{'en': 'SURel : A Gold Standard for Incorporating Meaning Shifts into Term Extraction', 'ar': 'سوريل: معيار ذهبي لدمج تحولات المعنى في استخراج المدى', 'es': 'SUREL: Un estándar de oro para incorporar cambios de significado en la extracción de términos', 'pt': 'SURel: Um padrão-ouro para incorporar mudanças de significado na extração de termos', 'fr': "SuReL\xa0: une référence absolue pour intégrer les changements de sens dans l'extraction de termes", 'ja': 'SURel ：用語抽出に意味シフトを組み込むためのゴールドスタンダード', 'ru': 'SURel: Золотой стандарт для включения смысловых сдвигов в извлечение терминов', 'zh': 'SURel:转义入术语取黄金', 'hi': 'SURel: शब्द निष्कर्षण में अर्थ शिफ्ट को शामिल करने के लिए एक स्वर्ण मानक', 'ga': 'SURel: Caighdeán Óir chun Aistrithe Brí a Ionchorprú in Eastóscadh Téarma', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ένα χρυσό πρότυπο για την ενσωμάτωση των σημασιολογικών μετατοπίσεων στην εξόρυξη όρων όρων', 'hu': 'SUrel: Arany szabvány a jelentési váltások beépítésére a kifejezés kivonásába', 'it': "SUrel: uno standard d'oro per incorporare cambiamenti di significato nell'estrazione del termine", 'kk': 'SURel: Құрамындау үшін алтын стандартты терминді тарқату', 'lt': 'SURel: Aukso standartas reikšmės perkėlimui į termino ekstrakciją įtraukti', 'mk': 'СУРЕЛ: Златен стандард за вклопување на значење се префрли во терминска екстракција', 'ms': 'SURel: Piawai Emas untuk memasukkan Peralihan Maknanya ke Ekstraksi Terma', 'ml': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'mt': 'SURel: Standard tad-Deheb għall-Inkorporazzjoni ta’ Shifts ta’ Sinjal fl-Estrazzjoni tat-Terminu', 'mn': 'СУРЕЛ: Ингээд оруулах алтын стандарт гэсэн утгатай судалгаанууд Term Extraction-д', 'no': 'SURel: Eit gull standard for inkorporasjonsforskyving i terminutpakking', 'pl': 'SUrel: Złoty standard włączania zmian znaczeniowych do ekstrakcji terminowej', 'sr': 'Zlatni standard za uključenje značajnih brodova u izvlačenje termina', 'ro': 'SUrel: Un standard de aur pentru încorporarea schimbărilor semnificative în extracția termenului', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'ta': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'sv': 'SUrel: En guldstandard för att införliva meningsskiften i termextraktion', 'ur': 'SUREL: ایک سوندی استاندارڈ ٹریم اٹھانے کے لئے ایک سوندی استاندارڈ', 'uz': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'vi': 'A Gold Standard of Incorporate meaning chuyển sang trung tâm dẫn ra', 'bg': 'Сурел: Златен стандарт за включване на промени в смисъла в извличането на термини', 'hr': 'SURel: Zlatni standard za uključenje značajnih brodova u izvlačenje termina', 'nl': 'SUrel: Een gouden standaard voor het opnemen van betekenisverschuivingen in termijnextractie', 'de': 'SUrel: Ein Goldstandard für die Einbeziehung von Bedeutungsverschiebungen in die Termextraktion', 'da': 'SUrel: En guldstandard for at indarbejde betydningsforskydninger i termekstraktion', 'ko': 'SURel: 용어 추출에 의미 변환을 포함하는 황금 기준', 'fa': 'SURel: یک استاندارد طلا برای درآوردن معنی کشتی\u200cها به خارج شدن کلمه', 'sw': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'tr': 'SURel: içine girmek üçin Altyn Standardy demek gemileri Term A çmak', 'id': 'SURel: Sebuah Standard Emas untuk memasukkan Peralihan Arti ke Ekstraksi Term', 'am': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'SURel: A Gold Standard for Incorporating Meaning Shifts into Term Extraction', 'hy': 'Սուրլ. Ոսկու ստանդարտ, որպեսզի ներառենք իմաստը, տեղափոխվում է տերմին արտահանելու մեջ', 'az': 'SURel: İnşallama məlumatı üçün altın Standard ı Termin Çıkarması', 'bs': 'SURel: Zlatni standard za uključenje značajnih brodova u izvlačenje termina', 'ca': "SURel: Un Estàndard d'or per incorporar significat canvia a l'extracció de termes", 'bn': 'SURel: টার্ম এক্সট্র্যাক্সট্র্যাক্টের মানে বিন্যাস করার জন্য সোনার স্ট্যান্ডার্ড', 'et': 'SUREL: Kuldstandard tähendusenihkete lisamiseks terminite ekstraheerimisse', 'fi': 'SUrel: Kultainen standardi merkityksenvaihtojen sisällyttämiseksi termien uuttamiseen', 'cs': 'SUrel: Zlatý standard pro začlenění významných posunů do termínové extrakce', 'jv': 'SURel: A gol Standard for Incoration', 'sk': 'SUrel: Zlati standard za vključevanje pomenskih premikov v ekstrakcijo izrazov', 'ha': 'SURLL: An daidaita wata takarda na Golin Aiki na Tsariya zuwa Cire Bayanta', 'bo': 'SURel: ནང་འབྲེལ་བའི་རྒྱ་མཚོན་གྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཞིག་གིས་དུས་ཚོད་འཕགས་རིས་ནང་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག', 'he': 'SURel: A Gold Standard for Incorporating Meaning Shifts into Term Extraction'}
{'en': 'We introduce SURel, a novel dataset with human-annotated meaning shifts between general-language and domain-specific contexts. We show that meaning shifts of term candidates cause errors in term extraction, and demonstrate that the SURel annotation reflects these errors. Furthermore, we illustrate that SURel enables us to assess optimisations of term extraction techniques when incorporating meaning shifts.', 'ar': 'نقدم SURel ، وهي مجموعة بيانات جديدة مع تحولات معاني مشروحة بشريًا بين سياقات اللغة العامة والسياقات الخاصة بالمجال. نوضح أن تحولات المعنى في المصطلحات المرشحة تسبب أخطاء في استخراج المصطلح ، ونوضح أن التعليق التوضيحي لـ SURel يعكس هذه الأخطاء. علاوة على ذلك ، نوضح أن SURel يمكننا من تقييم تحسينات تقنيات استخراج المصطلحات عند دمج تحولات المعنى.', 'es': 'Presentamos SUREl, un conjunto de datos novedoso con cambios de significado anotados por humanos entre el lenguaje general y el contexto específico del dominio. Mostramos que los cambios de significado de los candidatos a mandato causan errores en la extracción de términos y demostramos que la anotación SUREL refleja estos errores. Además, ilustramos que SUREL nos permite evaluar las optimizaciones de las técnicas de extracción de términos al incorporar cambios de significado.', 'fr': "Nous présentons SuReL, un nouveau jeu de données avec des changements de sens annotés par des humains entre des contextes de langage général et des contextes spécifiques à un domaine. Nous montrons que les changements de sens des candidats de termes provoquent des erreurs dans l'extraction des termes et démontrons que l'annotation SureL reflète ces erreurs. En outre, nous montrons que SuReL nous permet d'évaluer les optimisations des techniques d'extraction de termes lors de l'intégration de changements de sens.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos o SURel, um novo conjunto de dados com mudanças de significado anotadas por humanos entre contextos de linguagem geral e específicos de domínio. Mostramos que as mudanças de significado de candidatos a termos causam erros na extração de termos e demonstramos que a anotação SURel reflete esses erros. Além disso, ilustramos que SURel nos permite avaliar otimizações de técnicas de extração de termos ao incorporar mudanças de significado.', 'ja': 'SURelは、一般的な言語とドメイン固有の文脈の間で人間が注釈を付けた意味のシフトを持つ新規のデータセットです。用語候補の意味シフトが用語抽出のエラーを引き起こすことを示し、SURelアノテーションがこれらのエラーを反映していることを示しています。さらに、SURelは、意味シフトを組み込む際に、用語抽出技術の最適化を評価することを可能にすることを示しています。', 'hi': 'हम SURel, मानव-एनोटेट अर्थ के साथ एक उपन्यास डेटासेट पेश करते हैं, जिसका अर्थ सामान्य-भाषा और डोमेन-विशिष्ट संदर्भों के बीच बदलाव करता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि शब्द उम्मीदवारों के अर्थ बदलाव शब्द निष्कर्षण में त्रुटियों का कारण बनते हैं, और प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि SURel एनोटेशन इन त्रुटियों को दर्शाता है। इसके अलावा, हम बताते हैं कि SURel हमें अर्थ बदलावों को शामिल करते समय शब्द निष्कर्षण तकनीकों के अनुकूलन का आकलन करने में सक्षम बनाता है।', 'zh': '引入SURel,此一新数集,有注释之义,可于凡言特定领上下文之间转换。 臣等明选术语之义,转致术语误,证 SURel 注之误。 此外,SURel使吾等得以合义转换,评术语取术之优化。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем SURel, новый набор данных с аннотированным человеком значением, который меняется между общеязычным и доменным контекстом. Мы показываем, что смысловые сдвиги терминов-кандидатов вызывают ошибки в извлечении терминов, и демонстрируем, что аннотация SURel отражает эти ошибки. Кроме того, мы иллюстрируем, что SURel позволяет нам оценивать оптимизацию методов извлечения терминов при включении смысловых сдвигов.', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach SURel, tacar sonraí úrnua le haistrithe brí daonna-nótáilte idir comhthéacsanna ginearálta teanga agus fearainn-shonracha. Léirímid go n-eascraíonn aistrithe brí iarrthóirí téarma earráidí in eastóscadh téarma, agus léirímid go léiríonn anótáil SURel na hearráidí sin. Ina theannta sin, léirímid go gcuireann SURel ar ár gcumas measúnú a dhéanamh ar optamúcháin ar theicnící asbhainte téarma agus athruithe brí á n-ionchorprú againn.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων με ανθρώπινες σχολιασμένες μεταβολές νοήματος μεταξύ γενικής γλώσσας και ειδικού τομέα. Δείχνουμε ότι οι μεταβολές των εννοιών των υποψηφίων όρων προκαλούν λάθη στην εξαγωγή όρων και αποδεικνύουμε ότι η σημείωση αντικατοπτρίζει αυτά τα λάθη. Επιπλέον, καταδεικνύουμε ότι η SUrel μας επιτρέπει να αξιολογούμε βελτιστοποιήσεις των τεχνικών εξαγωγής όρων όταν ενσωματώνουμε αλλαγές εννοιών.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a SUrel-t, egy új adatkészletet, amely emberi jegyzetekkel ellátott jelentéskészlet változik az általános nyelv és a domain-specifikus kontextusok között. Megmutatjuk, hogy a kifejezések jelentéstétele hibákat okoz a kifejezések kivonásában, és bemutatjuk, hogy a SUrel jegyzetek ezeket a hibákat tükrözi. Ezenkívül azt is bemutatjuk, hogy a SUrel lehetővé teszi számunkra, hogy értékeljük a kifejezések extrakciós technikáinak optimalizálását jelentésváltások beépítésekor.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ SURel-ს გაჩვენებთ, პრომენტის მონაცემების კონტექსტი, რომელიც ადამიანის ანოტირებული ნიშნავს ცვლილება საერთო ენის და დიომინის განსაკუთრებული კონტექს ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ნიშნავს, რომ ტერმინის კონდიდიტების შეცვლები შეცდომა ტერმინის ექსტრექციაში და გამოჩვენება, რომ SURel ნიშნაცია ამ შეცდომების განახლება. დამატებით, ჩვენ თლუსტრატირებთ, რომ SURel გვაქვს შესაძლებლობა ჩვენ დავუწეროთ პრომენტის ექსტრექციის ტექნიკების ოპტიმიზაციები, როდესაც შევყვანეთ სიტ', 'it': "Introducemo SUrel, un nuovo dataset con passaggi di significato annotati dall'uomo tra il linguaggio generale e i contesti specifici del dominio. Mostriamo che i cambiamenti di significato dei candidati ai termini causano errori nell'estrazione dei termini e dimostriamo che l'annotazione SUrel riflette questi errori. Inoltre, mostriamo che SUrel ci permette di valutare l'ottimizzazione delle tecniche di estrazione dei termini quando incorporano cambiamenti di significato.", 'kk': 'Біз SURel- ді, адамдардың жалпы тіл мен доменге ерекше контексттер арасындағы ауыстыру мәліметі бар романдық деректер жиынын келтіреміз. Біз терминдің кандидаттарының өзгерістерін терминдің тарқатуында қателерді сезіп, SURel жазбаларының осы қателерді көрсетеді. Қосымша, SURel бізге сөздерді тарқату техникаларының оптимизацияларын оқу мүмкіндігін көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome SURel, naują duomenų rinkinį, kuriame žmogaus anotuota reikšmė keičiasi tarp bendrosios kalbos ir konkrečios srities kontekstų. Mes rodome, kad term in ų kandidatų pakeitimai sukelia klaidų ištraukiant terminus, ir rodome, kad SURel anotacija atspindi šias klaidas. Be to, iliustruojame, kad SURel leidžia mums įvertinti terminų gavybos metodų optimizacijas, atsižvelgiant į reikšmės pokyčius.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan SURel, set data yang baru dengan makna manusia-anotasi berubah antara konteks-bahasa umum dan domain-spesifik. Kami menunjukkan bahawa perubahan makna calon terma menyebabkan ralat dalam ekstraksi terma, dan menunjukkan bahawa anotasi SURel mencerminkan ralat ini. Selain itu, kami memperlihatkan bahawa SURel membolehkan kita untuk menilai peningkatan teknik ekstraksi terma apabila memasukkan perubahan makna.', 'mk': 'Ние го претставуваме СУРЕЛ, нов набор на податоци со промени на значење на човекот помеѓу генералниот јазик и контекстите специфични за домен. Ние покажуваме дека значењето на промените на терминските кандидати предизвикува грешки во терминската екстракција, и покажуваме дека анатацијата на СУРЕл ги одразува овие грешки. Покрај тоа, ние илустрираме дека СУРЕЛ ни овозможува да ги процениме оптимизациите на техниките на терминска екстракција при вклучувањето на значењето промени.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d സുറെലിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, മനുഷ്യരുടെ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളുമായ ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അതിന്റെ  വാക്ക് പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നവരുടെ മാറ്റം നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. വാക്ക് പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതില്\u200d പിശകുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാ അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു, ശുരേല്\u200d മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രത്യേക സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകളെ പരിഗ', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu SURel, sett ta’ dejta ġdid b’bidliet ta’ tifsira annotata mill-bniedem bejn kuntesti speċifiċi għall-lingwa ġenerali u d-dominju. Aħna nuru li bidliet fit-tifsira tal-kandidati għal terminu jikkawżaw żbalji fl-estrazzjoni fit-terminu, u nuru li l-annotazzjoni tas-SURel tirrifletti dawn l-iżbalji. Furthermore, we illustrate that SURel enables us to assess optimisations of term extraction techniques when incorporating meaning shifts.', 'mn': 'Бид SURel-г хүн төрөлхтний нэр тодорхойлогдсон шинэ өгөгдлийн сангуудыг танилцуулдаг. Үүний утга нь хэлэлцээний захирагчид алдаа гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Тэгээд SURel-ын захирагчид эдгээр алдаа гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Үүнээс гадна бид SURel нь утгын өөрчлөлтийг нэгтгэх үед томъёог гаргах технологийг баталж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer SURel, eit nytt dataset med menneskelig merkelig forskyving mellom generell-language og domenespesifikke kontekstar. Vi viser at forskyving av uttrykk av uttrykk fører til feil i uttrykk av uttrykk, og viser at SURel- notasjonen reflekterer desse feilene. I tillegg illustrerer vi at SURel tillater oss å vurdere optimizasjonar av terminekstraksjonskjer når det inkluderer forskyvingar.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy SUrel, nowatorski zestaw danych o znaczeniach opartych na człowieku, które przesuwają się między kontekstami ogólnojęzycznymi a kontekstami specyficznymi dla domeny. Pokazujemy, że zmiany znaczenia kandydatów terminów powodują błędy w ekstrakcji terminów i wykazujemy, że adnotacja SUrel odzwierciedla te błędy. Ponadto ilustrujemy, że SUrel pozwala nam ocenić optymalizacje technik ekstrakcji terminów przy uwzględnianiu zmian znaczeniowych.', 'ro': 'Introducem SUrel, un nou set de date cu schimbări de semnificații între limbajul general și contextele specifice domeniului. Arătăm că schimbările de semnificație ale candidaților la termen cauzează erori în extragerea termenului și demonstrăm că adnotarea SUrel reflectă aceste erori. În plus, ilustrăm faptul că SUrel ne permite să evaluăm optimizările tehnicilor de extracție a termenilor atunci când încorporăm schimbări de sens.', 'si': 'අපි SUREL විදිහට පෙනුම් කරනවා, මිනිස්සුන්ගේ අදහසක් තියෙනවා කියලා, සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාවය සහ ඩොමේන් විශේෂ සංව අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ඒ අදහස් වෙනස් වෙන්නේ කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කිය ඉතින්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ SUREL අපිට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ අදහස් වෙනස් කරන්න කියලා', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo SURel, novi set podataka sa ljudskim označenim smjenama između generalnog jezika i specifičnog domena. Pokazaæemo da znaèi promjene terminalnih kandidata uzrokuju greške u izrazu izvlaèenja i pokazujemo da navoðenje SURel odražava ove greške. Osim toga, ilustrujemo da nam SURel omogućava da procenimo optimizaciju tehnika izražavanja termina kada uključujemo smjene značenja.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa SURel, taas oo ah macluumaad warqada qoyska ee dadka la taxeeyey, taas oo micnaheedu yahay beddelka afka guud iyo xilliyada gaarka ah ee gudaha. Waxaynu tusnaa in beddelka mushaarkii waqtiga ah ay sababto khaldooyin waqtiga la soo saaray, waxaana muujinnaa in kasoo jeedo qaladkan SURel. Furthermore, waxaynu muujinnaa in SURel inagu habboon karo qiimeynta qalabka soo baxa marka la soo geliyo qalabka macnaheedka.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar SUrel, ett nytt dataset med mänskligt kommenterade meningsskiften mellan generellt språk och domänspecifika sammanhang. Vi visar att meningsskiften av termkandidater orsakar fel i termutvinningen, och visar att SUrel-anteckningen återspeglar dessa fel. Vidare illustrerar vi att SUrel gör det möjligt för oss att utvärdera optimeringar av termextraktionstekniker när vi införlivar meningsskiften.', 'ta': 'நாம் SURel, ஒரு புதிய தரவுத்தளத்தை அறிவி நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் என்று அர்த்தம் காலத்தின் மாற்றங்களை காட்டுகிறோம் மாற்றங்களின் பிழை பிரித்துக் கொண்டுள்ளது, மற் மேலும், SURel மாற்றங்களை சேர்க்கும் போது காலத்தின் வெளியேற்றும் தொழில்நுட்பத்தின் நம்பிக்கைகளை மதிப்பிட முடியும', 'ur': 'ہم SURel کو معرفی کرتے ہیں، ایک نو ڈیٹ سٹ جو انسان کے ذریعہ منظورت کی تعریف کے ساتھ عمومی زبان اور ڈومین کے خاص کنٹکسٹس کے درمیان تغییر کرتی ہے. ہم اس معنی کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ کلمات کڈینڈیٹوں کی تغییرات ٹکڑے ٹکڑے ٹکڑے ٹکڑے ٹکڑے ٹکڑے ٹکڑے ٹکڑے ٹکڑے کرتی ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ SURel ٹکڑے ان خطاوں کو دکھ اور اس کے علاوہ، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ SURel ہمیں توریت اضافہ تکنیکیوں کی optimization کی آزمائش کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے جب معنی تغییر کے ساتھ شامل ہوتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Biz SURel, inson taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar tarkibini o'rganimiz, umumiy tilda va domen-specific xizmatlar orasidagi o'zgarishlar. Biz bu so'zlar o'zgarishlarini o'zgartiradik so'zning tuzilishida xatolarni ko'rsatamiz va SURel taʼminlovchisi bu xatolarni ko'rsatadi. Ko'rib, biz SURel o'zgarishlarni o'zgartirish imkoniyatini o'zgartirish imkoniyatini o'ylab beradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng ta sẽ giới thiệu surel, một bộ dữ liệu mới với ý nghĩa con người-ghi-chú thay đổi giữa ngôn ngữ chung và ngữ-đặc-miền. Chúng tôi cho thấy sự thay đổi của các ứng cử viên có nghĩa là gây lỗi trong việc trích hạn, và chứng minh rằng chú thích giao thức cá nhân phản ánh lỗi này. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi có thể minh họa rằng Surlen đã cho phép chúng tôi đánh giá khả năng cải thiện các kỹ thuật trích thuật thuật ngữ khi nhập vào các thay đổi có ý nghĩa.', 'nl': 'We introduceren SUrel, een nieuwe dataset met menselijke annotatie betekenisverschuivingen tussen algemene taal en domein-specifieke contexten. We tonen aan dat betekenisverschuivingen van termkandidaten fouten veroorzaken in termextractie, en tonen aan dat de SURel annotatie deze fouten weerspiegelt. Verder illustreren we dat SURel ons in staat stelt optimalisaties van termextractietechnieken te beoordelen bij het opnemen van betekenisverschuivingen.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo SURel, novu kompetu podataka s ljudskim označenim smjenama između općeg jezika i domena specifičnih konteksta. Pokazujemo da smjena izraženih kandidata uzrokuje greške u izraženom izvlačenju i pokazujemo da navodna navodnost SURel odražava te greške. Osim toga, ilustrujemo da nam SURel omogućava procijeniti optimizaciju tehnika izražavanja termina kada uključujemo smjene značenja.', 'bg': 'Представяме нов набор от данни с анотирани от човека промени на значението между общия език и специфичния за домейна контекст. Показваме, че изместването на значението на кандидатите за срок причинява грешки при извличането на термини и демонстрираме, че анотацията отразява тези грешки. Освен това илюстрираме, че ни позволява да оценим оптимизациите на техниките за извличане на термини при включване на промени в значението.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer SUrel, et nyt datasæt med menneskespecifikke betydningsforskydninger mellem generelt sprog og domænespecifikke sammenhænge. Vi viser, at betydningsforskydninger af termkandidater forårsager fejl i termudtrækning, og demonstrerer, at SUrel-annotationen afspejler disse fejl. Desuden illustrerer vi, at SUrel gør det muligt for os at vurdere optimeringer af termekstraktionsteknikker, når vi indarbejder betydningsforskydninger.', 'ko': '일반 언어와 특정 영역의 컨텍스트 사이에서 전환할 수 있는 인류 주석의 의미를 지닌 새로운 데이터 세트를 소개합니다.후보 용어의 의미 이동으로 인해 용어 추출에 오류가 발생할 수 있음을 입증했으며 SURel 주석에 이러한 오류가 반영되었음을 입증했습니다.또한 SURel은 의미 이동에 포함될 때 용어 추출 기술의 최적화를 평가할 수 있도록 해줍니다.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan SURel, sebuah set data baru dengan arti manusia-anotasi perubahan antara bahasa umum dan konteks domain-spesifik. Kami menunjukkan bahwa perubahan arti dari kandidat istilah menyebabkan kesalahan dalam ekstraksi istilah, dan menunjukkan bahwa anotasi SURel merefleksikan kesalahan ini. Selain itu, kami memperlihatkan bahwa SURel memungkinkan kita untuk menilai optimasi teknik ekstraksi istilah ketika menggabungkan perubahan arti.', 'de': 'Wir stellen SUrel vor, einen neuartigen Datensatz mit human-annotierten Bedeutungsverschiebungen zwischen allgemeinsprachlichen und domänenspezifischen Kontexten. Wir zeigen, dass Bedeutungsverschiebungen von Termkandidaten Fehler in der Termextraktion verursachen und zeigen, dass die SURel-Annotation diese Fehler widerspiegelt. Darüber hinaus zeigen wir, dass SURel es uns ermöglicht, Optimierungen von Termextraktionstechniken unter Einbeziehung von Bedeutungsverschiebungen zu bewerten.', 'fa': 'ما SURel را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای نویس با تغییرات معنی\u200cای که به انسان نشان داده می\u200cشود بین محیط\u200cهای مخصوص ژنرال زبان و دومین. ما این معنی را نشان می دهیم که تغییرات کلمه کاندیداتی\u200cها در استخراج کلمه اشتباه می\u200cکنند و نشان می\u200cدهیم که نویسنده\u200cی SURel این اشتباه\u200cها را نشان می\u200cدهد. علاوه بر این، ما نشان می دهیم که SURel به ما اجازه می دهد که زمانی که تغییرات معنی را جمع می کند بهترین تغییرات تکنیک استخراج term را ارزیابی کنیم.', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha SURel, seti ya taarifa za riwaya yenye maana ya mabadiliko ya lugha ya jumla na matatizo maalum ya ndani. Tunaonyesha kwamba mabadiliko ya wagombea wa muhula yanasababisha makosa katika uteuzi wa muhula, na kuonyesha kwamba matangazo ya SURel yanaonyesha makosa haya. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha kwamba SURel inatuwezesha kutathmini matumaini ya mbinu za uteuzi wa muhula wakati wa kuingiza mabadiliko ya maana.', 'af': "Ons introduiseer SURel, 'n nuwe datastel met mens-annotated betekenis verskuif tussen generelle-taal en domein-spesifieke kontekste. Ons wys dat betekenis verskuif van term kandidate veroorsaak foute in term uittrekking, en wys dat die SURel annotasie reflekteer hierdie foute. Maar ons illustreer dat SURel ons toelaat om optimaliseerings van term uittrekking tekniks te vurk wanneer betekenis verskuiwes inkorporeer word.", 'tr': "Biz SURel'i, adam bilen nähili möhüm bolan sözleri bilen täze bir dataseti bilen tanyşdyrýarys. Biz bu sözlerniň üýtgewleriniň saýlamasynyň ýüze çykyşlygyny görkeýäris we bu sözlerniň üstine ýalňyşlygyny görkezýäris. Munuň üçin, SURel bize näme üçin üýtgeşmeleri dahil etmek üçin termyny açma tekniklerini barlamaga mümkin edýäris.", 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë SURel, një set të dhënash të reja me kuptim të anotuar nga njerëzit ndryshon midis gjeneral-gjuhës dhe konteksteve specifike për domenin. Ne tregojmë se ndryshimet e kuptimit të kandidatëve të afatit shkaktojnë gabime në nxjerrjen e afatit dhe demonstrojmë se anotacioni i SURel pasqyron këto gabime. Përveç kësaj, ne ilustrojmë se SURel na lejon të vlerësojmë optimizacionet e teknikave të nxjerrjes termike kur përfshijmë ndryshime kuptimi.', 'am': 'የሰው አነስተኛ ቋንቋ እና የዶሜን ግንኙነት መካከል የተለወጠውን የመረጃ ዳታዎችን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የጊዜው ተቃውሞ የሚቆጠሩት ተሳሳቾች ሲያሳዩ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ፣ SURel የተለወጠውን የጊዜው ውጤት ማሳየትን እንዲችል እናሳውራለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ՍուՌել-ը, մարդկային նկարագրված նշանակության նոր տվյալների համակարգը, որը փոխվում է ընդհանուր լեզվի և բնագավառի կոնտեքստների միջև: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ տերմինային թեկնածուների փոխումները սխալներ են առաջացնում տերմինային արտահանման մեջ, և ցույց են տալիս, որ Սուրել նոտացիան արտացոլում է այս սխալները: Ավելին, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ SOREL-ը մեզ հնարավորություն է տալիս գնահատել տերմինային վերացման տեխնոլոգիաների լավատեսումները, երբ ներառվում են իմաստային փոփոխություններ:', 'bn': 'We introduce SURel, a novel dataset with human-annotated meaning shifts between general-language and domain-specific contexts.  আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে মেয়াদের প্রার্থীদের পরিবর্তনের মানে তারা মেয়াদ বের করে তুলেছে এবং তারা প্রমাণিত করছে যে শিরেলের বিবেচনা এই এছাড়াও আমরা বর্ণনা করি যে শিউরেল আমাদের মানে পরিবর্তনের মানে পরিবর্তন করার সময় মেয়াদ বের করা কৌশলের আশাবাদের মূল্যায়ন করে দেয়।', 'az': "Biz SURel'i yeni veril…ôr quruluruq, insanlarńĪn m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪn genel dil il…ô domen m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪn arasńĪndakńĪ d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôri il…ô t…ôŇükil edirik. Biz bu s√∂zl…ôrin d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôrinin d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôrini g√∂st…ôririk ki, s√∂zl…ôrin d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôrinin d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôrinin d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôrin…ô g√∂r…ô x…ôtalar √ßńĪxarńĪlmasńĪ olar v…ô SURel s√∂zl…ôrinin bu x…ôtalarńĪ g√∂st…ôrir. Daha sonra, SURel'in bizim anlamńĪnńĪn d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôrini birl…ôŇüdir…ôrk…ôn term extraction teknikl…ôrinin optimizasiyonlarńĪnńĪ t…ôsdiql…ôm…ôsini m√ľmk√ľn edir.", 'ca': "We introduce SURel, a novel dataset with human-annotated meaning shifts between general-language and domain-specific contexts.  Mostrem que els canvis de terme provoquen errors en l'extracció de terme i demostrem que l'anotació de SURel reflecteix aquests errors. A més, il·lustrem que SURel ens permet valorar les optimitzacions de les tècniques d'extracció de termes quan incorporem canvis de significat.", 'cs': 'Představujeme SUrel, nový datový soubor s lidskými anotovanými významy přecházejícími mezi obecným jazykem a doménově specifickým kontextem. Ukazujeme, že významové posuny kandidátů výrazů způsobují chyby v extrakci termů a demonstrujeme, že anotace SUrel tyto chyby odráží. Dále ukazujeme, že SUrel nám umožňuje hodnotit optimalizace technik extrakce termínů při začlenění významových posunů.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo SURel, novi set podataka sa ljudskim označenim smjenama između općeg jezika i specifičnih konteksta domena. Pokazujemo da smjena izraženih kandidata uzrokuje greške u izraženom izvlačenju, i pokazujemo da navodnost SURel odražava te greške. Osim toga, ilustrujemo da nam SURel omogućava da procijenimo optimizaciju tehnika izražavanja termina kada uključujemo smjene značenja.', 'et': 'Tutvustame SUREL-i, uudset andmekogumit, millel on inimmärkidega tähendusenihked üldkeele ja domeenispetsiifiliste kontekstide vahel. Näitame, et termini kandidaatide tähendusenihked põhjustavad vigu termini ekstraheerimisel ja näitame, et SUREl annotatsioon peegeldab neid vigu. Lisaks illustreerime, et SUrel võimaldab meil hinnata terminite ekstraheerimise tehnikate optimeerimist tähendusmuutuste lisamisel.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme SUrelin, uuden aineiston, jossa on ihmisen merkitsemiä merkityksiä yleisen kielen ja toimialuekohtaisen kontekstin välillä. Osoitamme, että termiehdokkaiden merkityksenvaihdokset aiheuttavat virheitä termien erottamisessa, ja osoitamme, että SUrel-merkintä heijastaa näitä virheitä. Lisäksi havainnollistamme, että SUrelin avulla voimme arvioida termien uuttamistekniikoiden optimointia merkityssuuntauksen yhteydessä.', 'jv': 'We insert SURel, a new dataset with Human-anntatid means shifts amongst General-language and domain-special contexts. Awak dhéwé mungkin ngerti pergambar nggawe barang kelas kandidé nggawe barang urip dadi, lan mungkin nggawe barang SURel kuwi nggawe barang urip iki. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo SUrel, nov nabor podatkov s človeškimi oznakami pomena med splošnim jezikom in domenskim kontekstom. Pokažemo, da pomenski premiki kandidatov povzročajo napake pri ekstrakciji izrazov in dokazujemo, da opomba SUrel odraža te napake. Poleg tega ponazarjamo, da SUrel omogoča ocenjevanje optimizacij tehnik ekstrakcije izrazov pri vključevanju pomenskih premikov.', 'ha': 'Kana shawarar da SURel, wani danne na yanzu da aka faɗa wa mutum-yanzu masu amfani da musanya tsakanin harshen-zaman harshen da ke cikin-ƙunsa. Kana nũna musamman musamman musamman wagozaran mutane su sami ɓata cikin cire-cire, kuma za mu nuna cewa cewa shirin SURel na yi amfani da waɗannan ɓata. Furan haka, za mu bayyana SURel sai ka iya amfani da mu, kan ka ƙaddara misãlai ga masu cire-zafi masu shiryuwa da matsayin ayukan.', 'bo': 'We introduce SURel, a novel dataset with human-annotated meaning shifts between general-language and domain-specific contexts. འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཚིག་རྩོམ་པ་པོ་ལ་འགྱུར་བ་དེ་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་བྱུང་བ་རེད་སྟོན་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་SURel་གིས་ང་ཚོར་རྗེས་སུ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནང་གི་ཁྱད་པར་ཆོས་ཤིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'he': 'אנו מציגים את SURel, קבוצת נתונים חדשה עם משמעות אנושית מוצבעת משתנות בין רקע שפה כללית לבין רקע ספציפי. אנחנו מראים שהמשמעות שינויים של מועמדים למונחים גורמים לשגיאות בהוצאה המונחית, ולהראות שהציון של SURel משקף את השגיאות האלה. חוץ מזה, אנו מציגים שSURel מאפשר לנו להעריך אופטימציות של טכניקות חיפוש מונחים כאשר מכילים שינויים משמעותיים.'}
{'en': 'Second-order contexts from lexical substitutes for few-shot learning of word representations', 'pt': 'Contextos de segunda ordem a partir de substitutos lexicais para aprendizado de poucas tentativas de representações de palavras', 'ar': 'سياقات من الدرجة الثانية من البدائل المعجمية لتعلم تمثيلات الكلمات في لقطات قليلة', 'es': 'Contextos de segundo orden de sustitutos léxicos para el aprendizaje rápido de representaciones de palabras', 'fr': 'Contextes de second ordre à partir de substituts lexicaux pour un apprentissage ponctuel des représentations de mots', 'ja': '単語表現のほとんどのショット学習のための語彙的代替物からの二階コンテキスト', 'hi': 'शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व के कुछ-शॉट सीखने के लिए लेक्सिकल विकल्प से दूसरे क्रम के संदर्भ', 'zh': '词汇二阶上下文代单词少学也', 'ru': 'Контексты второго порядка из лексических заменителей для изучения слов', 'ga': "Comhthéacsanna dara hord ó fhoclóirí ionadach d'fhoghlaim cúpla seat de léirithe focal", 'ka': 'ლექსიკალური შეცვლების მეორე წერტილის კონტექსტი სიტყვების გამოყენება', 'el': 'Πλαίσια δεύτερης τάξης από λεξικά υποκατάστατα της εκμάθησης λέξεων ελάχιστης εμβέλειας', 'hu': 'Másodrendű kontextusok lexikai helyettesítőkből a szóreprezentációk néhány lövéses tanulásához', 'it': "Contesti di secondo ordine da sostituti lessicali per l'apprendimento a poche riprese delle rappresentazioni di parole", 'lt': 'Antrosios eilės kontekstai, gaunami iš leksinių pakaitalų, kai mokymasis žodžių atstovavimais yra nedidelis', 'mk': 'Контексти од втор ред од лексикални заменици за неколку снимки за учење на претставувања на зборови', 'kk': 'Лексикалық алмастырушылардың екінші ретіндегі контексті сөздерді көрсету үшін', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനായി ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d സ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും രണ്ടാമത്തെ ഉത്തരവാദി', 'ms': 'Second-order contexts from lexical substitutes for few-shot learning of word representations', 'mt': 'Kuntest tat-tieni ordni minn sostituti lexiċi għal tagħlim bi ftit fotografiji tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kliem', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Konteksty drugiego rzędu z leksykalicznych substytutów niewielkiej nauki reprezentacji słów', 'mn': 'Хоёр дахь дараагийн орлуулагчийн орлуулагчдын тухай хэд хэдэн зураг суралцахын тулд', 'ro': 'Contexte de ordinea a doua din substituenți lexicali pentru învățarea puțin-shot a reprezentărilor de cuvinte', 'sr': 'Drugi naređeni konteksti leksičkih zamjena za nekoliko snimanja učenja predstavljanja riječi', 'si': 'දෙවෙනි ක්\u200dරමාණය සම්බන්ධයක් ලෙක්සිකාලික වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන් වචන ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සඳහා වෙනුවෙන', 'so': 'Qoraalka labaad ee xarunta dhamaadka ah ee lexical beddelka ah ee barashada wax yar oo hadal wakiilayaal ah', 'sv': 'Andra ordningens kontexter från lexikala substitut för få skott lärande av ordrepresentationer', 'ta': 'இரண்டாவது வரிசையில் இருந்து லெக்சிக்சியல் மாற்றங்களிலிருந்து சில சொல்லை பிரதிநிதிகளின் கற்றலுக்கா', 'ur': 'لکسیکل کے بدلنے کے دوسرے اورڈ کنٹکسٹس لکھنے کے لئے بہت کم شٹ کی تعلیم لکھنے کے لئے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Quá trình thứ hai từ ngôn ngữ thay thế cho việc học tập các từ ngữ', 'nl': 'Second-order contexten van lexicale substituten voor weinig schot leren van woordrepresentaties', 'da': 'Anden ordens sammenhænge fra leksikalske erstatninger for få skud læring af ord repræsentationer', 'hr': 'Drugi redovni konteksti iz leksičkih zamjena za nekoliko snimanja učenja riječi zastupanja', 'bg': 'Контексти от втори ред от лексикални заместители на неколкократно учене на слово представяне', 'id': 'Konteks peringkat kedua dari pengganti leksik untuk belajar beberapa gambar dari representation kata', 'ko': '어휘 대체의 2 단계 언어 환경이 어휘 표징에 대한 단시간 학습', 'de': 'Kontexte zweiter Ordnung aus lexikalischen Substituten für seltenes Lernen von Wortrepräsentationen', 'fa': 'موضوع دوم از جایگزین زبانی برای یادگیری کمی از نمایش کلمات', 'sw': 'Mikongamano ya pili kutoka mabadiliko ya lexico kwa kujifunza maamuzi ya maneno machache', 'tr': 'Bir az resim öwrenmesi üçin lektik alan ikinji sıradan senedi', 'af': "Tweede volgorde konteks van leksiese vervangers vir 'n paar skoot leer van woorde voorstellings", 'sq': 'Kontekstet e rendit të dytë nga zëvendësuesit lexikë për mësimin me pak foto të përfaqësimeve të fjalëve', 'hy': 'Երկրորդ հատվածի կոնտեքստները բառերի ներկայացումների մի քանի նկարների ուսումնասիրելու լեքսիկական փոխարինակներից', 'bn': 'লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল বিনিময়ের দ্বিতীয় ক্ষেত্রে শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখার জন্য', 'am': 'የሁለተኛው የሥርዓት ግንኙነት ከሌክሲካ ውጤቶች ለጥቂት የቃላት መልዕክቶች ለመማር', 'bs': 'Drugi redni konteksti iz leksičkih zamjena za nekoliko pucnjava učenje predstavljanja riječi', 'cs': 'Kontexty druhého řádu z lexikálních náhrad několika výuky slovních reprezentací', 'az': 'İkinci sıralıq məlumatları, bir neçə şəkildə söz göstəricilərinin öyrənməsi üçün', 'ca': 'Contexts de segon ordre de substitucions lècsiques per aprendre poces fotos de representacions de paraules', 'et': 'Teise astme kontekstid leksikaalsetest asendajatest sõnarepresentatsioonide vähese võimalusega õppimisele', 'fi': 'Toisen luokan kontekstit sanaesitysten sanamuodon korvikkeista', 'jv': 'Text', 'sk': 'Konteksti drugega reda iz leksikalnih nadomestkov za manjše učenje besednih predstavitev', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'הקונקסטים של סדר שני מתחלפים לקסיים ללמוד במספר צילומים של מילים מייצגים', 'bo': 'གནད་དོན་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་པ་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཚབ་ནང་ནས་ཕན་ཚུན་བསྐྱར་བའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་ལ།'}
{'en': 'There is a growing awareness of the need to handle rare and unseen words in word representation modelling. In this paper, we focus on few-shot learning of emerging concepts that fully exploits only a few available contexts. We introduce a substitute-based context representation technique that can be applied on an existing word embedding space. Previous context-based approaches to modelling unseen words only consider bag-of-word first-order contexts, whereas our method aggregates contexts as second-order substitutes that are produced by a sequence-aware sentence completion model. We experimented with three tasks that aim to test the modelling of emerging concepts. We found that these tasks show different emphasis on first and second order contexts, and our substitute-based method achieves superior performance on naturally-occurring contexts from corpora.', 'fr': "Il existe une prise de conscience croissante de la nécessité de traiter des mots rares et invisibles dans les modèles de représentation des mots. Dans cet article, nous nous concentrons sur l'apprentissage ponctuel de concepts émergents qui n'exploitent pleinement que quelques contextes disponibles. Nous introduisons une technique de représentation contextuelle basée sur des substituts qui peut être appliquée à un espace d'incorporation de mots existant. Les approches contextuelles précédentes de modélisation de mots invisibles ne prennent en compte que les contextes de premier ordre à sac de mots, alors que notre méthode agrège les contextes en tant que substituts du second ordre produits par un modèle d'achèvement de phrase sensible à la séquence. Nous avons expérimenté trois tâches qui visent à tester la modélisation de concepts émergents. Nous avons constaté que ces tâches mettent l'accent différemment sur les contextes de premier et de second ordre, et que notre méthode basée sur les substituts permet d'obtenir des performances supérieures dans des contextes naturels issus de corpus.", 'es': 'Hay una creciente conciencia de la necesidad de manejar palabras raras e invisibles en el modelado de representación de palabras. En este artículo, nos centramos en el aprendizaje rápido de conceptos emergentes que explota completamente solo unos pocos contextos disponibles. Presentamos una técnica de representación de contexto basada en sustitutos que se puede aplicar en un espacio de incrustación de palabras existente. Los enfoques anteriores basados en el contexto para modelar palabras invisibles solo consideran contextos de primer orden de bolsa de palabras, mientras que nuestro método agrega contextos como sustitutos de segundo orden que se producen mediante un modelo de finalización de oraciones consciente de la secuencia. Experimentamos con tres tareas que tienen como objetivo probar el modelado de conceptos emergentes. Descubrimos que estas tareas muestran un énfasis diferente en los contextos de primer y segundo orden, y nuestro método basado en sustitutos logra un rendimiento superior en contextos naturales de los cuerpos.', 'pt': 'Há uma consciência crescente da necessidade de lidar com palavras raras e não vistas na modelagem de representação de palavras. Neste artigo, nos concentramos no aprendizado em poucas etapas de conceitos emergentes que exploram totalmente apenas alguns contextos disponíveis. Introduzimos uma técnica de representação de contexto baseada em substitutos que pode ser aplicada em um espaço de incorporação de palavras existente. As abordagens anteriores baseadas em contexto para modelar palavras invisíveis consideram apenas contextos de primeira ordem do tipo bag-of-word, enquanto nosso método agrega contextos como substitutos de segunda ordem que são produzidos por um modelo de conclusão de sentença com reconhecimento de sequência. Experimentamos três tarefas que visam testar a modelagem de conceitos emergentes. Descobrimos que essas tarefas mostram ênfase diferente em contextos de primeira e segunda ordem, e nosso método baseado em substitutos alcança desempenho superior em contextos de ocorrência natural de corpora.', 'ar': 'هناك وعي متزايد بالحاجة إلى التعامل مع الكلمات النادرة وغير المرئية في نمذجة تمثيل الكلمات. في هذه الورقة ، نركز على القليل من التعلم للمفاهيم الناشئة التي تستغل فقط عددًا قليلاً من السياقات المتاحة. نقدم تقنية تمثيل السياق القائمة على البديل والتي يمكن تطبيقها على مساحة تضمين كلمة موجودة. المناهج السابقة القائمة على السياق لنمذجة الكلمات غير المرئية لا تراعي سوى سياقات الترتيب الأول لحقيبة الكلمات ، بينما تقوم طريقتنا بتجميع السياقات كبدائل من الدرجة الثانية يتم إنتاجها بواسطة نموذج إتمام الجملة المدرك للتسلسل. جربنا ثلاث مهام تهدف إلى اختبار نمذجة المفاهيم الناشئة. وجدنا أن هذه المهام تُظهر تركيزًا مختلفًا على السياقات من الدرجة الأولى والثانية ، وأن طريقتنا القائمة على البدائل تحقق أداءً فائقًا في السياقات التي تحدث بشكل طبيعي من المجموعات.', 'zh': '人益意见单词建模处罕见、不见之单词必要性。 于本文,重言少学,以尽其上下文。 引入一本上下文,可施于空。 旧上下文模拟不见之单词,惟思单词囊一阶上下文,而合上下文为序感句成形者二阶代项。 我试三务,以试新兴之建模。 一阶二阶上下文不同,盖自语料库上下文而成卓异也。', 'hi': 'शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व मॉडलिंग में दुर्लभ और अनदेखी शब्दों को संभालने की आवश्यकता के बारे में जागरूकता बढ़ रही है। इस पेपर में, हम उभरती हुई अवधारणाओं के कुछ-शॉट सीखने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं जो पूरी तरह से केवल कुछ उपलब्ध संदर्भों का शोषण करते हैं। हम एक स्थानापन्न-आधारित संदर्भ प्रतिनिधित्व तकनीक पेश करते हैं जिसे मौजूदा शब्द एम्बेडिंग स्पेस पर लागू किया जा सकता है। अनदेखी शब्दों को मॉडलिंग करने के लिए पिछले संदर्भ-आधारित दृष्टिकोण केवल बैग-ऑफ-वर्ड प्रथम-क्रम के संदर्भों पर विचार करते हैं, जबकि हमारी विधि संदर्भों को दूसरे-क्रम के विकल्प के रूप में एकत्रित करती है जो अनुक्रम-जागरूक वाक्य पूर्णता मॉडल द्वारा उत्पादित होते हैं। हमने तीन कार्यों के साथ प्रयोग किया जिसका उद्देश्य उभरती अवधारणाओं के मॉडलिंग का परीक्षण करना है। हमने पाया कि ये कार्य पहले और दूसरे क्रम के संदर्भों पर अलग-अलग जोर देते हैं, और हमारी स्थानापन्न-आधारित विधि कॉर्पोरेट से स्वाभाविक रूप से होने वाले संदर्भों पर बेहतर प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करती है।', 'ja': '単語表現モデリングで希少で見えない単語を扱う必要性についての認識が高まっています。本稿では、利用可能なわずかな文脈のみを完全に利用する新たな概念の数ヶ月間の学習に焦点を当てる。既存の単語埋め込み空間に適用できる代替ベースのコンテキスト表現技術を紹介します。目に見えない単語をモデリングする以前の文脈ベースのアプローチは、一階の文脈のみを考慮していますが、私たちの方法は、シーケンス認識文完了モデルによって生成される二階の代替として文脈を集約します。新たな概念のモデリングをテストすることを目的とした3つのタスクを実験しました。これらのタスクは、一次コンテキストと二次コンテキストで異なる強調を示し、代替ベースの方法は、コーパスから自然に発生するコンテキストで優れたパフォーマンスを達成することがわかりました。', 'ru': 'Растет понимание необходимости обработки редких и невидимых слов в моделировании представления слов. В этом документе мы сосредоточимся на изучении возникающих концепций в несколько этапов, которые в полной мере используют лишь несколько доступных контекстов. Мы вводим метод представления контекста на основе замены, который может быть применен к существующему пространству вложения слов. Предыдущие контекстно-ориентированные подходы к моделированию невидимых слов рассматривают только контексты первого порядка, в то время как наш метод агрегирует контексты как замены второго порядка, которые производятся моделью завершения предложения, учитывающей последовательность. Мы экспериментировали с тремя задачами, которые направлены на тестирование моделирования возникающих концепций. Мы обнаружили, что эти задачи демонстрируют различный акцент на контекстах первого и второго порядка, и наш метод, основанный на замене, достигает превосходной производительности в естественных контекстах из тел.', 'ga': 'Tá feasacht ag méadú ar an ngá atá le focail neamhchoitianta agus nach bhfeictear a láimhseáil i múnlú ionadaíochta focal. Sa pháipéar seo, dírímid ar fhoghlaim bheagán ar choincheapa éiritheacha a bhaineann leas iomlán as ach cúpla comhthéacs atá ar fáil. Tugaimid isteach teicníocht ionadaíochta comhthéacs bunaithe ar ionadach is féidir a chur i bhfeidhm ar spás neadaithe focal atá ann cheana féin. Ní bhreithníonn cur chuige comhthéacs-bhunaithe roimhe seo chun focail nach bhfacthas a shamhaltú ach comhthéacsanna céad-ord an mhála focal, ach comhiomlánaíonn ár modh comhthéacsanna mar ionadaigh dara hord a tháirgtear trí mhúnla críochnaithe abairtí atá feasach ar sheicheamh. Rinneamar trí thasc a bhfuil sé mar aidhm acu samhaltú na gcoincheap atá ag teacht chun cinn a thástáil. Fuaireamar amach go léiríonn na tascanna seo béim éagsúil ar chomhthéacsanna den chéad agus den dara ord, agus go mbaineann ár modh ionad-bhunaithe feidhmíocht níos fearr amach as comhthéacsanna a tharlaíonn go nádúrtha ón gcorpas.', 'ka': 'არსებობს უფრო დიდი ცნობიერება საჭირო სიტყვების გამოსახულებაში, რომელიც არაჩვენებული სიტყვების გამოსახულება. ამ დოკუნტში, ჩვენ განვითარებული კონტექსტების რამდენიმე სწავლებაზე დავუყენებთ, რომელიც უფრო გამოიყენება მხოლოდ რამდენიმე შესაძლებელი კო ჩვენ შეცვალოთ კონტექსტურაციის ტექნექცია, რომელიც შეიძლება გამოყენება სექსტურაციის სიტყვებზე. პირველი კონტექსტური დაბათებული მიღება არაჩვენებული სიტყვების მოდელის შესახებ მხოლოდ პირველი სიტყვების კონტექსტის შესახებ, მაგრამ ჩვენი მეტი აგგრეგებს კონტექსტის როგორც მეორე წერტილის შეც ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტირებდით სამი დავალებით, რომლებიც მიზეზიან დავიწყებული კონფექტების მოდელურება. ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ეს დავალებები განსხვავებული აღმოჩნდება პირველი და მეორე წესების კონტექსტზე, და ჩვენი შეცვლელი მეტი გადაიყენება უფრო მეტი გავაკეთება კონტექსტზე, რომელიც სა', 'el': 'Υπάρχει μια αυξανόμενη επίγνωση της ανάγκης χειρισμού σπάνιων και αόρατων λέξεων στη μοντελοποίηση αναπαράστασης λέξεων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εστιάζουμε στην εκμάθηση νέων εννοιών που αξιοποιούν πλήρως μόνο μερικά διαθέσιμα πλαίσια. Εισάγουμε μια τεχνική αναπαράστασης περιβάλλοντος βασισμένη σε υποκατάστατα που μπορεί να εφαρμοστεί σε έναν υπάρχον χώρο ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων. Οι προηγούμενες προσεγγίσεις που βασίζονται στο πλαίσιο για τη μοντελοποίηση αόρατων λέξεων λαμβάνουν υπόψη μόνο τα πλαίσια πρώτης τάξης, ενώ η μέθοδος μας συγκεντρώνει τα πλαίσια ως υποκατάστατα δεύτερης τάξης που παράγονται από ένα μοντέλο ολοκλήρωσης προτάσεων με επίγνωση ακολουθίας. Πειραματιστήκαμε με τρεις εργασίες που στοχεύουν στη δοκιμή της μοντελοποίησης αναδυόμενων εννοιών. Διαπιστώσαμε ότι αυτές οι εργασίες δείχνουν διαφορετική έμφαση στα πλαίσια πρώτης και δεύτερης τάξης, και η μέθοδος που βασίζεται σε υποκατάστατα επιτυγχάνει ανώτερη απόδοση σε φυσικά περιβάλλοντα από σώματα.', 'hu': 'Egyre növekvő a tudatosság annak szükségességére, hogy ritka és láthatatlan szavakat kell kezelni a szóreprezentációs modellezésben. Ebben a tanulmányban a feltörekvő koncepciók néhány alkalommal történő tanulására összpontosítunk, amelyek csak néhány rendelkezésre álló kontextust használnak ki teljes mértékben. Bevezetünk egy helyettesítő alapú kontextusábrázolási technikát, amely alkalmazható egy meglévő szóbeágyazási területen. A láthatatlan szavak modellezésének korábbi kontextusalapú megközelítései csak a zsák-of-word elsőrendű kontextusokat veszik figyelembe, míg a módszerünk másodrendű helyettesítőként aggregálja a kontextusokat, amelyeket egy szekvencia-tudatos mondat kiegészítő modell hoz létre. Három feladattal kísérleteztünk, amelyek célja a feltörekvő koncepciók modellezésének tesztelése. Megállapítottuk, hogy ezek a feladatok különböző hangsúlyt mutatnak az első és másodrendű kontextusokra, és helyettesítő alapú módszerünk kiváló teljesítményt ér el a természetes kontextusokban a corporákból.', 'lt': 'Didėja informuotumas apie poreikį elgtis su retais ir nematomis žodžiais modeliuojant žodžius. Šiame dokumente daugiausia dėmesio skiriame nedideliam naujų koncepcijų mokymuisi, kuris visiškai išnaudoja tik keletą turimų aplinkybių. Įdiegiame pakaitinį konteksto atspindimo metodą, kuris gali būti taikomas esamame žodžių įterpimo erdvėje. Ankstesniais kontekstu grindžiamais metodais modeliuojant nematomus žodžius atsižvelgiama tik į pirmosios eilės žodžių maišelio kontekstus, o mūsų metodas sujungia kontekstus kaip antrosios eilės pakaitalus, kurie gaminami pagal sekos žinomą sakinio užbaigimo model į. Eksperimentavome su trimis užduotimis, kuriomis siekiama išbandyti naujų koncepcijų modeliavimą. Nustatėme, kad šios užduotys skirtingai pabrėžia pirmosios ir antrosios eilės kontekstus, o mūsų pakaitiniu metodu siekiama geresnių rezultatų, palyginti su natūraliai atsirandančiais kontekstais iš korpros.', 'it': "C'è una crescente consapevolezza della necessità di gestire parole rare e invisibili nella modellazione della rappresentazione delle parole. In questo articolo, ci concentriamo sull'apprendimento in pochi scatti di concetti emergenti che sfruttano appieno solo pochi contesti disponibili. Introduciamo una tecnica di rappresentazione del contesto basata su sostituti che può essere applicata a uno spazio esistente di incorporazione di parole. I precedenti approcci contestuali alla modellazione di parole invisibili considerano solo contesti di primo ordine in un sacco di parole, mentre il nostro metodo aggrega i contesti come sostituti di secondo ordine che sono prodotti da un modello di completamento della frase consapevole della sequenza. Abbiamo sperimentato tre compiti che mirano a testare la modellazione di concetti emergenti. Abbiamo scoperto che questi compiti mostrano un'enfasi diversa sui contesti di primo e secondo ordine, e il nostro metodo basato su sostituti raggiunge prestazioni superiori su contesti naturali da corpora.", 'kk': 'Сөздерді түсіндіру үшін кейбір сөздерді өзгерту және көрсетпеген сөздерді түсіндіру керек. Бұл қағазда біз тек бірнеше тәртіптерді қолдану үшін бірнеше сәйкестіктерді оқытуға көмектесеміз. Біз қолдануға болатын мәліметтің орында қолдануға мүмкін болатын контексті таңдау техникасын алмастырамыз. Алдыңғы контекст негізінде көрсетілмеген сөздерді үлгілеу үшін тек бірінші реттік контексттерді қарастыруға арналған, бірақ әдіміз тәртіптерді реттік сөздерді толтыру үлгісімен құрылған екінші реттік алмастыру үлгісі ретін Біз үш тапсырмаларды тексеру үшін тәжірибедік. Біз бұл тапсырмалар бірінші және екінші реттік тәртіптерге әртүрлі маңызды көрсетеді, және алмастыру тәртібіміздің корпорасының жақсы тәртіптерінің жоғары жағдайын көрсетеді.', 'ml': 'വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയുടെ മാതൃകയില്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യേണ്ടതിന്റെ ആവശ്യത്തെക്കുറിച്ചും അ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കുറച്ച് വെടിവെച്ച് പഠിക്കുന്ന ആശയങ്ങളെ ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും കുറച്ച് ലഭ്യമായ നിലവിലുള്ള വാക്കുകളില്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യഭിന്നതയുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയുടെ സാങ് ഒളിഞ്ഞ വാക്കുകള്\u200d മാത്രം ഭാവിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള മുമ്പുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d മാത്രമേ വിചാരിക്കുകയുള്ളൂ എന്നാല്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d രണ്ടാമത്തെ കല്\u200dപന മാറ്റ പുറപ്പെടുന്ന ആശയങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കാനുള്ള മൂന്ന് ജോലികള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരീക്ഷിച്ചു. ഈ ജോലികള്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെയും രണ്ടാമത്തേതെയും ഉത്തരവാദിത്വങ്ങളില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിക്കുന്നു എന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. നമ്', 'ms': 'Ada kesadaran semakin meningkat mengenai perlukan untuk menangani perkataan yang jarang dan tidak terlihat dalam pemodelan perwakilan perkataan. Dalam kertas ini, kita fokus pada pembelajaran beberapa-shot konsep yang muncul yang mengeksploitasi sepenuhnya hanya beberapa konteks yang tersedia. Kami memperkenalkan teknik perwakilan konteks berdasarkan pengganti yang boleh dilaksanakan pada ruang penyampilan perkataan yang ada. pendekatan berdasarkan konteks terdahulu untuk memmodelkan perkataan yang tidak terlihat hanya mempertimbangkan konteks tertib-pertama tas-perkataan, sementara kaedah kami agregat konteks sebagai pengganti tertib-kedua yang dihasilkan oleh model penyelesaian kalimat yang sedar-jujukan. We experimented with three tasks that aim to test the modelling of emerging concepts.  Kami mendapati bahawa tugas ini menunjukkan tekanan yang berbeza pada konteks tertib pertama dan kedua, dan kaedah pengganti-berdasarkan kami mencapai prestasi yang lebih baik pada konteks yang berlaku secara alami dari corpora.', 'mk': 'Постои растечка свесност за потребата да се справат со ретки и невидливи зборови во моделирањето на репрезентацијата на зборовите. Во овој весник, се фокусираме на мало учење на нови концепти кои целосно искористуваат само неколку достапни контексти. Ние воведуваме техника на замена базирана на контекст претставување која може да се примени на постоечкиот простор за вградување на зборови. Претходните контекстни пристапи за моделирање на невидливи зборови ги сметаат само контекстите од прва редица, додека нашиот метод ги агрегетира контекстите како заменици од втора редица кои се произведени од модел за завршување на речениците свесен за секвенца. Експериментиравме со три задачи кои имаат за цел да го тестираат моделирањето на новите концепти. We found that these tasks show different emphasis on first and second order contexts, and our substitute-based method achieves superior performance on naturally-occurring contexts from corpora.', 'mt': 'Hemm kuxjenza dejjem tikber dwar il-ħtieġa li jiġu ttrattati kliem rari u mhux viżibbli fl-immudellar tar-rappreżentanza tal-kliem. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna niffokaw fuq tagħlim b’ftit skopijiet ta’ kunċetti emerġenti li jisfruttaw bis-sħiħ biss ftit kuntesti disponibbli. We introduce a substitute-based context representation technique that can be applied on an existing word embedding space.  Approċċi preċedenti bbażati fuq il-kuntest għall-immudellar ta’ kliem mhux viżibbli jikkunsidraw biss kuntesti tal-ewwel ordni tal-borża tal-kliem, filwaqt li l-metodu tagħna jaggrega l-kuntesti bħala sostituti tat-tieni ordni li huma prodotti minn mudell ta’ tlestija tas-sentenza li jkun konxju mis-sekwenza. Esperimentajna bi tliet kompiti li għandhom l-għan li jittestjaw l-immudellar ta’ kunċetti emerġenti. Instabna li dawn il-kompiti juru enfasi differenti fuq kuntesti tal-ewwel u t-tieni ordni, u l-metodu sostitut tagħna jikseb prestazzjoni superjuri fuq kuntesti li jseħħu b’mod naturali minn corpora.', 'no': 'Det finst ein økende forståelse om nødvendighet for å handtera sjeldre og ukjende ord i ordrepresentasjonsmodulering. I denne papiret fokuserer vi på få bilete læring av oppgåande konseptar som fullstendig brukar berre noen tilgjengelege kontekstar. Vi introduserer ein komponentsrepresentasjon- teknik som kan brukast på eit eksisterande ord innebyggende plass. Førre kontekstbaserte tilnærmingar til å modellera ukjende ord, ser berre på førstrekkefølgjande kontekstar i bagen av ord, mens metoden vår samla kontekstar som andrerekkefølgjande erstattar som vert produsert av ein modell for fullføring av setningar. Vi eksperimenterte med tre oppgåver som mål å testa modellen av oppgåver. Vi fann at desse oppgåvene viser ulike understreking på første og andre rekkefølgjande kontekstar, og vår substitusjonsbasert metode gjer høgre utvikling på naturlige kontekstar frå korpora.', 'pl': 'Rośnie świadomość potrzeby obsługi rzadkich i niewidocznych słów w modelowaniu reprezentacji słów. W niniejszym artykule skupiamy się na niewielkiej nauce pojawiających się koncepcji, które w pełni wykorzystują tylko kilka dostępnych kontekstów. Wprowadzamy zastępczą technikę reprezentacji kontekstu, którą można zastosować na istniejącej przestrzeni osadzania słów. Poprzednie kontekstowe podejścia do modelowania niewidocznych słów uwzględniają tylko konteksty pierwszego rzędu, podczas gdy nasza metoda agreguje konteksty jako substytuty drugiego rzędu, które są produkowane przez model uzupełniania zdań świadomy sekwencji. Eksperymentowaliśmy z trzema zadaniami mającymi na celu przetestowanie modelowania pojawiających się koncepcji. Odkryliśmy, że zadania te wykazują różny nacisk na konteksty pierwszego i drugiego rzędu, a nasza metoda oparta na substytucjach osiąga doskonałą wydajność w naturalnie występujących kontekstach korpusów.', 'si': 'වචන ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරන්න අවශ්\u200dය විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරන්න අවශ්\u200dය වචන අවශ්\u200d මේ පත්තරේ අපි අවධානය කරන්නේ පුළුවන් අදහස් කිහිපයක් ඉගෙන ඉගෙන ගන්න, සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරත අපි ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය සම්බන්ධතාවක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විද්\u200dයාපනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරන් මුලින් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය නොදන්නේ වචන වර්තනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම අපේ විධානය සම්බන්ධ වි අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන වැඩක් තුනක් තියෙන්නේ, ඒ වගේම අදහස් කරලා තියෙන්නේ පුළුවන් අදහස්  අපි හොයාගෙන හිටියේ මේ වැඩක් පළමුවෙන් දෙවෙනි ක්\u200dරමය සංවිධානයේ වෙනස් අවධානය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, අපේ වෙනස් විධාන', 'sr': 'Postoji povećanje svijesti o potrebi da se rijetke i nevidljive reči u modelima reèi zastupanja. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se na nekoliko snimka učenja pojavljivanja koncepta koji potpuno iskorištava samo nekoliko raspoloženih konteksta. Predstavljamo tehniku zastupanja konteksta zasnovanog na zamjenu koja se može primjenjivati na postojećem prostoru za uključenje reči. Prethodni kontekstski pristupi modeliranju nevidljivih reči smatraju samo kontekstima prvog reda, dok naša metoda okuplja kontekste kao zamjene drugog reda koji su proizvođeni modelom završetka rečenica koji je svestan sekvencijom. Eksperimentirali smo sa tri zadatka koji su ciljani da testiramo modeliranje novih koncepta. Pronašli smo da ovi zadaci pokazuju različite naglaske na prvi i drugi redovni konteksti, a naša zamjena bazirana metoda postiže superiornu predstavu na prirodno pojavljujuće kontekste iz korpore.', 'so': 'Waxaa jira caqli kordhaya baahida u baahan yahay in la maamulo hadal qaali ah iyo hadal qarsoon oo ku qoran sameynta qaabilaada hadalka. Warqadan, waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa barashada fikrada soo socda oo si buuxda u isticmaalaya arimaha la heli karo oo keliya. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa tekniko qaabilsan oo ku saleysan qaabilaad, kaas oo lagu codsan karo hadal ku qoran goob ah. Dhaqdooyinkii hore ee ku qoran hadallada qarsoon oo kaliya waxay ka fikiraan dhamaadka qoraalka ugu horeeya ee kaliya, laakiin qaababkayaga ayaa ka mid ah bedelka bedelka qoraalka labaad ee loo sameeyo model dhamaystiro dabar-aqoon. Waxaannu ku jirrabnay saddex shaqo oo isku dayaya in aan tijaabiyo tusaale ahaan fikrada soo socda. We found that these tasks show different emphasis on first and second order contexts, and our substitute-based method achieves superior performance on naturally-occurring contexts from corpora.', 'sv': 'Det finns en växande medvetenhet om behovet av att hantera sällsynta och osynliga ord i ordrepresentation modellering. I den här uppsatsen fokuserar vi på få skott lärande av framväxande begrepp som fullt ut utnyttjar endast ett fåtal tillgängliga sammanhang. Vi introducerar en substitutionsbaserad kontextrepresentationsteknik som kan tillämpas på ett befintligt ordinbäddningsutrymme. Tidigare kontextbaserade tillvägagångssätt för modellering av osynliga ord beaktar endast säck-of-word första ordningens kontexter, medan vår metod aggregerar kontexter som andra ordningens substitut som produceras av en sekvensmedveten meningskompletteringsmodell. Vi experimenterade med tre uppgifter som syftar till att testa modellering av nya koncept. Vi fann att dessa uppgifter visar olika betoning på första och andra ordningens kontexter, och vår substitutionsbaserade metod uppnår överlägsen prestanda på naturligt förekommande kontexter från corpora.', 'mn': 'Хэдэн ховор, харагдаагүй үгсийг илэрхийлэх үгсийн талаар илэрхийлэх хэрэгтэй гэдгийг ойлгох болно. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэд хэдэн тохиолдолд ашиглаж байгаа шинэ ойлголтын талаар анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Бид орлуулагдсан орчин санааны зай дээр хэрэглэгдэж болно. Өмнөх нөхцөл байдлаар харагдаагүй үгсийг модельчлэх арга зам нь зөвхөн анхны дараагийн дараагийн дараагийн дараагийн дараагийн дараагийн дарааллыг бүтээх загвартай хоёр дахь дараагийн орлуулагч болно. Бид шинэ ойлголтыг шалгахын тулд 3 даалгавартай туршилт хийсэн. Бид эдгээр үйл ажиллагаанууд эхний, хоёр дахь дараагийн орчинд өөр төрлийн анхаарлыг харуулж байгааг олж мэдсэн. Хамгийн орчинд суурилсан арга нь корпораны байгалийн орчинд гарч ирсэн орчинд илүү өндөр үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг.', 'ta': 'வார்த்தை குறிப்பிடும் மாதிரியில் குறைவான மற்றும் மறைக்கப்படாத வார்த்தைகளை கையாள வேண்டும் என்பத இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் முழுமையாக கிடைக்கும் சில தோற்றம் கற்றுக்கொள்வதை கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம். அது முழுமையாக நாம் ஒரு மாற்று அடிப்படையில் உள்ள வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கும் இடைவெளியில் பயன்படுத்த முடியும் தொழில்நுட்பம். முந்தைய சூழல் அடிப்படையில் மறைக்கப்படாத வார்த்தைகளை மாதிரிக்க முடியும் முறைமைகள் பைப்பை முதல் வரிசை முறைமையை மட்டும் கருதும், ஆனால் எங்கள் முறைய We experimented with three tasks that aim to test the modelling of emerging concepts.  இந்த பணிகள் முதல் மற்றும் இரண்டாவது வரிசையில் மாறுபாடுகளை காண்பிக்கிறார்கள் என்பதை நாம் கண்டுபிடித்துள்ளோம், எங்கள் மாற்று முறைமையில', 'ur': 'کلمات کی نماداری میں نادر اور غیب کلمات کے تحمل کرنے کی ضرورت کے بارے میں اضافہ ہوتی ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم بہت کم شٹ کی تعلیم پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں جو صرف چند موجود موجود موجود موجود ہیں۔ ہم ایک جایگزینہ بنیادی کنٹنسیٹ نمایش ٹیکنیک کو معلوم کرتے ہیں جو ایک موجود لفظ پر استعمال کر سکتی ہے۔ مخکنی کنٹکسٹ بنیادی باتوں کی موڈلینگ کی تقریبا صرف پہلی اورمن اورمن اورمن اورمنٹکسٹ کی بغل کو سمجھ لیتے ہیں، حالانکہ ہمارا طریقہ کنٹکسٹ کو دوسری اورمن اورمنٹ کے بدلنے کے طور پر جمع کرتا ہے جو ایک اورمن آگاہ ویرمنٹ پورا موڈل سے ہم نے تین کاموں کے ساتھ آزمائش کی جو پیدا ہونے والی نظریں کی مدل کرنے کا مطابق ہے۔ ہم نے دیکھا کہ یہ کام پہلی اور دوسری اوقات پر مختلف تسبیح دکھاتے ہیں اور ہماری جایگزینی اوقات کے ذریعہ سے زیادہ اچھی فعالیت کرتی ہے جو قانون کی جگہ سے اترا ہوتا ہے۔', 'ro': 'Există o conștientizare tot mai mare a necesității de a gestiona cuvinte rare și nevăzute în modelarea reprezentării cuvintelor. În această lucrare, ne concentrăm pe învățarea puțin-shot a conceptelor emergente care exploatează pe deplin doar câteva contexte disponibile. Introducem o tehnică de reprezentare a contextului bazată pe substituție, care poate fi aplicată pe un spațiu existent de încorporare a cuvintelor. Abordările anterioare bazate pe context pentru modelarea cuvintelor nevăzute iau în considerare doar contexte de prim ordin sac de cuvânt, în timp ce metoda noastră agregă contextele ca substituți de ordinul al doilea care sunt produse de un model de completare a frazelor conștient de secvență. Am experimentat trei sarcini care vizează testarea modelării conceptelor emergente. Am descoperit că aceste sarcini arată un accent diferit pe contextele de ordinul întâi și al doilea, iar metoda noastră bazată pe substituții obține performanțe superioare în contextele naturale din corpore.', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻozda biz juda kam mavjud bo'lgan g'oyalarni o'rganishga foydalanamiz. Biz mavjud soʻz ichida qo'llash mumkin. Previous context-based approaches to modelling unseen words only consider bag-of-word first-order contexts, whereas our method aggregates contexts as second-order substitutes that are produced by a sequence-aware sentence completion model.  Biz quyidagi g'oyalarning modelini tekshirish uchun uchta vazifalar bilan biror qildik. Biz shu vazifalar birinchi va ikkinchi taklif tartiblarda boshqa ishlatiladi, va bizning qismlarimiz asosiy qo'shilgan tartiblarning tabiiy tartiblardan o'xshash bajarishimiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Có một nhận thức ngày càng lớn về nhu cầu sử dụng từ hiếm và vô hình trong việc mô phỏng chữ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi tập trung vào việc học tập về những khái niệm mới phát triển mà tận dụng chỉ một vài đối tượng sẵn sàng. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một kỹ thuật thay thế dựa trên ngữ cảnh có thể sử dụng trên một vùng chứa từ đã có. Trước đây các phương pháp dựa trên ngữ cảnh để mô phỏng những từ không nhìn thấy chỉ xem các ngữ cảnh đơn giản đầu tiên, trong khi phương pháp của chúng tôi tổng hợp các cấu trúc như thứ hai thay thế, được sản xuất bởi một mô hình điền bản. Chúng tôi thí nghiệm với ba nhiệm vụ nhằm mục đích thử nghiệm mô hình các khái niệm mới nổi. Chúng tôi phát hiện ra những nhiệm vụ này đặt trọng lượng thứ hai và đầu tiên trong các mặt trận, và phương pháp thay thế đạt được hiệu quả cao trên các mặt trời xuất hiện từ cơ thể.', 'bg': 'Налице е нарастваща осведоменост за необходимостта от работа с редки и невидими думи в моделирането на представянето на думи. В тази статия се фокусираме върху неколкократното обучение на нововъзникващи концепции, които напълно експлоатират само няколко налични контекста. Въвеждаме техника на заместващо базирано контекстно представяне, която може да бъде приложена върху съществуващо пространство за вграждане на думи. Предишните контекстни подходи за моделиране на невидими думи разглеждат само контексти от първи ред, докато нашият метод агрегира контекстите като заместители от втори ред, които се произвеждат от модел за завършване на изречения, осъзнаващ последователността. Експериментирахме с три задачи, които имат за цел да тестват моделирането на нововъзникващи концепции. Установихме, че тези задачи показват различен акцент върху контекстите от първи и втори ред, а нашият метод, базиран на заместители, постига превъзходно представяне на естествени контексти от корпората.', 'da': 'Der er en voksende bevidsthed om behovet for at håndtere sjældne og usynlige ord i ordrepræsentationsmodellering. I denne artikel fokuserer vi på nogle få skud læring af nye koncepter, der fuldt ud udnytter kun få tilgængelige sammenhænge. Vi introducerer en substitutionsbaseret kontekstrepræsentationsteknik, der kan anvendes på et eksisterende ordindlejringsrum. Tidligere kontekstbaserede tilgange til modellering af usynlige ord tager kun højde for første ordens sammenhænge, mens vores metode aggregerer sammenhænge som anden ordens erstatninger, der er produceret af en sekvensbevidst sætningsfærdighedsmodel. Vi eksperimenterede med tre opgaver, der har til formål at teste modellering af nye koncepter. Vi fandt ud af, at disse opgaver viser forskellig vægt på første og anden ordens sammenhænge, og vores substitutionsbaserede metode opnår overlegen ydeevne på naturligt forekommende sammenhænge fra corpora.', 'nl': 'Er is een groeiend bewustzijn van de noodzaak om zeldzame en ongeziene woorden in woordrepresentatiemodellering te verwerken. In dit artikel richten we ons op het leren van opkomende concepten die slechts enkele beschikbare contexten volledig benutten. We introduceren een vervangende context representatietechniek die kan worden toegepast op een bestaande woord insluitruimte. Eerdere contextgebaseerde benaderingen voor het modelleren van onzichtbare woorden beschouwen alleen bag-of-word eerste orde contexten, terwijl onze methode contexten aggregeert als tweede orde substituten die worden geproduceerd door een sequentie-bewust zinnenvervullingsmodel. We experimenteerden met drie taken die gericht zijn op het testen van de modellering van opkomende concepten. We ontdekten dat deze taken verschillende nadruk tonen op eerste en tweede orde contexten, en onze vervangende methode bereikt superieure prestaties op natuurlijke contexten uit corpora.', 'hr': 'Postoji sve veća svijest o potrebi za rijetkim i nevidljivim riječima u modelima predstavljanja riječi. U ovom papiru, usredotočili smo se na nekoliko snimka učenja pojavljujućih koncepta koji potpuno iskorištava samo nekoliko raspoloženih konteksta. Predstavljamo tehniku zastupanja konteksta na zamjenama koja se može primjenjivati na postojećem prostoru uključujući riječ. Prije kontekstskih pristupa modeliranju nevidljivih riječi smatraju samo kontekstima prvog reda vrećice riječi, dok naš metod skuplja kontekste kao zamjene drugog reda koji su proizvođeni modelom završetka rečenica koji su svjesni. Eksperimentirali smo s tri zadatka koji su ciljevi testirati modeliranje novih koncepta. Pronašli smo da ovi zadaci pokazuju različite naglaske na prve i druge redovne kontekste, a naša zamjena temeljena metoda postiže superiornu predstavu na prirodno pojavljujuće kontekste iz tijela.', 'de': 'Es gibt ein wachsendes Bewusstsein f羹r die Notwendigkeit, seltene und unsichtbare W繹rter in der Wortrepr瓣sentationsmodellierung zu behandeln. In diesem Beitrag konzentrieren wir uns auf das Erlernen neuer Konzepte, die nur wenige verf羹gbare Kontexte ausnutzen. Wir f羹hren eine substitutive-basierte Kontextrepr瓣sentationstechnik ein, die auf einen vorhandenen Worteinbettungsraum angewendet werden kann. Bisherige kontextbasierte Ans瓣tze zur Modellierung unsichtbarer W繹rter ber羹cksichtigen nur Wortbeutel erster Ordnung Kontexte, w瓣hrend unsere Methode Kontexte zweiter Ordnung aggregiert, die durch ein sequenzbasiertes Satzvervollst瓣ndigungsmodell erzeugt werden. Wir haben mit drei Aufgaben experimentiert, die darauf abzielen, die Modellierung neuer Konzepte zu testen. Wir fanden heraus, dass diese Aufgaben unterschiedliche Schwerpunkte auf Kontexten erster und zweiter Ordnung aufweisen, und unsere substitutive-basierte Methode erzielt 羹berlegene Leistung auf nat羹rlich vorkommenden Kontexten aus Korpora.', 'id': 'Ada kesadaran semakin meningkat tentang kebutuhan untuk menangani kata-kata langka dan tidak terlihat dalam pemodelan representation kata. Dalam kertas ini, kita fokus pada beberapa penelitian belajar konsep yang muncul yang sepenuhnya mengeksploitasi hanya beberapa konteks yang tersedia. Kami memperkenalkan teknik representation konteks berbasis pengganti yang dapat diaplikasikan pada ruang penerbangan kata yang ada. Pendekatan konteks-berdasarkan sebelumnya untuk memmodelir kata-kata yang tidak terlihat hanya mempertimbangkan konteks-konteks-tas-kata-peringkat pertama, sementara metode kami agregat konteks sebagai pengganti-peringkat kedua yang diproduksi oleh model penyelesaian kalimat yang sadar urutan. We experimented with three tasks that aim to test the modelling of emerging concepts.  Kami menemukan bahwa tugas-tugas ini menunjukkan fokus yang berbeda pada konteks peringkat pertama dan kedua, dan metode berbasis substitusi kita mencapai prestasi yang lebih tinggi pada konteks yang terjadi secara alami dari corpora.', 'ko': '사람들은 단어 표시 모델링에서 보기 드물고 보이지 않는 단어를 처리해야 한다는 것을 점점 깨닫고 있다.본고에서 우리가 주목하는 것은 신흥 개념에 대한 소량의 학습이다. 이런 개념들은 소수의 사용 가능한 상하문만 충분히 이용했다.우리는 교체를 바탕으로 하는 상하문 표시 기술을 소개했는데 기존의 단어 삽입 공간에 응용할 수 있다.이전에 상하문을 바탕으로 하는 보이지 않는 단어 모델링 방법은 단어봉투의 1단계 상하문만 고려했고 우리의 방법은 상하문을 서열 감지 문장으로 모아 모델 생성의 2단계 교체를 완성했다.우리는 신흥 개념의 모델링을 시험하기 위해 세 가지 임무를 시험했다.우리는 이러한 임무가 1단계와 2단계 언어 환경에서 서로 다른 측면 중점을 나타내고 대체적인 방법을 바탕으로 어료 라이브러리에서 자연적으로 나타난 언어 환경에서 우수한 성능을 얻었다는 것을 발견했다.', 'sw': 'Kuna uelewa wa haja ya kukabiliana na maneno nadra na yasiyo fichikana katika mtindo wa uwakilishaji maneno. Katika karatasi hii, tunajikita kujifunza kwa picha chache za mawazo yanayotokea ambayo yanatumia maduka machache tu yanayopatikana. Tunaonyesha teknolojia ya uwakilishaji kwa muktadha wa mabadiliko ambayo inaweza kutumika kwenye neno lililopo kwenye nafasi. Mfumo wa zamani wa muktadha uliopita wa kutengeneza maneno yasiyofahamika tu unachukulia mkakati wa maneno ya kwanza, wakati mbinu yetu inapingana kama mabadiliko ya taratibu ya pili yanayotengenezwa na modeli ya kutimiza hukumu inayofahamika. Tulijaribu kwa kazi tatu ambazo zinalenga kujaribu mifano ya dhana inayotokea. Tumegundua kuwa kazi hizi zinaonyesha msisitizo tofauti juu ya mikutano ya kwanza na ya pili, na njia yetu ya mabadiliko inaweza kupata ufanisi mkubwa zaidi katika miradi ya asili yanayotokea kutoka makampuni.', 'fa': 'آگاهی افزایش در مورد نیاز به استفاده از کلمات نادر و غیب در مدل نمایش کلمات وجود دارد. در این کاغذ، ما روی یادگیری کمی از نظریه\u200cهای بیرون آمده تمرکز می\u200cکنیم که فقط چند موقعیت موجود را کاملاً استفاده می\u200cکند. ما یک تکنیک نمایش محیط جایگزینی را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتواند روی فضای جایگزینی کلمه موجود استفاده شود. نزدیک\u200cهای پیشینیان برای مدل کردن کلمات غیبی تنها محتوای اولین نظر می\u200cگیرند، در حالی که روش ما محتویات را به عنوان جایگزینه\u200cهای دوم که تولید شده از یک مدل کامل کردن مجموعه\u200cی مجموعه\u200cای آگاهی از مجموعه\u200cهای دوم جمع می\u200cکند. ما با سه وظیفه آزمایش کردیم که هدف دارد برای آزمایش مدل\u200cسازی مفهوم\u200cهای پیشرفته است. ما فهمیدیم که این وظیفه\u200cها به موضوع اول و دوم سفارش متفاوتی نشان می\u200cدهند، و روش جایگزینی ما بر روی موضوع\u200cهای طبیعی از شرکت\u200cهای شرکت پیدا می\u200cکند.', 'sq': 'Ka një ndërgjegjësi në rritje për nevojën për të trajtuar fjalë të rralla dhe të padukshme në modelimin e përfaqësimit të fjalëve. Në këtë letër, ne përqëndrohemi në mësimin me pak fotografi të koncepteve në rritje që shfrytëzojnë plotësisht vetëm disa kontekste të disponueshme. Ne prezantojmë një teknikë përfaqësimi konteksti të bazuar në zëvendësim që mund të aplikohet në një hapësirë ekzistuese për përfshirjen e fjalëve. Përqasjet e mëparshme të bazuara në kontekst për modelimin e fjalëve të padukshme konsiderojnë vetëm kontekste të rendit të parë të çantës së fjalës, ndërsa metoda jonë agregon kontekstet si zëvendësues të rendit të dytë që prodhohen nga një model i përfundimit të fjalëve të ndjeshëm. Eksperimentuam me tre detyra që synojnë të testojnë modelimin e koncepteve të reja. We found that these tasks show different emphasis on first and second order contexts, and our substitute-based method achieves superior performance on naturally-occurring contexts from corpora.', 'af': "Daar is 'n groei waarskynlik van die nodigheid om selfde en onverskynlike woorde in woord voorskyning modellering te hanteer. In hierdie papier, ons fokus op 'n paar skoot leer van opkommende konsepte wat volledig 'n paar beskikbaar kontekste uitbreek. Ons introduiseer 'n substitute-gebaseerde konteks voorstelling tekniks wat kan aanwend word op 'n bestaande woord inbêer ruimte. Vorige konteks-gebaseerde toegang tot modellering van ongestelde woorde slegs beskou sak van woord eerste volgorde konteks, terwyl ons metode samekoppeer konteks as tweede volgorde vervangers wat word produseer deur 'n volgorde-bevestig setvolledmodel. Ons het eksperimenteer met drie taak wat doel om die modellering van uitkommende konsepte te testeer. Ons het gevind dat hierdie opdragte verskillende emphasies vertoon op eerste en tweede volgorde konteks, en ons substitusie-gebaseerde metode verkry bo-oefening op natuurlik voorkomste konteks van korpora.", 'tr': 'Kelimeler modelleme i챌inde nadir ve g철rmezli kelimeleri 챌철zmelidir. Bu kagyzda, biz birn채챌e m철h체m m철h체m b철legi 체첵tgeden d체힊체njeler barada 체ns ber첵채ris. Biz yerine da힊ary ta첵첵arlanan kontekst temsilleme teknikini, mevcut bir s철z i챌inde uygulanabilir. 횜흫ki kontekstlerde g철rkezilmedik s철zleri modelletmek 체챌in golla힊첵ar di흫e s철zleri흫 baglany ilkinji tertiblemesi 체챌in pikir ed첵채r, 첵철ne bizi흫 metodamyz durumlary흫 ikinji tertiblemesi 체챌in 첵erle힊첵채r Biz 첵체z g철r체n첵채n d체힊체njeleri modelletmek 체챌in 체챌 zady bardyk. Biz bu zadlary흫 birinji we ikinji s체첵tgede da힊ary 챌yky힊ymyzda farkl캇 체ns ber첵채ndigini tapdyk. 횥stine da힊ary 챌yky힊ymyz, do휓al 첵agda첵da t채sirli 첵agda첵lary흫 체st체ne 첵etir첵채r.', 'am': 'የንግግር መልዕክት ምሳሌ በመስመር የሚያስፈልገውን ትንሽ እና የተሰወረውን ቃላት ለመቀበል የሚያስፈልገውን ማስታወቂያ አለበት፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በአጭር ጥቂት የተገኘ ጥያቄዎችን ለመማር እናስማራለን፡፡ የአሁኑን ቃላት በጥቅልቅ ስፍራን ለመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ የቀድሞው የውይይት ቃላት መተላለፊያ አካባቢ የቃላትን የፊተኛውን ትክክለኛ ጉዳይ ብቻ ይመለከታሉ፡፡ We experimented with three tasks that aim to test the modelling of emerging concepts.  እነዚህ ስራዎች በመጀመሪያ እና በሁለተኛው ትእዛዝ ሁኔታ ላይ የተለየ ውጤት እንዲያሳየው እና የፍጥረት ግንኙነታችንን ከኮርፖራ የሚሆነውን ትክክል ማድረግ ማግኘት አግኝተናል፡፡', 'hy': 'Գոյություն ունի աճող գիտակցություն անհրաժեշտության վերաբերյալ հազվադեպ և անտեսանելի բառերը բառերի ներկայացման մոդելավորման մեջ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք կենտրոնանում ենք զարգացող գաղափարների փոքրիկ ուսումնասիրության վրա, որոնք լիովին օգտագործում են միայն մի քանի հասանելի կոնտեքստ: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք փոխարինական կոնտեքստի ներկայացման մեթոդ, որը կարող է կիրառվել գոյություն ունեցող բառերի ներգրավման տարածության վրա: Առաջին կոնտեքստի հիմնված մոտեցումները անտեսանելի բառերի մոդելավորման համար ընդունվում են միայն առաջին հաջորդ հաջորդ հաջորդ հաջորդ հաջորդ հաջորդ հաջորդ հաջորդ հաջորդ հաջորդ հաջորդ հաջորդ հաջորդ հաջորդ հաջորդ հաջորդ հաջո Մենք փորձարկում էինք երեք խնդիր, որոնց նպատակն է փորձել զարգացող գաղափարների մոդելավորումը: Մենք հայտնաբերեցինք, որ այս խնդիրները տարբեր կենտրոնացումներ են տալիս առաջին և երկրորդ դասակարգում գտնվող կոնտեքստների վրա, և մեր փոխարինակ հիմնված մեթոդը հասնում է գերազանցություն բնական կոնտեքստների վրա կապորայից:', 'az': 'Sözlük modellərində nadir və görmədikləri sözləri çəkmək lazımdır. Bu kağızda, birkaç dəfə müəyyən edilən məsələlərdən istifadə edən yenidən ortaya çıxan məsələlər öyrənməyə odaqlanırıq. Biz yerinə daxil olan kontekst göstəricisi teknikini təşkil edirik ki, mövcud olan sözlərdə istifadə edilə bilər. Əvvəlki kontekst-tabanlı modelləşdirmək tərzlərinə yalnız ilk sıralıq tərzlərini düşünün, halbuki bizim metodumuz tərzlərini ikinci sıralıq əvəzini sıralamaq məqsədilə ürəkləndirilən cümlələr tamamlama modeli ilə birləşdirir. Biz yenidən gələn fikirlərin modellenməsini imtahana çəkmək məqsədilə üç işlə imtahana çəkdik. Biz bu işlər ilk və ikinci sıralar müxtəliflərinə fərqli təsirləri göstərir, və əvəzinə dayanan metodlarımız korporadan gələn müxtəliflərin üstünlüyünü başa düşər.', 'bs': 'Postoji sve veća svijest o potrebi za rijetkim i nevidljivim riječima u modelima rečenica. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se na nekoliko snimanja učenja pojedinaca koji potpuno iskoriste samo nekoliko dostupnih konteksta. Predstavljamo tehniku zastupanja konteksta zasnovanog na zamjenu koja se može primjenjivati na postojećoj riječi uključujući prostor. Prije kontekstskih pristupa modeliranju nevidljivih riječi smatraju samo kontekstima prvog reda vrećice riječi, dok naš metod skuplja kontekste kao zamjene drugog reda koji su proizvođeni modelom završetka rečenica koji su svjesni. Eksperimentirali smo sa tri zadatka koji su ciljevi da testiramo modeliranje novih koncepta. Pronašli smo da ovi zadaci pokazuju različite naglaske na prvi i drugi redovni konteksti, a naš način na zamjeni osnovan postigne superiornu predstavu na prirodno pojavljujuće kontekste iz korpore.', 'ca': "Hi ha una consciència creixent de la necessitat de gestionar paraules rares i invisibles en la modelació de representació de paraules. In this paper, we focus on few-shot learning of emerging concepts that fully exploits only a few available contexts.  Introduïm una tècnica de representació contextual basada en substitució que es pot aplicar en un espai d'incorporació de paraules existent. Els enfocaments anteriors basats en el contexte de modelar paraules invisibles només consideran contextes de primer ordre, mentre que el nostre mètode agrega els contextes com substituts de segon ordre produïts per un model de completació de frases conscient de la seqüència. Hem experimentat amb tres tasques que busquen provar la modelació de conceptes emergents. Vam descobrir que aquestes tasques mostren un enfocament diferent en els contextes de primer i segon ordre, i el nostre mètode basat en substitució aconsegueix un rendiment superior en els contextes naturals de la corpora.", 'cs': 'Roste povědomí o potřebě zacházet se vzácnými a neviditelnými slovy v modelování reprezentace slov. V tomto článku se zaměřujeme na vznikající koncepty, které plně využívají jen několik dostupných kontextů. Představujeme techniku reprezentace kontextu založenou na náhradě, kterou lze aplikovat na existující vkládací prostor slov. Předchozí kontextové přístupy k modelování neviditelných slov berou v úvahu pouze kontexty prvního řádu, zatímco naše metoda agreguje kontexty jako náhrady druhého řádu, které jsou vytvořeny pomocí sekvenčního modelu dokončování vět. Experimentovali jsme se třemi úkoly, jejichž cílem je otestovat modelování vznikajících konceptů. Zjistili jsme, že tyto úkoly vykazují odlišný důraz na kontexty prvního a druhého řádu a naše metoda založená na náhradách dosahuje vynikajícího výkonu na přirozeně se vyskytujících kontextech korpusů.', 'bn': 'শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বের মডেলিং নিয়ে অদ্ভুত এবং অদৃশ্য শব্দের মুখোমুখি হওয়ার প্রয়োজনের ব্যাপারে বা এই কাগজটিতে আমরা কয়েকটি গুলি শিক্ষার দিকে মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি যা পুরোপুরি প্রতিযোগিতা ব্যবহার করেছে। আমরা একটি প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রযুক্তি পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি যা বিদ্যমান একটি শব্দ বিভিন্ন স্থানে প্ অদৃশ্য শব্দের মডেল করার পূর্ববর্তী কন্টেক্স ভিত্তিক উপায় শুধুমাত্র ব্যাগ-অফ-ওয়ার্ডের প্রথম কার্ড প্রতিযোগিতা বিবেচনা করে, যদিও আমাদের পদ্ধতি দ আমরা তিনটি কাজের মাধ্যমে পরীক্ষা করেছি যার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে উদ্ভাবনের ধারণার মডেল পরীক্ষা করা। আমরা আবিষ্কার করেছি যে এই কাজ প্রথম এবং দ্বিতীয় আদেশ প্রতিযোগিতায় বিভিন্ন প্রতিযোগিতা দেখাচ্ছে এবং আমাদের প্রতিস্থাপনের ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি', 'fi': 'On kasvava tietoisuus tarpeesta käsitellä harvinaisia ja näkymättömiä sanoja sanaesitysmallinnuksessa. Tässä artikkelissa keskitymme muutamaan otteeseen oppimaan uusia käsitteitä, jotka hyödyntävät täysin vain muutamia käytettävissä olevia konteksteja. Esittelemme korvaavan kontekstivalmistekniikan, jota voidaan soveltaa olemassa olevaan sanan upotustilaan. Aiemmat kontekstipohjaiset lähestymistavat näkymättömien sanojen mallintamiseen huomioivat vain sanapussin ensimmäisen järjestyksen konteksteja, kun taas menetelmämme yhdistää kontekstit toisen järjestyksen korvikkeina, jotka tuotetaan sekvenssitietoisella lauseen täydennysmallilla. Kokeilimme kolmea tehtävää, joiden tavoitteena on testata uusien konseptien mallintamista. Havaitsimme, että nämä tehtävät painottuvat eri tavalla ensimmäisen ja toisen asteen konteksteihin, ja korvikkeerinen menetelmämme saavuttaa erinomaisen suorituskyvyn luonnollisissa konteksteissa korpusista.', 'et': 'Kasvab teadlikkus vajadusest käsitleda sõnade esitamise modelleerimisel haruldasi ja nähtamatuid sõnu. Käesolevas dokumendis keskendume tekkivate kontseptsioonide vähesele õppimisele, mis kasutavad täielikult ära ainult mõningaid olemasolevaid kontekste. Tutvustame asenduspõhist konteksti esitamise tehnikat, mida saab rakendada olemasolevale sõna manustamisruumile. Varasemad kontekstipõhised lähenemisviisid nähtamatute sõnade modelleerimisele käsitlevad ainult esimese järgu kontekste, samas kui meie meetod koondab kontekstid teise järgu asendajatena, mis on toodetud jada-teadliku lauselõpetamise mudeli abil. Katsetasime kolme ülesandega, mille eesmärk on testida esilekerkivate kontseptsioonide modelleerimist. Leidsime, et need ülesanded näitavad erinevat rõhku esimese ja teise astme kontekstidele ning meie asenduspõhine meetod saavutab suurepärase tulemuse looduslikes kontekstides korpustest.', 'jv': 'Ana ono langkung piye isan Nanging mapani iki, kita ngomong titik-titik neng titik-titik lan nganggep kuwi tindakan nganggep sistem sing gak sotahan. Awak dhéwé nambah akeh basa nang sampek banter politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awak dhéwé éntuk karo telu nggawe dadi iki dadi bisa ngejer-bisa model sing luwih apik. Awak dhéwé éntukno karo perusahaan langkung wigatiningno langkung wigatiningno sakjane tentang karo hal-iki ngono nggawe barang urip nggawe barang dhéwé', 'ha': "Kuna ƙara fahimta ga muharin da za'a yi amfani da maganar da ba'a ɓõye ba cikin misalin mai gayarwa. In a cikin wannan takardan, munã fahimta a kan karatun masu iya ƙaranci da ke iya samu'a da kafiraikin masu iya amfani kawai kaɗan. Tuna ƙunsa da wani techni mai gaya mazaɓa da wanda za'a iya amfani da kan wani magana wanda ke cikin fili. Tsarin da aka riga ya sami zuwa motsi da maganar da ba'a sani ba, sai ka yi bincike matsayin-da-word-kwanza-ordan, da kuma hanyonmu ke kiyaye ta zama masu buƙata da tsarin-rubutun da aka samar da shi da wata motel mai cikakken maganar da-sequence-fahimta. Lalle ne, Mun jarraba taskõkin uku da ke so dõmin a jarraba misãlan zato masu fitarwa. Mun gane cewa waɗannan aikin za'a nuna musamman na farkon da na sau, kuma hanyoyinmu a matsayinmu yana da mafiya kyauta a kan tarakin da ke ƙara daga makampuni.", 'he': 'יש מודעות גדולה לצורך להתמודד עם מילים נדירות ולא נראות בהדגמת מילים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מתמקדים בללמוד קטן של רעיונות מתפתחים שמניצלים במלוא רק כמה קשרים זמינים. אנחנו מציגים טכניקה מייצגת קונטקסט מבוססת תחליפים שאפשר להשתמש במרחב קיום של מילים. Previous context-based approaches to modelling unseen words only consider bag-of-word first-order contexts, whereas our method aggregates contexts as second-order substitutes that are produced by a sequence-aware sentence completion model.  ניסונו עם שלושה משימות שמתכוונות לבדוק את הדוגמה של הרעיונות החדשים. מצאנו שהמשימות האלה מראות דגישה שונה על הקשר של סדר ראשון ושני, ושיטת המחליף שלנו מבוססת להשיג ביצועים עדיפים על הקשר שמתרחש באופן טבעי מקופורה.', 'sk': 'Vedno bolj se zaveda potrebe po uporabi redkih in nevidnih besed pri modeliranju predstavitve besed. V tem članku se osredotočamo na manjše učenje nastajajočih konceptov, ki v celoti izkoriščajo le nekaj razpoložljivih kontekstov. Predstavljamo nadomestno tehniko kontekstne reprezentacije, ki jo lahko uporabimo na obstoječem prostoru za vdelavo besed. Prejšnji kontekstni pristopi k modeliranju nevidnih besed upoštevajo le kontekste prvega reda vrečke besede, medtem ko naša metoda združuje kontekste kot nadomestke drugega reda, ki jih proizvaja model zaporedja zaključevanja stavkov. Eksperimentirali smo s tremi nalogami, katerih cilj je testirati modeliranje nastajajočih konceptov. Ugotovili smo, da ti nalogi kažejo različen poudarek na kontekstih prvega in drugega reda, naša nadomestna metoda pa dosega vrhunsko delovanje v naravnih kontekstih iz korpusov.', 'bo': 'There is a growing awareness of the need to handle rare and unseen words in word representation modelling. ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐོང་ནུས་མེད་པའི་ལྟ་བ་ཉུང་ཤས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་སྟོན་དགོས། ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཡུལ་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཚབ་བཅུག་པ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་སྤྲོད་དགོས། སྔོན ང་ཚོས་བརྟག་པར་མཐོང་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་པ་ཚོར་བརྟག་དཔྱད་བྱས་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་གསུམ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བརྟག ང་ཚོས་བྱ་རིམ་འདི་དག་གི་གནད་དོན་གཅིག་དང་གནད་དོན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཡུལ་རྗེས་སུ་མཐོང་བ་དང་། རྩ་བ་གཞི་བཙུགས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་མཐོང་བ་རྣམས་མཐོ'}
{'en': 'Pre-trained Contextualized Character Embeddings Lead to Major Improvements in Time Normalization : a Detailed Analysis', 'ar': 'تؤدي عمليات تضمين الشخصية السياقية المدربة مسبقًا إلى تحسينات كبيرة في تطبيع الوقت: تحليل مفصل', 'pt': 'Incorporações de caracteres contextualizados pré-treinados levam a grandes melhorias na normalização de tempo: uma análise detalhada', 'fr': "L'intégration de personnages contextualisés pré-entraînés entraîne des améliorations majeures de la normalisation temporelle\xa0: une analyse détaillée", 'es': 'Las incrustaciones de caracteres contextualizadas previamente entrenadas conducen a mejoras importantes en la normalización del tiempo: un análisis detallado', 'ja': '事前にトレーニングされたコンテキスト化された文字埋め込みは、正規化の時間の大幅な改善につながる：詳細な分析', 'zh': '预练之情化字符嵌致时归一化之大改进:详细分析', 'ru': 'Предварительно обученные контекстуализированные вставки символов приводят к существенным улучшениям в нормализации времени: подробный анализ', 'hi': 'पूर्व प्रशिक्षित Contextualized चरित्र एम्बेडिंग समय सामान्यीकरण में प्रमुख सुधार के लिए नेतृत्व: एक विस्तृत विश्लेषण', 'ga': 'Mar thoradh ar Leabú Carachtair Comhthéacsaithe Réamh-oilte Feabhsuithe Móra ar Normalú Ama: Anailís Mhionsonraithe', 'ka': 'პროგრამეტური კონტექსტუალური სიმბოლოების შებეჭდვა, რომელიც დროის ნორმალიზაციაში დიდ უფრო მეტირებულია: დარწმუნებული ანალიზაცია', 'el': 'Προεκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις χαρακτήρων στο πλαίσιο οδηγούν σε σημαντικές βελτιώσεις στην ομαλοποίηση του χρόνου: μια λεπτομερής ανάλυση', 'hu': 'Az előképzett kontextualizált karakterbeágyazások jelentős javulásokat eredményeznek az időnormalizációban: részletes elemzés', 'it': "Le incorporazioni contestualizzate pre-addestrate dei caratteri portano a miglioramenti importanti nella normalizzazione del tempo: un'analisi dettagliata", 'kk': 'Бұрынғы контекстуалды таңбаларды ендіру уақыт нормализациясындағы үлкен жақсартуларға бастады: Егжей- тегжейі анализ', 'lt': 'Iš anksto parengtas kontekstinis charakteristikų įterpimas lemia didelius laiko normalizavimo pagerėjimus: išsami analizė', 'mk': 'Претренираните вградувања на контекстни карактери водат до големи подобрувања во нормализацијата на времето: детална анализа', 'ms': 'Pencampuran Aksara Berkonteks Latihan Terdahulu Memimpin Kebaikan Besar dalam Normalisasi Masa: Analisi Terperinci', 'ml': 'പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ടിട്ടുള്ള അക്ഷരസഞ്ചയങ്ങളുടെ എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d സമയത്ത് നോര്\u200dമാലിഷഷനിലേക്ക് മേജറിന്\u200dറെ മുന്\u200dഗണന മാ', 'mn': 'Өмнө дасгал хөгжүүлсэн Сургуулийн Хэрэглэгчдийн Хараагууд Хугацаанд Маш Сайжруулалтыг Нэгдсэн: Маш нарийвчлалтай Шалиулалт', 'mt': 'Impjanti ta’ Karatteri Kuntest imħarrġa minn qabel iwasslu għal Titjib Maġġuri fin-Normalizzazzjoni tal-Ħin: Analiżi dettaljata', 'no': 'Førehandsvis kontekstualiserte teiknkombinasjonar fører til store forbedringar i tid- normalisering: ein detaljert analyse', 'ro': 'Încorporările de caractere contextualizate pre-instruite duc la îmbunătățiri majore în normalizarea timpului: o analiză detaliată', 'pl': 'Wstępnie przeszkolone kontekstualizowane osadzenia znaków prowadzą do znacznych popraw normalizacji czasu: szczegółowa analiza', 'sr': 'Pre obučene kontekstualizacije karaktera vode do većih poboljšanja u normalizaciji vremena: detaljna analiza', 'si': 'මුලින් ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණිත සංවිධානය සම්බන්ධතා අක්ෂර සංවිධානයට ප්\u200dරධාන විශාලනයක් වෙනුවෙන් විශාලනය', 'so': 'Hortrained Contextualized Character Embeddings Lead to Major improvements in Time Normalization: a Detailed Analysis', 'sv': 'Förtränade kontextualiserade karaktärsinbäddningar leder till stora förbättringar i tidsnormalisering: en detaljerad analys', 'ta': 'முன்பு பயிற்சியாக்கப்பட்ட எழுத்து உட்பொதிந்த முன்னேற்றத்திற்கு பெரிய முன்னேற்றங்களை நேரத்தில் செலுத்து: விவரம', 'ur': 'پہلے تدریس کی کنٹکسٹیولیز کریٹر ایمبڈینگ ٹیمٹ نورملیزی میں زیادہ اضافہ کی جاتی ہے: Detailed Analysis', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Những nét vẽ được sắp xếp sẵn dẫn đến sự cải thiện lớn trong tính chuẩn thời gian: một phân tích chi tiết', 'da': 'Forududdannede kontekstualiserede tegneblejringer fører til større forbedringer i tidsnormalisering: en detaljeret analyse', 'nl': 'Vooropgeleide contextualiseerde karakterinsluitingen leiden tot belangrijke verbeteringen in tijdnormalisatie: een gedetailleerde analyse', 'de': 'Vortrainierte kontextualisierte Zeicheneinbettungen führen zu erheblichen Verbesserungen in der Zeitnormalisierung: eine detaillierte Analyse', 'bg': 'Предварително обучените контекстуализирани вграждания на знаци водят до големи подобрения в нормализацията на времето: подробен анализ', 'hr': 'Preobučeni kontekstualizirani integraciji znakova vode do velikih poboljšanja u normalizaciji vremena: detaljna analiza', 'id': 'Penampilan Karakter Konteksualisasi Latihan Sebelumnya Membawa Kebaikan Besar dalam Normalisasi Waktu: Analisi Rincian', 'fa': 'پیش آموزش پیش از آموزش پیوند\u200cهای شخصیت\u200cهای متوسط به پیشرفته\u200cهای بزرگ توسعه\u200cسازی زمان: یک تحلیل detalja', 'ko': '상세한 분석에 의하면 사전 훈련을 거친 상황화 역할이 시간 규범화에 삽입되어 중대한 개선을 얻었다고 한다', 'sw': 'Pre-trained Contextualized Character Embeddings Lead to Major Improvements in Time Normalization: a Detailed Analysis', 'tr': 'Öňki eğlenmiş Kontrol Karakter Ködlemeleri Wagtyň Eňleşenlerine lider: Täzelleşen Taýramçylyk', 'af': "Vorige onderwerp Konteksualiseerde Karakter Inbeeldings Lead to Major Improvements in Time Normalisation: ' n Detailed Analysis", 'sq': 'Përmbajtja e karakterëve të trajnuar përpara kryeson përmirësime të mëdha në normalizimin e kohës: një analizë e detajuar', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'পূর্বপূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত অক্ষরের বিশেষ বিশ্লেষণ: একটি বিস্তারিত বিশ্লেষণ', 'hy': 'Նախապատրաստված համընդհանուր բնավորությունները հանգեցնում են ժամանակի նորմալիզացիայի մեծ բարելավումներին: a', 'bs': 'Preobučeni kontekstualizirani integraciji karaktera vode do velikih poboljšanja u normalizaciji vremena: detaljna analiza', 'az': 'Əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş Kontextualized Karakter İfadələri Vaxtı Normalizatında Böyük Güncelləmələrə İfadə edir: Detailli Analizi', 'cs': 'Předškolené kontextualizované vložení znaků vede k významnému zlepšení časové normalizace: podrobná analýza', 'ca': 'Embediments de caràcters contextualitzats pré-entrenats condueixen a millors importants en la normalització del temps: un anàlisi detallat', 'et': 'Eelnevalt koolitatud kontekstualiseeritud märkide manustamine parandab oluliselt aja normaliseerimist: üksikasjalik analüüs', 'fi': 'Esikoulutetut kontekstualisoituneet merkit johtavat merkittäviin parannuksiin ajan normalisoinnissa: yksityiskohtainen analyysi', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'he': 'Pre-trained Contextualized Character Embeddings Lead to Major Improvements in Time Normalization: a Detailed Analysis', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Vnaprej usposobljene kontekstualizirane vključitve znakov vodijo do velikih izboljšav pri normalizaciji časa: podrobna analiza', 'bo': 'སྔོན་གྲངས་བསླར་མ་ཡོད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ནང་དུ་ཆེ་བའི་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང'}
{'en': 'Recent studies have shown that pre-trained contextual word embeddings, which assign the same word different vectors in different contexts, improve performance in many tasks. But while contextual embeddings can also be trained at the character level, the effectiveness of such embeddings has not been studied. We derive character-level contextual embeddings from Flair (Akbik et al., 2018), and apply them to a time normalization task, yielding major performance improvements over the previous state-of-the-art : 51 % error reduction in news and 33 % in clinical notes. We analyze the sources of these improvements, and find that pre-trained contextual character embeddings are more robust to term variations, infrequent terms, and cross-domain changes. We also quantify the size of context that pre-trained contextual character embeddings take advantage of, and show that such embeddings capture features like part-of-speech and capitalization.', 'ar': 'أظهرت الدراسات الحديثة أن عمليات دمج الكلمات السياقية المدربة مسبقًا ، والتي تعين نفس المتجهات المختلفة للكلمة في سياقات مختلفة ، تعمل على تحسين الأداء في العديد من المهام. ولكن في حين يمكن أيضًا تدريب حفلات الزفاف السياقية على مستوى الشخصية ، لم تتم دراسة فعالية مثل هذه الزخارف. نحن نشتق الزخارف السياقية على مستوى الشخصية من Flair (Akbik et al. ، 2018) ، ونطبقها على مهمة تطبيع الوقت ، مما يؤدي إلى تحسينات كبيرة في الأداء مقارنة بأحدث التقنيات السابقة: تقليل الخطأ بنسبة 51٪ في الأخبار و 33 ٪ في الملاحظات السريرية. نحن نحلل مصادر هذه التحسينات ، ونجد أن حفلات الزفاف ذات الطابع السياقي المدربة مسبقًا هي أكثر قوة بالنسبة إلى اختلافات المصطلحات ، والمصطلحات النادرة ، والتغييرات عبر المجال. نحن أيضًا نحدد حجم السياق الذي تستفيد منه حفلات الزفاف السياقية المدربة مسبقًا ، ونبين أن مثل هذه الزخارف تلتقط ميزات مثل جزء من الكلام والكتابة بالأحرف الكبيرة.', 'es': 'Estudios recientes han demostrado que las incrustaciones de palabras contextuales previamente entrenadas, que asignan diferentes vectores a la misma palabra en diferentes contextos, mejoran el rendimiento en muchas tareas. Pero si bien las incrustaciones contextuales también se pueden entrenar a nivel de personaje, no se ha estudiado la eficacia de tales incrustaciones. Obtenemos incrustaciones contextuales a nivel de caracteres de Flair (Akbik et al., 2018) y las aplicamos a una tarea de normalización del tiempo, lo que produce mejoras importantes en el rendimiento con respecto al estado de la técnica anterior: reducción de errores del 51% en las noticias y 33% en las notas clínicas. Analizamos las fuentes de estas mejoras y descubrimos que las incorporaciones de caracteres contextuales previamente entrenadas son más sólidas para las variaciones de los términos, los términos poco frecuentes y los cambios entre dominios. También cuantificamos el tamaño del contexto que aprovechan las incrustaciones de caracteres contextuales previamente entrenadas y demostramos que dichas incrustaciones capturan características como la parte de la oración y el uso de mayúsculas.', 'fr': "Des études récentes ont montré que les intégrations contextuelles de mots préentraînées, qui attribuent au même mot des vecteurs différents dans différents contextes, améliorent les performances dans de nombreuses tâches. Mais si les intégrations contextuelles peuvent également être entraînées au niveau du personnage, leur efficacité n'a pas été étudiée. Nous dérivons des intégrations contextuelles au niveau des caractères de Flair (Akbik et al., 2018) et les appliquons à une tâche de normalisation temporelle, ce qui permet d'améliorer considérablement les performances par rapport à la technologie de pointe précédente\xa0: réduction des erreurs de 51\xa0% dans les actualités et de 33\xa0% dans les notes cliniques. Nous analysons les sources de ces améliorations et constatons que les intégrations de caractères contextuelles pré-entraînées sont plus robustes face aux variations de termes, aux termes peu fréquents et aux changements interdomaines. Nous quantifions également la taille du contexte dont les incorporations de caractères contextuels préentraînées tirent parti, et montrons que ces intégrations capturent des fonctionnalités telles que la partie du discours et la capitalisation.", 'pt': 'Estudos recentes mostraram que as incorporações de palavras contextuais pré-treinadas, que atribuem à mesma palavra diferentes vetores em diferentes contextos, melhoram o desempenho em muitas tarefas. Mas enquanto as incorporações contextuais também podem ser treinadas no nível do personagem, a eficácia de tais incorporações não foi estudada. Derivamos embeddings contextuais em nível de personagem de Flair (Akbik et al., 2018) e os aplicamos a uma tarefa de normalização de tempo, gerando grandes melhorias de desempenho em relação ao estado da arte anterior: 51% de redução de erros em notícias e 33 % em notas clínicas. Analisamos as fontes dessas melhorias e descobrimos que as incorporações de caracteres contextuais pré-treinadas são mais robustas para variações de termos, termos infrequentes e alterações entre domínios. Também quantificamos o tamanho do contexto que as incorporações de caracteres contextuais pré-treinadas aproveitam e mostramos que essas incorporações capturam recursos como parte de fala e capitalização.', 'ja': '最近の研究では、同じ単語を異なるコンテキストで異なるベクターに割り当てる事前訓練されたコンテキストワード埋め込みが、多くのタスクのパフォーマンスを向上させることが示されています。しかし、文脈的埋め込みはキャラクターレベルでトレーニングすることもできますが、そのような埋め込みの有効性は研究されていません。私たちは、文字レベルの文脈的埋め込みをFlair （ Akbik et al., 2018 ）から導き出し、それらを時間正規化タスクに適用し、以前の最先端のパフォーマンスよりも大きな改善をもたらします。ニュースではエラーが51 ％削減され、臨床ノートでは33 ％削減されます。私たちは、これらの改善のソースを分析し、事前にトレーニングされたコンテキスト文字の埋め込みは、用語のバリエーション、頻度の低い用語、およびクロスドメインの変更に対してより堅牢であることを発見しました。また、事前にトレーニングされたコンテキスト文字埋め込みが利用するコンテキストのサイズを定量化し、そのような埋め込みが音声の一部や大文字などの機能を取り込むことを示します。', 'ru': 'Недавние исследования показали, что предварительно обученные контекстные вставки слов, которые присваивают одно и то же слово разным векторам в разных контекстах, улучшают производительность во многих задачах. Но хотя контекстные вложения могут быть также обучены на уровне персонажей, эффективность таких вложений не изучена. Мы получаем контекстные вставки на уровне символов от Flair (Akbik et al., 2018) и применяем их к задаче нормализации времени, что приводит к значительным улучшениям производительности по сравнению с предыдущим уровнем техники: 51% снижение ошибок в новостях и 33% в клинических записях. Мы анализируем источники этих улучшений и обнаруживаем, что предварительно обученные контекстные вставки более устойчивы к изменениям терминов, редким терминам и междоменным изменениям. Мы также количественно оцениваем размер контекста, который используют предварительно обученные вложения контекстного характера, и показываем, что такие вложения захватывают такие особенности, как часть речи и заглавные буквы.', 'zh': '近者研明,预训者上下文词嵌(异上下文同单词分异者向量)可以重许多任务之性。 然虽上下文嵌亦可训练符级,然其有效性未究也。 臣等Flair(Akbik等,2018)中推导出字符级上下文嵌,并用时归一化,比之前最先进之术,生大性改进:新闻中谬减51%,临床笔记减33%。 论其所由来,则上下文字符嵌术语变,不烦之术语,跨域可恃也。 又量化预先训练上下文字符嵌所用上下文大小,并明此类嵌获词性、大写等特征。', 'hi': 'हाल के अध्ययनों से पता चला है कि पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित प्रासंगिक शब्द एम्बेडिंग, जो विभिन्न संदर्भों में एक ही शब्द को अलग-अलग वैक्टर असाइन करते हैं, कई कार्यों में प्रदर्शन में सुधार करते हैं। लेकिन जबकि प्रासंगिक एम्बेडिंग को चरित्र स्तर पर भी प्रशिक्षित किया जा सकता है, इस तरह के एम्बेडिंग की प्रभावशीलता का अध्ययन नहीं किया गया है। हम फ्लेयर (Akbik et al., 2018) से चरित्र-स्तरीय प्रासंगिक एम्बेडिंग प्राप्त करते हैं, और उन्हें एक समय सामान्यीकरण कार्य पर लागू करते हैं, जिससे पिछले राज्य-कला पर प्रमुख प्रदर्शन सुधार होते हैं: समाचार में 51% त्रुटि में कमी और नैदानिक नोटों में 33%। हम इन सुधारों के स्रोतों का विश्लेषण करते हैं, और पाते हैं कि पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित प्रासंगिक चरित्र एम्बेडिंग शब्द भिन्नताओं, अक्सर शब्दों और क्रॉस-डोमेन परिवर्तनों के लिए अधिक मजबूत होते हैं। हम संदर्भ के आकार को भी निर्धारित करते हैं जो पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित प्रासंगिक चरित्र एम्बेडिंग का लाभ उठाते हैं, और दिखाते हैं कि इस तरह के एम्बेडिंग भाग-भाषण और पूंजीकरण जैसी सुविधाओं को कैप्चर करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá sé léirithe ag staidéir le déanaí go bhfeabhsaítear feidhmíocht i go leor tascanna trí leabú focal comhthéacsúla réamh-oilte, a sannann veicteoirí difriúla an fhocail chéanna i gcomhthéacsanna éagsúla. Ach cé gur féidir leabuithe comhthéacsúla a oiliúint freisin ar leibhéal na gcarachtar, níl aon staidéar déanta ar éifeachtacht leabaithe den sórt sin. Faighimid leabaithe comhthéacsúla ar leibhéal carachtar ó Flair (Akbik et al., 2018), agus cuireann muid iad i bhfeidhm ar thasc normalaithe ama, rud a thugann feabhsuithe móra feidhmíochta ar an staid úrscothach roimhe seo: laghdú earráide 51% sa nuacht agus 33 % i nótaí cliniciúla. Déanaimid anailís ar fhoinsí na bhfeabhsuithe seo, agus aimsímid go bhfuil leabú carachtar comhthéacsúil réamh-oilte níos láidre maidir le héagsúlachtaí téarma, téarmaí neamhchoitianta, agus athruithe tras-fearainn. Déanaimid cainníochtú freisin ar an méid comhthéacs a bhaineann leabú carachtar comhthéacsúil réamh-oilte leas a bhaint as, agus léirímid go nglacann leabaithe den sórt sin gnéithe cosúil le cuid de chaint agus caipitliú.', 'ka': 'ახალი სწავლებები გამოჩვენეთ, რომ საკუთარი კონტექსტური სიტყვები, რომელიც იგივე სიტყვებს განსხვავებული გვექტორიების განსხვავება განსხვავებული კონტექსტში, უფრო მე მაგრამ, როცა კონტექსტური შემოწყვეტილება შეიძლება ასევე გააკეთება სიმბოლოების დონეში, ასეთი შემოწყვეტილების ეფექტიურობა არ მოსწავლია. ჩვენ მივიღეთ სიმბოლოების კონტექსტური კონტექსტური ინტერქსტურებები Flair (Akbik et al., 2018) დან და ისინი დავყენეთ დროის ნორმალიზაციის დავალებისთვის, რომელიც წინ წინ წინ წინ წინ წინ წინ წინ წინ წინ წ ჩვენ ამ უფლებების ფორმატების ანალიზაციას და აღმოჩნეთ, რომ უფრო ძალიან სტრუქტური კონტექსტური კონტექსტური კონტექსტური კონტექსტური კონტექსტური კონტე ჩვენ ასევე კონტექსტის ზომის კვანტიფიკაციას, რომელიც წინ განსწავლა კონტექსტური სიმბოლოების შემდეგ გამოიყენება, და გამოჩვენება, რომ ასეთი შემდეგების შემდეგება შეიყენება ფ', 'el': 'Πρόσφατες μελέτες έχουν δείξει ότι οι προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις λέξεων που αντιστοιχούν στην ίδια λέξη διαφορετικά διανύσματα σε διαφορετικά πλαίσια, βελτιώνουν την απόδοση σε πολλές εργασίες. Αλλά ενώ οι περιεκτικές ενσωματώσεις μπορούν επίσης να εκπαιδευτούν σε επίπεδο χαρακτήρων, η αποτελεσματικότητα τέτοιων ενσωματώσεων δεν έχει μελετηθεί. Παράγουμε περιεκτικές ενσωματώσεις σε επίπεδο χαρακτήρων από το και τις εφαρμόζουμε σε μια εργασία ομαλοποίησης χρόνου, παρέχοντας σημαντικές βελτιώσεις απόδοσης έναντι της προηγούμενης κατάστασης τεχνολογίας: 51% μείωση σφαλμάτων στις ειδήσεις και 33% σε κλινικές σημειώσεις. Αναλύουμε τις πηγές αυτών των βελτιώσεων και διαπιστώνουμε ότι οι προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις χαρακτήρων περιβάλλοντος είναι πιο ισχυρές σε παραλλαγές όρων, σπάνιους όρους και αλλαγές μεταξύ τομέων. Επίσης, ποσοτικοποιούμε το μέγεθος του περιβάλλοντος που εκμεταλλεύονται οι προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις χαρακτήρων περιβάλλοντος και δείχνουμε ότι τέτοιες ενσωματώσεις συλλαμβάνουν χαρακτηριστικά όπως μέρος ομιλίας και κεφαλαιοποίηση.', 'hu': 'A legutóbbi tanulmányok kimutatták, hogy az előre képzett kontextuális szóbeágyazások, amelyek ugyanazt a szót különböző kontextusokban rendelik különböző vektorokat, sok feladatban javítják a teljesítményt. De míg a kontextuális beágyazások karakterszinten is képezhetők, az ilyen beágyazások hatékonyságát nem tanulmányozták. Karakterszintű kontextuális beágyazásokat származtatunk Flairból (Akbik et al., 2018), és alkalmazzuk őket egy időnormalizálási feladatra, ami jelentős teljesítményjavulást eredményezett az előző korszerűséghez képest: 51%-os hibacsökkenés a hírekben és 33%-os klinikai jegyzetekben. Elemezzük ezeknek a fejlesztéseknek a forrásait, és megállapítjuk, hogy az előre képzett kontextuális karakterek beágyazása erőteljesebb a kifejezések variációival, ritka kifejezésekkel és a tartományok közötti változásokkal szemben. Számszerűsítjük azt a kontextust is, amelyet az előre képzett kontextuális karakterbeágyazások kihasználnak, és megmutatjuk, hogy az ilyen beágyazások olyan funkciókat rögzítenek, mint a beszédrész és a nagybetűk.', 'it': "Studi recenti hanno dimostrato che le incorporazioni contestuali pre-addestrate di parole, che assegnano alla stessa parola vettori diversi in contesti diversi, migliorano le prestazioni in molti compiti. Ma mentre le incorporazioni contestuali possono essere addestrate anche a livello di carattere, l'efficacia di tali incorporazioni non è stata studiata. Otteniamo incorporazioni contestuali a livello di carattere da Flair (Akbik et al., 2018), e li applichiamo a un compito di normalizzazione del tempo, ottenendo importanti miglioramenti delle prestazioni rispetto al precedente stato dell'arte: 51% riduzione degli errori nelle notizie e 33% nelle note cliniche. Analizziamo le fonti di questi miglioramenti e scopriamo che le incorporazioni di caratteri contestuali pre-addestrate sono più robuste per variazioni di termini, termini rari e cambiamenti cross-domain. Quantifichiamo anche la dimensione del contesto di cui traggono vantaggio le incorporazioni contestuali pre-addestrate dei caratteri e mostriamo che tali incorporazioni catturano funzionalità come parte di discorso e capitalizzazione.", 'kk': 'Жуырдағы зерттеулері бірнеше контексттік сөздерді ендіру үшін бірнеше сөзді векторлардың әртүрлі уақыттарын таңдап, көптеген тапсырмалардың істеуін жақсартып көрсетеді. Бірақ контекстік ендіруі сондай-ақ таңбалардың деңгейінде оқылмай алады. Бұл ендіруінің әсері оқылмайды. Біз Flair (Akbik et al., 2018) деңгейіндегі контекстуалды ендіруді құрып, оларды уақытты нормализациялау тапсырмасына қолданып, алдыңғы орындау күйінде маңызды жылдамдықтарды жақсартып, 51% жаңалықтарды азайту және 33% клиникалық ноттард Біз бұл жақсартулардың көздерін анализ және алдын- ала оқылған контексті таңбаларды ендіру үшін термин айырмашылықтары, әдеттегі терминлер және бірнеше доменге өзгерістер көбірек деп табыл Сонымен қатар, біз бұл контекстің өлшемін, көздеген контексті таңбалардың ендіру үшін пайдаланып, бұл ендіру сөздің бөлшегін және көпшіліктің бөлшегін түсіріп көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешните студии покажаа дека предобучените контекстни зборови, кои го додаваат истиот збор различни вектори во различни контексти, ја подобруваат перформансата во многу задачи. Но, иако контекстните вградувања исто така можат да бидат обучени на ниво на карактер, ефективноста на ваквите вградувања не е проучена. Ние изведуваме контекстуални внесувања на ниво на карактеристика од Флајр (Akbik и други, 2018) и ги применуваме на задачата за нормализација на времето, придонесувајќи големи подобрувања на перформансата во однос на претходната најнова состојба: 51 отсто намалување на грешките во вестите и 33 отсто во Ние ги анализираме изворите на овие подобрувања, и откриваме дека предобучените контекстуални карактеристички вложувања се посилни на терминските варијации, ретки термини и трансдомените промени. Ние, исто така, ја квантификуваме големината на контекст од кој предобучените контекстни карактеристички вградувања го искористуваат, и покажуваме дека ваквите вградувања заземаат карактеристики како дел од говорот и капитализација.', 'lt': 'Neseniai atlikti tyrimai parodė, kad iš anksto parengti kontekstiniai žodžių įterpimai, kurie skirtingomis aplinkybėmis suteikia tą patį žodį skirtingi vektoriai, pagerina daugelio užduočių rezultatus. But while contextual embeddings can also be trained at the character level, the effectiveness of such embeddings has not been studied.  Iš Flair (Akbik et al., 2018 m.) gauname charakteristikų lygmens kontekstinius įdėjimus ir juos taikome laiko normalizavimo uždaviniui, dėl kurio buvo gerokai pagerinti rezultatai, palyginti su ankstesnėmis pažangomis: 51 % klaidų sumažėjimas naujienose ir 33 % klinikinių pastabų. We analyze the sources of these improvements, and find that pre-trained contextual character embeddings are more robust to term variations, infrequent terms, and cross-domain changes.  Taip pat kiekybiškai vertiname kontekstą, kuriuo naudojasi iš anksto parengtas kontekstinis pobūdis, ir parodome, kad tokie įtraukimai apima tokius požymius kaip kalbos dalis ir kapitalizacija.', 'ml': 'Recent studies have shown that pre-trained contextual word embeddings, which assign the same word different vectors in different contexts, improve performance in many tasks.  എന്നാല്\u200d കാര്യത്തിലുള്ള അഭിപ്രായത്തില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഇതുപോലുള്ള അംഗീകരണങ്ങളുടെ പ്രവർത ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഫ്ലായിരില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള അക്സിക്ക് എറ്റ് അല്\u200d, 2018 ല്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ക്രമത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അവയെ സമയത്തെ സാധാരണമാക്കുന്ന ജോലിയില്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. മുമ ഈ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയ സ്രോതസ്സുകള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന പ്രധാനപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ അക്ഷരസഞ്ചരിത്രങ്ങള്\u200d വാ പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ടിട്ടുള്ള കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ വലിപ്പം നമ്മളും കൃത്യമാക്കുന്നു. ഇത്തരം അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്രത്തിന്\u200dറെയും പേരില്\u200d', 'mt': 'Studji reċenti wrew li inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem kuntestwali mħarrġa minn qabel, li jassenjaw l-istess kelma vetturi differenti f’kuntesti differenti, itejbu l-prestazzjoni f’ħafna kompiti. Iżda filwaqt li l-inkorporazzjonijiet kuntestwali jistgħu jiġu mħarrġa wkoll fil-livell tal-karattru, l-effettività ta’ tali inkorporazzjonijiet ma ġietx studjata. Aħna nidderivaw inkorporazzjonijiet kuntestwali fil-livell tal-karattru minn Flair (Akbik et al., 2018), u napplikawhom għal kompitu ta’ normalizzazzjoni tal-ħin, li jwassal għal titjib maġġuri fil-prestazzjoni fuq l-a ħħar avvanz: tnaqqis ta’ żball ta’ 51% fl-aħbarijiet u 33% fin-noti kliniċi. Aħna nianalizzaw is-sorsi ta’ dan it-titjib, u nsibu li l-inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ karattru kuntestwali mħarrġa minn qabel huma aktar robusti għall-varjazzjonijiet fit-terminu, termini mhux frekwenti, u bidliet bejn id-dominji. Nikkwantifikaw ukoll id-daqs tal-kuntest li l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-karattru kuntestwali mħarrġa minn qabel jieħdu vantaġġ minnu, u nuru li tali inkorporazzjonijiet jaqbdu karatteristiċi bħal parti mid-diskors u l-kapitalizzazzjoni.', 'ms': 'kajian baru-baru ini telah menunjukkan bahawa pelengkapan perkataan kontekstual pralatihan, yang menukarkan perkataan yang sama vektor berbeza dalam konteks berbeza, meningkatkan prestasi dalam banyak tugas. Tetapi walaupun penerbangan kontekstual juga boleh dilatih pada aras aksara, keefektivitas penerbangan tersebut belum dipelajari. Kami menghasilkan penyambungan kontekstual aras-aksara dari Flair (Akbik et al., 2018), dan menerapkannya kepada tugas normalisasi masa, menghasilkan peningkatan prestasi utama atas keadaan-keadaan-seni terdahulu: 51% pengurangan ralat dalam berita dan 33% dalam nota klinik. Kami menganalisis sumber perkembangan ini, dan mencari bahawa penyembelihan aksara kontekstual pra-dilatih lebih kuat kepada variasi terma, terma tidak sering, dan perubahan-domain saling. Kami juga kuantifikasikan saiz konteks bahawa pembenaman aksara kontekstual pra-dilatih mengambil keuntungan dari, dan menunjukkan bahawa pembenaman seperti ini menangkap ciri-ciri seperti sebahagian-dari-ucapan dan kapitalisasi.', 'mn': 'Саяхан судалгаагаар сургалтын өмнө сургалтын орчин үгийг бий болгож байгааг харуулсан. Энэ нь өөр нөхцөлд өөр векторуудыг тодорхойлж, олон ажил дээр ажиллагааг сайжруулдаг. Гэхдээ нөхцөл байдлын нэгдэл мөн харьцааны түвшинд суралцах боломжтой ч гэсэн, ийм нэгдэл нь үр дүнтэй байдлыг судалж чадахгүй. Бид Флайр (Akbik et al., 2018) ээс харьцаа түвшинд орчин үеийн төвшин орчин зүйлсийг авч, тэднийг цаг хугацааны хэмжээнд хэрэглэж, өмнөх урлагийн үйл ажиллагааны сайжруулалт гаргаж байна: мэдээллийн 51% бууруулалт, мөн клиникийн мэдээллийн 33%. Бид эдгээр сайжруулалтын эх үүсвэрийг шинжилгээ хийж, урьдчилан сургалтын харьцааны нэгтгэл нь өөрчлөлт, үр дүнтэй тохиолдол, олон дотор өөрчлөлт илүү хүчтэй гэдгийг олж мэднэ. Мөн бид урьд сургалтын орчин үеийн хэмжээний хэмжээг хэмжээгээр хэмжээгээр тодорхойлдог. Мөн ийм орчин үеийн хэсэг болон капиталын нэг хэсэг шиг харуулж байгааг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Ostatnie badania wykazały, że wstępnie przeszkolone kontekstowe osadzenia słów, które przypisują temu samemu słowu różne wektory w różnych kontekstach, poprawiają wydajność w wielu zadaniach. Ale choć kontekstowe osadzenia mogą być również trenowane na poziomie postaci, skuteczność takich osadzeń nie została zbadana. Wywodzimy kontekstowe osadzenia na poziomie znaków z Flaira (Akbik et al., 2018) i stosujemy je do zadania normalizacji czasu, przynosząc znaczną poprawę wydajności w stosunku do poprzedniego stanu techniki: 51% redukcji błędów w wiadomościach i 33% w notatkach klinicznych. Analizujemy źródła tych ulepszeń i stwierdzimy, że wstępnie przeszkolone osadzenia znaków kontekstowych są bardziej solidne w odniesieniu do wariancji terminów, rzadkich terminów i zmian między domenami. Określamy również wielkość kontekstu, z którego korzystają wstępnie przeszkolone osadzenia znaków kontekstowych, i pokazujemy, że takie osadzenia przechwytują funkcje, takie jak część mowy i wielkość liter.', 'no': 'Nyleg har studiar vist at før- trengte kontekst- ordinnbygging, som tilbyr same ord ulike vektorar i ulike kontekstar, forbetrar utviklinga i mange oppgåver. Men mens kontekstane innbygging også kan trenjast på teiknenivå, er det ikkje studiert effektiviteten av slike innbygging. Vi deriverer kontekstlike innbygging av karakternivået frå Flair (Akbik et al., 2018) og bruker dei til ein tidlegalisering oppgåve, som gjer stor forbedringar av utviklingane over den førre kunsttilstanden: 51% feilreduksjon i nyhetar og 33% i kliniske notata. Vi analyserer kjeldene for desse forbetringane, og finn at først trengte innbygging av teikn er meir sterkt for uttrykk av variasjonar, frekvens uttrykk og krysdomeneendringar. Vi kvantifiserer også storleiken på konteksten som først trengte innbygging av tekstteikn brukar til, og viser at slike innbygging får funksjonar som del av tale og store bokstavar.', 'ro': 'Studiile recente au arătat că încorporările contextuale pre-instruite, care atribuie același cuvânt vectori diferiți în contexte diferite, îmbunătățesc performanța în multe sarcini. Dar în timp ce încorporările contextuale pot fi, de asemenea, instruite la nivel de caracter, eficacitatea acestor încorporări nu a fost studiată. derivăm încorporări contextuale la nivel de caracter din Flair (Akbik et al., 2018) și le aplicăm la o sarcină de normalizare a timpului, obținând îmbunătățiri majore de performanță față de starea anterioară: 51% reducere a erorilor în știri și 33% în notele clinice. Analizăm sursele acestor îmbunătățiri și constatăm că încorporările contextuale pre-instruite de caractere sunt mai robuste pentru variațiile termenilor, termenii rar și schimbările cross-domeniu. De asemenea, cuantificăm dimensiunea contextului de care profită încorporările contextuale pre-instruite de caractere și arătăm că astfel de încorporări capturează caracteristici precum partea de vorbire și majuscalizarea.', 'sr': 'Nedavno ispitivanje pokazalo je da su predobučene kontekstualne reči ugrađene, koje daju istu reč različitim vektorima u različitim kontekstima, poboljšavaju učinkovitost u mnogim zadacima. Međutim, dok se kontekstualne integracije takođe mogu obučiti na nivou karaktera, učinkovitost takvih integracija nije proučena. Nalazimo kontekstualne integracije na nivou karaktera iz Flair a (Akbik et al., 2018), i primjenjujemo ih na posao normalizacije vremena, pružajući velike poboljšanje učinkovitosti u prethodnom stanju umjetnosti: smanjenje greške na 51% i 33% u kliničkim notama. Analiziramo izvore tih poboljšanja i otkrijemo da su predobučeni kontekstualni integraciji karaktera jači za izražavanje varijacija, neobičnih uslova i promjene preko domena. Takoðe kvantificiramo velièinu konteksta od kojeg predobuèeni kontekstualni integraciji koriste, i pokazujemo da takve integracije uhvate karakteristike poput deo govora i kapitalizacije.', 'si': 'අන්තිම විධානය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරධානය සම්පූර්ණ වචන සම්පූර්ණය, වෙනස නමුත් සංවේදනය සම්පූර්ණ ස්ථානයෙන් පුළුවන් අක්ෂර ස්ථානයෙන් පුළුවන් වෙලා තියෙන්නේ, මේ සංවේද අපි ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ස්ථානය සම්පූර්ණ ස්ථානයක් ප්\u200dරශ්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්ණය කරනවා Flair (Akbic et al., 2018), ඒ වගේම ඔවුන්ව වෙලාව සාමාන්\u200dය කාර්යාවට ප්\u200dරශ්ණය කරනවා, ප්\u200dරශ අපි මේ විශේෂණයේ ප්\u200dරදේශය විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරදේශයේ ප්\u200dරදේශ පරීක්ෂණය සංවිධානය වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්', 'so': 'Waxbarashada la soo dhowaaday waxay tuseen in horay loo tababaray ku qorayo hadal ku qoran, kaas oo u hagaajiya isku hadal vector oo kala duduwan, ku hagaajiya joojinta shaqooyin badan. But while contextual embeddings can also be trained at the character level, the effectiveness of such embeddings has not been studied.  Waxaynu ka soo bandhigaynaa qalabka xiliga ah Flair (Akbik et al., 2018), waxaana u codsanaynaa shaqada waqtiga caadiga ah, waxaana soo bandhigayaa horumarinta horumarinta horumarinta xaaladda hore ee sanadka: 51% qaladka u soo gaabiya warqada iyo 33% oo ku qoran qoraalka dhaqaalaha. Waxaynu kala fakaraynaa noocyada horumarinta, waxaynu ogaannaa in qofka horay loo tababariyey ay ka badan yihiin isbedelka xiliga ah, waxyaabaha ku saabsan, iyo beddelka gudaha. Sidoo kale waxaynu qiyaasaynaa sida qayb ka mid ah hadal iyo taariikh.', 'sv': 'Nyligen genomförda studier har visat att förintränade kontextuella ordinbäddningar, som tilldelar samma ord olika vektorer i olika sammanhang, förbättrar prestanda i många uppgifter. Men även om kontextuella inbäddningar också kan utbildas på karaktärsnivå, har effektiviteten av sådana inbäddningar inte studerats. Vi härleder kontextuella inbäddningar på karaktärsnivå från Flair (Akbik et al., 2018), och tillämpar dem på en tidsnormaliseringsuppgift, vilket ger stora prestandaförbättringar jämfört med tidigare state-of-the-art: 51% felminskning i nyheter och 33% i kliniska anteckningar. Vi analyserar källorna till dessa förbättringar och finner att förintränade kontextuella karaktärsinbäddningar är mer robusta för termvariationer, ovanliga termer och domänöverskridande förändringar. Vi kvantifierar också storleken på sammanhang som fördefinierade kontextuella karaktärsinbäddningar utnyttjar och visar att sådana inbäddningar fångar funktioner som del av tal och versaler.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் படிப்புகள் முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட தற்காலிக வார்த்தை உள்ளிடப்பட்டது, அதே வார்த்தையை வெவ்வெக்டார்கள் வெவ்வெட்டார்கள ஆனால் தற்காலிக நிலையான பொருள்கள் எழுத்து நிலையிலும் பயிற்சி செய்ய முடியும் போது, இவ்விருப்பங்களின் விளைவு பட நாம் பிளாரிலிருந்து எழுத்து நிலையில் இருந்து பிரச்சனைகளை கிடைத்துள்ளோம் (Akbik et al., 2018) மற்றும் அவற்றை நேர இயல்பான செயல்பாட்டிற்கு பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், முந்தைய கலை இந்த முன்னேற்றங்களின் மூலங்களை நாம் ஆராய்ச்சி செய்கிறோம், முன்பு பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட தற்காலிக எழுத்து உள்ளிடுதல் மாறிகள், பின்வரும்  முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட தற்காலிக எழுத்து உள்ளடக்கங்கள் பயன்படுத்தும் சூழலின் அளவை நாம் குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் இத்தகைய உள்ளீடுகள் பேச்சின் பக', 'ur': 'اچھی مطالعہ دکھائی گئی ہے کہ پہلے تدریس کی تدریس کی تدریس کی کلمات ابڈینگ، جو مختلف تدریس میں ایک کلمات مختلف ویکتروں کو مقرر کرتی ہے، بہت سی کاموں میں فعالیت کو بہتر کرتی ہے. لیکن حاﻻنکہ متوجہ ایمبڈینگ شخص سطح پر بھی تعلیم دی جاتی ہے، اس طرح کی ایمبڈینگ کی فعالیت پڑھی جاتی ہے ہم فریر (Akbik et al., 2018) سے Character-Level contextual embeddings derive from Flair (Akbik et al., 2018) اور ان کو ایک زمانی عامل کرنے کے تابع پر لازم کریں، پہلے کی حالت-art پر بڑی عملکرد اضافہ کریں گے: خبروں میں 51% خطا کاٹ اور 33% کلینیکی نوٹوں میں۔ ہم ان سوداگریزوں کے منبع تحقیق کرتے ہیں، اور دیکھتے ہیں کہ پہلے تدریس کی کنٹکسٹیسٹی شخصیزوں کی پیدائش کی زیادہ طاقت رکھتی ہے کہ تدریج، غیر عادت اور کروس ڈمین کی تغییرات کے لئے۔ ہم نے بھی کائنات کا اندازہ مقدار کرتا ہے جس سے پہلے تدریس کی تدریس کی تعلیم کے علائم انڈینگ فائدہ اٹھاتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ انڈینگ بات اور کٹیپلیٹ کی طرح ویژہ اٹھاتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Yaqinda o'rganishlar esa, bir necha vazifalarda bir so'zni o'zgartiradi va bir so'zni o'zgartiradi va bir xil vazifalarda bir so'zni o'zgartiradi. Lekin davomida qo'llanmalar qo'llangan darajada o'rganishi mumkin, shunday foydalanuvchi effekti o'qib boʻlmadi. We derive character-level contextual embeddings from Flair (Akbik et al., 2018), and apply them to a time normalization task, yielding major performance improvements over the previous state-of-the-art: 51% error reduction in news and 33% in clinical notes.  Biz bu yaxshi o'zgarishlarning manbanlarini analyzmaymiz, va o'rganishdan oldin taʼminlovchi darajadagi harflarning o'zgarishlarini o'zgartirish mumkin, ko'paytirilgan soʻzlar va har bir necha domen o'zgarishlarini ko'proq o'zgartiradi. Biz birinchi taʼminlovchi davom etilgan belgilarning hajmini aniqlashimiz mumkin. Bu aloqalar gapirish va taqdimlik kabi xususiyatlarni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Những nghiên cứu gần đây đã cho thấy sự nhúng vào các từ ngữ ngữ ngữ được rèn luyện trước, chia sẻ cùng một từ các véc- tơ khác nhau trong các ngữ cảnh khác nhau, nâng cao khả năng ứng biến. Tuy nhiên, mặc dù việc nhúng thêm các tình huống cũng có thể được đào tạo ở mức độ nhân cách, nhưng tính hiệu quả của việc này chưa được nghiên cứu. Chúng tôi chiết xuất xuất các trường hợp định dạng nhân vật từ Flair (Akbik et al., 2008) và áp dụng chúng vào một nhiệm vụ định dạng thời gian, tạo ra những cải tiến hiệu suất lớn hơn trước: 50=.* giảm lỗi trong tin tức và 33=* trong ghi chú lâm sàng. Chúng tôi phân tích nguồn gốc của những cải tiến này, và thấy rằng sự nhúng vào các ký tự đã được đào tạo trước đã mạnh hơn với những biến dạng hạn chế, và thay đổi chéo miền. Chúng tôi cũng định lượng kích thước của bối cảnh mà sự nhúng vào các ký tự có văn bản được đào tạo có lợi dụng, và cho thấy sự nhúng tay này thu thập các tính năng như phần nói và viết đầu.', 'bg': 'Последни проучвания показват, че предварително обучените контекстуални вграждания на думи, които присвояват една и съща дума различни вектори в различни контексти, подобряват изпълнението на много задачи. Но докато контекстуалните вграждания могат да бъдат обучени и на ниво характер, ефективността на такива вграждания не е проучена. Извличаме контекстуални вграждания на ниво характер от и ги прилагаме към задача за нормализиране на времето, което води до значителни подобрения на производителността в сравнение с предишните съвременни технологии: 51% намаляване на грешките в новините и 33% в клиничните бележки. Анализираме източниците на тези подобрения и откриваме, че предварително обучените контекстуални вграждания на знаци са по-стабилни за вариациите на термините, редките термини и промените в междудомейните. Също така количествено измерваме размера на контекста, от който се възползват предварително обучените контекстуални вграждания на знаци, и показваме, че такива вграждания улавят функции като част от речта и главни букви.', 'da': 'Nylige undersøgelser har vist, at prætrænede kontekstuelle ordindlejringer, som tildeler det samme ord forskellige vektorer i forskellige sammenhænge, forbedrer ydeevnen i mange opgaver. Men mens kontekstuelle indlejringer også kan trænes på karakterniveau, er effektiviteten af sådanne indlejringer ikke blevet undersøgt. Vi udleder kontekstuelle indlejringer på karakterniveau fra Flair (Akbik et al., 2018), og anvender dem til en tidsnormaliseringsopgave, hvilket giver store ydelsesforbedringer i forhold til den tidligere state-of-the-art: 51% fejlreduktion i nyheder og 33% i kliniske noter. Vi analyserer kilderne til disse forbedringer og finder ud af, at præ-trænede kontekstuelle karakterindsætninger er mere robuste til termvariationer, sjældne termer og ændringer på tværs af domæner. Vi kvantificerer også størrelsen af kontekst, som præ-trænede kontekstuelle tegn indlejringer drager fordel af, og viser, at sådanne indlejringer fanger funktioner som del-of-tale og store bogstaver.', 'nl': 'Recente studies hebben aangetoond dat vooraf getrainde contextuele woordembeddingen, die hetzelfde woord verschillende vectoren toekennen in verschillende contexten, de prestaties in veel taken verbeteren. Maar hoewel contextuele embeddings ook op karakterniveau getraind kunnen worden, is de effectiviteit van dergelijke embeddings niet onderzocht. We leiden contextuele embeddings op karakterniveau af van Flair (Akbik et al., 2018), en passen ze toe op een tijdnormalisatietaak, wat belangrijke prestatieverbeteringen oplevert ten opzichte van de vorige state-of-the-art: 51% foutreductie in nieuws en 33% in klinische notities. We analyseren de bronnen van deze verbeteringen en stellen vast dat vooraf getrainde contextuele karakterinsluitingen robuuster zijn voor termijnvariaties, zeldzame termen en domeinoverschrijdende wijzigingen. We kwantificeren ook de omvang van de context die vooraf getrainde contextuele tekens insluitingen benutten, en laten zien dat dergelijke insluitingen functies zoals deel van spraak en hoofdletters vastleggen.', 'hr': 'U nedavnim ispitivanjima pokazali su da su predobučene kontekstualne riječi ugrađene, koje dodaju isto riječ različitim vektorima u različitim kontekstima, poboljšavaju učinkovitost u mnogim zadatkima. Međutim, dok se kontekstualne integracije također mogu obučiti na razini karaktera, učinkovitost takvih integracija nije ispitivana. Nalazimo kontekstne integracije na nivou karaktera iz Flair a (Akbik et al., 2018) i primjenjujemo ih na zadatak normalizacije vremena, pružajući velike poboljšanje učinkovitosti u prethodnom stanju umjetnosti: smanjenje greške na 51% i 33% u kliničkim notama. Analiziramo izvore tih poboljšanja i otkrijemo da su predobučeni kontekstualni integraciji karaktera jači za izražavanje varijacija, rijetkih uslova i promjene preko domena. Također smo kvantificirali veličinu konteksta od kojeg su predobučeni kontekstualni integraciji karaktera iskoristili, i pokazali da takve integracije uhvate karakteristike poput dijela govora i kapitalizacije.', 'de': 'Neuere Studien haben gezeigt, dass vortrainierte kontextbezogene Worteinbettungen, die demselben Wort unterschiedliche Vektoren in verschiedenen Kontexten zuweisen, die Leistung in vielen Aufgaben verbessern. Aber während kontextuelle Einbettungen auch auf Charakterebene trainiert werden können, wurde die Wirksamkeit solcher Einbettungen nicht untersucht. Wir leiten kontextbezogene Einbettungen auf Charakterebene von Flair (Akbik et al., 2018) ab und wenden sie auf eine Zeitnormalisierungsaufgabe an, was zu erheblichen Leistungsverbesserungen gegenüber dem bisherigen Stand der Technik führt: 51% Fehlerreduktion in Nachrichten und 33% in klinischen Notizen. Wir analysieren die Quellen dieser Verbesserungen und stellen fest, dass vortrainierte kontextbezogene Zeicheneinbettungen robuster gegen Termvariationen, seltene Terme und domänenübergreifende Änderungen sind. Wir quantifizieren auch die Größe des Kontexts, den vorgetrainierte kontextbezogene Zeicheneinbettungen nutzen, und zeigen, dass solche Einbettungen Funktionen wie Sprachteil und Großschreibung erfassen.', 'id': 'Studi-studi baru-baru ini menunjukkan bahwa pembangunan kata kontekstual prapelatih, yang mengatur kata yang sama vektor berbeda dalam konteks berbeda, meningkatkan prestasi dalam banyak tugas. Namun meskipun penerbangan kontekstual juga dapat dilatih pada tingkat karakter, efektivitas penerbangan tersebut belum dipelajari. Kami menghasilkan bentuk kontekstual tingkat karakter dari Flair (Akbik et al., 2018), dan menerapkan mereka untuk tugas normalisasi waktu, menghasilkan peningkatan prestasi utama atas kemajuan-kemajuan sebelumnya: 51% pengurangan kesalahan dalam berita dan 33% dalam catatan klinis. Kami menganalisis sumber perbaikan ini, dan menemukan bahwa karakter kontekstual terlatih lebih kuat untuk variasi istilah, istilah jarang, dan perubahan cross-domain. Kami juga mengurangi ukuran konteks yang dilatih karakter kontekstual embedding mengambil keuntungan dari, dan menunjukkan bahwa embedding tersebut menangkap karakter seperti bagian dari pidato dan kapitalisasi.', 'ko': '최근의 연구에 따르면 미리 훈련된 상하문 단어 삽입은 서로 다른 상하문에서 같은 단어에 서로 다른 벡터를 분배하여 많은 임무의 집행 효율을 높일 수 있다.그러나 언어 환경 삽입도 역할 차원에서 훈련할 수 있지만 이런 삽입의 유효성은 아직 연구되지 않았다.Flair(Akbik et al., 2018)에서 문자급 컨텍스트 삽입을 파생하여 시간 표준화 임무에 적용한 결과, 이전의 최신 기술에 비해 중대한 성능 개선이 생겼다. 뉴스의 오류 감소 51%, 임상노트의 오류 감소 33%이다.우리는 이러한 개선의 출처를 분석한 결과 미리 훈련된 상하문 문자가 용어 변화, 빈번하지 않은 용어와 범위 내의 변화에 삽입되어 더욱 노봉성을 가진다는 것을 발견했다.우리는 또한 미리 훈련된 상하문 문자의 삽입이 사용하는 상하문 크기를 계량화하였으며 이러한 삽입은 단어성과 대문자 등 특징을 포착했음을 나타냈다.', 'sw': 'Tafiti za hivi karibuni zimeonyesha kuwa neno la zamani lililojifunza, ambalo linaweka neno hilo tofauti katika michoro tofauti, kuboresha utendaji katika kazi nyingi. Lakini wakati ambapo mabadiliko ya kitaifa yanaweza pia kufundishwa kwa kiwango cha tabia, madhara ya makundi haya hayajafunzwa. Tunatoa mabadiliko ya kiwango kikubwa kutoka Flair (Akbik et al., 2018), na kuwatumia katika kazi ya kawaida ya muda, na kusababisha maboresho ya utendaji mkubwa zaidi ya hali ya sanaa iliyopita: kupungua kwa asilimia 51 katika habari na asilimia 33 katika taarifa za kliniki. Tunanachambua vyanzo vya maendeleo haya, na tunagundua kuwa kuwepo kwa mhusika wa zamani ni mabadiliko mengi ya ukomo, matumizi yanayoendelea, na mabadiliko ya ndani. Kadhalika tunahitimisha ukubwa wa muktadha ambao kuwepo kwa mhusika wa zamani wanatumia matumizi, na kuonyesha kuwa makampuni haya yanachukua hisia kama sehemu ya hotuba na ubepari.', 'fa': 'مطالعات اخیرا نشان داده اند که ابتدایی کلمه\u200cهای متوسط پیش آموزش شده، که همان کلمه را در موقعیت متفاوت وابسته می\u200cکند، عملکرد در بسیاری از وظیفه\u200cها بهبود می\u200cکند. ولی در حالی که وسیله\u200cهای موضوع هم می\u200cتوانند در سطح شخصیت آموزش داده شوند، فعالیت این وسیله\u200cها مطالعه نشده است. ما از فلیر (Akbik et al., 2018) شرکت\u200cهای متوسط طبقه\u200cی شخصیت را می\u200cگیریم، و آنها را به یک کار عامل کردن زمان تأثیر می\u200cدهیم، با توجه به بهترین عملکرد بزرگ در حالت پیشین هنر: کاهش خطای 51 درصد در اخبار و 33 درصد در نوشته\u200cهای کلینیک. ما منبع این پیشرفت ها را تحلیل می کنیم، و پیدا می کنیم که پیوند شخصیت های پیش آموزش پیش آموزش شده برای تغییرات، شرایط غیرعادی و تغییرات متفاوت دامنین قوی تر هستند. ما همچنین اندازه محیط را مقدار می\u200cدهیم که ابتدایی شخصیت\u200cهای متوسط پیش آموزش شده از آن استفاده می\u200cکنند، و نشان می\u200cدهیم که این وسیله\u200cها ویژه\u200cهایی مانند بخشی از سخنرانی و سرمایه\u200cگذاری می\u200cگیرند.', 'tr': 'Ýakyndaky aramalar öňünde eğitilen metinçe sözleriň içine bir sözü farklı vektörlerde tanyşdyrýandygyny görkezilýärler. Birnäçe görevlerde etkinlik geliştirirler. Ýöne sened baglaýyşlaryň karakter derejesinde üýtgedilip bilmeýär. Biz Flair (Akbik et al., 2018) karakter derejesinden bölegi çykarýarys we olary zamanlama täblisasyna uygulaýarys, öňki suçuşyň durumynda möhüm hereket edip özlerini geliştirdik: 51% hasaplanyň düşürmesi we 33% kliniki notlarda. Biz bu gelişmelerin çeşitlerini analiz edip, we öňünden öňünden eğlenen tekst karakterleriň içinde üýtgeşmeler, nadiren sözleri we geçiş-domenyň üýtgeşmeleri üçin has güýçlidir. Biz hem öňünden eğlenen metinçe karakterler içerisinden faydalandyrýan kontekstyň ölçüsini ölçüp barýarys. Bu şekilde sözlerin bir parçasyny we kapitalizasyonyň ýaly eserlenmelerini görkez.', 'sq': 'Studimet e fundit kanë treguar se përfshirjet e paratrajnuara të fjalëve kontekstuale, të cilat caktojnë të njëjtin fjalë vektorë të ndryshëm në kontekste të ndryshme, përmirësojnë performancën në shumë detyra. Por ndërsa përfshirjet kontekstuale mund të trajnohen gjithashtu në nivelin e karakterit, efektshmëria e përfshirjeve të tilla nuk është studiuar. Ne nxjerrim përfshirje kontekstuale në nivelin e karakterit nga Flair (Akbik et al., 2018) dhe i aplikojmë a to në një detyrë normalizimi kohor, duke dhënë përmirësime të mëdha performancë mbi gjendjen e mëparshme të artit: 51% zvogëlimi i gabimeve në lajmet dhe 33% në shënimet klinike. Ne analizojmë burimet e këtyre përmirësimeve dhe zbulojmë se përfshirjet e karakterit kontekstual të paratrajnuar janë më të forta ndaj variacioneve të afatit, termave të pakufekshme dhe ndryshimeve ndër-domeni. Ne gjithashtu kuantifikojmë madhësinë e kontekstit që përfitimet e karakterit kontekstual të paratrajnuar përfitojnë dhe tregojmë se përfitimet e tilla kapin karakteristika si pjesë e fjalimit dhe kapitalizimit.', 'af': "Onlangse studie het vertoon dat voor- opgelei contextual woord inbêding, wat dieselfde woord verskillende vektore in verskillende kontekste toewys, verbeter prestasie in baie taak. Maar terwyl contextual inbettings ook op die karaktervlak onderwerp kan word, is die effektiviteit van sodanige inbettings nie onderwerp nie. Ons verkry karaktervlak kontekstuele inbêdings van Flair (Akbik et al., 2018), en toewend hulle na 'n tyd normaliseerde taak, wat groot prestasie verbeteringe oor die vorige status-of-the-art gegee het: 51% fout reduksie in nuus en 33% in kliniese notas. Ons analyseer die bronne van hierdie verbeteringe, en vind dat vooraf-onderwyse konteksual karakter inbêding is meer kragtiger na term veranderinge, onvolledige terme en kruisdomein veranderinge. Ons het ook die grootte van konteks gekwanntifiseer wat voor-opgevorderde contextual karakter inbêdings voordeel van, en wys dat sulke inbêdings opneem funksies soos deel van spraak en kapitalisasie.", 'am': 'የቀድሞው ትምህርት በተለየ ትምህርት የሁለተኛ ቃላት መግለጫ፣ በተለየ ሁኔታ የተለየ vector እና በብዙ ስራ ውስጥ የስራትን ትክክል እንዲያሳድጉ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን የአካባቢው አካባቢዎች በሥርዓት ደረጃዎች ደግሞ አስተማሩ ይችላል፣ የዚህ አካባቢዎች ጥቅም አልተማረም፡፡ አካቢ et al., 2018 የባሕላዊ አካባቢ ደረጃዎችን እናደርጋለን፣ እናም ለጊዜው የተለመደውን ስራ እና በተለየነው፣ የቀድሞው ትልቁ ሁኔታ ላይ ትልቅ ድምፅ ማድረግ እና በፕሮግራም ጠንካራ ትክክል ማድረግ እና በቴንቲካዊ ግንኙነት ውስጥ 51 በመቶ ስህተት አጎድሞታል፡፡ የእነዚህን ማስታወቂያ ምንጮች እናስተምር፣ አስቀድሞ የተጠቃሚ የግንኙነት ግንኙነት ለጊዜው መለወጥ፣ በተጨማሪው ግንኙነት እና የዶሜን ለውጦች መሆኑን እናግኘዋለን፡፡ እንደዚህ ያሉ አካባቢዎች የንግግር እና አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Վերջերս ուսումնասիրությունները ցույց են տվել, որ նախապատրաստված կոնտեքստալ բառերի ներդրումները, որոնք միևնույն բառը տարբեր վեկտորներ են տալիս տարբեր կոնտեքստներում, բարելավում են արտադրությունը շատ խնդիրներում: Բայց չնայած, որ կոնտեքստոնալ ներդրումները կարող են նաև ուսուցանվել բնավորության մակարդակում, այդպիսի ներդրումների արդյունավետությունը չի ուսումնասիրել: Մենք ստեղծում ենք բնավորության մակարդակի կոնտեքստոնալ ներդրումներ Flar-ից (Աքբիկիկ և այլն., 2018), և կիրառում ենք դրանք ժամանակի նորմալիզացիայի առաջադրանքի վրա, ինչը առաջին տեխնոլոգիայի մեծ բարելավումներ է բերում: 51 տոկոսով սխալների կրճատման նորություններում և 33 տոկոսով կլին Մենք վերլուծում ենք այս բարելավումների աղբյուրները և հայտնաբերում ենք, որ նախապատրաստված կոնտեքստոնալ կերպարների ներդրումները ավելի ուժեղ են տերմինային տարբերությունների, հազվադեպ տերմինների և շրջապատային փոփոխությունների համար: Մենք նաև քանակությամբ գնահատում ենք այն կոնտեքստի չափերը, որոնց օգտագործում են նախապատրաստված կոնտեքստային կերպարների ներդրումները, և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ նման ներդրումները ներառում են այնպիսի հատկություններ, ինչպիսիք են խոսքի մասը և կապիտալիզացի', 'az': 'Son təhsil edilənlərin əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş müxtəlif sözlər içərisində, eyni sözü fərqli vektörlərdə təhsil edir, çoxlu işlərdə performansını daha yaxşılaşdırır. Lakin müxtəlif inşallar karakter seviyyətində də təhsil edilə bilər, bu inşalların etkinlik təhsil edilmədi. Biz Flair (Akbik et al., 2018) tərəfindən karakter-seviyyəti müxtəlif in şalları yaratdıq və onları zamanı normalizasyon işinə istifadə edirik, əvvəlki mövzuların üstündə böyük performanslıq düzəltmələrini təşkil edirik: xəbərlərin 51% azaltması və kliniki notlarda 33%. Biz bu yaxşılıqların mənbələrini analiz edirik, və əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş müxtəlif karakter inşallarının dəyişikliklərinə, sonrakı şartlarına və çox domain dəyişikliklərinə daha qüvvətlidir. Biz də təhsil edilmiş müxtəlif karakter inşallarının istifadə etdiyi məlumatların böyüklüyünü ölçüləyirik, və bu inşalların söhbətlərin və kapitalizasyonların bənzərini alır.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক গবেষণা প্রদর্শন করেছে যে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত প্রাক্তন প্রতিবেদনের শব্দ বিভিন্ন প্রকল্পে ভিন্ন ভেক্টরের একই শব্দ বিভিন্ কিন্তু যেখানে প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করতে পারে এই চরিত্রের স্তরে, এই ধরনের প্রতিষ্ঠানগুলোর কার্যকর্ষতা গবেষণা  আমরা ফ্লায়ার থেকে চরিত্র-পর্যায়ের প্রতিযোগিতা প্রদান করেছি (Akbik et al., ২০১৮) এবং তাদের একটি সময় স্বাভাবিক কাজে প্রয়োগ করেছি, যা পূর্ববর্তী শিল্পের পরিস্থিতির বিরুদ্ধে প্ আমরা এই উন্নয়নের উৎস বিশ্লেষণ করি এবং পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত বৈশিষ্ট্যাক্তিক চরিত্রের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন, প্রায়শিক্ষিক শর্ত এবং ক্রান্ত এছাড়াও আমরা প্রশিক্ষণ পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী চরিত্রের সুবিধা প্রদান করি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে এ ধরনের বিভিন্ন বিভাষণ এবং রাজধানীর মত বিষয়বস', 'cs': 'Nedávné studie ukázaly, že předškolené kontextové vložení slov, které přiřazují stejnému slovu různé vektory v různých kontextech, zlepšují výkon v mnoha úkolech. Ale zatímco kontextové vložení lze trénovat také na úrovni znaků, účinnost takových vložení nebyla studována. Odvozujeme kontextové vložení na úrovni znaků od Flaira (Akbik et al., 2018) a aplikujeme je na časovou normalizaci, což přináší významné zlepšení výkonu oproti předchozímu stavu techniky: 51% snížení chyb ve zprávách a 33% v klinických poznámkách. Analyzujeme zdroje těchto vylepšení a zjišťujeme, že předškolené vložení kontextových znaků jsou robustnější vůči variacím termínů, vzácným termínům a změnám mezi různými doménami. Rovněž kvantifikujeme velikost kontextu, který využívají předškolené kontextové vložení znaků, a ukazujeme, že takové vložení zachycují funkce, jako je část řeči a velké písmeno.', 'ca': "Recents estudis han demostrat que les integracions de paraules contextuals pré-entrenades, que assenyen la mateixa paraula diferents vectors en diferents contextos, milloren el rendiment en moltes tasques. But while contextual embeddings can also be trained at the character level, the effectiveness of such embeddings has not been studied.  We derive character-level contextual embeddings from Flair (Akbik et al., 2018), and apply them to a time normalization task, yielding major performance improvements over the previous state-of-the-art: 51% error reduction in news and 33% in clinical notes.  Analitzem les fonts d'aquestes millores i descobrim que les incorporacions de caràcters contextuals pré-entrenats són més robustes a variacions de termes, termes poc freqüents i canvis transdomínics. També quantifiquem la mida del context en què les incorporacions de caràcter contextual pré-entrenats s'aprofiten, i demostrem que aquestes incorporacions capturen característiques com part de la fala i la capitalització.", 'bs': 'Nedavno ispitivanje pokazalo je da su predobučene kontekstualne riječi ugrađene, koje daju istu riječ različitim vektorima u različitim kontekstima, poboljšavaju učinkovitost u mnogim zadacima. Međutim, dok se kontekstualne integracije također mogu obučiti na nivou karaktera, učinkovitost takvih integracija nije proučena. Mi izvlačimo kontekstualne integracije na nivou karaktera iz Flair a (Akbik et al., 2018), i primjenjujemo ih na zadatak normalizacije vremena, dajući velike poboljšanje učinkovitosti u prethodnom stanju umjetnosti: smanjenje greške na 51% i 33% u kliničkim notama. Analiziramo izvore tih poboljšanja i otkrijemo da su predobučeni kontekstualni integraciji karaktera jači za izražavanje varijacija, rijetkih uslova i promjene preko domena. Također smo kvantificirali veličinu konteksta od kojeg su predobučeni kontekstualni integraciji karaktera iskoristili i pokazali da takvi integraciji uhvate karakteristike poput dijela govora i kapitalizacije.', 'et': 'Hiljutised uuringud on näidanud, et eelnevalt koolitatud kontekstipõhised sõnade manustamine, mis määravad ühele sõnale erinevad vektorid erinevates kontekstides, parandab paljude ülesannete tulemuslikkust. Kuigi kontekstipõhiseid manustamisi saab koolitada ka iseloomu tasandil, ei ole selliste manustamiste efektiivsust uuritud. Tuletame Flairist (Akbik et al., 2018) iseloomustaseme kontekstipõhised manustamised ja rakendame neid aja normaliseerimise ülesandele, mis annab olulise jõudluse paranemise võrreldes eelmise tehnika tasemega: 51% vigade vähendamine uudistes ja 33% kliinilistes märkustes. Analüüsime nende täiustuste allikaid ja leiame, et eelnevalt koolitatud kontekstilised märgipõimimised on terminite variatsioonide, harvade terminite ja valdkondadevaheliste muutuste suhtes tugevamad. Samuti mõõdame kvantifitseeritud konteksti suurust, mida eelnevalt koolitatud kontekstiliste märkide manustamine kasutab, ja näitame, et sellised manustamised hõlmavad selliseid funktsioone nagu kõneosa ja suurtähtede kujundamine.', 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset tutkimukset ovat osoittaneet, että ennalta koulutetut kontekstuaaliset sanaupotukset, joissa samalle sanalle annetaan eri vektoreita eri konteksteissa, parantavat suorituskykyä monissa tehtävissä. Vaikka kontekstuaalisia upotuksia voidaan kouluttaa myös hahmotasolla, tällaisten upotusten tehokkuutta ei ole tutkittu. Hahmotason kontekstuaaliset upotukset johdetaan Flairista (Akbik et al., 2018) ja sovellamme niitä ajan normalisointitehtävään, jolloin suorituskyky paranee merkittävästi edelliseen huipputekniikkaan verrattuna: 51% virheiden väheneminen uutisissa ja 33% kliinisissä muistiinpanoissa. Analysoimme näiden parannusten lähteitä ja huomaamme, että ennalta koulutetut kontekstuaaliset merkkiupotukset ovat vankempia termien vaihteluille, harvoille termeille ja toimialueiden välisille muutoksille. Määritämme myös kontekstin koon, jota esikoulutetut kontekstuaaliset merkkiupotukset hyödyntävät, ja osoitamme, että tällaiset upotukset tallentavat ominaisuuksia, kuten puheen osan ja suuraakkosen.', 'jv': 'text-tool-action politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness We take out character-scale contextual embedding from Floir We test the source of this advancement, and find that advanced contextual character embedding Speaking', 'ha': "Ana jarrabar da aka sanar da cewa masu tsari a gabã ɗaya da aka shigar da maganar da ke guda, wanda ke ƙayyade maganar daban-daban cikin masu husũn daban, kuma ya kyautata performance cikin aikin mãsu yawa. A lokacin da za'a iya yin wa'ar da takardar da ke cikin rubutun, ba a karanta aikin wannan. Tuna sami karar-daraja da aka shigar da shi daga flair (Akbik et al., 2018), kuma tuna amfani da su zuwa wani aikin mai normal a lokaci, wanda ya ƙara mazaɓa mai girma kan halin da ya gabatar da-sanar: 51% na ƙaranci cikin babban lãbãri da 33% a cikin littãfin da aka rubũta. Ana rarraba sourcen waɗannan gyarata, kuma munã gane cewa masu haɗi da takardar taƙata ta farko, za'a saurari zuwa variant masu ƙaranci, da musanyawa na guda. Tuna ƙayyade girmar mazaɓa da ke amfani da irin takardar da ke da shi a gabã ɗaya, kuma Mu nuna cewa, wannan da ke cikin hanyoyi sunã kãma masu kama da rabon magana da capitalization.", 'he': 'Recent studies have shown that pre-trained contextual word embeddings, which assign the same word different vectors in different contexts, improve performance in many tasks.  אך בעוד תוכניות קונטקסטיות יכולות גם להיות מאומנות ברמה של אופי, היעילות של תוכניות כאלה לא נחקרה. אנו משיגים תוכניות קונטקסטיות ברמה של אופי מפלאיר (Akbik et al., 2018), והפעילים אותן למשימת נורמליזציה בזמן, ומביאים שיפורים ביצועים גדולים במהלך המצב הקודם של האמנות: 51% שינוי שגיאות בחדשות ו-33% בהערות קליניות. אנו מנתחים את המקורים של השיפורים האלה, ומצאים שמערכות אופים קונטקסטיים מאומנות מראש הן חזקות יותר למונחים מונחיים, תנאים לא נדירים, ושינויים בין שטח. אנחנו גם מכוונים את הגודל של הקונקסט שבתוכניות אופי קונטקסט מאומנות מראש ניצלו, ולהראות כי תוכניות כאלה מכילות תכונות כמו חלק מהנאום והקפיטליזציה.', 'sk': 'Nedavne študije so pokazale, da vnaprej usposobljene kontekstualne vdelave besed, ki isti besedi dodeljujejo različne vektorje v različnih kontekstih, izboljšajo učinkovitost pri številnih opravilih. Čeprav se kontekstualne vdelave lahko usposabljajo tudi na ravni znakov, učinkovitost takih vdelav ni bila preučena. Iz Flaira (Akbik et al., 2018) izpeljemo kontekstualne vdelave na ravni znakov in jih uporabljamo pri nalogi normalizacije časa, kar prinaša velike izboljšave učinkovitosti v primerjavi s prejšnjim najsodobnejšim: 51% zmanjšanje napak v novicah in 33% v kliničnih zapiskih. Analiziramo vire teh izboljšav in ugotovimo, da so vnaprej usposobljene kontekstualne vdelave znakov bolj robustne do variacij izrazov, redkih izrazov in meddomenskih sprememb. Prav tako kvantificiramo velikost konteksta, ki jo izkoriščajo predhodno usposobljene kontekstualne vdelave znakov, in pokažemo, da takšne vdelave zajemajo funkcije, kot sta del govora in velike črke.', 'bo': 'འཕྲལ་མ་ཡོད་པའི་བརྗོད་དོན་དག་གི་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་ཚིག་རྣམས་གནས་སྟངས་འདི་དག་སྐྱེས་པའི་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ནང་ནས་མཐོང་སྣང་མེད་པའི་ཐ འོན་ཀྱང་། contextual embedding is also a character level. ང་ཚོས་Flair(Akbik et al., 2018)ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་དུས་ཚོད་དང་། དེ་ཚོ་ནི་གནས་སྟངས་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་མཁན We analyze the sources of these improvements, and find that pre-trained contextual character embeddings are more robust to term variations, infrequent terms, and cross-domain changes. ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཡུན་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་ཆེ་ཆུང་ལ་སྔོན་གྲངས་བསྒྲིག་ཡོད་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་སྣང་ཚོད་ལས་ཕན་ཐོགས་བྱེད་དགོས་བྱུང་།'}
{'en': 'Bot2Vec : Learning Representations of Chatbots', 'ar': 'Bot2Vec: تعلم تمثيلات روبوتات المحادثة', 'es': 'Bot2Vec: Representaciones de aprendizaje de chatbots', 'fr': 'Bot2Vec\xa0: Apprentissage des représentations des chatbots', 'pt': 'Bot2Vec: Aprendendo Representações de Chatbots', 'ja': 'Bot 2 Vec ：チャットボットの学習表現', 'hi': 'Bot2Vec: चैटबॉट्स के प्रतिनिधित्व सीखना', 'ru': 'Bot2Vec: Учебные представления чат-ботов', 'zh': 'Bot2Vec曰:机器人学也', 'ga': 'Bot2Vec: Léiriúcháin Foghlama Chatbots', 'ka': 'Bot2Vec: სატარბოტის გამოსწავლება', 'el': 'Bot2Vec: Εκπροσωπίες εκμάθησης των Chatbots', 'hu': 'Bot2Vec: Chatbotok tanulási képviseletei', 'it': 'Bot2Vec: Rappresentazioni di apprendimento dei Chatbot', 'kk': 'Bot2Vec: Чатботтардың суреттерін үйрену', 'lt': 'Bot2Vec: Mokymasis kalbų atstovavimas', 'mk': 'Bot2Vec: Научи претставувања на бацките', 'ms': 'Bot2Vec: Learning Representations of Chatbots', 'mn': 'Bot2Vec: Шатботын суралцах', 'mt': 'Bot2Vec: Rappreżentazzjonijiet tat-Tagħlim tal-Boċċijiet tal-Kattedja', 'ml': 'ബോട്ട്2വിക്: ചാട്ട്ബോട്ട്സിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'no': 'Bot2Vec: Læringsrepresentasjonar av Chatbots', 'pl': 'Bot2Vec: Nauka reprezentacji chatbotów', 'ro': 'Bot2Vec: Reprezentanțele de învățare ale roboților de chat', 'sr': 'Bot2Vec: Učenje predstavljanja Chatbota', 'si': 'Bot2Vec: 喽夃稖喾權侗喽溹侗喾娻侗 喽犩窅喽о穵喽多窚喽о穵喾冟穵 喽脆穵鈥嵿痘喽班窂喽编逗', 'ta': 'போட்2வெக்: சாட்போட்ஸின் பிரதிநிதிகளை கற்றுக்கொள்வது', 'sv': 'Bot2Vec: Lärande representationer av Chatbots', 'so': 'Bot2Vec: Learning Representations of Chatbots', 'ur': 'Bot2Vec: چیٹبوٹ کی نمایش سکھائی', 'uz': "Bot2Vec: Chatbotlar tashkilotlarini o'rganish", 'vi': 'Both2Vec: Truyền trình học của Chatbot', 'bg': 'Бот2Век: Учебни представителства на чатботи', 'nl': 'Bot2Vec: Leren vertegenwoordigingen van chatbots', 'da': 'Bot2Vec: Læringsrepræsentationer af chatbots', 'hr': 'Bot2Vec: Učenje predstavljanja Chatbota', 'fa': 'Bot2Vec: یاد گرفتن نمایندگان چاتبت', 'de': 'Bot2Vec: Lernen von Repräsentationen von Chatbots', 'id': 'Bot2Vec: Learning Representations of Chatbots', 'ko': 'Bot2Vec: 챗봇의 학습 표시', 'tr': 'Bot2Vec: Öwrenmek Görkezilişi', 'sw': 'Bot2Vec: Kufundisha Mazungumzo ya Chatbots', 'sq': 'Bot2Vec: Mësimi i përfaqësimeve të bisedës', 'af': 'Bot2Vec: Leer voorstellings van Chatbots', 'am': 'ቦት', 'hy': 'Bot2vec. Սովորել ելույթների ներկայացումներ', 'az': 'Bot2Vec: √áatabotlarƒ±n temsill…ôrini √∂yr…ônm…ôk', 'bn': 'বোট২ভেক: চ্যাটবোটের প্রতিনিধি শিখানো', 'ca': 'Bot2Vec: Aprendre representacions de bats de conversa', 'cs': 'Bot2Vec: Učení se reprezentace chatbotů', 'bs': 'Bot2Vec: Učenje predstavljanja Chatbota', 'et': 'Bot2Vec: Chatbotide õppimise esindused', 'fi': 'Bot2Vec: Chatbottien oppimista koskevat esitykset', 'jv': 'bot2vecc: Learning representations of conversation bots', 'sk': 'Bot2Vec: Učenje predstavništva Chatbotov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Bot2Vec: ללמוד מייצגים של שיחות שיחה', 'bo': 'Bot2Vec: གླེང་མོལ་ཁང་གི་སྟོན་བཤད་པ་སློབ་བཞིན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Chatbots (i.e., bots) are becoming widely used in multiple domains, along with supporting bot programming platforms. These platforms are equipped with novel testing tools aimed at improving the quality of individual chatbots. Doing so requires an understanding of what sort of bots are being built (captured by their underlying conversation graphs) and how well they perform (derived through analysis of conversation logs). In this paper, we propose a new model, Bot2Vec, that embeds bots to a compact representation based on their structure and usage logs. Then, we utilize Bot2Vec representations to improve the quality of two bot analysis tasks. Using conversation data and graphs of over than 90 bots, we show that Bot2Vec representations improve detection performance by more than 16 % for both tasks.', 'ar': 'أصبحت Chatbots (أي الروبوتات) مستخدمة على نطاق واسع في مجالات متعددة ، إلى جانب دعم منصات برمجة الروبوتات. تم تجهيز هذه الأنظمة الأساسية بأدوات اختبار جديدة تهدف إلى تحسين جودة روبوتات المحادثة الفردية. يتطلب القيام بذلك فهم نوع الروبوتات التي يتم إنشاؤها (يتم التقاطها بواسطة الرسوم البيانية للمحادثات الأساسية) ومدى جودة أدائها (المستمدة من تحليل سجلات المحادثة). في هذا البحث ، نقترح نموذجًا جديدًا ، Bot2Vec ، يدمج الروبوتات في تمثيل مضغوط بناءً على هيكلها وسجلات الاستخدام. بعد ذلك ، نستخدم عروض Bot2Vec لتحسين جودة مهمتي تحليل الروبوت. باستخدام بيانات المحادثة والرسوم البيانية لأكثر من 90 روبوتًا ، نظهر أن تمثيلات Bot2Vec تعمل على تحسين أداء الكشف بأكثر من 16٪ لكلتا المهمتين.', 'es': 'Los chatbots (es decir, los bots) se están utilizando ampliamente en múltiples dominios, junto con las plataformas de programación de bots compatibles. Estas plataformas están equipadas con novedosas herramientas de prueba destinadas a mejorar la calidad de los chatbots individuales. Hacerlo requiere comprender qué tipo de bots se están creando (capturados por sus gráficos de conversación subyacentes) y su rendimiento (derivado del análisis de los registros de conversación). En este artículo, proponemos un nuevo modelo, Bot2Vec, que incorpora los bots en una representación compacta basada en su estructura y registros de uso. Luego, utilizamos las representaciones de Bot2Vec para mejorar la calidad de dos tareas de análisis de bots. Mediante el uso de datos de conversación y gráficos de más de 90 bots, demostramos que las representaciones de Bot2Vec mejoran el rendimiento de detección en más de un 16% para ambas tareas.', 'fr': "Les chatbots (c.-à-d. les robots) sont de plus en plus utilisés dans de nombreux domaines, tout comme les plateformes de programmation de robots. Ces plateformes sont équipées de nouveaux outils de test visant à améliorer la qualité des chatbots individuels. Pour ce faire, il faut comprendre quels types de robots sont créés (capturés par leurs graphiques de conversation sous-jacents) et leurs performances (obtenues grâce à l'analyse des journaux de conversation). Dans cet article, nous proposons un nouveau modèle, Bot2Vec, qui intègre les robots dans une représentation compacte basée sur leur structure et leurs journaux d'utilisation. Ensuite, nous utilisons les représentations Bot2Vec pour améliorer la qualité de deux tâches d'analyse de robots. À l'aide de données de conversation et de graphiques de plus de 90 robots, nous montrons que les représentations Bot2Vec améliorent les performances de détection de plus de 16\xa0% pour les deux tâches.", 'pt': 'Os chatbots (ou seja, bots) estão se tornando amplamente usados em vários domínios, juntamente com o suporte a plataformas de programação de bot. Essas plataformas estão equipadas com novas ferramentas de teste destinadas a melhorar a qualidade de chatbots individuais. Fazer isso requer uma compreensão de que tipo de bots estão sendo construídos (capturados por seus gráficos de conversa subjacentes) e quão bem eles executam (derivado da análise de logs de conversa). Neste artigo, propomos um novo modelo, Bot2Vec, que incorpora bots a uma representação compacta baseada em sua estrutura e logs de uso. Em seguida, utilizamos as representações do Bot2Vec para melhorar a qualidade de duas tarefas de análise de bot. Usando dados de conversas e gráficos de mais de 90 bots, mostramos que as representações do Bot2Vec melhoram o desempenho de detecção em mais de 16% para ambas as tarefas.', 'ja': 'チャットボット（すなわち、ボット）は、サポートされているボットプログラミングプラットフォームとともに、複数のドメインで広く使用されるようになっています。これらのプラットフォームには、個々のチャットボットの品質向上を目的とした新規のテストツールが搭載されています。そのためには、どのような種類のボットが構築されているか（基礎となる会話グラフによってキャプチャされている）、およびそのパフォーマンス（会話ログの分析から導き出された）を理解する必要があります。本稿では、Botを構造と使用ログに基づいてコンパクトな表現に埋め込む新しいモデルBot 2 Vecを提案する。次に、Bot 2 Vec表現を使用して、2つのBot分析タスクの品質を向上させます。90を超えるボットの会話データとグラフを使用すると、Bot 2 Vecの表現は、両方のタスクの検出パフォーマンスを16%以上向上させます。', 'zh': '聊天机器人(即机器人)方得广泛应用于数域,兼赞机器人编程台。 平台备新测试工具,旨在机器人天质。 须知方构机器人类(底对图获)及其性(因对日志之分)。 新模Bot2Vec,机器人用日志嵌机器人凑。 然后因 Bot2Vec 以重二机器人之任。 用过 90 机器人数图,见 Bot2Vec 两任检能增 16% 以上。', 'hi': 'चैटबॉट्स (यानी, बॉट्स) व्यापक रूप से कई डोमेन में उपयोग किए जा रहे हैं, साथ ही बॉट प्रोग्रामिंग प्लेटफार्मों का समर्थन करने के साथ। ये प्लेटफ़ॉर्म व्यक्तिगत चैटबॉट्स की गुणवत्ता में सुधार के उद्देश्य से उपन्यास परीक्षण उपकरणों से सुसज्जित हैं। ऐसा करने के लिए यह समझने की आवश्यकता होती है कि किस प्रकार के बॉट बनाए जा रहे हैं (उनके अंतर्निहित वार्तालाप ग्राफ़ द्वारा कैप्चर किए गए) और वे कितनी अच्छी तरह से प्रदर्शन करते हैं (वार्तालाप लॉग के विश्लेषण के माध्यम से व्युत्पन्न)। इस पेपर में, हम एक नए मॉडल, Bot2Vec का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो बॉट्स को उनकी संरचना और उपयोग लॉग के आधार पर कॉम्पैक्ट प्रतिनिधित्व में एम्बेड करता है। फिर, हम दो बॉट विश्लेषण कार्यों की गुणवत्ता में सुधार करने के लिए Bot2Vec अभ्यावेदन का उपयोग करते हैं। वार्तालाप डेटा और 90 से अधिक बॉट्स के ग्राफ़ का उपयोग करते हुए, हम दिखाते हैं कि Bot2Vec अभ्यावेदन दोनों कार्यों के लिए 16% से अधिक का पता लगाने के प्रदर्शन में सुधार करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Чат-боты (т. е. боты) становятся широко используемыми во многих доменах, наряду с поддерживающими платформами для программирования ботов. Эти платформы оснащены новыми инструментами тестирования, направленными на повышение качества отдельных чат-ботов. Это требует понимания того, какой тип ботов создается (захватывается лежащими в их основе графиками разговора) и насколько хорошо они работают (получается путем анализа журналов разговора). В этой статье мы предлагаем новую модель, Bot2Vec, которая встраивает ботов в компактное представление на основе их структуры и журналов использования. Затем мы используем представления Bot2Vec для улучшения качества двух задач анализа ботов. Используя данные разговора и графики более 90 ботов, мы показываем, что представления Bot2Vec улучшают производительность обнаружения более чем на 16% для обеих задач.', 'ga': 'Tá Chatbots (i.e., róbónna) á n-úsáid go forleathan in iliomad fearann, mar aon le hardáin ríomhchláraithe bot a thacaíonn leo. Tá na hardáin seo feistithe le huirlisí tástála núíosacha atá dírithe ar fheabhas a chur ar cháilíocht chatbots aonair. Chun é sin a dhéanamh ní mór tuiscint a fháil ar an gcineál róbónna atá á dtógáil (arna ngabháil ag na graif chomhrá bhunúsacha acu) agus cé chomh maith agus a fheidhmíonn siad (díorthaithe trí anailís a dhéanamh ar logaí comhrá). Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid múnla nua, Bot2Vec, a neadaíonn róbónna chuig léiriú dlúth bunaithe ar a struchtúr agus a logaí úsáide. Ansin, úsáidimid uiríll Bot2Vec chun cáilíocht dhá thasc anailíse bot a fheabhsú. Ag baint úsáide as sonraí comhrá agus graif níos mó ná 90 róbónna, léirímid go bhfeabhsaíonn uiríll Bot2Vec feidhmíocht braite níos mó ná 16% don dá thasc.', 'hu': 'A csevegőbotok (azaz botok) széles körben használják több tartományban, valamint támogatják a bot programozási platformokat. Ezek a platformok új teszteszközökkel vannak felszerelve, amelyek célja az egyes chatbotok minőségének javítása. Ehhez szükség van arra, hogy megértsük, milyen botokat építenek (az alapul szolgáló beszélgetési grafikonok rögzítik), és mennyire jól teljesítenek (a beszélgetési naplók elemzésével származnak). Ebben a tanulmányban egy új modellt javasolunk, a Bot2Vec-ot, amely a botokat a struktúra és a használati naplók alapján kompakt ábrázolásba ágyazza. Ezután Bot2Vec reprezentációkat használunk két bot elemzési feladat minőségének javítására. Több mint 90 bot beszélgetési adatait és grafikonjait használva megmutatjuk, hogy a Bot2Vec reprezentációk több mint 16%-kal javítják az észlelési teljesítményt mindkét feladat esetében.', 'ka': 'Chatbots (i.e. bots) უფრო დიდ გამოყენებულია მრავალ დიომენში, რომელიც პროგრამირების პლატატურების დამატებით. ეს პლატატურები პრომენტური ტესტის ხელსაწყობილობით, რომელიც უფრო უფრო მეტივად განვითარება ინდიველური ქარბოტების კაalitეტი. ასე გავაკეთოთ უნდა იცოდოთ როგორი პრობოტების შექმნა (მათი ქვემოთ პარაუხის გრაფიკებით) და რამდენი კარგი გავაკეთებენ (შექმნილი პარაუხის ლოგიების ანალიზაციით). ამ წიგში ჩვენ ახალი მოდელს, Bot2Vec, რომელიც კომპოკტური გამოსახულებაში პროგრამეტაციაში პროგრამეტაციას დავყენებთ მათი სტრუქტურა და გამოყენება ლოგიები შემდეგ ჩვენ გამოყენებთ Bot2Vec-ს გამოსახულებები, რომ ორი ბოტის ანალიზების კოლეტაციას უფრო მეტივად გავაკეთებთ. 90-ზე მეტი პრობტობის დასაბამისა მონაცემები და გრაფიკების გამოყენება, ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენებთ, რომ Bot2Vec-ის გამოსაბამისა განა', 'el': 'Τα ρομπότ (δηλαδή ρομπότ) χρησιμοποιούνται ευρέως σε πολλούς τομείς, μαζί με την υποστήριξη πλατφόρμων προγραμματισμού ρομπότ. Αυτές οι πλατφόρμες είναι εξοπλισμένες με νέα εργαλεία δοκιμής που στοχεύουν στη βελτίωση της ποιότητας των μεμονωμένων chatbots. Για να γίνει αυτό απαιτείται κατανόηση του τι είδους ρομπότ κατασκευάζονται (συλλαμβάνονται από τα υποκείμενα γραφήματα συνομιλίας τους) και πόσο καλά αποδίδουν (που προέρχονται από την ανάλυση των αρχείων καταγραφής συνομιλίας). Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο, που ενσωματώνει τα ρομπότ σε μια συμπαγή αναπαράσταση με βάση τη δομή και τα αρχεία καταγραφής χρήσης τους. Στη συνέχεια, χρησιμοποιούμε αναπαραστάσεις για να βελτιώσουμε την ποιότητα δύο εργασιών ανάλυσης ρομπότ. Χρησιμοποιώντας δεδομένα συνομιλίας και γραφήματα πάνω από 90 ρομπότ, δείχνουμε ότι οι αναπαραστάσεις βελτιώνουν την απόδοση ανίχνευσης κατά περισσότερο από 16% και για τις δύο εργασίες.', 'kk': 'Чатботтар (т. е. боттар) бірнеше доменде қолданылады, ботты бағдарламаларды қолдау платформаларымен бірге қолданылады. Бұл платформалар әрбір шатботтардың сапатын жақсарту үшін жаңа сынақтар құралымен құрылады. Бұл үшін қандай боттарды құрылатынын түсіну керек (олардың негізгі сұрақтар графикалары) және қандай жақсы істеу керек (сұрақтар журналдары анализ арқылы) болады. Бұл қағаздың жаңа үлгісін, Bot2Vec дегенді таңдаймыз. Бұл боттарды құрылғылар мен қолдану журналдарына негізделген құрылғылар мен қолдану журналдарына қолданылатын компьютерлі Содан кейін, біз Bot2Vec таңбаларын қолдану үшін екі bot анализ тапсырмаларының сапатын жақсарту үшін қолданамыз. 90 боттан артық сөйлесу деректерін және графиктерін қолдану үшін, Bot2Vec келтірімдері екі тапсырма үшін 16% дегеннен артық тапсырмаларды жақсы көрсетеді.', 'it': "I chatbot (cioè i bot) stanno diventando ampiamente utilizzati in più domini, insieme al supporto delle piattaforme di programmazione bot. Queste piattaforme sono dotate di nuovi strumenti di test volti a migliorare la qualità dei singoli chatbot. Ciò richiede una comprensione di che tipo di bot vengono costruiti (catturati dai loro grafici di conversazione sottostanti) e di come funzionano (derivati dall'analisi dei log di conversazione). In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo modello, Bot2Vec, che incorpora i bot in una rappresentazione compatta basata sulla loro struttura e log di utilizzo. Quindi, utilizziamo le rappresentazioni Bot2Vec per migliorare la qualità di due attività di analisi bot. Utilizzando dati di conversazione e grafici di oltre 90 bot, mostriamo che le rappresentazioni Bot2Vec migliorano le prestazioni di rilevamento di oltre il 16% per entrambe le attività.", 'lt': 'Daugelyje sriči ų plačiai naudojami pokalbiai (t. y. robotai), taip pat remiamos robotų programavimo platformos. Šiose platformose įrengtos naujos bandymo priemonės, skirtos pagerinti atskirų pokalbių robotų kokybę. Tam reikia suprasti, kokių tipų robotai yra statomi (juos apibūdina jų pagrindiniai pokalbių grafikai) ir kaip jie gerai veikia (gaunami analizuojant pokalbių žurnalus). Šiame dokumente siūlome naują model į Bot2Vec, kuris įtraukia robotus į kompaktinį atstovavimą, pagrįstą jų struktūra ir naudojimo žurnalais. Tuomet naudojame Bot2Vec atstovavimus, kad pagerintume dviejų robotų analizės užduočių kokybę. Naudodami daugiau kaip 90 robotų pokalbių duomenis ir grafikus, parodome, kad Bot2Vec atstovybės abiejų užduočių atpažinimo veiksmingumą pagerina daugiau kaip 16 %.', 'mk': 'Батботовите (т.е. роботите) стануваат широко употребени во повеќе домени, заедно со поддршката на платформите за програмирање на роботите. Овие платформи се опремени со нови алатки за тестирање со цел подобрување на квалитетот на индивидуалните chatbots. Тоа бара разбирање на каков вид на роботи се градат (снимени од нивните графики за разговори) и колку добро се извршуваат (изведени преку анализа на дневниците за разговори). Во овој весник предложуваме нов модел, Bot2Vec, кој ги вклучува роботите во компактна претстава базирана на нивната структура и корисни дневници. Потоа, ги користиме претставувањата на Bot2Vec за подобрување на квалитетот на две задачи за анализа на роботите. Користејќи податоци за разговори и графики од повеќе од 90 роботи, покажуваме дека претставувањата на Bot2Vec ја подобруваат детекцијата за повеќе од 16 отсто за двете задачи.', 'ms': 'Batu perbualan (i.e., robot) semakin luas digunakan dalam domain berbilang, bersama dengan menyokong platforma pemrograman robot. Platform ini disediakan dengan alat ujian baru yang bertujuan untuk meningkatkan kualiti chatbot individu. Melakukan demikian memerlukan pemahaman tentang jenis robot yang sedang dibina (ditangkap oleh graf perbualan mereka di bawah) dan bagaimana baik mereka berjalan (ditambah melalui analisis log perbualan). Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan model baru, Bot2Vec, yang memasukkan robot ke perwakilan kompak berdasarkan struktur dan log penggunaan mereka. Then, we utilize Bot2Vec representations to improve the quality of two bot analysis tasks.  Menggunakan data perbualan dan graf lebih dari 90 robot, kami menunjukkan bahawa perwakilan Bot2Vec meningkatkan prestasi pengesan dengan lebih dari 16% untuk kedua-dua tugas.', 'ml': 'ചാട്ട്ബോട്ടുകള്\u200d (ഉദാഹരണമായി, ബോട്ടുകള്\u200d) പല ഡൊമെനെനിലും വിശാലമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ബോട്ട് പ്രോഗ്രാമിങ്ങ് പ്ലാറ്റ് ഈ പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമുകള്\u200d നോവല്\u200d പരീക്ഷണ ഉപകരണങ്ങളുമായി ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിന് വേണ്ടിയാണ് വ്യക്തിപരമ അങ്ങനെ ചെയ്യുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയാണ് ബോട്ടുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ട് (അവരുടെ അടിസ്ഥാന സംസാര ഗ്രാഫുകള്\u200d  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ മോഡല്\u200d, ബോട്ട്രിവെക്ക്, അത് ബോട്ട്സിലേക്ക് പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നു. അത് അവരുടെ കൂട്ടിടത്തിനും ഉപയോ പിന്നെ നമ്മള്\u200d ബോട്ട്2വേക്കിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. രണ്ട് ബോട്ട് വിശ്വാസികളുടെ ഗുണവും മ 90 ബോട്ടില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളും ഗ്രാഫുകളും ഉപയോഗിച്ച്, ബോട്ട്രിവേക്കിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d രണ്ട് ജോലികള്\u200dക്', 'mt': 'Il-chattbots (jiġifieri, il-robots) qed isiru użati b’mod wiesa’ f’diversi oqsma, flimkien ma’ appoġġ għall-pjattaformi tal-ipprogrammar tal-robots. Dawn il-pjattaformi huma mgħammra b’għodod ġodda għall-ittestjar immirati lejn it-titjib tal-kwalità tal-chatbots individwali. Biex tagħmel dan jeħtieġ fehim ta’ liema tip ta’ robots qed jinbnew (maqbuda mill-grafiċi ta’ konverżjoni sottostanti tagħhom) u kemm huma jwettqu tajjeb (derivati mill-analiżi tal-logs ta’ konverżjoni). F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu mudell ġdid, Bot2Vec, li jinkorpora robots f’rappreżentanza kompatta bbażata fuq l-istruttura u l-logs tal-użu tagħhom. Imbagħad, aħna nużaw ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet Bot2Vec biex itejbu l-kwalità ta’ żewġ kompiti ta’ analiżi robotika. Bl-użu ta’ dejta ta’ konverżjoni u grafiċi ta’ aktar minn 90 robot, nuru li r-rappreżentazzjonijiet Bot2Vec itejbu l-prestazzjoni ta’ detezzjoni b’aktar minn 16% għaż-żewġ kompiti.', 'mn': 'Чатботууд (т.е. ботууд) олон хэсэгт ашиглаж байна. Ботууд програмчлалын платформуудыг дэмжиж байна. Эдгээр платформууд нь хувийн чадварыг сайжруулах зорилготой шинэ шалгалтын хэрэгслүүдтэй багтана. Иймд хэрхэн ботууд ямар төрлийн ботууд бүтээж байгааг ойлгох шаардлагатай. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Bot2Vec шинэ загварыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь ботуудыг бүтэц болон хэрэглээний логиудын үндсэн компакт загвар руу оруулдаг. Дараа нь бид Bot2Vec илтгэлийг ашиглаж хоёр bot шинжилгээний ажлын сайн чанарыг сайжруулахын тулд хэрэглэдэг. Бид 90-аас илүү олон ботоос илүү ярианы өгөгдлийн болон график ашиглаж, Bot2Vec-ын үзүүлэлтийг хоёр даалгаварын хувьд нээлттэй үйл ажиллагаанд 16% илүү сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Chatbots (t.d. bots) blir brukt i fleire domene, saman med støtte for bot- programplattformar. Desse plattformene er spelt med nytt testverktøy for å forbetra kvaliteten på individuelle pratbots. Dette krev å forstå kva slags bots vert bygd (henta av dei underliggende samtalegrafikk) og kor godt dei utfører (utførte gjennom analysen av samtaleloggar). I denne papiret foreslår vi eit ny modell, Bot2Vec, som innebygger bots til eit kompakt representasjon basert på sine struktur og brukloggar. Deretter bruker vi Bot2Vec-representasjonar for å forbetra kvaliteten på to botanalyseringsoppgåver. Bruk samtaledata og grafikk over enn 90 bots, viser vi at bot2Vec-representasjonar forbedrar oppdagingsfunksjonen med mer enn 16 % for begge oppgåver.', 'pl': 'Chatboty (tj. boty) stają się szeroko stosowane w wielu domenach, wraz z obsługą platform programowania botów. Platformy te są wyposażone w nowe narzędzia testowe mające na celu poprawę jakości poszczególnych chatbotów. Wymaga to zrozumienia, jakiego rodzaju boty są budowane (przechwytywane przez ich podstawowe wykresy konwersacji) i jak dobrze działają (pochodzące z analizy dzienników konwersacji). W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nowy model Bot2Vec, który osadza boty w kompaktowej reprezentacji opartej na ich strukturze i logach użytkowania. Następnie wykorzystujemy reprezentacje Bot2Vec do poprawy jakości dwóch zadań analizy botów. Korzystając z danych konwersacyjnych i wykresów ponad 90-botów, pokazujemy, że reprezentacje Bot2Vec poprawiają wydajność wykrywania o ponad 16% dla obu zadań.', 'ro': 'Chatboții (adică roboții) devin utilizați pe scară largă în mai multe domenii, împreună cu platformele de programare a roboților. Aceste platforme sunt echipate cu instrumente noi de testare menite să îmbunătățească calitatea chatboților individuali. Pentru a face acest lucru necesită o înțelegere a ce fel de roboți sunt construiți (capturați de graficele de conversație subiacente) și cât de bine performează (derivate prin analiza jurnalelor de conversație). În această lucrare, propunem un nou model, Bot2Vec, care încorporează roboții într-o reprezentare compactă bazată pe structura lor și jurnalele de utilizare. Apoi, folosim reprezentările Bot2Vec pentru a îmbunătăți calitatea a două sarcini de analiză a roboților. Folosind date de conversație și grafice de peste 90 de roboți, arătăm că reprezentările Bot2Vec îmbunătățesc performanța de detectare cu peste 16% pentru ambele sarcini.', 'sr': 'Chatbots (tj. roboti) se široko koriste u višestrukim domenama, zajedno s podrškom programiranih platformi robota. Ove platforme su opremljene novim testiranjima alatima na cilju poboljšanja kvalitete individualnih otvorenika. To zahteva razumevanje kakav je vrst robota izgrađen (uhvaćen njihovim temeljnim grafikama razgovora) i kako dobro rade (proizveden analizom dnevnika razgovora). U ovom papiru predlažemo novi model, Bot2Vec, koji uključuje robote kompaktnom predstavljanju na temelju njihove strukture i dnevnice korištenja. Onda koristimo predstave Bot2Vec kako bi poboljšali kvalitet dva zadataka za analizu robota. Koristeći razgovorne podatke i grafike preko 90 robota, pokazujemo da predstavljanja Bot2Vec poboljšavaju učinkovitost otkrivanja za više od 16% za obe zadatke.', 'si': 'චැට්බෝට්ස් (ඉතින්, බෝට්ස්) විශාල ප්\u200dරවේශයක් වෙන්නේ බොට්ස් ප්\u200dරොග්රාමින් ප්ලේටම් එක්ක. මේ ප්ලෝටිෆෝම්ටර්ම් සාමාන්\u200dය පරීක්ෂණ උපකරණය සඳහා සැකසුම් කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිකාර කතාබට් මෙහෙම කරන්න අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්නේ කොච්චර බොට්ස් වර්ගයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා කියලා තේරුම් ගන්න. මේ පත්තරේ අපි අලුත් මදුල්යෙක්, Bot2Vec එකක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා, ඒකෙන් ඔවුන්ගේ සංවිධානය සහ භාවිතානය ලොග්ස් වලින ඊට පස්සේ, අපි Bot2Vec ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය භාවිතා කරනවා බොට් විශ්ලේෂණය දෙකක් වැඩ කරන්න. බොට්ස් 90 වඩා වඩා වැඩි සංවාද දත්ත සහ ග්\u200dරාෆ් වලින් භාවිත කරනවා, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ බොට්ස් වෙක් ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන වලින් ස', 'so': 'Chatbots (tusaale ahaan bots) waxay si ballan ah ugu isticmaalayaan guryaha kala duduwan, waxaana sidoo kale ku caawinaya qorshaha barnaamijka bot. Jardiinooyinkaas waxay leeyihiin qalabka imtixaanka saxda ah oo loogu talogalay inuu kordhiso qiimaha shakhsiga ah. Sida darteed waxaa loo baahan yahay garasho ku saabsan kartooyinka la dhisayo (waxaa lagu qabsaday tallaabooyinkooda hoose ee hadalka) iyo siduu si wanaagsan u sameeyo (waxaa lagu soo bandhigay baaritaanka qoraalka conversation). Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa tusaale cusub oo ah Bot2Vec, kaas oo ku soo bandhigaya qoraalka heshiiska oo ku saleysan dhismaha iyo isticmaalka. Markaas waxaynu isticmaalnaa noocyo-dhigista Bot2Vec si aan u hagaajino qiimaha labada baaritaanka. Isku isticmaalaya macluumaadka conversation iyo sawirada 90 bots ka badan, waxaynu tusaynaa in kooxoyinka Bot2Vec ay horumariyaan tababarka lagu soo bandhigi karo 16% ka badan labada shaqo.', 'sv': 'Chatbots (dvs. bots) används ofta i flera domäner, tillsammans med stöd för botprogrammeringsplattformar. Dessa plattformar är utrustade med nya testverktyg som syftar till att förbättra kvaliteten på enskilda chatbots. För att göra det krävs en förståelse för vilken typ av robotar som byggs (fångas av deras underliggande konversationsdiagram) och hur väl de presterar (härledda genom analys av konversationsloggar). I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ny modell, Bot2Vec, som bäddar in bots till en kompakt representation baserat på deras struktur- och användningsloggar. Sedan använder vi Bot2Vec representationer för att förbättra kvaliteten på två robotanalysuppgifter. Med hjälp av konversationsdata och diagram från över 90 robotar visar vi att Bot2Vec-representationer förbättrar detekteringsprestandan med mer än 16% för båda uppgifterna.', 'ta': 'சாட்பாட்ஸ் (அதாவது, பாட்டுகள்) பல களங்களில் உபயோகிக்கப்படுகிறது, பாட் நிரல் நிரல்மாணங்களை ஆதரிக்கும் போதும். இந்த தளங்கள் தனிப்பட்ட அரட்டைகளின் தரம் மேம்படுத்துவதற்கான புதிய சோதனை கருவி இவ்வாறு செய்வது எவ்வாறு பாட்டுகள் உருவாக்கப்படுகிறது என்பதை புரிந்து கொள்ள வேண்டும் (அவர்கள் அடிப்படையான பேச்சு வரைபடங்களால் பிட இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் புதிய மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், போட்டிவெக், அது பாட்டுகளை உருவாக்கும் பயன்பாடு பதிவுகளை அடிப்பட பிறகு, நாம் போட்டி2வெக் குறிப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி இரண்டு போட்ட் ஆராய்ச்சி பணிகளின் தரமை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கா 90 பாட்டுக்கும் மேற்பட்ட தகவல் மற்றும் வரைபடங்களை பயன்படுத்தி, போட்டிவெக் குறிப்பிடுகள் இருவரும் பணிகளுக்கும் 16% அதிகமாக கண்ட', 'ur': 'چاٹ بوٹ (یعنی بوٹ) بہت سی ڈومین میں وسیع طور پر استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، بوٹ پروگرامینگ پلٹرومین کی مدد کے ساتھ۔ یہ پٹرومٹ روانی آزمائش ابزار کے ساتھ مطابق ہیں جو شخصی باتبوٹوں کی کیفیت improvement کی هدف رکھتے ہیں. ایسا کرنا چاہتا ہے کہ سمجھ سکے کہ کس طرح روٹ بنائے جاتے ہیں اس کاغذ میں ہم نے ایک نوی موڈل، Bot2Vec کی پیشنهاد کرتی ہے، جو بوٹ کو ان کے ساختار اور استعمال لاگ پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے، ایک کمپیٹ نمایش کے لئے جمع کرتا ہے. پھر ہم Bot2Vec نمایش کا استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ دو بوٹ تحلیل کے کاموں کی کیفیت بہتر کریں۔ 90 سے زیادہ زیادہ بوٹ کی بات ڈیٹا اور گراف کا استعمال کرتا ہے، ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ بوٹ 2ویک نمایش دونوں کاموں کے لئے 16% سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Bu platformlar oddiy sinov vositalari bilan birlashtirish uchun qo'llanmalar. Bunday qilish kerak, qanday qanday botlar yaratiladigan (asosiy talab grafiklari tomonidan) va ular qanday bajarish kerak (chaqaloqlar loglarini analyzerdan foydalanishi mumkin). Bu hujjatda, biz yangi modelni boshqaramiz, Bot2Vec, bu tuzilishini va foydalanish loglarining asosida yaratilgan kompakt tashkilotga ega bo'ladi. Keyin biz Bot2Vek tashkilotlaridan foydalanamiz ikkita bot analyzer vazifalarning sifatini oshirish uchun. Ko'pchilik taʼminotlari va 90 yoshdan ortiq raqamlarni ishlatish mumkin, biz Bot2Vec taʼminlovchilari ikkita vazifalar uchun 16% dan ortiq ishni o'zgartiradi.", 'vi': "Chatbot (v.e., bot) đang được phổ biến rộng rãi trong nhiều miền, cùng với các platform hỗ trợ chương trình robot. Những platform được trang bị đầy những dụng cụ thí nghiệm mới nhằm nâng cao chất lượng của cá nhân. Làm vậy cần phải hiểu xem loại bot được xây dựng như thế nào (bị bắt giữ bởi các biểu đồ đối thoại cơ bản) và cách hoạt động tốt (bắt nguồn từ các bản phân tích cuộc đối thoại). Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình mới, Bot2Vec, xây dựng hai robot để mô phỏng gọn dựa trên cấu trúc và lịch sử của chúng. Sau đó, chúng ta sử dụng các biểu tượng của Bot2Vec để cải thiện chất lượng của hai nhiệm vụ phân tích robot. Sử dụng dữ liệu cuộc đối thoại và biểu đồ của hơn 90bot, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng các biểu tượng của Bot2Vec tăng khả năng phát hiện nhiều hơn là 16='cho cả hai nhiệm vụ.", 'hr': 'Chatboti (tj. roboti) se široko koriste u višestrukim domenama zajedno s podrškom programiranih platformi robota. Ove platforme su opremljene novim testovim alatima za cilj poboljšanja kvalitete individualnih otvorenika. To zahtijeva razumijevanje kakav je vrst robota izgrađen (uhvaćen njihovim temeljnim graficima razgovora) i kako dobro rade (proizveden analizom dnevnika razgovora). U ovom papiru predlažemo novi model, Bot2Vec, koji uključuje robote kompaktnom predstavljanju na temelju njihove strukture i dnevnice korištenja. Onda koristimo predstave Bot2Vec kako bi poboljšali kvalitetu dva zadatka za analizu bota. Koristeći razgovorne podatke i grafike preko 90 robota, pokazujemo da predstavljanja Bot2Vec poboljšavaju učinkovitost otkrića za više od 16% za oba zadatka.', 'bg': 'Чатботите (т.е. ботовете) стават широко използвани в множество домейни, заедно с поддържащи платформи за програмиране на ботове. Тези платформи са оборудвани с нови инструменти за тестване, насочени към подобряване качеството на отделните чатботи. Това изисква разбиране на какъв вид ботове се изграждат (улавят се от базовите им диаграми за разговори) и колко добре се представят (извлечени чрез анализ на дневниците за разговори). В тази статия предлагаме нов модел, който вгражда ботове в компактно представяне въз основа на тяхната структура и дневници за използване. След това използваме представянето, за да подобрим качеството на две задачи за анализ на ботове. Използвайки данни за разговори и графики на над 90 бота, показваме, че представянето подобрява ефективността на откриването с повече от 16% и за двете задачи.', 'da': 'Chatbots (dvs. bots) bliver meget udbredt i flere domæner, sammen med understøttelse af botprogrammeringsplatforme. Disse platforme er udstyret med nye testværktøjer, der har til formål at forbedre kvaliteten af individuelle chatbots. Dette kræver en forståelse af, hvilken slags bots der bliver bygget (fanget af deres underliggende samtalediagrammer) og hvor godt de fungerer (afledt gennem analyse af samtalelog). I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny model, Bot2Vec, der integrerer bots til en kompakt repræsentation baseret på deres struktur og brugslogs. Derefter bruger vi Bot2Vec repræsentationer til at forbedre kvaliteten af to bot analyseopgaver. Ved hjælp af samtaledata og grafer fra over 90 bots viser vi, at Bot2Vec-repræsentationer forbedrer detektionsydelsen med mere end 16% for begge opgaver.', 'nl': 'Chatbots (dat wil zeggen bots) worden op grote schaal gebruikt in meerdere domeinen, samen met ondersteuning van botprogrammeerplatforms. Deze platforms zijn uitgerust met nieuwe testtools die gericht zijn op het verbeteren van de kwaliteit van individuele chatbots. Dit vereist inzicht in wat voor soort bots worden gebouwd (vastgelegd door hun onderliggende gespreksgrafieken) en hoe goed ze presteren (afgeleid door analyse van gesprekslogboeken). In dit artikel stellen we een nieuw model voor, Bot2Vec, dat bots insluit in een compacte weergave op basis van hun structuur en gebruikslogboeken. Vervolgens gebruiken we Bot2Vec representaties om de kwaliteit van twee botanalysetaken te verbeteren. Aan de hand van gespreksgegevens en grafieken van meer dan 90 bots laten we zien dat Bot2Vec-representaties de detectieprestaties met meer dan 16% voor beide taken verbeteren.', 'de': 'Chatbots (d. h. Bots) werden in mehreren Domänen weit verbreitet, zusammen mit Unterstützung von Bot-Programmierplattformen. Diese Plattformen sind mit neuartigen Testwerkzeugen ausgestattet, um die Qualität einzelner Chatbots zu verbessern. Dies erfordert ein Verständnis dafür, welche Art von Bots gebaut werden (erfasst durch ihre zugrunde liegenden Konversationsgraphen) und wie gut sie funktionieren (abgeleitet durch Analyse von Konversationsprotokollen). In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein neues Modell vor, Bot2Vec, das Bots auf Basis ihrer Struktur- und Nutzungsprotokolle in eine kompakte Darstellung einbettet. Anschließend verwenden wir Bot2Vec-Darstellungen, um die Qualität von zwei Bot-Analyseaufgaben zu verbessern. Anhand von Gesprächsdaten und Grafiken von über 90-Bots zeigen wir, dass Bot2Vec-Darstellungen die Erkennungsleistung für beide Aufgaben um mehr als 16% verbessern.', 'ko': '채팅 로봇(즉bot)은 여러 분야에 광범위하게 응용되고bot프로그래밍 플랫폼을 지원하고 있다.이 플랫폼들은 단일 채팅 로봇의 질을 높이기 위해 새로운 테스트 도구를 갖추고 있다.이를 위해서는 어떤 로봇(밑바닥 대화도를 통해 포획)을 구축하고 있는지, 그리고 그들의 성능(대화 로그 분석을 통해)을 알아야 한다.본고에서 우리는 로봇을 구조와 사용 로그를 바탕으로 하는 치밀한 표현에 삽입하는 새로운 모델인 Bot2Vec를 제시했다.그리고 Bot2Vec 표시를 이용하여 두 개의bot 분석 임무의 질을 향상시킵니다.90여 개의 로봇의 대화 데이터와 도표를 사용하여 우리는 Bot2Vec 표현법이 이 두 가지 임무에서 검측 성능이 16% 이상 향상된 것을 발견했다.', 'sw': 'Mazungumzo (yaani, bots) yanakuwa yanatumika kwa kiasi kikubwa katika maeneo mbalimbali, pamoja na kutunga mkono jukwaa la programu za bot. Jukwaa hizi zimewekwa vifaa vya kujaribu riwaya kwa lengo la kuboresha ubora wa mazungumzo binafsi. Kufanya hivyo inahitaji kuelewa namna gani boti zinazojengwa (imekamatwa na picha za mazungumzo yao ya msingi) na namna gani wanavyofanya vizuri (kupitia uchambuzi wa blogu za mazungumzo). Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza mtindo mpya, Bot2Vec, ambalo linaingiza bots kwenye uwakilishi wa makubaliano kwa msingi wa ujenzi na blogu zao za matumizi. Kisha, tunatumia uwakilishi wa Bot2Vec kuboresha ubora wa kazi mbili za uchambuzi wa bot. Kwa kutumia takwimu za mazungumzo na picha za zaidi ya boti 90, tunaonyesha kuwa wawakilishi wa Bot2Vec wanaongezea utendaji wa uchunguzi kwa zaidi ya asilimia 16 kwa kazi zote.', 'id': 'Batu percakapan (i.e., robot) semakin luas digunakan dalam berbagai domain, bersama dengan mendukung platform pemrograman robot. Platform ini disediakan dengan alat tes baru yang bertujuan untuk meningkatkan kualitas chatbot individu. Melakukannya membutuhkan pemahaman tentang jenis robot apa yang sedang dibangun (ditangkap oleh grafik percakapan mereka) dan bagaimana baik mereka berhasil (dibangun melalui analisis log percakapan). Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan model baru, Bot2Vec, yang memasukkan robot ke sebuah representation kompakt berdasarkan struktur dan catatan penggunaan mereka. Kemudian, kami menggunakan represensi Bot2Vec untuk meningkatkan kualitas dua tugas analisis robot. Using conversation data and graphs of over than 90 bots, we show that Bot2Vec representations improve detection performance by more than 16% for both tasks.', 'fa': 'Chatbots (i.e. bots) در چندین دامنه\u200cها با پشتیبانی برنامه\u200cریزی ربات استفاده می\u200cشوند. این platformها با ابزارهای آزمایش نویسی که هدف دارند به بهترین کیفیت صحبت\u200cهای شخصی آماده می\u200cشوند. این کار نیاز دارد که بفهمید که چه نوع ربات ساخته می شوند (که توسط گرافهای صحبت زیر آنها گرفته می شوند) و چقدر خوب انجام می دهند (که از طریق تحلیل logs صحبت می شوند). در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل جدید، Bot2Vec را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، که bots را به یک نمایش پیچیده\u200cای که بر اساس ساختار و لیگ\u200cهای استفاده از آنها بنیاد می\u200cدهد. سپس، ما نمایش\u200cهای Bot2Vec را استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا کیفیت دو کار تحلیل bot را بهبود دهیم. استفاده از داده\u200cهای مکالمه و گرافیک بیش از ۹۰ ربات، نشان می\u200cدهیم که نمایش\u200cهای Bot2Vec اجرای شناسایی بیش از ۱۶ درصد برای هر دو کار بهتر می\u200cشود.', 'tr': "Çatbotlar (diýmek bolsa, botlar) birnäçe köp sahada ulanylýar, bot programleme platformlary goldadyrlar. Bu platformlar birnäçe çäbiň howplygyny geliştirmek üçin amaçly täze synaglama aletleri bilen birleştirilýär. Bu şekilde etmek üçin nähili botlaryň inşa edilen düşünmesi gerek. Bu kağıt içinde, Bot2Vec'u yeni bir modeli teklif ediyoruz. Bu botları yapıları ve kullanım günlüklerine dayanan kompakt temsillerine koyuyor. Sonra Bot2Vec temsillerini iki bot analizi görevinin kalitesini geliştirmek için kullanıyoruz. Qonuşma maglumatlaryny we grafiklerini 90 botdan ýokarynda ullanýarys, Bot2Vec üýtgewleri iki işe üçin tanyş etkinleşigini 16% ýokarynda gowylaşdyrýarlar.", 'af': "Chatbots (i.e. bots) word heeltemal gebruik in veelvuldige domeine, saam met ondersteuning van bot programplatforme. Hierdie platforme is beskikbaar met nuwe toets nutsprogramme wat die kwaliteit van individuele gespreksbote beter is om te verbeter. Doen so benodig 'n verstanding van watter soort bots gebou word (gevang deur hul onderstelde gesprekslys grafieke) en hoe goed hulle uitvoer (afgeleide deur analiseer van gesprekslys logs). In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n nuwe model, Bot2Vec, wat inbêer bots na 'n kompakte voorstelling gebaseer op hul struktuur en gebruik logs. Dan gebruik ons Bot2Vec voorstellings om die kwaliteit van twee bot analiseerde taak te verbeter. Gebruik ons gespreksdata en grafie van meer as 90 bots, wys ons dat Bot2Vec-voorstellings verbeter opdekking-prestasie deur meer as 16% vir beide opdragte.", 'sq': 'Botat e bisedës (pra, robotët) po përdoren gjerësisht në shumë fusha, së bashku me mbështetjen e platformeve të programimit të robotëve. Këto platforma janë të pajisura me mjete të reja testimi që synojnë përmirësimin e cilësisë së chatbotëve individual ë. Duke e bërë këtë kërkon një kuptim se çfarë lloj robotësh janë duke u ndërtuar (të kapur nga grafikët e tyre të bisedës) dhe se sa mirë ata bëjnë (të nxjerrë nga analiza e regjistrimeve të bisedës). Në këtë letër, propozojmë një model të ri, Bot2Vec, që përfshin robotët në një përfaqësim kompakt bazuar në strukturën e tyre dhe regjistrimet e përdorimit. Pastaj, ne përdorim përfaqësimet Bot2Vec për të përmirësuar cilësinë e dy detyrave të analizës robotike. Duke përdorur të dhënat e bisedimeve dhe grafikët e mbi 90 robotëve, ne tregojmë se përfaqësimet e Bot2Vec përmirësojnë shfaqjen e zbulimit me më shumë se 16% për të dy detyrat.', 'am': 'የካትቦት (ምሳሌ፣ ቦትቶች) በተለየ ብዙ ዶሜኖችን በተጨማሪም እየተጠቀሙ ናቸው፡፡ These platforms are equipped with novel testing tools aimed at improving the quality of individual chatbots.  እንደዚህም መሠረት ምን ዓይነት ቦቶች እንደሚመሠረቱ (በዋይኛው የንግግር ቀለሞች የሚያዙት) እና እንዴት ያህል እንደሚያሳዩት ማስተዋል ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም አዲስ ምሳሌ፣ ቦት2Vec፣ በሥርዓታቸው እና በመጠቀም የጦማሪያዎችን በመሠረት ላይ የተሳካ አካባቢ መልዕክት ያሳልፋል፡፡ በኋላም የቦት2Vec መልዕክቶች የሁለት ቦት-አካሊስ ስራዎችን ለማሻል እናጠቃለን፡፡ በ90 በመቶ የሚበልጠውን የንግግር ዳታ እና ቀፎችን በመጠቀም፣ ቦት2Vec መልዕክቶች ለሁለቱ ስርዓቶች 16 በመቶ የሚያበዛውን ያሳያልን፡፡', 'hy': 'Խոսակցությունները (այսինքն, ռոբոտները) տարածաբար օգտագործվում են բազմաթիվ բոտներում, միասին աջակցում են ռոբոտների ծրագրավորումների պլատֆորմերին: Այս պլատֆորմերը պատրաստված են նոր փորձարկումների գործիքներով, որոնք նպատակով են բարելավել անհատական խմբաբոտների որակը: Այդպես անելու համար հարկավոր է հասկանալ, թե ինչ տեսակի ռոբոտներ են կառուցվում (նկարահանված իրենց հիմնական խոսակցության գրաֆիկների միջոցով) և ինչքան լավ են նրանք աշխատում (ստացված խոսակցության գրաֆիկների վերլուծության միջոցով): Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մոդել, Bot2vec-ը, որը ներառում է ռոբոտներին իրենց կառուցվածքի և օգտագործման փաստաթղթերի վրա կապկտ ներկայացուցիչ: Հետո մենք օգտագործում ենք Bot2vec-ի ներկայացումները, որպեսզի բարելավենք երկու ռոբոտների վերլուծության խնդիրների որակը: Օգտագործելով ավելի քան 90 ռոբոտների խոսակցության տվյալներ և գրաֆիկներ, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ Bot2vec-ի ներկայացումները բարելավում են հայտնաբերման արդյունքը ավելի քան 16 տոկոսով երկու խնդիրների համար:', 'az': 'Chatbotlar (i.e. botlar) √ßoxlu domenl…ôrd…ô geniŇü i Ňül…ôdil…ôr, robot programlama platformlarńĪnńĪ d…ôst…ôkl…ôyirl…ôr. Bu platformlar, individuel √ß√∂p√ß√ľl…ôrin keyfiyy…ôtini yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrmaq m…ôqs…ôdil…ô yeni sńĪnama vasit…ôl…ôri il…ô hazńĪrlanmńĪŇüdńĪr. Bunu etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn botlarńĪn n…ô c√ľr inŇüa edildiyini v…ô n…ô yaxŇüńĪ iŇül…ôdikl…ôrini anlamasńĪ lazńĪmdńĪr. Bu kańüńĪzda yeni modeli Bot2Vec t…ôblińü edirik ki, botlarńĪ onlarńĪn yapńĪsńĪ v…ô istifad…ô g√ľnl√ľkl…ôrin…ô dayanan kompakt g√∂st…ôricisin…ô daxil edir. Sonra, Bot2Vec g√∂st…ôricil…ôrini iki bot analizi iŇül…ôrinin keyfiyy…ôtini yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrmaq √ľ√ß√ľn istifad…ô edirik. ńįnŇüallah m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪ v…ô grafikl…ôrini 90-d…ôn artńĪq botlarńĪn istifad…ô ed…ôr…ôk, Bot2Vec t…ôŇükil…ôri h…ôr iki iŇüin √ľ√ß√ľn 16%-d…ôn artńĪq t…ôŇükil etdiyini g√∂st…ôrir.', 'bn': 'বোট প্রোগ্রামিং প্ল্যাটফর্মের সমর্থন করার সাথে বিভিন্ন ডোমেইনে চ্যাটবোট (যেমন বট) ব্যাপক ব্যবহার করছে। These platforms are equipped with novel testing tools aimed at improving the quality of individual chatbots.  এভাবে বুঝতে হবে কি ধরনের বট তৈরি করা হচ্ছে (তাদের ভূতপূর্ব আলোচনার গ্রাফের দ্বারা তাদের ধরা হয়) এবং তারা কত ভালো করে কাজ করে (আলোচনার ল এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নতুন মডেল, বোট২ভেক, যা তাদের কাঠামো এবং ব্যবহারের লোগগুলোর ভিত্তিতে ভিত্তিক একটি প্রতিনিধিত্বের কাছে  তারপর আমরা বোট২ভেকের প্রতিনিধি ব্যবহার করি দুই বট বিশ্লেষণের কাজের মান উন্নত করার জন্য। কথোপকথনের তথ্য এবং ৯০ বোটের বেশী গ্রাফ ব্যবহার করে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে বোট২ভেকের প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্বের দুটি কাজে', 'ca': "Chatbots (i.e., bots) are becoming widely used in multiple domains, along with supporting bot programming platforms.  Aquestes plataformes estan equipades amb noves eines de prova destinades a millorar la qualitat dels chatbots individuals. Això requereix una comprensió de quin tipus de robots estan construint (capturats pels seus gràfics de conversació subjacents) i de com funcionan bé (derivats a través de l'an àlisi dels registres de conversació). En aquest article, proposem un nou model, Bot2Vec, que incorpora robots a una representació compacta basada en la seva estructura i registres d'ús. Després, utilitzem representacions Bot2Vec per millorar la qualitat de dues tasques d'anàlisi de robots. Utilitzant dades de conversa i gràfics de més de 90 robots, demostram que les representacions de Bot2Vec milloren el rendiment de la detecció en més del 16% per ambdues tasques.", 'cs': 'Chatboty (tj. boty) se stávají široce používány ve více doménách a podporují programovací platformy bot. Tyto platformy jsou vybaveny novými testovacími nástroji zaměřenými na zlepšení kvality jednotlivých chatbotů. To vyžaduje porozumění tomu, jaký druh robotů se vytvářejí (zachycený jejich základními grafy konverzace) a jak dobře fungují (odvozený prostřednictvím analýzy konverzačních protokolů). V tomto článku navrhujeme nový model Bot2Vec, který vloží boty do kompaktní reprezentace na základě jejich struktury a logů použití. Poté využíváme reprezentace Bot2Vec ke zlepšení kvality dvou úloh analýzy bot. Pomocí konverzačních dat a grafů více než 90-ti robotů ukazujeme, že reprezentace Bot2Vec zlepšují detekční výkon o více než 16% pro obě úkoly.', 'et': 'Chatbotid (st botid) kasutatakse laialdaselt mitmes domeenis koos toetavate botide programmeerimisplatvormidega. Need platvormid on varustatud uudsete testimisvahenditega, mille eesmärk on parandada üksikute chatbotide kvaliteeti. Selleks on vaja aru saada, milliseid bote ehitatakse (jäädvustatakse nende aluseks olevate vestlusgraafikute abil) ja kui hästi nad toimivad (tuletatud vestluslogide analüüsi abil). Käesolevas töös pakume välja uue mudeli Bot2Vec, mis integreerib botid kompaktsesse esitusse, mis põhineb nende struktuuril ja kasutuslogidel. Seejärel kasutame Bot2Vec esitusi kahe botianalüüsi ülesande kvaliteedi parandamiseks. Kasutades vestlusandmeid ja rohkem kui 90 boti graafikuid, näitame, et Bot2Veci esitused parandavad tuvastamise jõudlust enam kui 16% võrra mõlema ülesande puhul.', 'bs': 'Chatboti (tj. roboti) se široko koriste u višestrukim domenama, zajedno s podrškom programiranih platformi robota. Ove platforme su opremljene novim testskim alatima za cilj poboljšanja kvalitete individualnih otvorenika. To zahtijeva razumijevanje kakav je vrst robota izgrađen (uhvaćen njihovim temeljnim grafikama razgovora) i kako dobro rade (proizveden analizom dnevnika razgovora). U ovom papiru predlažemo novi model, Bot2Vec, koji uključuje robote kompaktnom predstavljanju na temelju njihove strukture i dnevnice korištenja. Onda koristimo predstave Bot2Vec kako bi poboljšali kvalitet dva zadatka za analizu robota. Koristeći razgovorne podatke i grafike preko 90 robota, pokazujemo da predstavljanja Bot2Vec poboljšavaju učinkovitost otkrivanja za više od 16% za oba zadatka.', 'fi': 'Chatbotit (botit) ovat yleistymässä useilla verkkotunnuksilla ja tukevat bottiohjelmistusalustoja. Nämä alustat on varustettu uusilla testaustyökaluilla, joilla pyritään parantamaan yksittäisten chatbottien laatua. Tämä edellyttää ymmärrystä siitä, millaisia botteja rakennetaan (niiden taustalla olevien keskustelukaavioiden avulla) ja kuinka hyvin ne toimivat (johdetaan keskustelulokien analysoinnin avulla). Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta mallia, Bot2Vec, joka upottaa botit kompaktiin esitykseen perustuen niiden rakenne- ja käyttölokeihin. Tämän jälkeen käytämme Bot2Vec-esityksiä parantaaksemme kahden bottianalyysitehtävän laatua. Käyttämällä yli 90 botin keskusteludataa ja kaavioita osoitamme, että Bot2Vec-esitykset parantavat havaitsemisen suorituskykyä yli 16% molemmissa tehtävissä.', 'jv': 'I Name Ngawe ngilangno sistem sing dibenakake opo sing sampeyan karo bot Nang pebuk iki, kita enyangsa model sing bagi, bot2vecc, lan akeh batasan bots kanggo nyelaran kompak bataran dhéwé nggawe sistem lan nambah logi Nambah, kita nggunakake bot2vec gambar kanggo luwih nggawe bot sampeyan iki dadi Ngawe ngubah data karo graphs menyang ngawih dumadhi', 'sk': 'Chatboti (tj. boti) se pogosto uporabljajo v več domenah, skupaj s podpirajočimi platformami za programiranje botov. Te platforme so opremljene z novimi orodji za testiranje, namenjenimi izboljšanju kakovosti posameznih chatbotov. Za to je potrebno razumeti, kakšne vrste botov se gradijo (ujeti z osnovnimi grafikoni pogovorov) in kako dobro delujejo (izpeljani z analizo dnevnikov pogovorov). V prispevku predlagamo nov model, Bot2Vec, ki vključuje bote v kompaktno predstavitev na podlagi njihove strukture in dnevnikov uporabe. Nato uporabljamo predstavitve Bot2Vec za izboljšanje kakovosti dveh nalog analize botov. Z uporabo podatkov o pogovoru in grafikonov več kot 90 botov pokažemo, da predstavitve Bot2Vec izboljšajo učinkovitost zaznavanja za več kot 16% pri obeh opravilih.', 'he': 'בוטי שיחה (כלומר, רובוטים) הופכים לשימוש רחב במספר שדות, יחד עם תמיכה במטפסות תוכנית רובוטים. הפלטפורמות האלה מוכשרות בכלי ניסוי חדשים שמתכוונים לשפר את איכות השיחבוטים האישיים. לעשות את זה דורש הבנה של איזה סוג של רובוטים נבנים (נתפסים על ידי גרפי השיחה המרכזים שלהם) וכמה טוב הם מצליחים (הנוצאים באמצעות ניתוח של לוגי השיחה). בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציעים מודל חדש, Bot2Vec, שמכניס רובוטים לייצגה חדה מבוססת על המבנה והשימוש שלהם. ואז, אנחנו משתמשים באמצעות Bot2Vec כדי לשפר את איכות שני משימות ניתוח רובוטים. באמצעות נתוני שיחה וגרפים של מעל 90 רובוטים, אנו מראים שהמייצגים של Bot2Vec משתפרים את ביצועי גילוי על ידי יותר מ-16% לשני המשימות.', 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name Wannan platform ana samar da zanen jarraba yanzu don a yi amfani da su gyara sifar batalo guda. Wannan yana tambayar ka fahimta a yanda aka gina kotts (an riƙe su da zanen mazaɓa masu bakin mazaɓa) kuma don a ƙaddara su da kyautar (an keɓance a fassarar logogin mazaɓa). Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata shekara guda, Bot2Wec, wanda ke ƙara mataimaki zuwa wani matsayi samu a kan salon da ke amfani da matsayinsu. Sa'an nan kuma, za mu yi amfani da abõkan Bot2V zuwa ga improve tsarin aikin biyo biyu. Yi amfani da data da grafiko na ƙari 90 bot, Munã nũna masu motsi da Bot2V sun fi ƙaranci fassarar gannaiki da asilimi 166 ga aikin dukansu.", 'bo': 'གླེང་མོལ་bots གླེང་སྒྲོམ་འདི་དག་སྒེར་གྱི་གླེང་མོལ་གྱི་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་ལག་ཆ་དང་མཉམ་སྒྲིག་ཡོད། བྱས་ཙང་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ནི་གང་འདྲ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་དེ་ལས། In this paper, we propose a new model, Bot2Vec, that embeds bots to a compact representation based on their structure and usage logs. Examples of these are the products. དེ་ནས་འུ་ཅག་གིས་bot2Vec་གཟུགས་བརྗོད་པ་དེ་སྒོ་ཕྱེ་བ་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱིས་རྒྱས་ཐལ་ཡོད་ཚད་ལེན་སྐྱོང་བྱེ གཏམ་གླེང་སྡོམ་གྱི་གནས་སྡུད་དང་ཚད་རིས་90་ལས་བརྟེན་ནས། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་Bot2Vec་ནང་གི་གསལ་བརྗོད་འཆར་སྟངས་ལ་16% ལས་'}
{'en': 'A Semantic Cover Approach for Topic Modeling', 'ar': 'نهج الغلاف الدلالي لنمذجة الموضوع', 'fr': 'Une approche sémantique de couverture pour la modélisation de sujets', 'es': 'Un enfoque de cobertura semántica para el modelado de temas', 'pt': 'Uma abordagem de cobertura semântica para modelagem de tópicos', 'ja': 'トピックモデリングのためのセマンティックカバーアプローチ', 'zh': '以主题建模语义覆法', 'ru': 'Семантический подход к моделированию тем', 'hi': 'विषय मॉडलिंग के लिए एक शब्दार्थ कवर दृष्टिकोण', 'ga': 'Cur Chuige Clúdaigh Shéimeantach maidir le Samhaltú Ábhair', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μια Semantic Cover Approach for Topic Modeling', 'hu': 'Szemantikus borítómegközelítés a téma modellezéséhez', 'kk': 'Нақышты үлгілеу үшін семантикалық мұқабатының жағдайыName', 'lt': 'Semantinis aprėpties metodas temų modeliavimui', 'it': 'Un approccio semantico di copertina per la modellazione degli argomenti', 'mk': 'Семантичен пристап до покривање за моделирање на теми', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'A Semantic Cover Approach for Topic Modeling', 'pl': 'Semantyczne podejście do modelowania tematów', 'ro': 'O abordare de acoperire semantică pentru modelarea subiectelor', 'no': 'Name', 'sr': 'Semantički pristup pokrivanja za modeliranje teme', 'so': 'Daryeelka macluumaadka', 'si': 'විදේශ මොඩේලින්ගෙන් සෙමැන්ටික් ආවරණ අවස්ථාව', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн загварын зураг загварын Semantic Cover Approach', 'ta': 'Name', 'sv': 'Ett semantiskt omslagstillvĂ¤gagĂ¥ngssĂ¤tt fĂ¶r Ă¤mnesmodellering', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'A Semantic cover tiếp cận đối với Toph Modeling', 'hr': 'Semantički pristup pokrivanja za modeliranje teme', 'bg': 'Семантичен подход за моделиране на теми', 'nl': 'Een semantische dekkingsbenadering voor topic modeling', 'da': 'En semantisk dækketilgang til emnemodellering', 'de': 'Ein semantischer Coveransatz für die Themenmodellierung', 'id': 'Pendekatan Sampul Semantik untuk Modeling Topik', 'sw': 'Habari za Semantic Inapatikana kwa ajili ya Utawala wa mada', 'ko': '테마 모델링의 의미 덮어쓰기 방법', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': '_Mazmunlar', 'am': 'Name', 'sq': 'A Semantic Cover Approach for Topic Modeling', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Mevzu Modeli üçün Semantik Yaxınlıq', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Semantički pristup pokrivanja za modeliranje teme', 'ca': 'Un enfocament Semàtic de cobertura per a la modelació de temes', 'cs': 'Sémantický přístup k modelování témat', 'et': 'Teemade modelleerimise semantiline kattevahend', 'fi': 'Semanttinen kansikuva aiheen mallintamiseen', 'sk': 'Pristop semantičnega naslovnika za modeliranje teme', 'jv': 'Cover Method', 'he': 'גישה סמנטית לכיסוי למדליגת נושאים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'གནད་དོན་རིས་མ་དབྱིབས་ལ་ཆུང་མཐའ་ཁེབས་དང་གཟུགས་རིས'}
{'en': 'We introduce a novel topic modeling approach based on constructing a semantic set cover for clusters of similar documents. Specifically, our approach first clusters documents using their Tf-Idf representation, and then covers each cluster with a set of topic words based on semantic similarity, defined in terms of a word embedding. Computing a topic cover amounts to solving a minimum set cover problem. Our evaluation compares our topic modeling approach to Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) on three metrics : 1) qualitative topic match, measured using evaluations by Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk) workers, 2) performance on classification tasks using each topic model as a sparse feature representation, and 3) topic coherence. We find that qualitative judgments significantly favor our approach, the method outperforms LDA on topic coherence, and is comparable to LDA on document classification tasks.', 'ar': 'نقدم نهجًا جديدًا لنمذجة الموضوع يعتمد على إنشاء غلاف مجموعة دلالي لمجموعات من المستندات المماثلة. على وجه التحديد ، يقوم نهجنا أولاً بتجميع المستندات باستخدام تمثيل Tf-Idf الخاص بهم ، ثم يغطي كل مجموعة بمجموعة من كلمات الموضوع بناءً على التشابه الدلالي ، المحدد من حيث تضمين كلمة. يصل حساب غلاف الموضوع إلى حل مشكلة غلاف مجموعة الحد الأدنى. يقارن تقييمنا نهج النمذجة الموضوعية لدينا مع تخصيص Latent Dirichlet (LDA) على ثلاثة مقاييس: 1) تطابق الموضوع النوعي ، المقاس باستخدام التقييمات التي أجراها عمال Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk) ، 2) الأداء في مهام التصنيف باستخدام كل نموذج موضوع كميزة متفرقة التمثيل ، و 3) تناسق الموضوع. وجدنا أن الأحكام النوعية تفضل بشكل كبير نهجنا ، والطريقة تتفوق على LDA في تماسك الموضوع ، ويمكن مقارنتها بـ LDA في مهام تصنيف المستندات.', 'fr': "Nous introduisons une nouvelle approche de modélisation de sujets basée sur la construction d'une couverture sémantique pour des groupes de documents similaires. Plus précisément, notre approche regroupe d'abord les documents à l'aide de leur représentation Tf-Idf, puis couvre chaque groupe avec un ensemble de mots de sujet basés sur la similitude sémantique, définis en termes d'intégration de mots. Calculer une couverture de sujet revient à résoudre un problème de couverture minimum. Notre évaluation compare notre approche de modélisation thématique à l'allocation de Dirichlet latente (LDA) sur trois mesures\xa0: 1) correspondance qualitative des sujets, mesurée à l'aide d'évaluations par les employés d'Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) performances sur les tâches de classification utilisant chaque modèle de sujet comme représentation de fonctionnalités fragmentée, et 3) cohérence des sujets. Nous constatons que les jugements qualitatifs favorisent considérablement notre approche, que la méthode surpasse la LDA sur la cohérence des sujets et qu'elle est comparable à la LDA pour les tâches de classification de documents.", 'es': 'Presentamos un enfoque novedoso de modelado de temas basado en la construcción de una cubierta semántica para grupos de documentos similares. Específicamente, nuestro enfoque primero agrupa los documentos utilizando su representación Tf-Idf y, a continuación, cubre cada grupo con un conjunto de palabras temáticas basadas en la similitud semántica, definida en términos de incrustación de palabras. Calcular la cobertura de un tema equivale a resolver un problema de cobertura mínima establecida. Nuestra evaluación compara nuestro enfoque de modelado de temas con la asignación de Dirichlet latente (LDA) en tres métricas: 1) coincidencia de temas cualitativa, medida mediante evaluaciones realizadas por trabajadores de Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) rendimiento en tareas de clasificación utilizando cada modelo de tema como representación de características dispersas, y 3) coherencia temática. Encontramos que los juicios cualitativos favorecen significativamente nuestro enfoque, el método supera al LDA en la coherencia del tema y es comparable al LDA en las tareas de clasificación de documentos.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma nova abordagem de modelagem de tópicos baseada na construção de uma cobertura de conjunto semântico para clusters de documentos semelhantes. Especificamente, nossa abordagem primeiro agrupa documentos usando sua representação Tf-Idf e, em seguida, cobre cada agrupamento com um conjunto de palavras-tópico com base na semelhança semântica, definida em termos de incorporação de palavras. Calcular uma cobertura de tópico equivale a resolver um problema de cobertura de conjunto mínimo. Nossa avaliação compara nossa abordagem de modelagem de tópicos com a Alocação de Dirichlet Latente (LDA) em três métricas: 1) correspondência qualitativa de tópicos, medida usando avaliações de funcionários do Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) desempenho em tarefas de classificação usando cada modelo de tópico como um recurso esparso representação e 3) coerência do tópico. Achamos que os julgamentos qualitativos favorecem significativamente nossa abordagem, o método supera o LDA na coerência do tópico e é comparável ao LDA nas tarefas de classificação de documentos.', 'hi': 'हम इसी तरह के दस्तावेजों के समूहों के लिए एक शब्दार्थ सेट कवर के निर्माण के आधार पर एक उपन्यास विषय मॉडलिंग दृष्टिकोण पेश करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हमारा दृष्टिकोण पहले उनके Tf-Idf प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग करके दस्तावेज़ों को क्लस्टर करता है, और फिर प्रत्येक क्लस्टर को शब्दार्थ समानता के आधार पर विषय शब्दों के एक सेट के साथ कवर करता है, जिसे एक शब्द एम्बेडिंग के संदर्भ में परिभाषित किया गया है। एक विषय कवर की गणना न्यूनतम सेट कवर समस्या को हल करने के बराबर है। हमारा मूल्यांकन तीन मीट्रिक पर अव्यक्त Dirichlet आवंटन (LDA) के लिए हमारे विषय मॉडलिंग दृष्टिकोण की तुलना करता है: 1) गुणात्मक विषय मैच, अमेज़ॅन मैकेनिकल तुर्क (MTurk) श्रमिकों द्वारा मूल्यांकन का उपयोग करके मापा जाता है, 2) वर्गीकरण कार्यों पर प्रदर्शन प्रत्येक विषय मॉडल का उपयोग करके एक विरल सुविधा प्रतिनिधित्व के रूप में, और 3) विषय सुसंगतता। हम पाते हैं कि गुणात्मक निर्णय हमारे दृष्टिकोण का काफी पक्ष लेते हैं, विधि विषय सुसंगतता पर एलडीए को मात देती है, और दस्तावेज़ वर्गीकरण कार्यों पर एलडीए के बराबर है।', 'ja': '類似の文書のクラスタのセマンティックセットカバーを構築することに基づいた新規トピックモデリングアプローチを紹介します。具体的には、私たちのアプローチは、まずTf - Idf表現を使用してドキュメントをクラスタ化し、次に語埋め込みの観点から定義されたセマンティック類似性に基づいたトピック単語のセットで各クラスタをカバーします。トピックカバーを計算することは、最小セットカバーの問題を解決することに相当します。私たちの評価は、潜在ディリクレ割当（ LDA ）に対する私たちのトピックモデリングアプローチを3つの指標で比較します。1 ） Amazon Mechanical Turk （ MTurk ）ワーカーによる評価を使用して測定される定性的なトピックマッチ、2 ）まばらな特徴表現として各トピックモデルを使用した分類タスクのパフォーマンス、3 ）トピックの一貫性。定性的な判断は、私たちのアプローチを大幅に有利にし、この方法はトピックの一貫性でLDAを上回り、文書分類タスクでLDAに匹敵することがわかります。', 'ru': 'Введем новый подход к тематическому моделированию, основанный на построении семантического множества обложки для кластеров подобных документов. В частности, наш подход сначала кластеризует документы, используя их представление Tf-Idf, а затем охватывает каждый кластер набором тематических слов, основанных на семантическом сходстве, определенном в терминах встраивания слов. Вычисление тематического обложки равнозначно решению задачи с минимальным набором обложек. Наша оценка сравнивает наш подход к тематическому моделированию для Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) по трем показателям: 1) качественное соответствие тем, измеренное с использованием оценок работников Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) производительность по задачам классификации с использованием каждой тематической модели в качестве редкого представления признаков и 3) согласованность тем. Мы обнаружили, что качественные суждения значительно благоприятствуют нашему подходу, метод превосходит LDA по согласованности тем и сопоставим с LDA по задачам классификации документов.', 'zh': '言类文档集群构语义集覆新题建模法。 具体来说,吾法先用Tf-Idf文档聚类,然后以一组盖语义相似性主题词每聚类,随词嵌定义。 计主题封面当决最小合封面。 吾评以吾题建模法与潜狄利克雷分(LDA)校之三指标:1)定性题配,以Amazon Mechanical Turk(MTurk)工作人员量之,2)以题模形为疏特征之分,及3)主题一致性。 吾见定性之决著于吾道,优于主一致性于LDA,而于文档类与LDA等。', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach cur chuige nua um shamhaltú topaicí bunaithe ar chlúdach tacair shéimeantach a chruthú do chnuasaigh de dhoiciméid chomhchosúla. Go sonrach, cnuasaíonn ár gcur chuige doiciméid ar dtús ag baint úsáide as a n-ionadaíocht Tf-Idf, agus ansin clúdaíonn sé gach braisle le sraith focal topaice bunaithe ar chosúlacht shéimeantach, sainithe i dtéarmaí neadaithe focal. Is ionann ríomh clúdach ábhair agus íosfhadhb chlúdaigh tacair a réiteach. Déanann ár meastóireacht comparáid idir ár gcur chuige samhaltaithe topaicí maidir le Leithdháileadh Folaigh Folaigh (LDA) ar thrí mhéadracht: 1) meaitseáil ábhar cáilíochtúil, tomhaiste ag baint úsáide as meastóireachtaí ó oibrithe Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) feidhmíocht ar thascanna aicmithe ag baint úsáide as gach múnla topaice mar ghné gann ionadaíocht, agus 3) comhleanúnachas topaicí. Feicimid go bhfuil breithiúnais cháilíochta go mór i bhfabhar ár gcur chuige, go bhfuil an modh níos fearr ná LDA ar chomhleanúnachas topaicí, agus go bhfuil sé inchomparáide leis an LDA ar thascanna aicmithe doiciméad.', 'hu': 'Egy új téma modellezési megközelítést vezetünk be, amely a hasonló dokumentumok klasztereinek szemantikai készletborításán alapul. Konkrétabban, a megközelítésünk először a Tf-Idf reprezentációt használó klaszterek dokumentálják, majd minden klaszteret egy szemantikai hasonlóságon alapuló témaköri szavakkal fed le, amelyeket egy szóbeágyazás alapján definiálunk. A témakörök kiszámítása egy minimális készletborítási probléma megoldását jelenti. Értékelésünk a Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) témaköri modellezési megközelítését három mutató alapján hasonlítja össze: 1) kvalitatív témaköri egyezés, amelyet Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk) dolgozók értékeléseivel mértek, 2) osztályozási feladatok teljesítménye az egyes témaköri modellek használatával ritka jellemzők ábrázolásával, és 3) témaköri koherencia. Úgy találjuk, hogy a minőségi ítéletek jelentősen előnyben részesítik megközelítésünket, a módszer témaköri koherencia tekintetében felülmúlja az LDA-t, és összehasonlítható az LDA-val a dokumentumok osztályozási feladatokban.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ პრომენტიკური ტემების მოდელური პროგრამის შესახებ, რომელიც იგივე დოკუმენტების კლასტრებისთვის სემანტიკური კონტაქტის შესახებ დავუყ განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენი პირველი კლასტერის დოკუმენტები გამოყენებული Tf-Idf გამოყენებაში, და შემდეგ ყველა კლასტერის კლასტერის სიტყვები, რომელიც სემონტიკური სიტყვების განსაკუთრებული,  თემების გადახმარების გამოყენება მინიმალური დახმარების პრობლემას გადაწყენება. ჩვენი განსაზღვრება ჩვენი თემის მოდელური პროგორმაციას შემდგომარებს Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) სამი მეტრიკაში: 1) კვალიტატიური თემის შემდგომარება, განსაზღვრებული Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk) სამუშაო მუშაო მუშაო გამოყენებით, 2) კლასიფიკაციის მოდელ ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ კვალიტატიური გადაწყვეტილებები ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანია ჩვენი წარმოდგენისთვის, რომელიც LDA-ს თემის თანასწორობაზე გავაკეთებს და LDA-ს შემდგენელია დ', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση μοντελοποίησης θεμάτων βασισμένη στην κατασκευή ενός σημασιολογικού καλύμματος συνόλων για ομάδες παρόμοιων εγγράφων. Συγκεκριμένα, η προσέγγισή μας αρχικά συγκεντρώνει έγγραφα χρησιμοποιώντας την αναπαράσταση τους και στη συνέχεια καλύπτει κάθε σύμπλεγμα με ένα σύνολο θεμάτων λέξεων βασισμένων στη σημασιολογική ομοιότητα, που ορίζεται ως ενσωμάτωση λέξεων. Ο υπολογισμός ενός θεματικού καλύμματος ισοδυναμεί με την επίλυση ενός ελάχιστου προβλήματος κάλυψης. Η αξιολόγησή μας συγκρίνει την προσέγγιση μοντελοποίησης θέματος με την κατανομή λανθάνουσας διρίκλετ σε τρεις μετρήσεις: 1) ποιοτική αντιστοίχιση θέματος, μετρημένη χρησιμοποιώντας αξιολογήσεις από εργαζομένους του Amazon Mechanical Turk (2) απόδοση σε εργασίες ταξινόμησης χρησιμοποιώντας κάθε μοντέλο θέματος ως αραιή αναπαράσταση χαρακτηριστικών, και 3) συνοχή θέματος. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι οι ποιοτικές κρίσεις ευνοούν σημαντικά την προσέγγισή μας, η μέθοδος ξεπερνά τις LDA σε θέματα συνοχής και είναι συγκρίσιμη με τις LDA σε εργασίες ταξινόμησης εγγράφων.', 'it': "Introduciamo un nuovo approccio di modellazione tematica basato sulla costruzione di una copertura semantica per cluster di documenti simili. Nello specifico, il nostro approccio prima raggruppa documenti utilizzando la loro rappresentazione Tf-Idf, e poi copre ogni cluster con un insieme di parole topiche basate sulla somiglianza semantica, definite in termini di incorporazione di una parola. Calcolare una copertina di un argomento equivale a risolvere un problema minimo di copertura di set. La nostra valutazione confronta il nostro approccio di modellazione tematica all'allocazione Latent Dirichlet (LDA) su tre metriche: 1) match qualitativo, misurato utilizzando valutazioni da parte dei lavoratori di Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) performance sulle attività di classificazione utilizzando ogni modello di argomento come rappresentazione di funzionalità scarsa, e 3) coerenza degli argomenti. Troviamo che i giudizi qualitativi favoriscano significativamente il nostro approccio, il metodo supera LDA sulla coerenza dei temi ed è paragonabile a LDA sulle attività di classificazione dei documenti.", 'lt': 'Įdiegiame naują temų modeliavimo metodą, grindžiamą semantiniu panašių dokumentų grupių aprėptimi. Konkrečiai, mūsų požiūris pirmiausia apima dokumentus, kuriuose naudojamas jų Tf-Idf atstovavimas, o vėliau apima kiekvieną grupę su teminiu žodžių rinkiniu, pagrįstu semantiniu panašumu, apibrėžtu žodžio įterpimu. Temos aprėpties apskaičiavimas reiškia minimalios nustatytos aprėpties problemos sprendimą. Mūsų vertinimas palygina mūsų teminį modeliavimo metodą Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) trimis metriniais rodikliais: 1) kokybinis temų atitikimas, išmatuotas naudojant Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk) darbuotojų vertinimus, 2) klasifikavimo užduočių rezultatai, naudojant kiekvieną teminį model į kaip nedidelės savybės atstovavimą, ir 3) temų nuoseklumas. Nustatome, kad kokybiniai sprendimai gerokai palanki mūsų požiūriui, metodas atitinka mažiausiai išsivysčiusiąsias technologijas, susijusias su temų nuoseklumu, ir yra panašus į mažiausiai išsivysčiusiąsias technologijas, susijusias su dokumentų klasifikavimo užduotimis.', 'kk': 'Біз ұқсас құжаттардың кластері үшін семантикалық бақытты құру негізінде романдық нақышты модель тәртібін келтіреміз. Ескерту үшін, бірінші кластер құжаттарымыз Tf- Idf түсіндірімізді қолданып, әрбір кластерді semantic ұқсас сөздеріне негізделген, сөздерді ендіру үшін анықталады. Нақыштың мазмұнын шешу үшін төменгі мәселесін есептеу. Біздің оқиғамыз тақырыбызды үш метрикалық Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) дегенге салыстырады: 1) квалификациялық нақыштар сәйкесті, Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk) жұмыстарының (MTurk) оқиғаларының (2) оқиғаларының оқиғаларын салыстырады. Әрбір нақыштың үлгісін кеңі Біз квалификациялық оқиғалар өзіміздің тәсілімізді көмектеседі, тәсілі нақыштардың тәсілігін LDA бағыттап, құжаттардың классификациялық тапсырмаларында LDA-мен са', 'mk': 'Ние воведуваме нов пристап на моделирање на теми базиран на изградба семантична покривка за групи на слични документи. Специфично, нашиот пристап прво ги групира документите со користење на нивната претстава Tf-Idf, а потоа ги покрива секој груп со група темски зборови базирани на семантична сличност, дефинирани во поглед на зборот вграден. Компјутерирањето на покривањето на темата значи решавање на минимален проблем со покривањето. Нашата евалуација го споредува нашиот пристап на моделирање на темата кон Латент Диричлет Allocation (LDA) на три метрики: 1) квалитетна тема, мерена со користење на евалуации од работниците на Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) резултати на класификациските задачи користејќи секој темски модел како мала претстава на темата, и 3) тема ко Најдовме дека квалитетните пресуди значително го подобруваат нашиот пристап, методот го надминува ЛДА во однос на тематска кохеренција и е споредлив со ЛДА во однос на задачите за класификација на документите.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan pemodelan topik baru berdasarkan membina penyamaran set semantik untuk kumpulan dokumen yang sama. Secara khusus, pendekatan kami mendekati dokumen kelompok pertama menggunakan perwakilan Tf-Idf mereka, dan kemudian meliputi setiap kelompok dengan set perkataan topik berdasarkan persamaan semantik, ditakrif dalam terma penyambungan perkataan. Mengkomputer penyamaran topik jumlah untuk menyelesaikan masalah penyamaran set minimum. Evaluasi kami membandingkan pendekatan pemodelan topik kami kepada Allokasi Latent Dirichlet (LDA) pada tiga metrik: 1) persamaan topik kualitatif, diukur menggunakan penilaian oleh pekerja Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) prestasi pada tugas klasifikasi menggunakan setiap model topik sebagai perwakilan ciri-ciri ringan, dan 3) kesesuaian topik. Kami mendapati bahawa penghakiman kualitatif menguntungkan pendekatan kita secara signifikan, kaedah ini melampaui LDA pada ketepatan topik, dan adalah bandingan dengan LDA pada tugas kelasukan dokumen.', 'mt': "Aħna nintroduċu approċċ ġdid ta' mudellar ta' suġġetti bbażat fuq il-bini ta' kopertura semantika għal raggruppamenti ta' dokumenti simili. B’mod speċifiku, l-approċċ tagħna l-ewwel jikklassifika dokumenti li jużaw ir-rappreżentanza tagħhom tat-Tf-Idf, u mbagħad ikopri kull grupp b’sett ta’ kliem tematiku bbażat fuq similarità semantika, definita f’termini ta’ inkorporazzjoni ta’ kelma. Il-kompjuter ta’ kopertura ta’ suġġett jammonta għal soluzzjoni ta’ problem a ta’ kopertura minima. L-evalwazzjoni tagħna tqabbel l-approċċ tagħna tal-immudellar tas-suġġett għall-Allokazzjoni Latent Dirichlet (LDA) fuq tliet metriċi: 1) tqabbil kwalitattiv tas-suġġett, imkejjel bl-użu ta’ evalwazzjonijiet mill-ħaddiema tal-Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) prestazzjoni fuq kompiti ta’ klassifikazzjoni bl-użu ta’ kull mudell tas-suġġett bħala rappreżentazzjoni ta’ karatteristiċi żgħar, u 3) koerenza tas-suġġett. Aħna nsibu li s-sentenzi kwalitattivi jiffavorixxu b’mod sinifikanti l-approċċ tagħna, il-metodu jaqbeż l-LDA fuq koerenza tematika, u huwa komparabbli mal-LDA fuq kompiti ta’ klassifikazzjoni tad-dokumenti.", 'mn': 'Бид шинэ сэдэв загварын загварын арга загварыг илтгэнэ. Яг ижил баримт бичиг баримтуудын төлөвлөгөө зохион байгуулах. Ялангуяа, бидний анхны арга баримтууд Tf-Idf илэрхийллийг ашиглаж, дараа нь бүх багц бүрийг semantic similarity дээр тодорхойлж байгаа сэдвийн үгүүдтэй тэмдэглэдэг. Судалгааны дарааллыг тооцоолох нь хамгийн бага хэмжээний дарааллын асуудлыг шийдэх боломжтой. Бидний оюун шалгалт нь 3 метрийн Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) дээр бидний сэдвийн загварын загварыг харьцуулдаг: 1) сайн чанартай сэдвийн тоглоом, Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk) ажилтнуудын оюун шалгалтыг ашиглан хэмжээтэй, 2) сэдвийн загварын загварын тухай хуваалцах үйл ажиллагааг ашиглан хуваалцах үйл ажил Бид чадвартай шийдвэрлэлүүд бидний арга хэмжээнд үнэхээр тусламжтай байдаг. Энэ арга нь LDA-г сэдвээс хамааралтай байдлын тухай илэрхийлэгддэг. Энэ арга нь баримт хуваалтын ажил дээр LDA-тай харьцуулдаг.', 'ml': 'ഇതുപോലുള്ള രേഖകളുടെ ക്ലാസ്റ്ററുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു സെമാന്റിക് സജ്ജീകരണം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിന് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി നോവല്\u200d  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മുടെ ആദ്യ ക്ലാസ്റ്റര്\u200d രേഖകള്\u200d ടിഫ്-ഐഡിഫ് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച്, പിന്നീട് ഓരോ ക്ലാസ്റ്റരിലും ഒരു സെമാന്റിക് സമമായ വാക ഒരു പ്രമേയത്തിന്റെ പ്രശ്നം കണക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും കുറഞ്ഞ സജ്ജീവമായ പ്രശ്നമാണ്. നമ്മുടെ വിശ്വാസം മൂന്നു മീറ്റരില്\u200d ലാറ്റെന്റ് ഡിരിച്ചില്ലേറ്റ് സമ്പാദിക്കുന്ന പ്രമേയത്തിന്റെ (LDA) മാതൃകയിലേക്ക് നമ്മുടെ പ്രമേയം മാതൃകയോട് തുല്യമാക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് മാത്രമാണ്.  നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രോഗത്തിന് വളരെ പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വിധികള്\u200d, പ്രധാനപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി LDA പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന രീത', 'no': 'Vi introduserer ein modelleringstilnærming på nytt tema basert på å konstruera eit semantisk omslag for grupper av liknande dokument. Spesifisert, tilnærminga våre første klasterdokument med representasjonen av Tf-Idf, og så dekkar kvar klaster med eit sett med emne ord basert på semantisk likhet, definert som eit ord innebygging. Reknar ut eit omslag av emne for å løysa ein minimal omslag av omslag. Vårt evaluering samanliknar vårt temamodelleringstilnærming til Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) på tre metriske måtar: 1) kvalitative emne, målt med evalueringar av Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk) arbeidarar, 2) utvikling på klassifiseringsverkta ved å bruka kvar temamodell som representasjon av sparse funksjonar, og 3) temakoherens. Vi finn at kvalitative sprøytebrukar støttar tilnærminga vårt, metoden utfører LDA på temakoherens, og er samanlikbar med LDA på dokumentklassifikasjonsprogrammer.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy nowatorskie podejście do modelowania tematów oparte na konstruowaniu okładki zbioru semantycznego dla klastrów podobnych dokumentów. W szczególności nasze podejście najpierw klastruje dokumenty wykorzystujące ich reprezentację Tf-Idf, a następnie obejmuje każdy klastr zestawem słów tematycznych opartych na podobieństwie semantycznym, zdefiniowanych w kategoriach osadzenia słowa. Obliczenie okładki tematu oznacza rozwiązanie problemu minimalnego zestawu okładki. Nasza ocena porównuje nasze podejście do modelowania tematów do Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) na podstawie trzech wskaźników: 1) jakościowego dopasowania tematów, mierzonego przy użyciu ocen przez pracowników Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) wydajności w zakresie zadań klasyfikacyjnych przy użyciu każdego modelu tematu jako rzadkiej reprezentacji cech oraz 3) spójności tematu. Uważamy, że oceny jakościowe znacząco sprzyjają naszemu podejściu, metoda ta przewyższa LDA w zakresie spójności tematycznej i jest porównywalna z LDA w zakresie zadań klasyfikacji dokumentów.', 'ro': 'Introducem o abordare nouă de modelare a subiectelor bazată pe construirea unui set semantic de acoperire pentru clustere de documente similare. Mai exact, abordarea noastră grupează mai întâi documentele folosind reprezentarea lor Tf-Idf, apoi acoperă fiecare grup cu un set de cuvinte tematice bazate pe similitudinea semantică, definite în termeni de încorporare a unui cuvânt. Calcularea unei coperti de subiect reprezintă rezolvarea unei probleme minime de copertă de set. Evaluarea noastră compară abordarea noastră de modelare a subiectelor la Allocarea Latent Dirichlet (LDA) pe trei măsurători: 1) potrivirea calitativă a subiectelor, măsurată prin evaluări efectuate de lucrătorii Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) performanța activităților de clasificare utilizând fiecare model de subiect ca reprezentare a caracteristicilor rare și 3) coerența subiectelor. Considerăm că judecățile calitative favorizează semnificativ abordarea noastră, metoda depășește LDA în ceea ce privește coerența subiectelor și este comparabilă cu LDA în sarcinile de clasificare a documentelor.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo nov pristup modelima tema na osnovu konstrukcije semantičkog set a pokrivanja skupina sličnih dokumenta. Posebno, naš pristup prvim skupinama koristi svoju predstavu Tf-Idf, a zatim pokriva svaki skup sa skupom temnih riječi na semantičkoj sličnosti, definisanim u smislu reči ugrađene. Računajući količine pokrivanja teme za rješavanje minimalnog problem a sa pokrivanjem. Naša procjena uspoređuje naš pristup modelima tema sa Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) na tri metrika: 1) kvalitativni meč tema, mjeren korištenjem ocjena radnika Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) učinkovitosti klasifikacijskih zadataka korištenjem svakog modela tema kao predstavljanje rezervnih karakteristika i 3) sasvim tema. Nalazimo da kvalitativni sudovi značajno podržavaju naš pristup, metod nadmašuje LDA na sasvim temama i uspoređuje sa LDA na zadatkima klasifikacije dokumenta.', 'si': 'අපි සමාන විද්\u200dයාපයක් විද්\u200dයාපයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා වගේ ලිපින්තුවන්ගේ කොල්ස්ටර් වලට. විශේෂයෙන්ම, අපේ ප්\u200dරධානය ප්\u200dරධානයක් ප්\u200dරධානයක් තියෙනවා ඔවුන්ගේ Tf-IdF ප්\u200dරධානයක් භාවිත කරනවා, ඊට පස්සේ ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරධානයක්  ප්\u200dරශ්න ආවරණයක් පරිගණනය කරනවා අඩුම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසඳන්න. අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය සමාන්තිය කරනවා අපේ විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරමාණය මදුලිකරණය ලටින් ඩිරිච්ලෙට් ඇලෝකේෂණය (LDA) තුන් මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් වල: 1) ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරමාණය සමාන්තික විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරමාණ අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ විධානය අපේ විධානය ගොඩක් උදව් කරනවා කියලා, විධානය LDA විධානය සම්බන්ධතාවයෙන් ප්\u200dරති', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar en ny temamodelleringsmetod baserad på att konstruera en semantisk uppsättning omslag för kluster av liknande dokument. Vårt tillvägagångssätt klustrar först dokument med hjälp av deras Tf-Idf-representation, och täcker sedan varje kluster med en uppsättning ämnesord baserade på semantisk likhet, definierade i termer av en ordinbäddning. Att beräkna ett ämnesomslag är att lösa ett minimum uppsättning omslagsproblem. Vår utvärdering jämför vår metod för ämnesmodellering med Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) på tre mätvärden: 1) kvalitativ ämnesmatchning, mätt med utvärderingar av Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk)-arbetare, 2) prestanda på klassificeringsuppgifter med användning av varje ämnesmodell som en gles funktionsrepresentation, och 3) ämneskoherens. Vi finner att kvalitativa bedömningar avsevärt gynnar vårt tillvägagångssätt, metoden överträffar LDA när det gäller ämneskoherens och är jämförbar med LDA när det gäller dokumentklassificeringsuppgifter.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய தலைப்பு மாதிரி முறைமையை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் போன்ற ஆவணங்களின் குழுக்களை உருவாக்கும் பொருளாக குறிப்பிட்டு, எங்கள் முதல் உறுப்பினர் ஆவணங்களை Tf- Idf குறிப்பிட்டு பயன்படுத்தி, பின்னர் ஒவ்வொரு குழுக்கும் ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட பொருள் ஒத்திசையாக Name நம்முடைய பிரச்சினை மாதிரி மாதிரி ஒப்பிடும் மூன்று மேட்ரிக்குகளில் மட்டும் டைரிச்லெட் ஒப்பிடும் பொருட்களை ஒப்பிடும், அமாசான் மெக்சிக்கல் துருக்கு (MTurk) வேலைகளை பயன்படுத்தி மதிப்பிடும்  நாங்கள் கண்டுபிடிக்கும் பொருள் தீர்ப்புகள் எங்கள் வழிமுறையை மிகவும் பெருமையாக அனுமதிக்கும், முறையில் LDA பொருந்தும், மற்றும் L', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab tusaale ah oo ku saleysan dhismaha daboolka sawirka ah oo looga soo bandhigayo dukumentiyada oo isku mid ah. Si gaar ah, dhaqdhaqaaqyadayada ugu horraysa ayaa lagu isticmaalaa warqadooda Tf-Idf, kadibna wuxuu ku daboolaa koox kasta oo ku qoran hadal la mid ah oo ku saleysan isku mid ah, oo lagu qoray hadal ku qoran. Qiimeynta daboolka madaxa ayaa qiimeynaya dhibaatada daboolka ee ugu yaraan. Qiimeyntayada ayaa isbardhigi kara qaababka sameynta jaamacadaha ee Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) oo ku qoran saddex metric: 1) qiimeynta mada, waxaa lagu qiyaasay qiimeynta shaqaalaha Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) sameynta fasaxyada sameynta sameynta sameynta model kasta oo ku saabsan tusaale kasta oo muhiim ah oo aad u muuqaneyso, iyo 3) muhiim. Waxaynu heli nahay in xukumo takhasuska ah aad u raalli karno qaabeeneeneena, qaabka uu ku sameeyo LDA oo ku saabsan wadajirka, wuxuuna u eg yahay LDA oo ku saabsan shaqooyinka wargeyska.', 'ur': 'ہم نے ایک نوی موضوع موڈلینگ طریقہ کو معلوم کرتا ہے جس طرح کے دفتروں کے کلسٹر کے لئے ایک سیمانتیک سٹ کاور بنانے پر بنیاد رکھا ہے. مخصوص طور پر، ہماری تقریبا پہلی کلسٹر کے دکھانے کے مطابق اپنے Tf-Idf نمایش کے مطابق ہے، اور پھر ہر کلسٹر کو ایک مجموعہ ٹوپ کلمات کے ذریعہ ڈھانپ دیتا ہے جو سیمانٹیکی برابری پر بنیاد ہے، ایک کلمات کے مطابق معلوم ہے۔ ایک ٹوپ کور کی کمپیوٹر کی کمپیوٹر کرتا ہے ایک کمینٹ سٹ کور مسئلہ حل کرنے کے لئے۔ ہمارا ارزیابی تین متریک پر لات ڈریچلٹ آلوکاٹ (LDA) کے معاملہ میں ہماری موضوع موڈلینگ کا طریقہ مقایسہ کرتا ہے: 1) کیلوٹیٹی موضوع کا مطالعہ، مطالعہ مکانیک ترک (MTurk) کارکنوں کے مطالعہ سے اندازہ کیا گیا ہے، 2) ہر موضوع موڈل کے مطالعہ سے ہر موضوع موڈل کے مطالعہ سے ایک ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ کیلوٹیٹی فیصلے ہمارے طریقے سے اچھی طریقے سے فائدہ دیتے ہیں، اس طریقے سے LDA کو ٹوپ کے ساتھ زیادہ مطابق کرتا ہے، اور اس طریقے سے LDA کے ساتھ سند کلاسی ٹوک کے بارے میں مطابق ہے.', 'uz': "Biz bir novel mavzu modeli usulini ko'rsatamiz. Bu bir xil hujjatlar uchun semantik tuzilishini yaratish mumkin. Ko'rsatilgan, bizning birinchi darajaga murojaat qilish Tf-Idf tashkilotlari bilan qoʻllaniladi va keyin har bir xotirani semantik bir xil so'zlari bilan qaraydi. Name Bizning qiymatlarimiz esa esa 3 metriklarga (LDA) qiymatimiz o'xshash o'zgarishga ega bo'ladi. Amazon Mechanikal Turk (MTurk) ishlatuvchilari bilan qiymatni oʻzgartirish mumkin, 2) va har bir mavzu modeli bilan bir mavzuni tashkilotdan foydalanish muvaffaqiyatlarini qiymatish mumkin. Biz o'rganamiz, kvlitative ҳужжатлар ўз манфаатларимизга муҳим ёрдам беради, mavzu bilan LDA'ni birlashtirish usulini bajaradi, va LDA ҳужжат тафсири вазифаларига мос бўлган.", 'vi': 'Chúng ta sẽ giới thiệu một phương pháp tạo mẫu đề tài mới dựa trên việc thiết lập một mặt nạ ngữ pháp cho các tập tài liệu tương tự. Cụ thể, cách tiếp cận đầu tiên của chúng ta là cụm số tài liệu sử dụng đại diện Tf-Idf của chúng, và sau đó bao gồm mỗi cụm lần với một chuỗi các từ chủ đề dựa trên nét giống nhau theo ngữ nghĩa, được xác định theo nghĩa chữ nhúng. Tính to án một chủ đề bao gồm có nghĩa là giải quyết một vấn đề tối thiểu đã đặt. Bài đánh giá của chúng tôi so sánh phương pháp người mẫu về giao tiếp với Latent DirIChlet Allocation (LDAP) về ba metrics: 1) về ứng dụng âm tính, đo được bằng đánh giá của công nhân Amazon Mechanial Turk (MTV) phẩm về các nhiệm vụ phân loại sử dụng mỗi mô vật chủ đề như một sự phân biệt do rò rỉ, và 3) liên hệ về chủ đề. Chúng tôi thấy những phán quyết về năng lực ủng hộ cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi, cách thức thực hiện được ngôn ngữ học về sự đồng nhất chủ đề, và cũng tương đương với LDAP về các nhiệm vụ phân loại tài liệu.', 'nl': 'We introduceren een nieuwe topic modelling benadering gebaseerd op het bouwen van een semantische set cover voor clusters van vergelijkbare documenten. In het bijzonder clustert onze aanpak eerst documenten met behulp van hun Tf-Idf-weergave, en bestrijkt vervolgens elk cluster met een set topic words gebaseerd op semantische gelijkenis, gedefinieerd in termen van een woord embedding. Het berekenen van een topic cover komt neer op het oplossen van een minimum set cover probleem. Onze evaluatie vergelijkt onze topic modelling benadering met Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) op drie metrics: 1) kwalitatieve topic match, gemeten aan de hand van evaluaties door Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk) werknemers, 2) prestaties bij classificatietaken waarbij elk topic model wordt gebruikt als een schaarse feature representatie, en 3) topic coherentie. We vinden dat kwalitatieve oordelen onze aanpak aanzienlijk bevorderen, de methode beter presteert dan LDA op het gebied van topic coherentie en is vergelijkbaar met LDA op het gebied van documentclassificatie taken.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer en ny temamodelleringsmetode baseret på at konstruere et semantisk sæt cover til klynger af lignende dokumenter. Specielt vil vores tilgang først klynge dokumenter ved hjælp af deres Tf-Idf repræsentation, og derefter dækker hver klynge med et sæt emneord baseret på semantisk lighed, defineret som en ordindlejring. At beregne et emne dækning svarer til at løse et minimum sæt dækningsproblem. Vores evaluering sammenligner vores emnemodelingstilgang til Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) på tre målinger: 1) kvalitativ emnematch målt ved hjælp af evalueringer fra Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk) medarbejdere, 2) ydeevne på klassificeringsopgaver ved hjælp af hver emnemodel som en sparsom funktion repræsentation, og 3) emnemæssig sammenhæng. Vi finder, at kvalitative vurderinger i høj grad favoriserer vores tilgang, metoden overgår LDA på emneoverhængighed og kan sammenlignes med LDA på dokumentklassifikationsopgaver.', 'de': 'Wir stellen einen neuartigen Themenmodellierungsansatz vor, der auf der Konstruktion einer semantischen Mengenabdeckung für Cluster ähnlicher Dokumente basiert. Konkret wird in unserem Ansatz zunächst die Dokumentation mithilfe ihrer Tf-Idf-Darstellung zusammengefasst und dann jeder Cluster mit einer Reihe von Themenwörtern, die auf semantischer Ähnlichkeit basieren, die in Form einer Worteinbettung definiert sind, abgedeckt. Die Berechnung einer Themenabdeckung entspricht der Lösung eines Mindestsatzabdeckungsproblems. Unsere Evaluation vergleicht unseren Themenmodellierungsansatz mit Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) anhand von drei Metriken: 1) qualitativer Topic Match, gemessen anhand von Bewertungen von Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk)-Mitarbeitern, 2) Leistung bei Klassifizierungsaufgaben, die jedes Topic Model als spärliche Feature Repräsentation verwenden, und 3) Themenkohärenz. Wir stellen fest, dass qualitative Beurteilungen unseren Ansatz signifikant begünstigen, dass die Methode LDA in Bezug auf Themenkohärenz übertrifft und vergleichbar mit LDA in Bezug auf Dokumentenklassifikationsaufgaben ist.', 'bg': 'Въвеждаме нов подход за моделиране на теми, базиран на изграждането на семантичен набор от корици за клъстери от подобни документи. По-конкретно, нашият подход първо групира документи, използвайки тяхното представяне и след това обхваща всеки клъстер с набор от тематични думи въз основа на семантична сходство, дефинирана по отношение на вграждане на дума. Изчисляването на тематична покривка означава решаване на проблем с минималното покритие. Нашата оценка сравнява подхода ни за моделиране на темата с разпределението на латентни дириклет (ЛДА) по три показателя: 1) качествено съвпадение на темата, измерено чрез оценки от работници на Амазонка Механик Турк (МТюрк), 2) представяне на задачи по класификация, използвайки всеки тематичен модел като рядко представяне на характеристиките, и 3) съгласуваност на темата. Намираме, че качествените преценки значително благоприятстват нашия подход, методът превъзхожда ДДС по тематичната съгласуваност и е сравним с ДДС по задачите по класификация на документи.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo nov pristup modelima tema na temelju konstrukcije semantičkog set a pokrivanja skupina sličnih dokumenta. Posebno, naš pristup prvim skupinama koristi svoju predstavu Tf-Idf, a zatim pokriva svaki skup sa skupom temnih riječi temeljnim na semantičkoj sličnosti, definiranim u smislu riječi ugrađene. Računajući količine pokrivanja teme za rješavanje minimalnog problem a sa pokrivanjem. Naša procjena uspoređuje naš pristup modelizaciji teme s Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) na tri metrika: 1) kvalitativni poklapanje teme, mjeren s procjenama radnika Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) učinkovitosti klasifikacijskih zadataka koristeći svaki model teme kao predstavljanje rezervnih karakteristika i 3) saskaņonost teme. Smatramo da kvalitativni sudovi značajno podržavaju naš pristup, metod nadmašuje LDA na saskaņonosti teme i uspoređuje s LDA na zadatke klasifikacije dokumenta.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan model topik baru berdasarkan pembangunan sampul semantis untuk kumpulan dokumen yang sama. Secara spesifik, pendekatan kami pertama berkumpul dokumen menggunakan persembahan Tf-Idf mereka, dan kemudian menutupi setiap berkumpul dengan set kata topik berdasarkan persamaan semantis, didefinisikan dalam terma penerbangan kata. Mengkomputerkan sumber penyamaran topik untuk memecahkan masalah penyamaran minimum set. Evaluasi kami membandingkan pendekatan model topik kami ke Allokasi Latent Dirichlet (LDA) pada tiga metrik: 1) persamaan topik kualitatif, diukur menggunakan evaluasi oleh pekerja Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) prestasi pada tugas klasifikasi menggunakan setiap model topik sebagai representation fitur ringan, dan 3) koerensi topik. Kami menemukan bahwa penghakiman kualitatif sangat mendukung pendekatan kami, metode melampaui LDA pada koherensi topik, dan dapat dibandingkan dengan LDA pada tugas klasifikasi dokumen.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza mbinu za kutengeneza mada ya riwaya kwa kutumia kujenga makala ya kizuizini kwa ajili ya viungo vya nyaraka kama hizo. Kwa hakika, mbinu zetu za kwanza zinazotumia nyaraka hizo kwa kutumia uwakilishi wao wa Tf-Idf, na kisha hujumuisha kila mstari na seti ya maneno yenye usawa wa kimapenzi, inayoelezea kwa namna ya neno linaloingizwa. Kuchunguza habari za mada ni kiasi cha kutatua tatizo la kina la habari. Utafiti wetu unalinganisha mbinu zetu za mifano ya Muungano wetu wa Kusini Dirichlet (LDA) katika mbinu tatu za mada: 1) zilizohitimika kwa kutumia tathmini za wafanyakazi wa Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) utendaji wa kazi za usambazaji kwa kutumia mifano ya kila mada kama muungano wa kipekee kidogo, na 3) ushirikiano wa mada. We find that qualitative judgments significantly favor our approach, the method outperforms LDA on topic coherence, and is comparable to LDA on document classification tasks.', 'tr': "Semantik senedi 첵aly 챌aplar 체챌in bir ta첵챌a 철r채n ta첵첵arlama 첵agda첵yny g철rkezip. Adat챌a, bizi흫 ilkinji gezek okuw챌ylarymyz Tf-Idf suratyny ullan첵ar we so흫ra her sany semantik 첵aly s철zleri bilen da힊aryl첵ar, bir s철z da힊aryl첵an s철zleri 체챌in tany첵arlar. T채ze 채pi힊g채ni흫 azalyk gabdaly meseleny 챌철zmek 체챌in bir tema azaly힊y hasaplanjak. Ta첵첵arlanmamyz temalarymyzy Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) 체챌 metriklerde g철rkezil첵채r. 1) me첵dany me첵dany me첵dany me첵dany, Amazoni첵a Me첵nikal Turk (MTurk) i힊g채rleri tarapyndan 챌yky힊 edilen 챌yky힊 힊eklinde 2) topar nusgalaryny her tema g철rkezil첵채n 챌yky힊 we 3) me첵dany 챌yky힊 힊eklinde g철rkezil첵채r. Munu흫 me흫ze힊 kararlary흫 bizi흫 golamyza 철r채n gowy g철r첵채n 첵agda첵ymyzy tap첵arys, me흫ze힊 temalarda LDA'y ni첵etle힊dir첵채n 첵agda첵ymyz 체챌in 첵agda첵dyr we desktap g철rkezili힊inde LDA'y 첵aly g철r체n첵채r.", 'fa': 'ما روش نمونه\u200cسازی موضوع نویسی را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که بر اساس ساختن یک مجموعه سیمانتیک برای مجموعه\u200cهای مدارک مشابه است. مخصوصاً دسترسی اولین مدارک گروه\u200cهای ما از نمایش Tf-Idf استفاده می\u200cکنند، و بعد هر گروه را با مجموعه کلمه\u200cهای موضوع بر اساس شبیه\u200cای semantic پوشانده می\u200cکند، که به عنوان یک کلمه وارد می\u200cشود. محاسبه کردن مقدار پوشش موضوع برای حل مشکل کمینه پوشش تنظیم. ارزیابی ما روش نمونه\u200cسازی موضوع ما را با تقسیم\u200cسازی Latent Dirichlet (LDA) با سه متری مقایسه می\u200cکند: ۱) مسابقه\u200cی موضوع کیفیت، با استفاده از ارزیابی توسط کارگران مکانیکی ترک (MTurk) آمازون مقایسه می\u200cکند، ۲) روی کار\u200cهای تقسیم\u200cسازی با استفاده از هر مدل موضوع به عنوان یک نمونه\u200cسازی خص ما فهمیدیم که قضاوت\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای از دسترسی ما، روش LDA را در مورد هماهنگی موضوع بیشتر از آن انجام می\u200cدهد، و با LDA در مورد کارهای ویژه\u200cبندی سند قابل مقایسه است.', 'af': "Ons introduseer 'n nuwe onderwerp modeling toegang gebaseer op die konstruksie van 'n semantiese stel omslag vir clusters van gelyke dokumente. Spesifieke, ons toegang met die eerste klaster dokumente wat hulle Tf-Idf verteenwoording gebruik het, en dan dekk elke klaster met 'n stel onderwerpe woorde gebaseer op semantiese gelykenis, gedefinieerd in terms van 'n woord ingesluit. Bereken 'n onderwerp omslag hoeveelheid om 'n minimum stel omslag probleem te los. Ons evaluasie vergelyk ons onderwerp modellering toegang tot Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) op drie metries: 1) kvalitatiewe onderwerp ooreenstem, gemeet deur evaluasies deur Amazon Mekaniese Turk (MTurk) werkers, 2) effektuur op klassifikasie taak gebruik elke onderwerp model as 'n sparse funksie voorstel, en 3) onderwerp koherens. Ons vind dat kvalitatiewe oordelinge betekenlik ons toegang, die metode uitvoer LDA op onderwerp koherens, en is vergelykbaar met LDA op dokumentklassifikasie taak.", 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë një metodë të re modelimi të temës bazuar në ndërtimin e një mbulese semantike për grupe dokumentesh të ngjashme. Veçanërisht, qasja jonë e parë grumbullon dokumentet duke përdorur përfaqësimin e tyre Tf-Idf, dhe pastaj mbulon çdo grumbull me një sërë fjalësh tematike bazuar në ngjashmërinë semantike, të përcaktuar në terma të një fjale të përfshirë. Kompjutimi i një mbulese tematike shkon në zgjidhjen e një problem minimal të mbulesës së caktuar. Vlerësimi ynë krahason metodën tonë të modelimit të temës ndaj Allokimit Latent Dirichlet (LDA) në tre metrika: 1) ndeshje kualitative të temës, të matur duke përdorur vlerësimet nga punonjësit e Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) performancë në detyrat klasifikuese duke përdorur çdo model temë si një përfaqësim i vogël të elementeve dhe 3) koherencë tematike. Ne zbulojmë se gjykimet kualitative favorizojnë ndjeshëm qasjen tonë, metoda ekzekuton LDA në koherencën tematike dhe është e krahasueshme me LDA në detyrat e klasifikimit të dokumenteve.', 'am': 'እንደዚህ ያሉ ሰነዶች ሰነዶች የሚደረጉ የsemantic ደረጃዎችን በመሠረት ላይ የሚደረገውን የረኀብ አካል ምሳሌ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ የፊተኛይቱን ጉዳይ የTf-Idf መልዕክት የተጠቃሚ ሰነድ ሰነዱን በመጠቀም እና በሁሉም ጉንኙነታችንን በsemantic ብጤት በተመሳሳይ የተደረገውን የጉዳዩ ቃላትን ይሸፍናል፡፡ የጉዳዩ መክፈቻ ቁጥጥር መቆጣጠር ምርጫዎቻችን በሦስት ሜትሪክ (LDA) ላይ የተካሄደውን የዳይሬክሌት ድርጅት አካሄዱን ያሳያል፡፡ 1) የተካሄደውን ትክክል፣ በአማዞን ሜክናኪክ ቱርክ (MTurk) ሠራተኞችን በመጠቀም የተካሄደውን ትክክል ስርዓት፣ 2) የሁሉንም ትምህርት ሞዴል በመጠቀም ላይ ትክክክል ማድረግ እና 3) ትክክል ጉዳይ ስርዓት ነው፡፡ እና የክፍለ ፍርድ አካሄዱን እጅግ ያማረ እንደሆነ እናገኘዋለን፤ ሥርዓቱ የLDA አካባቢ ስርዓቶችን በመጠቀም እና ከLDA ጋር በማስተካከል ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր թեմային մոդելներ, որոնք հիմնված են նման փաստաթղթերի խմբերի սեմանտիկ շապիկի կառուցման վրա: Հատկապես, մեր մոտեցումը առաջին անգամ խմբավորում է փաստաթղթեր, որոնք օգտագործում են իրենց Tf-IDf ներկայացումը, և հետո ծախսում է յուրաքանչյուր խմբավորում թեմային բառերի մի շարք, հիմնված սեմանտիկ նմանության վրա, սահմանված բառի ներառման տես Թեմայի ծածկույթի հաշվարկը նշանակում է լուծել նվազագույն ծածկույթի խնդիրը: Մեր գնահատականը համեմատում է մեր թեմային մոդելը Վերջին Դիրիկլետի Ադասավորման (ԼԴԱ) երեք մետրիկայի վրա: 1) որակային թեմային համապատասխան, չափում օգտագործելով Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk) աշխատակիցների գնահատականները, 2) դասավորման առաջադրանքների արտադրողությունը, օգտագործելով յուրաքանչյուր թեմա մոդել Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ որակային դատողությունները կարևոր օգնում են մեր մոտեցումներին, մեթոդը ավելի լավ է արդյունքում, քան թեմային համապատասխանատվությունը, և այն համեմատում է փաստաթղթերի դասակարգման խնդիրներին:', 'az': 'Biz yeni məsələlər modelləşdirmək metodlarını bənzər məsələlər üçün semantik çubuğu inşa etdik. Tf-Idf göstəricisini istifadə edərək, ilk klasterlərimizin yaxınlığı ilə Tf-Idf göstəricisi ilə, sonra hər klasteri semantik bənzər sözlərlə örtür, bir söz içərisində belə tanınmış. Məsələn örtüyünü hesablayın, minimal örtük problemini çəkmək üçün. Bizim değerlendirmək məsələmizi Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) ilə üç metri ilə qarşılaşdırır: 1) gözəl məsələmiz, Amazon Mehanika Türk (MTurk) işçilərinin değerlendirmələri ilə ölçülür, 2) hər məsələnin modelini küçük mövzu olaraq istifadə edərək klasifikasyon məsələlərində müəyyən edilir. 3) məsələmiz müəyyən edilir. Gördük ki, qabiliyyətli yargılmalar bizim yaxınlığımıza çox faydalanır, metod LDA məsələlərin birləşməsi barəsində istifadə edir və belə yazılmış klasifikasyon işləri barəsində LDA ilə qarşılaşır.', 'ko': '우리는 비슷한 문서 묶음을 위한 의미 집합 덮어쓰기를 바탕으로 새로운 주제 모델링 방법을 제시했다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리의 방법은 먼저 Tf-Idf를 사용하여 문서를 분류한 다음에 의미의 유사성에 따라 하나의 주제어를 사용하여 모든 분류를 덮어씌운다. 이런 주제어는 단어에 따라 정의된 것이다.계산 테마 덮어쓰기는 최소 집합 덮어쓰기 문제를 해결하는 것과 같다.우리의 평가는 우리의 주제 모델링 방법과 잠재적인Dirichlet분배(LDA)를 세 가지 지표에서 비교했다. 1) 정성 주제가 일치하고 아마존 Mechanical Turk(MTurk) 노동자의 평가를 이용하여 측정한다. 2) 각 주제 모델을 희소한 특징으로 나타내는 분류 작업 성능, 그리고 3) 주제의 일치성을 사용한다.우리는 정성적 판단이 주제의 일관성 면에서 LDA보다 우수하고 문서 분류 임무에서 LDA와 비슷하다는 것을 발견했다.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo nov pristup modelima tema na temelju konstrukcije semantičkog set a pokrivanja skupina sličnih dokumenta. Posebno, naš pristup prvih skupina dokumenta koristeći njihovu predstavu Tf-Idf, a zatim pokriva svaki skup sa skupom temnih riječi temeljnim na semantičkoj sličnosti, definisanim u smislu ugrađene riječi. Računajući količine pokrivanja teme za rješavanje minimalnog problem a sa pokrivanjem. Naša procjena uspoređuje naš pristup modelizaciji teme sa Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) na tri metrika: 1) kvalitativne mečeve teme, mjerene s ocjenama radnika Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) učinkovitosti klasifikacijskih zadataka koristeći svaki model teme kao predstavljanje rezervnih karakteristika, i 3) saskašnost teme. Mi smatramo da kvalitativni sudovi značajno podržavaju naš pristup, metod iznosi LDA na sasvim temama i uspoređuje sa LDA na zadatke klasifikacije dokumenta.', 'bn': 'আমরা একই ধরনের ডকুমেন্টের ক্লাস্টারের জন্য একটি সেমেন্টিক সেট কাভার নির্মাণ করার ভিত্তিতে একটি উপন্যাস বিষয়ের মডে বিশেষ করে, আমাদের প্রথম ক্লাস্টারের নথি তাদের টিএফ-আইডিফ প্রতিনিধিত্ব ব্যবহার করে প্রত্যেক ক্লাস্টারের সাথে সেমেন্টিক সমতার উপর ভিত্তিক বিষয়ে একটি বিষয়ের কাভার হিসেবে গণনা করা হচ্ছে ন্যুনতম সেট কাভারের সমস্যা সমাধানের জন্য। আমাদের মুল্যায়ন আমাজোন মেক্যানিকাল তুর্ক (এমটুর্ক) শ্রমিকদের মূল্যের মাধ্যমে আমাদের প্রত্যেক বিষয় মডেল ব্যবহার করে ল্যাটেন্ট ডিরিচেলেট অ্যালোকেশনের (এলডিএ) তিন মিট্রিক: ১) সম্মানিত বিষয়ের ম আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে কৌতুহলিক বিচার আমাদের পদক্ষেপের ব্যাপারে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সমর্থন প্রদান করে, এই পদ্ধতি বিষয়বস্তুর বিষয়ে এলডিএ প্রকা', 'ca': "Introduïm un nou enfocament de modelació de temes basat en la construcció d'una cobertura semàntica per grups de documents similars. Concretament, el nostre enfocament primer agrupa documents utilitzant la seva representació Tf-Idf, i després cobre cada agrupament amb un conjunt de paraules temàtiques basades en la similitud semàntica, definida en termes d'incorporació de paraules. Computing a topic cover amounts to solving a minimum set cover problem.  La nostra evaluació compara el nostre enfocament de modelació del tema a la Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) en tres mètriques: 1) la comparació qualitativa del tema, mesurada fent servir les evaluacions dels treballadors Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) el rendiment en tasques de classificació fent servir cada model de tema com a representació de característiques escases, i 3) la coherencia del tema. Trobem que els judicis qualitatius favoreixen significativament el nostre enfocament, el mètode supera l'ADL en la coherencia temàtica i és comparable a l'ADL en tasques de classificació de documents.", 'cs': 'Představujeme nový přístup k modelování témat založený na konstrukci sémantického krytu množin pro clustery podobných dokumentů. Konkrétně, náš přístup nejprve shlukuje dokumenty pomocí jejich Tf-Idf reprezentace a poté pokrývá každý cluster sadou tématických slov založených na sémantické podobnosti definovaných ve smyslu vložení slova. Výpočet obálky tématu znamená řešení problému minimálního pokrytí. Naše hodnocení porovnává náš přístup k modelování témat s Latent Dirichletovou alokací (LDA) na třech metrikách: 1) kvalitativní shoda témat, měřená pomocí hodnocení pracovníků Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) výkon při klasifikačních úlohách pomocí každého tématického modelu jako řídké reprezentace funkcí a 3) koherence tématu. Zjišťujeme, že kvalitativní hodnocení výrazně upřednostňují náš přístup, metoda překonává LDA v oblasti koherence tématu a je srovnatelná s LDA v oblasti klasifikace dokumentů.', 'et': 'Tutvustame uudset teemamodelleerimise lähenemisviisi, mis põhineb semantilise komplekti katte loomisel sarnaste dokumentide klastritele. Täpsemalt, meie lähenemisviis koondab esmalt dokumendid, kasutades nende Tf-Idf esitust, ja seejärel hõlmab iga klastri teemasõnade komplektiga, mis põhinevad semantilisel sarnasusel, mis on määratletud sõna manustamisel. Teema katmise arvutamine tähendab minimaalse katmise probleemi lahendamist. Meie hinnangus võrreldakse meie teemamodelleerimise lähenemisviisi Latent Dirichleti allocationi (LDA) suhtes kolme mõõdiku põhjal: 1) kvalitatiivne teemavaste vastavus, mida mõõdetakse Amazon Mechanical Turki (MTurk) töötajate hinnangute abil, 2) klassifitseerimisülesannete tulemuslikkus, kasutades iga teemamudelit hõreda funktsiooni esitusena, ja 3) teemasidusus. Leiame, et kvalitatiivsed hinnangud soodustavad oluliselt meie lähenemist, meetod on teemasidususe osas LDA-st parem ja on võrreldav LDA-ga dokumentide klassifitseerimise ülesannetes.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme uuden teemamallinnuksen, joka perustuu semanttisen joukon kannen rakentamiseen samankaltaisten asiakirjojen klustereille. Tarkemmin sanottuna lähestymistapamme yhdistää ensin dokumentit käyttäen niiden Tf-Idf-esitystä ja kattaa sitten jokaisen klusterin semanttiseen samankaltaisuuteen perustuvilla aihesanoilla, jotka määritellään sanan upottamiseksi. Aiheen kannen laskeminen merkitsee vähimmäisjoukon kannen ongelman ratkaisemista. Arvioinnissamme vertaillaan aihemallinnustamme Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) -menetelmään kolmella mittarilla: 1) laadullinen aihekohtainen vastaavuus, mitattuna Amazon Mechanical Turkin (MTurk) -työntekijöiden arvioinneilla, 2) suorituskyky luokittelutehtävissä käyttäen kutakin aihemallia harvaana ominaisuusesitys ja 3) aihekohtainen johdonmukaisuus. Havaitsemme, että laadulliset arvioinnit suosivat merkittävästi lähestymistapaamme, menetelmä ylittää LDA:n aiheiden johdonmukaisuuden ja on vertailukelpoinen LDA:n kanssa asiakirjojen luokittelutehtävissä.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo nov pristop tematskega modeliranja, ki temelji na konstrukciji semantične platnice za grozde podobnih dokumentov. Natančneje, naš pristop najprej združuje dokumente z uporabo njihove predstavitve Tf-Idf, nato pa vsako skupino pokriva z naborom tematskih besed, ki temeljijo na semantični podobnosti, opredeljenih v smislu vdelave besed. Izračunavanje pokritosti teme pomeni reševanje problema minimalnega nabora pokritosti. Naša ocena primerja naš pristop modeliranja teme z Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) na treh merilih: 1) kvalitativno ujemanje teme, merjeno z evalvacijami delavcev Amazon Mechanical Turk (MTurk), 2) uspešnost pri opravilih klasifikacije z uporabo vsakega tematskega modela kot redke predstavitve funkcij in 3) skladnost teme. Ugotavljamo, da kvalitativne presoje bistveno podpirajo naš pristop, metoda presega LDA glede tematske skladnosti in je primerljiva z LDA pri nalogah klasifikacije dokumentov.', 'ha': "Tuna fara wani masu motsi na nowaya da ke samun ka samun wata dabooli na semantic wa samun takardar misãlai. A ƙayyade, hanyoyinmu na farkon samun takardun na Tf-Idf na yi amfani da shiryuwar Tf-Idf, sa'an nan yana rufe kowace komai da wasu kalmõmi masu daidaita da daidaita, an ƙayyade shi cikin maganar da za'a fitarwa. Yi ƙidãya kiman rufe maɓalli na zartar da kure matsalar da aka daidaita ta ƙarami. Ana ƙaddara da mazaɓa masu motsi zuwa shirin Latent Dirikle Allocation (LDA) a kan matriki uku: 1) ma'aunin maɓalli, an ƙaddara shi da yana amfani da evaluci na aikin Amzon Mekanical turk (Mtur), 2) mai cikakken aikin fasasar da aka yi amfani da duk misãlai na madaidaici kamar wani muhimmi mai ƙaranci, da kuma 3). We find that qualitative judgments significantly favor our approach, the method outperforms LDA on topic coherence, and is comparable to LDA on document classification tasks.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་བརྗོད་དོན་དངོས་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་གནད་དོན་མིའི་བཟོ་རྣམ་བཟོ་བ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས། ང་ཚོའི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གྱི་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་པོ་དེ་ཚོའི་Tf-Idf་རྟོགས་པ་དང་། དེ་ནས་ཚོའི་ནང་གི་ཚན་རེ་རེ་བ་ལ་ཚན་ཡོད་པའི་གནད་དོན་ཚིག གནད་དོན་འདྲ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཚད་མང་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་མི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་རྩིས་འཁོར་བ་བྱེད་དགོས Our evaluation compares our topic modeling approach to Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) on three metrics: 1) qualitative topic match, measured using evaluations by Amazon Mechanical Turk ང་ཚོའི་གནད་དོན་ཡུལ་ཆེན་ཉེན་བྱ་ཚིག་ལ་ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ལ་ཕན་ཆེན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་ཆོས་ཉེན་རྐྱེ', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nyenggawe nganggo sistem sing model gawe nguasai sematik iki luwih cara-cara sing luwih dumateng. Awak dhéwé, akeh basa sing paling-akèh dokumen sing sampeyan gambar tf-Idf uga ngono nggawe clusteran karo pergambar kelas Tema sing basa gambar semanti aksi, dadi sak oleh tiku kelas embedding word. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness We assertion conflicts we tema modeting method to Latten dir ilet Allokation (LA) on 3 Metika: 1) Qualitative tema match, measuremented use measurements by Amarok mehanical turk (MTurk) worker, 2) success on CLASS tasks use every tema model as a spase option representation, and 3) Subject coherence. Alternate priority Awak dhéwé luwih-luwih hukum sing gak bener nggawe yakuné, ngono nggawe barang-bener barang nggawe barang-bener kanggo nggawe barang dhéwé, lan ijol-utek wih apik dhéwé ning basa sing paling dhéwé.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים גישה מודלית נושא חדשה מבוססת על בניית כיסוי סמנטי למועדונים של מסמכים דומים. במיוחד, הגישה שלנו קודם מסמכים מגדלים באמצעות ייצוג Tf-Idf שלהם, ואז מכסה כל מגדל עם קבוצה של מילים נושאיות מבוססת על דומות סמנטיות, מוגדרת במונחים של מילה מעורבת. מחשב כיסוי נושא עולה לפתור בעיה כיסוי מינימום. הערכה שלנו משווה את גישת הדוגמניות הנושאיות שלנו למסע הדריקלט הלנט (Latent Dirichlet Allocation - LDA) על שלושה מטריות: 1) התאמת נושא איכותית, המדודה באמצעות הערכות על ידי עובדי הטורק המקניקלי (MTurk) של Amazon, 2) ביצועים על משימות ההסדרה באמצעות כל מודל נושא כמציגת תכונות נדירה, 3) תואם נו אנו מוצאים ששיפוטים איכותיים מעדיפים באופן משמעותי את הגישה שלנו, השיטה מובילה את LDA על תואם נושא, והיא שווה ל LDA על משימות מסמכים מסווג.'}
{'en': 'MCScript2.0 : A Machine Comprehension Corpus Focused on Script Events and Participants', 'ar': 'MCScript2.0: مجموعة فهم آلي تركز على أحداث النص والمشاركين', 'es': 'McScript2.0: Un corpus de comprensión automática centrado en eventos de guiones y participantes', 'pt': 'MCScript2.0: um corpus de compreensão de máquina focado em eventos e participantes de script', 'fr': 'McScript2.0\xa0: Corpus de compréhension automatique axé sur les événements de script et les participants', 'ja': 'MCScript2.0 ：スクリプトイベントと参加者に焦点を当てた機械理解コーパス', 'ru': 'MCScript2.0: Корпус машинного понимания, ориентированный на сценарии событий и участников', 'hi': 'MCScript2.0: एक मशीन समझ कॉर्पस स्क्रिप्ट घटनाओं और प्रतिभागियों पर केंद्रित', 'ga': 'MCScript2.0: Corpas Tuiscint Inneall Dírithe ar Imeachtaí Scripte agus Rannpháirtithe', 'zh': 'MCScript2.0:注脚本事及参与者机器解语料库', 'ka': 'MCScript2. Name', 'hu': 'MCScript2. 0: Egy gépi megértési testület, amely a script eseményekre és a résztvevőkre összpontosít', 'el': 'MCScript2. 0: Ένα Σώμα Κατανόησης Μηχανών που επικεντρώνεται σε γεγονότα σεναρίου και συμμετέχοντες', 'it': 'MCScript2. 0: Un corpo di comprensione della macchina incentrato su eventi e partecipanti', 'kk': 'MCScript2. 0: Скрипт оқиғалар мен қатысушыларға көздейтін машинаның қиындығы', 'lt': 'MCScript2. 0: Mašinos supratimo korpusas, sutelktas į scenarijų renginius ir dalyvius', 'mk': 'MCScript2. 0: Корпус за машинско разбирање фокусиран на сценариски настани и учесници', 'ms': 'MCScript2. 0: A Machine Comprehension Corpus Focused on Script Events and Participants', 'ml': 'MCScript2. 0: സ്ക്രിപ്റ്റ് അവസരങ്ങളും പങ്കുചേര്\u200dത്തുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു മെഷീന്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ്', 'no': 'MCScript2. 0: Eit maskinekomprehensingskorpus fokusert på skripthendingar og deltakarar', 'mn': 'MCScript2. 0: Скрипт үйл явдал болон оролцогчдын төвлөрөмж', 'mt': 'MCScript2. 0: Korp ta’ Komprensjoni tal-Makkinarju ffokat fuq Avvenimenti u Parteċipanti bil-Kitba', 'pl': 'MCScript2. 0: Korpus Kompleksowy Maszyn skoncentrowany na wydarzeniach skryptowych i uczestnikach', 'ro': 'MCScript2. 0: Un corp de înțelegere a mașinilor axat pe evenimente și participanți la scenariu', 'sr': 'MCScript2. 0: Mašinska kompresija korpusa fokusirana na scenarijske događaje i učesnike', 'si': 'MCScript 2. Name', 'so': 'MCScript2. 0: A machine Comprehension Corpus Focused on Script Events and Particients', 'sv': 'MCScript2. 0: En maskinförståelse Corpus fokuserad på skript händelser och deltagare', 'ta': 'MCScript2. 0: சிறுநிரல் நிகழ்வுகள் மற்றும் பங்குத்தவர்களுக்கு முன்னிலைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட இயந்திரம் முழுமையான கூட்', 'ur': 'MCScript2. 0', 'uz': 'MCScript2. Name', 'vi': 'Đóng. 0: Một Tập đoàn xây dựng máy ảnh tập trung vào các sự kiện và những người tham gia', 'bg': 'MCScript2. 0: Корпус за машинно разбиране, фокусиран върху сценарийни събития и участници', 'hr': 'MCScript2. 0: Mašinska kompresija korpusa fokusirana na scenarijske događaje i učesnike', 'da': 'MCScript2. 0: Et maskinforståelseskorpus fokuseret på scriptbegivenheder og deltagere', 'nl': 'MCScript2. 0: Een Machine Comprehension Corpus gericht op scriptgebeurtenissen en deelnemers', 'de': 'MCScript2. 0: Ein Machine Comprehension Corpus mit Fokus auf Script Events und Teilnehmer', 'id': 'MCScript2. 0: A Machine Comprehension Corpus Focused on Script Events and Participants', 'ko': 'MCScript2。0: 스크립트 이벤트와 참여자에 대한 기계 이해 자료 라이브러리', 'fa': 'MCScript2. ۰: یک جسد تغییر دستگاه روی اتفاقات و شرکتگران اسکریپت تمرکز شده', 'tr': 'MCScript2. 0:Makine A şırı Köpeği Skript olaylara ve iştirakçilere odaklandı', 'af': 'MCScript2. 0: √¢¬Ä¬ôn Masjienkomprehensie Korpus gefokus op Skrip Begeefde en Deelnaders', 'sw': 'MCScript2. 0: Korpus ya Kupima Mashiniki yenye lengo la matukio ya Script na washiriki', 'sq': 'MCScript2. 0: A Machine Comprehension Corpus Focused on Script Events and Participants', 'hy': 'MCSScrt2: 0. Մեքենայի ընկալումների կորպոս, որը կենտրոնացված է գրական իրադարձությունների և մասնակիցների վրա', 'az': 'MCScript2. 0: Skript olaraqları və iştirakçıların üzərində Fokus edilən Makine Comprehension Corpus', 'am': 'MCScript2 0: የመስኮት አካላፊያ ቆሮፕስ በጽሑፍ ሁኔታ እና ተጋሪዎች ላይ', 'bn': 'MCScript2. 0: স্ক্রিপ্ট অনুষ্ঠান এবং অংশগ্রহণকারীদের উপর একটি মেশিন সম্পূর্ণ কর্পুস ফোকাস করা হয়েছে', 'cs': 'MCScript2. 0: Strojový porozumělecký korpus zaměřený na scénářské události a účastníky', 'ca': 'MCScript2. 0: A Machine Comprehension Corpus Focused on Script Events and Participants', 'bs': 'MCScript2. 0: Mašinska kompresija korpusa fokusirana na scenarijske događaje i učesnike', 'et': 'MCScript2. 0: Machine Comprehension Corpus keskendub skripti sündmustele ja osalejatele', 'fi': 'MCScript2. 0: Koneymm├Ąrryskorpus, joka keskittyy k├Ąsikirjoitustapahtumiin ja osallistujiin', 'sk': 'MCScript2. 0: Strojno razumevanje Corpus, osredotočen na scenarijske dogodke in udeležence', 'ha': 'MC cript2. 0: KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'MCScript2. 0: גופוס להבין מכונת שמוקד באירועים ותסריטים', 'jv': 'M 0', 'bo': 'MCScript2 0:A Machine Comprehension Corpus Focused on Script Events and Participants'}
{'en': 'We introduce MCScript2.0, a machine comprehension corpus for the end-to-end evaluation of script knowledge. MCScript2.0 contains approx. 20,000 questions on approx. 3,500 texts, crowdsourced based on a new collection process that results in challenging questions. Half of the questions can not be answered from the reading texts, but require the use of commonsense and, in particular, script knowledge. We give a thorough analysis of our corpus and show that while the task is not challenging to humans, existing machine comprehension models fail to perform well on the data, even if they make use of a commonsense knowledge base. The dataset is available at http://www.sfb1102. uni-saarland.de/?page_id=2582', 'ar': 'نقدم MCScript2.0 ، مجموعة فهم الآلة للتقييم الشامل لمعرفة البرنامج النصي. يحتوي MCScript2.0 على ما يقرب من. 20000 سؤال تقريبًا. 3500 نص ، تم التعهيد الجماعي بناءً على عملية تجميع جديدة تؤدي إلى أسئلة صعبة. لا يمكن الإجابة على نصف الأسئلة من نصوص القراءة ، ولكنها تتطلب استخدام المنطق ، وعلى وجه الخصوص ، معرفة النص. نعطي تحليلاً شاملاً لمجموعتنا ونبين أنه على الرغم من أن المهمة لا تمثل تحديًا للبشر ، إلا أن نماذج فهم الآلة الحالية تفشل في الأداء بشكل جيد على البيانات ، حتى لو استخدمت قاعدة معرفية منطقية. مجموعة البيانات متاحة على الموقع http: //www.sfb1102. uni-saarland.de/؟page_id=2582', 'fr': "Nous présentons McScript2.0, un corpus de compréhension automatique pour l'évaluation de bout en bout de la connaissance des scripts. McScript2.0 contient environ 20 000 questions sur environ 3 500 textes, issus du crowdsourcing basé sur un nouveau processus de collecte qui entraîne des questions difficiles. La moitié des questions ne peuvent pas trouver de réponse à partir des textes lus, mais nécessitent le bon sens et, en particulier, la connaissance du script. Nous effectuons une analyse approfondie de notre corpus et montrons que même si la tâche n'est pas difficile pour les humains, les modèles de compréhension automatique existants ne fonctionnent pas bien sur les données, même s'ils utilisent une base de connaissances de bon sens. L'ensemble de données est disponible à l'adresse http://www.sfb1102. uni-saarland.de/\xa0? page_id=2582", 'es': 'Presentamos McScript2.0, un corpus de comprensión de máquinas para la evaluación integral del conocimiento del guion. McScript2.0 contiene aproximadamente 20 000 preguntas en aproximadamente 3 500 textos, de colaboración colectiva basada en un nuevo proceso de recopilación que da lugar a preguntas desafiantes. La mitad de las preguntas no se pueden responder a partir de los textos de lectura, pero requieren el uso del sentido común y, en particular, del conocimiento del guion. Hacemos un análisis exhaustivo de nuestro corpus y demostramos que, si bien la tarea no es un desafío para los humanos, los modelos de comprensión de máquinas existentes no funcionan bien en los datos, incluso si utilizan una base de conocimientos de sentido común. El conjunto de datos está disponible en http://www.sfb1102. uni-saarland.de/? page_id=2582', 'pt': 'Apresentamos o MCScript2.0, um corpus de compreensão de máquina para a avaliação de ponta a ponta do conhecimento de script. MCScript2.0 contém aprox. 20.000 perguntas em aprox. 3.500 textos, crowdsourced com base em um novo processo de coleta que resulta em perguntas desafiadoras. Metade das perguntas não podem ser respondidas a partir dos textos de leitura, mas requerem o uso do senso comum e, em particular, o conhecimento do roteiro. Damos uma análise completa do nosso corpus e mostramos que, embora a tarefa não seja desafiadora para os humanos, os modelos de compreensão de máquina existentes não funcionam bem nos dados, mesmo que façam uso de uma base de conhecimento de senso comum. O conjunto de dados está disponível em http://www.sfb1102. uni-saarland.de/?page_id=2582', 'ja': 'スクリプト知識のエンドツーエンド評価のための機械理解コーパスであるMCScript2.0をご紹介します。MCScript2.0には、約3,500のテキストに関する約20,000の質問が含まれており、新しい収集プロセスに基づいてクラウドソーシングされ、困難な質問になります。質問の半分はテキストを読むことからは答えられないが、常識的な知識、特にスクリプトの知識を使用する必要がある。私たちはコーパスの徹底的な分析を行い、タスクが人間にとって難しいものではないが、既存の機械理解モデルは、常識的な知識ベースを利用しても、データに対して良好なパフォーマンスを発揮できないことを示しています。データセットはhttp://www.sfb1102.uni-saarland.de/?page_id=2582から入手できます。', 'zh': '引入 MCScript2.0,所以端到脚本机器解语料库也。 MCScript2.0 含大约 3,500 篇本约 20,000 一事,本于新集众包,而有挑战性焉。 半问不能对,但须用常识,特脚本知识。 吾于吾语料库尽之,明虽于人非有挑战性也,而今机器知形于数,虽用之常识性知识库。 数据集于 http://www.sfb1102。 uni-saarland.de/?page_id=2582', 'hi': 'हम MCScript2.0, स्क्रिप्ट ज्ञान के अंत-से-अंत मूल्यांकन के लिए एक मशीन समझ कॉर्पस पेश करते हैं। MCScript2.0 में लगभग 3,500 ग्रंथों पर लगभग 20,000 प्रश्न शामिल हैं, जो एक नई संग्रह प्रक्रिया के आधार पर क्राउडसोर्स किए गए हैं जिसके परिणामस्वरूप चुनौतीपूर्ण प्रश्न होते हैं। आधे प्रश्नों का उत्तर पढ़ने वाले ग्रंथों से नहीं दिया जा सकता है, लेकिन सामान्य ज्ञान और विशेष रूप से, स्क्रिप्ट ज्ञान के उपयोग की आवश्यकता होती है। हम अपने कॉर्पस का पूरी तरह से विश्लेषण करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि जबकि कार्य मनुष्यों के लिए चुनौतीपूर्ण नहीं है, मौजूदा मशीन समझ मॉडल डेटा पर अच्छा प्रदर्शन करने में विफल रहते हैं, भले ही वे कॉमनसेंस नॉलेज बेस का उपयोग करें। डेटासेट http://www.sfb1102 पर उपलब्ध है। uni-saarland.de/?page_id=2582', 'ru': 'Мы представляем MCScript2.0, корпус машинного понимания для сквозной оценки знаний о скриптах. MCScript2.0 содержит около 20 000 вопросов по примерно 3500 текстам, краудсорсинг на основе нового процесса сбора, который приводит к сложным вопросам. Половина вопросов не может быть ответом на тексты для чтения, но требует использования здравого смысла и, в частности, знаний о сценариях. Мы даем тщательный анализ нашего корпуса и показываем, что, хотя задача не является сложной для человека, существующие модели машинного понимания не могут хорошо работать с данными, даже если они используют базу знаний здравого смысла. С набором данных можно ознакомиться по адресу http://www.sfb1102. uni-saarland.de/?page_id=2582', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach MCScript2.0, corpas tuisceana meaisín le haghaidh measúnú ceann go ceann ar eolas scripte. Tá timpeall ar MCScript2.0. 20,000 ceist ar thart. 3,500 téacs, sluafhoinsithe bunaithe ar phróiseas bailiúcháin nua as a dtagann ceisteanna dúshlánacha. Ní féidir leath de na ceisteanna a fhreagairt ó na téacsanna léitheoireachta, ach teastaíonn úsáid tuiscint choiteann agus, go háirithe, eolas scripte. Déanaimid mionanailís ar ár gcorpas agus léirímid, cé nach bhfuil an tasc dúshlánach do dhaoine, nach n-éiríonn go maith leis na múnlaí tuisceana atá ann cheana féin ar na sonraí, fiú má úsáideann siad bonn eolais ciallmhar. Tá an tacar sonraí ar fáil ag http://www.sfb1102. uni-saarland.de/?page_id=2582', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მოვიყენებთ MCScript2. 0, სკრიპტის უცნობის კოპუსის მაქსინური გაგრძელება. MCScript2. 0 იყენებს დამატებით 20 000 კითხვები. 3 500 ტექსტი, დამატებით ახალი კოლექციის პროცესი დაბავშირებული, რომელიც შემდეგ შესაძლებელი კითხვების შესახებ. კითხვების ნახევალი არ შეიძლება წერილის ტექსტიდან გაუპასუხოთ, მაგრამ უნდა გამოყენების გამოყენება და განსაკუთრებით სკრიპტის მეცნიერება. ჩვენ ჩვენი კორპუსის ძალიან ანალიზია და ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ საქმე ადამიანებისთვის არ შესაძლებელია, მსოფლიო მაქსინური განსხვავების მოდელები არ შეუძლებელია მონაცემებზე კარგი გავაკეთება, თუ მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია http://www.sfb1102. ვეთნ-ჟაპლანე. ევ/? page_id=2582', 'el': 'Σας παρουσιάζουμε το MCScript2. 0, ένα σώμα κατανόησης μηχανών για την ολοκληρωμένη αξιολόγηση της γνώσης του σεναρίου. MCScript2. Το 0 περιέχει περίπου 20.000 ερωτήσεις για περίπου 3.500 κείμενα, βασισμένα σε μια νέα διαδικασία συλλογής που οδηγεί σε δύσκολες ερωτήσεις. Οι μισές από τις ερωτήσεις δεν μπορούν να απαντηθούν από τα κείμενα ανάγνωσης, αλλά απαιτούν τη χρήση κοινής λογικής και, ειδικότερα, της γνώσης των σεναρίων. Δίνουμε μια εμπεριστατωμένη ανάλυση του σώματος μας και αποδεικνύουμε ότι ενώ η εργασία δεν είναι πρόκληση για τους ανθρώπους, τα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα κατανόησης μηχανών δεν αποδίδουν καλά στα δεδομένα, ακόμα και αν χρησιμοποιούν μια βάση γνώσης κοινής λογικής. Το σύνολο δεδομένων διατίθεται στη διεύθυνση http://www.sfb1102. Uni-saarland. de/; page_id=2582', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk az MCScript2-t. 0, egy gépi megértési korpusz a szkripttudás end-to-end értékelésére. MCScript2. A 0 körülbelül 20 000 kérdést tartalmaz kb. 3500 szövegről, amelyeket egy új gyűjtési folyamat alapján gyűjtöttek össze, amely kihívást jelentő kérdéseket eredményez. A kérdések felét az olvasási szövegekből nem lehet megválaszolni, hanem a közértelmet és különösen a forgatókönyv ismeretét igényli. Alapos elemzést végzünk korpuszunkról, és megmutatjuk, hogy bár a feladat nem jelent kihívást az emberek számára, a meglévő gépi megértési modellek nem teljesítenek jól az adatokon, még akkor sem, ha egy közértelmű tudásbázist használnak. Az adatkészlet a következő címen érhető el: http://www.sfb1102. Uni-saarland. de/? page_id=2582', 'it': "Introducemo MCScript2. 0, un corpus di comprensione automatica per la valutazione end-to-end della conoscenza dello script. MCScript2. 0 contiene circa 20.000 domande su circa 3.500 testi, crowdsourcing sulla base di un nuovo processo di raccolta che si traduce in domande impegnative. Metà delle domande non può essere data risposta dai testi di lettura, ma richiedono l'uso del senso comune e, in particolare, della conoscenza della sceneggiatura. Diamo un'analisi approfondita del nostro corpo e mostriamo che mentre il compito non è impegnativo per gli esseri umani, i modelli di comprensione macchina esistenti non riescono a funzionare bene sui dati, anche se fanno uso di una base di conoscenze di buon senso. Il set di dati è disponibile all'indirizzo http://www.sfb1102. Uni-saarland. de/? page_id=2582", 'lt': 'Pateikiame MCScript2. 0 – mašinos supratimo korpusas, skirtas skripto žinių vertinimui nuo pabaigos. MCScript2. 0 apima apie 20 000 klausimų apie apie 3 500 tekstų, gautų iš visuomenės, remiantis nauju rinkimo procesu, dėl kurio kyla sudėtingų klausimų. Pusės klausimų negalima atsakyti iš skaitomųjų tekstų, bet reikalaujama naudoti bendrą supratimą ir visų pirma rašytines žinias. Atliekame išsamią mūsų korpuso analizę ir parodome, kad nors užduotis nėra sunki žmonėms, esami mašinų supratimo modeliai nepavyksta gerai atlikti duomenų, net jei jie naudojasi bendra žinių baze. Duomenų rinkinys pateikiamas http://www.sfb1102.  uni-saarland. De/? page_id=2582', 'kk': 'Біз MCScript2 дегенді таңдаймыз. 0, скрипттің аяқтау- аяқтау мәліметін бағалау үшін машинаны түсіну корпус. MCScript2. 0 дегенде около 20 000 сұрақ бар. 3 500 мәтін, жаңа жинақтау процесіне негізделген жаңа сұрақтарды көмектеседі. Сұрақтардың жарты оқу мәтіндерінен жауап беруге болмайды, бірақ көпшілік сезімдерді және осымен қатар скрипттің білімін қолдану керек. Біз корпусомызды тұрақты анализ беріп, тапсырма адамдарға көмектеспеген болғанда, барлық машинаның түсініктеме үлгілері деректерді жақсы жасауға болмайды, егер олар көпшілікті білім негізінде қолданса да Деректер жиыны бар http://www.sfb1102. uni-saarland. de/? page_ id=2582', 'mk': 'Ќе го претставиме MCScript2. 0, корпус за машинско разбирање за проценка од крај до крај на знаење на сценариото. MCScript2. 0 содржи околу 20.000 прашања за околу 3.500 тексти, кои се наоfаат на популарни извори врз основа на новиот процес на колекција кој резултира со предизвикувачки прашања. Половина од прашањата не можат да се одговори од текстовите за читање, туку бараат употреба на заедничко и, особено, знаење на сценариото. Ние даваме темелна анализа на нашиот корпус и покажуваме дека иако задачата не е предизвикувачка за луѓето, постоечките машински модели на разбирање не успеваат да извршат добро на податоците, дури и ако користат заедничка база на знаење. Податоците се достапни на http://www.sfb1102.  uni-saarland. Да? page_id=2582', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan MCScript2. 0, corpus pemahaman mesin untuk penilaian akhir-akhir pengetahuan skrip. MCScript2. 0 mengandungi kira-kira 20,000 soalan pada kira-kira 3,500 teks, sumber ramai berdasarkan proses koleksi baru yang mengakibatkan soalan yang mencabar. Setengah soalan tidak dapat dijawab dari teks pembacaan, tetapi memerlukan penggunaan pengetahuan umum dan, terutama, skrip. Kami memberikan analisis teliti dari korpus kami dan menunjukkan bahawa walaupun tugas ini tidak menantang kepada manusia, model pemahaman mesin yang wujud gagal melakukan dengan baik pada data, walaupun mereka menggunakan pangkalan pengetahuan yang umum. Set data tersedia di http://www.sfb1102. - uni-saarland. de/? page_id=2582', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d MCScript2 പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. 0, സ്ക്രിപ്റ്റിന്റെ അറിവ് അവസാനിക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു യന്ത്രം കോര്\u200dപ്പസ് പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. MCScript2. ഏകദേശം 3,500 ടെക്സ്റ്റുകള്\u200d, പുതിയ സംഘത്തിന്റെ പ്രക്രിയയെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ചോദ്യം വരുത്തുന വായിക്കുന്ന പദാവലികളില്\u200d നിന്നും പാതി ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകാന്\u200d സാധിക്കില്ല, പക്ഷെ കമോണ്\u200dസണ്\u200dസെന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറ We give a thorough analysis of our corpus and show that while the task is not challenging to humans, existing machine comprehension models fail to perform well on the data, even if they make use of a commonsense knowledge base.  ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് ലഭ്യമല്ല http://www.sfb1102. യൂണി-ഗര്\u200dലാന്\u200dഡ്. de/? page_ id=2582', 'mt': 'Aħna nintroduċu l-MCScript2. 0, korpus ta’ komprensjoni tal-magna għall-evalwazzjoni minn tarf sa tarf tal-għarfien tal-iskripti. MCScript2. 0 fih madwar 20,000 mistoqsija dwar madwar 3,500 test, crowdsourced abbażi ta’ proċess ġdid ta’ ġbir li jirriżulta f’mistoqsijiet ta’ sfida. Nofs il-mistoqsijiet ma jistgħux jitwieġbu mit-testi tal-qari, iżda jeħtieġu l-użu ta’ għarfien komuni u, b’mod partikolari, tal-kitba. Aħna nagħtu analiżi bir-reqqa tal-korpus tagħna u nuru li filwaqt li l-kompitu mhuwiex ta’ sfida għall-bnedmin, mudelli eżistenti ta’ komprensjoni tal-magni jonqsu milli jwettqu tajjeb fuq id-dejta, anki jekk jagħmlu użu minn bażi ta’ għarfien komuni. Is-sett tad-dejta huwa disponibbli fuq http://www.sfb1102. • uni-saarland. de/? page_id=2582', 'mn': 'Бид MCScript2-г танилцуулж байна. 0, бичлэгийн мэдлэгийг төгсгөл дуусахын тулд машин ойлгох корпус. MCScript2. 0 нь ойролцоогоор 20 мянган асуулт байдаг. 3.500 текст, олон нийтэд шинэ цуглуулах процесс дээр зориулан асуулт шаардлагатай болно. Үүний хагас нь унших бичгийнхээс хариулж чадахгүй, гэхдээ ерөнхий ойлголт хэрэглэх хэрэгтэй, ялангуяа бичгийн мэдлэг хэрэглэх хэрэгтэй. Бид өөрсдийн корпус-ын үндсэн шинжилгээ өгч, ажил хүмүүст зорилготой байхгүй байхдаа оршиж буй машин ойлголтын загварууд өгөгдлийн талаар сайн ажиллаж чаддаггүй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Өгөгдлийн хэлбэр http://www.sfb1102. Нэг-саарланд. /? хуудас_id=2582', 'no': 'Vi introduserer MCScript2. 0, ein maskin med forståelse av korpus for evalueringa av skriptkunnskap til slutt til slutt. MCScript2. 0 inneheld omtrent 20 000 spørsmål på omtrent. 3 500 tekstar, som er tilfeldig basert på eit nytt samlingsprosess som resulterer i vanskeleg spørsmål. Halvparten av spørsmålene kan ikkje svarast frå lesingstekstane, men krev bruk av vanleg mening og spesielt skriptkunnskap. Vi gir ein grunnleggjande analyse av korpusen vårt og viser at mens oppgåva ikkje er vanskeleg for menneske, kan det ikkje utføra noko godt på dataene, selv om dei brukar ein vanskeleg kunnskapsbasen. Datasettet er tilgjengeleg på http://www.sfb1102. uni-saarland. de/? page_id=2582', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy MCScript2. 0, korpus zrozumienia maszyny do kompleksowej oceny wiedzy o skryptach. MCScript2. 0 zawiera ok. 20.000 pytania dotyczące ok. 3.500 tekstów, crowdsourcing oparty na nowym procesie zbierania, który skutkuje trudnymi pytaniami. Na połowę pytań nie można odpowiedzieć z tekstów czytania, ale wymagają zastosowania zdrowego rozsądku, a w szczególności znajomości scenariusza. Dokonujemy dokładnej analizy naszego korpusu i pokazujemy, że choć zadanie to nie jest wyzwaniem dla człowieka, istniejące modele rozumienia maszyn nie sprawdzają się dobrze na danych, nawet jeśli wykorzystują zdrową bazę wiedzy. Zestaw danych dostępny jest na stronie internetowej http://www.sfb1102. Uni-saarland. de/? page_id=2582', 'ro': 'Introducem MCScript2. 0, un corpus de înțelegere a mașinii pentru evaluarea end-to-end a cunoștințelor de script. MCScript2. 0 conține aproximativ 20.000 de întrebări pe aproximativ 3.500 de texte, crowdsourcing bazat pe un nou proces de colectare care duce la întrebări dificile. Jumătate din întrebări nu pot fi răspunse din textele citite, ci necesită folosirea bunului sens și, în special, cunoștințe de scenariu. Facem o analiză amănunțită a corpului nostru și arătăm că, deși sarcina nu este provocatoare pentru oameni, modelele existente de înțelegere a mașinilor nu reușesc să funcționeze bine pe date, chiar dacă utilizează o bază de cunoștințe de bun simț. Setul de date este disponibil la adresa http://www.sfb1102. Uni-saarland. de/? page_id=2582', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo MCScript2. 0, mašina razumijevanja korpusa za procjenu znanja skripta do kraja. MCScript2. 0 sadrži oko 20.000 pitanja na približno 3.500 teksta, crowdsourced na temelju novog procesa kolekcije koji rezultira izazovnim pitanjima. Pola pitanja se ne može odgovoriti iz tekstova èitanja, ali zahteva upotrebu uobièajenog smisla i posebno znanja skripta. Daćemo temeljnu analizu našeg korpusa i pokažemo da, dok zadatak nije izazovan ljudima, postojeći modeli razumevanja mašine ne uspevaju dobro izvršiti podatke, čak i ako koriste bazu znanja zajedničkog smisla. Podaci su dostupni na http://www.sfb1102. Uni-Sarland. Da? page_id=2582', 'si': 'අපි MCScript 2 වෙනුවෙන්. 0, ස්ක්\u200dරිප්ට් දන්නවගේ අන්තිම අවශ්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණයක් තියෙන්නේ යන්ත්\u200dරයක්. MCScript 2. 0 සම්බන්ධයි. ප්\u200dරශ්න 20,000 ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධයි. පැත්ත 3,500 ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධයි, අළුත් සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න බාගයක් පැත්තක් කියවන්න පැත්තක් වලින් උත්තර දෙන්න බෑ, ඒත් සාමාන්\u200dය භාවිතාවය සහ, විශේෂයෙ අපි අපේ කෝර්පස් ගැන හොඳ විශ්ලේෂණයක් දෙන්නේ ඒ වගේම මිනිස්සුන්ට වැඩ කරන්නේ නැති වෙලාවක් පෙන්වන්නේ, තියෙන්න තියෙන්නේ පරික්ෂණයේ ම දත්ත සෙට් ප්\u200dරවේශයක් තියෙනවා http://www.sfb1102. uni-saarland. ඩි/? page_id=2582', 'so': "Waxaannu soo sheegaynaa MCScript2. 0, baaritaanka aasaasiga mashiinka ee ugu dambaysta qiimeynta aqoonta qoraalka. MCScript2. 0 waxaa ku yaala qiyaastii 20,000 su'aalo ku saabsan qiyaastii 3,500 qoraal, taas oo lagu soo bandhigay koorasyo cusub oo ka soo jeeda su'aalo dhibaataysan. Isuullada badhkiis looma jawaabi karo qoraalka akhriska, laakiin waxaad u baahan tahay isticmaalka shirkadda iyo si gaar ah aqoonta qoraalka. Anagaa sameynaya baaritaankeenna si fudud ah, waxaana muujinaynaa in goortii shaqadu uusan dadka dhibaato la’aan ahayn, modellada hoos-dhigista mashiinka ee jiraana ma baaqan karto inay si fiican u sameyn karto macluumaadka, xitaa haddii ay isticmaalaan aasaaska aqoonta shirkadeed. Lacagta macluumaadka waxaad ka heleysaa http://www.sfb1102. - Yuun-saarland. de/? page_id=2582", 'ta': 'நாம் MCScript2 அறிவிக்கிறோம். 0, சிறுநிரல் அறிவின் முடிவிற்கு ஒரு இயந்திர சூழ்நிலை குறியீடு. MCScript2. 0 க்கு approximately 20,000 கேள்விகள் உள்ளன. 3,500 உரைகள், புதிய தொகுப்பு செயல்பாட்டின் அடிப்படையில் கேள்விகளை சவாலிக்கும் பொருட் பாதி கேள்விகள் படிக்கும் உரைகளிலிருந்து பதில் அளிக்க முடியாது, ஆனால் தொழில்நுட்பம் பயன்படுத்த வேண்டும் குறிப நாம் எங்கள் குறியீட்டின் முழுமையான ஆய்வு கொடுக்கிறோம் மற்றும் காட்டுகிறோம் என்றால் இந்த செயல் மனிதர்களுக்கு சவால் இல்லை என்றால், இருக்கும தகவல் அமைப்பு கிடைக்கும் http://www.sfb1102. - யூனி-saarland. de/? பக்கம் id=2582', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar MCScript2. 0, en maskinförståelse korpus för end-to-end utvärdering av manuskunskap. MCScript2. 0 innehåller ca 20 000 frågor om ca 3 500 texter, crowdsourcerade utifrån en ny insamlingsprocess som resulterar i utmanande frågor. Hälften av frågorna kan inte besvaras från lästexterna, utan kräver användning av allmänst och i synnerhet manuskunskap. Vi ger en grundlig analys av vår korpus och visar att även om uppgiften inte är utmanande för människor, misslyckas existerande maskinförståelsemodeller med att prestera bra på data, även om de använder sig av en allmännyttig kunskapsbas. Datauppsättningen finns tillgänglig på http://www.sfb1102. uni-saarland. de/? page_ id=2582', 'ur': 'ہم MCScript2 کو معرفی کرتے ہیں. 0، ایک ماشین سمجھنے کی کورپوس اسکریپٹ علم کے آخر کی ارزیابی کے لئے۔ MCScript2. 0 میں تقریباً 20,000 سوال ہیں، تقریباً 3,500 ٹیکسٹ، ایک نئی کلکس پرسس پر بنیاد لگا ہوا ہے جو مشکل سوال کے نتیجے میں ہے. آدھا سوال پڑھنے کے متن سے جواب نہیں دیا جاتا، لیکن عام سمجھ کے استعمال کی ضرورت ہے اور مخصوصاً اسکریپٹ علم کی استعمال کی ضرورت ہے. ہم نے اپنے کورپوس کی عمدہ تحلیل دیتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ جب تک کام انسانوں کے لئے مشکل نہیں ہے، موجود ماشین کی سمجھ کی نمونے ڈاٹوں پر اچھی طرح کام نہیں کرسکتے، اگرچہ وہ ایک معمولی علم بنسس سے استعمال کریں۔ ڈاٹا سٹ موجود ہے http://www.sfb1102. uni-saarland. de/? page_id=2582', 'uz': "Biz MCScript2 bilan ishlatimiz. Name MCScript2. 0'da approximately 20,000 savollar mavjud. 3,500 matnlar, yangi toʻplam jarayonlari asosida, muammolar sabab beradi. @ info: whatsthis Biz kompyuterimizni juda muhimiy analyzerizni ko'rsamiz va vazifa insonlarni qanday qilmaydi, mavjud mashina kompyuterning modellari maʼlumotlarni bajarib boʻlmaydi, agar ular faqat ta'rif bazasini ishlatish mumkin. Maʼlumot bazasi mavjud http://www.sfb1102. Uni-saarland. de /? page_ id=2582", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu MCScrivia. 0, một tập đoàn thấu hiểu máy cho kết thúc đánh giá kiến thức văn bản. Đóng. 0 chứa các câu hỏi về phương pháp. 3,500, bài kiểm tra dựa trên một tiến trình tập hợp mới dẫn đến những câu hỏi đầy thử thách. Một nửa các câu hỏi không thể trả lời từ các văn bản đọc, nhưng yêu cầu phải sử dụng lẽ thường và, đặc biệt, kiến thức văn bản. Chúng tôi phân tích đầy đủ tập đoàn của chúng tôi và cho thấy rằng, mặc dù nhiệm vụ không phải thử thách đối với con người, nhưng các mô hình hiểu biết trên máy đã có vẫn không làm tốt với dữ liệu, cho dù họ có sử dụng một căn cứ kiến thức thông thường. Bộ dữ liệu có sẵn ở http://www.sfb1102. Không. Khỏe không? trang u id=2582', 'bg': 'Представяме MCScript2. 0, корпус за машинно разбиране за цялостна оценка на знанието за скрипта. MCScript2. 0 съдържа приблизително 20 000 въпроса на приблизително 3500 текста, събрани въз основа на нов процес на събиране, който води до предизвикателни въпроси. Половината от въпросите не могат да бъдат отговорени от четените текстове, но изискват използването на разум и по-специално знание за сценарии. Правим задълбочен анализ на нашия корпус и показваме, че макар задачата да не е предизвикателство за хората, съществуващите модели на машинно разбиране не успяват да се справят добре с данните, дори ако използват обща база от знания. Наборът от данни е достъпен на адрес: http://www.sfb1102. Уни-саарланд. Де/? page_ id=2582', 'da': 'Vi introducerer MCScript2. 0, en maskinforståelse korpus til end-to-end evaluering af script viden. MCScript2. 0 indeholder ca. 20.000 spørgsmål om ca. 3.500 tekster, crowdsourcing baseret på en ny indsamlingsproces, der resulterer i udfordrende spørgsmål. Halvdelen af spørgsmålene kan ikke besvares fra læseteksterne, men kræver brug af almindelig fornuft og især manuskriptviden. Vi giver en grundig analyse af vores korpus og viser, at selvom opgaven ikke er udfordrende for mennesker, fungerer eksisterende maskinforståelsesmodeller ikke godt på dataene, selv om de gør brug af en almindelig vidensbase. Datasættet er tilgængeligt på http://www.sfb1102. uni-saarland. de/? page_ id=2582', 'nl': 'We introduceren MCScript2. 0, een machinebegripscorpus voor de end-to-end evaluatie van scriptkennis. MCScript2. 0 bevat ca. 20.000 vragen over ca. 3.500 teksten, crowdsourcing gebaseerd op een nieuw verzamelproces dat resulteert in uitdagende vragen. De helft van de vragen kan niet worden beantwoord uit de leesteksten, maar vereist het gebruik van gezond verstand en met name scriptkennis. We geven een grondige analyse van ons corpus en laten zien dat, hoewel de taak voor de mens niet uitdagend is, bestaande machinebegripsmodellen niet goed presteren op de data, zelfs als ze gebruik maken van een gezonde kennisbasis. De dataset is beschikbaar op: http://www.sfb1102. Uni-saarland. de/? pagina_id=2582', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo MCScript2. 0, stroj razumijevanja korpusa za procjenu znanja skripta do kraja. MCScript2. 0 sadrži oko 20.000 pitanja na približno 3.500 teksta, crowdsourced na temelju novog procesa kolekcije koji rezultira izazovnim pitanjima. Polovinu pitanja se ne može odgovoriti iz tekstova čitanja, ali zahtijevaju upotrebu običnog smisla i posebno znanja skripta. Dati ćemo temeljnu analizu našeg korpusa i pokazati da, dok zadatak nije izazovan ljudima, postojeći modeli razumijevanja strojeva ne ispunjavaju dobro podatke, čak i ako koriste bazu znanja zajedničkog smisla. Podaci su dostupni na http://www.sfb1102. Uni-saarland. Da? page_id=2582', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan MCScript2. 0, sebuah korpus pemahaman mesin untuk evaluasi dari akhir ke akhir pengetahuan skrip. MCScript2. 0 mengandung sekitar 20.000 pertanyaan pada sekitar 3.500 teks, crowdsourced berdasarkan proses koleksi baru yang menyebabkan pertanyaan yang menantang. Setengah pertanyaan tidak dapat dijawab dari teks pembacaan, tetapi memerlukan penggunaan umum dan, terutama, pengetahuan skrip. Kami memberikan analisis teliti dari tubuh kami dan menunjukkan bahwa meskipun tugas ini tidak menantang bagi manusia, model pemahaman mesin yang ada gagal melakukan dengan baik pada data, bahkan jika mereka menggunakan dasar pengetahuan umum. Set data tersedia di http://www.sfb1102. - uni-saarland. de/? page_id=2582', 'ko': 'MCScript2에 대해 살펴보겠습니다.0, 스크립트 지식을 끝까지 평가하는 기계 이해 자료 라이브러리.MCScript2。0 약 3500개의 텍스트 중 약 20000개의 문제를 포함하고 새로운 수집 과정의 하청을 바탕으로 도전적인 문제가 발생한다.절반의 문제는 텍스트를 읽는 것에서 답을 얻을 수 없지만 상식, 특히 각본 지식을 활용해야 한다.우리는 우리의 어료 라이브러리에 대해 철저한 분석을 실시한 결과 이 임무가 인류에게 도전적이지 않음에도 불구하고 기존의 기계 이해 모델은 데이터를 잘 처리하지 못한다. 설령 그들이 상식지식 라이브러리를 사용했다 하더라도.이 데이터 세트는http://www.sfb1102.사르 대학교.de/？페이지 번호 id=2582', 'de': 'Wir stellen MCScript2 vor. 0, ein maschinelles Verständniskorpus zur durchgängigen Auswertung von Skriptwissen. MCScript2. 0 enthält ca. 20.000 Fragen zu ca. 3.500 Texten, Crowdsourcing basierend auf einem neuen Sammelprozess, der zu herausfordernden Fragen führt. Die Hälfte der Fragen lässt sich nicht aus den Lesetexten beantworten, sondern erfordert den Einsatz von gesundem Menschenverstand und insbesondere Skriptwissen. Wir führen eine gründliche Analyse unseres Korpuss durch und zeigen, dass die Aufgabe für den Menschen zwar nicht herausfordernd ist, vorhandene maschinelle Verständnismodelle jedoch nicht gut auf den Daten funktionieren, auch wenn sie auf eine vernünftige Wissensbasis zurückgreifen. Der Datensatz ist verfügbar unter http://www.sfb1102. Uni-saarland. de/? page_id=2582', 'fa': 'ما MCScript2 را معرفی می کنیم. 0، یک دستگاه درک کورپوس برای ارزیابی دانش نوشته\u200cها. MCScript2. ۰ شامل حدود ۲۰۰۰ سؤال بر تقریباً ۳۵۰۰ متن است که بر اساس یک فرایند مجموعه جدید به نتیجه سؤال سختی می\u200cرسد. نیمی از سوالات از متن خواندن جواب نمی\u200cدهند، ولی از استفاده از معنی معمولی و مخصوصا از دانش نوشته نیاز دارند. ما یک تحلیل کامل از کورپوس خود را می دهیم و نشان می دهیم که در حالی که این کار برای انسان مشکل نیست، مدل فهمیدن ماشین موجود در اطلاعات خیلی خوب انجام نمی دهد، حتی اگر از یک پایگاه دانش معمولی استفاده کنند. مجموعه داده\u200cها در http://www.sfb1102. يه سايرلند دوم؟ page_id=2582', 'af': "Ons introduiseer MCScript2. 0, 'n masjien verstaan korpus vir die einde- na- einde evaluering van skrip kennis. MCScript2. 0 bevat omtrent 20,000 vrae op omtrent. 3,500 teks, gemeenskappe gebaseer op 'n nuwe versameling proses wat resultaat in redelike vrae. Halwe van die vrae kan nie van die leestekste antwoord word nie, maar benodig die gebruik van gemeenskap en, in besonderhede, skrip kennis. Ons gee 'n ondersteunde analisie van ons korpus en wys dat terwyl die taak nie met mense verdraai is nie, bestaande masjien verstaan modele misluk om goed te doen op die data, selfs as hulle gebruik van 'n gemeenskaplike kennis basis. Die datastel is beskikbaar by http://www.sfb1102. Uni-saarland. de/? page_id=2582", 'sw': 'Tunatambulisha MCScript2. 0, chombo cha kompyuta cha mashine kwa ajili ya uchunguzi wa maarifa ya mwisho wa kitabu. MCScript2. 0 in a maswali takriban 20,000 kuhusiana na ujumbe wa jumbe 3,500, wanaosababishwa na mchakato mpya wa mkusanyiko unaosababisha maswali yanayochanganya. Nusu ya maswali hayawezi kujibu kutoka kwenye maandishi ya kusoma, lakini inahitaji matumizi ya umma na hasa, maarifa ya kuandika. Tunapata uchambuzi wa kina wa viungo vyetu na kuonyesha kwamba wakati kazi haina changamoto kwa binadamu, miundo mbinu ya kompyuta ya mashine hayajashindwa kufanya vizuri kwenye taarifa, hata kama wanatumia msingi wa maarifa ya jumla. seti ya takwimu inapatikana katika http://www.sfb1102.  uni-saarland. de/? page_id=2582', 'tr': "Biz MCScript2-i tanyşdyrýarys. 0, skript bilgini soňunda çykmak üçin maşynyň düşünmesi korpusu. MCScript2. 0'da yaklaşık yaklaşık 20.000 soru var. Soraglaryň ýahatyny okamak metinden jogap berilmez, ýöne orta duýgynyň ullanyşyny gerek bolar we özellikle skript bilgi. Bizim korputumuzun tam bir analizi verip görevimiz insana zor olmadığını gösteriyoruz. Varlık makinelerin anlama modelleri verilerde iyi uygulamaktan başarısız olur. Maglumat setirini şu ýerde bar http://www.sfb1102. Üç-saarland. de/? sahypa=2582", 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë MCScript2. 0, një korpus kompresimi i makinës për vlerësimin nga fundi në fund të njohurive të skriptit. MCScript2. 0 përmban rreth 20,000 pyetje mbi rreth 3,500 tekste, të burimeve publike bazuar në një proces të ri koleksioni që rezulton në pyetje sfiduese. Gjysma e pyetjeve nuk mund të përgjigjet nga tekstet e leximit, por kërkojnë përdorimin e njohurive të zakonshme dhe, në veçanti, të shkrimit. Ne japim një analizë të thellë të trupit tonë dhe tregojmë se ndërsa detyra nuk është sfida për njerëzit, modelet ekzistuese të kuptimit të makinave nuk arrijnë të bëjnë mirë të dhënat, edhe nëse përdorin një bazë njohurie të përbashkët. Set i të dhënave është në dispozicion në http://www.sfb1102. Një-Saarland. De/? page_id=2582', 'am': "MCScript2 እናሳውቃለን። 0, a machine comprehension corpus for the end-to-end evaluation of script knowledge.  MCScript2 0 ውስጥም 20,000 ጥያቄዎች ውስጥ ነው። 3,500 ጽሑፎች፣ የቁጥጥር ጥያቄዎችን በሚያቀናው አዲስ ስብስብ ፕሮጀክት በመሠረት የተመሳሳይ ነው፡፡ የጥያቄዎቹን እኩሌታው ከመነበብ ጽሑፎች ሊመልስ አይችልም፥ ነገር ግን የድጋፍ ጉዳይ እና በተለይም የጽሑፍ እውቀት ያስፈልጋል። የካርፓስነታችንን አስተያየት እናሳያቸዋለን፣ ስራው ከሰዎች ጋር የማይቃወም ሲሆን፣ የአሁኑ መሣሪያዎች አካባቢ ሞዴላዎች በአዳራጆች ላይ ጥሩ ማድረግ አይቻሉም፣ ምንም እንኳ የድጋፍ እውቀት መቀመጫ ቢጠይቁ እንኳ፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s http://www.sfb1102. የዩኒአርላንድ de/? page_id=2582", 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք MCS-2: 0-ը, մեքենայի ընկալումների կորպուսը գրաֆիտի գիտելիքների վերջ-վերջ գնահատման համար: MCSScrt2: 0 contains approx. 20,000 questions on approx. 3,500 texts, crowdsourced based on a new collection process that results in challenging questions.  Հարցերից կեսը չեն կարող պատասխանել կարդալու տեքստներից, այլ պահանջում են ընդհանուր և հատկապես գրական գիտելիքների օգտագործման: Մենք կատարում ենք մեր մարմնի հիմնական վերլուծությունը և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ չնայած խնդիրը մարդկանց համար դժվար չէ, գոյություն ունեցող մեքենային ընկալումների մոդելները չեն կարողանում լավ աշխատել տվյալների վրա, նույնիսկ եթե նրանք օգտագործում են ընդհանուր գիտելիքների հիմ Տվյալների համակարգը հասանելի է http://www.sfb1102. - ունի-սաարլանդ: de ? էջ_ID=2582', 'az': "Biz MCScript2'i tanıdırıq. 0, skriptlər bilgisinin son-son değerlendirməsi üçün maşın anlama korpusu. MCScript2. 0 də yaklaşık 20.000 sual vardır. 3.500 məktub, yeni koleksiyon prosesinə dayandırılmış, çətin sualların sonuçlarına gələn yeni koleksiyon prosesinə dayandırılmış. Soruların yarısını oxuyan mətnlərdən cavab verə bilməz, lakin sıradan anlayış və özlərinə də skriptlər bilgi lazımdır. Biz corpusumuzun tamamilə analizi veririk və göstəririk ki, işləri insanlara çətin olmadığı halda, mevcut maşın anlama modelləri məlumatların üstündə yaxşı işlər görməyə çalışmırlar. Halbuki onlar çox sağlam bilgi üssünü istifadə edirlər. Verici qurğuları faydalanır http://www.sfb1102. Uni-saarland. de/? page_id=2582", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo MCScript2. 0, stroj razumijevanja korpusa za procjenu znanja skripta do kraja. MCScript2. 0 sadrži oko 20.000 pitanja na približno 3.500 teksta, crowdsourced na temelju novog procesa kolekcije koji rezultira izazovnim pitanjima. Pola pitanja se ne može odgovoriti iz tekstova čitanja, ali zahtijevaju upotrebu uobičajenog smisla i posebno znanja skripta. Daćemo temeljnu analizu našeg korpusa i pokažemo da, dok zadatak nije izazovan ljudima, postojeći modeli razumijevanja mašine ne ispunjavaju dobro podatke, čak i ako koriste bazu znanja zajedničkog smisla. Podaci su dostupni na http://www.sfb1102. Uni-saarland. Da? page_id=2582', 'ca': "We introduce MCScript2. 0, un corpus de comprensió de màquina per a l'evaluació final del coneixement de l'escriptura. MCScript2. 0 conté aproximadament 20.000 preguntes sobre aproximadament 3.500 textos, crowdsourced basant-se en un nou procés de col·lecció que provoca preguntes desafiables. La meitat de les preguntes no poden ser respostes a partir dels textos de lectura, sinó requereixen l'ús de coneixements comuns i, en particular, escriptures. Fem una anàlisi detallada del nostre cos i demostrem que, tot i que la tasca no és desafiadora per als humans, els models de comprensió màquina existents no aconsegueixen bé les dades, fins i tot si utilitzen una base de coneixement comú. El conjunt de dades està disponible en http://www.sfb1102. uni-Saarland. de/? page_id=2582", 'cs': 'Představujeme MCScript2. 0, korpus strojového porozumění pro komplexní hodnocení znalostí skriptu. MCScript2. 0 obsahuje cca 20.000 otázky na cca 3.500 texty, crowdsourcing založený na novém sběrném procesu, který vede k náročným otázkám. Polovina otázek nelze zodpovědět z čtení textů, ale vyžaduje použití zdravého rozumu a zejména znalosti písma. Podáváme důkladnou analýzu našeho korpusu a ukazujeme, že i když tento úkol není pro člověka náročný, stávající modely porozumění strojů nefungují na datech dobře, i když využívají zdravé znalostní báze. Soubor dat je k dispozici na adrese http://www.sfb1102. Uni-saarland. de/? page_id=2582', 'bn': 'আমরা MCScript2 পরিচয় করিয়ে দেবো। 0, a machine comprehension corpus for the end-to-end evaluation of script knowledge.  MCScript2. প্রায় ২০,০০০ প্রশ্ন রয়েছে। ৩,৫০০ টেক্সট, নতুন সংগ্রহের প্রক্রিয়ার ভিত্তিতে জনসূত্র, যা প্রশ্নের ফলে চ্যালেঞ্জের কা প্রশ্নের অর্ধেক পাঠের লেখা থেকে উত্তর পাওয়া যাবে না, কিন্তু কমান্সেন্স ব্যবহারের প্রয়োজন এবং বিশেষ করে স্ক্রিপ্টের আমরা আমাদের কোর্পাসের বিশ্লেষণ করি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে যদিও কাজ মানুষের কাছে চ্যালেঞ্জ নেই, তবে বিদ্যমান মেশিন সম্পূর্ণ মডেল তথ্যে ভালো কাজ করতে ব্য ডাটাসেট পাওয়া যাচ্ছে http://www.sfb1102. - ইউনিসার্ল্যান্ড। ডি/? পৃষ্ঠা id=2582', 'et': 'Tutvustame MCScript2. 0, masinase mõistmise korpus skriptiteadmiste täielikuks hindamiseks. MCScript2. 0 sisaldab umbes 20 000 küsimust umbes 3500 teksti kohta, mis on kogutud ühiselt uue kogumisprotsessi alusel, mille tulemuseks on keerulised küsimused. Pooltele küsimustele ei ole võimalik vastata teksti lugemisest, kuid need nõuavad mõistuse ja eelkõige skriptiteadmise kasutamist. Analüüsime põhjalikult oma korpust ja näitame, et kuigi ülesanne ei ole inimestele keeruline, ei suuda olemasolevad masinate mõistmise mudelid andmetega hästi toimida, isegi kui nad kasutavad üldse mõistlikku teadmistebaasi. Andmekogum on kättesaadav aadressil http://www.sfb1102. Unisaarland. de/? page_id=2582', 'fi': 'Esittelemme MCScript2:n. 0, koneymmärryskorpus käsikirjoitusosaamisen kokonaisarviointiin. MCScript2. 0 sisältää noin 20 000 kysymystä noin 3 500 tekstistä, jotka on koottu yhteen uuden keräysprosessin pohjalta, joka johtaa haastaviin kysymyksiin. Puoleen kysymyksistä ei voida vastata lukemalla tekstejä, mutta ne edellyttävät järkevää ja erityisesti käsikirjoitusosaamista. Analysoimme korpustamme perusteellisesti ja osoitamme, että vaikka tehtävä ei ole haastava ihmisille, olemassa olevat koneymmärrysmallit eivät toimi hyvin datan suhteen, vaikka niissä hyödynnettäisiinkin järkevää tietopohjaa. Aineisto on saatavilla osoitteessa http://www.sfb1102. Unisaarland. de/? page_id=2582', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe mbèhke XMpt2. 0, sistem sampeyan mruput nggo Kemerdekaan kanggo Kemerdekaan Winter M 0 mungkin sesuk sabanjur kelas polio kanggo bali, limangatus 3.500 Kowe kalah-kalah sing runggo ora bisa gambaran ning pisan seneng pisan, nguasah njuk sisakaké ngerasakno karo, njuk kesempatan kanggo ngerasakno seneng pisan. Awak dhéwé éné beraksi perusahaan sampeyan karo hal-hal ngono kuwi nganggep petani sing gak nggawe barang wong liyane kuwi nggawe perusahaan, sistem sampeyan perusahaan model sing beraksi yang ora bisa diangkat awak dhéwé, lha ngono kuwi diangkat awak dhéwé beraksi sak ora bis dataset http://www.sfb1102. Uni-saarland. de/? page_id=2', 'ha': "Munã ƙara MC script2. 0, wata umarni na samu'a cikin kwamfyuta don an ƙara zuwa ƙarshen ƙayyade kunyar scripta. MC cript2. 0 yana da taki. Half daga maswali ba za a iya karɓa daga littãfin karatun, kuma amma ana ƙayyade amfani da masu yin amfani da shirin zaman shawara da kuma, hasa'a, da sanin manuscriptu. Munã bãyar da rabon jama'ar kwamfyutan mu da kuma Muke nũna cẽwa, kuma a lokacin da aikin ba ta zama mai zartar da mutum ba, ko da misãlai masu ƙaranci na maɓallin komai ba za'a yi mafiya amfani da danganta, kuma kõ dã sun yi amfani da wani bango na ilmi. An sami tsarin bayani da http://www.sfb1102. Ga ku. de/? QPrintPreviewDialog", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo MCScript2. 0, korpus strojnega razumevanja za celovito vrednotenje znanja scenarija. MCScript2. 0 vsebuje približno 20.000 vprašanj o približno 3.500 besedilih, množično izbranih na podlagi novega postopka zbiranja, ki ima za posledico zahtevna vprašanja. Na polovico vprašanj ni mogoče odgovoriti iz branja besedil, ampak zahteva uporabo dobrega smisla in zlasti znanja scenarija. Podamo temeljito analizo našega korpusa in pokažemo, da čeprav naloga ni zahtevna za ljudi, obstoječi modeli strojnega razumevanja ne uspevajo dobro na podatkih, tudi če uporabljajo splošno razumno bazo znanja. Zbirka podatkov je na voljo na spletni strani: http://www.sfb1102. unisaarland. De/? page_id=2582', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים את MCScript2. 0, קורפוס הבנה מכונת עבור הערכה סוף-סוף של ידע התסריט. MCScript2. 0 מכיל כ-20,000 שאלות על כ-3,500 טקסטים, מקובלים על בסיס תהליך אוסף חדש שמוביל בשאלות מאתגרות. חצי מהשאלות אינן יכולות לענות מהטקסטים הקריאים, אלא דורשים השימוש של ידע משותף, ובמיוחד, תסריט. אנו נותנים ניתוח יסודי של הקורפוס שלנו ולהראות שלמרות שהמשימה אינה מאתגרת לבני אדם, דוגמני הבנה מכונות קיימים לא מצליחים להצליח היטב במידע, אפילו אם הם משתמשים בבסיס ידע משותף. קבוצת הנתונים זמינה ב http://www.sfb1102.  uni-saarland. כן? page_id=2582', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་MCScript2་མངོན་གསལ་བྱེད་པ 0, a machine comprehension corpus for the end-to-end evaluation of script knowledge. MCScript2 0 ཡིས་གཟུགས་འགྲོ་བ་དེ་གཟུགས་འགྲོ་བ་༢༠༠༠་ཙམ་ཡོད། ཡི་གེ་༣༠༠་ཙམ་ཡོད། མ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བསྡུར་ནས་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་ག Half of the questions cannot be answered from the reading text, but require the use of commonsense and, in particular, script knowledge. ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་མཐུད་མིའི་གྲངས་ལས་རྫིག་ཞིབ་འཇུག སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་ཆ་སྤྱོད་ཚར་བ http://www.sfb1102. U-saarland ཡིན། de/? page_id=2582'}
{'en': 'Deconstructing multimodality : visual properties and visual context in human semantic processing', 'ar': 'تفكيك الوسائط المتعددة: الخصائص المرئية والسياق المرئي في المعالجة الدلالية البشرية', 'pt': 'Desconstruindo a multimodalidade: propriedades visuais e contexto visual no processamento semântico humano.', 'es': 'Deconstruir la multimodalidad: propiedades visuales y contexto visual en el procesamiento semántico humano', 'fr': 'Déconstruire la multimodalité\xa0: propriétés visuelles et contexte visuel dans le traitement sémantique humain', 'ja': 'マルチモーダリティのデコンストラクト：人間のセマンティック処理における視覚的プロパティと視覚的コンテキスト', 'hi': 'Deconstructing multimodulity: दृश्य गुण और मानव शब्दार्थ प्रसंस्करण में दृश्य संदर्भ', 'zh': '解构多模态:人语义视上下文', 'ru': 'Деконструирование мультимодальности: визуальные свойства и визуальный контекст в семантической обработке человека', 'ga': 'Ilmhódúlacht a dhíthógáil: airíonna amhairc agus comhthéacs amhairc i bpróiseáil shéimeantach dhaonna', 'el': 'Αποκonstrukcja πολυμορφίας: οπτικές ιδιότητες και οπτικό πλαίσιο στην ανθρώπινη σημασιολογική επεξεργασία', 'kk': 'Көптеген көпшіліктерді құрастыру: көзінің қасиеттері мен көрінетін контексті', 'it': "Decostruzione multimodale: proprietà visive e contesto visivo nell'elaborazione semantica umana", 'hu': 'A multimodalitás dekonstrukciója: vizuális tulajdonságok és vizuális kontextus az emberi szemantikai feldolgozásban', 'mk': 'Деконструкција на мултимодноста: визуелни сопствености и визуелен контекст во човечкиот семантичен процес', 'ms': 'Membongkar multimodaliti: ciri-ciri visual dan konteks visual dalam proses semantik manusia', 'lt': 'Daugiamodališkumo naikinimas: regėjimo savybės ir regėjimo aplinkybės žmogaus semantiniame apdorojime', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യന്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d കാഴ്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വ്യവസ്ഥകളും കാഴ്ചപ്പെടുത്', 'mn': 'Олон загварыг бүтээж буй: хүн төрөлхтний шинжлэх ухааны хувьд харагдаж буй өөрчлөлт, харагдаж буй нөхцөл байдал', 'mt': 'Deconstructing multimodality: visual properties and visual context in human semantic processing', 'no': 'Dekonstruerer fleire modular: visuelle eigenskapar og visuelle kontekst i menneske semantiske prosessering', 'ka': 'მულტიმოდიალობის განსრულება: ვიზუალური განსაზღვრებები და ვიზუალური კონტექსტი ადამიანის სიმენტიკური პროცესიში', 'ro': 'Deconstrucția multimodalității: proprietăți vizuale și context vizual în procesarea semantică umană', 'sr': 'Dekonstrukcija multimodalnosti: vizualne vlasništvo i vizualni kontekst u ljudskom semantičkom procesu', 'pl': 'Dekonstrukcja multimodalności: właściwości wizualne i kontekst wizualny w przetwarzaniu semantycznym człowieka', 'sv': 'Avuppbyggnad av multimodalitet: visuella egenskaper och visuell kontext i mänsklig semantisk bearbetning', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු සෙමාන්ටික ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාවයෙන් විස්තර කරන්න', 'ta': 'பெரும்பொருளை உருவாக்குதல்', 'so': 'Qoraalka kala duduwan: xuquuqda aragnimada iyo dhaqanka aragnimada ee ka baaraandegista dadka semantika', 'ur': 'ملتی موڈلیٹ کے سامنے ساختہ کرنا: visual properties and visual context in human semantic processing', 'uz': 'Koʻproq odatni yaratish: visual properties and visual context in human semantic processing', 'vi': 'Thiết kế đa thể: tính chất thị giác và ngữ cảnh trong việc xử lý ngữ pháp.', 'bg': 'Деконструктиране на мултимодалност: визуални свойства и визуален контекст в човешката семантична обработка', 'hr': 'Dekonstrukcija multimodalnosti: vizualne vlasništvo i vizualni kontekst u ljudskom semantičkom procesu', 'nl': 'Deconstructie multimodaliteit: visuele eigenschappen en visuele context in menselijke semantische verwerking', 'da': 'Afbygning af multimodalitet: visuelle egenskaber og visuel kontekst i menneskelig semantisk behandling', 'de': 'Dekonstruktion von Multimodalität: visuelle Eigenschaften und visueller Kontext in der menschlichen semantischen Verarbeitung', 'id': 'Deconstructing multimodality: visual properties and visual context in human semantic processing', 'fa': 'ساختن چندmodalities: ویژگی\u200cهای تصویر و محیط تصویر در پرداخت سیمانتیک انسان', 'ko': '다중모드의 해체: 인류의 의미 처리에서의 시각적 특성과 시각적 언어 환경', 'sw': 'Kutengeneza vifaa vingi: utaalam wa kuona na muktadha wa kuona katika upasuaji wa sekunda wa binadamu', 'tr': 'Çoklumodalitet çözümlenmek: insan semantik işlemde görsel hasaplar ve görsel kontekstler', 'sq': 'Zhdukja e multimodalitetit: pronësitë vizuale dhe konteksti vizual në procesimin semantik njerëzor', 'az': 'İnsan semantik işlətməsində görsel xüsusiyyətlər və görsel məlumat', 'af': 'Name', 'ca': 'Desconstruir la multimodalitat: propietats visuals i context visual en el procés semàntic humà', 'bs': 'Dekonstrukcija multimodalnosti: vizualne vlasti i vizualni kontekst u ljudskom semantičkom procesu', 'hy': 'Բազմակերպության ոչնչացումը. տեսողական հատկությունները և տեսողական կոնտեքստը մարդկային սեմանտիկ վերլուծում', 'am': 'ብዙ ጥያቄ: visual properties and visual context in human semantic processing', 'bn': 'মানুষের সেমেন্টিক প্রক্রিয়ার মধ্যে দৃশ্যমান বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং দৃশ্যমান বৈশিষ্ট্য', 'cs': 'Dekonstrukce multimodality: vizuální vlastnosti a vizuální kontext v lidském sémantickém zpracování', 'et': 'Multimodaalsuse dekonstrueerimine: visuaalsed omadused ja visuaalne kontekst inimese semantilises töötluses', 'fi': 'Multimodaalisuuden purkaminen: visuaaliset ominaisuudet ja visuaalinen konteksti ihmisen semanttisessa käsittelyssä', 'jv': 'Ngawe', 'sk': 'Dekonstrukcija multimodalnosti: vizualne lastnosti in vizualni kontekst v človeški semantični obdelavi', 'he': 'Deconstructing multimodality: visual properties and visual context in human semantic processing', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'མ་དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་སྣང་བ། མཐོང་རུང་ངོས་དང་མཐོང་བའི་ཁོར་ཡུག་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་'}
{'en': 'Multimodal semantic models that extend linguistic representations with additional perceptual input have proved successful in a range of natural language processing (NLP) tasks. Recent research has successfully used neural methods to automatically create visual representations for words. However, these works have extracted visual features from complete images, and have not examined how different kinds of visual information impact performance. In contrast, we construct multimodal models that differentiate between internal visual properties of the objects and their external visual context. We evaluate the models on the task of decoding brain activity associated with the meanings of nouns, demonstrating their advantage over those based on complete images.', 'ar': 'أثبتت النماذج الدلالية متعددة الوسائط التي توسع التمثيلات اللغوية مع مدخلات إدراكية إضافية نجاحها في مجموعة من مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (NLP). نجحت الأبحاث الحديثة في استخدام الأساليب العصبية لإنشاء تمثيلات مرئية للكلمات تلقائيًا. ومع ذلك ، فقد استخلصت هذه الأعمال الميزات المرئية من الصور الكاملة ، ولم تفحص كيف تؤثر الأنواع المختلفة من المعلومات المرئية على الأداء. في المقابل ، نبني نماذج متعددة الوسائط تفرق بين الخصائص المرئية الداخلية للأشياء وسياقها المرئي الخارجي. نقوم بتقييم النماذج على مهمة فك تشفير نشاط الدماغ المرتبط بمعاني الأسماء ، وإظهار ميزتها على تلك القائمة على الصور الكاملة.', 'es': 'Los modelos semánticos multimodales que amplían las representaciones lingüísticas con aportaciones perceptivas adicionales han demostrado ser eficaces en una serie de tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural (NLP). Investigaciones recientes han utilizado con éxito métodos neuronales para crear automáticamente representaciones visuales de palabras. Sin embargo, estos trabajos han extraído características visuales de imágenes completas y no han examinado cómo los diferentes tipos de información visual afectan al rendimiento. Por el contrario, construimos modelos multimodales que diferencian entre las propiedades visuales internas de los objetos y su contexto visual externo. Evaluamos los modelos en la tarea de decodificar la actividad cerebral asociada a los significados de los sustantivos, demostrando su ventaja sobre los basados en imágenes completas.', 'pt': 'Modelos semânticos multimodais que estendem representações linguísticas com entrada perceptiva adicional provaram ser bem-sucedidos em uma variedade de tarefas de processamento de linguagem natural (PLN). Pesquisas recentes usaram com sucesso métodos neurais para criar automaticamente representações visuais para palavras. No entanto, esses trabalhos extraíram recursos visuais de imagens completas e não examinaram como diferentes tipos de informações visuais afetam o desempenho. Em contraste, construímos modelos multimodais que diferenciam as propriedades visuais internas dos objetos e seu contexto visual externo. Avaliamos os modelos na tarefa de decodificar a atividade cerebral associada aos significados dos substantivos, demonstrando sua vantagem sobre aqueles baseados em imagens completas.', 'fr': "Les modèles sémantiques multimodaux qui étendent les représentations linguistiques avec des données perceptuelles supplémentaires se sont révélés efficaces dans une gamme de tâches de traitement du langage naturel (TAL). Des recherches récentes ont utilisé avec succès des méthodes neuronales pour créer automatiquement des représentations visuelles pour les mots. Cependant, ces œuvres ont extrait des caractéristiques visuelles d'images complètes et n'ont pas examiné l'impact des différents types d'informations visuelles sur les performances. En revanche, nous construisons des modèles multimodaux qui différencient les propriétés visuelles internes des objets de leur contexte visuel externe. Nous évaluons les modèles sur la tâche de décoder l'activité cérébrale associée à la signification des noms, démontrant leur avantage par rapport à ceux basés sur des images complètes.", 'ja': '追加の知覚入力を用いて言語表現を拡張するマルチモーダルセマンティックモデルは、一連の自然言語処理（ NLP ）タスクにおいて成功していることが証明されている。最近の研究では、単語の視覚表現を自動的に作成するためのニューラルメソッドを使用することに成功しています。しかしながら、これらの著作は完全な画像から視覚的特徴を抽出しており、異なる種類の視覚情報がどのようにパフォーマンスに影響するかを検討していない。対照的に、私たちは、オブジェクトの内部視覚プロパティとその外部視覚コンテキストを区別するマルチモーダルモデルを構築します。私たちは、名詞の意味に関連する脳活動をデコードするタスクに関するモデルを評価し、完全な画像に基づいたモデルよりもそれらの利点を実証します。', 'ru': 'Мультимодальные семантические модели, которые расширяют лингвистические представления с дополнительным вводом восприятия, оказались успешными в ряде задач обработки естественного языка (NLP). Недавние исследования успешно использовали нейронные методы для автоматического создания визуальных представлений для слов. Однако эти работы извлекали визуальные признаки из полных изображений и не рассматривали, как различные виды визуальной информации влияют на производительность. Напротив, мы строим мультимодальные модели, которые различают внутренние визуальные свойства объектов и их внешний визуальный контекст. Мы оцениваем модели на задаче декодирования мозговой активности, связанной со значениями существительных, демонстрируя их преимущество перед теми, которые основаны на полных образах.', 'hi': 'मल्टीमॉडल सिमेंटिक मॉडल जो अतिरिक्त अवधारणात्मक इनपुट के साथ भाषाई प्रतिनिधित्व का विस्तार करते हैं, प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (एनएलपी) कार्यों की एक श्रृंखला में सफल साबित हुए हैं। हाल के शोध ने शब्दों के लिए दृश्य प्रतिनिधित्व स्वचालित रूप से बनाने के लिए तंत्रिका विधियों का सफलतापूर्वक उपयोग किया है। हालांकि, इन कार्यों ने पूर्ण छवियों से दृश्य सुविधाओं को निकाला है, और यह जांच नहीं की है कि विभिन्न प्रकार की दृश्य जानकारी प्रदर्शन को कैसे प्रभावित करती है। इसके विपरीत, हम मल्टीमॉडल मॉडल का निर्माण करते हैं जो वस्तुओं के आंतरिक दृश्य गुणों और उनके बाहरी दृश्य संदर्भ के बीच अंतर करते हैं। हम संज्ञाओं के अर्थों से जुड़ी मस्तिष्क गतिविधि को डिकोड करने के कार्य पर मॉडल का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, पूर्ण छवियों के आधार पर उन पर उनके लाभ का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'zh': '额外感知输广言语多模态语义模形于一系自然语言处(NLP)已验成功。 近论成功神经以自创单词之明。 然取诸全象,非有异类也。 比之以多模态形以别内,与外以视。 估知码名词之义大脑动事之形,证其相全之势也。', 'ga': "D’éirigh go maith le samhlacha ilmhódacha shéimeantacha a leathnaíonn léiriúcháin teanga le hionchur aireachtála breise i raon tascanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha (NLP). D'éirigh le taighde a rinneadh le déanaí modhanna néaracha a úsáid chun léiriúcháin amhairc d'fhocail a chruthú go huathoibríoch. Mar sin féin, bhain na saothair seo gnéithe amhairc as íomhánna iomlána, agus níor scrúdaigh siad an tionchar a bhíonn ag cineálacha éagsúla faisnéise amhairc ar fheidhmíocht. I gcodarsnacht leis sin, déanaimid samhlacha ilmhódacha a dhéanann idirdhealú idir airíonna amhairc inmheánacha na réad agus a gcomhthéacs amhairc seachtrach. Déanaimid meastóireacht ar na samhlacha ar an tasc a bhaineann le gníomhaíocht inchinne a bhaineann le bríonna ainmfhocal a dhíchódú, ag léiriú a mbuntáiste thar na cinn atá bunaithe ar íomhánna iomlána.", 'ka': 'მელტიმოდიალური სიმენტიკური მოდელები, რომლებიც ლენგურისტიკური გამოსახულებებისთვის დამატებული სიმენტიკური გამოსახულებით, შემდეგ წარმატებულია ნახვა ენის პროცესის (NLP)  ახლა შემდეგ შესწავლობა სიტყვებისთვის ვიზუალური გამოსახულებების შექმნა შესაძლებელია ნეიროლური მეტოვები. მაგრამ ეს სამუშაოებები უკვე ვიზუალური ფუნქციების გამოყენება დასრულებული გამოსახულებებიდან და არ შევხედავთ თუ როგორ განსხვავებული ვიზუალური ინფორმა კონტრასტში, ჩვენ მლიტიმოდიალური მოდელების კონტრუქტურება, რომლებიც საშუალური ვიზუალური მნიშვნელობების და გარეშე ვიზუალური კონტექსტურის შორ ჩვენ მოდელების განსაზღვრება ტვინის აკეთექტივას მოდელზე, რომლებიც სახელის ნიშნავებით დაკავშირებული მოდელები, რომლებიც სახელის გამოსახულებით გამოსახულებულია.', 'hu': 'A nyelvi reprezentációkat kiegészítő perceptuális bemenettel kiterjesztő multimodális szemantikai modellek számos természetes nyelvfeldolgozási (NLP) feladatban sikeresnek bizonyultak. A legutóbbi kutatások sikeresen alkalmazták az idegi módszereket a szavak vizuális ábrázolására. Ezek a munkák azonban vizuális jellemzőket vontak ki teljes képekből, és nem vizsgálták meg, hogy a különböző vizuális információk milyen hatással vannak a teljesítményre. Ezzel szemben olyan multimodális modelleket építünk, amelyek különbséget tesznek az objektumok belső vizuális tulajdonságai és külső vizuális kontextusa között. A főnevek jelentéséhez kapcsolódó agyi aktivitás dekódolásának feladatára vonatkozó modelleket értékeljük, bemutatva azok előnyét a teljes képekkel szemben.', 'it': "Modelli semantici multimodali che estendono le rappresentazioni linguistiche con input percettivi aggiuntivi si sono dimostrati efficaci in una serie di attività di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (NLP). Recenti ricerche hanno utilizzato con successo metodi neurali per creare automaticamente rappresentazioni visive per le parole. Tuttavia, questi lavori hanno estratto caratteristiche visive da immagini complete, e non hanno esaminato come diversi tipi di informazioni visive influenzano le prestazioni. Al contrario, costruiamo modelli multimodali che differenziano tra le proprietà visive interne degli oggetti e il loro contesto visivo esterno. Valutiamo i modelli sul compito di decodificare l'attività cerebrale associata ai significati dei sostantivi, dimostrando il loro vantaggio rispetto a quelli basati su immagini complete.", 'el': 'Τα πολυμodale σημασιολογικά μοντέλα που επεκτείνουν τις γλωσσικές αναπαραστάσεις με πρόσθετη αντιληπτική εισαγωγή έχουν αποδειχθεί επιτυχή σε μια σειρά εργασιών επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Πρόσφατες έρευνες έχουν χρησιμοποιήσει επιτυχώς νευρωνικές μεθόδους για να δημιουργήσουν αυτόματα οπτικές αναπαραστάσεις για τις λέξεις. Ωστόσο, αυτά τα έργα έχουν εξαγάγει οπτικά χαρακτηριστικά από πλήρεις εικόνες, και δεν έχουν εξετάσει πώς διαφορετικά είδη οπτικών πληροφοριών επηρεάζουν την απόδοση. Αντίθετα, κατασκευάζουμε πολυμορφικά μοντέλα που διαφοροποιούν τις εσωτερικές οπτικές ιδιότητες των αντικειμένων και το εξωτερικό οπτικό τους πλαίσιο. Αξιολογούμε τα μοντέλα σχετικά με το έργο της αποκωδικοποίησης της εγκεφαλικής δραστηριότητας που σχετίζεται με τις έννοιες των ουσιαστικών, αποδεικνύοντας το πλεονέκτημά τους έναντι εκείνων που βασίζονται σε πλήρεις εικόνες.', 'lt': 'Daugiarūšiai semantiniai modeliai, išplečiantys kalbinį atstovavimą papildomu suvokiamuoju įnašu, buvo sėkmingi įvairiose gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo užduotyse. Neseniai atlikti tyrimai sėkmingai naudojo nervinius metodus, kad būtų automatiškai sukurti vaizdiniai žodžių rodmenys. Vis dėlto šie darbai ištraukė vizualias savybes iš pilnų vaizdų ir nenagrinėjo, kaip skirtingos vizualinės informacijos poveikio savybės. Priešingai, mes sukuriame daugiarūšius modelius, kurie skiriasi tarp objektų vidinių vizualinių savybių ir jų išorinio vizualinio konteksto. Vertiname modelius, susijusius su smegenų aktyvumo dekodavimu, susijusiu su vardinių medžiagų reikšmėmis, parodant jų pranašumą, palyginti su visais vaizdais.', 'kk': 'Қосымша түсінікті келтірілген лингвистикалық түсініктерді кеңейту көптеген семантикалық үлгілер табиғи тілдерді өңдеу (NLP) тапсырмалардың аумағында сәтті болды. Жуырдағы зерттеу сөздерді автоматты түрде көрсету үшін невралдық әдістерді қолданды. Бірақ бұл жұмыстар толық кескіндерден көрініс мүмкіндіктерін алып тастап, көрініс мәліметтердің қандай түрлі нәтижесін тексермейді. Әртүрлі, біз нысандардың ішкі көрініс қасиеттері мен сыртқы көрініс контексті арасындағы көптеген моделдерді құрамыз. Біз мидың белсенділігін декодтау тапсырмасының үлгілерін, атаулардың мәліметтерімен байланыстырып, толық кескіндерге негізделген үлгілерін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Multimodal semantic models that extend linguistic representations with additional perceptual input have proved successful in a range of natural language processing (NLP) tasks.  Recent research has successfully used neural methods to automatically create visual representations for words.  However, these works have extracted visual features from complete images, and have not examined how different kinds of visual information impact performance.  In contrast, we construct multimodal models that differentiate between internal visual properties of the objects and their external visual context.  Ги проценуваме моделите на задачата на декодирање на мозочната активност поврзана со значењето на имениците, покажувајќи ја нивната предност над оние базирани на комплетни слики.', 'ms': 'Model semantik berbilang modal yang memperluas perwakilan bahasa dengan input persepsi tambahan telah terbukti berjaya dalam julat tugas pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi (NLP). kajian baru-baru ini telah berjaya menggunakan kaedah saraf untuk mencipta persembahan visual secara automatik untuk perkataan. Namun, kerja-kerja ini telah mengekstrak ciri-ciri visual dari imej lengkap, dan tidak memeriksa bagaimana jenis-jenis maklumat visual impak prestasi. In contrast, we construct multimodal models that differentiate between internal visual properties of the objects and their external visual context.  Kami menilai model dalam tugas penyahkodan aktiviti otak yang berkaitan dengan makna nama, menunjukkan keuntungan mereka terhadap mereka berdasarkan imej lengkap.', 'ml': 'ഭാഷ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കാഴ്ചയുള്ള ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടുകള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വിശേഷിപ്പിക്കുന്ന മള്\u200dമോഡോള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള അടുത്തുള്ള പരിശോധന വിജയിച്ചു വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കായി കാഴ്ചപ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d സ്വയം സൃഷ്ടിക്കാന്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d രീ എന്നാലും ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ചിത്രങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും കാഴ്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങളുട വിരോധമായി നമ്മള്\u200d പല്ലിമോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. അത് വസ്തുക്കളുടെ ഉള്ളിലുള്ള കാഴ്ചയുടെ ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും അവയുടെ പുറത മോഡലുകള്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d ചിത്രങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് മാതൃകങ്ങളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന്\u200dറെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്ത', 'mn': 'Дасгал ойлголтыг нэмэлт ойлголтын оролцоогоор нэмэлт хэлний хэлний үйл ажиллагаанд амжилттай болсон олон төрлийн semantic загварууд. Саяхан судалгаагаар мэдрэлийн аргыг автоматаар үгсийн үзүүлэлтийг бий болгохын тулд амжилттай ашиглаж байна. Гэхдээ эдгээр ажиллууд бүрэн зургаас харагдаж байгаа зүйлсийг хэрхэн өөр төрлийн харагдах мэдээллийн үйл ажиллагааны нөлөө үзүүлэхийг шалгахгүй байна. Харамсалтай нь бид объектуудын дотоод харагдах болон гадаад харагдах нөхцөл байдлын хооронд ялгаатай олон моделийн загваруудыг бүтээж байна. Бид тархины үйл ажиллагааны загварыг нэр хэмжээтэй холбогдож, бүрэн зураг дээр суурилсан хүмүүсийн давуу талаарх ашиг үзүүлдэг.', 'no': 'Multimodal semantiske modeller som utvidar lingviske representasjonar med fleire oppfattingar har vist suksessfull i eit rekkje av naturspråkshandsamar (NLP) oppgåver. Nyleg forskning har brukt neuralmetodar for å automatisk laga visual representasjonar for ord. Desse arbeida har imidlertid utpakka visuelle funksjonar frå fullførte bilete, og har ikkje undersøkt korleis ulike typar visuelle informasjonspåvirkningar påvirkar. I contrast, we construct multimodal models that differentiate between internal visual properties of the objects and their external visual context. Vi evaluerer modellen på oppgåva av dekoding av hjernenaktivitet som er tilknytta med betydningane av namn, som viser fordel på dei baserte på fullstendige bilete.', 'pl': 'Multimodalne modele semantyczne rozszerzające reprezentacje językowe o dodatkowe wejście perceptualne okazały się skuteczne w zakresie zadań przetwarzania języka naturalnego (NLP). Ostatnie badania z powodzeniem wykorzystały metody neuronowe do automatycznego tworzenia wizualnych reprezentacji słów. Prace te wydobyły jednak cechy wizualne z kompletnych obrazów i nie zbadały, jak różne rodzaje informacji wizualnych wpływają na wydajność. Natomiast konstruujemy modele multimodalne, które rozróżniają wewnętrzne właściwości wizualne obiektów a ich zewnętrzny kontekst wizualny. Oceniamy modele dotyczące zadania dekodowania aktywności mózgu związanej ze znaczeniami rzeczowników, demonstrując ich przewagę nad tymi opartymi na kompletnych obrazach.', 'mt': 'Mudelli semantiċi multimodali li jestendu r-rappreżentazzjonijiet lingwistiċi b’input perċettwali addizzjonali wrew suċċess f’firxa ta’ kompiti ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi naturali (NLP). Riċerka reċenti użat b’suċċess metodi newrali biex awtomatikament to ħloq rappreżentazzjonijiet viżwali għall-kliem. Madankollu, dawn ix-xogħlijiet estrattaw karatteristiċi viżivi minn immaġni kompluti, u ma eżaminawx kif tipi differenti ta’ prestazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni viżiva għandhom impatt. In contrast, we construct multimodal models that differentiate between internal visual properties of the objects and their external visual context.  Aħna jevalwaw il-mudelli dwar il-kompitu tad-dekodifikazzjoni tal-attività tal-moħħ assoċjata mat-tifsiriet tal-ismijiet, li juru l-vantaġġ tagħhom fuq dawk ibbażati fuq immaġni kompluti.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් මෝඩාල් සෙමාන්ටික් මෝඩේල්ස් එක්ක භාෂාවික ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය විස්තර කරනවා අතර ප්\u200dරතිබැදිලි ඇතුළු සමග සාමාන්\u200d අලුත් පරීක්ෂණය සමහර විශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සමහර විස්තරයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න ස්වයංක්\u200dරි නමුත්, මේ වැඩවල් පූර්ණ පින්තූර වලින් ප්\u200dරකෘතියක් පිළිබඳින් පිළිබඳින් පිළිබඳු විදිහට ප විරුද්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, අපි ගොඩක් මෝඩල් නිර්මාණය කරනවා ඒ වගේම ඇතුළු ප්\u200dරදේශ විශේෂතාවක් සහ ඔවුන්ගේ පුර අපි මොළු ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂ කරනවා මොළු ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙලා තියෙන්නේ, මොළු ක්\u200dරියාත්ම', 'so': "Tusaale kala duduwan oo u fidiya wakiilada luuqada ah oo ku qoran qoraal kale oo arag dheeraad ah waxaa ku liibaanay shaqooyin kala duduwan baaraandegista luqada asalka ah (NLP). Recent research has successfully used neural methods to automatically create visual representations for words.  Si kastaba ha ahaatee shuqulladan waxay ka soo saaraan sawirro dhamaan, mana baarayn sidoo kale saameyn ku yeelashada macluumaadka aragga oo kala duduwan. Iska soojeeda, waxaan dhisnaa modelal kala duduwan oo kala soocaa qalabka aragtida gudaha ah iyo muuqashada dibadda ah. Tusaalada waxaan ku qiimeynaynaa shuqulka kooban waxqabadka maskaxda ee la xiriira micnaha nooca la’aanta, waxaana muujinnaa faa'iidadooda ku saabsan sawirada dhamaadka.", 'ro': 'Modelele semantice multimodale care extind reprezentările lingvistice cu input perceptual suplimentar s-au dovedit a fi de succes într-o serie de sarcini de procesare a limbajului natural (PNL). Cercetările recente au folosit cu succes metode neurale pentru a crea automat reprezentări vizuale pentru cuvinte. Cu toate acestea, aceste lucrări au extras caracteristici vizuale din imagini complete și nu au examinat modul în care diferite tipuri de informații vizuale influențează performanța. În schimb, construim modele multimodale care diferențiază între proprietățile vizuale interne ale obiectelor și contextul vizual extern al acestora. Evaluăm modelele privind sarcina de decodare a activității cerebrale asociate cu semnificațiile substantivelor, demonstrând avantajul lor față de cele bazate pe imagini complete.', 'ta': 'கூடுதல் பார்வையுடன் உள்ளீட்டை விரிவாக்கும் மொழி பாதிப்பு மாதிரிகள் இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாடுகளில் வெற்றியடைந்தது. சமீபத்தில் ஆராய்ச்சி வெற்றிகரமாக உபயோகித்து வார்த்தைகளுக்கு தானாகவே பார்வையான காட்சி பிரதிந ஆனால், இந்த வேலைகள் முழு பிம்பங்களிலிருந்து பார்வையுடைய குணங்களை வெளியிட்டுள்ளது, மற்றும் எவ்வாறு வித்தியா மாறாக, நாம் பல்வேறு மாதிரிகளை உருவாக்கி பொருளின் உள்ளார்ந்த காட்சி பண்புகள் மற்றும் அவற்றின் வெளி பார்வையில் உள்ள க நாம் மூளை செயல்பாட்டின் செயல்பாட்டில் மாதிரிகளை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம், முழு பிம்பங்களை அடிப்படையில் அவர்களுக்கு அவர்கள் சிறப்', 'sr': 'Multimodalni semantički modeli koji prošire jezičke predstave sa dodatnim perceptualnim ulazom dokazali su uspešni u nizu zadataka prirodnog obrade jezika (NLP). Nedavno istraživanje je uspešno iskoristilo neuralne metode kako bi automatski stvorilo vizuelne predstave za reči. Međutim, ovi radovi su izvadili vizuelne karakteristike iz kompletnih slika, i nisu pregledali kako različite vrste vizuelnih informacija utiču na učinak. Naprotiv, mi konstruiramo multimodalne modele koji diferenciraju između unutrašnjih vizualnih vlasništva objekata i njihovog vanjskog vizualnog konteksta. Procjenjujemo modele na zadatku dekodiranja aktivnosti mozga povezanih sa značenjem imena, pokazujući njihovu prednost nad onima koji su bazirani na kompletnim slikama.', 'sv': 'Multimodala semantiska modeller som utökar språkliga representationer med ytterligare perceptuell ingång har visat sig framgångsrika i en rad olika uppgifter för behandling av naturligt språk (NLP). Ny forskning har framgångsrikt använt neurala metoder för att automatiskt skapa visuella representationer för ord. Dessa verk har dock extraherat visuella funktioner från kompletta bilder, och har inte undersökt hur olika typer av visuell information påverkar prestanda. Däremot konstruerar vi multimodala modeller som skiljer mellan objektens inre visuella egenskaper och deras yttre visuella kontext. Vi utvärderar modellerna på uppgiften att avkoda hjärnaktivitet associerad med substantivens betydelser, vilket visar deras fördel jämfört med dem baserade på kompletta bilder.', 'ur': 'Multimodal semantic models that extend linguistic representations with additional perceptual input have proved successful in a range of natural language processing (NLP) tasks. اگلے تحقیقات سفارشی سے نورول طریقے استعمال کیے گئے ہیں کہ کلمات کے لئے ویزیئل روشنی ایجاد کریں۔ لیکن یہ کام کامل تصویروں سے visual features اٹھائے گئے ہیں، اور دیکھتے نہیں ہیں کہ کس طرح مختلف طریقوں کی تصویر معلومات کا اثر کرتا ہے. مخالف، ہم multimodal models بناتے ہیں جن کے اندر آنے والی ویزیولی ویزیولی ویزیولی ویزیولی موضوع کے درمیان تفریق کرتے ہیں. ہم مغز کی فعالیت کے مطابق ڈیکوڈ کرنے کی کوشش کی مدلکوں کو مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق بناتے ہیں، اور مطابق تصاویروں پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں ان کے فائدہ دکھاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Yaqinda o'rganish muvaffaqiyatli o'z soʻzlari uchun avtomatik ko'rinish usullarini yaratish uchun neyural usullardan foydalanadi. Lekin, bu ishlar butun rasmlardan ko'rinish xususiyatlarini ko'rsatadi, va ko'rining turli maʼlumot bajarishini qanday qilib ko'rinishni anglatmaydi. Ikkinchi tomonda, biz obʼektlarning ichki ko'rining xususiyatlarini va tashqi ko'rinish muzdalarini o'zgartiradi. Biz miya aktiviyasini ko'rib chiqarishimiz modellarini qiymatimiz va butun rasmlar asosida yaratish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Các mô- đun theo ngữ pháp đa phương có khả năng mở rộng các biểu tượng ngôn ngữ với các thông tin phụ đã thành công trong các công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Nghiên cứu gần đây đã sử dụng các phương pháp thần kinh để tự động tạo ảnh hưởng từ. Tuy nhiên, các tác phẩm này có các tính năng hình ảnh được chiết xuất từ các ảnh đầy đủ, và chưa kiểm tra các kiểu ảnh hưởng ảnh chụp ảnh. Tuy nhiên, chúng tôi xây dựng các mô hình đa phương phân biệt giữa các tính chất thị giác nội bộ của các vật thể và hoàn cảnh thị giác bên ngoài. Chúng tôi đánh giá các mô hình về nhiệm vụ giải mã hoạt động não tương tác với ý nghĩa của danh từ, để thể hiện lợi thế của chúng hơn những hình ảnh đầy đủ.', 'bg': 'Мултимодалните семантични модели, които разширяват лингвистичните изображения с допълнителен възприятие, се оказват успешни в редица задачи за обработка на естествения език (НЛП). Последните изследвания успешно използват невронни методи за автоматично създаване на визуални изображения за думи. Тези произведения обаче извличат визуални характеристики от пълни изображения и не изследват как различните видове визуална информация влияят върху ефективността. За разлика от това, ние конструираме мултимодални модели, които разграничават вътрешните визуални свойства на обектите и външния им визуален контекст. Оценяваме моделите по задачата за декодиране на мозъчната активност, свързана със значенията на съществителните, демонстрирайки тяхното предимство пред тези, базирани на пълни изображения.', 'nl': 'Multimodale semantische modellen die linguïstische representaties uitbreiden met extra perceptuele input zijn succesvol gebleken in een reeks van Natural Language Processing (NLP)-taken. Recent onderzoek heeft met succes neurale methoden gebruikt om automatisch visuele representaties voor woorden te creëren. Deze werken hebben echter visuele kenmerken uit volledige beelden gehaald, en hebben niet onderzocht hoe verschillende soorten visuele informatie invloed hebben op prestaties. Daarentegen bouwen we multimodale modellen die onderscheid maken tussen interne visuele eigenschappen van de objecten en hun externe visuele context. We evalueren de modellen op de taak van het decoderen van hersenactiviteit geassocieerd met de betekenissen van zelfstandige naamwoorden, en demonstreren hun voordeel ten opzichte van die op basis van volledige beelden.', 'da': 'Multimodale semantiske modeller, der udvider sproglige repræsentationer med yderligere perceptuelle input, har vist sig at være vellykkede i en række Natural Language Processing (NLP) opgaver. Nylig forskning har med succes brugt neurale metoder til automatisk at skabe visuelle repræsentationer for ord. Disse værker har imidlertid udvundet visuelle funktioner fra komplette billeder, og har ikke undersøgt, hvordan forskellige former for visuel information påvirker ydeevnen. I modsætning hertil konstruerer vi multimodale modeller, der differentierer mellem objekternes interne visuelle egenskaber og deres eksterne visuelle kontekst. Vi evaluerer modellerne på opgaven med at afkode hjerneaktivitet forbundet med betydningerne af substantiver, og demonstrerer deres fordel i forhold til dem baseret på komplette billeder.', 'hr': 'Multimodalni semantički modeli koji prošire jezičke predstave s dodatnim percepcijskim ulazom dokazali su uspješni u nizu zadataka prirodnog obrade jezika (NLP). Nedavno istraživanje uspješno je iskoristilo neuralne metode kako bi se automatski stvorilo vizualne predstave za riječi. Međutim, ovi radovi su izvukli vizualne funkcije iz kompletnih slika i nisu pregledali kako različite vrste učinka vizualnih informacija utječe na učinke. Naprotiv, mi konstruiramo multimodalne modele koji razlikuju između unutrašnjih vizualnih vlasništva objekata i njihovog vanjskog vizualnog konteksta. Procjenjujemo modele na zadatku dekodiranja aktivnosti mozga povezanih sa značenjem imena, pokazujući njihovu prednost nad onima na temelju kompletnih slika.', 'id': 'Model semantis multimodal yang memperluas representation bahasa dengan input persepsi tambahan telah terbukti sukses dalam jangkauan proyeksi bahasa alami (NLP). Recent research has successfully used neural methods to automatically create visual representations for words.  Namun, pekerjaan-pekerjaan ini telah mengekstraksi karakteristik visual dari gambar lengkap, dan belum memeriksa bagaimana jenis informasi visual berbeda dampak prestasi. Sebaliknya, kami membangun model multimodal yang membedakan antara properti visual internal objek dan konteks visual luar mereka. Kami mengevaluasi model dalam tugas dekodifikasi aktivitas otak yang berhubungan dengan arti nama, menunjukkan keuntungan mereka atas yang berdasarkan gambar lengkap.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای semantic چندین مدل\u200cها که نمایش\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی را با ورودهای مفهوم اضافه می\u200cکنند در مجموعه\u200cای از کار\u200cهای پردازش زبان طبیعی (NLP) موفق شده\u200cاند. تحقیقات اخیرا به موفقیت از روش\u200cهای عصبی برای ایجاد نمایش\u200cهای دیده\u200cای برای کلمات استفاده کرده است. ولی این کارها ویژه\u200cهای دیده\u200cای از تصاویر کامل خارج شده\u200cاند و مطالعه نکرده\u200cاند که چگونه نوع اثرات اطلاعات دیده\u200cای تأثیر دهند. بر خلاف این، ما مدل های چندین مدل ساختیم که بین ویژگی های دیده\u200cای داخلی و محیط دیده\u200cی بیرون آنها تفرق می\u200cکنند. ما مدل\u200cها را بر روی وظیفه\u200cی دکوندن فعالیت مغز ارتباط به معنای اسم\u200cها ارتباط می\u200cدهیم، و مفید\u200cهایشان را بر روی تصاویر کامل نشان می\u200cدهیم.', 'de': 'Multimodale semantische Modelle, die linguistische Repräsentationen um zusätzlichen perzeptuellen Input erweitern, haben sich in einer Reihe von Aufgaben der Natural Language Processing (NLP) bewährt. Neuere Forschungen haben erfolgreich neuronale Methoden eingesetzt, um automatisch visuelle Repräsentationen für Wörter zu erstellen. Diese Arbeiten haben jedoch visuelle Merkmale aus vollständigen Bildern extrahiert und nicht untersucht, wie verschiedene Arten visueller Informationen die Leistung beeinflussen. Im Gegensatz dazu konstruieren wir multimodale Modelle, die zwischen internen visuellen Eigenschaften der Objekte und ihrem äußeren visuellen Kontext unterscheiden. Wir evaluieren die Modelle zur Aufgabe der Dekodierung der Hirnaktivität, die mit den Bedeutungen von Substantiven verbunden ist, und zeigen ihren Vorteil gegenüber denen, die auf vollständigen Bildern basieren.', 'ko': '일련의 자연 언어 처리(NLP) 작업에서 추가 감지 입력을 통해 확장된 언어 표현을 하는 다중모드적 의미 모델이 성공했다는 것이 증명되었다.최근의 연구는 신경 방법을 이용하여 단어의 시각적 표현을 자동으로 만드는 데 성공했다.그러나 이러한 작업은 완전한 이미지에서 시각적 특징을 추출했고 서로 다른 유형의 시각적 정보가 성능에 어떻게 영향을 미치는지 연구하지 않았다.그에 비해 우리는 다중모드모델을 구축하여 대상의 내부 시각 특성과 외부 시각 환경을 구분했다.우리는 디코딩과 명사의 의미와 관련된 뇌 활동의 모델을 평가하여 완전한 이미지를 바탕으로 하는 모델보다 장점을 보여 주었다.', 'sw': 'Mfano wa semantic wa a in a mbalimbali unaoongeza uwakilishi wa lugha kwa kutumia mitazamo ya kuongezeka yamekwisha kufanikiwa katika majukumu ya utaratibu wa lugha asili (NLP). Utafiti wa hivi karibuni umefanikiwa kutumia mbinu za neura za kutengeneza maoni kwa ajili ya maneno. Hata hivyo, kazi hizi zimetoa vipande vya kuona kutoka kwenye picha kamili, na hawajachunguza namna tofauti ya ufanisi wa taarifa unavyoathiri. Tofauti na hilo, tunajenga mifano mingi inayotofautiana na utaalamu wa ndani wa vitu na muktadha wao wa nje wa kuona. Tunatathmini mifano ya kazi ya kupunguza shughuli za ubongo zinazohusiana na maana ya hawa, wakionyesha faida yao juu ya zile zinazotumia picha kamili.', 'tr': 'Birnäçe modal semantik nusgalary, hatda lingwistiki näçe görnüş bilen täze diller işleýän (NLP) täzeliklerde üstünlik gazandy. Ýakynda görsel suratlary sözler üçin üýtgetmek üçin neural yöntemleri ullanýar. Ýöne bu işler doly suratlardan görsel özellikleri çykarmady we görsel maglumatyň nähili täsirini maslahat etmediler. Daşarkı, nesnelerin iç görsel özellikleri ve daşarkı görsel kontekstleri arasynda farklı bir multimodal modelleri inşa ediyoruz. Beýniniň janlaşmasynyň işini deňleýän nusgalaryny üýtgedýäris. Tam suratlara daýanýan nusgalaryny görkezýäris.', 'sq': 'Modelet semantike multimodale që zgjerojnë përfaqësimet gjuhësore me hyrje shtesë perceptuale janë vërtetuar të suksesshme në një gamë detyrash të përpunimit natyror të gjuhës (NLP). Kërkimi i fundit ka përdorur me sukses metodat nervore për të krijuar automatikisht përfaqësime vizuale për fjalët. Megjithatë, këto punë kanë nxjerrë karakteristika vizuale nga imazhet e plota dhe nuk kanë shqyrtuar se si lloje të ndryshme të informacionit vizual ndikojnë performancën. Në ndryshim, ne ndërtojmë modele multimodale që ndryshojnë midis pronave vizuale të brendshme të objekteve dhe kontekstit vizual të jashtëm të tyre. Ne vlerësojmë modelet në detyrën e dekodimit të aktivitetit të trurit të lidhur me kuptimet e emrave, duke demonstruar avantazhin e tyre ndaj atyre që bazohen në imazhe të plota.', 'af': "Multimodale semantiese modele wat lingvisiese voorstellings uitbrei met addisionele aanvaardige invoer het suksesvol bevestig in 'n reek van natuurlike taal verwerking (NLP) opdragte. Onlangse ondersoek het suksesvol neurale metodes gebruik om automaties visuele voorstellings vir woorde te skep. Hierdie werke het egter visuele funksies uit volledige beelde uitgevoer en nie ondersoek hoe verskillende soorte visuele inligting effektuur het nie. In contrast, ons konstrukteer multimodale modele wat tussen interne visuele eienskappe van die objekte en hulle eksterne visuele konteks verskillig word. Ons evalueer die modele op die taak van dekodering van brein aktiviteit wat geassosieer is met die betekenings van noume, en wys hulle voordeel oor die wat op volledige beelde gebaseer is.", 'am': 'የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን በተጨማሪው የዓይነት ግንኙነት የሚያሰፋው ብዙ ሞዴላዊ ምሳሌዎች በተለየ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ (NLP) ስራ ውስጥ አግኝተዋል፡፡ የአሁኑ ትምህርት ለቃላት ራሳቸውን የራእይ መልዕክቶችን ለመፍጠር የኔural methods ተጠቃሚ ሆኖአል፡፡ ነገር ግን እነዚህ ሥራ ከሙሉ ምስሎች የተለየ የራእይ እውቀት አወጣላቸው፣ የዓይነት መልዕክት ምን ያህል የራእይ ጥቅም እንዴት እንደሆነ አልተመለከቱም፡፡ በተለየው፣ አካባቢዎቹን እና ውጭው የራእይ ግንኙነትን መካከል የሚለየውን ብዙዎችን አካል እናደርጋለን፡፡ በሙሉ ምስሎች ላይ የተደረገውን ጥቅማቸውን እናሳይናለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Բազմամոդալ սեմանտիկ մոդելները, որոնք ընդլայնում են լեզվական ներկայացումները ավելին ընկալումնային ներմուծքով, հաջողակ են ապացուցել բնական լեզվի վերամշակման (ՆԼՊ) խնդիրների շարքում: Վերջին հետազոտությունները հաջողությամբ օգտագործել են նյարդային մեթոդներ, որպեսզի ինքնաբերաբար ստեղծեն բառերի տեսողական ներկայացումներ: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս աշխատանքները հանել են տեսողական հատկություններ ամբողջական պատկերներից և չեն ուսումնասիրել, թե ինչպես են տեսողական ինֆորմացիայի տարբեր տեսակները ազդում աշխատանքի վրա: Դրան հակառակ, մենք կառուցում ենք բազմամոդալ մոդելներ, որոնք տարբերակում են առարկաների ներքին տեսողական հատկությունների և արտաքին տեսողական կոնտեքստի միջև: Մենք գնահատում ենք ուղեղի ակտիվության կոդավորման խնդրի մոդելները, որոնք կապված են անունների իմաստների հետ, ցույց տալով նրանց առավելությունը, քան նրանք, որոնք հիմնված են ամբողջական պատկերների վրա:', 'az': 'Təbiətli dil işlətməsi (NLP) işlərində çoxlu modal semantik modellərdə başarılı olmuşdur. Son araştırmalar sözlər üçün vizuallər yaratmaq üçün nöral metodları müvəffəqiyyətlə istifadə etdi. Ancaq bu işlər tamamlanmış şəkillərdən görsel möcüzələri çıxartdı və nə cür cür görsel məlumat təsirlərinin təsirlərini incidirmədi. Əksinə, biz objeklərin içəri görsel özellikləri və onların dış görsel məlumatları arasında fərqli multimodal modelləri inşa edirik. Biz beyin fəaliyyətini dəyişdirmək üçün modelləri, ismlərin anlamı ilə bağlı olan modelləri təmin edirik, tamamlama şəkillərin üstündə olanların faydalarını göstərir.', 'bs': 'Multimodalni semantički modeli koji prošire jezičke predstave sa dodatnim perceptualnim ulazom dokazali su uspješni u nizu zadataka prirodnog obrade jezika (NLP). Nedavno istraživanje uspješno je iskoristilo neuralne metode kako bi automatski stvorilo vizuelne predstave za riječi. Međutim, ovi radovi su izvukli vizuelne karakteristike iz kompletnih slika i nisu pregledali kako različite vrste vizuelnih informacija utiču na učinke. Naprotiv, mi konstruiramo multimodalne modele koji razlikuju između unutrašnjih vizualnih vlasništva objekata i njihovog vanjskog vizualnog konteksta. Procjenjujemo modele na zadatku dekodiranja aktivnosti mozga povezanih sa značenjem imena, pokazujući njihovu prednost nad onima koji su bazirani na kompletnim slikama.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার (এনএলপি) কাজে অনেক সাফল্য প্রমাণিত হয়েছে। সম্প্রতি গবেষণা সফল হয়েছে শব্দের জন্য নিউরেল পদ্ধতি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে দৃশ্য প্রতিনিধি তৈরি করার জন্য। তবে এই কাজ সম্পূর্ণ ছবি থেকে দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রদর্শন করেছে এবং তারা পরীক্ষা করেনি কিভাবে ভিন্ন ধরনের দৃশ্য তথ বিপরীতে, আমরা মাল্টিমোডাল মডেল তৈরি করি যা বস্তুর অভ্যন্তরীণ দৃষ্টিভঙ্গির বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং তাদের বাইরে দৃষ্টিভঙ্গির মধ্যে  আমরা মডেলের মূল্য মূল্য দিচ্ছি যে মস্তিষ্ক কার্যক্রম নির্ধারণ করা হয়েছে নিষ্ঠানের মানে যুক্ত, যারা পূর্ণ ছবির ভিত্তিতে', 'ca': "Els models semàntics multimodals que estenen les representacions lingüístices amb entrada perceptiva adicional han demostrat èxit en una gama de tasques de processament de llenguatges naturals (NLP). La recent recerca ha utilitzat mètodes neurals amb èxit per crear representacions visuals per a paraules. No obstant això, aquestes obres han extraït característiques visuals de imatges completas i no han examinat com diferents tipus d'informació visual impacten el rendiment. En canvi, construim models multimodals que diferencien entre les propietats visuals internas dels objectes i el seu context visual extern. We evaluate the models on the task of decoding brain activity associated with the meanings of nouns, demonstrating their advantage over those based on complete images.", 'cs': 'Multimodální sémantické modely, které rozšiřují lingvistické reprezentace o další perceptuální vstup, se ukázaly úspěšně v řadě úloh zpracování přirozeného jazyka (NLP). Nedávný výzkum úspěšně použil neuronové metody k automatickému vytváření vizuálních reprezentací slov. Tyto práce však extrahovaly vizuální prvky z kompletních obrazů a nezkoumaly, jak různé druhy vizuálních informací ovlivňují výkon. Naproti tomu konstruujeme multimodální modely, které rozlišují mezi vnitřními vizuálními vlastnostmi objektů a jejich vnějším vizuálním kontextem. Vyhodnocujeme modely na úlohu dekódování mozkové aktivity spojené s významem podstatných jmen a demonstrujeme jejich výhodu oproti těm založeným na kompletních obrazech.', 'et': 'Multimodaalsed semantilised mudelid, mis laiendavad keelelisi esitusi täiendava tajumise sisendiga, on osutunud edukaks mitmetes looduskeele töötlemise ülesannetes. Hiljutised uuringud on edukalt kasutanud närvimeetodeid, et luua automaatselt visuaalseid representatsioone sõnadele. Siiski on need tööd ekstraheerinud visuaalseid omadusi terviklikest piltidest ega ole uurinud, kuidas erinevad visuaalsed andmed mõjutavad jõudlust. Seevastu ehitame multimodaalseid mudeleid, mis eristavad objektide sisemist visuaalset omadust ja välist visuaalset konteksti. Hindame nimesõnade tähendustega seotud ajuaktiivsuse dekodeerimise mudeleid, näidates nende eelist täielikul kujutisel põhinevate mudelite ees.', 'fi': 'Multimodaaliset semanttiset mallit, jotka laajentavat kielellisiä representaatioita havainnointisyötteellä, ovat osoittautuneet menestyksekkäiksi erilaisissa luonnollisen kielen käsittelytehtävissä (NLP). Viimeaikaiset tutkimukset ovat onnistuneesti hyödyntäneet neuromenetelmiä luodakseen automaattisesti visuaalisia representaatioita sanoille. Näissä teoksissa on kuitenkin poimittu visuaalisia ominaisuuksia kokonaisista kuvista, eikä ole tutkittu, miten erilaiset visuaaliset tiedot vaikuttavat suorituskykyyn. Sen sijaan rakennamme multimodaalisia malleja, jotka erottavat kohteiden sisäiset visuaaliset ominaisuudet ja niiden ulkoisen visuaalisen kontekstin. Arvioimme substantiivien merkityksiin liittyvän aivotoiminnan dekoodaamisen malleja, osoittaen niiden etulyöntiaseman täydellisiin kuviin perustuviin malleihin nähden.', 'jv': 'Multimodal semanti modes that expand language representations with additional comprptual input have been displayed success in a Range of normal language operation (NLP) tasks. text-tool-action politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness layers-action Awak dhéwé éntuk model sing nggawe barang nggawe layang-layang ning awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang awak dhéwé, ngono kuwi nggawe bener dhéwé kuwi nggawe larang sing bisa gambar uwong.', 'sk': 'Multimodalni semantični modeli, ki razširijo jezikovne reprezentacije z dodatnim perceptivnim vnosom, so se izkazali za uspešni pri različnih nalogah obdelave naravnega jezika (NLP). Nedavne raziskave so uspešno uporabljale nevronske metode za samodejno ustvarjanje vizualnih predstavitev besed. Vendar pa so ta dela izvlekla vizualne značilnosti iz celotnih slik in niso preučevala, kako različne vrste vizualnih informacij vplivajo na zmogljivost. Nasprotno pa gradimo multimodalne modele, ki razlikujejo med notranjimi vizualnimi lastnostmi objektov in njihovim zunanjim vizualnim kontekstom. Ocenjujemo modele na nalogi dekodiranja možganske aktivnosti, povezane s pomenom samostalnikov, s čimer dokazujemo njihovo prednost pred tistimi, ki temeljijo na popolnih slikah.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Ana amfani da shiryoyin neural a yanzu-yanzu don ya iya ƙiƙiro wakin da gane wa kalmõmi farat ɗaya. Haƙĩƙa, waɗannan aikin sun nuna wasu misfealumai daga zanen cikakku, kuma ba su haƙur da jine irin mutane da ke nuna ba. Tsamman, za mu sami misãlai masu multi da ke rarraba tsakanin properties na guda na gane wa abubuwan da ke ƙaranci. Tuna ƙaddara misãlai a kan aikin yin kodi da aikin miyar da aka yi wa muhimmada da ma'anar nau'i, kuma Muke nuna amfani da su a kan waɗanda ke kamfata zane-zane.", 'he': 'מודלים סמנטיים רבים שמארכים מייצגים שפתיים עם תוכנית תפיסה נוספת הוכיחו מוצלחים בגוון של משימות עיבוד שפת טבעית (NLP). מחקר לאחרונה השתמש בהצלחה בשיטות עצביות ליצור אוטומטית מייצגים ויזואליים למילים. עם זאת, העבודות האלה הוציאו תכונות ויזואליות מתמונות מושלמות, ולא בדקו איך סוגים שונים של מידע ויזואלי משפיעים ביצועים. בניגוד לזה, אנו בונים מודלים רבים מודלים שמפרדים בין תכונות ויזואליות פנימיות של החפצים לבין הקשר ויזואלי החיצוני שלהם. אנו מעריכים את הדוגמנים על המשימה לפענח פעילות מוח הקשורה למשמעות של שמות, להוכיח את היתרון שלהם על אלה שמבוססים על תמונות מושלמות.', 'bo': 'Multimodal semantic models that extend linguistic representations with additional perceptual input have proved successful in a range of natural language processing (NLP) tasks. ཉེ་ཆར་ཡོད་པའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་ནས་མཐོང་ནུས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་རྗེས་སུ་ལག་ལེན་བྱས་ཡོད་པ ཡིན་ནའང་། བྱ་ཚིག་དེ་དག་གིས་མཐོང་ནུས་པ་གཟུགས་རིས་བཏོན་མྱོང་ཡོད་པས། མིན་དུས་རྟོགས་གནས་ཚུལ ང་ཚོས་དངོས་པོ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་དབྱིབས་མཐོང་བའི་ནང་གི་མཐོང་བའི་རྣམ་པ་དང་ཁོ་ཚོའི་ཕྱིར་མཐོང་སྣང་གི་ཁྱད་པར་མོ་འདུག ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་པ་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་དག་གི་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། དེ་ནི་རྣམ་པ་ཡོངས་བསྡ'}
{'en': 'Neural User Factor Adaptation for Text Classification : Learning to Generalize Across Author Demographics', 'ar': 'تكيف عامل المستخدم العصبي لتصنيف النص: تعلم التعميم عبر التركيبة السكانية للمؤلف', 'fr': 'Adaptation du facteur utilisateur neuronal pour la classification de textes\xa0: apprendre à généraliser à travers les données démographiques des auteurs', 'es': 'Adaptación del factor de usuario neuronal para la clasificación de textos: aprender a generalizar en la demografía de los autores', 'pt': 'Adaptação do fator de usuário neural para classificação de texto: aprendendo a generalizar entre os dados demográficos do autor', 'ja': 'テキスト分類のためのニューラルユーザーファクターアダプテーション：著者人口統計学全体を一般化するための学習', 'zh': '文本分类神经用户素适应性:学跨人计泛化', 'ru': 'Адаптация нейронного фактора пользователя для классификации текста: обучение обобщению демографических данных автора', 'hi': 'पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए तंत्रिका उपयोगकर्ता कारक अनुकूलन: लेखक जनसांख्यिकी में सामान्यीकरण करना सीखना', 'ga': "Fachtóir Úsáideora Néarúil a oiriúnú d'Aicmiú Téacs: Ag Foghlaim conas Ginearálú Trasna Déimeagrafaíochta Údair", 'hu': 'Neurális felhasználói tényezők adaptációja a szövegosztályozáshoz: A szerzők demográfiai általánosításának tanulása', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Adattamento del fattore utente neurale per la classificazione del testo: imparare a generalizzare attraverso la demografia degli autori', 'el': 'Προσαρμογή του νευρωνικού παράγοντα χρήστη για την ταξινόμηση κειμένου: Μάθηση για τη γενίκευση σε ολόκληρο τον συγγραφέα Δημογραφικά', 'kk': 'Мәтін классификациясының нейрондық пайдаланушының факторының адаптациясы: Автор демографикасын жалпы түрлендіру', 'lt': 'Naudotojo neurologinio faktoriaus pritaikymas teksto klasifikacijai: Mokymasis visur generuoti autorių demografiją', 'mk': 'Адаптација на неуралниот кориснички фактор за класификација на текст: Научи да генерализира преку авторска демографија', 'ms': 'Penyesuaian Faktor Pengguna Neural untuk Klasifikasi Teks: Belajar untuk Menjana Seluruh Demografik Penulis', 'ml': 'പദാവലി ക്ലാസിഷനിക്കുവേണ്ടി ന്യൂറല്\u200d ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ഫാക്ടറ്\u200d ആഡാപ്റ്റര്\u200d: പഠിക്കുന്നത് പഠിപ്പിക്കു', 'mt': 'Adattament tal-Fattur tal-Utent Newrali għall-Klassifikazzjoni tat-Test: Tagħlim biex tiġġeneralizza madwar id-Demografija tal-Awtur', 'mn': 'Текст классификацийн мэдрэлийн хэрэглэгчийн факторын адаптаци: Дээр зургийн зохиолч Демографик гэх мэт суралцах', 'pl': 'Adaptacja czynników użytkownika neuronalnego do klasyfikacji tekstu: nauka uogólniania w całym autorze demografia', 'no': 'Neyral brukarfaktoreadaptasjon for tekstklassifikasjon: Læring for å generera forfattardemografikk', 'ro': 'Adaptarea factorului neural al utilizatorilor pentru clasificarea textelor: Învățarea de a generaliza în toată populația autorilor', 'sr': 'Adaptacija faktora neuroloških korisnika za klasifikaciju teksta: učenje generalizacije demografije autora', 'si': 'පාළුවන් ක්\u200dරාසික්ෂණය සඳහා න්\u200dයූරාල භාවිතා ක්\u200dරියාක්\u200dරීය අනුමාණය: ප්\u200dරධාන ක්\u200dරියාක්\u200dරියාක්\u200dරි', 'sv': 'Neural User Factor Anpassning för textklassificering: Lär dig att generalisera över författardemografi', 'so': 'Isticmaalaha Neural Adaptation for Text Classification: Learning to Generalize Across Demographics', 'ta': 'உரை வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கான நெருக்கமான பயனர் தொகுப்பான்', 'ur': 'Text Classification for Neural User Factor Adaptation: Learning to Generalize Across Author Demographics', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thay đổi Hệ thống thần kinh cho việc đánh giá văn bản:', 'bg': 'Адаптация на невралния потребителски фактор за класификация на текста: учене да се обобщава между авторите Демография', 'da': 'Neural User Factor Tilpasning til tekstklassificering: Lære at generalisere på tværs af forfatterdemografi', 'nl': 'Neural User Factor Adaptatie voor Tekst Classificatie: Leren Generaliseren over Author Demographics', 'hr': 'Adaptacija faktora neuralnog korisnika za klasifikaciju teksta: učenje generalizacije demografije autora', 'de': 'Neurale Benutzerfaktoranpassung für die Textklassifikation: Lernen, über die gesamte Autorendemographie hinweg zu generalisieren', 'id': 'Neural User Factor Adaptation for Text Classification: Learning to Generalize Across Author Demographics', 'fa': 'Adaptation Factor User Neural for Text Classification: Learning to Generalize Across Author Demographics', 'ko': '텍스트 분류의 신경 사용자 요소 적응: 저자 인구통계학에서 학습 보급', 'sw': 'Kituo cha Mtumiaji wa Neural Adaptation for Classification Text: Kujifunza Kujumuisha Mwandishi wa Mazungumzo', 'sq': 'Përpërshtatja e Faktorit të Përdoruesit Neural për Klasifikimin e Tekstit: Mësimi për të gjeneralizuar nëpërmjet Demografisë së Autorit', 'tr': 'Metin Sözlemek üçin Nural Ullançy Faýllary Adynlaşdyrma: Hatlary Awtomatik Gaýşartmak üçin öwrenmek', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Տեքստի դասակարգման համար նյարդային օգտագործողի գործոնի ադապտացիան. սովորելը գեներալացնել հեղինակի ժողովրդագրությունը', 'az': 'Metin Klasifikasyonu üçün nöral Kullanıcı Faktor Adjustasyonu: Across Author Demographics Öyrənmək', 'bn': 'টেক্সট ক্লাসিকেশনের জন্য নিউরেল ব্যবহারকারী ফ্যাক্টর অ্যাডাপ্টেশন: ক্রোস লেখক ডেমোগ্রাফিক্স স সাধারণ শিক্', 'bs': 'Adaptacija faktora neurološkog korisnika za klasifikaciju teksta: učenje generalizacije demografije autora', 'ca': "Adaptació neuronal del factor d'usuari per a la classificació del text: Aprendre a generalitzar a través de la demografia de l'autor", 'cs': 'Adaptace neurálního uživatelského faktoru pro klasifikaci textu: Naučení se obecně generalizovat napříč autorem demografie', 'et': 'Neuraalse kasutaja faktori kohandamine teksti klassifitseerimiseks: õppimine üldistama kogu autori demograafia', 'fi': 'Neural User Factor Adaptation for Text Classification: Oppiminen yleistymään eri tekijöiden demografiset tiedot', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Prilagoditev nevralnega uporabniškega faktorja za klasifikacijo besedila: učenje splošnosti po vseh avtorjih Demografija', 'he': 'Neural User Factor Adaptation for Text Classification: Learning to Generalize Across Author Demographics', 'bo': 'Neural User Factor Adaptation for Text Classification: Learning to Generalize Across Author Demographics'}
{'en': 'Language use varies across different demographic factors, such as gender, age, and geographic location. However, most existing document classification methods ignore demographic variability. In this study, we examine empirically how text data can vary across four demographic factors : gender, age, country, and region. We propose a multitask neural model to account for demographic variations via adversarial training. In experiments on four English-language social media datasets, we find that classification performance improves when adapting for user factors.', 'ar': 'يختلف استخدام اللغة باختلاف العوامل الديموغرافية ، مثل الجنس والعمر والموقع الجغرافي. ومع ذلك ، فإن معظم أساليب تصنيف الوثائق الحالية تتجاهل التباين الديموغرافي. في هذه الدراسة ، نفحص بشكل تجريبي كيف يمكن أن تختلف البيانات النصية عبر أربعة عوامل ديموغرافية: الجنس والعمر والبلد والمنطقة. نقترح نموذجًا عصبيًا متعدد المهام لمراعاة الاختلافات الديموغرافية من خلال التدريب العدائي. في التجارب التي أجريت على أربع مجموعات بيانات لوسائل التواصل الاجتماعي باللغة الإنجليزية ، وجدنا أن أداء التصنيف يتحسن عند التكيف مع عوامل المستخدم.', 'fr': "L'utilisation de la langue varie en fonction de différents facteurs démographiques, tels que le sexe, l'âge et la situation géographique. Cependant, la plupart des méthodes de classification des documents existantes ignorent la variabilité démographique. Dans cette étude, nous examinons empiriquement comment les données textuelles peuvent varier en fonction de quatre facteurs démographiques\xa0: le sexe, l'âge, le pays et la région. Nous proposons un modèle neuronal multitâche pour tenir compte des variations démographiques par le biais d'un entraînement contradictoire. Dans le cadre d'expériences menées sur quatre ensembles de données de médias sociaux en anglais, nous avons constaté que les performances de classification s'améliorent lors de l'adaptation aux facteurs utilisateur.", 'es': 'El uso del idioma varía según los diferentes factores demográficos, como el sexo, la edad y la ubicación geográfica. Sin embargo, la mayoría de los métodos de clasificación de documentos existentes ignoran la vari En este estudio, examinamos empíricamente cómo los datos de texto pueden variar en cuatro factores demográficos: género, edad, país y región. Proponemos un modelo neuronal multitarea para tener en cuenta las variaciones demográficas a través del entrenamiento contradictorio. En experimentos realizados en cuatro conjuntos de datos de redes sociales en inglés, descubrimos que el rendimiento de la clasificación mejora cuando se adapta a los factores del usuario.', 'pt': 'O uso do idioma varia de acordo com diferentes fatores demográficos, como sexo, idade e localização geográfica. No entanto, a maioria dos métodos de classificação de documentos existentes ignora a variabilidade demográfica. Neste estudo, examinamos empiricamente como os dados de texto podem variar em quatro fatores demográficos: sexo, idade, país e região. Propomos um modelo neural multitarefa para explicar variações demográficas por meio de treinamento adversário. Em experimentos em quatro conjuntos de dados de mídia social em inglês, descobrimos que o desempenho da classificação melhora ao se adaptar aos fatores do usuário.', 'ja': '言語の使用は、性別、年齢、地理的位置など、さまざまな人口統計学的要因によって異なります。しかし、ほとんどの既存の文書分類方法は、人口統計学的変動を無視している。この研究では、性別、年齢、国、地域の4つの人口統計学的要因にわたってテキストデータがどのように変化するかを実証的に検討します。我々は、対抗訓練を通じて人口統計学的変動を考慮するためのマルチタスクニューラルモデルを提案する。4つの英語のソーシャルメディアデータセットの実験では、ユーザーファクターに適応すると、分類パフォーマンスが向上することがわかります。', 'zh': '言语用因人计而异,如性别,年地位。 然大抵见文档之法,略人口统计学变异性。 于此论之,据经验考文本数据四人口计其素异:性别,年,国地也。 设一多任务神经模形,对抗性训人口统计学异。 四英语社交媒体之实验,应用户之时,类性益高。', 'hi': 'भाषा का उपयोग विभिन्न जनसांख्यिकीय कारकों, जैसे लिंग, आयु और भौगोलिक स्थान में भिन्न होता है। हालाँकि, अधिकांश मौजूदा दस्तावेज़ वर्गीकरण विधियाँ जनसांख्यिकीय परिवर्तनशीलता की अनदेखी करती हैं. इस अध्ययन में, हम अनुभवजन्य रूप से जांच करते हैं कि पाठ डेटा चार जनसांख्यिकीय कारकों में कैसे भिन्न हो सकता है: लिंग, आयु, देश और क्षेत्र। हम प्रतिकूल प्रशिक्षण के माध्यम से जनसांख्यिकीय विविधताओं के लिए खाते के लिए एक मल्टीटास्क तंत्रिका मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। चार अंग्रेजी भाषा के सोशल मीडिया डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों में, हम पाते हैं कि उपयोगकर्ता कारकों के लिए अनुकूलन करते समय वर्गीकरण प्रदर्शन में सुधार होता है।', 'ru': 'Использование языка зависит от различных демографических факторов, таких как пол, возраст и географическое положение. Однако большинство существующих методов классификации документов игнорируют демографическую изменчивость. В этом исследовании мы эмпирически изучаем, как текстовые данные могут варьироваться в зависимости от четырех демографических факторов: пола, возраста, страны и региона. Мы предлагаем многозадачную нейронную модель для учета демографических вариаций посредством состязательного обучения. В экспериментах над четырьмя наборами данных социальных сетей на английском языке мы обнаружили, что эффективность классификации улучшается при адаптации к пользовательским факторам.', 'ga': 'Athraíonn úsáid teanga thar fachtóirí éagsúla déimeagrafacha, mar inscne, aois, agus suíomh geografach. Mar sin féin, déanann an chuid is mó de na modhanna aicmithe doiciméad atá ann faoi láthair neamhaird ar éagsúlacht dhéimeagrafach. Sa staidéar seo, scrúdaíonn muid go heimpíreach conas is féidir le sonraí téacs athrú thar cheithre fhachtóir déimeagrafacha: inscne, aois, tír, agus réigiún. Molaimid múnla néarúil iltasc le cuntas a thabhairt ar éagsúlachtaí déimeagrafacha trí oiliúint sháraíochta. I dturgnaimh ar cheithre thacar sonraí meán sóisialta Béarla, feicimid go bhfeabhsaítear feidhmíocht aicmithe nuair a dhéantar oiriúnú d’fhachtóirí úsáideoirí.', 'hu': 'A nyelvhasználat különböző demográfiai tényezők, például nem, életkor és földrajzi elhelyezkedés között változik. A legtöbb meglévő dokumentum osztályozási módszer azonban figyelmen kívül hagyja a demográfiai változékonyságot. Ebben a tanulmányban empirikusan megvizsgáljuk, hogyan változhatnak a szöveges adatok négy demográfiai tényező között: nem, kor, ország és régió. Javasolunk egy többfeladatú neurális modellt, amely ellenséges képzésen keresztül figyelembe veszi a demográfiai változásokat. Négy angol nyelvű közösségi média adatkészleten végzett kísérletekben azt találtuk, hogy a besorolási teljesítmény javul a felhasználói tényezőkhöz való alkalmazkodás során.', 'el': 'Η χρήση γλώσσας ποικίλλει ανάλογα με διαφορετικούς δημογραφικούς παράγοντες, όπως φύλο, ηλικία και γεωγραφική τοποθεσία. Ωστόσο, οι περισσότερες υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι ταξινόμησης εγγράφων αγνοούν τη δημογραφική μεταβλητότητα. Σε αυτή τη μελέτη, εξετάζουμε εμπειρικά πώς τα δεδομένα κειμένου μπορούν να διαφέρουν σε τέσσερις δημογραφικούς παράγοντες: φύλο, ηλικία, χώρα και περιοχή. Προτείνουμε ένα νευρωνικό μοντέλο πολλαπλών εργασιών για να υπολογίσουμε τις δημογραφικές διακυμάνσεις μέσω αντίπαλης εκπαίδευσης. Σε πειράματα σε τέσσερα αγγλόγλωσσα σύνολα δεδομένων κοινωνικών μέσων, διαπιστώνουμε ότι η απόδοση ταξινόμησης βελτιώνεται όταν προσαρμόζεται στους παράγοντες χρήστη.', 'ka': 'ენის გამოყენება განსხვავებულია განსხვავებული დემოგრაფიკური ფექტურების განსხვავებაში, როგორც გენდერი, ასე და დოგრაფიკური ადგილება. მაგრამ უფრო მსგავსი დოკუმენტის კლასიფიკაციის მეტოვები დემოგრაფიკური გარივიაციას ინგორიცია. ამ კვლევაში ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ თუ როგორ ტექსტის მონაცემები შეიძლება განსხვავება ოთხი დემოგრაფიკური ფაქტორებში: გენდერი, ასე, ქვეყანი და რეგიონი. ჩვენ მრავალური ნეიროლური მოდელს მივიღებთ, რომ დემოგრაფიკური გარიაციების შესახებ განაცემების გამოყენება. ექსპერიმენტებში 4 ინგლისური საზოგადომი საზოგადომი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში, ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ კლასიფიკაციის კონფიგურაცია უფ', 'kk': 'Тілдерді қолдану әртүрлі демографиялық факторларында, мысалы гендер, жас және географиялық орналасуы. Бірақ бар құжаттардың көпшілігі шектеу әдістері демографиялық айнымалылығын елемейді. Бұл зерттеулерде мәтін деректері төрт демографиялық факторларында қалай өзгертуге мүмкін екенін тексереміз: гендер, жас, ел және аумағын. Біз көптеген тапсырманың невралдық моделі қарсы оқыту арқылы демографиялық айнымалылықтарды есептеу үшін қолданамыз. Төрт ағылшын тілінің социалдық медиа деректерінің тәжірибелерінде, пайдаланушылардың факторларына адаптациялау үшін классификациялық әрекеттері жақсы болады.', 'lt': 'Kalbų naudojimas skiriasi įvairiais demografiniais veiksniais, pavyzdžiui, lytimi, amžiumi ir geografine vieta. Tačiau dauguma esamų dokumentų klasifikavimo metodų ignoruoja demografinį kintamumą. Šiame tyrime empiriniu būdu nagrinėjame, kaip teksto duomenys gali skirtis įvairiais keturiais demografiniais veiksniais: lytis, amžius, šalis ir regionas. Siūlome daugiašalį neurologinį model į, kuris atspindėtų demografinius pokyčius per priešingą mokymą. Eksperimentuose su keturiais anglų kalbomis susijusiais socialinių žiniasklaidos duomenų rinkiniais nustatyta, kad klasifikavimo rezultatai pagerėja prisitaikant prie naudotojų veiksnių.', 'it': "L'uso delle lingue varia in base a diversi fattori demografici, come sesso, età e posizione geografica. Tuttavia, la maggior parte dei metodi di classificazione dei documenti esistenti ignora la variabilità demografica. In questo studio esaminiamo empiricamente come i dati testuali possano variare in quattro fattori demografici: sesso, età, paese e regione. Proponiamo un modello neurale multitask per tenere conto delle variazioni demografiche attraverso l'allenamento avversario. In esperimenti su quattro set di dati sui social media in lingua inglese, troviamo che le prestazioni di classificazione migliorano quando si adattano ai fattori dell'utente.", 'mk': 'Користењето на јазикот се разликува во различни демографски фактори, како што се полот, возраста и географската локација. Сепак, повеќето постојни методи на класификација на документи ја игнорираат демографската варијабилност. Во оваа студија, емпирички проверуваме како текстовите податоци можат да се разликуваат во четири демографски фактори: пол, возраст, земја и регион. Предложуваме мултизадачен нервен модел кој ќе ги признае демографските варијации преку непријателска обука. Во експериментите на четири податоци на социјалните медиуми на англиски јазик, откриваме дека класификациската перформанса се подобрува кога се адаптира за корисниците фактори.', 'ms': 'Penggunaan bahasa berbeza melalui faktor demografik berbeza, seperti jenis, umur, dan lokasi geografik. Namun, kebanyakan kaedah klasifikasi dokumen yang ada mengabaikan variabiliti demografik. Dalam kajian ini, kami memeriksa secara empirik bagaimana data teks boleh berbeza melalui empat faktor demografik: jenis, umur, negara, dan kawasan. Kami cadangkan model saraf berbilang tugas untuk menganggap variasi demografik melalui latihan lawan. Dalam eksperimen pada empat set data media sosial bahasa Inggeris, kami mendapati bahawa prestasi klasifikasi meningkat apabila menyesuaikan untuk faktor pengguna.', 'ml': 'ഭാഷ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡെമോഗ്രാഫിക് ഫാക്ടറുകളിലും വ്യത്യസ്തമാണ്, പ്രായമാണം, പ്രായമായത്, ഭൂഗ്ര എന്നാലും നിലവിലുള്ള രേഖയുടെ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d രീതികള്\u200d ഡെമോഗ്രാഫിക് മാറ്റമില്ല. ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d എക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d ഡേറ്റാകള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുന്നതെന്ന് ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു വൈരിക്കല്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തിലൂടെ ജനോഗ്രാഫിക വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് കണക്ക് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു മുള്\u200dട്ടിട്ടുക നാലു ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഭാഷ സോഷ്യല്\u200d മേഡിയ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റേറ്റുകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d, ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ഫാക്ടറുകള്\u200dക്ക് മാ', 'mt': 'Language use varies across different demographic factors, such as gender, age, and geographic location.  Madankollu, il-biċċa l-kbira tal-metodi ta’ klassifikazzjoni tad-dokumenti eżistenti jinjoraw il-varjabilità demografika. F’dan l-istudju, eżaminaw b’mod empiriku kif id-dejta tat-test tista’ tvarja minn erba’ fatturi demografiċi: is-sess, l-età, il-pajjiż u r-reġjun. Aħna nipproponu mudell newrali multikompitu li jikkunsidra l-varjazzjonijiet demografiċi permezz ta’ taħriġ avversarju. Fl-esperimenti fuq erba’ settijiet ta’ dejta tal-midja soċjali tal-lingwa Ingliża, instabu li l-prestazzjoni tal-klassifikazzjoni titjieb meta tiġi adattata għall-fatturi tal-utent.', 'mn': 'Холбоо хэрэглэх нь гендер, нас, географик байр суурь мэт олон ардчилсан хүчин зүйлсийн хувьд өөр өөр өөрчлөгдөж байна. Гэвч ихэнх баримт хуваалтын арга нь демографик өөрчлөлтийг үгүйсгэдэг. Энэ судалгаанд бид текст өгөгдлийг хэрхэн өөрчлөх вэ гэдгийг харуулж байна: гендер, нас, улс, бүс нутагтай. Бид олон ажлын сэтгэл зүйн загварыг эсрэг сургалтын аргаар харьцуулахын тулд олон ажлын сэтгэл зүйн загварыг сануулдаг. Дөрвөн Англи хэлний нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэвлэлийн туршилтууд хэрэглэгчийн хүчин зүйлсийг адаптын үед хуваалцах үйл ажиллагааны үйл ажиллагаа улам сайжруулдаг.', 'no': 'Språkbruk varierer over ulike demografiske faktorer, slik som gener, alder og geografisk plassering. Desse eksisterande dokumentklassifikasjonsmetodar ignorerer demografiske variabel. I denne studien undersøker vi empirisk korleis tekstdata kan variera over fire demografiske faktorer: seks, alder, land og region. Vi foreslår eit fleiroppgåve neuralmodell for å rekna på demografiske variasjonar ved hjelp av negativ trening. I eksperimenter på fire engelske sosiale mediesata finn vi at klassifikasjonen forbetrar når du tilpassar brukarfaktorer.', 'pl': 'Używanie języka różni się w zależności od różnych czynników demograficznych, takich jak płeć, wiek i położenie geograficzne. Jednak większość istniejących metod klasyfikacji dokumentów ignoruje zmienność demograficzną. W tym badaniu badamy empirycznie, w jaki sposób dane tekstowe mogą różnić się w zależności od czterech czynników demograficznych: płci, wieku, kraju i regionu. Proponujemy wielozadaniowy model neuronowy, aby uwzględnić różnice demograficzne poprzez szkolenie przeciwne. W eksperymentach na czterech angielskojęzycznych zbiorach danych mediów społecznościowych stwierdzono, że wydajność klasyfikacji poprawia się podczas adaptacji do czynników użytkownika.', 'ro': 'Utilizarea limbilor variază în funcție de factori demografici diferiți, cum ar fi sexul, vârsta și locația geografică. Cu toate acestea, majoritatea metodelor existente de clasificare a documentelor ignoră variabilitatea demografică. În acest studiu, analizăm empiric modul în care datele text pot varia în funcție de patru factori demografici: sex, vârstă, țară și regiune. Propunem un model neural multitask pentru a ține cont de variațiile demografice prin formare adversară. În experimentele efectuate pe patru seturi de date de social media în limba engleză, constatăm că performanța clasificării se îmbunătățește atunci când se adaptează la factorii utilizatorilor.', 'sr': 'Koristenje jezika se razlikuje u različitim demografskim faktorima, poput spola, doba i geografske lokacije. Međutim, većina postojećih metoda klasifikacije dokumenta ignorišu demografsku variabilnost. U ovom istraživanju, ispitujemo empirički kako tekstualni podaci mogu da se razlikuju u četiri demografske faktore: spol, dob, zemlja i regija. Predlažemo multitaskni neuralni model da računa za demografske varijacije putem neprijateljske obuke. U eksperimentima na četiri koledža socijalnih medija engleskog jezika, nalazimo se da se klasifikacija poboljšava kada se prilagođava faktorima korisnika.', 'so': "Isku isticmaalka luuqadu wuxuu ku kala duwan yahay waxyaabo kala duduwan sida jinsi, da'da, iyo goobaha jiografiga. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, hababka sharciga ee dokummada oo badankood way diidaan isbedelka dadka. Waxbarashadan si fiican ayaannu ugu baaraynaa siduu macluumaadka qoraalka u kala duwan karo afarta sababo ee dadku: jinsi, da'da, waddanka iyo gobolka. Waxaannu soo jeedaynaa model neurada ah oo kala duduwan in lagu xisaabiyo bedelka dadka ku saabsan waxbarashada ka geesta ah. Imtixaanka afarta macluumaadka bulshada ee luuqadda Ingiriiska waxaan ka helaynaa in tababarida lagu kordhiyo marka loo beddelo arrimaha isticmaalaha.", 'si': 'භාෂාව භාවිතා වෙනස් ප්\u200dරතිභාවිත විදිහට වෙනස් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිභාවිත විදිහට වෙනස් වෙන්නේ, ජ නමුත්, ගොඩක් තියෙන්නේ ලිපින්ත විශේෂණ විධානය ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරතිකාරය අනතුරු කරන්න. මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා පාළුවේ දත්ත කොහොමද ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත්ති හතරක් වෙනස් වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා අපි ගොඩක් ක්\u200dරියාකාරිය න්\u200dයූරාල් මෝඩල් එකක් ප්\u200dරසිද්ධා කරනවා විරුද්ධ වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂාවයේ සාමාජික මිඩියාවයේ තොරතුරු හතරක් පරීක්ෂණයේ අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ', 'sv': 'Språkanvändningen varierar mellan olika demografiska faktorer, såsom kön, ålder och geografisk plats. De flesta befintliga dokumentklassificeringsmetoder ignorerar dock demografisk variation. I denna studie undersöker vi empiriskt hur textdata kan variera mellan fyra demografiska faktorer: kön, ålder, land och region. Vi föreslår en multi-task neural modell för att ta hänsyn till demografiska variationer via kontradiktorisk träning. I experiment på fyra engelskspråkiga sociala mediedataset konstaterar vi att klassificeringsprestandan förbättras vid anpassning till användarfaktorer.', 'ta': 'மொழி பயன்படுத்தல் வேறு வித்திய இனது, வயது, புவியியல் மற்றும் புவியியல் இடங்களில் மாறுபடும். ஆனால் இருக்கும் பெரும்பாலான ஆவண வகைப்பாட்டு முறைகள் demographic மாறியை புறக்கணிக்கவில்லை. In this study, we examine empirically how text data can vary across four demographic factors: gender, age, country, and region.  நாங்கள் பல்வேறு கேட்ட புதிய மாதிரியை எதிர்மறை பயிற்சியினால் தொகுதி மாறுபாடுகளை கணக்கிட வேண்டும். நான்கு ஆங்கிலம் மொழியில் சமூக தரவுத்தளங்களில், பயனர் காரணிகளுக்கு ஒப்பிடும் போது வகுப்பு செயல்பாடு மேம்படுத்', 'ur': 'زبان کا استعمال مختلف دموگرافیک فکتوروں میں متفاوت ہوتا ہے، جیسے جنس، عمر، اور جغرافیک موقعیت. However, most existing document classification methods ignore demographic variability. اس مطالعہ میں ہم مطالعہ سے دیکھتے ہیں کہ چر جمعیگرافیک فکتوروں میں متفاوت کیسے متفاوت کر سکتے ہیں: جنس، عمر، کشور اور منطقه. ہم ایک multitask neural model کی پیشنهاد کریں کہ دموگرافیکی تدریس کے ذریعے دموگرافیکی متفاوتوں کے لئے حساب کریں. چار انگلیسی زبان کی آزمائش میں سوسیل میڈیا ڈاٹ سٹ میں، ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ کلاسپیٹ کی عملکرد یوسٹر فاکتوروں کے لئے اڈپٹ کر رہی ہے۔', 'uz': "Tilning foydalanuvchisi boshqa demografik factorilarga, jinsi, yosh va geografi manziliga oʻxshash. However, most existing document classification methods ignore demographic variability.  Bu taʼminotda, biz matn maʼlumotlari 4 ta demografik faktorega o'zgarishi mumkin: jinsiy, yosh, davlat, va region. Biz bir necha tarkibiy trening orqali demografi oʻzgarishlarini hisoblash uchun multiask neyrolik modelini talab qilamiz. Biz foydalanuvchilar uchun darajalashtirish jarayonlarini o'rganamiz.", 'vi': 'Ngôn ngữ khác nhau về nhân số khác nhau, như giới tính, tuổi tác và địa điểm. Tuy nhiên, hầu hết các phương pháp phân loại tài liệu hiện thời. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu theo kinh nghiệm làm thế nào mà dữ liệu văn bản có thể thay đổi theo bốn yếu tố dân số: giới tính, tuổi tác, quốc gia và vùng. Chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình thần kinh đa nhiệm để giải thích về biến dạng dân số qua huấn luyện đối nghịch. Trong các thí nghiệm trên bốn tập tin về truyền thông xã hội tiếng Anh, chúng tôi thấy hiệu quả phân loại tốt hơn khi thích ứng với các yếu tố người dùng.', 'bg': 'Използването на езика варира според различните демографски фактори, като пол, възраст и географско местоположение. Въпреки това, повечето съществуващи методи за класификация на документи пренебрегват демографската променливост. В това проучване изследваме емпирично как текстовите данни могат да варират в четири демографски фактора: пол, възраст, държава и регион. Предлагаме многофункционален невронен модел за отчитане на демографските вариации чрез съперническо обучение. При експерименти с четири набора от данни на английски език в социалните медии откриваме, че ефективността на класификацията се подобрява при адаптиране към потребителските фактори.', 'hr': 'Koristenje jezika se razlikuje u različitim demografskim faktorima, poput spola, doba i geografskog lokacije. Međutim, većina postojećih metoda klasifikacije dokumenta ignorira demografsku variabilnost. U ovom ispitivanju ispitujemo empirički kako podaci teksta mogu promijeniti u četiri demografske faktore: spol, dob, zemlja i regija. Predlažemo višezadatačni neuralni model da se računa za demografske varijacije putem neprijateljske obuke. U eksperimentima na četiri engleskog jezika socijalne medije nalazimo se da se klasifikacija poboljšava kada se prilagođava faktorima korisnika.', 'da': 'Sprogbrug varierer på tværs af forskellige demografiske faktorer, såsom køn, alder og geografisk placering. De fleste eksisterende dokumentklassifikationsmetoder ignorerer imidlertid demografisk variation. I denne undersøgelse undersøger vi empirisk, hvordan tekstdata kan variere på tværs af fire demografiske faktorer: køn, alder, land og region. Vi foreslår en multi-task neural model til at tage højde for demografiske variationer via adversial træning. I eksperimenter med fire engelsksprogede sociale mediedatasæt konstaterer vi, at klassificeringsydelsen forbedres ved tilpasning til brugerfaktorer.', 'nl': 'Taalgebruik varieert afhankelijk van verschillende demografische factoren, zoals geslacht, leeftijd en geografische locatie. De meeste bestaande documentclassificatiemethoden negeren echter demografische variabiliteit. In dit onderzoek onderzoeken we empirisch hoe tekstgegevens kunnen variëren tussen vier demografische factoren: geslacht, leeftijd, land en regio. We stellen een multitask neuraal model voor om demografische variaties in rekening te brengen via adversariaal training. In experimenten met vier Engelstalige social media datasets zien we dat classificatieprestaties verbeteren bij aanpassing aan gebruikersfactoren.', 'de': 'Der Sprachgebrauch variiert je nach demografischen Faktoren wie Geschlecht, Alter und geografischer Lage. Die meisten existierenden Dokumentenklassifizierungsmethoden ignorieren jedoch die demografische Variabilität. In dieser Studie untersuchen wir empirisch, wie Textdaten über vier demografische Faktoren variieren können: Geschlecht, Alter, Land und Region. Wir schlagen ein neuronales Multitask-Modell vor, um demografische Schwankungen durch adversariales Training zu berücksichtigen. In Experimenten mit vier englischsprachigen Social-Media-Datensätzen zeigen wir, dass sich die Klassifikationsleistung bei der Anpassung an Benutzerfaktoren verbessert.', 'id': 'Penggunaan bahasa berbagai faktor demografis, seperti jenis, usia, dan lokasi geografik. Namun, kebanyakan metode klasifikasi dokumen yang ada mengabaikan variabilitas demografis. In this study, we examine empirically how text data can vary across four demographic factors: gender, age, country, and region.  Kami mengusulkan model saraf multitask untuk memperhitungkan variasi demografis melalui latihan lawan. Dalam eksperimen pada empat set data media sosial bahasa Inggris, kami menemukan bahwa prestasi klasifikasi meningkat ketika menyesuaikan untuk faktor pengguna.', 'ko': '언어의 사용은 성별, 나이, 지리적 위치 등 인구 요인에 따라 다르다.그러나 대부분의 기존 문서 분류 방법은 인구통계학적 차이를 소홀히 했다.이 연구에서 우리는 실증적인 측면에서 텍스트 데이터가 네 가지 인구 통계학 요소 중의 변화인 성별, 연령, 국가와 지역을 고찰했다.우리는 대항적인 훈련을 통해 인구통계학의 변화를 설명하는 다중 임무 신경 모델을 제시했다.네 개의 영어 소셜 미디어 데이터 집합에서의 실험에서 우리는 사용자 요소에 적응할 때 분류 성능이 향상된다는 것을 발견했다.', 'fa': 'استفاده از زبان در موقعیت\u200cهای دموگرافیک مختلف متفاوت می\u200cشود، مثل جنس، سن و موقعیت جغرافی. با این حال، بیشترین روش\u200cهای مختصات سند موجود تغییرات دموگرافیک را نادیده می\u200cدهد. در این مطالعه، ما به مطالعه تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که چگونه داده\u200cهای متن می\u200cتوانند در چهار faktور دموگرافیک تغییر دهند: جنس، سن، کشور و منطقه. ما یک مدل عصبی چندین کار را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که برای تغییرات دموگرافیک از طریق آموزش دشمنی حساب کند. در آزمایش\u200cهای چهار مجموعه\u200cهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی انگلیسی زبان، پیدا می\u200cکنیم که هنگامی که تغییر داده\u200cهای اجتماعی به عنوان faktورهای کاربر تغییر داده می\u200cشود، عملکرد', 'sw': 'Utumiaji wa lugha unatofautiana na sababu tofauti za watu kama jinsia, umri na maeneo ya kijiografia. Hata hivyo, mbinu nyingi za usambazaji wa nyaraka zinazopo zinazipuuza mabadiliko ya kidemokrasia. Katika utafiti huu, tunachunguza kwa makini jinsi takwimu za maandishi zinavyotofauti katika sababu nne za watu: jinsia, umri, nchi, na eneo. Tunazipendekeza mtindo wa neura wa kikundi cha kutangaza mabadiliko ya watu kupitia mafunzo ya upinzani. In experiments on four English-language social media datasets, we find that classification performance improves when adapting for user factors.', 'tr': 'Diller farkl캇 demografik fakt철rlerde 체첵tge힊iril첵채r, 첵a힊y, 첵a힊 we geografik 첵erleri 첵aly. 횦철ne k철p bar sened klasifikasy y철ntemleri demografik 챌al힊yrlygyny g철rmezden 챌ykar. Bu okuwda, metin maglumaty d철rt demogr채fi첵any흫 arasynda n채hili 체첵tge힊iklerini bardygyny empiri첵a 챌철z첵채ris: jens, 첵a힊y, 첵urt we b철legi. Biz nusgala okuw챌ylary g철r채 demografik 체첵tge힊meleri 체챌in k철p t채sirli nusgal nusgasyny maslahat ber첵채ris. 4 I흫lis dilinde sosial medi첵a sanatyndaky deneylerde, ullan챌ylar fakt철rlerine 체첵tgedeni흫de klasifikasi첵a etkinle힊ik gowuralyr di첵ip pikir ed첵채ris.', 'sq': 'Përdorimi i gjuhës ndryshon në faktorë të ndryshëm demografikë, të tillë si gjini, mosha dhe vendndodhja gjeografike. Megjithatë, shumica e metodave ekzistuese të klasifikimit të dokumenteve injorojnë variabilitetin demografik. Në këtë studim, ne shqyrtojmë empirikisht se si të dhënat e tekstit mund të ndryshojnë në katër faktorë demografikë: gjini, mosha, vendi dhe rajoni. Ne propozojmë një model neuronal shumëdetyror për të llogaritur variacionet demografike nëpërmjet trajnimit kundërshtar. Në eksperimentet në katër grupe të dhënash të medias shoqërore në gjuhën angleze, gjejmë se rezultati klasifikues përmirësohet kur përshtatet për faktorët përdorues.', 'am': 'Language use varies across different demographic factors, such as gender, age, and geographic location.  ነገር ግን አብዛኛዎቹ የሰነድ መግለጫ ማድረጊያውን የዲሞግራፍ መለያየት ይሸሻሉ። በዚህ ትምህርት፣ የጽሑፍ ዳታዎች በአራቱ ዴሞክራሲ ውጤቶች እንዴት እንዲለዩ እንደሚችል እናምረዋለን፡፡ በተቃዋሚ ትምህርት የዴሞግራፊ ለውጦችን ለመቆጣጠር እናስባለን፡፡ በአራቱ እንግሊዝኛ-ቋንቋ ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ዳታዎችን በመፈተና፣ የተጠቃሚ ውጤቶችን በመቀበል ጊዜ የክፍለ ሥርዓት ማድረግ ይሻላል፡፡', 'hy': "Լեզուների օգտագործումը տարբեր դեմոգրաֆիկ գործոնների միջև տարբերվում է, ինչպիսիք են սեռը, տարիքը և երկրագրական վայրը: Այնուամենայնիվ, հիմնական փաստաթղթերի դասակարգման մեթոդները անտեսում են դեմոգրաֆիկ տարբերակությունը: Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք էպիրիկապես ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե ինչպես կարող են տեքստի տվյալները տարբերվել չորս դեմոգրաֆիկ գործոնների միջև' գենդերային, տարիքային, երկրի և տարածաշրջանի միջև: Մենք առաջարկում ենք բազմախնդիր նյարդային մոդել, որը հակառակ վարժությունների միջոցով հաշվի առնի դեմոգրաֆիկ տարբերությունները: Չորս անգլերեն սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների տվյալների փորձարկումներում մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ դասակարգման արդյունքները բարելավվում են օգտագործողների գործոնների հետ հարմարվելիս:", 'af': "Taal gebruik verskillende demografiese faktore, soos geneem, ouer en geografiese ligging. Maar, mees bestaande dokumentklassifikasie metodes ignoreer demografiese veranderlikheid. In hierdie studie, ondersoek ons empiriese hoe teks data kan verander oor vier demografiese faktore: gender, ouderdom, land en region. Ons voorstel 'n multitaak neurale model om rekening vir demografiese veranderinge deur teenwoordige onderwerp te raak. In eksperimente op vier Engelstaalse sosiale media-dataset, vind ons dat klassifikasie-prestasie verbeter wanneer vir gebruikerfaktore aanpas word.", 'az': 'Dil istifadəsi, cins, yaş və ģeogrāfiski məqamlar kimi müxtəlif demografik faktörlərin arasında fərqli olar. Lakin çox mövcud dökümət klasifikasiya metodları demografik dəyişikliklərini görməz. Bu təcrübədə, məlumat məlumatlarının dörd demografik faktörlərin arasında necə dəyişə biləcəyini gözləyirik: cins, yaş, ülk və bölgesi. Biz çoxlu işin nöral modelini düşmənçilik təhsil vasitəsilə demografik dəyişiklikləri hesablamaq üçün təklif edirik. Dörd İngilizə dilində sosyal media verilənlərin təcrübələrində, istifadəçilərin faktörlərinə uyğunlaşdığı zaman klasifikasiya performansı yaxşılaşdırır.', 'bs': 'Koristenje jezika se razlikuje u različitim demografičkim faktorima, poput spola, doba i geografske lokacije. Međutim, većina postojećih metoda klasifikacije dokumenta ignorira demografsku variabilnost. U ovom ispitivanju ispitujemo empirički kako podaci teksta mogu promijeniti u četiri demografske faktore: spol, dob, zemlja i regija. Predlažemo multizadatačni neuralni model da se računa za demografske varijacije putem neprijateljske obuke. U eksperimentima na četiri kompleta socijalnih medija engleskog jezika, nalazimo se da se klasifikacija poboljšava kada se prilagođava faktorima korisnika.', 'ca': "L'ús del llenguatge varia en diferents factors demogràfics, com el gènere, l'edat i l'ubicació geogràfica. No obstant això, la majoria dels mètodes de classificació de documents existents ignoren la variabilitat demogràfica. En aquest estudi, examinem empíricament com les dades de text poden variar entre quatre factors demogràfics: gènere, edat, país i regió. Proposem un model neural multitascat per tenir en compte les variacions demogràfiques a través de l'entrenament adversari. En experiments de quatre conjunts de dades dels mitjans socials de llenguatge anglès, trobem que el rendiment de la classificació millora quan s'adapta a factors d'usuari.", 'et': 'Keele kasutamine erineb erinevate demograafiliste tegurite, näiteks soo, vanuse ja geograafilise asukoha järgi. Enamik olemasolevaid dokumentide klassifitseerimise meetodeid ignoreerib aga demograafilist variatsiooni. Käesolevas uuringus uurime empiiriliselt, kuidas tekstiandmed võivad erineda nelja demograafilise teguri järgi: soo, vanus, riik ja piirkond. Pakume välja mitmeülesandelise närvimudeli, et arvestada demograafilisi variatsioone vastava koolituse kaudu. Nelja ingliskeelse sotsiaalmeedia andmekogumiga tehtud eksperimentides leiame, et klassifikatsiooni tulemuslikkus paraneb kasutajateguritega kohanemisel.', 'bn': 'ভাষা ব্যবহার বিভিন্ন গণতান্ত্রিক কারণগুলোর মধ্যে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভি তবে বর্তমান নথির বেশীরভাগ ক্লাসাফিকেশন পদ্ধতি গণতান্ত্রিক পরিবর্তন উপেক্ষা করে। এই গবেষণায় আমরা শান্তিভাবে পরীক্ষা করি কিভাবে লেখা তথ্য চারজন গণতান্ত্রিক কারণের মধ্যে পার্থক্য হতে পারে: লিঙ্গ, বয় আমরা বিরোধী প্রশিক্ষণের মাধ্যমে গণতান্ত্রিক ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন পরিবর্তনের জন্য একটি মাল্টিটিক্যারেল মডে চারটি ইংরেজী ভাষায় সামাজিক মিডিয়া ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষায় আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে ব্যবহারকারী কার্যক্রমের মাধ্যমে ক্ল', 'cs': 'Používání jazyka se liší podle různých demografických faktorů, jako je pohlaví, věk a zeměpisná poloha. Většina stávajících metod klasifikace dokumentů však ignoruje demografickou variabilitu. V této studii empiricky zkoumáme, jak se textová data mohou lišit napříč čtyřmi demografickými faktory: pohlavím, věkem, zemí a regionem. Navrhujeme multiúlohový neuronový model pro zohlednění demografických variací prostřednictvím adversariálního tréninku. V experimentech na čtyřech anglických datových sadách sociálních médií zjišťujeme, že klasifikační výkon se zlepšuje při adaptaci na uživatelské faktory.', 'fi': 'Kielen käyttö vaihtelee demografisten tekijöiden, kuten sukupuolen, iän ja maantieteellisen sijainnin mukaan. Useimmissa nykyisissä asiakirjojen luokittelumenetelmissä ei kuitenkaan oteta huomioon demografista vaihtelua. Tässä tutkimuksessa tarkastellaan empiirisesti, miten tekstitiedot voivat vaihdella neljän demografisen tekijän: sukupuolen, iän, maan ja alueen välillä. Ehdotamme monitehtäväneuromallia demografisten vaihtelujen huomioon ottamiseksi vastustajakoulutuksen avulla. Neljällä englanninkielisellä sosiaalisen median tietoaineistolla tehdyissä kokeissa havaittiin, että luokittelukyky paranee käyttäjätekijöihin sopeutumisessa.', 'jv': 'Language politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné isih éntuk empir piye isakno kayané dadi teks gambaran karo angka sing basa gambaran: génêr, tualah, langêr lan tambah. Awak dhéwé ngerasai model multitask Neral kanggo ngakun diapakan langgar tarjamahan Nanging kapan pangan kanggo saben éntuk kanggo saben inggal-ingkang dadi media sotal, kita luwih nggawe barang panjenengan seneng pisan kanggo nggawe nggawe operasi kanggo nggawe operasi nggawe operasi kanggo nggawe operasi.', 'he': 'השימוש בשפה שונה בין גורמים דמוגרפיים שונים, כמו מין, גיל ומיקום גאוגרפי. בכל אופן, רוב שיטות מסמכים הקיומות מתעלמות מהשינוי דמוגרפי. במחקר הזה, אנחנו בודקים באמפריה איך נתוני טקסט יכולים להשתנות בארבעה גורמים דמוגרפיים: מין, גיל, מדינה ואזור. אנחנו מציעים מודל עצבי רב משימה כדי לחשבון על שונות דמוגרפיות באמצעות אימון יריבי. בניסויים על ארבעה קבוצות נתונים של תקשורת חברתית בשפה אנגלית, אנו מוצאים שהביצועים של הסווג משתפרים כשמתאימים לגורמים משתמשים.', 'sk': 'Uporaba jezika se razlikuje glede na različne demografske dejavnike, kot so spol, starost in geografska lokacija. Vendar pa večina obstoječih metod razvrščanja dokumentov ne upošteva demografske variabilnosti. V tej študiji empirično preučujemo, kako se besedilni podatki lahko razlikujejo po štirih demografskih dejavnikih: spolu, starosti, državi in regiji. Predlagamo večopravilni nevronski model za upoštevanje demografskih variacij prek kontradiktorskega treninga. V poskusih na štirih angleških družbenih omrežjih smo ugotovili, da se klasifikacijska učinkovitost izboljša pri prilagajanju uporabniškim dejavnikom.', 'ha': "Yin amfani da harshe yana da amfani da su duk matsayin mutane daban, kamar mazan jini, da tsohon da wuri. A lokacin da, ko da mafi yawan hanyar fasarin takardar da ke jira, sai su ƙyale variant na mutane. Daga wannan lõkaci, Munã jarraba jinsi data za'a iya sãɓã wa matsayin a cikin afar fakta na mutane: jini, tsohon, ƙasa, da region. Tuna goyyar da wata misãlin neural na multi-aski don ya sami ƙidãya wa variabler mutane a yi amfani da wa'anar motsi. Ko cikin jarrabãwa na tsari na zane-zane-zane-zane-harshe huɗu, za mu gane cewa mafarinta ga fasalin, idan an daidaita wa masu amfani da shi.", 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་སྤྱོད་ནང་དུ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་བཀོད་རིས་གནས་ཡུལ་འདྲ་མི་འདྲ་ཞིག་ཡིན། ཡིན་ནའང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་དབྱེ་བ་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྤྱོད་སྟངས་འགྱུར་ཅན་སྣང་མེད་བསྐྱུར་བྱེད་པ འུ་ཅག་གི་བརྩལ་ཞིབ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་གེ་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱིས་མི་ས་ཁམས་ཀྱི་རྩོམ་འབྲེལ་གྱི་བཞི་ནང་ནས་ཇི་ལྟར་འགྱུར་སྲིད་མིན་འདུག ང་ཚོས་དཀའ་ངལ་གྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་མཐུད་སྣེ་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་པའི་མིག་རྩལ་བ་ཞིག་ལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དབྱིན་ཡིག་སྐད་ཀྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ཕྲེང་བཞིན་གྱི་བརྟག་ཞིག་ནང་གི་གྲངས་འཛིན་གྱི་ལས་འགན་འགྱུར་བ་'}
{'en': 'Abstract Graphs and Abstract Paths for Knowledge Graph Completion', 'ar': 'الرسوم البيانية المجردة والمسارات المجردة لإكمال الرسم البياني المعرفي', 'pt': 'Gráficos abstratos e caminhos abstratos para conclusão do gráfico de conhecimento', 'fr': 'Graphiques abstraits et chemins abstraits pour la complétion des graphes', 'es': 'Gráficos abstractos y rutas abstractas para completar gráficos de conocimiento', 'ja': 'ナレッジグラフ補完のための抽象グラフと抽象パス', 'zh': '知图谱成抽象图象路', 'ru': 'Абстрактные графики и абстрактные пути для заполнения графа знаний', 'hi': 'ज्ञान ग्राफ़ पूर्णता के लिए सार रेखांकन और सार पथ', 'ga': 'Graif Teibí agus Conairí Teibí chun Grafa Faisnéise a Chríochnú', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Αφηρημένα γραφήματα και αφηρημένες διαδρομές για την ολοκλήρωση γραφήματος γνώσης', 'hu': 'Absztrakt grafikonok és absztrakt útvonalak a tudásgraf befejezéséhez', 'it': 'Grafici astratti e percorsi astratti per il completamento del grafico della conoscenza', 'kk': 'Білім графикалық толтыру үшін абстракты графиктер мен абстракты жолдар', 'lt': 'Žinių grafikų užbaigimo abstraktūs grafikai ir abstraktūs keliai', 'mk': 'Апстрактни графички и апстрактни патишта за комплетирање на знаменски график', 'ms': 'Graf Abstrakt dan Laluan Abstrakt untuk Pelengkapan Graf Pengetahuan', 'ml': 'അറിവുള്ള ഗ്രാഫ് പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഗ്രാഫ്സുകളും അസ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്ട് പാതുകളും', 'mt': 'Grafiki Abstrati u Rotot Abstrati għat-Tlestija tal-Grafiki tal-Għarfien', 'mn': 'Абстракт график болон Абстракт график дуусгах зам', 'pl': 'Abstrakcyjne wykresy i abstrakcyjne ścieżki do uzupełniania wykresu wiedzy', 'no': 'Abstrakt grafikk og abstrakt baner for fullføring av kjennomsnittgrafen', 'ro': 'Grafice abstracte și căi abstracte pentru finalizarea graficului de cunoaștere', 'sr': 'Abstraktivni grafi i abstraktivni putevi za kompletnost znanja grafika', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Isticmaal', 'sv': 'Abstrakta grafer och abstrakta vägar för färdigställande av kunskapsgrafer', 'ta': 'அறிவு வரைப்படம் முடிப்பதற்கான வரைப்படங்களை மற்றும் சுற்றி பாதைகளை நீக்கு', 'ur': 'علم گراف کامل کے لئے ابسٹرک گراف اور ابسٹرک راستے', 'uz': 'Jadvalni toĘ»ldirish', 'vi': 'Bản tóm tắt và mặc định hình thức hoàn thành', 'bg': 'Абстрактни графики и абстрактни пътища за завършване на графиката на знанието', 'nl': 'Abstracte grafieken en abstracte paden voor de voltooiing van de kennisgrafiek', 'de': 'Abstrakte Graphen und abstrakte Pfade zur Vervollständigung von Wissensgrafiken', 'da': 'Abstrakte grafer og abstrakte veje til viden graf fuldførelse', 'id': 'Graf Abstrakt dan Jalan Abstrakt untuk Penyempurnaan Graf Pengetahuan', 'ko': '지식도 완비된 추상도와 추상적 경로', 'hr': 'Abstraktične grafike i Abstraktične puteve za kompletnost znanja grafika', 'fa': 'گراف\u200cها و مسیرهای ابستراک برای کامل گراف دانش', 'sw': 'Tafsiri na Kuondoa Njia kwa Kumaliza Graph ya Sayansi', 'af': 'Abstrakte Grafie en Abstrakte Pad vir kennis Grafie Voltooiïng', 'am': 'gradients-action', 'tr': 'Bilen Graph Tamamlandyrmasy üçin grafikler we Abstrakt Yoklar', 'sq': 'Grafikë abstrakte dhe rrugë abstrakte për kompletimin e grafikut të njohurive', 'bn': 'জ্ঞান গ্রাফ সম্পূর্ণের জন্য গ্রাফ এবং আবর্জনা পাথ আবর্জনা করো', 'hy': 'Գիտելու գրաֆիկի ավարտին վերացական գրաֆիկներ և վերացական ուղիներ', 'bs': 'Abstraktivni grafi i abstraktivni putevi za kompletnost znanja grafika', 'az': 'Bil톛n Grafik tamamlamas캼 칲칞칲n Abstrakt Grafikl톛r v톛 Abstrakt Yollar', 'ca': 'Gràfics abstracts i camis abstracts per a completar el gràfic del coneixement', 'cs': 'Abstraktní grafy a abstraktní cesty pro dokončení znalostního grafu', 'fi': 'Abstraktit kaaviot ja abstraktit polut tietografiikan viimeistelyyn', 'et': 'Abstraktsed graafikud ja abstraktsed teed teadmiste graafiku lõpetamiseks', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': 'Abstract Graphs and Abstract Paths for Knowledge Graph Completion', 'sk': 'Abstraktni grafi in abstraktne poti za dokončanje grafikona znanja', 'he': 'Graphs Abstract and Abstract Paths for Knowledge Graph Completion', 'bo': 'tract Graphs and Abstract paths for Knowledge Graph Completion'}
{'en': 'Knowledge graphs, which provide numerous facts in a machine-friendly format, are incomplete. Information that we induce from such graphs   e.g. entity embeddings, relation representations or patterns   will be affected by the imbalance in the information captured in the graph   by biasing representations, or causing us to miss potential patterns. To partially compensate for this situation we describe a method for representing knowledge graphs that capture an intensional representation of the original extensional information. This representation is very compact, and it abstracts away from individual links, allowing us to find better path candidates, as shown by the results of link prediction using this information.', 'ar': 'الرسوم البيانية المعرفية ، التي تقدم العديد من الحقائق بتنسيق مناسب للآلة ، غير مكتملة. المعلومات التي نحصل عليها من هذه الرسوم البيانية - على سبيل المثال تتأثر عمليات دمج الكيانات أو تمثيلات العلاقات أو الأنماط - باختلال التوازن في المعلومات التي يتم التقاطها في الرسم البياني - عن طريق التمثيلات المنحازة ، أو التسبب في تفويتنا للأنماط المحتملة. للتعويض جزئيًا عن هذا الموقف ، نصف طريقة لتمثيل الرسوم البيانية المعرفية التي تلتقط تمثيلًا مكثفًا للمعلومات التوسعية الأصلية. هذا التمثيل مضغوط للغاية ، وهو يبتعد عن الروابط الفردية ، مما يسمح لنا بالعثور على مرشحين أفضل للمسار ، كما هو موضح في نتائج تنبؤ الارتباط باستخدام هذه المعلومات.', 'es': 'Los gráficos de conocimiento, que proporcionan numerosos datos en un formato amigable con las máquinas, están incompletos. La información que indujimos a partir de dichos gráficos, por ejemplo, incrustaciones de entidades, representaciones de relaciones o patrones, se verá afectada por el desequilibrio en la información capturada en el gráfico, al sesgar las representaciones o hacer que no tengamos patrones potenciales. Para compensar parcialmente esta situación, describimos un método para representar gráficos de conocimiento que capturan una representación intencional de la información extensional original. Esta representación es muy compacta y se abstrae de los enlaces individuales, lo que nos permite encontrar mejores candidatos de ruta, como lo muestran los resultados de la predicción de enlaces utilizando esta información.', 'pt': 'Os gráficos de conhecimento, que fornecem vários fatos em um formato amigável à máquina, estão incompletos. Informações que induzimos a partir de tais gráficos – por exemplo, Embeddings de entidades, representações de relações ou padrões – serão afetados pelo desequilíbrio nas informações capturadas no gráfico – por representações tendenciosas, ou fazendo com que percamos padrões potenciais. Para compensar parcialmente esta situação descrevemos um método para representar grafos de conhecimento que capturam uma representação intencional da informação extensional original. Essa representação é muito compacta e abstrai links individuais, permitindo-nos encontrar melhores candidatos a caminhos, como mostrado pelos resultados da previsão de links usando essas informações.', 'fr': "Les graphiques de connaissances, qui fournissent de nombreux faits dans un format convivial pour les machines, sont incomplets. Les informations que nous induisons à partir de tels graphiques — par exemple les intégrations d'entités, les représentations de relation ou les modèles — seront affectées par le déséquilibre des informations capturées dans le graphique — en biaisant les représentations ou en nous faisant oublier des modèles potentiels. Pour compenser partiellement cette situation, nous décrivons une méthode de représentation des graphes de connaissances qui capturent une représentation intentionnelle des informations d'extension originales. Cette représentation est très compacte, et elle fait abstraction des liens individuels, ce qui nous permet de trouver de meilleurs candidats de chemin, comme le montrent les résultats de la prédiction de liens utilisant ces informations.", 'ja': '機械に優しい形式で多数の事実を提供するナレッジグラフは不完全です。このようなグラフから誘導される情報（エンティティ埋め込み、関係表現、パターンなど）は、グラフに取り込まれた情報の不均衡によって、表現に偏りを生じたり、潜在的なパターンを見逃したりすることによって影響を受けます。この状況を部分的に補うために、元の拡張情報のインテンショナルな表現を取り込んだ知識グラフを表す方法を説明する。この表現は非常にコンパクトで、個々のリンクから抽象化され、この情報を使用したリンク予測の結果によって示されるように、より良いパス候補を見つけることができます。', 'zh': '知图谱以机器好式给事,不全。 吾辈以此图导之 - 如实体嵌入,关系模式 - 将受图中获息不平之 - 以偏倚示之,或致我辈失于潜在之式。 所以补偿者,言知图谱之道,图谱得始也。 此甚紧凑,抽象单链接,使得佳径候选者,如用此链接占。', 'ru': 'Графики знаний, которые предоставляют многочисленные факты в машиночитаемом формате, являются неполными. Информация, которую мы индуцируем из таких графиков – например, вложения сущностей, представления отношений или шаблоны – будет зависеть от дисбаланса в информации, захваченной на графике – смещением представлений, или заставляя нас пропустить потенциальные шаблоны. Чтобы частично компенсировать эту ситуацию, мы описываем метод представления графов знаний, которые захватывают интенсивное представление исходной экстенсивной информации. Это представление очень компактное и абстрагируется от отдельных ссылок, позволяя нам находить лучшие варианты пути, как показывают результаты предсказания ссылок, используя эту информацию.', 'hi': 'ज्ञान रेखांकन, जो मशीन के अनुकूल प्रारूप में कई तथ्य प्रदान करते हैं, अधूरे हैं। जानकारी है कि हम इस तरह के रेखांकन से प्रेरित - उदाहरण के लिए इकाई embeddings, संबंध प्रतिनिधित्व या पैटर्न - ग्राफ में कब्जा कर ली गई जानकारी में असंतुलन से प्रभावित होगा - पूर्वाग्रह प्रतिनिधित्व से, या हमें संभावित पैटर्न याद करने के लिए कारण. आंशिक रूप से इस स्थिति के लिए क्षतिपूर्ति करने के लिए हम ज्ञान रेखांकन का प्रतिनिधित्व करने के लिए एक विधि का वर्णन करते हैं जो मूल विस्तारात्मक जानकारी के एक गहन प्रतिनिधित्व को कैप्चर करता है। यह प्रतिनिधित्व बहुत कॉम्पैक्ट है, और यह व्यक्तिगत लिंक से दूर है, जिससे हमें बेहतर पथ उम्मीदवारों को खोजने की अनुमति मिलती है, जैसा कि इस जानकारी का उपयोग करके लिंक भविष्यवाणी के परिणामों द्वारा दिखाया गया है।', 'ga': 'Tá graif eolais, a sholáthraíonn fíricí iomadúla i bhformáid atá oiriúnach don mheaisín, neamhiomlán. Faisnéis a tharraingímid ó ghraif dá leithéid – m.sh. beidh tionchar ag an éagothroime san fhaisnéis a ghlactar sa ghraf ar leabú aonáin, ar léiriú gaolta nó ar phatrúin – trí uiríll claonta, nó a chuirfeadh orainn patrúin fhéideartha a chailleann. Chun an cás seo a chúiteamh i bpáirt déanaimid cur síos ar mhodh chun graif eolais a léiriú a ghlacann léiriú dian ar an mbuneolas sínte. Tá an léiriú seo an-dlúth, agus achoimríonn sé ar shiúl ó naisc aonair, rud a ligeann dúinn teacht ar iarrthóirí cosáin níos fearr, mar atá léirithe ag torthaí tuar naisc ag baint úsáide as an fhaisnéis seo.', 'el': 'Τα γραφήματα γνώσης, τα οποία παρέχουν πολλά στοιχεία σε μια φιλική προς το μηχάνημα μορφή, είναι ελλιπή. Οι πληροφορίες που προκαλούμε από τέτοια γραφήματα – π.χ. ενσωμάτωση οντοτήτων, αναπαραστάσεις σχέσεων ή μοτίβα – θα επηρεαστούν από την ανισορροπία στις πληροφορίες που συλλαμβάνονται στο γράφημα – με προκατάληψη αναπαραστάσεων ή προκαλώντας μας να χάσουμε πιθανά πρότυπα. Για μερική αντιστάθμιση αυτής της κατάστασης περιγράφουμε μια μέθοδο αναπαράστασης γραφικών γνώσεων που αποτυπώνουν μια εντατική αναπαράσταση των αρχικών επεκτατικών πληροφοριών. Αυτή η αναπαράσταση είναι πολύ συμπαγής, και αφαιρεί μακριά από μεμονωμένους συνδέσμους, επιτρέποντας μας να βρούμε καλύτερους υποψήφιους διαδρομής, όπως δείχνουν τα αποτελέσματα της πρόβλεψης σύνδεσης χρησιμοποιώντας αυτές τις πληροφορίες.', 'hu': 'A tudásdiagramok, amelyek számos tényt szolgáltatnak gépbarát formátumban, hiányosak. Az ilyen grafikonokból indukált információkat – például entitások beágyazását, kapcsolatreprezentációkat vagy mintákat – befolyásolja a grafikonban rögzített információk egyensúlytalansága – a reprezentációk elfogultságával, vagy a potenciális minták hiányával. Ennek a helyzetnek részben kompenzálására leírunk egy olyan módszert, amely az eredeti extenziós információ intenzív ábrázolását rögzíti. Ez a megjelenítés nagyon kompakt, és elvont az egyes linkektől, lehetővé téve számunkra, hogy jobb útvonaljelölteket találjunk, amint azt a linkelőrejelzés eredményei mutatják ezen információk felhasználásával.', 'ka': 'მეცნიერების გრაფიკები, რომელიც მრავალი ფაქტებს მაქინის მეგობრებელი ფორმატისთვის, არიან დასრულებული. ინფორმაცია, რომელიც ჩვენ ასეთი გრაფიკებიდან გამოვიყენებთ - მაგალითად ელექტიკის შემოწყვება, შესახებ გამოსახულებები ან მონაცემებები - იქნება ინფორმაციის განმავლობაზე, რომელიც გრაფიკში ჩატვირდება ინფორმაცი ამ სიტუაციაზე ნაწილად კონსპენცირებით ჩვენ აღწერეთ მეტი, რომელიც ცნობიერების გრაფიკების გამოსახულებას, რომელიც ინტენსციონალური გამოსახულებას აღწერ ეს გამოსახულება ძალიან კომპექტურია, და ის აბსტრაქტირება ინდიველური კონდიდენტების განმავლობაზე, როგორც გამოიყენება ამ ინფორმაციას გამოიყენებული კონდიდენტების გასა', 'it': 'I grafici delle conoscenze, che forniscono numerosi fatti in un formato di facile utilizzo delle macchine, sono incompleti. Le informazioni che induciamo da tali grafici – ad esempio incorporazioni di entità, rappresentazioni di relazioni o modelli – saranno influenzate dallo squilibrio delle informazioni catturate nel grafico – distorcendo le rappresentazioni, o causando la perdita di potenziali modelli. Per compensare parzialmente questa situazione descriviamo un metodo per rappresentare grafici di conoscenza che catturano una rappresentazione intensiva delle informazioni estensionali originali. Questa rappresentazione è molto compatta, e astrae lontano dai singoli link, permettendoci di trovare candidati di percorso migliori, come dimostrano i risultati della previsione dei link utilizzando queste informazioni.', 'kk': 'Мәлімет графиктері, машиналық пішімінде көптеген факттерді көрсетеді, толық емес. Бұл графиктердің мәліметі - мысалы, нысандарды ендіру, қатынастығы не үлгілерді - графикте тартылған мәліметтердің дисбалансын әсер етеді - немесе қатынастық үлгілерді жоғалтыру үшін немесе қатынастық үлгілерді өзгерту ү Бұл жағдайда бөлшекті бөлшектеу үшін білім графиктерін көрсету әдісін таңдаймыз. Бұл бастапқы кеңейтілген мәліметтің тәжірибесін түсіндіреді. Бұл таңбаша өте сәйкес, бұл жеке сілтемелерден қашыққа қашыққан, бұл мәліметті қолданып сілтемелердің алдындағы нәтижелерін көрсетуге мүмкіндік береді.', 'mk': 'Графиците за знаење, кои обезбедуваат бројни факти во формат пријателски со машината, се нецелосни. Информациите кои ги индустрираме од ваквите графики – на пример, вградувањата на ентитетите, претставувањата на односите или шемите – ќе бидат влијани на нерамнотежата во информациите снимени во графикот – со предрасудување на претставувањата или со тоа што ќе не пропушти потенцијалните шеми. За делумно да ја компензираме оваа ситуација опишуваме методот за претставување на графиците на знаење кои снимаат интензионално претставување на оригиналните екстресионални информации. Оваа претстава е многу компактна и апстрактна далеку од индивидуалните врски, што ни овозможува да најдеме подобри кандидати за пат, како што покажуваат резултатите од предвидувањето на врските користејќи ги овие информации.', 'lt': 'Žinių grafikai, kuriuose pateikiama daug faktų mašinoms palankiu formatu, yra neišsamūs. Information that we induce from such graphs – e.g. entity embeddings, relation representations or patterns – will be affected by the imbalance in the information captured in the graph – by biasing representations, or causing us to miss potential patterns.  Norėdami iš dalies kompensuoti šią padėtį, apibūdiname metodą žinių grafikams, kuriuose pateikiamas intensyvus pradinės išplėstinės informacijos atspaudimas. Šis atstovavimas yra labai kompaktiškas, jis abstraktuojamas nuo atskirų ryšių ir leidžia mums rasti geresnių kelių kandidatus, kaip rodo sąsajų prognozės rezultatai naudojant šią informaciją.', 'ms': 'Knowledge graphs, which provide numerous facts in a machine-friendly format, are incomplete.  Maklumat yang kita induk dari graf-graf tersebut -- contohnya penerbangan entiti, perwakilan hubungan atau corak-corak -- akan dipengaruhi oleh ketidakseimbangan maklumat yang ditangkap dalam graf -- dengan membiasikan perwakilan, atau menyebabkan kita melewatkan corak-corak berpotensi. Untuk sebahagian membalas situasi ini kami menggambarkan kaedah untuk mewakili graf pengetahuan yang menangkap perwakilan intensif maklumat ekstensif asal. Perwakilan ini sangat sempit, dan ia abstrak jauh dari pautan individu, membolehkan kita mencari calon laluan yang lebih baik, seperti yang dipaparkan oleh keputusan ramalan pautan menggunakan maklumat ini.', 'ml': 'ഒരു യന്ത്ര- സുഹൃത്തുക്കളുടെ ഫോര്\u200dമാറ്റില്\u200d അധികമായ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്ന അറിവുകള്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ്രാഫുകള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമ ഇത്തരം ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും നമ്മള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d- ഉദാഹരണമായ വസ്തുക്കളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d, ബന്ധപ്രതിനിധികളോ രൂപങ്ങളോ എന്നിവയുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഗ്ര ഈ സാഹചര്യത്തിന് ഭാഗമായി പ്രതിനിധിക്കാന്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു രീതി ഈ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d വളരെ സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമാണ്, അത് വ്യക്തിപരമായ ബന്ധങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും അകറ്റുനില്\u200dക്കുന്നു. ഈ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ലിങ്ക് പ്രവചന', 'mt': 'Grafiki tal-għarfien, li jipprovdu bosta fatti f’format faċli għall-magna, mhumiex kompluti. L-informazzjoni li ninduċu minn dawn il-grafiki – pereżempju l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-entitajiet, ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet tar-relazzjonijiet jew ix-xejriet – se tiġi affettwata mill-iżbilanċ fl-informazzjoni li tinġabar fil-grafika – billi nippreġudikaw ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet, jew inkella nikkawżaw li nieqsu mix-xejriet potenzjali. Biex tikkumpensa parzjalment għal din is-sitwazzjoni niddeskrivu metodu għar-rappreżentazzjoni tal-grafiċi tal-għarfien li jaqbdu rappreżentazzjoni intensifikata tal-informazzjoni estensiva oriġinali. Din ir-rappreżentanza hija kompatta ħafna, u tirrestrinġi ’l bogħod minn rabtiet individwali, u tippermettilna nsibu kandidati għal triq aħjar, kif muri mir-riżultati tat-tbassir ta’ rabta bl-użu ta’ din l-informazzjoni.', 'mn': 'Мэдлэг график, машины найзуудтай хэлбэрээр олон зүйлийг хангадаг нь бүтэлгүйтгүй. Бидний ийм графикаас үүсгэсэн мэдээлэл, жишээ нь нэгж, харилцаа илэрхийлэл, загваруудын харилцаа, графикад авсан мэдээлэлд тэгш байдал нөлөөлж чадна. Энэ нөхцөл байдлын төлөө төлөө төлөөлөхийн тулд бид анхны нэмэлт мэдээлэл дээрх хүчтэй дүрслэлийг үзүүлэх мэдлэг графикийг илэрхийлдэг аргыг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ илэрхийлэл маш нарийн бөгөөд энэ нь хувийн холбоотой холбоотой бөгөөд энэ мэдээллийг ашиглан холбоотой байдлын үр дүнд бидэнд илүү сайхан зам захирагчдыг олох боломжтой болгодог.', 'no': 'Kvitningsgrafar, som tilbyr mange faktar i eit maskinevenn format, er ikkje fullført. Informasjon som vi induserer frå slike grafen – f.eks. innbygging av einingar, relasjonsrepresentasjonar eller mønsterer – vil bli påvirka av ulikheten i informasjonen som er henta i grafen – ved å forvirra representasjonar eller føra oss til å mista potensielle mønsterer. For å delvis kompensera denne situasjonen, beskriver vi ein metode for å representera kunnskapsgrafene som får eit intensivt representasjon av den opprinnelige utvidingsinformasjonen. Denne representasjonen er svært kompakt, og det abstraktar vekk frå individuelle lenkjer, og tillater oss å finna bedre bankandidatar, som viste av resultatet av forhåndsvising av lenkjer med denne informasjonen.', 'pl': 'Wykresy wiedzy, które dostarczają licznych faktów w przyjaznym dla maszyny formacie, są niekompletne. Informacje, które wywołujemy z takich wykresów – np. osadzenia jednostek, reprezentacje relacji lub wzorce – będą miały wpływ na zakłócenie równowagi w informacjach przechwytywanych na wykresie – poprzez stronnicze reprezentacje lub powodujące, że pominiemy potencjalne wzorce. Aby częściowo zrekompensować tę sytuację opisujemy metodę reprezentowania wykresów wiedzy, które przechwytują intensywną reprezentację oryginalnej informacji rozszerzeniowej. Reprezentacja ta jest bardzo kompaktowa i abstrahuje z dala od poszczególnych linków, co pozwala nam znaleźć lepszych kandydatów ścieżki, o czym pokazują wyniki predykcji linków za pomocą tych informacji.', 'ro': 'Graficele cunoștințelor, care oferă numeroase fapte într-un format ușor de utilizat, sunt incomplete. Informațiile pe care le inducem din astfel de grafice – de exemplu, încorporările entităților, reprezentările relațiilor sau modelele – vor fi afectate de dezechilibrul informațiilor capturate în grafic – prin reprezentări părtinitoare sau cauzându-ne să pierdem potențiale modele. Pentru a compensa parțial această situație descriem o metodă de reprezentare a graficelor cunoașterii care captează o reprezentare intensivă a informațiilor extensionale originale. Această reprezentare este foarte compactă și abstracționează departe de legăturile individuale, permițându-ne să găsim candidați de traseu mai buni, așa cum arată rezultatele predicției link-urilor folosind aceste informații.', 'sr': 'Znanstveni grafiki, koji pružaju mnoge činjenice u obliku prijatnog mašine, nisu kompletni. Informacije koje izazivamo iz takvih grafika – na primer integracija entiteta, odnose ili obrazaca – će utjecati na nelegalnost u informacijama uhvaćenim u grafiku – predrasudajući predstavljanja ili uzrokovati da propustimo potencijalne obrazace. Da bi delimično kompenzirali ovu situaciju opisali smo metodu za predstavljanje grafika znanja koja uključuje intenzivnu predstavu originalnih proširenih informacija. Ova predstava je vrlo kompaktna, i odvaja se od pojedinih veza, omogućavajući nam da nađemo bolje kandidate puteva, kao što je pokazalo rezultati predviđanja veza koristeći ovu informaciju.', 'so': 'Shaqooyinka aqoonta, taasoo ku fidiya waxyaabo badan oo ku saabsan qaabka machine-friendly, waa dhamaan. Macluumaadka aan sawiradaas ka soo bandhigi karno, tusaale ahaan qalabka xiriirka ama noocyada- waxaa saameyn ku yeelan doona si siman ah, macluumaadka kaarka lagu qoray - si gaar ah ama nooga baaqan karo noocyada suurtagalka ah. Si loo qeyb uga bixiyo xaaladan, waxaynu u qornaa qaab ku saabsan sawirada aqoonta oo ku soo bandhigaya macluumaadka ugu horeeya. Aqoonsigu waa mid aad u adag, wuxuuna ka fogaadaa xiriir gaar ah, waxayna inagu raadinaysaa inaannu helno kandidiilooyin aad u wanaagsan, sida loo tusayo dhamaadka bandhiggan isticmaalka macluumaadkan.', 'si': 'දැනගැනීම් ග්\u200dරාෆික්ස්, මැෂින් යාළුවන් විදියට ගොඩක් ඇත්ත දෙන්න පුළුවන්. අපි ඒ වගේ ග්\u200dරාෆ් වලින් ඉන්න තොරතුරු - උදාහරණයෙන් ඉන්බින්ඩිංග්, සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය නැති ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය වලින් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වි මේ තත්වය සඳහා අංකයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරගන්න, අපි දන්න විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විස්තර කරනවා ඒ වගේම මුලින් විස්තර ත මේ ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය ගොඩක් සම්පූර්ණයි, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන සම්පූර්ණයෙන් පිටවෙනවා,', 'sv': 'Kunskapsgrafer, som ger många fakta i ett maskinvänligt format, är ofullständiga. Information som vi framkallar från sådana grafer – t.ex. entitetsinbäddningar, relationsrepresentationer eller mönster – kommer att påverkas av obalansen i informationen som fångas in i grafen – genom att partiska representationer eller få oss att missa potentiella mönster. För att delvis kompensera för denna situation beskriver vi en metod för att representera kunskapsgrafer som fångar en intensionell representation av den ursprungliga extensionsinformationen. Denna representation är mycket kompakt och abstraherar bort från enskilda länkar, vilket gör att vi kan hitta bättre sökkandidater, vilket framgår av resultaten av länkprognosen med hjälp av denna information.', 'ta': 'அறிவு வரைபடம், இயந்திரம்- நண்பர் வடிவத்தில் பல உண்மைகளை வழங்குகிறது, முழுமையானது. இத்தகைய வரைப்படங்களிலிருந்து நாம் தொடங்கும் தகவல் - உதாரணமாக பொருள் உள்ளிடுதல், தொடர்பு பிரிவுகள் அல்லது வடிவங்கள் - வரைப்படத்தில் பிடித்த தகவல்களின் ஒழுங்கிலிரு இந்த நிலைக்கு பகுதியாக தீர்ப்பு அளிக்க நாம் அறிவு வரைபடங்களை குறிப்பிட ஒரு முறையை விவரிக்கிறோம். மூல விரிவாக தகவலின்  இந்த குறிப்பிடுதல் மிகவும் ஒப்புரையானது, அது தனித்தொடர்புகளிலிருந்து வெளியேறுகிறது, சிறந்த பாதையின் தேர்வாளர்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க', 'ur': 'علم گراف، جو ماشین دوست رکھنے والی فرمود میں بہت سی حقیقتیں پیش کرتی ہیں، بے پوری ہیں. یہ معلومات جو ہم اس طرح کے گراف سے منتقل کرتے ہیں، جیسے انٹیٹی امبرڈینگ، رابطہ نمونات یا نمونٹر، ان معلومات کی نابرابری کے ذریعے گراف میں پکڑی ہوئی معلومات کے ذریعے اثر دیتی ہے، نمونٹوں کی نابرابری کے ذریعے، یا ہم کو امکانات الٹرو اس موقعیت کے لئے حصہ سے مزدوری کرنے کے لئے ہم علم گراف کی تصویر کرنے کے لئے ایک طریقہ بیان کرتے ہیں جو اصلی وسعت معلومات کی ایک مضبوط تصویر حاصل کرتا ہے۔ یہ نمایش بہت پیچیدہ ہے، اور یہ شخصی لینک سے دور ہوتا ہے، اور ہمیں اس معلومات کے مطابق بہترین مسیر کاندینڈ تلاش کی اجازت دیتا ہے جس طرح لینک پیش بینی کا نتیجہ دکھایا گیا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Ushbu grafikdan ishlab chiqaruvchi maʼlumot, masalan, ma'lumotning taʼminotlari, bogʻ'liq representations yoki shakllar bilan grafikdagi maʼlumotlarning balandligi qo'llaniladi, yoki bizga qo'shish qoidalarini yoʻqolishimiz mumkin. Bu holatning qismni qismga murakkab qilish uchun biz ilmiy grafiklarni koʻrsatish usulini aytishimiz mumkin, bu asl kengaytmalarning asl kengaytmalarni aniqlash mumkin. Bu tashkilotni juda murakkab qiladi, va bu bir xil bogʻlamalardan ajratib chiqaradi, bizga yaxshi yoʻl kandidalarni topish imkoniyatini beradi. Bu maʼlumot yordamida bogʻ'lash natijalarini ko'rsatish mumkin.", 'vi': "Biểu đồ về tri thức, cung cấp nhiều dữ liệu theo dạng máy tính, không đầy đủ. Thông tin mà chúng ta cung cấp từ các biểu đồ như thế (v.d. sự nhúng tập hợp, các biểu tượng tương quan hay mô hình) sẽ bị ảnh hưởng bởi sự mất cân bằng trong các thông tin thu được trong đồ thị'bằng các biểu tượng làm lung tung', hoặc làm chúng ta lỡ mất các mô hình tiềm năng. Để bù đắp phần nào cho tình huống này, chúng tôi mô tả một phương pháp đại diện đồ thị về kiến thức, thu thập các mô tả nhiệt độ của thông tin phụ thuộc nội tâm. Cách biểu diễn này rất gọn, và nó tách khỏi liên kết cá nhân, cho phép chúng ta tìm những ứng viên đường dẫn tốt hơn, như kết quả dự đoán liên kết với thông tin này.", 'bg': 'Графите на знанието, които предоставят множество факти в подходящ за машината формат, са непълни. Информацията, която индуцираме от такива графики - например вграждане на обекти, представяне на релации или модели - ще бъде засегната от дисбаланса в информацията, уловена в графиката - чрез пристрастяване на представянето или каране ни да пропускаме потенциални модели. За частично компенсиране на тази ситуация описваме метод за представяне на знателни графики, които улавят интензивно представяне на първоначалната разширителна информация. Това представяне е много компактно и абстракира отделните връзки, което ни позволява да намерим по-добри кандидати по пътя, както показват резултатите от прогнозирането на връзките, използвайки тази информация.', 'da': 'Vidensgrafer, som giver mange fakta i et maskinvenligt format, er ufuldstændige. Oplysninger, som vi fremkalder fra sådanne grafer - f.eks. enhedsindlejringer, relationsrepræsentationer eller mønstre - vil blive påvirket af ubalancen i de oplysninger, der indsamles i grafen - ved at forudindstille repræsentationer eller få os til at gå glip af potentielle mønstre. For delvist at kompensere for denne situation beskriver vi en metode til at repræsentere vidensgrafer, der fanger en intensiv repræsentation af den oprindelige extensional information. Denne repræsentation er meget kompakt, og den abstraherer væk fra individuelle links, så vi kan finde bedre stikandidater, som vist af resultaterne af linkforudsigelse ved hjælp af disse oplysninger.', 'hr': 'Znanstveni grafiki, koji pružaju brojne činjenice u obliku prijatnog strojeva, nisu kompletni. Informacije koje izazivamo iz takvih grafika - na primjer ugrađenja subjekta, odnosu predstavljanja ili obrazaca - utjecaju na nelīdznost u informacijama uhvaćenim u grafiku - predrasudajući predstavljanja ili uzrokujući nam propuštanje potencijalnih obrazaca. Da bi djelimično kompenzirali ovu situaciju opisali smo metodu za predstavljanje grafika znanja koja uključuje intenzivno predstavljanje originalnih proširenih informacija. Ova predstava je vrlo kompaktna, i odvlači se od pojedinih veza, omogućavajući nam da nađemo bolje kandidate za putovanje, kao što je pokazalo rezultati predviđanja veze koristeći te informacije.', 'nl': 'Kennisgrafieken, die talrijke feiten in een machinevriendelijk formaat verstrekken, zijn onvolledig. Informatie die we opwekken uit dergelijke grafieken zijn bijvoorbeeld entiteitsinsluitingen, relatievoorstellingen of patronen, zal worden beïnvloed door de onevenwichtigheid in de informatie die in de grafiek wordt vastgelegd door vooringenomene voorstellingen, of waardoor we potentiële patronen missen. Om deze situatie gedeeltelijk te compenseren beschrijven we een methode voor het representeren van kennisgrafieken die een intensionele representatie van de oorspronkelijke uitbreidingsinformatie vastleggen. Deze weergave is zeer compact en abstraheert weg van individuele links, waardoor we betere paden kunnen vinden, zoals blijkt uit de resultaten van linkvoorspelling met behulp van deze informatie.', 'de': 'Wissensgrafiken, die zahlreiche Fakten in einem maschinenfreundlichen Format liefern, sind unvollständig. Informationen, die wir aus solchen Graphen hervorrufen, sind z.B. Entitäteneinbettungen, Beziehungsrepräsentationen oder Muster, die durch das Ungleichgewicht in den im Graphen erfassten Informationen beeinträchtigt werden, indem Darstellungen verzerrt werden oder dazu führen, dass wir potenzielle Muster verpassen. Um diese Situation teilweise auszugleichen, beschreiben wir eine Methode zur Darstellung von Wissensgraphen, die eine intensive Darstellung der ursprünglichen Extensionsinformation erfassen. Diese Darstellung ist sehr kompakt und abstrahiert weg von einzelnen Links, so dass wir bessere Pfadkandidaten finden können, wie die Ergebnisse der Linkprädiktion anhand dieser Informationen zeigen.', 'ko': '지식도는 기계의 우호적인 격식으로 대량의 사실을 제공했지만 완전하지는 않았다.우리는 이러한 그림에서 귀납된 정보, 예를 들어 실체 삽입, 관계 표시 또는 모델 - 그림에서 포착된 정보의 불균형의 영향을 받거나 편차 표시를 통해 잠재적인 모델을 놓치게 된다.이러한 상황을 부분적으로 보완하기 위해 우리는 지식도를 나타내는 방법을 묘사했고 이 지식도는 원시적으로 정보를 확장하는 내포 표현을 포착했다.이러한 표현은 매우 치밀하다. 이것은 하나의 링크에서 추상화되어 더욱 좋은 후보 경로를 찾을 수 있다. 예를 들어 이 정보를 사용한 링크 예측 결과와 같다.', 'fa': 'گرافیک دانش، که واقعیت های زیادی را در یک شکل رابطه به ماشین می دهد، کامل نیستند. اطلاعات که ما از چنین گرافیکها تحت تاثیر قرار می دهیم - مثال جمع کردن واحد، رشته\u200cهای ارتباطی یا الگوها - توسط نابرابری در اطلاعات که در گرافیکه گرفته می\u200cشوند - توسط نمایش\u200cهای نابرابری، یا باعث می\u200cشود که الگوهای پتانسیل را از دست بدیم. برای پاره\u200cای از این موقعیت، ما یک روش برای نمایش گرافیک دانش توصیف می\u200cکنیم که یک نمایش عمومی از اطلاعات متوسط اصلی را گرفته است. این نمایش بسیار پیچیده است، و از لینک\u200cهای فردی دور می\u200cشود، که به ما اجازه می\u200cدهد کاندیدای راه بهتر را پیدا کنیم، همانطور که به نتیجه پیش\u200cبینی ارتباط با استفاده از این اطلاعات نشان داده می\u200cشود.', 'sw': 'Picha za maarifa, ambazo zinatoa ukweli wengi katika mfumo wa mashine yenye urafiki, hazijatikani. Taarifa ambazo tunaanzisha kutoka kwenye picha hizo - kwa mfano, maendeleo ya taasisi, uwakilishi wa mahusiano au mitindo - zitathirika na usawa wa usawa katika taarifa zilizokamatwa katika picha - kwa kuwakilisha upendeleo, au kusababisha kupoteza mifano ya uwezekano. Ili kulipia kwa sehemu ya hali hii tunaelezea njia ya kuwakilisha picha za maarifa ambazo zinaweza kushikilia uwakilishaji wa taarifa za asili. Uwakilishaji huu ni makubaliano makubwa sana, na unajitoa mbali na viungo vya watu binafsi, na kuturuhusu kutafuta wagombea bora zaidi, kama ilivyoonyesha matokeo ya utabiri wa kiungo kwa kutumia taarifa hii.', 'id': 'Knowledge graphs, which provide numerous facts in a machine-friendly format, are incomplete.  Information that we induce from such graphs - e.g. entity embeddings, relation representations or patterns - will be affected by the imbalance in the information captured in the graph - by biasing representations, or causing us to miss potential patterns.  To partially compensate for this situation we describe a method for representing knowledge graphs that capture an intensional representation of the original extensional information.  This representation is very compact, and it abstracts away from individual links, allowing us to find better path candidates, as shown by the results of link prediction using this information.', 'tr': 'Bilen grafikler, maşynyň dosty şeklinde birnäçe fakty tapandyrýarlar, incompler. Böyle grafiklerden industri eden bilgi - mesela entitet içerimleri, ilişkileri ya da örnekleri - grafikte yakalanmış bilgilerin dengesizligi tarafından etkilenecek - örnek biçimdeki ifadeler tarafından, veya bizi potansiyel şablonlardan kaçırmak için yaratacak. Bu durumda biraz kötüleşmek üçin biz başlangıç büyük bilgi grafiklerini ifade etmek için bir yöntem tasvir ediyoruz. Bu surat örän compakdir we bu baglaýyşlardan uzaklaşýar, bize bu maglumaty ullanýan baglaýyş öňünden görkezilýän çykyşyň netijesi üçin has gowy ýunlar tapmalydyrys.', 'af': "Kenningsgrafe, wat veelvuldige fakte verskaf in 'n masjienvriende formaat, is onvolledige. Informasie wat ons van sodanige grafieke induseer - bv. entiteit inbetering, verwanting voorstellings of patrone - sal deur die onverandering in die inligting wat in die graaf gevang is, beperk word, of ons veroorsaak om potensiele patrone te mis. Om gedeeltelik te kompenseer vir hierdie situasie, beskrywe ons 'n metode vir te stel kennis grafieke wat 'n intensieële voorsiening van die oorspronklike uitbreidingsinformasie opneem. Hierdie voorstelling is baie kompakte, en dit abstrakteer weg van individuele skakels, wat ons toelaat om beter pad kandidate te vind, soos vertoon deur die resultate van skakelvoorskou deur hierdie inligting te gebruik.", 'sq': 'Grafiket e njohurive, që ofrojnë fakte të shumta në një format miqësor me makinë, janë të pakompletuara. Information that we induce from such graphs - e.g. entity embeddings, relation representations or patterns - will be affected by the imbalance in the information captured in the graph - by biasing representations, or causing us to miss potential patterns.  To partially compensate for this situation we describe a method for representing knowledge graphs that capture an intensional representation of the original extensional information.  Kjo përfaqësim është shumë kompakt dhe abstrakton larg lidhjeve individuale, duke na lejuar të gjejmë kandidatë më të mirë, siç tregohet nga rezultatet e parashikimit të lidhjeve duke përdorur këtë informacion.', 'am': 'የእውቀት ቀለም እንደነዚህ ካላት አካባቢ፣ የግንኙነት አካባቢ ወይም ዓይነቶች እና የምናሳውቀው መረጃ - በአካባቢ መልዕክቶች፣ ወይም የቻይሎችን ዓይነቶች ማሳየት በሚያሰኘው መረጃዎች በሚያስጨንቁናል፡፡ ለዚህ ጉዳይ ክፍል ለማድረግ የአውቀትን ቀለሞች ለማሳየት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ This representation is very compact, and it abstracts away from individual links, allowing us to find better path candidates, as shown by the results of link prediction using this information.', 'hy': 'Գիտելու գրաֆիկները, որոնք բազմաթիվ փաստեր են տրամադրում մեքենայի ընդունակ ֆորմատով, անկատարյալ են: Տեղեկատվությունը, որը մենք արտադրում ենք նման գրաֆիկներից, օրինակ, էության ներդրումներից, հարաբերությունների ներկայացումներից կամ կաղապարներից, ազդում է գրաֆիկի ներկայացված տեղեկատվության անհավասարակշռության վրա, կողմնակալ ներկայացումների վրա, կամ մեզ ստիպում է բաց թողնել պո Այս իրավիճակի համար մասամբ փոխարինելու համար մենք նկարագրում ենք գիտելիքի գրաֆիկների ներկայացման մեթոդը, որը ներկայացնում է սկզբնական աճող տեղեկատվության ինտենսիվ ներկայացումը: Այս ներկայացումը շատ խիստ է, և այն վերացնում է անհատական կապերից, թույլ տալով մեզ ավելի լավ ճանապարհ գտնել թեկնածուներ, ինչպես ցույց են տալիս կապերի կանխատեսման արդյունքները, օգտագործելով այս տեղեկատվությունը:', 'az': 'Bilim grafikləri, makinelə dostluq format ında çoxlu faktları təmin edirlər, tamamlanmamışlar. Bütün graflardan təşkil etdiyimiz məlumatlar - məsələn təşkil məlumatları, əlaqələri və örtükləri - grafikdə tutulmuş məlumatların müqabiliyyətinə səbəb ediləcək - təşkil g östəricilər və ya potensial örtükləri itirəcək. Bu şəkildə bir qismi ilə kompensə etmək üçün biz özünün genişliyi bilgi grafiklərini göstərmək üçün bir metodu təsdiqləyirik. Bu göstəricisi çox kompaktdır, və bu məlumatları istifadə edərək, bizə daha yaxşı yol kandidātlarını tapmağa imkan verir.', 'ca': 'Els gràfics del coneixement, que proporcionen molts fets en un format propi a la màquina, són incomplets. Information that we induce from such graphs - e.g. entity embeddings, relation representations or patterns - will be affected by the imbalance in the information captured in the graph - by biasing representations, or causing us to miss potential patterns.  To partially compensate for this situation we describe a method for representing knowledge graphs that capture an intensional representation of the original extensional information.  This representation is very compact, and it abstracts away from individual links, allowing us to find better path candidates, as shown by the results of link prediction using this information.', 'bn': 'জ্ঞান গ্রাফ, যা মেশিন-বন্ধুত্ব বিন্যাসে অনেক তথ্য প্রদান করে, সম্পূর্ণ। এই ধরনের গ্রাফ থেকে আমরা তথ্য শুরু করি- যেমন সাধারণ প্রতিনিধিত্ব, সম্পর্কের প্রতিনিধিত্ব অথবা প্যাটারেন্ট- গ্রাফের তথ্যের মধ্যে অসমান্য ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত হবে- বৈ এই পরিস্থিতির প্রতি অংশীদারিত্ব দেয়ার জন্য আমরা জ্ঞান গ্রাফের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করার একটি পদ্ধতি বর্ণনা করি যা মূল বিস্তৃত তথ্ এই প্রতিনিধিত্ব খুব কঠিন এবং এটি ব্যক্তিগত লিঙ্ক থেকে দূরে সরে যায়, যাতে আমাদের ভালো পথপ্রার্থী খুঁজে বের করতে দেয়, যেমন এই তথ্য ব্যবহার কর', 'cs': 'Grafy znalostí, které poskytují mnoho faktů ve strojově přívětivém formátu, jsou neúplné. Informace, které z těchto grafů vyvoláváme, jsou např. vložení entit, reprezentace vztahů nebo vzorce, budou ovlivněny nerovnováhou v informacích zachycených v grafu předmětem reprezentace, nebo způsobením, že zmeškáme potenciální vzorce. K částečné kompenzaci této situace popisujeme metodu reprezentace znalostních grafů, které zachycují intenzivní reprezentaci původních rozšířených informací. Tato reprezentace je velmi kompaktní a abstrahuje od jednotlivých odkazů, což nám umožňuje najít lepší kandidáty cesty, jak ukazují výsledky predikce odkazů pomocí těchto informací.', 'bs': 'Grafi znanja, koji pružaju mnoge činjenice u području strojeva, nisu kompletni. Informacije koje izazivamo iz takvih grafika - na primjer ugrađenja entiteta, predstavljanja odnosa ili obrazaca - će utjecati na nelegalnost u informacijama uhvaćenim u grafiku - predrasudajući predstavljanja ili uzrokovati nam propuštanje potencijalnih obrazaca. Da bi djelimično kompenzirali ovu situaciju opisali smo metodu predstavljanja grafika znanja koja uključuje intenzivnu predstavu originalnih proširenih informacija. Ova predstava je vrlo kompaktna, i odvaja se od pojedinih veza, omogućavajući nam da nađemo bolje kandidate puteva, kao što je pokazalo rezultati predviđanja veza koristeći te informacije.', 'fi': 'Tietokaaviot, jotka tarjoavat lukuisia faktoja koneystävällisessä muodossa, ovat epätäydellisiä. Tällaisista kaavioista saamiimme tietoihin - esim. entiteettien upotuksiin, suhdeesityksiin tai kuvioihin - vaikuttaa kaavioon tallennetun tiedon epätasapaino - harhauttamalla esityksiä tai jättämällä mahdolliset kuviot huomaamatta. Tämän tilanteen osittaiseksi kompensoimiseksi kuvaamme menetelmää, jolla esitetään tietograafeja, jotka kuvaavat alkuperäisen laajennusinformaation intensiivistä esitystä. Tämä esitys on hyvin kompakti, ja se abstraktoi pois yksittäisistä linkeistä, jolloin voimme löytää parempia polkuehdokkaita, kuten linkin ennustuksen tulokset osoittavat käyttämällä tätä tietoa.', 'et': 'Teadmisgraafikud, mis esitavad masinasõbralikus vormingus arvukaid fakte, on ebatäielikud. Teavet, mida me sellistest graafikutest esile kutsume - näiteks olemite põimimised, seoste esitused või mustrid - mõjutab graafikus kogutud teabe tasakaalustamatus - erapooletud esitused või põhjustavad meile potentsiaalsete mustrite möödumise. Selle olukorra osaliseks kompenseerimiseks kirjeldame meetodit teadmiste graafikute esitamiseks, mis hõlmavad algse laiendusteabe intensiivset esitust. See esitus on väga kompaktne ja see võtab eemale individuaalsed lingid, võimaldades meil leida paremaid tee kandidaate, nagu näitavad lingi ennustamise tulemused kasutades seda teavet.', 'jv': 'Piranti punika (kaantung) informasi sing dibutuhke Ing cah-cah dumateng liyane kanggo ngerasakno iki kita gsasai method kanggo gambar kelangan kelangan langgar nggawe barang kelangan seneng pisan tambah apik kita kelangan informasi tambah apik dhéwé representation', 'sk': 'Grafi znanja, ki zagotavljajo številna dejstva v stroju prijaznem formatu, so nepopolni. Na informacije, ki jih induciramo iz takih grafov - npr. vgradnje entitet, predstavitve relacij ali vzorci - bo vplivalo neravnovesje informacij, zajetih v grafu - s pristranskimi predstavitvami ali zaradi tega, da zamudimo potencialne vzorce. Da bi delno nadomestili to situacijo, opisujemo metodo za predstavitev grafov znanja, ki zajemajo intenzivno predstavitev izvirnih razširitvenih informacij. Ta predstavitev je zelo kompaktna in povzema stran od posameznih povezav, kar nam omogoča, da najdemo boljše kandidate za pot, kot kažejo rezultati napovedi povezav z uporabo teh informacij.', 'he': 'גרפים מידע, שמספקים עובדות רבות בצורה ידידותית למכונה, אינם מלאים. מידע שאנחנו מוציאים מגרפים כאלה - לדוגמא פיצועים של ישויות, מייצגים מערכות יחסים או דפוסים - ישפיע על ידי אי-איזון במידע שנתפס בגרף - על ידי מייצגים משותפים, או לגרום לנו לפספס דפוסים פוטנציאליים. כדי לפצות חלקית על המצב הזה אנחנו מתארים שיטה לייצג גרפים ידועים שמתפסיקים מייצג אינטנסיבי של המידע המקורי. ההצגה הזאת מאוד צמודה, והיא מתרחקת ממקשרים בודדים, מאפשרת לנו למצוא מועמדים בדרך טובה יותר, כפי שנראה על ידי תוצאות חזיון הקשר באמצעות המידע הזה.', 'bo': 'དབྱིན་འབྲི་རིས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་མ་ལག་ལེན་པའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་ནང་དུ་དངོས་འབྲེལ་མང་པོ་བྱིན་མེད། Information that we induce from such graphs - e.g. entity embeddings, relation representations or patterns - will be affected by the imbalance in the information captured in the graph - by biasing representations, or causing us to miss potential patterns. ང་ཚོས་གནས་སྟངས་འདི་ལ་ཆུང་ཤས་བསྡད་དགོས་པ་ཞིག་གིས་གཟུགས་རིས་སྟོན་པའི་དབྱིན་ཡིག་རིས་བཀོད་སྟོན་ཐབས་ཤིག་བྱེད་ This representation is very compact, and it abstracts away from individual links, allowing us to find better path candidates, as shown by the results of link prediction using this information.', 'ha': "Grafiko na saniga, da ke samar da fakta masu yawa cikin tsarin mai kifi-rafiki, ba su cika ba. Agaji da Muke ƙara daga wannan graphogi - misali, filinaiki, masu shiryuwa da mazaɓa da mazaɓa - za'a yi shawara da balanci a cikin shirin da aka kãma shi cikin grafi - da misalin abubuwa, ko ya kusa ya ɓace mana misãlai masu yiwuwa. To, dõmin ya raba rabo musamman wa wannan halin, sai mu bayyana wata hanyoyi wa wakilishi fassarar zane da za'a sami wani mai tsaro na farko na tsari. Wannan mai gaurawa ne mai ƙunci, kuma yana yanke daga linki guda, kuma yana yarda mu sãmi gogoyi mafi alhẽri, kamar da aka nuna matsalan birnin da ke amfani da wannan information."}
{'en': 'Enthymemetic Conditionals', 'ar': 'الشرطية Enthymemetic', 'es': 'Condicionales entimeméticos', 'pt': 'Condicionais Entimeméticos', 'fr': 'Conditionnels enthymétiques', 'ja': '喘息状態', 'hi': 'Enthymemetic Conditionals', 'zh': 'Enthymemetic Conditionals', 'ru': 'ЭНТИМЕМЕТИЧЕСКИЕ условия', 'ga': 'Coinníollacha Eintimiméadacha', 'el': 'Ενθυμομετικοί όροι', 'hu': 'Entimemetikus feltételek', 'ka': 'Enthymemetic Conditions', 'lt': 'Entimetiniai reikalavimai', 'it': 'Condizionamenti entimemetici', 'kk': 'Энтиметикалық шарттар', 'mk': 'Ентиметски услови', 'ms': 'Kondisi Entimetik', 'mn': 'Энтиметик нөхцөлд', 'mt': 'Kundizzjonijiet Entimetiċi', 'ml': 'എന്\u200dട്രിമെറ്റിക് സ്ഥിതികള്\u200d', 'pl': 'Warunki etymemetyczne', 'ro': 'Condiții entimemetice', 'sr': 'Entimetski uslovi', 'no': 'Entimetiske betingelsar', 'so': 'Xaaladaha ganacsiga', 'ta': 'நிலைமீட்டிக் நிபந்தனைகள்', 'si': 'අන්තිමේතික ස්ථිතිය', 'sv': 'Entymemetiska villkor', 'ur': 'انٹیمیٹیک شرط', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thần mê', 'bg': 'Условни ензимеметични вещества', 'nl': 'Entymemetische voorwaarden', 'hr': 'Entimetički uvjeti', 'da': 'Entymemetiske betingelser', 'de': 'Enthymemetische Bedingungen', 'id': 'Kondisi Entimetik', 'fa': 'شرایط\u200cهای متفاوتی', 'ko': '조건문', 'sw': 'Matukio ya kiuchumi', 'tr': 'Gnome Ortamy', 'af': 'Entimematiese Bedinge', 'sq': 'kushte entememetike', 'am': 'ሁኔታ፦', 'az': 'Entimetik ≈ü…ôkill…ôr', 'hy': 'Էնթիմետիկ պայմաններում', 'bn': 'এন্টাইমেটিক অবস্থা', 'bs': 'Entimetički uvjeti', 'ca': 'Condicions entimètiques', 'cs': 'Entymemetické podmínky', 'et': 'Entümeetilised tingimused', 'fi': 'Entymeemeettiset ehdot', 'jv': 'Samsul Entiremet', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'תנאי אנטימפטי', 'sk': 'Entimemetični pogoji', 'bo': 'འོད་རིས་གནས་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'To model conditionals in a way that reflects their acceptability, we must include some means of making judgements about whether antecedent and consequent are meaningfully related or not. Enthymemes are non-logical arguments which do not hold up by themselves, but are acceptable through their relation to a topos, an already-known general principle or pattern for reasoning. This paper uses enthymemes and topoi as a way to model the world-knowledge behind these judgements. In doing so, it provides a reformalisation (in TTR) of enthymemes and topoi as networks rather than functions, and information state update rules for conditionals.', 'ar': 'لنمذجة الشروط بطريقة تعكس قبولها ، يجب علينا تضمين بعض الوسائل لإصدار الأحكام حول ما إذا كانت السابقة والنتيجة مرتبطة بشكل مفيد أم لا. Enthymes هي حجج غير منطقية لا تصمد في حد ذاتها ، ولكنها مقبولة من خلال علاقتها مع topos ، وهو مبدأ أو نمط عام معروف بالفعل للاستدلال. تستخدم هذه الورقة الترانيم والتوبوي كطريقة لنمذجة المعرفة العالمية وراء هذه الأحكام. عند القيام بذلك ، فإنه يوفر إعادة تشكيل (في TTR) من الإنزيميات والموضوعات كشبكات بدلاً من الوظائف ، وقواعد تحديث حالة المعلومات للشرطية.', 'pt': 'Para modelar condicionais de uma maneira que reflita sua aceitabilidade, devemos incluir alguns meios de fazer julgamentos sobre se antecedente e conseqüente estão significativamente relacionados ou não. Entimemas são argumentos não lógicos que não se sustentam por si mesmos, mas são aceitáveis por meio de sua relação com um topos, um princípio geral ou padrão de raciocínio já conhecido. Este artigo usa entimemas e topoi como forma de modelar o conhecimento de mundo por trás desses julgamentos. Ao fazê-lo, fornece uma reformulação (em TTR) de entimemas e topoi como redes em vez de funções, e regras de atualização de estado de informação para condicionais.', 'es': 'Para modelar los condicionales de una manera que refleje su aceptabilidad, debemos incluir algunos medios para emitir juicios sobre si el antecedente y el consiguiente están relacionados de manera significativa o no. Los entimemes son argumentos no lógicos que no se sostienen por sí mismos, pero que son aceptables por su relación con un topos, un principio general o patrón de razonamiento ya conocido. Este artículo utiliza entimemes y topoi como una forma de modelar el conocimiento mundial detrás de estos juicios. Al hacerlo, proporciona una reformalización (en TTR) de los entimemes y topoi como redes en lugar de funciones, y las reglas de actualización del estado de la información para los condicionales.', 'fr': "Pour modéliser les conditionnels d'une manière qui reflète leur acceptabilité, nous devons inclure certains moyens de porter des jugements sur la question de savoir si les antécédents et les conséquences sont réellement liés ou non. Les enthymèmes sont des arguments non logiques qui ne résistent pas seuls, mais qui sont acceptables par leur relation avec un topos, un principe général ou un modèle de raisonnement déjà connu. Cet article utilise des enthymèmes et des topoi comme moyen de modéliser la connaissance du monde qui sous-tend ces jugements. Ce faisant, il fournit une reformalisation (en TTR) des enthymèmes et des topoi sous forme de réseaux plutôt que de fonctions, et des règles de mise à jour de l'état des informations pour les conditionnels.", 'ja': '条件の許容性を反映する方法でモデル化するには、先行する条件と結果が有意義に関連しているかどうかを判断する手段を含める必要があります。エンタイムは、単独では持ちこたえないが、推論のためのトポス、既知の一般原理またはパターンとの関係を通じて許容される非論理的な議論である。この論文では、エンタイムとトポイを、これらの判断の背後にある世界の知識をモデル化する方法として使用している。そうすることで、関数ではなくネットワークとしてのエンタイムとトポイの（ TTRでの）再分類と、条件付きの情報状態更新ルールを提供する。', 'zh': '所以然者,建模可接受性也,必有前因后法。 Enthymeme是非逻辑论之,其身不立,因其与拓扑可受,拓扑已知之理式也。 本文以enthymemestopoi拟之。 如此者,供enthymemestopoi之为网络非功能之复表()于TTR,而消息更新也。', 'hi': 'सशर्त को इस तरह से मॉडल करने के लिए जो उनकी स्वीकार्यता को दर्शाता है, हमें इस बारे में निर्णय लेने के कुछ साधनों को शामिल करना चाहिए कि पूर्ववर्ती और परिणामस्वरूप सार्थक रूप से संबंधित हैं या नहीं। Enthymemes गैर-तार्किक तर्क हैं जो खुद को पकड़ नहीं लेते हैं, लेकिन एक topos, एक पहले से ही ज्ञात सामान्य सिद्धांत या तर्क के लिए पैटर्न के साथ अपने संबंध के माध्यम से स्वीकार्य हैं। यह पेपर इन निर्णयों के पीछे विश्व-ज्ञान को मॉडल करने के तरीके के रूप में एंथिमेम्स और टोपोई का उपयोग करता है। ऐसा करने में, यह कार्यों के बजाय नेटवर्क के रूप में enthymemes और topoi का एक reformalization (TTR में) प्रदान करता है, और सशर्त के लिए सूचना राज्य अद्यतन नियम।', 'ru': 'Чтобы смоделировать условия таким образом, который отражает их приемлемость, мы должны включить некоторые средства для вынесения суждений о том, являются ли предшествующие и последующие существенным образом связанными или нет. Энтиме - это нелогические аргументы, которые не выдерживают себя, но являются приемлемыми в силу их отношения к топосу, уже известному общему принципу или шаблону для рассуждений. В этой статье используются энтимемы и топои как способ моделирования мирового знания, стоящего за этими суждениями. При этом он обеспечивает реформализацию (в ТТР) энтимеров и топоев как сетей, а не функций, и правила обновления информационного состояния для условий.', 'ga': 'Chun coinníollacha a shamhaltú ar bhealach a léiríonn a n-inghlacthacht, ní mór dúinn roinnt bealaí a chur san áireamh chun breithiúnais a dhéanamh maidir le cé acu an bhfuil baint bríoch ag baint le réamhinsint agus iarmhairt nó nach bhfuil. Argóintí neamhloighciúla is ea eintimimí nach seasann leo féin, ach atá inghlactha mar gheall ar a ngaol le topos, prionsabal ginearálta nó patrún réasúnaíochta atá ar eolas cheana féin. Úsáideann an páipéar seo enthymemes agus topoi mar bhealach chun an t-eolas domhanda taobh thiar de na breithiúnais seo a shamhaltú. Agus é sin á dhéanamh, soláthraíonn sé athleasú (in TTR) ar eintimimí agus topoi mar líonraí seachas mar fheidhmeanna, agus rialacha maidir le nuashonrú stáit faisnéise le haghaidh coinníollach.', 'el': 'Για να διαμορφώσουμε τους όρους με τρόπο που να αντικατοπτρίζει την αποδοχή τους, πρέπει να συμπεριλάβουμε ορισμένα μέσα για να κρίνουμε αν οι προηγούμενες και οι συνεπείς συνδέονται ουσιωδώς ή όχι. Τα ένθυμια είναι μη λογικά επιχειρήματα που δεν συγκρατούν από μόνα τους, αλλά είναι αποδεκτά μέσω της σχέσης τους με έναν τόπο, μια ήδη γνωστή γενική αρχή ή μοτίβο συλλογισμού. Η παρούσα εργασία χρησιμοποιεί ενθύμματα και τοποί ως τρόπο μοντελοποίησης της παγκόσμιας γνώσης πίσω από αυτές τις κρίσεις. Με τον τρόπο αυτό, παρέχει μια αναδιαμόρφωση (σε ΤΡ) των ενθύμων και των τόπων ως δικτύων αντί των λειτουργιών, και τους κανόνες ενημέρωσης κατάστασης πληροφοριών για τους όρους.', 'hu': 'Ahhoz, hogy a feltételek elfogadhatóságát tükröző módon modellezzük, bizonyos eszközöket kell bevezetnünk annak megítélésére, hogy az előzmények és a következmények jelentős összefüggésben állnak-e vagy sem. Az entimémek olyan nem logikai érvek, amelyek önmagukban nem állnak fenn, de elfogadhatóak a toposzhoz való viszonyuk, amely egy már ismert általános elv vagy érvelési minta. Ez a tanulmány enthimémákat és topoit használ, mint modellezési módot az ítéletek mögött álló világtudás mögött. Ennek során az enthimémek és topoi reformalizálását (TTR-ben) biztosítja, nem függvényként, hanem hálózatként, továbbá a feltételekre vonatkozó információállapot frissítésére vonatkozó szabályokat.', 'ka': 'მოდელური კონდიციონებისთვის, რომელიც მათი წარმოადგენელობას გამოყენებს, ჩვენ უნდა დავყენოთ რამდენიმე ხელსაწყობილობის შესახებ თუ არა ანტეცენტი და შემდეგ სანიშნავ ანტიმემები არ არის ლოგიური არგუმენტები, რომელიც არ იყენებენ თავიდან, მაგრამ ისინი თავიდან დაკავშირებულია, რომელიც უკვე უცნობილი საერთო პრინუმენტი ან არგუმენტი არ ეს დოკუმენტი გამოყენება ენტიმები და ტოპოი როგორც მსოფლიოს ცოცხლების მოდელედ ამ წესების შემდეგ. ამას გავაკეთებთ, ის ინტემიმების და ტოპოის რეფორმალიზაცია (TTR) როგორც ქსელები არა ფუნქციების და ინფორმაციის ღირებულ წესების განახლება.', 'it': "Per modellare i condizionali in un modo che rifletta la loro accettabilità, dobbiamo includere alcuni mezzi per giudicare se antecedenti e conseguenti sono significativamente correlati o meno. Gli entimemi sono argomenti non logici che non sostengono da soli, ma sono accettabili attraverso la loro relazione con un topos, un principio generale o modello di ragionamento già noto. Questo articolo utilizza entimemi e topoi come un modo per modellare la conoscenza del mondo dietro questi giudizi. In tal modo, fornisce una riformalizzazione (in TTR) degli entimi e dei topoi come reti piuttosto che funzioni, e regole di aggiornamento dello stato dell'informazione per i condizionali.", 'kk': 'Олардың қабылдау мүмкіндігін қарайтын шарттарды үлгілеу үшін біз кейбір арқылы алдындағы және кейбір нәтижесінің маңызды немесе қатынасы бар екенін түсіндіру үшін қажет болады. Энтимемдер - өзіңіздің жалғыз тұрмайтын логикалық аргументтер, бірақ олардың топтардың қатынасы, алдында белгіленген жалпы принцип не үлгісін қабылдауға мүмкіндік береді. Бұл қағаз энтиметтер мен топой әлемдік мәліметтердің артындағы үлгілерін үлгілеу үшін қолданады. Бұл істеу үшін ол функциялардың орнына желілерді реформализациялау (TTR) және топояны, мәліметтердің жаңарту ережелерін жасайды.', 'lt': 'Siekiant modeliuoti sąlygas taip, kad būtų atsižvelgta į jų priimtinumą, turime įtraukti tam tikras priemones, kaip priimti sprendimus dėl to, ar ankstesni ir susiję dalykai yra reikšmingai susiję, ar ne. Entimetai yra neloginiai argumentai, kurie nelaiko savarankiškumo, bet yra priimtini dėl jų santykio su topais, jau žinomo bendrojo principo arba pagrindimo modelio. Šiame dokumente kaip būdą modeliuoti pasaulines žinias, kuriomis grindžiami šie sprendimai, naudojami entumerai ir topojai. In doing so, it provides a reformalisation (in TTR) of enthymemes and topoi as networks rather than functions, and information state update rules for conditionals.', 'mk': 'За да ги моделиме условните услови на начин кој ги одразува нивните прифатливоsti, мора да вклучиме некои средства за донесување пресуди за тоа дали претходните и последиците се значително поврзани или не. Ентиметите се нелогични аргументи кои не се согласуваат сами, но се прифатливи преку нивната врска со топот, веќе познат генерален принцип или шаблон за размислување. Овој весник користи ентимети и топои како начин да го моделира светското знаење зад овие пресуди. Со тоа, истиот обезбедува реформализација (во ТТР) на ентимите и топоите како мрежи наместо функции, и правила за подготвување на информациите за условите.', 'ms': 'Untuk model syarat dengan cara yang mencerminkan kesetujuan mereka, kita mesti termasuk beberapa cara untuk membuat penilaian mengenai sama ada terdahulu dan akibatnya berkaitan dengan bermakna atau tidak. Entimes adalah argumen tidak logik yang tidak menahan diri sendiri, tetapi diterima melalui hubungan mereka dengan topos, prinsip umum yang sudah diketahui atau corak untuk alasan. Kertas ini menggunakan semangat dan topoi sebagai cara untuk model pengetahuan dunia di belakang penilaian ini. Dalam melakukan itu, ia menyediakan penyembahan semula (dalam TTR) enthymemes dan topoi sebagai rangkaian daripada fungsi, dan peraturan kemaskini keadaan maklumat untuk syarat.', 'mt': 'Biex nimmudellaw il-kondizzjonijiet b’mod li jirrifletti l-a ċċettabbiltà tagħhom, irridu ninkludu xi mezzi biex nagħmlu ġudizzji dwar jekk il-preċedenti u l-konsegwenzi humiex relatati b’mod sinifikanti jew le. L-entimemes huma argumenti mhux loġiċi li ma jsostnux waħedhom, iżda huma a ċċettabbli permezz tar-relazzjoni tagħhom ma’ topos, prinċipju jew mudell ġenerali diġà magħruf għar-raġunament. This paper uses enthymemes and topoi as a way to model the world-knowledge behind these judgements.  Meta tagħmel dan, tipprovdi riformalizzazzjoni (fit-TTR) tal-entumi u t-topoi bħala netwerks minflok funzjonijiet, u regoli ta’ a ġġornament tal-istat tal-informazzjoni għall-kondizzjonijiet.', 'ml': 'അവയുടെ സ്വീകരിക്കുന്നതിനെ പ്രത്യേകിക്കുന്ന ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d മാതൃകയിലാക്കാന്\u200d നമുക്ക് ചില മാര്\u200dഗ്ഗങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കണം, ആ എന്ത്ഹീമികള്\u200d ലോഗിക്കല്\u200d വാദികള്\u200d അല്ലാത്ത വാദ്യാഭ്യാസങ്ങളാണ്. അത് സ്വയം പിടിച്ചുനില്\u200dക്കുന്നില്ല, പക്ഷെ അവയുടെ ബന്ധത്തില്\u200d സ് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഈ വിധികളുടെ പിന്നില്\u200d ലോകത്തിന്റെ അറിവുകള്\u200d മാതൃകയാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വഴിയായിരിക്കും. In doing so, it provides a reformalisation (in TTR) of enthymemes and topoi as networks rather than functions, and information state update rules for conditionals.', 'mn': 'Тэдний хүлээн зөвшөөрөл байдлыг харуулах арга загварын тулд бид зарим арга загвар өгөх хэрэгтэй эсвэл үр дүнтэй холбоотой эсэхийг шийдвэрлэх хэрэгтэй. Энтимем бол өөрсдийгөө зогсохгүй логик аргументууд биш, гэхдээ тэдний холбоотой холбоотой, аль хэдийн мэддэг ерөнхий принцип эсвэл ойлголтын загвар юм. Энэ цаас дэлхийн мэдлэгийг эдгээр шүүмжүүдийн ард загварчлахын тулд сэтгэл ханамж, топой хэрэглэдэг. Үүнийг хийхэд энэ нь функцийн оронд хүсэл, топой холбоотой шинэчлэлүүд болон мэдээллийн байр суурь шалтгааныг шинэчлэх (TTR) юм.', 'no': 'For å modellere kondisjonar på ein måte som reflekserer akseptabiliteten sine, må vi inkludere noen måtar å gjera beslutningar om antecedent og konsekvens er betydelig relaterte eller ikkje. Enthymemar er ikkje-logiske argumenter som ikkje held opp seg selv, men er akceptiv gjennom deres relasjon til ei topo, ein allerede kjent generell prinsipp eller mønster for å forstørra. Denne papiret bruker enthymer og topoi som måte å modellere verdenskjenninga bak desse avtalene. På å gjøre dette tilbyr det ein reformalisering (i TTR) av enthymer og topoi som nettverk i staden for funksjonar, og informasjonstilstand oppdaterer reglar for kondicionalar.', 'pl': 'Aby modelować warunki w sposób odzwierciedlający ich akceptowalność, musimy uwzględnić pewne środki służące ocenie tego, czy poprzednie i konsekwentne są znacząco powiązane, czy nie. Entymemy są argumentami nielogicznymi, które same w sobie nie utrzymują się, ale są akceptowalne poprzez swój związek z toposem, znaną już ogólną zasadą lub wzorem rozumowania. Niniejszy artykuł wykorzystuje enthymemy i topoi jako sposób na modelowanie światowej wiedzy stojącej za tymi ocenami. W ten sposób zapewnia reformalizację (w TTR) enthimemów i topoi jako sieci, a nie funkcji, oraz zasady aktualizacji stanu informacji dla warunków.', 'ro': 'Pentru a modela condițiile într-un mod care să reflecte acceptabilitatea lor, trebuie să includem unele mijloace de a lua decizii cu privire la dacă antecedentele și consecințele sunt sau nu legate în mod semnificativ. Entimemele sunt argumente non-logice care nu susțin de la sine, dar sunt acceptabile prin relația lor cu un topos, un principiu general deja cunoscut sau model de raționament. Această lucrare folosește enthimeme și topoi ca modalitate de a modela cunoașterea lumii din spatele acestor judecăți. În acest sens, acesta oferă o reformalizare (în TTR) a entimemelor și topoilor ca rețele, mai degrabă decât funcții, și norme de actualizare a stărilor informaționale pentru condițiile.', 'sr': 'Za model uvjeta na način na koji odražava njihovu prihvatljivost, moramo uključiti neke načine da donesemo odluke o tome da li su predsjednici i posledice značajno povezani ili ne. Entimemi su neologični argumenti koji ne drže sami sebe, ali su prihvatljivi kroz njihovu vezu sa topom, veæ poznatim općim principom ili obrazac razumljivanja. Ovaj papir koristi entujeme i topoi kao način da modeliraju svetsko znanje iza ovih osuđivanja. Učineći to, ona pruža reformalizaciju (u TTR) entumira i topoi kao mreže umjesto funkcija, i informaciona država aktualizira pravila za uvjete.', 'si': 'ඔවුන්ගේ පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වෙන්න, අපිට ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ඕන ඇන්තිමේස් තමයි නොලෝජික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි, ඒත් ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ නැහැ, ඒත් ඔවුන්ගේ සම්බන්ධය ප්\u200dරශ්න මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ටොපොයි විදිහට භාවිතා කරනවා ලෝකයේ දන්නවය මේ විශ්වාසයේ පස්සේ පිටි එහෙම කරන්න, ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ජාලය හා ටොපොයි වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක', 'so': 'Si loo sameyno shuruudaha qaababka ay ku cadaynayso aqbalka, waa in aynu ku qornaa qaab ka gaarista go’aanka, in dhakhtarku ay ku xiran tahay iyo in kale. Isticmaalku waa doodo a an la xiriirayn, laakiin waa in la aqbali karo xiriirkoodu ay ku xiriiraan topicyo, qaynuunka horay loo yaqaan ama qaababka sababta. Warqaddaas wuxuu ku isticmaalaa hiwaayado iyo topoi si uu u sameyno aqoonta dunida ee ka dambeeya xukunladan. Markaas waxaa sameynaya hagaajiyada (TTR) oo ku jira shabakado ka duwan shaqooyinka iyo topoi, iyo sharciyada macluumaadka oo la cusboonaysiiyo shuruudaha shuruudaha.', 'sv': 'För att modellera villkorliga villkor på ett sätt som återspeglar deras godtagbarhet måste vi inkludera några sätt att göra bedömningar om tidigare och efterföljande är meningsfullt relaterade eller inte. Entymemer är icke-logiska argument som inte håller upp av sig själva, men är acceptabla genom sitt förhållande till en topos, en redan känd allmän princip eller mönster för resonemang. Denna uppsats använder enthymemer och topoi som ett sätt att modellera världskunskapen bakom dessa bedömningar. Därmed innebär det en reformalisering (i TTR) av entymer och topoi som nätverk snarare än funktioner, och regler för uppdatering av informationsstaten för villkorliga villkor.', 'ta': 'மாதிரி நிபந்தனைகளை ஏற்றுக்கொள்ள வேண்டும் முறையில், நாம் தீர்ப்புகளை சேர்த்து வை எத்தியோபெம்கள் தொழில்நுட்பமில்லாத வார்ப்புகள் ஆனால் அவர்கள் தனியாக இருக்கவில்லை, அவர்கள் தலைப்புகளுடன் தொடர்பு, ஏற்கனவே அறியப்பட்ட பொது வ இந்த தாள் இந்த தீர்ப்புகளுக்குப் பின்னால் உலக அறிவை மாற்றுவதற்கான வழியாக பயன்படுத்துகிறது. இதைச் செய்தால், அது செயல்பாடுகளை விட வலைப்பின்னல் மற்றும் டோபோயின் செயல்பாடுகளை பிணையத்திற்கு ஒரு சீராக்கம் (TTR) வழங்குகிறது, மற', 'ur': "اس طرح کی مدل کے لئے جو ان کی قبولیت کا تفصیل کرتا ہے، ہم کو کچھ طریقے کے ساتھ فیصلہ کرنے کے لئے شامل کرنا چاہیے کہ ان کی پیشوائی اور اتفاق معنی کے ساتھ رابطہ ہیں یا نہ ہوں. Enthymemes are non-logic arguments that don't hold themselves, but are acceptable through their relation to a topos, a already known general principle or pattern for reasoning. یہ کاغذ ان فیصلے کے پیچھے دنیا کی علم کی مدل کرنے کے لئے آسانی اور توپوی کا استعمال کرتا ہے. یہ کام کرنا چاہتا ہے کہ یہ انتظام اور ٹوپوی کی اصلاح (TTR) کو کام کے بغیر نیٹورک بنا دیتا ہے اور اطلاعات کی حالت اصلاح کے قانون کے لئے۔", 'uz': "To model conditionals in a way that reflects their acceptability, we must include some means of making judgements about whether antecedent and consequent are meaningfully related or not.  Entfeymlar o'z o'zimlarini o'z bilan ishlatmaydigan argumentlar emas, lekin ularning topolari bilan bog'liqni qabul qilinadi, balki sabablar uchun taymaʼlum umumiy qoidalar yoki turli. Bu qogʻoz esa bu xususiyatlarning eng dunyoni bilimni modellashga ishlatadi. Va shunday qilib, u vazifalarni oʻrniga tarmoqni o'zgartirish (TTR) va topoidagi tarmoqni o'zgartirishga ega bo'ladi, va maʼlumot holatning holatlariga yangilash qoidalarini yaratadi.", 'vi': 'Để mô tả các điều kiện theo một cách phù hợp với khả năng chấp nhận của chúng, chúng ta phải có một số phương pháp để phán xét xem việc trước đó và sau đó có liên quan đến ý nghĩa hay không. Enthymộng là những luận không-lý-luận không tự mình cầm cự được, nhưng được chấp nhận qua mối quan hệ của họ với địa hình, một nguyên tắc chung hoặc mô hình lý lập luận đã được biết. Tờ giấy này dùng kim cương và địa hình để mô hình kiến thức thế giới đằng sau các phán xét. Do đó, nó cung cấp một cải cách hình thành cổ kim và địa hình dạng mạng thay vì chức năng, và thông tin cập nhật nội quy định điều kiện.', 'bg': 'За да моделираме условията по начин, който отразява тяхната приемливост, трябва да включим някои средства за вземане на решения дали предшестващите и последващите са смислено свързани или не. Ентимемите са нелогични аргументи, които не издържат сами по себе си, но са приемливи чрез връзката си с топос, вече известен общ принцип или модел на разсъждение. Тази статия използва етидеми и топои като начин за моделиране на световното знание зад тези преценки. По този начин той осигурява реформализация (в ТТР) на енидемите и топите като мрежи, а не функции, както и правила за актуализиране на състоянието на информацията за условни.', 'nl': 'Om voorwaardelijke voorwaarden op een manier te modelleren die hun aanvaardbaarheid weerspiegelt, moeten we enkele middelen omvatten om te beoordelen of voorafgaande en consequente betekenisvol met elkaar verbonden zijn of niet. Entymen zijn niet-logische argumenten die op zichzelf niet volhouden, maar aanvaardbaar zijn door hun relatie tot een topos, een reeds bekend algemeen principe of redeneringspatroon. Deze paper gebruikt enthymemen en topoi als een manier om de wereldkennis achter deze oordelen te modelleren. Daarmee biedt het een reformisering (in TTR) van enthymen en topoi als netwerken in plaats van functies, en informatiestatusregels voor conditionals.', 'da': 'For at modellere betingelser på en måde, der afspejler deres acceptabilitet, må vi medtage nogle midler til at træffe afgørelser om, hvorvidt tidligere og deraf følgende er betydningsfuldt forbundne eller ej. Entymemer er ikke-logiske argumenter, der ikke holder op af sig selv, men er acceptable gennem deres forhold til et topos, et allerede kendt generelt princip eller mønster for ræsonnement. Denne artikel bruger enthymemer og topoi som en måde at modellere verdenskendskabet bag disse domme. I den forbindelse indeholder den en reformalisering (i TTR) af enthymemer og topoi som netværk snarere end funktioner og regler for opdatering af informationsstater for betingelser.', 'hr': 'Za model uvjeta na način na koji odražava njihovu prihvatljivost, moramo uključiti neke načine da donesemo odluke o tome da li su predsjednici i posljedice značajno povezani ili ne. Enthime su neologični argumenti koji se ne drže sami, ali prihvaćaju svojim odnosima s topom, već poznatim općim načelom ili uzorak razumijevanja. Ovaj papir koristi enthymeme i topoi kao način da modeliraju svjetski znanje iza ovih osuđenja. Učineći to, ona pruža reformalizaciju (u TTR) entumira i topoija kao mreže umjesto funkcija, a informaciona država aktualizira pravila za uvjete.', 'de': 'Um Bedingungen in einer Weise zu modellieren, die ihre Akzeptanz widerspiegelt, müssen wir einige Mittel einschließen, um beurteilen zu können, ob vorausgegangene und konsequente Beziehungen sinnvoll sind oder nicht. Entyme sind nicht-logische Argumente, die sich nicht für sich halten, sondern durch ihre Beziehung zu einem Topos, einem bereits bekannten allgemeinen Prinzip oder Muster zur Vernunft akzeptabel sind. In diesem Beitrag werden Enthyme und Topoi verwendet, um das Weltwissen hinter diesen Urteilen zu modellieren. Dabei wird eine Reformalisierung (in TTR) von Enthymen und Topoi als Netze statt Funktionen bereitgestellt, sowie Regeln zur Aktualisierung des Informationszustands für Konditionale.', 'ko': '조건문의 수용성을 반영하는 방식으로 조건문을 모델링하기 위해서 우리는 반드시 전인과 후인이 의미와 관련이 있는지 판단하는 방법을 포함해야 한다.추리는 비논리적인 논증으로 그 자체가 성립되지 않지만 그것들과 토폴로지학의 관계를 통해 받아들일 수 있다. 토폴로지학은 이미 알려진 일반적인 추리 원칙이나 모델이다.본고는 이와 토폴로지를 하나의 방법으로 삼아 이러한 판단 배후의 세계 지식을 모의하고자 한다.이렇게 하면 함수가 아닌 네트워크로 리포맷(TTR에서) 및 조건문에 대한 정보 상태 업데이트 규칙이 제공됩니다.', 'fa': 'برای مدل شرایط\u200cهایی که توضیح پذیرفتگی آنها را تفسیر می\u200cکند، باید برخی از وسایل تصمیم\u200cگیری در مورد اینکه آیا پیشنهاد و نتیجه به معنی ارتباط دارند یا نه شامل باشیم. انتیمیم\u200cها دلیل\u200cهای غیرمنطقی هستند که خودشان را نگه نمی\u200cدارند، ولی از طریق ارتباطشان با توپوس، یک اصل عمومی شناخته شده یا الگو برای منطقی پذیرفته می\u200cشوند. این کاغذ به عنوان راهی برای مدل دانش جهانی پشت این قضاوت استفاده می کند. در این صورت، به عنوان شبکه\u200cهایی به جای عملکرد، یک تغییر تغییر دادن (در TTR) از آرزوها و توپوی را به عنوان شبکه\u200cهایی به جای عملکرد، و قوانین وضعیت اطلاعات را برای شرایط\u200cها آگاهی می\u200cکن', 'id': 'Untuk model kondisi dengan cara yang mencerminkan kesepakatan mereka, kita harus termasuk beberapa cara untuk membuat penilaian tentang apakah sebelumnya dan konsekuensinya berarti berhubungan atau tidak. Entimes adalah argumen yang tidak logis yang tidak menahan diri sendiri, tetapi diterima melalui hubungan mereka dengan topos, prinsip umum yang sudah dikenal atau pola untuk alasan. Kertas ini menggunakan semangat dan topoi sebagai cara untuk model pengetahuan dunia di balik penilaian ini. Dalam melakukan hal itu, ia menyediakan reformalisasi (dalam TTR) enthymemes dan topoi sebagai jaringan daripada fungsi, dan peraturan update negara informasi untuk kondisi.', 'sw': 'Ili kufanya mazingira kwa namna inayoonyesha kukubaliana kwao, ni lazima tujumuishe njia fulani ya kufanya maamuzi kuhusu kama tukio hilo na matokeo yanahusiana na maana au la. Utamaduni ni hoja zisizo za kisiasa ambazo hazijakilishi wenyewe, lakini wanakubalika kupitia mahusiano yao na mada, kanuni ya ujumla au mtindo wa maana. Gazeti hili linatumia hisia na topoi kama njia ya kuelezea maarifa ya dunia nyuma ya maamuzi haya. Kwa kufanya hivyo, inatoa mabadiliko (katika TTR) ya matumaini na topoi kama mtandao badala ya kazi, na sheria mpya za taarifa zinazohusu mazingira.', 'af': "Om voorwaardes te model op 'n manier wat hulle aanvaardigheid reflekteer, moet ons 'n paar bedryfstelinge insluit om oordelings te maak oor of antecedent en volgens betekende verwante is of nie. Enthimemes is nie-logiese argumente wat nie deur hulleself hou nie, maar word aanvaarbaar deur hul verwanting met 'n topos, 'n reeds bekende algemene prinsipe of patroon vir redering. Hierdie papier gebruik enthymeme en topoi as 'n manier om die wêreld-kennis agter hierdie oordelinge te model. In dit te doen, verskaf dit 'n reformalisasie (in TTR) van entumme en topoi as netwerke eerder as funksies, en inligting staat opdateer reëls vir voorwaardes.", 'tr': '힇araglary kabul etmegi흫i t채ze bir 힊ekilde 철r채n g철rkezmek 체챌in, gerekli pikir etmek 체챌in pikir etmek 체챌in pikir etmek 체챌in pikir etmeli bolmalydyrys. T채zimler 철zlerine garamazlar, 첵철ne topolar bilen bagla힊yklaryndan, e첵첵채m tana첵an umumy prinsip 첵a-da d체힊체nle힊en nusgalar d채ldir. Bu kagyz h철wesi we topony 힊u kararlary흫 arkasynda d체n첵채de bilgi nusgasyna g철rkezmek 체챌in ullan첵ar. Bu 힊ekilde, h철wes we topoi 흫 체첵tge힊melerini funksi첵alardan 첵erine, we informasi첵a durumlary 힊artlar 체챌in reformalizasyon (TTR) sa첵la첵ar.', 'am': 'መቀበልን በሚያሳየው የግንኙነት አካባቢዎች ለመምለል፣ የግንኙነቱ እና በአካባቢው ማህበረሰብ ወይም አይሆንም እንደሆነ የፍርድ ማድረግ እናስባለን፡፡ የኢንትዮሜም አካባቢዎች ብቻቸውን ሳይደገሙ ነገር ግን የጦማር ግንኙነት፣ አስቀድሞ የታወቀ ጠቅላዊ አካል ወይም መልዕክት የሚቀበሉ ናቸው፡፡ ይህች ገጽ የዓለም እውቀትን ከዚህች ፍርድ በኋላ መግለጫ የሚደረግ መንገድ ነው፡፡ እንደዚህ በማድረግ፣ የኢንተርሚም እና ቶዎ (TTR) የመተላለፊያ መረብ እንዲመስል እና የኢንተርኔት ግንኙነት አሻሻሻል፡፡', 'sq': 'Për të modeluar kushtet në një mënyrë që pasqyron pranueshmërinë e tyre, ne duhet të përfshijmë disa mjete për të bërë gjykime rreth nëse paraardhësit dhe pasojat janë të lidhura me kuptim apo jo. Entimet janë argumente jo-logjike që nuk mbajnë veten, por janë të pranueshme nëpërmjet marrëdhënieve të tyre me topos, një parim të përgjithshëm tashmë të njohur apo modeli për arsyetimin. This paper uses enthymemes and topoi as a way to model the world-knowledge behind these judgements.  Duke bërë këtë, ajo ofron një reformalizim (në TTR) të entuimëve dhe topoit si rrjete në vend të funksioneve dhe rregullat e përditësimit të shtetit të informacionit për kushtet.', 'hy': 'Որպեսզի պայմանավորված պայմաններն արտացոլում են նրանց ընդունակությունը, մենք պետք է ներառենք որոշ միջոցներ դատողություններ կայացնելու այն մասին, թե արդյոք նախկին և հետևանքները իմաստալիորեն կապված են, թե ոչ: Էնթիմեմերը ոչ-տրամաբանական բանավեճեր են, որոնք իրենք չեն ընդունում, բայց ընդունելի են իրենց հարաբերությունների միջոցով թոպոսի հետ, արդեն հայտնի ընդհանուր սկզբունքի կամ մտածողության կաղապարի միջոցով: Այս թղթին օգտագործում է ոգևորություններ և թոպոյի որպես միջոց, որպեսզի մոդելավորի այս դատողությունների հետևում գտնվող աշխարհի գիտելիքները: Այդ դեպքում այն հնարավորություն է տալիս վերականգնել (ԹԹՌ-ում) ոգևորությունները և թոպոյը որպես ցանցեր, ոչ թե ֆունկցիաներ, և տեղեկատվական վիճակի վերականգնման կանոնները պայմաններում:', 'az': 'Onların qəbul edilməsini göstərən şəkildə modellərin modellərini çəkmək üçün, əvvəlkilərin və sonrakıların anlama gələn və ya yoxdur haqqında hökm vermək üçün bəzi vasitələri daxil olmalıyıq. Enthimlər özlərinə möhkəm deyil, ancaq topo ilə ilişkisi qəbul edilir, əvvəlcə tanınmış genel bir prinsip və fikirləşmək üçün örtükləri. Bu kağıt bu hökmlərin ardındakı dünya bilgisini modelləşdirmək üçün enthymemes və topoi istifadə edir. Bəlkə, bu şəkildə istifadə etmək yerinə şəklə və topoyun reformalizasyonu (TTR) ilə fəaliyyətlərin yerinə, və məlumat durumu şəkildə yenilənmək kurallarını təmin edir.', 'bn': 'যেভাবে তাদের গ্রহণযোগ্যতার প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রতিফলিত করে, আমাদের অবশ্যই বিচারের কিছু উপায় আছে যেখানে বিচার করা যায় যে বিষয়টি কি অর্থহীন এনথিমামগুলো নিজেদের নিজেদের নিজেদের মধ্যে থাকে না, কিন্তু তাদের সম্পর্কের মাধ্যমে গ্রহণযোগ্য, ইতোমধ্যে পরিচিত একটি সাধারণ নীতি  এই পত্রিকাটি এনথিম এবং টোপোই ব্যবহার করে এই বিচারের পিছনে বিশ্বের জ্ঞানের মডেল করার উপায় হিসেবে ব্যবহার করে। এই কাজের পরিবর্তে এটি একটি সংস্কার প্রদান করে (টিটিআরএ) ইনথিম এবং টোপোয়ার নেটওয়ার্ক হিসেবে সংস্কার প্রদান করে এবং পরিস্থিতির জন্য তথ্য', 'bs': 'Za model uvjeta na način na koji odražava njihovu prihvatljivost, moramo uključiti neke načine da donesemo odluke o tome da li su predsjednici i posljedice značajno povezani ili ne. Entimemi su neologični argumenti koji ne drže sami sebe, ali su prihvatljivi putem njihovog odnosa sa topom, već poznatim općem principom ili obrazac razumljivanja. Ovaj papir koristi entumime i topoi kao način da modeliraju svetsko znanje iza ovih osuđenja. U tom slučaju, ona pruža reformalizaciju (u TTR) entumira i topoija kao mreže umjesto funkcija, i pravila informacionih država za aktualizaciju uvjeta.', 'ca': "Per modelar les condicions d'una manera que reflecteixi la seva acceptabilitat, hem d'incloure alguns mitjans de fer judicis sobre si l'antecedent i la conseqüència estan relacionats significativament o no. Els entimes són arguments no lògics que no s'ajusten sols, però són acceptables gràcies a la seva relació amb un topos, un principi o patró general ja conegut per al raonament. Aquest paper utilitza entusiasmes i topoi com a forma de modelar el coneixement mundial darrere d'aquests judicis. En fer-ho, proporciona una reformialització (en TTR) dels entusiasmes i del topoi com a xarxes en comptes de funcions, i normes d'actualització de l'estat de la informació per als condicionats.", 'cs': 'Abychom mohli modelovat podmínky způsobem, který odráží jejich přijatelnost, musíme zahrnout určité prostředky pro posuzování toho, zda předchozí a následné jsou smysluplně spojeny nebo ne. Entymemy jsou nelogické argumenty, které samy o sobě nevydrží, ale jsou přijatelné svým vztahem k toposu, již známému obecnému principu nebo vzoru uvažování. Tento článek využívá enthymémy a topoi jako způsob, jak modelovat světové znalosti za těmito úsudky. Přitom poskytuje reformalizaci (v TTR) enthymemů a topoi jako sítí spíše než funkcí a pravidla aktualizace informačního stavu pro podmíněné.', 'et': 'Tingimuste modelleerimiseks viisil, mis peegeldab nende vastuvõetavust, peame lisama mõned vahendid otsuste tegemiseks selle kohta, kas eelnevad ja järgnevad on mõttekalt seotud või mitte. Entümeemid on mitteloogilised argumendid, mis iseenesest ei pea vastu, kuid on vastuvõetavad oma seose toposega, juba tuntud üldpõhimõtte või põhjendusmustriga. Käesolev raamat kasutab entümeeme ja topoi kui viis modelleerida maailma-teadmisi taga nende otsuste. Seda tehes võimaldab see entrümeemide ja topoide reformaliseerimist (TTR-is) pigem võrkudena kui funktsioonidena ning tingimuste teabeoleku uuendamise reegleid.', 'fi': 'Ehtojen mallintamiseksi niiden hyväksyttävyyttä heijastavalla tavalla meidän on sisällytettävä joitakin keinoja arvioida, ovatko aikaisemmat ja seuraukset merkityksellisesti sidoksissa toisiinsa vai eivät. Entymeemit ovat epäloogisia argumentteja, jotka eivät pidä kiinni itsestään, mutta ovat hyväksyttäviä suhteensa topokseen, jo tunnettuun yleiseen periaatteeseen tai päättelymalliin. Tämä artikkeli käyttää entymeemeja ja topoi tapa mallintaa maailmankuvaa näiden tuomioiden takana. Näin ollen se tarjoaa entymeemien ja topoien uudelleenmuotoilun (TTR:ssä) funktioiden sijaan verkoiksi ja ehdollisten tietojen tilan päivityssäännöt.', 'ha': "To, dõmin ka motsar halin a kan hanyar da ke yi fatawa da abincinsu, sai mu ƙaddara mu haɗa wasu hanyõyi da za'a yi hukunci a kan musamman ta zama da ma'anar musamman ko ba. Enthime-ne-mazaɓa waɗanda ba su tsare kansu ba, kuma amma suna yarda da su a haɗi da wani topogi, wani rubutun da aka sani a yanzu ko wata salon da za'a yi sauna. Wannan karatun na yi amfani da ɗamfyuta da topoi kamar shirin ya samo mulkin ilmi bakin wannan gareshi. Idan yana aikata shi, yana samar da reformin (cikin NTR) na Enthimeme da topoi kamar shirin tarayya ne mafiya musamman functionin aiki, kuma yana da sharciyar taƙaitar mazaɓa wa sharĩ'a.", 'sk': 'Za modeliranje pogojev na način, ki odraža njihovo sprejemljivost, moramo vključiti nekaj sredstev za presojo, ali sta predhodna in posledična smiselno povezana ali ne. Entimimi so nelogični argumenti, ki se sami ne držijo, ampak so sprejemljivi s svojim odnosom do toposa, že znanega splošnega načela ali vzorca razmišljanja. Ta prispevek uporablja entimeme in topoi kot način modeliranja svetovnega znanja za temi sodbami. Pri tem zagotavlja reformalizacijo (v TTR) entimemov in topojev kot omrežja in ne funkcije ter pravila za posodobitev stanja informacij za pogoje.', 'jv': 'Sampeyan kelas kondisisi ning maneh sing mbujalaké awak dhéwé, awak dhéwé kudu beraksi perusahaan winih dhéwé kuwi tindakan kejahatan karo ndeaksi cara terus-terus lan soalé terus-terus sing apik dhéwé. logic Awak dhéwé iki ngono kalem tualangan karo nganggo perusahaan kanggo model kuwi awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang iki dadi. Nanging lakoni, nggawe sistem atualizasi (TTR) karo enthêm lan top oleh dumadhakan sistem sing bisa ditambang cara nggawe informasi sistem atualizasi kanggo kowé.', 'he': 'כדי לדוגמא תנאי באופן שמשתקף את קבלתם, אנחנו חייבים לכלול איזושהי דרך לשפוט אם הקודמים והתוצאות הן קשורות משמעותית או לא. אנטיימים הם טיעונים לא הגיוניים שלא מחזיקים בעצמם, אלא מקובלים דרך היחסים שלהם לטופוס, עקרון כללי כבר ידוע או דפוס הסיבה. העיתון הזה משתמש באנטימסים וטופואי כדרך לדוגמא את ידע העולם מאחורי השיפוטים האלה. בעזרת זה, הוא מספק שינוי (TTR) של אנטיימס וטופואי כרשתות במקום פעילות, וחוקי המידע המעדכון של המדינה לתנאים.', 'bo': 'དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བྱས་ན་ཁོང་ཚོའི་དང་ལེན་བྱས་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཁ་ཤས་ཡོད་དགོས། Enthymemes are non-logic arguments which do not hold up by themselves, but are acceptable through their relation to a topos, an already-known general principle or pattern for reasoning. ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་འཇིག་རྟེན་འདི་ལ་མཚོན་པའི་དྲན་སྐོར་དང་མགོ་རིམ་སྤེལ་བ་ཐབས་ཤིག་རྩལ་བ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡ In doing so, it provides a reformalisation (in TTR) of enthymemes and topoi as networks rather than functions, and information state update rules for conditionals.'}
{'en': 'Acquiring Structured Temporal Representation via Crowdsourcing : A Feasibility Study', 'pt': 'Adquirindo Representação Temporal Estruturada via Crowdsourcing: Um Estudo de Viabilidade', 'fr': 'Acquérir une représentation temporelle structurée via le crowdsourcing\xa0: une étude de faisabilité', 'es': 'Adquisición de representación temporal estructurada mediante crowdsourcing: un estudio de viabilidad', 'ar': 'الحصول على تمثيل زمني منظم عن طريق التعهيد الجماعي: دراسة جدوى', 'ja': 'クラウドソーシングによる構造化時間表現の獲得：実現可能性調査', 'zh': '以众包取结构化时,可行性研究', 'hi': 'Crowdsourcing के माध्यम से संरचित अस्थायी प्रतिनिधित्व प्राप्त करना: एक व्यवहार्यता अध्ययन', 'ru': 'Получение структурированного временного представления с помощью краудсорсинга: технико-экономическое обоснование', 'ga': 'Ionadaíocht Struchtúrtha Sealadach a Fháil trí Sluaite: Staidéar Féidearthachta', 'hu': 'Strukturált időbeli reprezentáció megszerzése Crowdsourcing segítségével: Megvalósíthatósági tanulmány', 'ka': 'სტრუქტურაციული ტემპორალური გამოსახულება Crowdsourcing: შესაძლებლობა სწავლება', 'lt': 'Struktūrinio laikino atstovavimo įgijimas naudojant visuomenės išteklius: įgyvendinamumo tyrimas', 'kk': 'Құрастырылған уақытша таңбашасын қабылдау: Бұл мүмкіндік зерттеу', 'mk': 'Acquiring Structured Temporal Representation via Crowdsourcing: A Feasibility Study', 'el': 'Απόκτηση Δομημένης Χρονικής Αντιπροσωπείας μέσω Μια Μελέτη σκοπιμότητας', 'ml': 'ക്രൂഡ്സോര്\u200dസിങ്ങില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ടെമ്പ്പോറല്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Acquiring Structured Temporal Representation via Crowdsourcing: A Feasibility Study', 'mt': 'L-akkwist tar-Rappreżentanza Temporanja Strutturata permezz tal-Crowdsourcing: Studju dwar il-Fażibbiltà', 'mn': 'Бүтээгдэхүүний Температурын төлөөлөл авч үзэх нь: Магадлалын судалгаа', 'pl': 'Uzyskanie strukturalnej reprezentacji czasowej poprzez crowdsourcing: studium wykonalności', 'it': 'Acquisire una rappresentazione temporale strutturata tramite crowdsourcing: uno studio di fattibilità', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'Achiziționarea reprezentării temporale structurate prin crowdsourcing: un studiu de fezabilitate', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Acquiring Structured Temporal Representation via Crowdsourcing: A Feasibility Study', 'sr': 'Uzimanje strukturiranog vremenskog predstavljanja kroz Crowdsourcing: Proučavanje mogućnosti', 'sv': 'Förvärva strukturerad temporell representation via crowdsourcing: En genomförbarhetsstudie', 'ta': 'உருவாக்கப்பட்ட தற்காலிக உருவாக்குதல் மூலம்:', 'ur': 'کروڈ سورسینگ کے ذریعے ساخترائی Temporal Representation کو پکڑ رہا ہے: A Feasibility Study', 'vi': 'Bộ Kỹ thuật xây dựng thời gian truyền qua Tập đoàn tụ:', 'uz': 'Name', 'da': 'Erhvervelse af struktureret tidsbegrænset repræsentation via crowdsourcing: En gennemførlighedsundersøgelse', 'hr': 'Uzimanje strukturiranog vremenskog predstavljanja kroz Crowdsourcing: Ispitivanje mogućnosti', 'de': 'Erwerb strukturierter temporaler Repräsentation über Crowdsourcing: Eine Machbarkeitsstudie', 'id': 'Menerima Perwakilan Temporal Struktur melalui Crowdsourcing: Sebuah Studi Kemudahan', 'ko': '크라우드소싱을 통해 구조화 시간 표징의 타당성 연구', 'fa': 'دریافت نمایش Temporary Structured via Crowdsourcing: A Feasibility Study', 'sw': 'Kupata maoni ya muda mfupi kupitia Crowdsourcing: Utafiti wa Kuhisi', 'bg': 'Придобиване на структурирано времево представителство чрез crowdsourcing: проучване на осъществимостта', 'nl': 'Structured Temporal Representation verwerven via Crowdsourcing: een haalbaarheidsstudie', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Merrja e përfaqësimit të strukturuar të përkohshëm nëpërmjet burimeve të turmës: një studim realizueshëm', 'tr': 'Structured Temporal Representation by Crowdsourcing: A Feasibility Study', 'az': "Yapılmış Temporal Representation'i Crowdsourcing vasitəsilə almaq: A Feasibility Study", 'am': 'Crowdsourcing: A Feasibility Study', 'bs': 'Prihvaćanje strukturiranog vremenskog predstavljanja kroz Crowdsourcing: Ispitivanje mogućnosti', 'hy': 'Կառուցված ժամանակական ներկայացում ստանալը ժողովրդավարության միջոցով. Մի հնարավորություն ուսումնասիրություն', 'et': 'Struktureeritud ajutise esinduse omandamine ühisturunduse kaudu: teostatavusuuring', 'cs': 'Získání strukturované časové reprezentace prostřednictvím crowdsourcingu: studie proveditelnosti', 'bn': 'Acquiring Structured Temporal Representation via Crowdsourcing: A Feasibility Study', 'ca': 'Acquirir una representació temporal estructurada a través de la crowdsourcing: Un estudi de viabilitat', 'fi': 'Strukturoidun temporaalisen edustuksen hankinta joukkohankinnan kautta: Toteutettavuustutkimus', 'jv': 'Acceleration', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'להשיג מייצג זמני מבוסס באמצעות מצוות: מחקר אפשרות', 'sk': 'Pridobitev strukturiranega časovnega predstavništva prek množičnega izvajanja: študija izvedljivosti', 'bo': 'Acquiring Structured Temporal Representation via Crowdsourcing: A Feasibility Study'}
{'en': 'Temporal Dependency Trees are a structured temporal representation that represents temporal relations among time expressions and events in a text as a dependency tree structure. Compared to traditional pair-wise temporal relation representations, temporal dependency trees facilitate efficient annotations, higher inter-annotator agreement, and efficient computations. However, annotations on temporal dependency trees so far have only been done by expert annotators, which is costly and time-consuming. In this paper, we introduce a method to crowdsource temporal dependency tree annotations, and show that this representation is intuitive and can be collected with high accuracy and agreement through crowdsourcing. We produce a corpus of temporal dependency trees, and present a baseline temporal dependency parser, trained and evaluated on this new corpus.', 'es': 'Los árboles de dependencia temporal son una representación temporal estructurada que representa las relaciones temporales entre las expresiones de tiempo y los eventos de un texto como una estructura de árbol de dependencias. En comparación con las representaciones tradicionales de relaciones temporales por pares, los árboles de dependencia temporal facilitan las anotaciones eficientes, una mayor concordancia entre anotadores y cálculos eficientes. Sin embargo, las anotaciones en los árboles de dependencias temporales hasta ahora solo las han realizado anotadores expertos, lo que es costoso y lleva mucho tiempo. En este artículo, presentamos un método para obtener anotaciones del árbol de dependencias temporales y mostramos que esta representación es intuitiva y se puede recopilar con gran precisión y acuerdo a través del crowdsourcing. Producimos un corpus de árboles de dependencias temporales y presentamos un analizador de dependencias temporales de referencia, entrenado y evaluado en este nuevo corpus.', 'ar': 'تعد أشجار التبعية الزمنية تمثيلًا زمنيًا منظمًا يمثل العلاقات الزمنية بين تعبيرات الوقت والأحداث في النص كهيكل شجرة تبعية. مقارنةً بتمثيلات العلاقات الزمنية التقليدية الزوجية ، فإن أشجار التبعية الزمنية تسهل التعليقات التوضيحية الفعالة ، واتفاق أعلى بين المعلقين ، والحسابات الفعالة. ومع ذلك ، لم تتم التعليقات التوضيحية على أشجار التبعية الزمنية حتى الآن إلا بواسطة المعلقين الخبراء ، وهو أمر مكلف ويستغرق وقتًا طويلاً. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم طريقة لتعهيد التعليقات التوضيحية لشجرة التبعية المؤقتة ، ونبين أن هذا التمثيل بديهي ويمكن جمعه بدقة عالية واتفاق من خلال التعهيد الجماعي. نحن ننتج مجموعة من أشجار التبعية الزمنية ، ونقدم محللًا أساسيًا للاعتماد الزمني ، ومدربًا وتقييمه على هذه المجموعة الجديدة.', 'fr': "Les arbres de dépendance temporelle sont une représentation temporelle structurée qui représente les relations temporelles entre les expressions temporelles et les événements d'un texte sous la forme d'une structure d'arbre de dépendance. Par rapport aux représentations de relations temporelles par paires traditionnelles, les arbres de dépendance temporelle facilitent l'efficacité des annotations, une meilleure concordance entre les annotateurs et des calculs efficaces. Toutefois, jusqu'à présent, les annotations sur les arbres de dépendances temporelles n'ont été effectuées que par des annotateurs experts, ce qui est coûteux et prend du temps. Dans cet article, nous présentons une méthode d'externalisation participative des annotations d'arbres de dépendances temporelles, et montrons que cette représentation est intuitive et peut être collectée avec une précision et un accord élevés grâce au crowdsourcing. Nous produisons un corpus d'arbres de dépendances temporelles et présentons un analyseur de dépendance temporelle de base, formé et évalué sur ce nouveau corpus.", 'pt': 'Árvores de Dependência Temporais são uma representação temporal estruturada que representa relações temporais entre expressões de tempo e eventos em um texto como uma estrutura de árvore de dependência. Em comparação com as representações tradicionais de relações temporais de pares, as árvores de dependência temporal facilitam anotações eficientes, maior concordância entre anotadores e cálculos eficientes. No entanto, as anotações nas árvores de dependência temporal até agora foram feitas apenas por anotadores especialistas, o que é caro e demorado. Neste artigo, apresentamos um método de crowdsourcing para anotações de árvore de dependência temporal e mostramos que essa representação é intuitiva e pode ser coletada com alta precisão e concordância por meio de crowdsourcing. Produzimos um corpus de árvores de dependência temporal e apresentamos um analisador de dependência temporal de linha de base, treinado e avaliado neste novo corpus.', 'ja': '時間依存性ツリーは、依存性ツリー構造としてテキスト内の時間表現とイベント間の時間関係を表す構造化された時間表現です。従来のペア単位の時間関係表現と比較して、時間依存性ツリーは、効率的な注釈、より高い注釈者間の合意、および効率的な計算を促進する。しかし、これまでの時間依存性ツリーに関する注釈は、専門家の注釈者によってのみ行われており、費用がかかり、時間がかかります。本稿では、時間依存木の注釈をクラウドソーシングする方法を紹介し、この表現が直感的であり、クラウドソーシングを通じて高い精度と合意で収集できることを示した。時間依存性木のコーパスを作成し、この新しいコーパスで訓練され評価されたベースライン時間依存性パーサーを提示します。', 'hi': 'टेम्पोरल निर्भरता पेड़ एक संरचित अस्थायी प्रतिनिधित्व है जो निर्भरता पेड़ संरचना के रूप में एक पाठ में समय अभिव्यक्तियों और घटनाओं के बीच अस्थायी संबंधों का प्रतिनिधित्व करता है। पारंपरिक जोड़ी-वार अस्थायी संबंध प्रतिनिधित्व की तुलना में, अस्थायी निर्भरता पेड़ कुशल एनोटेशन, उच्च अंतर-एनोटेटर समझौते और कुशल गणनाओं की सुविधा प्रदान करते हैं। हालांकि, अस्थायी निर्भरता के पेड़ों पर एनोटेशन अब तक केवल विशेषज्ञ एनोटेटरों द्वारा किए गए हैं, जो महंगा और समय लेने वाला है। इस पेपर में, हम क्राउडसोर्स टेम्पोरल निर्भरता ट्री एनोटेशन के लिए एक विधि पेश करते हैं, और दिखाते हैं कि यह प्रतिनिधित्व सहज ज्ञान युक्त है और क्राउडसोर्सिंग के माध्यम से उच्च सटीकता और समझौते के साथ एकत्र किया जा सकता है। हम अस्थायी निर्भरता पेड़ों का एक कॉर्पस का उत्पादन करते हैं, और इस नए कॉर्पस पर प्रशिक्षित और मूल्यांकन किए गए बेसलाइन टेम्पोरल निर्भरता पार्सर को प्रस्तुत करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Деревья временных зависимостей - это структурированное временное представление, которое представляет временные отношения между выражениями времени и событиями в тексте в виде структуры дерева зависимостей. По сравнению с традиционными парными представлениями временных отношений, деревья временных зависимостей облегчают эффективные аннотации, более высокое согласие между аннотаторами и эффективные вычисления. Однако аннотации по деревьям временной зависимости до сих пор делались только экспертами-аннотаторами, что является дорогостоящим и трудоемким делом. В этой статье мы представляем метод для краудсорсинга аннотаций дерева временной зависимости и показываем, что это представление интуитивно понятно и может быть собрано с высокой точностью и согласием с помощью краудсорсинга. Мы создаем корпус деревьев временной зависимости и представляем базовый парсер временной зависимости, обученный и оцененный на этом новом корпусе.', 'zh': '时也者,结构化也;时也者,表达式也。 比之成对,依树有助于高效注、高注器间一致性、高效之数。 然至目前为止,时赖所注仅成于专门,贵且耗时。 于本文中,言一众包时赖树注释之法,以示直观,且可因众包以高精度一致性收之。 吾生一时恃树语料库,并给一基线恃解析器,新语料库练评于此。', 'ga': 'Is léiriú struchtúrtha ama iad Crainn Spleáchais Ama a léiríonn caidreamh ama i measc nathanna cainte agus imeachtaí ama i dtéacs mar struchtúr crann spleáchais. I gcomparáid le huiríll traidisiúnta maidir le caidreamh ama péire-ciallmhar, éascaíonn crainn spleáchais ama nótaí éifeachtacha, comhaontú idir-anóadóirí níos airde, agus ríomhanna éifeachtúla. Mar sin féin, ní dhearna nótaí ar chrainn spleáchais ama go dtí seo ach nótaíoirí saineolacha, rud atá costasach agus am-íditheach. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid isteach modh chun nótaí crann spleáchais ama crowdsource, agus léirímid go bhfuil an léiriú seo iomasach agus gur féidir é a bhailiú le cruinneas ard agus comhaontú trí sluafhoinsiú. Déanaimid corpas de chrainn spleáchais ama a tháirgeadh, agus cuirimid i láthair parsálaí spleáchais ama bonnlíne, oilte agus measúnaithe ar an gcorpas nua seo.', 'el': 'Τα δέντρα χρονικής εξάρτησης είναι μια δομημένη χρονική αναπαράσταση που αντιπροσωπεύει τις χρονικές σχέσεις μεταξύ εκφράσεων χρόνου και συμβάντων σε ένα κείμενο ως δομή δέντρου εξάρτησης. Σε σύγκριση με τις παραδοσιακές αναπαραστάσεις χρονικών σχέσεων ζεύγους, τα δέντρα χρονικής εξάρτησης διευκολύνουν τις αποδοτικές σχολιάσεις, την υψηλότερη συμφωνία μεταξύ σχολιαστών και τους αποδοτικούς υπολογισμούς. Ωστόσο, οι σχολιασμοί σε δέντρα χρονικής εξάρτησης μέχρι στιγμής έχουν γίνει μόνο από ειδικούς σχολιαστές, γεγονός που είναι δαπανηρό και χρονοβόρο. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εισάγουμε μια μέθοδο για τις σχολιασμούς δέντρου χρονικής εξάρτησης και δείχνουμε ότι αυτή η αναπαράσταση είναι διαισθητική και μπορεί να συλλεχθεί με υψηλή ακρίβεια και συμφωνία μέσω του κοινού. Παράγουμε ένα σώμα δέντρων χρονικής εξάρτησης και παρουσιάζουμε έναν αναλυτή χρονικής εξάρτησης βάσης, εκπαιδευμένο και αξιολογημένο σε αυτό το νέο σώμα.', 'it': "Gli alberi di dipendenza temporale sono una rappresentazione temporale strutturata che rappresenta le relazioni temporali tra espressioni temporali ed eventi in un testo come struttura ad albero di dipendenza. Rispetto alle tradizionali rappresentazioni di relazioni temporali a coppia, gli alberi di dipendenza temporale facilitano annotazioni efficienti, accordi inter-annotatori più elevati e calcoli efficienti. Tuttavia, le annotazioni sugli alberi di dipendenza temporale finora sono state fatte solo da esperti annotatori, il che è costoso e richiede tempo. In questo articolo, introduciamo un metodo per crowdsource annotazioni sull'albero delle dipendenze temporali, e mostriamo che questa rappresentazione è intuitiva e può essere raccolta con alta precisione e accordo attraverso il crowdsourcing. Produciamo un corpus di alberi di dipendenza temporale e presentiamo un parser di dipendenza temporale di base, addestrato e valutato su questo nuovo corpus.", 'ka': 'ტემპორალური დასამყარებელობა ხეები არის სტრუქტურული ტემპერალური გამოსახულება, რომელიც სამყარო გამოსახულებების და მოვლენებების შორის ტექსტის შესახებ როგორც დასამყარებ სატრაციონალური ორივე თავშირი პროგრამეტრებისთვის შემდგომარებით, თავშირი დასამხოლობა ხელები გამოყენებენ ეფექტიური ანოტაციები, უფრო მეტად ანოტაციური შედ მაგრამ, სადრო მხოლოდ განსაკუთრებული განსაკუთრებულობის ხელებზე აღმოჩენა მხოლოდ ექსპერტის ანტოტოტორიები, რომლებიც უფრო ძალიან და დროს გამოყენებელია. ამ დოკუმენტში ჩვენ მოვიყენებთ მეტი სამუშაო დამხოლოების განმავლობაში, და ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ეს გამოყენება ინტერუტიურია და შეგვიძლია შეიძლია გადაყენება მაღალი წესიერებით და მუ ჩვენ შევქმნით ტემპალური დასახლოების ეხეების კორპუს, და ჩვენ აჩვენებთ დასახლოებით ტემპალური დასახლოების პანუზერი, რომელიც განსწავლია და გაუუმუშავებული ამ ა', 'hu': 'A temporális függőség fák egy strukturált időbeli ábrázolás, amely az időkifejezések és események közötti időbeli kapcsolatokat ábrázolja egy szövegben, mint függőség fa struktúra. A hagyományos páros-bölcs időkapcsolat reprezentációkkal összehasonlítva az időfüggőségi fák hatékony megjegyzéseket, magasabb inter-annotator megállapodást és hatékony számításokat tesznek lehetővé. Az időbeli függőségi fákra vonatkozó megjegyzéseket azonban eddig csak szakértői kommentátorok végezték, ami költséges és időigényes. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy módszert a crowdsource időfüggőségi fák jegyzéseire, és megmutatjuk, hogy ez a reprezentáció intuitív és nagy pontossággal és egyetértéssel gyűjthető össze a crowdsourcing segítségével. Időfüggőségi fák korpuszát állítunk elő, és bemutatunk egy alapvető időfüggőségi elemzőt, amelyet ezen az új korpuszon képzett és értékelt.', 'kk': 'Температуралық Тәуелсіздік Бұтақтар - мәтіндегі уақыт өрнектері мен оқиғалар арасында тәуелсіздік ағаш құрылымы ретінде тәуелсіздік деген құрылған уақытша қатынасы. Дәстүрлі екі және уақытша қатынастармен салыстырылған, уақытша тәуелдік ағаштары ефективті белгілерді көмектеседі, белгілердің қатынастарының көмегімен және ефективті есептеул Бірақ қазірше уақытша тәуелсіздік ағаштардың белгілері тек эксперттер жазбалары жасалды, бұл күнделікті және уақыт пайдаланушысы. Бұл қағазда, біз уақытша тәуелдік ағаш жазбаларына әдіс келтіріп, бұл түсініктеме тәуелдік деп көрсетіп, көпшілік көмегімен дұрыс және көпшілік көмегімен біріктіріледі Біз уақытша тәуелсіздік ағаштардың корпусын жасап, бастапқы уақытша тәуелсіздік талдаушысын, оқылған және оқылған жаңа корпус.', 'lt': 'Temporal Dependency Trees are a structured temporal representation that represents temporal relations among time expressions and events in a text as a dependency tree structure.  Palyginti su tradiciniais dviejų santykių tarpusavio atvaizdais, laikinųjų priklausomybės medžiai palengvina veiksmingas anotacijas, didesnį tarpanotatorių susitarimą ir veiksmingus skaičiavimus. Tačiau pastabas dėl laikinos priklausomybės medžių iki šiol atliko tik ekspertai, kurie brangiai kainuoja ir laiko reikalauja. In this paper, we introduce a method to crowdsource temporal dependency tree annotations, and show that this representation is intuitive and can be collected with high accuracy and agreement through crowdsourcing.  Mes gaminame laiko priklausomybės medžių korpusą ir pateikiame pradinį laiko priklausomybės analizatorių, apmokytą ir įvertintą nuo šio naujo korpuso.', 'ml': 'കാലാവധി ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന വൃക്ഷങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നിര്\u200dമ്മിതമായ കാലാവധി പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നു. അത് സമയത്തെ പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്ന ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക പാരമ്പര്യമായ ജോടിയുടെ സാമ്പത്തികവിദ്യബന്ധം പ്രതിനിധികളോടൊപ്പം ചേര്\u200dന്നാല്\u200d, സമയത്തെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന വൃക്ഷങ്ങള്\u200d, അത്യുത്തമായ വികാരണങ്ങള എന്നാലും നേരത്തെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന വൃക്ഷങ്ങളില്\u200d വ്യക്തിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് വിശേഷിപ്പുകാര്\u200d മാത്രമേ ചെയ്തുള്ളൂ. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു മാര്\u200dഗ്ഗം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, നേരത്തെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന വൃക്ഷത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത്, ഈ പ്രതിനിധിയ സമയത്തെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന വൃക്ഷങ്ങളുടെ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പുതിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്റെ മേല്\u200dനേരമായ ആശ്രയ', 'mn': 'Температур хамааралтай мод бол хугацааны илэрхийлэл болон үйл явдлын хоорондын хугацааны харилцаа юм. Температур хамааралтай мод бүтэц гэж бий болгож байна. Уламжлалт хоёр хугацааны харилцааны харилцааны харилцааныг харьцуулахад, хугацааны хамааралтай мод нь үр ашигтай анзааралтуудыг, илүү өндөр анзааралтын зөвлөлт, үр ашигтай тооцоололтуудыг ашигла Гэхдээ одоо хүртэл хугацааны хамааралтай мод дээр зөвхөн мэргэжилтнүүд зөвхөн үнэтэй, цаг хугацааны хэрэглээ хийсэн байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хүмүүсийн хугацааны хамааралтай модны анзаарлыг илтгэдэг арга замыг тайлбарлаж, энэ илтгэл нь зөв байдаг ба олон нийтийн сэтгэл хөрөнгө оруулж чадна. Бид цаг хугацааны хамааралтай модын корпус бүтээж, үндсэн цаг хугацааны хамааралтай хуваарилагч, сургалтын, үнэлгээ шинэ корпус дээр үзүүлсэн.', 'ms': 'Temporal Dependency Trees are a structured temporal representation that represents temporal relations among time expressions and events in a text as a dependency tree structure.  Compared to traditional pair-wise temporal relation representations, temporal dependency trees facilitate efficient annotations, higher inter-annotator agreement, and efficient computations.  Namun, anotasi pada pokok dependensi sementara sejauh ini hanya dilakukan oleh anotasi pakar, yang mahal dan memakan masa. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan kaedah untuk anotasi pepohonan dependensi sementara sumber ramai, dan menunjukkan bahawa perwakilan ini adalah intuitif dan boleh dikumpulkan dengan ketepatan dan persetujuan tinggi melalui crowdsourcing. We produce a corpus of temporal dependency trees, and present a baseline temporal dependency parser, trained and evaluated on this new corpus.', 'mt': 'Is-Siġar tad-Dipendenza Temporali huma rappreżentanza temporali strutturata li tirrappreżenta relazzjonijiet temporali fost l-espressjonijiet tal-ħin u l-avvenimenti f’test bħala struttura tas-siġar tad-dipendenza. Meta mqabbel mar-rappreżentazzjonijiet tradizzjonali tar-relazzjonijiet temporali bejn il-pari, is-siġar tad-dipendenza temporali jiffaċilitaw annotazzjonijiet effiċjenti, ftehim ogħla bejn l-annotaturi, u kalkoli effiċjenti. Madankollu, l-annotazzjonijiet dwar is-siġar tad-dipendenza temporali s’issa saru biss minn annotaturi esperti, li jiswew ħafna flus u jieħdu ħafna ħin. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nintroduċu metodu għall-annotazzjonijiet tas-siġar tad-dipendenza temporali crowdsource, u nuru li din ir-rappreżentanza hija intwittiva u tista’ tinġabar b’preċiżjoni għolja u bi qbil permezz tal-crowdsourcing. Aħna nipproduċu korpus ta’ siġar ta’ dipendenza temporali, u nippreżentaw analizzatur ta’ dipendenza temporali fil-linja bażi, imħarreġ u evalwat fuq dan il-korpus il-ġdid.', 'no': 'Temporale avhengighetstre er eit strukturert tidsstyrre representasjon som representerer tidsstyrre forhold mellom tidsstrykk og hendingar i teksten som ein avhengighetstrykk. Sammenlignet med tradisjonelle par-tidsstyrke representasjonar, tidsstyrke avhengighetstrøk gjer tilgjengeleg effektiv notasjon, høgare inter annotator-samtale og effektiv rekningar. Merknader på tidlegare avhengighetstrær har imidlertid berre blitt gjort av ekspertannotatorar, som er kost og tidspunkt. I denne papiret introduserer vi ein metode til mellombels avhengighetstrånotasjon, og viser at denne representasjonen er intuitivt og kan samla med høg nøyaktig og samtale gjennom crowdsourcing. Vi produserer ein korpus av tidlegare avhengighetstrær, og presenterer ein baseline tidlegare avhengighetsanalyser, treng og evaluert på denne nye korpusen.', 'ro': 'Copacii de dependență temporală sunt o reprezentare temporală structurată care reprezintă relațiile temporale dintre expresiile timpului și evenimentele dintr-un text ca o structură arbore de dependență. În comparație cu reprezentările tradiționale ale relațiilor temporale în perechi, arborii dependenței temporale facilitează adnotările eficiente, acordul inter-adnotator mai mare și calculele eficiente. Cu toate acestea, adnotările asupra copacilor dependenței temporale până în prezent au fost făcute doar de către experți adnotatori, ceea ce este costisitor și consumator de timp. În această lucrare, introducem o metodă pentru adnotările arborelor dependenței temporale crowdsource și arătăm că această reprezentare este intuitivă și poate fi colectată cu precizie și acord ridicată prin crowdsourcing. Producem un corpus de arbori de dependență temporală și prezentăm un parser de dependență temporală de bază, instruit și evaluat pe acest nou corp.', 'mk': 'Привремените дрвја на зависност се структурирана привремена претстава која претставува привремени односи меѓу временските изрази и настаните во текст како структура на дрво на зависност. Во споредба со традиционалните привремени односи за парови, дрвјата за привремена зависност овозможуваат ефикасни анотации, повисок интеранотациски договор и ефикасни пресметки. However, annotations on temporal dependency trees so far have only been done by expert annotators, which is costly and time-consuming.  Во овој весник, воведуваме метод за анотации на дрвото на привремената зависност, и покажуваме дека ова претставување е интуитивно и може да се собере со висока прецизност и договор преку пулсорсирање. We produce a corpus of temporal dependency trees, and present a baseline temporal dependency parser, trained and evaluated on this new corpus.', 'sr': 'Temporalno zavisno drvo su strukturirana temporalna predstavljanja koja predstavlja temporalne odnose među izrazima vremena i događajima u tekstu kao strukturu drveta zavisnosti. U usporedbi sa tradicionalnim reprezentacijama temporalnih odnosa na parove, temporalne drveće zavisnosti olakšavaju efikasne annotacije, viši interannotatorski sporazum i efikasne računale. Međutim, annotacije o privremenim drvećima zavisnosti do sada su uradile samo ekspertni annotatori, koji su skupi i potrošili vrijeme. U ovom papiru predstavljamo metodu privremenoj oznake o drvetu za zavisnost publikacije i pokazujemo da je ova predstavljanja intuitivna i može biti sakupljena sa visokom preciznošću i sporazumom putem crowdsourcing. Proizvodimo korpus temporalnih drveća zavisnosti i predstavljamo početni temporalni analizač zavisnosti, obučen i procenjen na ovom novom korpusu.', 'so': 'Geedka ku meelgaarka ah ee ku meelgaarka ah waa xuquuqda wakhti ku meelgaar ah, kaas oo ka mid ah xiriirka ku meelgaarka ah iyo dhacdooyinka ku qoran qoraalka sida dhismo geed ku xiran. Isbarbardhigga labada nooc oo xilliga ah, geedaha ku xiran ee waqtiga ah, waxay ka heli karaan dhibaatooyin faa’iido ah, heshiiska dhexe ka sareeya iyo xisaabta faa’iido leh. However, annotations on temporal dependency trees so far have only been done by expert annotators, which is costly and time-consuming.  Qoraalkan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaa qaab ku saameyn ah geed ku saabsan, waxaana muujinaynaa in wakiilkanu ay leedahay waxyaabaha muhiim ah, waxaana lagu soo ururin karaa si saxda ah iyo heshiis aad u kordhaysan. Waxaannu soo saarnaa geedo ku saabsan waqti ku meelgaar ah, waxaana soo bandhignaa ku saabsan wakhti ku meelgaar ah, baaritaan oo lagu qiimeynay qofkan cusub.', 'sv': 'Temporal Dependency Trees är en strukturerad temporal representation som representerar temporala relationer mellan tidsuttryck och händelser i en text som en beroendeträdsstruktur. Jämfört med traditionella parvisa temporala relationsrepresentationer underlättar temporala beroendeträd effektiva noteringar, högre mellankommentatoröverenskommelser och effektiva beräkningar. Noteringar på tidsberoende träd har dock hittills endast gjorts av expertkommentatorer, vilket är kostsamt och tidskrävande. I denna uppsats introducerar vi en metod för crowdsource temporal dependence tree annotationer, och visar att denna representation är intuitiv och kan samlas in med hög noggrannhet och överenskommelse genom crowdsourcing. Vi producerar en korpus av temporala beroendeträd, och presenterar en baseline temporal beroendeparser, utbildad och utvärderad på denna nya korpus.', 'si': 'Temporal Dependency Trees are a Strukturated Tempral presentation that presents tempral ties to a time expressions and cases in a text as a Dependency Tree building. සාමාන්\u200dය ජාතිකය සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සමග, කාලාවක් සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් ගස්ස් සහයෝජනය කරන්න,  නමුත්, විශ්වාසික විශේෂ ගස් වලින් අවශ්\u200dය විශේෂ විශ්වාස කරනවා විතරයි, ඒක ගොඩක් වඩා විශේෂ සහ වෙලාව මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරවේශයක් පිළිගන්නවා කාලකාලික විශේෂතාවක් වලින් ප්\u200dරවේශයක්, ඒ වගේම පෙන්වන්නේ මේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් නිර අපි කොර්පුස් එකක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා මේ අලුත් කොර්පුස් එක්ක.', 'ta': 'தற்காலிக சார்பு மரங்கள் ஒரு கட்டமைக்கப்பட்ட வார்ப்பு குறிப்பிடும் நேர தொடர்புகள் மற்றும் நிகழ்வுகளை உரையில் சார்பு மரம் அமைப்பா மரபார்ந்த ஜோடி விளக்கமான நேர தொடர்பு பிரதிநிர்வாகிகளுடன் ஒப்பிட்டால், தற்காலிக சார்ந்த சார்பு மரங்கள் வெளிப்படையான அறிவிப்பு, உயர்ந ஆயினும், தற்போது வரை தற்காலிக சார்பு மரங்கள் மீது விளக்கம் செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது, விலை மற்றும் நேரத்திற்கு முடியும். இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் மக்கள் மூலம் தற்காலிக சார்ந்த மரத்தை அறிவிப்பதற்கு ஒரு முறையைக் குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், மற்றும் இந்த குறிப்பிடுதல் சுலபம நாம் நேரத்தில் சார்பு மரங்கள் ஒரு குறுக்கு உருவாக்குகிறோம், மற்றும் அடிப்படைக்கோடு தற்காலிக சார்பு சார்பு, பயிற்சி மற்ற', 'pl': 'Drzewa zależności czasowej są ustrukturyzowaną reprezentacją czasową, która reprezentuje relacje czasowe między wyrażeniami czasu i zdarzeniami w tekście jako strukturę drzewa zależności. W porównaniu do tradycyjnych reprezentacji relacji czasowych w parze, drzewa zależności czasowej ułatwiają efektywne adnotacje, wyższą zgodę między adnotatorami i wydajne obliczenia. Jednak adnotacje na drzewach zależności czasowej były dotychczas wykonywane tylko przez ekspertów adnotatorów, co jest kosztowne i czasochłonne. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy metodę adnotacji drzewa zależności czasowej crowdsource i pokazujemy, że reprezentacja ta jest intuicyjna i może być zbierana z wysoką dokładnością i zgodnością poprzez crowdsourcing. Produkujemy korpus drzew zależności czasowej i przedstawiamy podstawowy parser zależności czasowej, przeszkolony i oceniany na tym nowym korpusie.', 'ur': 'Temporal Dependency Trees are a structured temporal representation that represents temporal relations between time expressions and events in a text as a dependency tree structure. اس کے مطابق سنتی جوڑے کی تاریخی رابطہ کے معاملات کے مطابق، موقت اعتمادی درختوں کے مطابق اثرات کے مطابق اثرات کے مطابق آسان کر دیتے ہیں، بلندی اثرات کے معاملات کے مطابق اور اثرات کی کم لیکن اکثر تک معمولی اعتمادی درختوں کے ذریعہ مطلوبہ مطلوبہ اذیت کرنے والوں کے ذریعہ صرف مطلوبہ اذیت کرنے والے ہیں جو قیمت اور زمانہ کھانے والے ہیں ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک طریقہ پیش کریں گے گروہوں کے سراسر موقت اعتمادی درخت کے اظہارات، اور دکھائیں گے کہ یہ نمونہ بصیرت ہے اور بہت سی دقیق اور اقرار سے جمع کئے جائیں گے ہم ایک قابل اعتمادی درخت کی کورپوس پیدا کرتے ہیں، اور اس نوی کورپوس پر بنیاس لین کی موقتی اعتمادی پارچر کو پیش کرتے ہیں،', 'uz': "Name @ info: whatsthis Ammo, har doim vaqt-davomida ishlatuvchi daraxtda tajribalar faqat taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchilar tomonidan bajarildi, bu qiymati va vaqt foydalanishi mumkin. Bu qogʻozda, biz vaqtinchalik maqsadlik daraxtni ishlatuvchi usulni anglatamiz, va bu tashkilotni juda muhim va jamoatlarni ko'rsatish mumkin. Vaqt davomida ishlatuvchi daraxtni chiqaramiz, bir asl vaqt ishlatuvchi parametrlarini hozir qilamiz, bu yangi korpusda o'rganish va qiymatlashmiz.", 'vi': 'Bảng phụ thuộc thời gian là một đại diện thời gian cấu trúc đại diện cho các sự kiện thời gian giữa biểu hiện thời gian và các sự kiện trong một văn bản như một cấu trúc cây độ phụ thuộc. So với các biểu tượng về mặt thời gian hai chiều truyền thống, các cây phụ thuộc thời gian dễ dàng ghi chú hiệu quả, thỏa thuận liên tục cao hơn và tính hiệu quả. Tuy nhiên, lịch sử về những cây phụ thuộc thời gian cho đến nay chỉ được viết bởi các nhà biên bản chuyên gia, tốn kém và tốn thời gian. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp ghi chú về hệ thống phụ thuộc thời gian crodsource, và cho thấy rằng sự đại diện này rất nhạy bén và có thể được thu thập với độ chính xác và hợp đồng cao nhờ vào crodsouring. Chúng tôi sản xuất một tập thể những cây phụ thuộc thời gian, và giới thiệu một phân tích thời gian dựa trên cơ thể mới này.', 'da': 'Temporal Dependency Træer er en struktureret tidslig repræsentation, der repræsenterer tidsmæssige relationer mellem tidsudtryk og begivenheder i en tekst som en afhængighedstræstruktur. Sammenlignet med traditionelle parvise tidsrelationsrepræsentationer, tidsafhængighedstræer muliggør effektive annotationer, højere inter-annotator aftale og effektive beregninger. Indtil videre er noteringer på tidsafhængighedstræer imidlertid kun blevet udført af eksperter, hvilket er dyrt og tidskrævende. I denne artikel introducerer vi en metode til crowdsource temporal dependence tree annotationer, og viser, at denne repræsentation er intuitiv og kan indsamles med høj nøjagtighed og enighed gennem crowdsourcing. Vi producerer et korpus af tidsmæssige afhængighedstræer, og præsenterer en baseline tidsmæssig afhængighedsfortolker, trænet og evalueret på dette nye korpus.', 'hr': 'Temporalna zavisnost drveta su strukturirana privremena predstavljanja koja predstavlja privremene odnose među izrazima vremena i događajima u tekstu kao strukturu drveta zavisnosti. U usporedbi s tradicionalnim reprezentacijama vremenskih odnosa na parove, privremene drveće zavisnosti olakšavaju učinkovite annotacije, viši međuannotatorski sporazum i učinkoviti računali. Međutim, annotacije o privremenim drvećem zavisnosti do sada čine samo stručni annotatori, koji su skupe i potrošnje vremena. U ovom papiru predstavljamo metodu privremenoj oznake o drvetu za zavisnost publikacije i pokazujemo da je ova predstavljanje intuitivna i može biti sakupljena sa visokom preciznošću i sporazumom putem crowdsourcing. Proizvodimo korpus temporalnih drveća zavisnosti i predstavljamo početni temporalni analizač zavisnosti, obučen i procijenjen na ovom novom korpusu.', 'bg': 'Дърветата за времева зависимост са структурирано времево представяне, което представлява времевите отношения между времевите изрази и събития в текста като структура на дървото на зависимостта. В сравнение с традиционните представления за временни взаимоотношения по двойки, дърветата за времева зависимост улесняват ефикасните анотации, по-високо междуанотаторно съгласие и ефикасните изчисления. Въпреки това, анотациите на дърветата за времева зависимост досега са правени само от експертни анотатори, което е скъпо и отнема време. В тази статия ние въвеждаме метод за анотации на дървото за времева зависимост и показваме, че това представяне е интуитивно и може да бъде събрано с висока точност и съгласие чрез crowdsourcing. Изработваме корпус от дървета за времева зависимост и представяме базов анализатор за времева зависимост, обучен и оценен върху този нов корпус.', 'nl': 'Tijdelijke afhankelijkheidsbomen zijn een gestructureerde tijdelijke representatie die tijdelijke relaties tussen tijduitdrukkingen en gebeurtenissen in een tekst weergeeft als een afhankelijkheidsboomstructuur. Vergeleken met traditionele paren-wise temporele relatiepresentaties vergemakkelijken temporele afhankelijkheidsbomen efficiënte annotaties, hogere inter-annotator overeenkomst en efficiënte berekeningen. Annotaties op tijdelijke afhankelijkheidsbomen zijn tot nu toe echter alleen gedaan door deskundige annotators, wat kostbaar en tijdrovend is. In dit artikel introduceren we een methode voor crowdsource temporele afhankelijkheidsboomannotaties, en laten we zien dat deze weergave intuïtief is en met hoge nauwkeurigheid en overeenstemming kan worden verzameld door middel van crowdsourcing. We produceren een corpus van temporele afhankelijkheidsbomen en presenteren een baseline temporele afhankelijkheidsparser, getraind en geëvalueerd op dit nieuwe corpus.', 'id': 'Pohon Dependensi Temporal adalah representation temporal strukturasi yang mewakili hubungan temporal antara ekspresi waktu dan peristiwa dalam teks sebagai struktur pohon dependensi. Dibandingkan dengan tradisional perwakilan hubungan temporal sepasang, pohon dependensi temporal memudahkan annotasi efisien, kesepakatan inter annotator yang lebih tinggi, dan perhitungan efisien. Namun, anotasi pada pohon tergantung sementara sejauh ini hanya dilakukan oleh anotasi ahli, yang mahal dan memakan waktu. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan metode untuk anotasi pohon pendekatan sementara sumber ramai, dan menunjukkan bahwa representation ini adalah intuitif dan dapat dikumpulkan dengan akurasi tinggi dan kesepakatan melalui crowdsourcing. Kami menghasilkan sebuah tubuh pohon tergantung temporal, dan mempersembahkan parser tergantung temporal dasar, dilatih dan diteliti pada tubuh baru ini.', 'ko': '시제 의존 트리는 구조화된 시제 표시로 텍스트의 시간 표현식과 이벤트 간의 시제 관계를 의존 트리 구조로 나타낸다.전통적인 성대시제 관계 표시에 비해 시제 의존 트리는 효율적인 주석, 더 높은 주석자 간의 일치성과 효율적인 계산에 도움이 된다.그러나 지금까지 시제는 나무의 주석에 의존해 전문가 주석자만 완성해 왔기 때문에 비싸고 시간도 소모된다.본고에서 우리는 패키지 시제에 트리 표시에 의존하는 방법을 소개했고 이러한 표시는 직관적이며 패키지를 통해 높은 정밀도와 일치성을 얻을 수 있음을 나타냈다.우리는 시제 의존 트리의 자료 라이브러리를 만들었고, 이 새로운 자료 라이브러리에서 훈련과 평가를 위한 기선 시제 의존 해상도를 제시했다.', 'sw': 'Temporal Dependency Trees are a structured temporal representation that represents temporal relations among time expressions and events in a text as a dependency tree structure.  Kulinganishwa na uwakilishi wa mahusiano ya muda wa kidini wawili wenye akili, miti ya muda yanategemea ya muda kunaweza kusaidia mabadiliko yenye ufanisi, makubaliano ya juu ya mahusiano yanayohusiana na wachambuzi, na hisabati za ufanisi. Hata hivyo, matatizo yanayotegemea miti ya muda mrefu mpaka sasa yamekuwa yakifanya tu na wataalam wataalam, ambayo ni gharama na matumizi ya muda. Katika gazeti hili, tunaonyesha njia ya kutangaza matangazo ya mti wa muda wa kutumia umaarufu, na kuonyesha kuwa uwakilishi huu ni wa maana na inaweza kukusanywa kwa usahihi na makubaliano makubwa kupitia vyombo vya habari vya watu. Tunatoa makampuni ya miti ya muda yanategemea, na tunaweka kituo cha kutegemea kwa muda wa msingi, kinachofundishwa na kutathmini kwenye makampuni haya mpya.', 'fa': 'درختان بستگی Temporary are a constructed representation temporal that represents temporal relations among time expressions and events in a text as a dependency tree structure. در مقایسه با نمایش\u200cهای موقتی با جفت\u200cهای سنتی، درختان بستگی موقتی آسان\u200cسازی\u200cهای موثر، توافق بین\u200cآگاهی\u200cکننده\u200cهای بالاتر و محاسبه\u200cهای موثر است. با این حال، اخطار بر درختان بستگی موقتی تا حالا فقط توسط اخطار دانشمندان متخصص انجام شده\u200cاند، که به اندازه\u200cی ارزش و مصرف زمانی است. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش را به نشانه\u200cهای بستگی درخت موقتی معرفی می\u200cکنیم، و نشان می\u200cدهیم که این نمایش بصیرت است و می\u200cتواند با دقیق و توافق بالا با توافق از طریق سرمایه\u200cگذاری گروهی جمع شود. ما یک جسد از درختان بستگی موقتی را تولید می کنیم، و یک تقسیم بستگی موقتی از خط پایین را پیشنهاد می کنیم، آموزش و ارزیابی بر این جسد جدید.', 'de': 'Temporale Abhängigkeitsbäume sind eine strukturierte zeitliche Darstellung, die zeitliche Beziehungen zwischen Zeitausdrücken und Ereignissen in einem Text als Abhängigkeitsbaumstruktur darstellt. Im Vergleich zu herkömmlichen paarweisen zeitlichen Beziehungsrepräsentationen ermöglichen temporale Abhängigkeitsbäume effiziente Annotationen, höhere Inter-Annotator-Übereinstimmung und effiziente Berechnungen. Allerdings wurden Annotationen auf zeitlichen Abhängigkeitsbäumen bisher nur von erfahrenen Annotatoren durchgeführt, was kostspielig und zeitaufwendig ist. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine Methode zur Crowdsourcing temporaler Abhängigkeitsbaumannotationen vor und zeigen, dass diese Darstellung intuitiv ist und mit hoher Genauigkeit und Übereinstimmung durch Crowdsourcing gesammelt werden kann. Wir erstellen einen Korpus von temporalen Abhängigkeitsbäumen und stellen einen Baseline-Parser für temporale Abhängigkeiten vor, der auf diesem neuen Korpus trainiert und evaluiert wurde.', 'tr': 'Wagtlaýyn bağlanylyk agaçlary zaman ifadeleri we olaryň arasynda wagt edip görnüşi ýagdaýa çaplanýan bir nusga dur. Däpli çift yönünde geçici baglaşmalar ile karşılaştırılýar, zamanla bağımlılık agaçları etkinlik notlamalary, üst-açarlar ylalaşmalary we etkinlik hesaplamalary kolaylaştırırlar. Ýöne şuwagt wagt baglarynda geçici baglaryň täsirleri diňe ekspert täsirçiler tarapyndan edildi. Bu şekilde deňli we wagt tüketmelidir. Bu kagyzda, biz wagt bagly maglumaty agajyk duýdurmalaryna köp taýýarlandyrýarys we bu representasiýanyň intuitivdygyny görkezip bilen ýokary dogry we ylalaşyk bilen toplanyp bileris. Biz temporal bağımlılık agaçlarının korpusu üretip, bu yeni korpus üzerinde temel bir zamanlı bağımlılık tölegi sunuyoruz.', 'sq': 'Pemët e varësisë së përkohshme janë një përfaqësim i strukturuar përkohor që përfaqëson marrëdhëniet përkohore midis shprehjeve të kohës dhe ngjarjeve në një tekst si një strukturë varësie pemësh. Në krahasim me përfaqësimet tradicionale të marrëdhënieve përkohore për çifte, pemët e varësisë përkohore lehtësojnë anotacionet efikase, marrëveshjen më të lartë ndër-anotatorë dhe llogaritjet efikase. Megjithatë, anotacionet mbi pemët e varësisë përkohore deri tani janë bërë vetëm nga anotatorët ekspertë, gjë që është e shtrenjtë dhe e kushton kohë. Në këtë letër, ne futim një metodë për të përdorur anotacionet e varësisë temporale të drurit, dhe tregojmë se ky përfaqësim është intuitiv dhe mund të mblidhet me saktësi të lartë dhe marrëveshje nëpërmjet crowdsourcing. We produce a corpus of temporal dependency trees, and present a baseline temporal dependency parser, trained and evaluated on this new corpus.', 'af': "Tydelike afhanklikheid Boom is 'n struktureerde tydelike voorstelling wat tydelike verhouding onder tyd uitdrukkings en gebeurtenis in 'n teks as 'n afhanklikheid boom struktuur verteenwoordig. Vergelyk met tradisionele paar-wyse tydelike verwanting voorstellings, tydelike afhanklikheidsboom maak effektief notasies, hoëre inter-annotator-ooreenkoms en effektief rekenasies. Maar annotasies op tydelike afhanklikheidbome so toe het slegs gedoen deur eksperteerde annotators, wat kosbaar en tyd-gebruik is. In hierdie papier, introduseer ons 'n metode aan die skakelbron tydelike afhanklikheidsboom notasies, en wys dat hierdie voorstelling intuitief is en kan versamel word met hoë presisie en ooreenkoms deur skakelsoursing. Ons produseer 'n korpus van tydelike afhanklikheidsboom, en voorsien 'n basisline tydelike afhanklikheidspanser, onderwerp en evalueer op hierdie nuwe korpus.", 'az': 'Vaxt bağımlılığı a ğacları vaxt ifadəsi və vaxtlar arasında müəyyən vaxt ağacı qurulması olaraq müəyyən vaxtlı ilişkiləri göstərir. Dəstəliyi çift tərəfindən müxtəlif əlaqələri ilə qarşılaşdırıldı, vaxtlı bağımlılıq ağacları faydalı ifadə edilənlər, daha yüksək inter-annotator anlaşması və faydalı hesaplamalar olaraq asanlaşdırıldı. Ancaq bu zamana qədər vaxtlı bağımlılıq ağaclarının təbliğ edilməsi yalnız müxtəlif təbliğçilər tarafından yapılmışdır, bu is ə ucuz və vaxtlı istifadə edir. Bu kağızda, insanların zamanlı təvəkküllük a ğacının məlumatlarına bir yol göstəririk və bu göstəricisin intuitiv olduğunu göstərir və çox doğruluqla və müzakirə ilə toplanır. Biz temporal bağımlılıq a ğaclarının korpusu ürəkləyirik və bu yeni korpus üzərində təhsil edilmiş və değerlendirilmiş bir dəstə bağımlılıq ayırıcısını göstəririk.', 'hy': 'Ժամանակական կախվածության ծառերը կառուցվածված ժամանակական ներկայացում են, որը ներկայացնում է ժամանակական հարաբերությունները ժամանակային արտահայտումների և իրադարձությունների միջև տեքստում որպես կախվածության ծառի կառուցվածք: Համեմատելով ավանդական զույգչափ ժամանակական հարաբերությունների ներկայացումների հետ, ժամանակական կախվածությունը ծառերը հնարավորություն են տալիս արդյունավետ նոտացիաներ, ավելի բարձր միջնոտացիոն համաձայնություն և արդյունավետ հաշվարկներ: Այնուամենայնիվ, մինչ այժմ ժամանակական կախվածության ծառերի նկարագրությունները կատարվել են միայն փորձագետների կողմից, ինչը թանկ է և ժամանակ է պահանջում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք ընդհանուր ժամանակական կախվածության ծառի նշումների մեթոդ, և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս ներկայացումը ինտուիտիվ է և կարող է հավաքել բարձր ճշգրտությամբ և համաձայնություն ընդհանուր կախվածության միջոցով: We produce a corpus of temporal dependency trees, and present a baseline temporal dependency parser, trained and evaluated on this new corpus.', 'am': 'በጽሑፍ ውስጥ የጊዜው ግንኙነት እና ሁኔታ በጽሑፍ ውስጥ የተጠቃሚ ዛፍ መሠረት የሚሆን የጊዜው ግንኙነት የሚያሳውቅ ጥቅረት ነው፡፡ ባሕላዊ ሁለቶች የጠቅላላ ወቅት ግንኙነት አካባቢዎች፣ የጊዜው ታዋቂነት ዛፎች በጥያቄ ማስታወቂያ፣ ከፍተኛ አስተያየት ማሰናከል እና በጥያቄ ቁጥጥር ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ ነገር ግን እስከ ዛሬ ድረስ በጊዜው በተደገመ ዛፎች ላይ የሚያስጨንቀው፣ ዋጋው እና በጊዜው የሚጠቀም ባለ አዋቂዎች ብቻ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሬዝዳንት፣ ሰዓት ጊዜው የዛፍ መታሰሪያ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በጊዜው የተደገመ ዛፎችን ቁጥር እናወጣለን፣ በዚህም አዲስ ቆርፓስ ላይ የተማረ እና የተመሠረተውና በተመሳሳይ፣ የመደገፊያውን የጊዜው ተማሪ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'ca': "Els arbres de dependencia temporal són una representació temporal estructurada que representa les relacions temporals entre expressions de temps i esdeveniments en un text com una estructura d'arbre de dependencia. Comparat amb les representacions temporals tradicionals de relacions parelles, els arbres de dependencia temporal faciliten anotacions eficients, un acord entre anotators més alt i calculs eficients. Tot i així, fins ara només han fet anotacions sobre arbres de dependencia temporal per anotators experts, que costen i consumen temps. En aquest article, introduïm un mètode per anotacions d'arbres de dependencia temporal crowdsource, i demostram que aquesta representació és intuïtiva i pot ser recollida amb alta precisió i acord a través de crowdsourcing. Produem un cos d'arbres de dependencia temporal, i presentem un analitzador de dependencia temporal basal, entrenat i evaluat en aquest nou cos.", 'bn': 'মাত্রিক নির্ভরশীল গাছগুলো একটি কাঠামো সাময়িক প্রতিনিধিত্ব যা সময় প্রকাশ এবং অনুষ্ঠানের মধ্যে সাময়িক সম্পর্কের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে একট ঐতিহ্যবাহী জোড়া সাময়িক সম্পর্কের প্রতিনিধিত্বের তুলনায়, সাময়িক নির্ভরশীল গাছগুলো কার্যকর বিষয়বস্তুর সুযোগ, বেশী প্রতিষ্ঠানের চু কিন্তু এখন পর্যন্ত বিশেষজ্ঞ বিশেষজ্ঞ বিক্ষোভকারীদের দ্বারা সাময়িক নির্ভরশীল গাছগুলোর উপর বিবৃতি প্রদান করেছে, যা খ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা জনসোর্সের মাধ্যমে সময় নির্ভরশীল গাছের বিষয়টিকে পরিচয় করিয়ে দিয়েছি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে এই প্রতিনিধিত্বের ব্যাপারে বিশেষ এবং জন আমরা সাময়িক নির্ভরশীল গাছের একটি কোর্পাস তৈরি করি এবং এই নতুন কোর্পাসের উপর একটি বেসেলাইনের মাধ্যমে নির্ভরশীল বিষয়টি উপস্থাপন করি।', 'bs': 'Temporalno zavisno drvo su strukturirana privremena predstavljanja koja predstavlja privremene odnose među izrazima vremena i događajima u tekstu kao strukturu drveta zavisnosti. U usporedbi sa tradicionalnim reprezentacijama vremenskih odnosa na parove, temporalne drveće zavisnosti olakšavaju učinkovite annotacije, viši interannotatorski sporazum i efikasne računale. Međutim, annotacije o privremenim drvećima zavisnosti do sada su uradile samo ekspertni annotatori, koji su skupi i potrošili vrijeme. U ovom papiru predstavljamo metodu komentacijama o privremenoj zavisnosti drveta, i pokažemo da je ova predstavljanja intuitivna i može biti sakupljena sa visokom preciznošću i sporazumom putem crowdsourcing. Proizvodimo korpus temporalnih drveća zavisnosti i predstavljamo početnu temporalnu zavisnost, obučenu i procjenjivanu na ovom novom korpusu.', 'fi': 'Aikariippuvuuspuut ovat strukturoitu aikaesitys, joka edustaa ajallisia suhteita tekstin aikalausekkeiden ja tapahtumien välillä riippuvuuspuurakenteena. Perinteisiin parimuotoisiin aikasuhdeesityksiin verrattuna ajalliset riippuvuuspuut helpottavat tehokkaita merkintöjä, suurempaa huomautusten välistä yhteisymmärrystä ja tehokkaita laskentoja. Aikariippuvuuspuiden muistiinpanoja ovat tähän mennessä tehneet vain asiantuntijamerkinnät, mikä on kallista ja aikaa vievää. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme menetelmän joukkolähdepuun aikariippuvuuspuun huomautuksiin ja osoitamme, että tämä esitys on intuitiivinen ja että se voidaan kerätä suurella tarkkuudella ja yhteisymmärryksellä joukkolähdekoodin avulla. Tuotamme aikariippuvuuspuiden korpusen ja esittelemme perusaikataulun aikariippuvuuden jäsentäjän, joka on koulutettu ja arvioitu tällä uudella korpusella.', 'cs': 'Časové závislosti Stromy jsou strukturovaná časová reprezentace, která reprezentuje časové vztahy mezi časovými výrazy a událostmi v textu jako strukturu stromu závislosti. Ve srovnání s tradičními reprezentacemi časových vztahů, stromy časové závislosti usnadňují efektivní anotace, vyšší dohodu mezi anotátory a efektivní výpočty. Avšak anotace na stromech časové závislosti byly dosud prováděny pouze expertními anotátory, což je nákladné a časově náročné. V tomto článku představujeme metodu crowdsource anotací stromu časové závislosti a ukazujeme, že tato reprezentace je intuitivní a lze ji sbírat s vysokou přesností a shodou prostřednictvím crowdsourcingu. Vytváříme korpus stromů časové závislosti a prezentujeme základní parser časové závislosti, trénovaný a vyhodnocený na tomto novém korpusu.', 'et': 'Ajalised sõltuvuspuud on struktureeritud ajaline esitus, mis esindab ajalisi suhteid teksti ajaavaldiste ja sündmuste vahel sõltuvuspuu struktuurina. Võrreldes traditsiooniliste paari-ajaliste suhete esitustega hõlbustavad ajalise sõltuvuse puud tõhusaid annotatsioone, suuremat annotatoritevahelist kokkulepet ja tõhusaid arvutusi. Ajalise sõltuvuse puude kohta on siiani tehtud märkusi ainult ekspertide poolt, mis on kulukas ja aeganõudev. Käesolevas töös tutvustame meetodit ajalise sõltuvuse puu annotatsioonide jaoks ja näitame, et see esitus on intuitiivne ning seda saab koguda suure täpsusega ja kokkuleppel läbi crowdsourcingi. Me toodame ajalise sõltuvuse puude korpuse ja esitame algse ajalise sõltuvuse parseri, mida on koolitatud ja hinnatud selle uue korpuse põhjal.', 'jv': 'time Digowbudhakan langgar sampeyan kelas politenessoffpolite, politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Nang kuwi iki, awak dhéwé nggawe ngubah perusahaan kanggo ngerasahan cara-cara sing perusahaan kanggo kalah-cara ngono nggawe ngubah iki apa-perusahaan iki luwih apik lan akeh iso nggawe lanjut sing berarti tambah kuwi tambah akéh lan tambah bantuan tambah. Awak dhéwé éntuk cara-cara sing perusahaan segala macem, lan nganggo cara-cara sing dianggap uwong, terus-terus karo ngono kuwi bagian iki.', 'he': 'עצי תלויות זמניות הם מייצג זמני מובנה שמייצג יחסים זמניים בין ביטוי הזמן ואירועים בטקסט כמבנה עץ תלויות. בהשוואה ליציגות יחסים זמניים מסורתיים בין זוגות, עצי תלויות זמניות מקלים ציונים יעילים, הסכם בין ציונים גבוה יותר, וחישובים יעילים יותר. עם זאת, הערות על עצי תלויות זמניות עד כה נעשו רק על ידי הערות מומחיות, שזה יקר הרבה זמן. In this paper, we introduce a method to crowdsource temporal dependency tree annotations, and show that this representation is intuitive and can be collected with high accuracy and agreement through crowdsourcing.  אנחנו יוצרים קורפוס של עצי תלויות זמניות, ומציגים מעבד תלויות זמניות בסיסי, מאומן ומעריך על הקורפוס החדש הזה.', 'sk': 'Časovna odvisnost Drevesa so strukturirana časovna predstavitev, ki predstavlja časovne odnose med časovnimi izrazi in dogodki v besedilu kot strukturo drevesa odvisnosti. V primerjavi s tradicionalnimi predstavitvami časovnih relacij v dveh drevesa časovne odvisnosti omogočajo učinkovite opombe, višje soglasje med opombe in učinkovite izračune. Vendar so opombe na drevesa časovne odvisnosti do zdaj opravljali le strokovni opombe, kar je drago in zamudno. V tem prispevku predstavljamo metodo za pripombe drevesa časovne odvisnosti množičnega izvora in pokažemo, da je ta predstavitev intuitivna in jo je mogoče zbrati z visoko natančnostjo in soglasjem prek množičnega izvora. Izdelamo korpus dreves časovne odvisnosti in predstavljamo osnovni razčlenjevalec časovne odvisnosti, usposobljen in ocenjen na tem novem korpusu.', 'ha': "Trees na Damarin da Akwai na zama an asayyar da temporary ambaci wanda ke wakilisha dangantaka masu ƙayyade tsakanin magana na lokaci da ke cikin wani matsayi kamar wata tsarin itãce mai dõgara. Ana samfanna da danbi'in biyu masu hikima ga fassarar mutane, itãcen da ake yi wa amfani da fasahan fasahan fasahan, da yardar masu ƙaranci da kuma da lissafi masu sha'awa. A lokacin da aka yi matayyaki a kan itãcen mutane har zuwa yanzu an aikata kawai na masu taƙaitãwa, wanda yana kasancẽwa da abincin lokaci. Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙara wani hanyoyi wa mutane da ake faɗar cewa da ake yi wa halayyar da itãce, a lokacin, kuma ke nuna cewa wannan macalin yana da muhimmi kuma za'a sami da tabbatacce da yarda a tsakanin mutane. Munã tsirar wata nauyi na itãcen da ke dõgara a lokacin, kuma munã halatar da a kan salon, yana mai amfani da fassarar, an sanar da shi kuma an ƙaddara shi a kan wannan nauyi na sãbuwa.", 'bo': 'མཐའ་མཚམས་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བྱ་བ་དེ་ཚོའི་དབྱིབས་བཟོས་མཚམས་ཁང་ཅིག་ཡིན་པས་ཚོར་བརྗོད་དང་བྱ་འགུལ་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་མཐའ་མཚམས སྔོན་སྲོལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཚོ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བརྗོད་པ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བ་ནི་ཕན་ཚུན་བསྐྱེད་པའི་སྟོན་ཚུལ་དང་ལས་ཕན་ཚུན་གྱི་རྩིས་ཐ ཡིན་ནའང་། ད་ལྟ་བུའི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བའི་འཇིག་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་གྱི་གསལ་སྐོར་ཚུལ་དེ་གསར་པ་ཡིན་པ་མིན་ན། ཇི་ལྟར་ནི་སྐྱེས་ཚོས་ ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་མཉམ་དུ་འབྱུང་བའི་རྐྱེན་ཁག་ཅིག་གི་བརྡ་སྟོན་བྱེད་དུ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དུས་མཚམས་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བྱ་རིམ་ཞིག་གསར་པ་ཞིག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བརྗོད་གཞིའི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་དང་གཙོ་རིམ'}
{'en': 'Improving Generalization in Coreference Resolution via Adversarial Training', 'ar': 'تحسين التعميم في حل Coreference عن طريق التدريب العدائي', 'es': 'Mejora de la generalización en la resolución de correferencias mediante el entrenamiento contradictorio', 'zh': '抗训改进共推理解析之泛化', 'hi': 'प्रतिकूल प्रशिक्षण के माध्यम से Coreference संकल्प में सामान्यीकरण में सुधार', 'pt': 'Melhorando a Generalização na Resolução de Correferência por meio de Treinamento Adversarial', 'ja': '対抗訓練によるコアレファレンスの一般化の改善', 'fr': 'Améliorer la généralisation dans la résolution de coréférence grâce à la formation contradictoire', 'ru': 'Улучшение обобщения в ключевом разрешении посредством обучения соперников', 'ga': 'Ginearálú a Fheabhsú i Réiteach Croíthagartha trí Oiliúint Sáraíochta', 'ka': 'გენერალიზაციის უფრო მეტივად კონფერენციის რეზოციონციაში კონფერაციალური განსწავლების გამოყენება', 'el': 'Βελτίωση της Γενικοποίησης στην Επίλυση Συνεργασίας μέσω της Αντιμετωπικής Κατάρτισης', 'hu': 'Az általánosítás javítása a Coreferencia-megoldásban ellenálló képzés révén', 'it': 'Migliorare la generalizzazione nella risoluzione della coreferenza attraverso la formazione avversaria', 'kk': 'Жалпы қасиеттердің Айырымдылығын көтеру', 'mk': 'Подобрување на генерализацијата во резолуцијата на кореференцијата преку непријатно обука', 'lt': 'Gerinti bendrųjų konferencijų sprendimo generalizaciją rengiant priešingus mokymus', 'ms': 'Menembak Jeneralisasi dalam Resolusi Coreference melalui Latihan Melawan', 'ml': 'പരിശീലനത്തിനുമുഖാന്തരം കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് റിസ്റ്റേഷനിലെ ജനറലേഷന്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു', 'mn': 'Эмчилгээний дасгал хөдөлгөөнийг сайжруулах', 'mt': 'Titjib fil-Ġeneralizzazzjoni fir-Riżoluzzjoni tal-Koreferenza permezz ta’ Taħriġ Avversiarju', 'no': 'Å forbetra generellisering i oppløysing av hjelpefølgje via Adversarial Training', 'pl': 'Poprawa ogólności w rozwiązywaniu współpracy poprzez szkolenie przeciwne', 'sr': 'Poboljšanje generalizacije u rezoluciji korisnosti putem Adversarialnog treninga', 'ro': 'Îmbunătățirea generalizării în rezoluția coreferenței prin instruire adversară', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය විශේෂණය විශේෂණය කරන්න', 'so': 'Horumarinta Generalization in Coreference Resolution via Adversarial Training', 'sv': 'Förbättra generaliseringen i Coreference Resolution via Adversarial Training', 'ta': 'முன்னேற்ற பயிற்சி', 'ur': 'اڈورساریل ٹرینینگ کے ذریعے سرپرست ریزوشن میں جرانیلایزی زیادہ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tăng cường trong giải pháp quốc phòng thông qua giáo dục tình địch', 'da': 'Forbedring af generaliseringen i Coreference-løsningen via advarsel uddannelse', 'bg': 'Подобряване на генерализацията на резолюцията на кореференцията чрез рекламно обучение', 'nl': 'Verbetering van de generalisatie in Coreference Resolutie via Adversarial Training', 'hr': 'Poboljšanje generalizacije u rezoluciji korisnosti putem Adversarial Training', 'ko': '대항 훈련을 통해 공지 소해의 범화 능력을 향상시키다', 'de': 'Verbesserung der Generalisierung in der Coreferenz Resolution durch Adversarial Training', 'id': 'Menembak Generalisasi dalam Resolusi Koreference melalui Pelatihan Adversarial', 'sw': 'Kuboresha Umoja katika Mazingiro ya Mazingira kwa kupitia mafunzo ya Tafsiri', 'fa': 'بهتر تولید تولید تولید توسط آموزش تجاوز', 'tr': 'Ullanyş Ewezam Aralygy (Adversarial Training) tarapyndan Döwletlerni Ewezam', 'sq': 'Përmirësimi i gjeneralizimit në rezolutën e Koreferencës nëpërmjet trainimit kundërshtar', 'af': 'Verbeter Generalisasie in Hoofheidsoplossing deur Adversariale Oefening', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Կորեֆերանսի լուծումների ընդհանուր ընդլայնման բարելավումը հակառակ ուսուցման միջոցով', 'az': 'Adversarial Training', 'bn': 'Improving Generalization in Coreference Resolution via Adversarial Training', 'bs': 'Poboljšanje generalizacije u rezoluciji korisnosti putem Adversarialnog treninga', 'ca': 'millorar la generalització de la resolució de coreferència mitjançant formació adversaria', 'cs': 'Zlepšení zobecnění v řešení Coreference prostřednictvím nepřátelského školení', 'et': 'Koreferensi lahenduse üldistamise parandamine kõrvaltoimete koolituse kaudu', 'fi': 'Coreference Resolution yleistymisen parantaminen adversariaalisen koulutuksen avulla', 'jv': 'Progress', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Izboljšanje splošnosti reševanja Coreference prek neželenega usposabljanja', 'bo': 'རྒྱལ་སྐྱོར་གྱི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ལ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་གཏོང་།', 'he': 'Improving Generalization in Coreference Resolution via Adversarial Training'}
{'en': 'In order for coreference resolution systems to be useful in practice, they must be able to generalize to new text. In this work, we demonstrate that the performance of the state-of-the-art system decreases when the names of PER and GPE named entities in the CoNLL dataset are changed to names that do not occur in the training set. We use the technique of adversarial gradient-based training to retrain the state-of-the-art system and demonstrate that the retrained system achieves higher performance on the CoNLL dataset (both with and without the change of named entities) and the GAP dataset.', 'es': 'Para que los sistemas de resolución de correferencias sean útiles en la práctica, deben ser capaces de generalizar al texto nuevo. En este trabajo, demostramos que el rendimiento del sistema de última generación disminuye cuando los nombres de las entidades nombradas PER y GPE en el conjunto de datos de CoNll se cambian por nombres que no aparecen en el conjunto de entrenamiento. Utilizamos la técnica del entrenamiento basado en gradientes adversarios para volver a entrenar el sistema de última generación y demostrar que el sistema reentrenado logra un mayor rendimiento en el conjunto de datos de CoNll (con y sin el cambio de entidades nombradas) y el conjunto de datos GAP.', 'ar': 'لكي تكون أنظمة قرار المرجع مفيدة في الممارسة ، يجب أن تكون قادرة على التعميم على نص جديد. في هذا العمل ، نوضح أن أداء النظام الحديث ينخفض عندما يتم تغيير أسماء الكيانات المسماة PER و GPE في مجموعة بيانات CoNLL إلى أسماء لا تحدث في مجموعة التدريب. نحن نستخدم تقنية التدريب القائم على التدرج العدائي لإعادة تدريب النظام الحديث وإثبات أن النظام المعاد تدريبه يحقق أداءً أعلى في مجموعة بيانات CoNLL (سواء مع أو بدون تغيير الكيانات المسماة) ومجموعة بيانات GAP.', 'pt': 'Para que os sistemas de resolução de correferência sejam úteis na prática, eles devem ser capazes de generalizar para novos textos. Neste trabalho, demonstramos que o desempenho do sistema de última geração diminui quando os nomes das entidades nomeadas PER e GPE no conjunto de dados CoNLL são alterados para nomes que não ocorrem no conjunto de treinamento. Usamos a técnica de treinamento baseado em gradiente adversário para retreinar o sistema de última geração e demonstrar que o sistema retreinado alcança maior desempenho no conjunto de dados CoNLL (com e sem a alteração de entidades nomeadas) e no conjunto de dados GAP.', 'ja': 'コアリファレンス解決システムが実際に役立つためには、新しいテキストに一般化できる必要があります。この作業では、CoNLLデータセットのPERとGPEの名前付きエンティティの名前が、トレーニングセットで発生しない名前に変更されると、最先端システムのパフォーマンスが低下することを実証します。私たちは、対抗勾配ベースのトレーニングの技術を使用して、最先端のシステムを再トレーニングし、再トレーニングされたシステムがCoNLLデータセット（名前付きエンティティの変更の有無にかかわらず）およびGAPデータセットでより高いパフォーマンスを達成することを実証します。', 'zh': '为使共指寻辨系统在实践中有用,须得推到新文本。 于此证当 CoNLL 数集 PER 与 GPE 名实体改为训练集未见之名,最先进系统者降之。 吾以抗梯度之教,更练先进之统,以明CoNLL数之集(更命实体)与GAP数集上更高之性也。', 'ru': 'Для того чтобы основные системы разрешения были полезны на практике, они должны быть в состоянии обобщить новый текст. В этой работе мы демонстрируем, что производительность современной системы уменьшается, когда имена именованных сущностей PER и GPE в наборе данных CoNLL меняются на имена, которые не встречаются в обучающем наборе. Мы используем технику обучения на основе состязательных градиентов для переобучения современной системы и демонстрируем, что переобученная система достигает более высокой производительности на наборе данных CoNLL (как с изменением именованных сущностей, так и без него) и наборе данных GAP.', 'fr': "Pour que les systèmes de résolution de coréférence soient utiles dans la pratique, ils doivent pouvoir être généralisés au nouveau texte. Dans ce travail, nous démontrons que les performances du système de pointe diminuent lorsque les noms des entités nommées PER et GPE dans le jeu de données ConLL sont remplacés par des noms qui n'apparaissent pas dans le jeu d'apprentissage. Nous utilisons la technique de l'entraînement basé sur les gradients contradictoires pour recycler le système de pointe et démontrer que le système recyclé atteint de meilleures performances sur le jeu de données ConLL (avec et sans changement d'entités nommées) et le jeu de données GAP.", 'hi': 'coreference संकल्प प्रणालियों के लिए व्यवहार में उपयोगी होने के लिए, उन्हें नए पाठ को सामान्यीकृत करने में सक्षम होना चाहिए। इस कार्य में, हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि अत्याधुनिक प्रणाली का प्रदर्शन कम हो जाता है जब CoNLL डेटासेट में PER और GPE नामित संस्थाओं के नाम उन नामों में बदल दिए जाते हैं जो प्रशिक्षण सेट में नहीं होते हैं। हम अत्याधुनिक प्रणाली को फिर से प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए प्रतिकूल ग्रेडिएंट-आधारित प्रशिक्षण की तकनीक का उपयोग करते हैं और यह प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि पुन: प्रशिक्षित प्रणाली CoNLL डेटासेट (नामित संस्थाओं के परिवर्तन के साथ और बिना दोनों) और GAP डेटासेट पर उच्च प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करती है।', 'ga': 'Ionas go mbeidh córais réitigh croíchomhdhála úsáideach go praiticiúil, ní mór dóibh a bheith in ann ginearálú go téacs nua. San obair seo, léirímid go dtagann laghdú ar fheidhmíocht an chórais úrscothach nuair a athraítear ainmneacha na n-eintiteas ainmnithe PER agus GPE i tacar sonraí CoNLL go hainmneacha nach dtarlaíonn sa tacar oiliúna. Bainimid úsáid as teicníc na hoiliúna atá bunaithe ar ghrádán sáraíochta chun an córas úrscothach a athoiliúint agus a léiriú go mbaineann an córas ath-oilte feidhmíocht níos airde amach ar thacar sonraí CoNLL (le agus gan aonáin ainmnithe a athrú) agus ar thacar sonraí GAP.', 'ka': 'როგორც კონფიგურაციის გარეშე სისტემის გამოსაყენებელი პრაქტიკში იყოს, ისინი უნდა შეუძლებელია გარეშე ახალი ტექსტში. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ სამუშაო სისტემის გავაკეთება, როდესაც PER და GPE სამუშაო ინტერტიების სახელი CoNLL მონაცემების სახელის სახელის სახელის შეცვლა, რომელიც არ მოხდება სახელის სახელის ჩვენ გამოყენებთ განაცემებული გრადიენტის განაცემების ტექნექტიკის გამოყენება, რომელიც განაცემებული სისტემის განაცემების შესაძლებლობად და გამოჩვენება, რომ მიღებული სისტემის შესაძლებლობა უფრო მეტი გამოყენება CoNLL მონა', 'el': 'Για να είναι χρήσιμα στην πράξη τα συστήματα επίλυσης συναλλακτικών διαφορών, πρέπει να μπορούν να γενικεύονται σε νέο κείμενο. Σε αυτή την εργασία, καταδεικνύουμε ότι η απόδοση του συστήματος τελευταίας τεχνολογίας μειώνεται όταν τα ονόματα των οντοτήτων που ονομάζονται PER και GPE στο σύνολο δεδομένων αλλάζουν σε ονόματα που δεν εμφανίζονται στο σύνολο εκπαίδευσης. Χρησιμοποιούμε την τεχνική της εκπαίδευσης με βάση την αντίθετη κλίση για να επαναεκπαιδεύσουμε το σύστημα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας και να αποδείξουμε ότι το επανεκπαίδευτο σύστημα επιτυγχάνει υψηλότερη απόδοση στο σύνολο δεδομένων (τόσο με όσο και χωρίς την αλλαγή ονομάτων οντοτήτων) και στο σύνολο δεδομένων GAP.', 'hu': 'Ahhoz, hogy a coreferencia felbontási rendszerek hasznosak legyenek a gyakorlatban, képesnek kell lenniük arra, hogy általánosítsák az új szöveget. Ebben a munkában azt mutatjuk be, hogy a legkorszerűbb rendszer teljesítménye csökken, amikor a CoNLL adatkészletben található PER és GPE nevű entitások nevét olyan nevekre változtatjuk, amelyek nem jelennek meg a képzéskészletben. Az ellentmondásos gradiens alapú képzés technikáját használjuk a korszerű rendszer átképzésére és annak bizonyítására, hogy az átképzett rendszer nagyobb teljesítményt ér el a CoNLL adatkészleten (nevezett entitások változásával és anélkül is) és a GAP adatkészleten.', 'it': "Affinché i sistemi di risoluzione della coreferenza siano utili nella pratica, essi devono essere in grado di generalizzare a nuovo testo. In questo lavoro, dimostriamo che le prestazioni del sistema all'avanguardia diminuiscono quando i nomi delle entità denominate PER e GPE nel set di dati CoNLL vengono modificati in nomi che non si verificano nel set di formazione. Usiamo la tecnica della formazione basata sul gradiente avversario per riqualificare il sistema all'avanguardia e dimostrare che il sistema riqualificato raggiunge prestazioni superiori sul set di dati CoNLL (sia con che senza il cambiamento delle entità nominate) e sul set di dati GAP.", 'lt': 'Kad nuoseklumo sprendimo sistemos būtų naudingos praktikoje, jos turi turėti galimybę apskritai susieti su nauju tekstu. Šiame darbe įrodome, kad pažangiausios sistemos veiklos rezultatai mažėja, kai CONLL duomenų rinkinyje nurodytų PER ir GPE subjektų pavadinimai keičiami į mokymo rinkinyje nenurodytus pavadinimus. Naudojame prieštaringo laipsniško mokymo metodą moderniajai sistemai atnaujinti ir įrodome, kad atnaujinta sistema užtikrina didesnius CoNLL duomenų rinkinio rezultatus (su pavadintų subjektų pakeitimais ir be jų) ir GAP duomenų rinkinio rezultatus.', 'kk': 'Қайшылық айырмашылық жүйелері әрекетінде пайдалы болу үшін, олар жаңа мәтін жалпы түрлендіру керек. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, CoNLL деректер жиынындағы PER және GPE атауларының атаулары өзгертілген атауларға өзгертілмегенін көрсетіп тұрмыз. Біз қарсы градиенттің негіздеген оқыту техникасын қолданып, Сурет жүйесінің күйін қайта алу үшін, қалған жүйесі CoNLL деректер жиынында (аталған нысандарды өзгерту үшін не GAP деректер жиынында) жоғары ықтималдығын көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'За системите за резолуција на соодветноста да бидат корисни во практиката, тие мора да можат да се генерализираат на нов текст. Во оваа работа, ние демонстрираме дека изведувањето на најсовремениот систем се намалува кога имињата на ентитетите именувани ПЕР и ГПЕ во датотеката CoNLL се менуваат во имиња кои не се случуваат во сетот на обука. Ние ја користиме техниката на обука базирана на непријателски градиенти за повторно тренирање на најсовремениот систем и демонстрирање дека повторно тренираниот систем постигнува повисока резултат на коНЛ датотеката (со и без промена на именуваните ентитети) и на GAP датотеката.', 'ms': 'Untuk sistem resolusi persamaan berguna dalam praktek, mereka mesti mampu menyebarkan ke teks baru. Dalam kerja ini, kami menunjukkan bahawa prestasi sistem state-of-the-art menurun apabila nama entiti bernama PER dan GPE dalam set data CoNLL diubah kepada nama yang tidak berlaku dalam set latihan. Kami menggunakan teknik latihan berdasarkan gradien lawan untuk melatih semula sistem state-of-the-art dan menunjukkan bahawa sistem dilatih semula mencapai prestasi yang lebih tinggi pada set data CoNLL (dengan dan tanpa perubahan entiti bernama) dan set data GAP.', 'ml': 'പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d പ്രയോജനപ്പെടുന്ന കോര്\u200dഫനെന്\u200dസ് റിസ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200dക്കു്, പുതിയ പദാവലിയിലേക്ക ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ സെറ്റില്\u200d സംഭവിക്കാത്ത പെരുമാറ്റുന്ന പേരുകള്\u200d പെരുമാറ്റുമ്പോള്\u200d പെരുമാറ്റുന്ന പേ നമ്മള്\u200d വിരോധമായ ഗ്രാഡിഗ്രാഡിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള പരിശീലനത്തിന്\u200dറെ ടെക്കിനിക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സിസ്റ്റം വീണ്ടും തിരിച്ചുവരുത്തുവാ', 'mt': 'Sabiex is-sistemi ta’ riżoluzzjoni ta’ koerenza jkunu utli fil-prattika, għandhom ikunu jistgħu jiġġeneralizzaw għal test ġdid. F’dan ix-xogħol, nagħmlu xhieda li l-prestazzjoni tas-sistema l-aktar avvanzata tonqos meta l-ismijiet tal-entitajiet imsemmija PER u GPE fis-sett tad-dejta CoNLL jinbidlu għal ismijiet li ma jseħħux fis-sett tat-taħriġ. Aħna nużaw it-teknika tat-taħriġ avversarju bbażat fuq il-gradjenti biex inħarrġu mill-ġdid is-sistema l-aktar avvanzata u nippruvaw li s-sistema mħarrġa mill-ġdid tikseb prestazzjoni ogħla fuq is-sett tad-dejta CoNLL (kemm bil-bidla ta’ entitajiet imsemmija kif ukoll mingħajr) u s-sett tad-dejta GAP.', 'mn': 'Хэрэв зөвшөөрөл шийдвэрлэлтийн системүүд дасгал дээр хэрэглэгдэхэд, тэд шинэ текст шинэчлэх боломжтой болно. Энэ ажил дээр бид CoNLL өгөгдлийн сангийн нэр болон GPE-ийн нэр нь сургалтын сургуульд оролцохгүй нэрүүдэд өөрчлөгдсөн гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бид эсэргүүцлийн градиент дээр сургалтын техникыг ашиглаж урлагийн тогтолцоог дахин авч, хүлээж авсан систем CoNLL өгөгдлийн санд (нэрлэгдсэн бүтээгдэхүүний өөрчлөлт болон GAP өгөгдлийн санд) өндөр үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж чадна.', 'no': 'For å ha koreferanse oppløysingssystemer nyttig i praksis, må dei kunna generalisere til ny tekst. I denne arbeida viser vi at utviklinga av kunstsystemet reduserer når namnet på PER og GPE-namnet på datasettet CoNLL er endra til namn som ikkje skjer i øvingssettet. Vi bruker teknikken for å gjenoppretta opplæringa med negativ fargeovergangsbasert for å gjenoppretta kunstsystemet og demonstrera at det gjenopprette systemet gjer høgare utviklingar på CoNLL-datasettet (både med og utan endring av namn på einingar) og GAP-datasettet.', 'ro': 'Pentru ca sistemele de rezoluție a coreferenței să fie utile în practică, acestea trebuie să poată generaliza la text nou. În această lucrare, demonstrăm că performanța sistemului de ultimă generație scade atunci când numele entităților numite PER și GPE din setul de date CoNLL sunt schimbate în nume care nu apar în setul de instruire. Folosim tehnica instruirii bazate pe gradient adversar pentru a recalifica sistemul de ultimă generație și a demonstra că sistemul recalificat obține performanțe mai mari pe setul de date CoNLL (atât cu cât și fără schimbarea entităților denumite) și pe setul de date GAP.', 'pl': 'Aby systemy rozwiązywania współdzielności mogły być użyteczne w praktyce, muszą one być w stanie uogólniać się na nowy tekst. W niniejszej pracy pokazujemy, że wydajność nowoczesnego systemu spada, gdy nazwy PER i GPE w zbiorze danych CoNLL są zmieniane na nazwy, które nie występują w zestawie treningowym. Wykorzystujemy technikę szkolenia opartego na gradientach przeciwnych, aby przekwalifikować najnowocześniejszy system i wykazać, że przekwalifikowany system osiąga wyższą wydajność na zbiorze danych CoNLL (zarówno z zmianą nazwanych podmiotów, jak i bez zmiany) oraz zbiorze danych GAP.', 'sr': 'Da bi sistemi rezolucije dobrote bili korisni u praksi, moraju biti u stanju generalizirati na novi tekst. U ovom poslu pokazujemo da se učinkovitost državnog umjetničkog sistema smanjuje kada se imena PER i GPE imenovanih entitata u kompetu podataka CoNLL promene na imena koje se ne dešavaju u kompetu obuke. Koristimo tehniku neprijateljskog treninga baziranog na gradientu kako bi se povratili sistem umetnosti i pokazali da se sustav koji je dobio ostvario veći učinkovit na kompletu podataka CoNLL (i bez promjene imenovanih entiteta) i kompletu podataka GAP-a.', 'sv': 'Fﾃｶr att coreferencelopplﾃｶsningssystem ska vara anvﾃ､ndbara i praktiken mﾃ･ste de kunna generalisera till ny text. I detta arbete visar vi att prestandan hos det senaste systemet minskar nﾃ､r namnen pﾃ･ PER- och GPE-namngivna entiteter i CoNLL-datauppsﾃ､ttningen ﾃ､ndras till namn som inte fﾃｶrekommer i utbildningsuppsﾃ､ttningen. Vi anvﾃ､nder tekniken med gradientbaserad trﾃ､ning fﾃｶr att omskola det senaste systemet och visa att det omskolade systemet uppnﾃ･r hﾃｶgre prestanda pﾃ･ CoNLL datauppsﾃ､ttningen (bﾃ･de med och utan byte av namngivna entiteter) och GAP datauppsﾃ､ttningen.', 'so': 'Si ay u isticmaalaan nidaamka qaynuunnada, waa in ay u awoodaan in ay sameeyaan qoraal cusub. Shaqadan, waxaynu muujinnaa in sameynta nidaamka farshaxanku uu yaraanayo marka magaca PER iyo GPE lagu magacaabay macluumaadyada koonfurta CoNLL lagu beddelo magacyo aan ku dhicin saxda waxbarashada. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa teknikada waxbarashada rasmiga ah si aan u soo celino nidaamka farshaxanka iyo sidoo kale waxaynu caddaynaynaa in nidaamka dib u celinta ay ka samayso sameynta kooxda aqoonta CoNLL (dhamaantooda iyo beddelinta magaca) iyo sawirka macluumaadka ee GAP.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරයෝජනයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂණ පද්ධතිය, ඔවුන්ට අළුත් පාළුවට සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා කියලා, කොන්ල් දත්ත සෙට්ටුවේ PER සහ GPE නාමක් නැවත පද්ධතියේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක පද්ධතියේ පරීක්ෂණය පරීක්ෂණය පරීක්ෂණය අපි විරෝධ විරෝධ ව්\u200dයාපෘතියේ ප්\u200dරධානය භාවිතා කරනවා කියලා, ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතිය ආපහු ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරනවා කියලා, ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මය CoNLL දත්ත සැට (', 'ta': 'குறிப்பு தெளிவுத்திறன் அமைப்புகளுக்கு பயனுள்ளதாக இருக்க வேண்டுமானால், அவர்கள் புதிய உரைக்கு பொதுவாக உருவா இந்த வேலையில், நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் என்றால் பயிற்சி அமைப்பில் இல்லாத பெயர் PER மற்றும் GPE பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள்களின் பெயர்களை கோன்எல் தரவுத்தளத்தில் பெ நாம் எதிர்மறையான சார்ந்த பயிற்சியை பயன்படுத்தி நிலைமையை மீண்டும் மீண்டும் திரும்ப முடியும் மற்றும் மீண்டும் திரும்ப அமைப்பு கோன்எல் தரவுத்தளத்தில் அத', 'ur': 'اس لئے کہ مہربانی رخصوص سیستموں کو عمدہ میں فائدہ پہنچانا چاہیے، وہ نو پیغام پر قادر ہیں۔ ہم اس کام میں دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایٹ سیسٹم کی فعالیت کم ہوتی ہے جب CONLL ڈیٹ سٹ میں PER اور GPE کے نام کے نام کائنال کے نام کے نام کائنال میں نہیں ہوتے۔ ہم مخالف گرڈیس ٹرینگ بنیاد کی تعلیم کو استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ایٹیس سیسٹم کو پیدا کریں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیدا ہونے والی سیسٹم CoNLL ڈیٹسٹ پر بالا عملکرد حاصل کرتا ہے (نام دار ایٹیسیٹ کے ساتھ اور بغیر) اور GAP ڈیٹسٹ پر۔', 'uz': "Name Bu vazifani ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, Shaxsiy tizimning xususiyatlarini qo'yishda, CONLL maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi PER va GPE nomlarining nomini oʻzgartirib boʻlmaydi. Biz tashkilotli gradient-asosida taʼminlovchi texnologidan foydalanamiz va qayta olingan tizim CONLL maʼlumotlari (quyidagi obʼektlarni o'zgartirib boʻlmaydi va GAP maʼlumotlar tizimini o'zgartirib chiqaradi.", 'vi': 'Để có hiệu quả thực tế trong các hệ thống giải quyết hạn hẹp, chúng phải có khả năng tổng kết vào văn bản mới. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi chứng minh rằng hiệu quả của hệ thống hiện đại giảm khi tên các thực thể được gọi là cấp trên và GPE trong bộ nhớ dữ liệu CO2 được chuyển thành những tên không xuất hiện trong bộ tập tin huấn luyện. Chúng tôi sử dụng kỹ thuật huấn luyện dốc ngược để tái tạo lại hệ thống hiện đại và chứng minh rằng hệ thống được tái tạo lại đạt hiệu suất cao hơn trên tập tin thuộc về Coyl (cả với và không thay đổi các thực thể tên) và tập tin GAP.', 'bg': 'За да могат системите за резолюция да бъдат полезни на практика, те трябва да могат да обобщават към нов текст. В тази работа демонстрираме, че ефективността на най-съвременната система намалява, когато имената на имената на имената на имената на ПЕР и ГПЕ в набора от данни се променят на имена, които не се появяват в набора от обучения. Използваме техниката на съперническо градиентно обучение, за да преквалифицираме най-съвременната система и да демонстрираме, че преквалифицираната система постига по-високи резултати в набора от данни на CoNLL (както със, така и без смяна на наименовани субекти) и набора от данни на GAP.', 'nl': 'Om in de praktijk bruikbaar te kunnen zijn, moeten de systemen voor coferentieresolutie kunnen worden veralgemeend tot nieuwe tekst. In dit werk tonen we aan dat de prestaties van het state-of-the-art systeem afnemen wanneer de namen van PER en GPE benoemde entiteiten in de CoNLL dataset worden gewijzigd in namen die niet voorkomen in de trainingsset. We gebruiken de techniek van adversarial gradient based training om het state-of-the-art systeem te herscholen en aan te tonen dat het herschoolde systeem hogere prestaties behaalt op de CoNLL dataset (zowel met als zonder de wijziging van benoemde entiteiten) en de GAP dataset.', 'hr': 'Da bi se sustavi rješavanja pristojnosti koristili u praksi, moraju biti u stanju generalizirati na novi tekst. U ovom poslu pokazujemo da se učinkovitost stanja umjetničkog sustava smanjuje kada se imena PER-a i GPE-a imena podataka u CoNLL-u promjene na imena koje se ne dešavaju u setu obuke. Koristimo tehniku neprijateljskog obrazovanja na temelju predstava za obnovu sustava umjetnosti i pokazujemo da povratni sustav postiže veću učinkovitost na kompletu podataka CoNLL (i bez promjene imenovanih entitata) i kompletu podataka GAP-a.', 'da': 'For at coreferenceopløsningssystemer skal være nyttige i praksis, skal de kunne generalisere til ny tekst. I dette arbejde demonstrerer vi, at ydeevnen af det avancerede system falder, når navnene på PER og GPE navngivne enheder i CoNLL datasættet ændres til navne, der ikke forekommer i træningssættet. Vi bruger teknikken med modstridende gradient-baseret træning til at omskole det nyeste system og demonstrere, at det omskolede system opnår højere ydeevne på CoNLL datasættet (både med og uden ændring af navngivne entiteter) og GAP datasættet.', 'de': 'Damit Coreferenz-Auflösungssysteme in der Praxis nützlich sein können, müssen sie in der Lage sein, auf neuen Text zu verallgemeinern. In dieser Arbeit zeigen wir, dass die Leistung des State-of-the-Art-Systems abnimmt, wenn die Namen von PER- und GPE-benannten Entitäten im CoNLL-Datensatz in Namen geändert werden, die nicht im Trainingsset vorkommen. Wir verwenden die Technik des adversarialen gradientenbasierten Trainings, um das State-of-the-Art-System umzuschulen und zu demonstrieren, dass das umgeschulte System eine höhere Leistung auf dem CoNLL-Datensatz (sowohl mit als auch ohne Änderung benannter Entitäten) und dem GAP-Datensatz erzielt.', 'id': 'Untuk sistem resolusi koreferensi menjadi berguna dalam praktek, mereka harus mampu menyebarkan ke teks baru. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami menunjukkan bahwa prestasi sistem state-of-the-art menurun ketika nama-nama entitas bernama PER dan GPE dalam set data CoNLL berubah menjadi nama-nama yang tidak terjadi dalam set latihan. Kami menggunakan teknik pelatihan berbasis gradien lawan untuk melatih ulang sistem state-of-the-art dan menunjukkan bahwa sistem dilatih ulang mencapai prestasi yang lebih tinggi pada set data CoNLL (dengan dan tanpa perubahan entitas bernama) dan set data GAP.', 'sw': 'Ili kwa ajili ya mfumo wa suluhisho wa mafanikio, lazima waweze kutengeneza ujumbe mpya wa maandishi. In this work, we demonstrate that the performance of the state-of-the-art system decreases when the names of PER and GPE named entities in the CoNLL dataset are changed to names that do not occur in the training set.  Tunatumia mbinu ya mafunzo yanayotokana na msingi wa kisasa ili kurejesha mfumo wa sanaa na kuonyesha kwamba mfumo huo ulioendelea unapata ufanisi mkubwa zaidi kwenye seti ya data ya CoNLL (pamoja na bila mabadiliko ya vifaa vinavyoitwa) na seti ya data za GAP.', 'fa': 'برای اینکه سیستم\u200cهای حل\u200cسازی که در تمرین مفید باشند، باید بتوانند به متن جدید ژنرال\u200cسازی کنند. در این کار، ما نشان می دهیم که عملکرد سیستم هنر هنر وقتی نام\u200cهای شرکت\u200cهای PER و GPE در مجموعه داده\u200cهای CoNLL به نام\u200cهایی تغییر می\u200cشوند که در مجموعه آموزش نمی\u200cشوند، کاهش می\u200cشود. ما از تکنیک آموزش بر اساس گرادینت مخالف استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا سیستم هنری را بازیافت کنیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که سیستم بازیافت شده در مجموعه داده\u200cهای CoNLL (هر دو با تغییر عنوان\u200cهای نامیده) و مجموعه داده\u200cهای GAP را فراهم می\u200cکند.', 'ko': '공지 해소 시스템이 실천에서 유용하도록 하기 위해서, 그것들은 반드시 새로운 텍스트로 보급될 수 있어야 한다.이 작업에서 우리는 CoNLL 데이터 집합의 PER와 GPE 명칭 실체의 명칭이 훈련 집합에 나타나지 않는 명칭으로 바뀌면 최첨단 시스템의 성능이 떨어진다는 것을 증명했다.Dell은 최상의 시스템에 대해 계단식 기반 트레이닝 기술을 사용하여 재교육을 실시했으며, 재교육 시스템이 CoNLL 데이터 세트(명명 엔티티 변경 여부와 관계없이)와 GAP 데이터 세트에서 더 높은 성능을 구현하고 있음을 증명했습니다.', 'tr': 'Eýratyn çözümleme sistemalary praktikada ulanmak üçin, täze metin döredilemeli. Bu işde, CoNLL veri setirinde PER we GPE adlarynyň esaplaryň ýitilmeýän adlaryna üýtgedilip, sungat sisteminiň başarylygyny göçürýäris. Biz çykyş halkara derejede tabanly eğitim teknikini ulanýarys. Ýöne galan sistemiň CoNLL veri setirinde (hem isim barlygy bilen hem diňe üýtgetmelidigini) we GAP veri setirinde ýokary ukypdyr.', 'am': 'ለመጠቀም የኮሬፖርቲካ ማስታወቂያው ስርዓቶች ለመጠቀም ይችላሉ አዲስ ጽሑፍ ማቀናቀል ይገባዋል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የ-የ-የ-የ-ዐርድ ሥርዓት ስሞች በኮንኤል ዳታተር ውስጥ ያልደረገውን የPER እና GPE ስሞች በተለወጡ ጊዜ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ በተቃዋሚ አካባቢ-የዓላማ ስርዓት ግንኙነትን ለመመለስ እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'af': 'Om koreferensie oplossing stelsels gebruik te wees in praksie, moet hulle in staat wees om na nuwe teks te genereer. In hierdie werk, ons wys dat die prestasie van die staat-van-die-kunstenstelsel verklein word wanneer die name van PER en GPE genoem entiteite in die CoNLL datastel verander word na name wat nie in die onderwerp stel voorkom nie. Ons gebruik die teknike van teëstandige gradient-gebaseerde onderwerp om die staat-van-die-kunstenstelsel te herhaal en te wys dat die herhaal stelsel hoër prestasie bereik op die CoNLL datastel (beide met en sonder die verandering van genaamde entiteite) en die GAP datastel.', 'sq': 'Në mënyrë që sistemi i rezolutës së korreferencës të jetë i dobishëm në praktikë, ata duhet të jenë në gjeneralizim në tekst të ri. Në këtë punë, ne demonstrojmë se performanca e sistemit më të lartë zvogëlon kur emrat e njësive të emëruara PER dhe GPE në grupin e të dhënave CoNLL ndryshohen në emra që nuk ndodhin në grupin e trajnimit. Ne përdorim teknikën e trajnimit kundërshtar të bazuar në gradient ë për të ripërtëritur sistemin më të lartë dhe për të demonstruar se sistemi i ripërtëritur arrin performancë më të lartë në grupin e të dhënave CoNLL (si me ndryshimin e njësive të emëruara, ashtu edhe pa ndryshimin e njësive të emëruara) dhe grupin e të dhënave GAP.', 'az': 'Mərhəmətli çözünürlük sistemləri praksiyada faydalı olmaq üçün, onlar yeni mətnə generalizə bilərlər. Bu işdə, biz göstəririk ki, CoNLL veri qutusundakı PER və GPE adlı nömrələrinin adı azaldığı zaman, təhsil qutusunda olmayan adlar dəyişdirilmişdir. Biz təhsil sistemini geri qaytarmaq üçün adversarial gradient-based təhsil təhsilinin teknikini istifadə edirik və təhsil sisteminin CoNLL veri qutusunda yüksək təhsil etdiyini göstərdik.', 'hy': 'Որպեսզի կորեֆերանսի լուծման համակարգերը օգտակար լինեն իրականության մեջ, նրանք պետք է կարողանան ընդհանրացնել նոր տեքստին: In this work, we demonstrate that the performance of the state-of-the-art system decreases when the names of PER and GPE named entities in the CoNLL dataset are changed to names that do not occur in the training set.  Մենք օգտագործում ենք հակառակ աստիճանի հիմնված ուսումնասիրության մեթոդը վերադասավանդելու համար և ապացուցելու համար, որ վերադասավանդված համակարգը հասնում է ավելի բարձր արդյունք ԿոՆԼ տվյալների համակարգում (անվանված էակների փոխման հետ և առանց դրանից) և ԳԱՊ տվյալների համակարգում:', 'bn': 'কোরেফেন্সের সিস্টেম ব্যবহারের জন্য, তারা নতুন টেক্সটে সাধারণ করতে পারে। এই কাজে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের প্রদর্শন কমে যাচ্ছে যখন কএনএল ডাটাসেটের নাম পের আর জিপি নামের প্রতিষ্ঠানের নাম পরিবর্তন করা হয়, যা প্রশি আমরা বিরোধী গ্রেডিয়েন্ড ভিত্তিক প্রশিক্ষণের কৌশল ব্যবহার করি শিল্প-শিল্পের রাষ্ট্র পুনরুদ্ধার করার জন্য এবং প্রমাণিত করি যে পুনরায় সিস্টেম কনএল ডাটাসেট (নামের', 'bs': 'Da bi sistemi rješavanja pristojnosti bili korisni u praksi, moraju biti u stanju generalizirati na novi tekst. U ovom poslu pokazujemo da se učinkovitost državnog umjetničkog sistema smanjuje kada se imena PER i GPE imenovanih entitata u kompletu podataka CoNLL-a promijeni na imena koje se ne dešavaju u kompletu obuke. Koristimo tehniku neprijateljskog obrazovanja na temelju predstavnog gradienta kako bi se povratili sistem umjetnosti i pokazali da je sustav koji se povlači ostvario veći učinkovit na setu podataka CoNLL (i sa promjenom imenovanih entitata i bez promjene podataka GAP-a).', 'et': 'Selleks et kaasviidete lahendamise süsteemid oleksid praktikas kasulikud, peavad nad suutma üldistada uuele tekstile. Käesolevas töös näitame, et kaasaegse süsteemi jõudlus väheneb, kui CoNLL andmekogumis sisalduvate PER- ja GPE-nimeliste üksuste nimed muudetakse nimedeks, mida koolituskogumis ei esine. Kasutame vastandliku gradientipõhise koolituse tehnikat, et ümberõpetada kaasaegset süsteemi ja näidata, et ümberõpetatud süsteem saavutab CoNLL andmekogumi (nii nimetatud üksuste vahetamisega kui ka ilma) ja GAP andmekogumi tulemuslikkuse.', 'ca': "Per a que els sistemes de resolució de coreferencia siguin útils en la pràctica, han de ser capaços de generalitzar-se en un nou text. In this work, we demonstrate that the performance of the state-of-the-art system decreases when the names of PER and GPE named entities in the CoNLL dataset are changed to names that do not occur in the training set.  Utilitzem la tècnica d'entrenament adversari basat en gradients per a tornar a treinar el sistema d'última generació i demostrar que el sistema de retransmisió aconsegueix un rendiment més alt en el conjunt de dades CoNLL (tant amb com sense el canvi d'entitats anomenades) com en el conjunt de dades GAP.", 'fi': 'Jotta yhteisp채채t철sj채rjestelm채t olisivat k채yt채nn철ss채 hy철dyllisi채, niiden on voitava yleist채채 uuteen tekstiin. T채ss채 ty철ss채 osoitetaan, ett채 uusimman j채rjestelm채n suorituskyky heikkenee, kun CoNLL-aineistossa olevien PER- ja GPE-nimien nimet vaihdetaan nimiksi, joita ei esiinny koulutussarjassa. K채yt채mme vastakohtaisen gradienttiperusteisen koulutuksen tekniikkaa uusimpien j채rjestelmien uudelleenkouluttamiseen ja osoitamme, ett채 uudelleenkoulutettu j채rjestelm채 saavuttaa paremman suorituskyvyn CoNLL-aineistossa (sek채 nimettyjen kokonaisuuksien vaihdolla ett채 ilman) ja GAP-aineistossa.', 'cs': 'Aby systémy koreferenčního řešení byly v praxi užitečné, musí být schopny zobecňovat na nový text. V této práci ukazujeme, že výkon moderního systému klesá, když jsou jména PER a GPE pojmenovaných entit v datové sadě CoNLL změněny na názvy, které se v tréninkové sadě nevyskytují. Používáme techniku tréninku založeného na negativním gradientu k retrénování nejmodernějšího systému a demonstraci toho, že retrénovaný systém dosahuje vyššího výkonu na datové sadě CoNLL (s i bez změny jmenovaných entit) a datové sadě GAP.', 'ha': "Dõmin za'a iya amfani da wasu na'urar buƙata na korea, sai za'a so su iya ƙiƙiro zuwa matsayin yanzu. Yana nũna cikin wannan aikin, ko kuma za mu ƙara cikakken halin-sanar idan an canza sunayen FER da GPA da sunan abun cikin tsarin KANLL zuwa sunayen waɗanda ba su ci cikin tsarin mafarin. Tuna amfani da technical na tsarin mai motsi ga gyare-na-halin-sanar kuma Muke nuna cewa na'urar da tsarin da aka sake shi ya sami mafiya girma a kan data na CoNLL (da kuma bã da musanyi ba da sunan-abun) da tsarin GPA.", 'sk': 'Da bi bili sistemi koreferenčnega reševanja koristni v praksi, morajo biti sposobni posplošiti na novo besedilo. V tem delu dokazujemo, da se zmogljivost najsodobnejšega sistema zmanjša, ko se imena imenovanih subjektov PER in GPE v naboru podatkov CoNLL spremenita v imena, ki se ne pojavljajo v naboru usposabljanj. Za preusposabljanje najsodobnejšega sistema uporabljamo tehniko kontradientalnega gradientnega usposabljanja in dokazujemo, da preusposobljeni sistem dosega večjo uspešnost na naboru podatkov CoNLL (s spremembo imenovanih subjektov in brez nje) in naboru podatkov GAP.', 'bo': 'དབང་ཚད་ལ་གདོང་རིས་མ་མཐུན་གྱི་མ་ལག་གིས་ལག་སྟར་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་དེ་འདིས་ཡིག་གེ་གསར་པ་ལ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་CoNLL གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་ནང་གི་PER དང་GPE གནད་སྡུད་ནང་གི་མིང་ཚོའི་གནས་སྟངས་གི་ལས ང་ཚོས་ཟུར་བ་དང་ལྷན་ཁང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་སྤྱད་ནས་གནད་དོན་འཆར་གཞི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་བསྐྱར་གསོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ལ།', 'jv': 'Sampeyan kang dipolehasan sistem sing beraksi kanggo nggawe praksi, dheweke bisa ngubah batar nggo teks sing isin. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné mulasai kanggo ngerasakno dadi sistem sing bisa perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo nganggo perusahaan PAR karo GNU sing nganggo perusahaan anyari dadi CoNLL karo nganggo nambah sing ora tau dadi, kuwi mau. Awak dhéwé ngéwé teknik sing berarti perusahaan seneng pisan karo paké, iso nglanggar sistem-kalem kuwi tindakan kuwi tindakan nggawe sistem sing arep terus nggawe barang dhéwé bakal terus éntuk dhéwé nggawe dataset CoNLL (dadi ngono sak sistem sing berarti Entité sing berarti barêng) lan dataset GLP', 'he': 'In order for coreference resolution systems to be useful in practice, they must be able to generalize to new text.  In this work, we demonstrate that the performance of the state-of-the-art system decreases when the names of PER and GPE named entities in the CoNLL dataset are changed to names that do not occur in the training set.  אנו משתמשים בטכניקה של אימון מבוסס על תליונים יריביים כדי לאמן מחדש את מערכת המאומנות והוכיח שהמערכת המאומנת מחדש משיגה ביצועים גבוהים יותר על קבוצת נתונים CoNLL (גם עם ושינוי של ישויות בשם) ובקבוצת נתונים GAP.'}
{'en': 'Improving Human Needs Categorization of Events with Semantic Classification', 'ar': 'تحسين تصنيف الاحتياجات البشرية للأحداث مع التصنيف الدلالي', 'fr': 'Améliorer la catégorisation des événements par les besoins humains grâce à la classification sémantique', 'pt': 'Melhorando a Categorização de Necessidades Humanas de Eventos com Classificação Semântica', 'es': 'Mejora de la categorización de eventos de las necesidades humanas con la clasificación semántica', 'hi': 'सिमेंटिक वर्गीकरण के साथ घटनाओं के मानव आवश्यकताओं के वर्गीकरण में सुधार', 'ja': '人間のニーズの向上セマンティック分類によるイベントの分類', 'zh': '以语义类易人事者也', 'ru': 'Улучшение классификации человеческих потребностей по событиям с семантической классификацией', 'ga': 'Feabhas a chur ar Chatagóiriú Imeachtaí ar Riachtanais an Duine le hAicmiú Séimeantach', 'ka': 'სემანტიკური კლასიფიკაციის მოვლენების კატეგორიზაცია', 'el': 'Βελτίωση της κατηγοριοποίησης των ανθρώπινων αναγκών των γεγονότων με Σημαντική Ταξινόμηση', 'hu': 'Az emberi igények javítása események kategorizálása szemantikus osztályozással', 'mk': 'Improving Human Needs Categorization of Events with Semantic Classification', 'lt': 'Improving Human Needs Categorization of Events with Semantic Classification', 'ms': 'Menembak Kategori Keperlukan Manusia Peristiwa dengan Klasifikasi Semantik', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചുകൊണ്ട് മനുഷ്യരുടെ ആവശ്യങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Titjib fil-Kategorizzazzjoni tal-Ħtiġijiet tal-Bniedem tal-Avvenimenti bil-Klassifikazzjoni Semantika', 'kk': 'Оқиғалардың санаттарын жақсарту керек', 'mn': 'Хүн төрөлхтний хэрэгцээг сайжруулах нь Semantic Classification', 'no': 'Å forbetra menneske treng kategorisering av hendingar med semiantisk klassifikasjon', 'it': 'Migliorare la classificazione dei bisogni umani degli eventi con classificazione semantica', 'sr': 'Poboljšanje ljudskih potreba kategorije događaja sa semantičkom klasifikacijom', 'ro': 'Îmbunătățirea nevoilor umane Categorizarea evenimentelor cu clasificare semantică', 'pl': 'Poprawa kategorizacji zdarzeń z klasyfikacją semantyczną potrzeb ludzkich', 'so': 'Improving Human Needs Categorization of Events with Semantic Classification', 'sv': 'Förbättring av mänskliga behov Kategorisering av händelser med semantisk klassificering', 'ur': 'انسان کی ضرورت سیمنٹی کلاسیفی کے ساتھ اتفاقات کا کاٹیوریزی کرنا ضرورت ہے', 'si': 'මිනිස්සුන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න අවශ්\u200dයය සෙමාන්ටික ක්ලාසිකරණය සමග සාමාන්තික ව', 'ta': 'Improving Human Needs Categorization of Events with Semantic Classification', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Tăng cường nhu cầu nhân loại hóa các sự kiện có mật mã hóa', 'hr': 'Poboljšanje ljudskih potreba kategorije događaja sa semantičkom klasifikacijom', 'da': 'Forbedring af menneskelige behov Kategorisering af begivenheder med semantisk klassificering', 'bg': 'Подобряване на човешките нужди Категоризация на събитията със семантична класификация', 'nl': 'Verbetering van de categorisering van gebeurtenissen door middel van semantische classificatie', 'id': 'Menembak Kategorisasi Kebutuhan Manusia Kejadian Kejadian dengan Klasifikasi Semantik', 'ko': '의미 분류로 인류의 사건에 대한 수요 분류를 개선하다', 'de': 'Verbesserung der Kategorisierung menschlicher Bedürfnisse durch semantische Klassifizierung von Ereignissen', 'fa': 'بهتر کردن نیازهای انسان کاتوریژی اتفاقات با کلاس\u200cشناسی سیمانتیک', 'sq': 'Përmirësimi i kategorizimit të nevojave njerëzore të ngjarjeve me klasifikimin Semantik', 'am': 'CategoryName', 'sw': 'Kuboresha Mahitaji ya Binadamu ya Kugawanywa kwa Matukio ya Kijinsia', 'tr': 'Adamlaryň ilatyny Semantik klasifikasy bilen taýýarlanmasy gerek', 'af': 'Verbetering van menslike behoefte het Kategoriseering van gebeurtenis met semiantiese klassifisering', 'bn': 'সেম্যান্টিক ক্লাসিকেশন দ্বারা অনুষ্ঠানের শ্রেণীতে মানব প্রয়োজন', 'bs': 'Poboljšanje ljudskih potreba kategorije događaja sa semantičkom klasifikacijom', 'hy': 'Մարդկային կարիքների խմբավորումների բարելավումը սեմատիկ դասակարգման միջոցով', 'ca': 'millorar la categorització de les necessitats humanes dels events amb classificació semàtica', 'az': 'İnsan ehtiyacını daha yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün Semantik Klasifikasiylə olaraq', 'et': 'Inimvajaduste parandamine sündmuste kategooriaks semantilise klassifikatsiooniga', 'cs': 'Zlepšení kategorizace událostí lidských potřeb pomocí sémantické klasifikace', 'fi': 'Ihmisten tarpeiden parantaminen tapahtumien luokittelu semanttisella luokittelulla', 'sk': 'Izboljšanje človeških potreb Kategorizacija dogodkov s semantično klasifikacijo', 'he': 'Improving Human Needs Categorization of Events with Semantic Classification', 'jv': 'Gujaring Kelangan Dowurung Panjenengan Keteraturasi eventur', 'ha': 'Categorization of event with Semantic Classification', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་ཆེ་རུ་གཏོང་རིམ་དང་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་དག་ཆེད་པོ་ཞིག་དགོས་པ'}
{'en': 'Human Needs categories have been used to characterize the reason why an affective event is positive or negative. For example, I got the flu and I got fired are both negative (undesirable) events, but getting the flu is a Health problem while getting fired is a Financial problem. Previous work created learning models to assign events to Human Needs categories based on their words and contexts. In this paper, we introduce an intermediate step that assigns words to relevant semantic concepts. We create lightly supervised models that learn to label words with respect to 10 semantic concepts associated with Human Needs categories, and incorporate these labels as features for event categorization. Our results show that recognizing relevant semantic concepts improves both the recall and precision of Human Needs categorization for events.', 'fr': "Les catégories de besoins humains ont été utilisées pour caractériser la raison pour laquelle un événement affectif est positif ou négatif. Par exemple, «\xa0J'ai attrapé la grippe\xa0» et «\xa0Je me suis fait virer\xa0» sont tous deux des événements négatifs (indésirables), mais contracter la grippe est un problème de santé alors que me faire virer est un problème financier. Des travaux antérieurs ont créé des modèles d'apprentissage pour attribuer des événements à des catégories de besoins humains en fonction de leurs mots et de leurs contextes. Dans cet article, nous présentons une étape intermédiaire qui attribue des mots à des concepts sémantiques pertinents. Nous créons des modèles légèrement supervisés qui apprennent à étiqueter des mots en fonction de 10 concepts sémantiques associés aux catégories Besoins humains, et incorporons ces étiquettes comme fonctionnalités pour la catégorisation d'événements. Nos résultats montrent que la reconnaissance de concepts sémantiques pertinents améliore à la fois le rappel et la précision de la catégorisation des besoins humains pour les événements.", 'es': 'Las categorías de Necesidades Humanas se han utilizado para caracterizar la razón por la que un evento afectivo es positivo o negativo. Por ejemplo, «Tengo gripe» y «Me despidieron» son eventos negativos (indeseables), pero contraer la gripe es un problema de salud, mientras que ser despedido es un problema financiero. En trabajos anteriores se crearon modelos de aprendizaje para asignar eventos a las categorías de Necesidades Humanas en función de sus palabras y contextos. En este artículo, presentamos un paso intermedio que asigna palabras a conceptos semánticos relevantes. Creamos modelos ligeramente supervisados que aprenden a etiquetar palabras con respecto a 10 conceptos semánticos asociados con las categorías de Necesidades Humanas, e incorporamos estas etiquetas como características para la categorización de eventos. Nuestros resultados muestran que el reconocimiento de conceptos semánticos relevantes mejora tanto el recuerdo como la precisión de la categorización de las necesidades humanas para los eventos.', 'pt': 'As categorias de Necessidades Humanas têm sido utilizadas para caracterizar o motivo pelo qual um evento afetivo é positivo ou negativo. Por exemplo, “eu peguei a gripe” e “eu fui demitido” são eventos negativos (indesejáveis), mas pegar a gripe é um problema de saúde enquanto ser demitido é um problema financeiro. Trabalhos anteriores criaram modelos de aprendizagem para atribuir eventos a categorias de Necessidades Humanas com base em suas palavras e contextos. Neste artigo, apresentamos uma etapa intermediária que atribui palavras a conceitos semânticos relevantes. Criamos modelos levemente supervisionados que aprendem a rotular palavras em relação a 10 conceitos semânticos associados às categorias de Necessidades Humanas e incorporam esses rótulos como recursos para categorização de eventos. Nossos resultados mostram que reconhecer conceitos semânticos relevantes melhora tanto a recordação quanto a precisão da categorização de Necessidades Humanas para eventos.', 'ar': 'تم استخدام فئات الاحتياجات البشرية لوصف سبب كون الحدث العاطفي إيجابيًا أو سلبيًا. على سبيل المثال ، "لقد أصبت بالإنفلونزا" و "لقد تم فصلي من العمل" كلاهما حدثان سلبيان (غير مرغوب فيهما) ، لكن الإصابة بالأنفلونزا هي مشكلة صحية أثناء فصلي من العمل يمثل مشكلة مالية. أنشأ العمل السابق نماذج تعلم لتخصيص الأحداث لفئات الاحتياجات البشرية بناءً على كلماتهم وسياقاتهم. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم خطوة وسيطة تقوم بتعيين كلمات للمفاهيم الدلالية ذات الصلة. نقوم بإنشاء نماذج تحت الإشراف الخفيف تتعلم تسمية الكلمات فيما يتعلق بـ 10 مفاهيم دلالية مرتبطة بفئات الاحتياجات البشرية ، ودمج هذه الملصقات كميزات لتصنيف الأحداث. تظهر نتائجنا أن التعرف على المفاهيم الدلالية ذات الصلة يحسن كلاً من استدعاء ودقة تصنيف الاحتياجات البشرية للأحداث.', 'hi': 'मानव आवश्यकताओं की श्रेणियों का उपयोग इस कारण को चिह्नित करने के लिए किया गया है कि एक भावात्मक घटना सकारात्मक या नकारात्मक क्यों है। उदाहरण के लिए, "मुझे फ्लू मिला" और "मुझे निकाल दिया गया" दोनों नकारात्मक (अवांछनीय) घटनाएं हैं, लेकिन फ्लू प्राप्त करना एक स्वास्थ्य समस्या है, जबकि निकाल दिया जाना एक वित्तीय समस्या है। पिछले काम ने अपने शब्दों और संदर्भों के आधार पर मानव आवश्यकताओं की श्रेणियों को घटनाओं को असाइन करने के लिए सीखने के मॉडल बनाए। इस पेपर में, हम एक मध्यवर्ती चरण पेश करते हैं जो प्रासंगिक शब्दार्थ अवधारणाओं को शब्दों को असाइन करता है। हम हल्के से पर्यवेक्षित मॉडल बनाते हैं जो मानव आवश्यकताओं की श्रेणियों से जुड़ी 10 शब्दार्थ अवधारणाओं के संबंध में शब्दों को लेबल करना सीखते हैं, और इन लेबलों को घटना वर्गीकरण के लिए सुविधाओं के रूप में शामिल करते हैं। हमारे परिणामों से पता चलता है कि प्रासंगिक शब्दार्थ अवधारणाओं को पहचानने से घटनाओं के लिए मानव आवश्यकताओं के वर्गीकरण की याद और सटीकता दोनों में सुधार होता है।', 'ja': '人間のニーズカテゴリは、情動的事象が肯定的または否定的である理由を特徴付けるために使用されてきた。たとえば、「インフルエンザにかかった」と「クビになった」はどちらもマイナス（望ましくない）事象ですが、クビになっている間にインフルエンザにかかることは健康上の問題です。以前の研究では、人間のニーズのカテゴリにイベントを割り当てるための学習モデルが作成されていました。本稿では、関連する意味概念に単語を割り当てる中間ステップを紹介する。人間のニーズカテゴリに関連付けられた10のセマンティックコンセプトに関して単語にラベルを付けることを学ぶ軽く監督されたモデルを作成し、これらのラベルをイベント分類のための機能として組み込んでいます。私たちの結果は、関連する意味概念を認識することで、事象の人間のニーズ分類の想起と精度の両方が向上することを示しています。', 'ru': 'Категории потребностей человека были использованы для характеристики причины, по которой аффективное явление является положительным или отрицательным. Например, «Я заболел гриппом» и «Меня уволили» являются негативными (нежелательными) событиями, но заражение гриппом является проблемой со здоровьем, а увольнение - финансовой проблемой. В ходе предыдущей работы были созданы модели обучения для отнесения событий к категориям «Потребности человека» на основе их слов и контекстов. В этой статье мы вводим промежуточный шаг, который присваивает слова соответствующим семантическим понятиям. Мы создаем слегка контролируемые модели, которые учатся маркировать слова в соответствии с 10 семантическими понятиями, связанными с категориями человеческих потребностей, и включают эти метки в качестве признаков для категоризации событий. Наши результаты показывают, что распознавание соответствующих семантических концепций улучшает как вызов, так и точность категоризации человеческих потребностей для событий.', 'zh': '人之所以叙情者,积极之极也。 如"我得流感"、"我被解雇",皆负面(不良)事也,得流感一健,解雇一财也。 前事创学模形,以单词上下文分人。 本文中,我们介介了一个将单词分配相关语义概念的中间步驿。 吾创为轻督之法,学以类相关者10语义名单词,并而为事类者也。 吾之的结果表明,识相关者语义可以重人事之思精确度。', 'ga': 'Baineadh úsáid as catagóirí Riachtanais Dhaonna chun an fáth a bhfuil teagmhas mothaitheach dearfach nó diúltach a shainiú. Mar shampla, is imeachtaí diúltacha (neamh-inmhianaithe) iad “Fuair mé an fliú” agus “brí mé”, ach is fadhb Airgeadais é an fliú a fháil agus tú ag bréanú díom. Chruthaigh obair roimhe seo samhlacha foghlama chun imeachtaí a shannadh do chatagóirí Riachtanas Daonna bunaithe ar a gcuid focal agus a gcomhthéacsanna. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid isteach céim idirmheánach a sannann focail do choincheapa shéimeantacha ábhartha. Cruthaímid múnlaí maoirsithe éadroma a fhoghlaimíonn conas focail a lipéadú maidir le 10 gcoincheap shéimeantach a bhaineann le catagóirí Riachtanas Daonna, agus ionchorpraímid na lipéid seo mar ghnéithe le haghaidh catagóiriú imeachtaí. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí go bhfeabhsaítear athghairm agus beachtas chatagóiriú Riachtanas Daonna le haghaidh imeachtaí trí choincheapa shéimeantacha ábhartha a aithint.', 'ka': 'ადამიანის საჭირო კატეგორიები გამოყენებული იყო, რატომ მიზეზი, რატომ მიზეზი, რატომ მიზეზი მოვლენა პოტიფიური ან negatifური. მაგალითად, "მივიღეთ გლუფი" და "მივიღეთ" ორივე განსაკუთრებული მოვლენები არიან, მაგრამ გლუფის მივიღეთ სიცილი პრობლემა, როცა გახსენა ფინსონციალური პრობლემა. წინა სამუშაო შექმნა სწავლის მოდელები, რომლებიც ადამიანის საჭირო კატეგორიზებისთვის, მათი სიტყვების და კონტექსტებისთვის დაბაზე ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ გავაჩვენოთ საშუალო ნაწილი, რომელიც სიტყვებს შესაბამისი სემონტიკური კონცექტებში დააყენებს. ჩვენ მარტივი მოდელების შექმნა, რომლებიც მოვისწავლოთ სიტყვების შესახებ 10 სემონტიკური კონცექტების შესახებ, რომლებიც ადამიანის საჭირო კატეგორიზაციაზე დაკავშირებული,  ჩვენი წარმოდგენების შესახებ, რომ შესახებ შესახებ სემონტიკური კონფექტები უფრო მეტადებს ადამიანის საჭირო კატეგორიზაცია მოხდებისთვის.', 'hu': 'Az Emberi Szükségletek kategóriáit használták annak jellemzésére, hogy egy affektív esemény miért pozitív vagy negatív. Például az "influenza" és a "kirúgtak" negatív (nemkívánatos) esemény, de az influenza megszerzése egészségügyi probléma, miközben kirúgtak, pénzügyi probléma. Az előző munka olyan tanulási modelleket hozott létre, amelyek az eseményeket az emberi igények kategóriáihoz rendelték a szavak és kontextusok alapján. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy közbenső lépést, amely a szavakat releváns szemantikai fogalmakhoz rendeli. Könnyen felügyelt modelleket hozunk létre, amelyek megtanulják a szavak címkézését az emberi igények kategóriájához kapcsolódó 10 szemantikai fogalom tekintetében, és ezeket a címkéket az eseménykategorizálás funkciójaként beépítik. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy a releváns szemantikai fogalmak felismerése javítja az események esetében az emberi igények kategorizálásának visszahívását és pontosságát.', 'el': 'Οι κατηγορίες ανθρώπινων αναγκών έχουν χρησιμοποιηθεί για να χαρακτηρίσουν τον λόγο για τον οποίο ένα συναισθηματικό γεγονός είναι θετικό ή αρνητικό. Για παράδειγμα, το "έπαθα γρίπη" και το "απολύθηκα" είναι και τα δύο αρνητικά (ανεπιθύμητα) γεγονότα, αλλά το να πάθω γρίπη είναι πρόβλημα υγείας ενώ το να απολυθώ είναι οικονομικό πρόβλημα. Προηγούμενες εργασίες δημιούργησαν μοντέλα μάθησης για να αντιστοιχούν γεγονότα σε κατηγορίες ανθρώπινων αναγκών με βάση τις λέξεις και τα πλαίσια τους. Στην παρούσα εργασία, εισάγουμε ένα ενδιάμεσο βήμα που αποδίδει λέξεις σε σχετικές σημασιολογικές έννοιες. Δημιουργούμε ελαφρά εποπτευμένα μοντέλα που μαθαίνουν να επισημαίνουν λέξεις σε σχέση με δέκα σημασιολογικές έννοιες που σχετίζονται με τις κατηγορίες ανθρώπινων αναγκών και ενσωματώνουν αυτές τις ετικέτες ως χαρακτηριστικά για κατηγοριοποίηση συμβάντων. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι η αναγνώριση σχετικών σημασιολογικών εννοιών βελτιώνει τόσο την ανάκληση όσο και την ακρίβεια της κατηγοριοποίησης των ανθρώπινων αναγκών για γεγονότα.', 'kk': "Адамдың санаттары оқиғаның неге оқиғаның оқиғасы не негативті сипаттамасын таңдау үшін қолданылады. Мысалы, 'Бірақ қалқымалы' және 'Бірақ қалдырылдым' екеуі негативті (қажеттілмейтін) оқиғалар, бірақ қалқымалы түсіру - саулық мәселесі - қалқымалы мәселе. Алдыңғы жұмыс оқиғаларды адамдардың сөздері мен контексттеріне негізделген санаттарына таңдау үшін оқиғаларды үйрену үлгілерін құрды. Бұл қағаздың орташа қадамын келтіріп, сөздерді сәйкес семантикалық концепцияларға беретін. Біз сөздерді 10 семантикалық концепцияларға қатынау үлгілерін жазып, адамдардың қажеттік санаттарына қатынау үлгілерін жазып, оқиғалардың санаттарына қатынау үшін осы жарлықтарды жазып қою ү Біздің нәтижелеріміз керек семантикалық концепцияларды түсініп, адамдардың қажеттіліктерінің саны мен дұрыстығын жасайды.", 'it': 'Le categorie dei bisogni umani sono state utilizzate per caratterizzare il motivo per cui un evento affettivo è positivo o negativo. Ad esempio, "ho avuto l\'influenza" e "sono stato licenziato" sono entrambi eventi negativi (indesiderabili), ma prendere l\'influenza è un problema di salute mentre essere licenziato è un problema finanziario. Il lavoro precedente ha creato modelli di apprendimento per assegnare eventi alle categorie dei bisogni umani in base alle loro parole e contesti. In questo articolo introduciamo un passaggio intermedio che assegna le parole a concetti semantici rilevanti. Creiamo modelli leggermente supervisionati che imparano ad etichettare le parole rispetto a 10 concetti semantici associati alle categorie Human Needs e incorporano queste etichette come caratteristiche per la categorizzazione degli eventi. I nostri risultati mostrano che riconoscere concetti semantici rilevanti migliora sia il richiamo che la precisione della categorizzazione dei bisogni umani per gli eventi.', 'lt': 'Žmogaus poreikių kategorijos buvo naudojamos apibūdinti priežastį, kodėl poveikis yra teigiamas arba neigiamas. Pavyzdžiui, "a š turiu gripą" ir "aš buvau atleistas" yra ir neigiami (nepageidaujami) įvykiai, tačiau gripo atsiradimas yra sveikatos problem a, kai jį atleidžia, yra finansinproblema. Ankstesniame darbe sukurti mokymosi modeliai, pagal kuriuos renginiai priskiriami žmogaus poreikių kategorijoms, remiantis jų žodžiais ir aplinkybėmis. Šiame dokumente įvedame tarpinį žingsnį, kuriuo žodžiai priskiriami atitinkamoms semantinėms koncepcijoms. Mes sukuriame lengvai prižiūrimus modelius, kurie mokosi ženklinti žodžius dėl 10 semantinių sąvokų, susijusių su žmogaus poreikių kategorijomis, ir įtraukiame šias etiketes kaip įvykių kategorijų savybes. Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad atitinkamų semantinių sąvokų pripažinimas pagerina ir žmogaus poreikių kategorijų atšaukimą, ir tikslumą renginiuose.', 'ms': "Kategori Keperlukan Manusia telah digunakan untuk mengkalarasikan sebab mengapa peristiwa afektif adalah positif atau negatif. Contohnya, 'saya mendapat flu' dan 'saya dipecat' adalah kedua-dua peristiwa negatif (tidak diinginkan), tetapi mendapatkan flu adalah masalah kesehatan semasa dipecat adalah masalah keuangan. Previous work created learning models to assign events to Human Needs categories based on their words and contexts.  Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan langkah sementara yang menukarkan perkataan kepada konsep semantik yang relevan. Kami mencipta model yang diawasi dengan mudah yang belajar untuk label perkataan mengenai 10 konsep semantik yang berkaitan dengan kategori Keperlukan Manusia, dan memasukkan label ini sebagai ciri-ciri untuk kategori peristiwa. Hasil kita menunjukkan bahawa pengenalan konsep semantik yang relevan meningkatkan pengingatan dan ketepatan kategorisasi Perlu Manusia untuk peristiwa.", 'ml': "Human Needs categories have been used to characterize the reason why an affective event is positive or negative.  ഉദാഹരണത്തിന്, എനിക്ക് ഫ്ലൂ കിട്ടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. എന്നിട്ട് 'എനിക്ക് വെടിവെച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു' രണ്ടുപേരും നഷ്ടമായ (അസാധ്യതയില്ല)  മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലിയില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അവയുടെ വാക്കുകളും പരിഹാസങ്ങളും അടിസ്ഥ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഇടയിലുള്ള പടിയില്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സെമാന്റിക്  നമ്മള്\u200d എളുപ്പമായി നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. പത്തു സെമാന്റിക് ആശയങ്ങളുമായി പഠിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. മനുഷ്യര്\u200dക്ക് ആ നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സെമാന്റിക് ആശയങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതാണെന്നാണ്. മ", 'mk': 'Категориите за човечки потреби се употребени за да се карактеризира причината зошто afective настан е позитивен или негативен. На пример, „имам грип“ и „ме отпуштија“ се негативни (нежелни) настани, но добивањето грип е здравствен проблем додека ме отпуштаат е финансиски проблем. Претходната работа создаде модели за учење за доделување на настани на категориите за човекови потреби врз основа на нивните зборови и контексти. Во овој весник, воведуваме меѓувремен чекор кој ги додава зборовите на релевантните семантични концепти. Создаваме лесно надгледувани модели кои учат да ги означуваат зборовите во однос на 10 семантични концепти поврзани со категориите за човекови потреби, и ги вклучуваме овие означувања како карактеристики за категоризација на настани. Our results show that recognizing relevant semantic concepts improves both the recall and precision of Human Needs categorization for events.', 'mt': "Kategoriji tal-Bżonnijiet tal-Bniedem intużaw biex jikkaratterizzaw ir-raġuni għaliex avveniment affetttiv huwa pożittiv jew negattiv. Pereżempju, 'kelli l-influwenza' u 'kelli n-nar' huma t-tnejn avvenimenti negattivi (mhux mixtieqa), iżda l-influwenza hija problem a tas-saħħa waqt li ngħatajt in-nar hija problema finanzjarja. Ix-xogħol preċedenti ħoloq mudelli ta’ tagħlim biex l-avvenimenti jiġu assenjati lill-kategoriji tal-Bniedem ibbażati fuq il-kliem u l-kuntesti tagħhom. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nintroduċu pass intermedju li jassenja l-kliem għal kunċetti semantiċi rilevanti. We create lightly supervised models that learn to label words with respect to 10 semantic concepts associated with Human Needs categories, and incorporate these labels as features for event categorization.  Ir-riżultati tagħna juru li r-rikonoxximent tal-kunċetti semantiċi rilevanti jtejjeb kemm it-tfakkir kif ukoll il-preċiżjoni tal-kategorizzazzjoni tal-ħtiġijiet tal-Bniedem għall-avvenimenti.", 'no': 'Menneske treng kategoriar er brukte for å teikna grunnen til at ein påverka hending er positiv eller negativ. For eksempel, «eg fikk gripa» og «eg fjerna ut» er både negativ hendingar, men å få gripa er eit helseproblem mens du fjerna ut er eit finansielt problem. Førre arbeid laga læringsmodeller for å tildelja hendingar til menneskelige treng kategoriar basert på ordene og kontekstane sine. I denne papiret introduserer vi ein middelsteg som tilbyr ord til relevante semantiske konseptar. Vi lager lett oversikte modeller som lærer å merke ord med respekt til 10 semantiske konseptar som er assosiert med kategoriar for menneske treng, og inkluderer desse merkelappene som funksjonar for hendingsgategorisering. Resultatet våre viser at gjenkjenning av relevante semantiske konseptar forbedrar både rekningen og nøyaktigheten av menneskelige treng kategorisering for hendingar.', 'ro': 'Categoriile de nevoi umane au fost folosite pentru a caracteriza motivul pentru care un eveniment afectiv este pozitiv sau negativ. De exemplu, "am gripă" și "am fost concediat" sunt ambele evenimente negative (nedorite), dar obținerea gripei este o problemă de sănătate în timp ce a fi concediat este o problemă financiară. Lucrările anterioare au creat modele de învățare pentru a atribui evenimente categoriilor de nevoi umane în funcție de cuvintele și contextele lor. În această lucrare, introducem un pas intermediar care atribuie cuvinte conceptelor semantice relevante. Creăm modele ușor supravegheate care învăță să eticheteze cuvintele în raport cu 10 concepte semantice asociate categoriilor de nevoi umane și încorporăm aceste etichete ca caracteristici pentru clasificarea evenimentelor. Rezultatele noastre arată că recunoașterea conceptelor semantice relevante îmbunătățește atât rechemarea, cât și precizia clasificării nevoilor umane pentru evenimente.', 'sr': "Kategorije ljudskih potreba su korišćene kako bi karakterizirale razlog zašto je uticajni događaj pozitivan ili negativan. Na primjer, 'dobio sam gripu' i 'otpušten' su obje negativne (nevidljive) događaje, ali dobiti gripu je problem zdravstva dok me otpuštaju je finansijski problem. Prethodni rad je stvorio modele učenja da odredi događaje kategorijama ljudskih potreba na temelju njihovih reči i konteksta. U ovom papiru predstavljamo međuvremeni korak koji daje reči relevantnim semantičkim konceptima. Mi stvaramo lagano nadgledane modele koji nauče označiti riječi u pogledu 10 semantičnih koncepta povezanih sa kategorijama ljudskih potreba, i uključujemo te etikete kao karakteristike za kategoriju događaja. Naši rezultati pokazuju da priznanje relevantnih semantičkih koncepta poboljšava sećanje i preciznost kategorije ljudskih potreba za događaje.", 'pl': 'Kategorie potrzeb człowieka zostały wykorzystane do scharakteryzowania przyczyny, dla których zdarzenie afektywne jest pozytywne lub negatywne. Na przykład: "Dostałem grypę" i "zostałem zwolniony" są negatywnymi (niepożądanymi) zdarzeniami, ale dostawanie grypy jest problemem zdrowotnym, podczas gdy zwolnienie jest problemem finansowym. Poprzednie prace stworzyły modele uczenia się, aby przypisywać zdarzenia do kategorii Potrzeb Człowieka na podstawie ich słów i kontekstów. W artykule przedstawiamy krok pośredni, który przypisuje słowa do istotnych pojęć semantycznych. Tworzymy lekko nadzorowane modele, które uczą się etykietować słowa w odniesieniu do dziesięciu koncepcji semantycznych związanych z kategoriami potrzeb człowieka i uwzględniają te etykiety jako funkcje do kategoryzacji zdarzeń. Nasze wyniki pokazują, że rozpoznawanie istotnych koncepcji semantycznych poprawia zarówno przypomnienie, jak i precyzję kategoryzacji potrzeb człowieka dla zdarzeń.', 'si': "මිනිස්සුන්ට අවශ්\u200dය වර්ගයක් භාවිත කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක සැකසුම් හේතුව සඳහා අවශ උදාහරණයෙන්, 'මට ග්\u200dරෝප් එක ගත්තා' සහ 'මට විස්තර කරලා තියෙන්නේ' දෙන්නම අනතුරු වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ඒත් ග්\u200dරෝප් එක ගත්තා  මිනිස්සුන්ට අවශ්\u200dය වචන සහ සංවේදනය අධාරණය කරන්න පුරාවන් වැඩේ ඉගෙනගන්න මොඩල් හදන්න. මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරවේශ කරනවා වචනය සම්බන්ධ සැමැන්තික අදහස් කරනවා. අපි ලොකු ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා මිනිස්සුන් අවශ්\u200dය වර්ගයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වර්ගය 10 සෙමාන්තික ප්\u200dරධානයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් වර්ගයෙ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ සම්බන්ධ සෙමාන්ටික් අදහස් කරනවා මිනිස්සු අවශ්\u200dය විදියට පරීක්ෂණය සහ අවශ්\u200d", 'so': "Sida loo isticmaalay kooxo dadka loo baahan yahay, si loo caddeeyo sababta ay dhacdo wax saameyn ah u tahay positive ama negativ. For example, 'I got the flu' and 'I got fired' are both negative (undesirable) events, but getting the flu is a Health problem while getting fired is a Financial problem.  Shaqo hore ayaa sameynay tusaalooyin waxbarasho si ay dhacdooyinka u qaybsadaan noocyada u baahan dadka ee uu u baahan yahay si ay ugu saleysan hadalkooda iyo qoraalkooda. Warqadan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaa tallaabo dhexe ah oo ku qoraya hadal ay u sheegto fikrada semantika. Tusaale fudud oo la ilaaliyo oo bara hadal lagu qoro oo ku saabsan 10 fekero semantic oo la xiriira kooxo dadka u baahan dadka, waxaana loo soo bandhigaa calaamadaas si gaar ah u kala qeybinta dhacdooyinka. Abaalkayaga waxay muuqataa in aqoonsashada fikrada kala duduwan ay kordhisaa xusuusta iyo saxda u baahan yihiin qaybiga dhacdooyinka dadka.", 'sv': 'Kategorier Mänskliga behov har använts för att karakterisera anledningen till att en affektiv händelse är positiv eller negativ. Till exempel "Jag fick influensa" och "Jag fick sparken" är båda negativa (oönskade) händelser, men att få influensa är ett hälsoproblem medan att få sparken är ett ekonomiskt problem. Tidigare arbete skapade inlärningsmodeller för att tilldela händelser till Human Needs kategorier baserat på deras ord och sammanhang. I denna uppsats introducerar vi ett mellanliggande steg som tilldelar ord till relevanta semantiska begrepp. Vi skapar lätt övervakade modeller som lär oss att märka ord med avseende på 10 semantiska begrepp förknippade med Human Needs kategorier, och införlivar dessa etiketter som funktioner för händelsekategorisering. Våra resultat visar att erkännande av relevanta semantiska begrepp förbättrar både återkallelsen och precisionen av Human Needs kategorisering för händelser.', 'mn': 'Хүн төрөлхтний хэрэгтэй категориуд нь эерэг эсвэл сөрөг үйл явдлыг харуулахын тулд хэрэглэгдсэн. Жишээлбэл, "Би грипп авсан" гэдэг нь хасах (хүсэхгүй) үйл явдал юм. Гэхдээ грипп авах нь эрүүл мэндийн асуудал гэдэг нь санхүүгийн асуудал юм. Өмнөх ажил хүн төрөлхтний хэрэгцээнд үйл явдлыг зохион байгуулахын тулд суралцах загварыг бүтээсэн. Энэ цаасан дээр бид үгсийг холбоотой семантик ойлголтын тухай орчин алхам танилцуулдаг. Бид хүний хэрэгцээтэй холбогдсон 10 семантик ойлголтын тухай үг загвар бий болгож, эдгээр загваруудыг үйл явдлын категорийн хувьд бүрдүүлдэг. Бидний үр дүнд холбоотой семантик ойлголтыг хүлээн зөвшөөрөх нь хүний хэрэгцээний тодорхойлолт болон тодорхойлолт нь боловсруулдаг.', 'ta': "ஒரு பாதிக்கும் நிகழ்வு நேர்மறை அல்லது எதிர்மறை என்ற காரணத்திற்கான காரணமாக மனித வேண்டிய வகுப்பு உதாரணத்திற்கு 'நான் விளையாடி கிடைத்தது' மற்றும் 'நான் வெளியேற்றப்பட்டுள்ளேன்' இருவரும் -எதிர்மறையான) நிகழ்வுகள், ஆனால் விளையாடு @ info இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு நடுநிலை படி குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். அது வார்த்தைகளை தொடர்புடைய அர்த்தமான கருத்துக்கள நாம் எளிதாக கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளை உருவாக்குகிறோம் அது வார்த்தைகளை விளக்கச் சொல்லும் 10 பெமான்டிக் கருத்துகளுடன் மனித விருப்பங்களு எங்கள் முடிவுகள் தெரியும் பொருத்தமான பெம்பென்டிக் கருத்துக்களை உணர்ந்து கொள்வது நிகழ்வுகளுக்கு நினைவு மற்றும்", 'ur': 'انسان کی ضرورت کاٹیوں کے لئے استعمال کئے گئے ہیں کہ ایک اثرات حادثہ مثبت یا منفی کیوں ہے۔ مثال یہ ہے کہ "مجھے فلوپ ملی" اور "مجھے اٹھایا گیا" دونوں منفی (ناپسند) حادثہ ہیں، لیکن فلوپ حاصل کرنے کا ایک سلامتی مسئلہ ہے جبکہ اٹھایا جاتا ہے وہ ایک مالی مسئلہ ہے. اگلے کام نے انسان کے کلمات اور کنٹکسٹس پر بنیاد رکھنے کے لئے موجودات کی تعلیم مدل بنائی ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک میانہ قدم معرفی کرتے ہیں جو کلمات معرفی سیمنٹی نظریں کے لئے مقرر کرتا ہے۔ ہم آسانی طرح نظارت کی موڈل بناتے ہیں جو ۱۰ سیمنٹی نظریوں کے معاملہ میں لکھ سکتے ہیں جن کے ساتھ انسان کی نیاز کاٹیوں کے معاملہ میں مشترک ہیں، اور یہ لابلوں کو ایٹیوں کاٹیوجیزی کے لئے ویژگی کے طور پر شامل کرتا ہے. ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ معاملہ سیمنٹی نظریوں کی پہچان کرنا، انسان کی ضرورت کا ذکر اور دقیق برابر ہوتا ہے کہ حادثوں کے لئے تقسیم کرنا ہے.', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis Masalan, "Men suv olib ketdim" va "men ishga tushganman" ikkita negativ (asoslangan) hodisalar, lekin suhbat olish juda bog\'liq muammo, balki o\'chirib chiqishda Financial muammo. Oldingi ishni o\'rganish modellarini inson muhit va tartiblar asosida o\'rganish uchun turlarini qanday qilish uchun yaratildi. Bu qogʻozda, biz ma\'lum semantik fikrlariga so\'zlarni o\'zgartiradigan o\'zlarni o\'zgartirish orasidagi o\'rtacha qadam beramiz. Biz oddiy taʼminlovchi modellarni yaratishmiz. Bu so\'zlarni 10 semantik g\'oyalar bilan bog\'liq narsa bilan o\'rganish mumkin, va bu tugmalarni tashqi turlariga qo\'yish mumkin. Bizning natijalarimiz hozirga bog\'liq semantik g\'oyalarini aniqlashni ko\'rsatadi. Hodisalar uchun qo\'llanma uchun kategoriyatning xotira va murakkablarini bajaradi.', 'vi': 'Loại nhu cầu nhân loại đã được dùng để diễn tả lý do tại sao một biến cố dương tính hay âm tính. Ví dụ, "Tôi bị cúm" và "Tôi bị sa thải" đều là các sự kiện âm tính (không mong muốn) nhưng bệnh cúm là một vấn đề sức khỏe trong khi bị sa thải là một vấn đề tài chính. Trước đây đã tạo ra các mô hình học để gán các sự kiện cho các loại nhu cầu nhân tạo dựa trên ngôn ngữ và ngữ cảnh. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta sẽ đưa ra một bước trung gian chỉ định từ cho các khái niệm ngữ pháp liên quan. Chúng tôi tạo ra các mô hình được giám sát nhẹ để học cách hiệu các từ với tôn giáo mười khái niệm ngữ pháp liên quan đến các phân loại nhu cầu con người, và nhập các nhãn này vào dạng đặc trưng cho việc phân loại các sự kiện. Kết quả cho thấy việc nhận diện các khái niệm ngữ pháp liên quan cải thiện việc triệu tập và độ chính xác của phân loại nhu cầu con người cho các sự kiện.', 'da': "Menneskelige behovskategorier er blevet brugt til at karakterisere årsagen til, at en affektiv begivenhed er positiv eller negativ. For eksempel er 'Jeg fik influenza' og 'Jeg blev fyret' begge negative (uønskede) begivenheder, men at få influenza er et sundhedsproblem, mens du bliver fyret er et økonomisk problem. Tidligere arbejde skabte læringsmodeller til at tildele begivenheder til kategorier af menneskelige behov baseret på deres ord og sammenhænge. I denne artikel introducerer vi et mellemliggende trin, der tildeler ord til relevante semantiske begreber. Vi skaber let overvågede modeller, der lærer at mærke ord i forhold til 10 semantiske begreber forbundet med Human Needs kategorier, og indarbejder disse etiketter som funktioner til eventkategorisering. Vores resultater viser, at anerkendelse af relevante semantiske begreber forbedrer både tilbagekaldelsen og præcisionen af Human Needs kategorisering for begivenheder.", 'bg': 'Категориите човешки потребности са използвани за характеризиране на причината, поради която дадено афективно събитие е положително или отрицателно. Например "хванах грип" и "уволниха ме" са и двете отрицателни (нежелани) събития, но грипът е здравословен проблем, докато те уволнят е финансов проблем. Предишна работа създаде модели за обучение, за да присвои събития към категориите Човешки потребности въз основа на техните думи и контексти. В тази статия въвеждаме междинна стъпка, която присвоява думите към съответните семантични понятия. Създаваме леки модели, които се научават да етикетират думи по отношение на 10 семантични понятия, свързани с категориите човешки потребности, и включват тези етикети като функции за категоризация на събития. Нашите резултати показват, че разпознаването на съответните семантични понятия подобрява както припомнянето, така и прецизността на категоризацията на човешките потребности за събития.', 'nl': "Human Needs categorieën zijn gebruikt om de reden te karakteriseren waarom een affectieve gebeurtenis positief of negatief is. Bijvoorbeeld, 'Ik kreeg de griep' en 'Ik werd ontslagen' zijn beide negatieve (ongewenste) gebeurtenissen, maar griep krijgen is een gezondheidsprobleem terwijl ontslagen worden een financieel probleem is. Eerder werk creëerde leermodellen om gebeurtenissen toe te wijzen aan categorieën met menselijke behoeften op basis van hun woorden en contexten. In dit artikel introduceren we een tussenstap die woorden toewijst aan relevante semantische concepten. We maken licht begeleide modellen die leren woorden te labelen met betrekking tot tien semantische concepten geassocieerd met Human Needs categorieën, en deze labels opnemen als functies voor gebeurteniscategorisatie. Onze resultaten tonen aan dat het herkennen van relevante semantische concepten zowel de recall als de precisie van Human Needs categorisering voor gebeurtenissen verbetert.", 'hr': "Kategorije ljudskih potreba koristljene su za karakteriziranje razloga zašto je utjecajni događaj pozitivan ili negativan. Na primjer, 'dobio sam gripu' i 'otpušten' su obje negativne (nevidljive) događaje, ali dobiti gripu je problem zdravstva dok me otpuštaju je financijski problem. Prethodni rad stvorio je modele učenja za određivanje događaja kategorijama ljudskih potreba na temelju njihovih riječi i konteksta. U ovom papiru predstavljamo prosječni korak koji daje riječi relevantnim semantičkim konceptima. Mi stvaramo lagano nadzirani modeli koji nauče označiti riječi u odnosu na 10 semantičkih koncepta povezanih s kategorijama ljudskih potreba i uključuju te etikete kao karakteristike za kategoriju događaja. Naši rezultati pokazuju da priznanje relevantnih semantičkih koncepta poboljšava sjećanje i preciznost kategorije ljudskih potreba za događaje.", 'de': 'Human Needs Kategorien wurden verwendet, um den Grund zu charakterisieren, warum ein affektives Ereignis positiv oder negativ ist. Zum Beispiel "Ich habe die Grippe" und "Ich wurde gefeuert" sind beide negative (unerwünschte) Ereignisse, aber Grippe zu bekommen ist ein Gesundheitsproblem, während gefeuert zu werden ein finanzielles Problem ist. Frühere Arbeiten erstellten Lernmodelle, um Ereignisse basierend auf ihren Wörtern und Kontexten den Kategorien Human Needs zuzuordnen. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir einen Zwischenschritt vor, der Wörter relevanten semantischen Konzepten zuordnet. Wir erstellen leicht überwachte Modelle, die lernen, Wörter in Bezug auf zehn semantische Konzepte zu kennzeichnen, die mit Human Needs-Kategorien assoziiert sind, und integrieren diese Labels als Funktionen für die Ereigniskategorisierung. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass das Erkennen relevanter semantischer Konzepte sowohl den Rückruf als auch die Präzision der Kategorisierung von Human Needs für Ereignisse verbessert.', 'ko': "인간의 수요 유형은 감정 사건이 긍정적인지 부정적인지 묘사하는 데 쓰인다.예를 들어'나 독감 걸렸어'와'나 잘렸어'는 모두 부정적(환영받지 못한) 사건이지만 독감에 걸린 것은 건강문제이고 잘린 것은 재무문제다.이전의 작업은 학습 모델을 만들어 사건의 어휘와 상하문에 따라 사건을 인류의 수요 유형에 분배했다.본고에서 우리는 중간 절차를 도입하여 단어를 관련 의미 개념에 분배했다.우리는 감독하기 쉬운 모델을 만들어 인류의 수요 유형과 관련된 10개의 의미 개념에 따라 단어를 표기하고 이 라벨을 사건 분류의 특징으로 삼았다.우리의 연구 결과에 따르면 관련 의미 개념을 식별하면 사건에서 인류의 수요 분류의 리콜율과 정확성을 높일 수 있다.", 'fa': 'نیازهای انسان برای تعریف دلیلی که یک رویداد تاثیرگذاری مثبت یا منفی است استفاده شده است. برای مثال، "من گروپ گرفتم" و "من اخراج شدم" هر دو اتفاق منفی (ناخوشایند) هستند، ولی گرفتن گروپ یک مشکل سلامتی است در حالی که اخراج شدن یک مشکل مالی است. کارهای قبلی مدل یادگیری برای تعیین رویدادها به مجموعه های نیازهای انسان بر اساس کلمات و موضوعات آنها ایجاد کرد. در این کاغذ، ما یک قدم متوسط را معرفی می کنیم که کلمات را به عنوان مفهوم\u200cهای سنتی ارتباط می\u200cدهد. ما مدل های تحت نظر روشنی ساختیم که یاد می گیرند کلمات را با نسبت به ۱۰ مفهوم سیمانتی ارتباط به kategoriهای نیازهای انسان باشد، و این نقاشی را به عنوان ویژگی برای تقسیم کردن اتفاقات شامل می کنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که شناختن نظریه\u200cهای سنتی مربوط به یادآوری و دقیق نیازهای انسان برای اتفاقات بهتر می\u200cشود.', 'id': 'Kategori Kebutuhan Manusia telah digunakan untuk mengkaraterisasi alasan mengapa peristiwa afektif positif atau negatif. Contohnya, "Saya mendapat flu" dan "Saya dipecat" adalah kejadian negatif (tidak diinginkan), tetapi mendapatkan flu adalah masalah kesehatan sementara dipecat adalah masalah keuangan. Pekerjaan sebelumnya menciptakan model belajar untuk mengarahkan peristiwa kepada kategori Kebutuhan Manusia berdasarkan kata-kata dan konteks mereka. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan langkah intermedi yang mengarahkan kata-kata kepada konsep semantis relevan. Kami menciptakan model yang terlihat ringan yang belajar untuk mengetikkan kata-kata mengenai 10 konsep semantis yang berhubungan dengan kategori Kebutuhan Manusia, dan memasukkan label-label ini sebagai fitur untuk kategori peristiwa. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa mengenali konsep semantis relevan meningkatkan pengingatan dan presisi dari kategorisasi Kebutuhan Manusia untuk peristiwa.', 'sw': "Human Needs categories have been used to characterize the reason why an affective event is positive or negative.  Kwa mfano, 'Nilipata mafua' na 'nilifukuzwa' ni matukio yasiyo na hasi (yasiyoeleweka) lakini kupata mafua ni tatizo la afya wakati akifukuzwa ni tatizo la kifedha. Kazi zilizopita ilitengeneza mifano ya kujifunza kutengeneza matukio kwa makundi yanayohitaji binadamu kwa kutumia maneno na matatizo yao. Katika gazeti hili, tunaonyesha hatua ya kati inayoweka maneno kwa dhana inayohusiana na kimapenzi. Tunaweza kutengeneza mifano ya kufuatiliwa kirahisi ambazo hujifunza kuandika maneno kwa kuheshimu dhana ya sekunde 10 zinazohusiana na makundi ya binadamu yanayohitaji binadamu, na kuingiza alama hizi kama alama kwa ajili ya makundi ya tukio. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kwamba kutambua dhana inayohusiana na sekunda inaboresha kumbukumbu na sahihi ya kutenganishwa kwa matukio ya binadamu.", 'sq': "Kategoritë e nevojave njerëzore janë përdorur për të karakterizuar arsyen pse një ngjarje afektive është pozitive apo negative. For example, 'I got the flu' and 'I got fired' are both negative (undesirable) events, but getting the flu is a Health problem while getting fired is a Financial problem.  Puna e mëparshme krijoi modele mësimi për t'i caktuar ngjarjet kategorive të nevojave njerëzore bazuar në fjalët dhe kontekstet e tyre. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një hap të mesëm që i cakton fjalët koncepteve semantike të rëndësishme. Ne krijojmë modele të mbikqyrur lehtë që mësojnë të etiketojnë fjalët lidhur me 10 koncepte semantike të lidhura me kategoritë e nevojave njerëzore dhe të përfshijnë këto etiketa si karakteristika për kategorizimin e ngjarjeve. Our results show that recognizing relevant semantic concepts improves both the recall and precision of Human Needs categorization for events.", 'am': 'የሰው ፈቃድ ግንኙነት አካባቢ ወይም አካባቢ መሆኑን በመግለጽ ተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ ለምሳሌ ‹ፍላጻ አገኘሁ›› እና ‹ተወግቻለሁ› ሁለቱም ጉዳዮች negative (የማይቻል) ናቸው፡፡ ግን የፉላው መቀበል በመውጣት ጊዜ የደኅንነት ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ የቀድሞው ስራ ቃላቸውና ትግባሮች በመሠረት ላይ ጉዳዮችን ለሰው የሚፈልጉትን ክፍሎች ለማስጠጋት ተማሪ ምሳሌዎችን አቀረበ፡፡ በዚህ ካላት ውስጥ ቃላትን ለአስቸጋሪ የsemantic አሳብ የሚያሳየው የመካከለኛ ደረጃን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ አዲስ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢዎች ጋር በተያያዙ አሥር ምሳሌዎችን ለመማር እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፍሬዎቻችን የግንኙነት የsemantic አካሄዱን ማወቅ የሰው ማስታሰቢያ እና ማስታወቂያውን ለሁኔታዎች ግንኙነት እንዲሻል ያሳየናል፡፡', 'tr': "Adamlar kategoriýalary näme üçin etkinlik wajyp däl ýa-da negatif bolmagyň sebäbi karakterifikasynda ullanýarlar. Mesela, 'grip'i aldym' we 'kovuldym' hem negatif çykyşyklar bolar, ýöne grip ýitirmek saglyk meselesi işden çykarmak üçin mali mesele. Öňki işiň adamlaryň sözlerine we metinlerine daýlamak üçin öwrenmek nusgalaryny bejerdi. Bu kagyzda, semantik düşünjelere sözleri takyklaýan arasyndaky adım tanyşdyrýarys. Biz bu etiketleri 10 semantik düşünjeleri bilen alat etmek üçin aňsatly gözlemli nusgalary bejer we bu etiketleri taýýarlamak üçin özellikler diýip ýazylýarys. Biziň netijelerimiz nähili semantik düşünjelerini tanamak hem ynsan gerekli taýýarlaryň derejesini hem gowurar.", 'hy': "Մարդկային կարիքների կատեգորիաները օգտագործվել են որպես բնորոշ պատճառ, թե ինչու է ազդեցությունը դրական կամ բացասական: For example, 'I got the flu' and 'I got fired' are both negative (undesirable) events, but getting the flu is a Health problem while getting fired is a Financial problem.  Անցյալ աշխատանքը ստեղծեց ուսումնասիրության մոդելներ, որպեսզի իրադարձությունները պատվիրեն մարդկային կարիքների կատեգորիաներին, հիմնված նրանց բառերի և կոնտեքստների վրա: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք միջին քայլը, որը բառերը տրամադրում է նշանակալի սեմանտիկ գաղափարներին: Մենք ստեղծում ենք թեթև վերահսկված մոդելներ, որոնք սովորում են նշանակել բառերը մարդկային կարիքների կատեգորիաների հետ կապված 10 սեմանտիկ գաղափարի հետ, և ներառում են այս նշանները որպես իրադարձությունների կատեգորիզացիայի հատկություններ: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ նշանակալի սեմանտիկ գաղափարների ճանաչելը բարելավում է մարդկային կարիքների կատեգորիզացիայի հիշելը և ճշգրիտությունը իրադարձությունների համար:", 'az': 'ńįnsanlarńĪn kategoriyalarńĪnńĪ t…ôsirli olaraq pozitif ya da negatif olaraq t…ôsirl…ônm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn istifad…ô edilmiŇüdir. M…ôs…ôl…ôn, "grip aldńĪm" v…ô "atńĪldńĪm" h…ôr ikisi negatif (ist…ôm…ôz) olaraq, lakin grip almaq t…ôhl√ľk…ôsizlik problemidir, iŇüńĪqlandńĪrmaq Financial problemidir. ∆Źvv…ôlki iŇül…ôr insanlarńĪn s√∂zl…ôrin…ô v…ô m…ôs…ôl…ôl…ôrin…ô dayanńĪlmaq √ľ√ß√ľn √∂yr…ônm…ôk modell…ôrini yaratdńĪ. Bu kańüńĪzda, …ôlaq…ôsiz semantik fikirl…ôr…ô s√∂zl…ôri verir. Biz insanlarńĪn ehtiyaclarńĪ kategoriyalarńĪna bańülńĪ 10 semantik fikirl…ôr…ô g√∂r…ô s√∂zl…ôri etiketl…ôm…ôyi √∂yr…ôn…ôn …ôn y√ľng√ľl g√∂z…ôtli modell…ôri yaratdńĪq v…ô bu etiketl…ôri olaraq kategoriyalarńĪn √∂zellikl…ôri olaraq qatńĪŇüdńĪrńĪq. Sonu√ßlarńĪmńĪz g√∂st…ôrir ki, …ôlaq…ôtli semantik fikirl…ôri tanńĪmmaq h…ôm√ßinin ńįnsan ehtiyacńĪnńĪn kategoriyalarńĪnńĪn hatńĪrlamasńĪnńĪ v…ô d…ôqiqliyini daha yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪr.', 'bn': "মানুষের প্রয়োজনীয় বিভাগ ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে কেন একটি প্রভাবিত ঘটনা ইতিবাচক অথবা নেতিবাচক। উদাহরণস্বরূপ, 'আমার ফ্লু পেয়েছি' এবং 'আমাকে গুলি করা হয়েছে' উভয়ই নেতিবাচক (অসম্ভব) ঘটনা, কিন্তু ফ্লু পাওয়া যাচ্ছে স্বাস্থ্য সমস্যা যখন ফ্লুট পূর্ববর্তী কাজ তৈরি করেছে মানুষের প্রয়োজনীয় অনুষ্ঠানের ক্ষেত্রে তাদের শব্দ এবং প্রতিযোগিতার উপর ভিত্ত এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি মাধ্যমীন পদক্ষেপ পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি যা সংক্রান্ত সেমেন্টিক ধারণার জন্য শব্দ দিয়েছে। We create lightly supervised models that learn to label words with respect to 10 semantic concepts associated with Human Needs categories, and incorporate these labels as features for event categorization.  আমাদের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রয়োজনীয় সেমান্টিক ধারণাকে স্বীকার করে মানুষের প্রয়োজনীয় বিভাগের স্মরণ এবং সুস্", 'cs': 'Kategorie lidských potřeb byly použity k charakterizaci důvodu, proč je afektivní událost pozitivní nebo negativní. Například "Dostal jsem chřipku" a "Dostal jsem padáka" jsou oba negativní (nežádoucí) události, ale dostat chřipku je zdravotní problém, zatímco dostat padáka je finanční problém. Předchozí práce vytvořila vzdělávací modely pro přiřazení událostí do kategorií lidských potřeb na základě jejich slov a kontextů. V tomto článku představujeme mezikrok, který přiřazuje slova relevantním sémantickým pojmům. Vytváříme lehce dohlížené modely, které se naučí označovat slova s ohledem na deset sémantických konceptů spojených s kategorií Lidské potřeby, a začlení tyto štítky jako funkce pro kategorizaci událostí. Naše výsledky ukazují, že rozpoznání relevantních sémantických konceptů zlepšuje jak vyvolání, tak přesnost kategorizace lidských potřeb pro události.', 'bs': "Kategorije ljudskih potreba su korišćene za karakteriziranje razloga zašto je utjecajni događaj pozitivan ili negativan. Na primjer, 'dobio sam gripu' i 'otpušten' su obje negativne (nevidljive) događaje, ali dobiti gripu je problem zdravstva dok me otpuštaju je finansijski problem. Prethodni rad je stvorio modele učenja za dodavanje događaja kategorijama ljudskih potreba na temelju njihovih riječi i konteksta. U ovom papiru predstavljamo prosječni korak koji daje riječi relevantnim semantičkim konceptima. Mi stvaramo lagano nadzirani modeli koji nauče označiti riječi u odnosu na 10 semantičkih koncepta povezanih sa kategorijama ljudskih potreba, i uključujemo te etikete kao karakteristike za kategoriju događaja. Naši rezultati pokazuju da priznanje relevantnih semantičkih koncepta poboljšava sjećanje i preciznost kategorije ljudskih potreba za događaje.", 'et': 'Inimvajaduste kategooriaid on kasutatud selleks, et kirjeldada põhjust, miks afektiivne sündmus on positiivne või negatiivne. Näiteks "mul on gripp" ja "mind vallandati" on mõlemad negatiivsed (soovimatud) sündmused, kuid gripp on terviseprobleem, samal ajal kui vallandamine on finantsprobleem. Varasemate töödega loodi õppemudelid sündmuste määramiseks inimvajaduste kategooriatesse nende sõnade ja konteksti alusel. Käesolevas töös tutvustame vahepealset sammu, mis määrab sõnad asjakohastele semantilistele kontseptsioonidele. Me loome kergesti järelevalvestatud mudeleid, mis õpivad märgistama sõnu 10 semantilise kontseptsiooni kohta, mis on seotud inimvajaduste kategooriatega, ja lisavad need sildid sündmuste kategooriate funktsioonidena. Meie tulemused näitavad, et asjakohaste semantiliste kontseptsioonide tunnustamine parandab inimvajaduste kategooriate meenutamist ja täpsust sündmuste jaoks.', 'ca': "Les categories de necessitats humanes han estat utilitzades per caracteritzar la raó per la qual un esdeveniment afectiu és positiu o negatiu. Per exemple, 'm'ha fet la grip' i 'm'han fet despedir' són esdeveniments negatius (no desitjables), però aconseguir la grip és un problem a sanitari mentre m'han fet despedir és un problema financer. La feina anterior va crear models d'aprenentatge per assenyar esdeveniments a categories de necessitats humanes basades en les seves paraules i contextos. En aquest article introduim un pas intermedi que assenya paraules a conceptes semàntics pertinents. Creem models lliurement supervisats que aprenen a etiquetar paraules en relació a 10 conceptes semàntics associats a les categories de Necessitats Humanes, i incorporem aquestes etiquetes com característiques per a la categorització d'eventos. Our results show that recognizing relevant semantic concepts improves both the recall and precision of Human Needs categorization for events.", 'fi': 'Ihmisten tarpeiden kategorioita on käytetty kuvaamaan sitä, miksi affektiivinen tapahtuma on positiivinen tai negatiivinen. Esimerkiksi "sain flunssan" ja "sain potkut" ovat molemmat negatiivisia (ei-toivottuja) tapahtumia, mutta flunssan saaminen on terveysongelma samalla kun potkut on taloudellinen ongelma. Aiemmassa työssä luotiin oppimismalleja, joiden avulla tapahtumat voidaan jakaa ihmisten tarpeiden luokkiin niiden sanojen ja kontekstien perusteella. Tässä työssä esittelemme välivaiheen, joka määrittää sanat merkityksellisiin semanttisiin käsitteisiin. Luomme kevyesti valvottuja malleja, jotka oppivat merkitsemään sanoja suhteessa 10 semanttiseen käsitteeseen, jotka liittyvät Human Needs kategorioihin, ja yhdistävät nämä merkinnät tapahtumaluokittelun ominaisuuksiksi. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että relevanttien semanttisten käsitteiden tunnistaminen parantaa sekä inhimillisten tarpeiden luokittelun muistelua että tarkkuutta tapahtumiin.', 'af': 'Mens benodig kategories is gebruik om die rede te karakteriseer waarom \'n effektief gebeurtenis positief of negatief is. Byvoorbeeld, "Ek het die grip gekry" en "Ek het uitgegaan" is beide negatiewe (onverstandige) gebeurtenis, maar kry die grip is \'n gesondige probleem terwyl ek uitgegaan word, is \'n finansiële probleem. Vorige werk het geleer modele geskep om gebeurtenis aan die menslike Need kategories te toewys, gebaseer op hul woorde en kontekste. In hierdie papier, introduseer ons \'n middelste stap wat woorde aan relevante semantiese konsepte toewys. Ons skep lig ondersoekte modele wat leer om woorde te etiket met respek na 10 semantiese konsepte wat geassosieer is met menslike behoefte kategories, en inkorporeer hierdie etikette as funksies vir gebeurtenis kategoriseering. Ons resultate wys dat die herken van relevante semantiese konsepte verbeter beide die rekening en presisie van menslike behoefte vir gebeurtenis.', 'sk': 'Kategorije človeških potreb so bile uporabljene za označevanje razloga, zakaj je afektivni dogodek pozitiven ali negativen. Na primer, "Gripo sem dobil" in "Odpustili so me" sta oba negativna (neželena) dogodka, vendar je gripa zdravstvena težava, medtem ko so me odpustili, finančna težava. Predhodno delo je ustvarilo učne modele za dodelitev dogodkov kategorijam človeških potreb na podlagi njihovih besed in kontekstov. V prispevku predstavljamo vmesni korak, ki besede dodeli relevantnim semantičnim konceptom. Ustvarjamo lahko nadzorovane modele, ki se naučijo označevati besede glede na 10 semantičnih konceptov, povezanih s kategorijami človeških potreb, in vključujejo te oznake kot funkcije za kategorizacijo dogodkov. Naši rezultati kažejo, da prepoznavanje relevantnih semantičnih konceptov izboljša tako spomin kot natančnost kategorizacije človeških potreb za dogodke.', 'jv': 'category sample Laptop" and "Desktop Awak dhéwé éntuk nggawe kuwi nglanggar tarjamahan kanggo nggawe gambarang sematik. Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh model sing sampeyan luwih nggawe Tiilengé gambaran karo 10 Rejalaké awak dhéwé ngerasakno iki dadi seneng dipunangé semantar iki dadi nggawe barang gak bakal terus kesempatan karo Kemerdekaan Dowuh sing Kemerdekaan kanggo Perintah Pangan', 'ha': "An amfani da categories ga mutum dõmin ka ƙayyade saba da wata wahalar ta wajen maras ko nega. For example, 'I got the flu' and 'I got fired' are both negative (undesirable) events, but getting the flu is a Health problem while getting fired is a Financial problem.  Yin aikin da ya gabãni ya halin misãlai da aka sanar da su zuwa masu gaurar al'amarin zuwa masu da amfani da mutane, a kan salon da maganar da matsayinsu. Ga wannan takardan, za mu introduce wani takwai ta tsakiya wanda ke gajiya magana zuwa idãnun na semantiki da muhimmi. Tuna ƙiƙira misãlai masu lissafa da aka sanar da su kallo na rubutu da sauri 10 zaɓen hanyõyin mutane da aka yi haɗi da nau'i ga mutane, kuma Mu shigar da waɗannan alama kamar misãlai wa wa categori wa event. MatamayinMu na nũna cewa ku gane zato masu da muhimmi na semanti, yana ƙara wa tunãtarwa da ƙayyade wa Nakiyayõyin Mutum wa rabo-categorization wa shiryoyin ayuka.", 'he': 'הקטגוריות של צרכים אנושיים השתמשו כדי לתאר את הסיבה למה אירוע חיובי הוא חיובי או שלילי. לדוגמא, "יש לי שפעת" ו "נפטרתי" הם שניהם אירועים שליליים (בלתי רצויים), אבל לקבל השפעת היא בעיה בריאותית בזמן שנפטר היא בעיה פיננסית. העבודה הקודמת יצרה דוגמנים למידה כדי להסגיר אירועים לקטגוריות זקוקים אנושיים בהתבסס על המילים והקשרים שלהם. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים צעד בינוני שמוסיף מילים לרעיונות סמנטיים רלוונטיים. אנו יוצרים דוגמנים מפקחים בקלות שלמדו לתייג מילים בנוגע ל-10 מושגים סמנטיים שקשורים לקטגוריות צרכים אנושיים, ולהכיל את התייגים האלה כתכונות לקטגוריזציה של אירועים. Our results show that recognizing relevant semantic concepts improves both the recall and precision of Human Needs categorization for events.', 'bo': "ནོར་ཤུགས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་བ་དག་ཚོར་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྟར་སྟངས་འཛིན་བྱས་ཡོད། དཔེར་ན། 'ང་དང་གནད་གནད་དོན་ཐུབ་པ་དང་ 'ངས་ཕྱིར་བཤུད་བྱུང་' ནི་ཕྱོགས་ཉུང་གི་བྱ་འགུལ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་རྐྱེན་མ་ཐུབ། ཡིན་ནའང་གནད་ སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་འགན་བྱས་གོང་གི་སློབ་པའི་མིག་རྣམ་པ་ལ་བྱ་འགུལ་དགོས་མིན་པའི་དབྱེ་རིགས་དགོས ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྔོན་གྱི་ལྟ་བུའི་ཚིག We create lightly supervised models that learn to label words with respect to 10 semantic concepts associated with Human Needs categories, and incorporate these labels as features for event categorization. ང་ཚོས་འབྲས་བ་དག་གི་དོན་དག་བྱུང་བའི་སེམས་ཚོར་རྟོགས་ཀྱི་ལྟ་བ་དག་གི་རྣམ་གྲངས་དང་precision་དག"}
{'en': 'Automatic Accuracy Prediction for AMR Parsing', 'ar': 'التنبؤ التلقائي بدقة لتحليل AMR', 'fr': "Prédiction automatique de la précision pour l'analyse AMR", 'pt': 'Previsão de precisão automática para análise de AMR', 'es': 'Predicción automática de precisión para el análisis de AMR', 'ja': 'AMR解析の自動精度予測', 'zh': 'AMR 解析自精测', 'hi': 'AMR पार्सिंग के लिए स्वचालित सटीकता पूर्वानुमान', 'ru': 'Автоматическое прогнозирование точности для анализа AMR', 'ga': 'Tuar Cruinneas Uathoibríoch do Pharsáil AMR', 'el': 'Αυτόματη πρόβλεψη ακρίβειας για ανάλυση AMR', 'hu': 'Automatikus pontossági előrejelzés AMR-értelmezéshez', 'it': "Predizione automatica dell'accuratezza per l'analisi AMR", 'lt': 'Automatinis AMR analizavimo tikslumo prognozė', 'mk': 'Автоматска претпоставка за анализирање на AMR', 'ms': 'Prediksi Kepastian Automatik untuk Menghurai AMR', 'mt': 'Tbassir ta’ Akkwatezza Awtomatika għall-Analiżi tal-AMR', 'ml': 'AMR പാര്\u200dസ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള സ്വയം എക്സുറന്റി മുന്\u200dഗണനം', 'kk': 'AMR талдау үшін автоматты дұрыстығы', 'no': 'Automatisk presisjon for AMR- tolking', 'ro': 'Predicția automată a preciziei pentru analizarea AMR', 'pl': 'Automatyczne prognozowanie dokładności dla analizy AMR', 'ka': 'AMR პარამეტრებისთვის ავტომატური წესიერება', 'so': 'Heshiiska AMR', 'sv': 'Automatisk noggrannhetsprognos för AMR-tolkning', 'mn': 'AMR шинжилгээний автоматтын тодорхойлолт', 'ta': 'AMR பாசிங்குக்கான தானியக்க மதிப்பு முன்னுரிமை', 'si': 'AMR පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය සැකසුම් ප්\u200dරශ්නය', 'sr': 'Автоматична предсказујања точности за AMR пробање', 'ur': 'AMR پارچینگ کے لئے آٹوٹی دقیق پیش بینی', 'uz': 'AMR parsing uchun avtomatik qoĘ»yish', 'vi': 'Định chuẩn tự động cho AMR Parsons.', 'da': 'Automatisk nøjagtighedsforudsigelse for AMR-fortolkning', 'nl': 'Automatische nauwkeurigheidsvoorspelling voor AMR Parsing', 'hr': 'Automatski predviđanje preciznosti za AMR analizu', 'de': 'Automatische Genauigkeit Vorhersage für AMR Parsing', 'bg': 'Автоматично прогнозиране на точността за анализ на АМР', 'ko': 'AMR 해석의 자동 정밀도 예측', 'id': 'Prediksi Ketepian Otomatis untuk Penganalisan AMR', 'sw': 'Automatic Accuracy Prediction for AMR Parsing', 'tr': 'AMR Taýýarlama üçin Otomatik Dyggat', 'fa': 'پیشنهاد دقیق خودکار برای تحلیل AMR', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'af': 'Comment', 'bn': 'AMR পার্সের জন্য স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ পছন্দ', 'hy': 'Automatic Accuracy Prediction for AMR Parsing', 'az': 'AMR analizi üçün avtomatik nöqsanlıq tərzi', 'ca': "Predicció d'exactitud automàtica per l'analització AMR", 'sq': 'Parashikimi automatik i saktësisë për analizimin AMR', 'cs': 'Automatická predikce přesnosti pro analýzu AMR', 'et': 'Automaatne täpsuse prognoos AMR parsimisel', 'fi': 'Automaattinen tarkkuuden ennustus AMR-analyysille', 'bs': 'Automatska predviđanja preciznosti za AMR analizu', 'jv': 'dockable-action', 'sk': 'Samodejna napoved natančnosti za razčlenitev AMR', 'he': 'Automatic Accuracy Prediction for AMR Parsing', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'AMR གསལ་བཤད་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ངེས་བདེན་བཤད་ཀྱི་སྔོན་འཛུགས'}
{'en': 'Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) represents sentences as directed, acyclic and rooted graphs, aiming at capturing their meaning in a machine readable format. AMR parsing converts natural language sentences into such graphs. However, evaluating a parser on new data by means of comparison to manually created AMR graphs is very costly. Also, we would like to be able to detect parses of questionable quality, or preferring results of alternative systems by selecting the ones for which we can assess good quality. We propose AMR accuracy prediction as the task of predicting several metrics of correctness for an automatically generated AMR parse   in absence of the corresponding gold parse. We develop a neural end-to-end multi-output regression model and perform three case studies : firstly, we evaluate the model’s capacity of predicting AMR parse accuracies and test whether it can reliably assign high scores to gold parses. Secondly, we perform parse selection based on predicted parse accuracies of candidate parses from alternative systems, with the aim of improving overall results. Finally, we predict system ranks for submissions from two AMR shared tasks on the basis of their predicted parse accuracy averages. All experiments are carried out across two different domains and show that our method is effective.', 'ar': 'يمثل تمثيل المعنى المجرد (AMR) الجمل على شكل رسوم بيانية موجهة وحلقة ومتجذرة ، تهدف إلى التقاط معناها في تنسيق يمكن قراءته آليًا. يحول تحليل AMR جمل اللغة الطبيعية إلى مثل هذه الرسوم البيانية. ومع ذلك ، فإن تقييم محلل على البيانات الجديدة عن طريق المقارنة مع الرسوم البيانية AMR التي تم إنشاؤها يدويًا يعد مكلفًا للغاية. أيضًا ، نود أن نكون قادرين على اكتشاف التحليلات ذات الجودة المشكوك فيها ، أو نفضل نتائج الأنظمة البديلة عن طريق اختيار الأنظمة التي يمكننا من خلالها تقييم الجودة الجيدة. نقترح التنبؤ بدقة AMR كمهمة توقع عدة مقاييس للصحة لتحليل AMR الذي يتم إنشاؤه تلقائيًا - في غياب التحليل الذهبي المقابل. نقوم بتطوير نموذج انحدار عصبي متعدد المخرجات ونجري ثلاث دراسات حالة: أولاً ، نقوم بتقييم قدرة النموذج على توقع دقة تحليل AMR ونختبر ما إذا كان بإمكانه تعيين درجات عالية بشكل موثوق لتحليل الذهب. ثانيًا ، نقوم باختيار التحليل بناءً على دقة التحليل المتوقعة للتحليل المرشح من الأنظمة البديلة ، بهدف تحسين النتائج الإجمالية. أخيرًا ، نتوقع تصنيفات النظام للإرسالات من مهمتين مشتركتين في AMR على أساس متوسطات دقة التحليل المتوقعة. يتم إجراء جميع التجارب عبر مجالين مختلفين وتظهر أن طريقتنا فعالة.', 'pt': 'A Representação Abstrata de Significado (AMR) representa sentenças como grafos direcionados, acíclicos e enraizados, com o objetivo de capturar seu significado em um formato legível por máquina. A análise AMR converte sentenças de linguagem natural em tais gráficos. No entanto, avaliar um analisador em novos dados por meio de comparação com gráficos AMR criados manualmente é muito caro. Além disso, gostaríamos de ser capazes de detectar análises de qualidade questionável, ou preferir resultados de sistemas alternativos, selecionando aqueles para os quais podemos avaliar boa qualidade. Propomos a previsão de precisão AMR como a tarefa de prever várias métricas de correção para uma análise AMR gerada automaticamente - na ausência da análise ouro correspondente. Desenvolvemos um modelo de regressão multi-saída neural de ponta a ponta e realizamos três estudos de caso: primeiro, avaliamos a capacidade do modelo de prever precisões de análise de AMR e testamos se ele pode atribuir pontuações altas de maneira confiável a análises de ouro. Em segundo lugar, realizamos a seleção de análise com base nas precisões de análise preditas de análises candidatas de sistemas alternativos, com o objetivo de melhorar os resultados gerais. Por fim, prevemos as classificações do sistema para envios de duas tarefas compartilhadas de AMR com base em suas médias de precisão de análise previstas. Todos os experimentos são realizados em dois domínios diferentes e mostram que nosso método é eficaz.', 'fr': "La représentation abstraite de signification (AMR) représente des phrases sous forme de graphes orientés, acycliques et enracinés, visant à capturer leur signification dans un format lisible par machine. L'analyse AMR convertit les phrases en langage naturel en de tels graphiques. Cependant, l'évaluation d'un analyseur sur de nouvelles données par comparaison avec des graphes AMR créés manuellement est très coûteuse. Nous aimerions également pouvoir détecter les analyses de qualité douteuse, ou préférer les résultats de systèmes alternatifs en sélectionnant ceux pour lesquels nous pouvons évaluer la bonne qualité. Nous proposons la prédiction de la précision de l'AMR comme tâche de prédire plusieurs mesures d'exactitude pour une analyse AMR générée automatiquement — en l'absence de l'analyse Gold correspondante. Nous développons un modèle de régression neuronale multi-sorties de bout en bout et réalisons trois études de cas\xa0: premièrement, nous évaluons la capacité du modèle à prédire la précision de l'analyse AMR et testons s'il peut attribuer de manière fiable des scores élevés aux analyses Gold. Deuxièmement, nous effectuons une sélection d'analyse basée sur les précisions d'analyse prédites des analyses candidates provenant de systèmes alternatifs, dans le but d'améliorer les résultats globaux. Enfin, nous prédisons les classements système pour les soumissions de deux tâches partagées AMR sur la base de leurs moyennes de précision d'analyse prédites. Toutes les expériences sont réalisées dans deux domaines différents et montrent que notre méthode est efficace.", 'es': 'La representación de significado abstracto (AMR) representa oraciones como gráficos dirigidos, acíclicos y arraigados, con el objetivo de capturar su significado en un formato legible por máquina. El análisis de AMR convierte las oraciones de lenguaje natural en dichos gráficos. Sin embargo, evaluar un analizador sintáctico en datos nuevos mediante la comparación con gráficos AMR creados manualmente es muy costoso. Además, nos gustaría poder detectar análisis de calidad cuestionable o preferir resultados de sistemas alternativos seleccionando aquellos para los que podemos evaluar la buena calidad. Proponemos la predicción de precisión de AMR como la tarea de predecir varias métricas de corrección para un análisis de AMR generado automáticamente, en ausencia del análisis de oro correspondiente. Desarrollamos un modelo de regresión neuronal de múltiples salidas de extremo a extremo y realizamos tres estudios de caso: en primer lugar, evaluamos la capacidad del modelo para predecir las precisiones del análisis de AMR y probamos si puede asignar puntuaciones altas de manera confiable a los análisis de oro. En segundo lugar, realizamos la selección de análisis en función de las precisiones de análisis predichas de los análisis candidatos de sistemas alternativos, con el objetivo de mejorar los resultados generales. Por último, predecimos las clasificaciones del sistema para los envíos de dos tareas compartidas de AMR en función de sus promedios de precisión de análisis predichos. Todos los experimentos se llevan a cabo en dos dominios diferentes y demuestran que nuestro método es eficaz.', 'ja': '抽象意味表現（ ＡＭＲ ）は、機械可読フォーマットでその意味を捉えることを目的とした、指示された、非循環的、およびルーティングされたグラフとしての文章を表す。 AMR構文解析は、自然言語の文章をそのようなグラフに変換します。 しかしながら、手動で作成されたAMRグラフと比較して、新しいデータで構文解析器を評価することは非常にコストがかかります。 また、質の疑わしいパースを検出したり、良い品質を評価できるパースを選択したりして、代替システムの結果を好みたいと考えています。 AMR精度予測は、対応する金解析がない場合に、自動生成されたAMR解析の正確性のいくつかの指標を予測するタスクとして提案します。 私たちは、ニューラルエンドツーエンドのマルチ出力回帰モデルを開発し、3つのケーススタディを実行します。まず、AMR解析精度を予測するモデルの能力を評価し、高いスコアをゴールド解析に確実に割り当てることができるかどうかをテストします。 第二に、代替システムからの候補パースの予測パース精度に基づいてパース選択を行い、全体的な結果の向上を目指す。 最後に、2つのAMR共有タスクからのサブミッションのシステムランクを、予測された解析精度平均に基づいて予測します。 すべての実験は2つの異なるドメインで行われ、当社の方法が効果的であることが示されています。', 'zh': '象义(AMR)以句为定向,非循环根图,指以机器可读格获其义。 AMR 解析转自然语言句为此图。 然较手动创 AMR 图以质新数解析器甚贵。 愿择可质者解析以检疑解析,或更喜代统。 臣等言AMR准确性占者,占自生AMR解析正确性之数指标 - 无应者解析。 开一神经端到端多输归模,而行三事:先料AMR解析精,试以黄金解析分高分否。 其次,以代统之选解析解析精行解析择,所以改善整体也。 最后,据两 AMR 共享之占解析精度平均值以占交统排名。 凡实验皆异域,明吾道有效也。', 'hi': 'अमूर्त अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व (एएमआर) निर्देशित, एसाइक्लिक और निहित रेखांकन के रूप में वाक्यों का प्रतिनिधित्व करता है, जिसका उद्देश्य मशीन पठनीय प्रारूप में उनके अर्थ पर कब्जा करना है। एएमआर पार्सिंग प्राकृतिक भाषा के वाक्यों को इस तरह के रेखांकन में परिवर्तित करता है। हालांकि, मैन्युअल रूप से बनाए गए एएमआर ग्राफ़ की तुलना के माध्यम से नए डेटा पर पार्सर का मूल्यांकन करना बहुत महंगा है। इसके अलावा, हम संदिग्ध गुणवत्ता के पार्स का पता लगाने में सक्षम होना चाहते हैं, या उन लोगों का चयन करके वैकल्पिक प्रणालियों के परिणामों को पसंद करते हैं जिनके लिए हम अच्छी गुणवत्ता का आकलन कर सकते हैं। हम एक स्वचालित रूप से उत्पन्न एएमआर पार्स के लिए शुद्धता के कई मीट्रिक की भविष्यवाणी करने के कार्य के रूप में एएमआर सटीकता भविष्यवाणी का प्रस्ताव करते हैं - संबंधित सोने के पार्स की अनुपस्थिति में। हम एक तंत्रिका अंत-से-अंत बहु-आउटपुट प्रतिगमन मॉडल विकसित करते हैं और तीन मामले के अध्ययन करते हैं: सबसे पहले, हम एएमआर पार्स सटीकता की भविष्यवाणी करने की मॉडल की क्षमता का मूल्यांकन करते हैं और परीक्षण करते हैं कि क्या यह मज़बूती से सोने के पार्स को उच्च स्कोर असाइन कर सकता है। दूसरे, हम समग्र परिणामों में सुधार के उद्देश्य से, वैकल्पिक प्रणालियों से उम्मीदवार पार्स की अनुमानित पार्स सटीकता के आधार पर पार्स चयन करते हैं। अंत में, हम अपने पूर्वानुमानित पार्स सटीकता औसत के आधार पर दो एएमआर साझा कार्यों से प्रस्तुतियों के लिए सिस्टम रैंकों की भविष्यवाणी करते हैं। सभी प्रयोगों को दो अलग-अलग डोमेन में किया जाता है और यह दर्शाता है कि हमारी विधि प्रभावी है।', 'ru': 'Абстрактное представление значений (АМР) представляет предложения в виде направленных, ациклических и корневых графиков, направленных на захват их значения в машиночитаемом формате. AMR-парсинг преобразует предложения на естественном языке в такие графики. Тем не менее, оценка анализатора на основе новых данных путем сравнения с вручную созданными графиками AMR является очень дорогостоящей. Кроме того, мы хотели бы иметь возможность обнаруживать парсы сомнительного качества или предпочитать результаты альтернативных систем путем выбора тех, для которых мы можем оценить хорошее качество. Мы предлагаем предсказание точности AMR как задачу предсказания нескольких метрик правильности для автоматически сгенерированного анализа AMR – при отсутствии соответствующего золотого анализа. Мы разрабатываем нейронную сквозную регрессионную модель с несколькими выходами и проводим три тематических исследования: во-первых, мы оцениваем способность модели прогнозировать точность синтаксического анализа AMR и проверяем, может ли она надежно присваивать высокие баллы синтаксическим анализам Gold. Во-вторых, мы выполняем отбор синтаксического анализа на основе прогнозируемой точности синтаксического анализа кандидатов из альтернативных систем с целью улучшения общих результатов. Наконец, мы прогнозируем ранги системы для представлений из двух общих задач AMR на основе их прогнозируемых средних значений точности синтаксического анализа. Все эксперименты проводятся в двух разных областях и показывают, что наш метод эффективен.', 'ga': "Léiríonn Léiriú Brí Teibí (AMR) abairtí mar graif dhírithe, aic-imthriallacha agus fréamhaithe, a dhíríonn ar a gciall a ghabháil i bhformáid atá inléite ag meaisín. Tiontaíonn parsáil AMR abairtí teanga nádúrtha ina graif dá leithéid. Mar sin féin, tá sé an-chostasach parsálaí a mheas ar shonraí nua trí chomparáid a dhéanamh le graif AMR a chruthaítear de láimh. Chomh maith leis sin, ba mhaith linn a bheith in ann parsanna de cháilíocht amhrasach a bhrath, nó b'fhearr linn torthaí ó chórais mhalartacha a roghnú trí na cinn ar féidir linn dea-cháilíocht a mheas ina leith a roghnú. Molaimid tuar cruinnis AMB mar thasc roinnt méadracht cruinnis a thuar do pharsáil AMR a ghintear go huathoibríoch – in éagmais na parsála óir comhfhreagrach. Forbraímid samhail néarúil aischéimniúcháin il-aschuir ceann go ceann agus déanaimid trí chás-staidéar: ar an gcéad dul síos, déanaimid meastóireacht ar chumas an mhúnla cruinneas parsála AMR a thuar agus déanaimid tástáil an féidir leis scóir arda a shannadh go hiontaofa do pharsanna óir. Ar an dara dul síos, déanaimid roghnú parsála bunaithe ar chruinneas parsála tuartha na bparsanna iarrthóra ó chórais mhalartacha, agus é mar aidhm againn na torthaí foriomlána a fheabhsú. Ar deireadh, déanaimid réamh-mheas ar chéimeanna córais le haghaidh aighneachtaí ó dhá thasc chomhroinnte AMB ar bhonn a meán cruinnis pharsála tuartha. Déantar na turgnaimh go léir thar dhá réimse éagsúla agus léiríonn siad go bhfuil ár modh éifeachtach.", 'hu': 'Absztrakt Meaning Representation (AMR) a mondatokat irányított, aciklikus és gyökerezett grafikonként jeleníti meg, amelyek célja, hogy jelentésüket géppel olvasható formátumban rögzítsék. Az AMR elemzés a természetes nyelvű mondatokat konvertálja ilyen grafikonokká. Azonban a kézzel létrehozott AMR grafikonokkal való összehasonlítás segítségével értékelni egy elemzőt új adatokon. Szeretnénk továbbá megkérdőjelezhető minőségű elemzéseket észlelni, vagy előnyben részesíteni az alternatív rendszerek eredményeit azzal, hogy kiválasztjuk azokat, amelyekre jó minőséget tudunk értékelni. Az AMR pontosságának előrejelzését javasoljuk, mint az automatikusan generált AMR elemzéshez számos pontossági mutató előrejelzését - a megfelelő arany elemzés hiányában. Kifejlesztünk egy neurális end-to-end multi-output regressziós modellt, és három esettanulmányt végzünk: először is értékeljük a modell képességét az AMR elemzési pontosság előrejelzésére, és teszteljük, hogy megbízhatóan hozzárendeli-e a magas pontszámokat az arany elemzésekhez. Másodszor, alternatív rendszerekből származó jelöltek elemzési pontossága alapján végzünk elemzési kiválasztást azzal a céllal, hogy javítsuk az általános eredményeket. Végül megjósoljuk a két AMR megosztott feladatból származó beadványok rendszersorozatát az előrejelzett elemzési pontossági átlagok alapján. Minden kísérletet két különböző területen végeznek, és azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk hatékony.', 'ka': 'Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) represents sentences as directed, acyclic and rooted graphs, aiming to capture their meaning in a machine readable format. AMR პანსტირება მოცემულია თავისუფალური სიტყვები ასეთი გრაფიკაში. მაგრამ ახალი მონაცემების განსაზღვრება ხელსახურად შექმნილი AMR გრაფიკათან შემდგომარებად ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან. ასევე, ჩვენ მინდა შევიძლიათ გავაკეთოთ კითხვადასხვა კაalitეტის პარაზები, ან ალტენტრუმენტური სისტემის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობა, რომლებიც ჩვენ შეგვიძლია ჩვენ მინდა AMR წარმოდგენის წარმოდგენა როგორც რამდენიმე მეტრიკის წარმოდგენების გადაწყვება ამR წარმოდგენებისთვის, როგორც კონფიგურაციული gold parse არსებობით. ჩვენ განვითარებთ ნეიროლური ბოლოდან გადასრულებული მრავალური რეგრესის მოდელი და სამი შესახებ სწავლის შესახებ: პირველი, ჩვენ მოდელის შესახებ AMR პარასის წინასწარმოდგენის შესაძლებლობა და შევცვალობთ თუ ის შეუძ მეორე, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ პარასის მონიშნულებას, რომელიც განსაზღვრებული პარასის კონდიდეტური პარასის ალტერტური სისტემიდან გავაკეთებთ, რომელიც უფრო მეტი წარმოდგენების უფრო საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ დავიწყვებთ სისტემის რენგიები, რომელიც ორი AMR დაყოფილი საქმედების განმავლობაზე გადავიწყვებთ მათი წარმოდგენილი წარმოდგენების განმავლობაზე. ყველა ექსპერიმენტები იქნება ორი განსხვავებული დიომენტებში და ჩვენი მეტი ექსპერიმენტია.', 'el': 'Η αναπαράσταση της έννοιας (ΑΜR) αντιπροσωπεύει προτάσεις ως κατευθυνόμενα, ακυκλικά και ριζικά γραφήματα, με στόχο την καταγραφή της έννοιάς τους σε μια αναγνώσιμη από μηχανή μορφή. Η ανάλυση μετατρέπει προτάσεις φυσικής γλώσσας σε τέτοια γραφήματα. Ωστόσο, η αξιολόγηση ενός αναλυτή σε νέα δεδομένα μέσω της σύγκρισης με χειροκίνητα δημιουργημένα γραφήματα είναι πολύ δαπανηρή. Επίσης, θα θέλαμε να είμαστε σε θέση να ανιχνεύουμε αναλύσεις αμφισβητήσιμης ποιότητας, ή προτιμώντας αποτελέσματα εναλλακτικών συστημάτων επιλέγοντας αυτά για τα οποία μπορούμε να αξιολογήσουμε καλή ποιότητα. Προτείνουμε την πρόβλεψη ακρίβειας ως καθήκον πρόβλεψης αρκετών μετρήσεων ορθότητας για μια αυτόματα παραγόμενη ανάλυση χωρίς την αντίστοιχη ανάλυση χρυσού. Αναπτύσσουμε ένα νευρωνικό μοντέλο παλινδρόμησης πολλαπλών εξόδων και διεξάγουμε τρεις μελέτες περίπτωσης: πρώτον, αξιολογούμε την ικανότητα του μοντέλου να προβλέψει τις ακρίβειες ανάλυσης και εξετάζουμε αν μπορεί αξιόπιστα να εκχωρήσει υψηλές βαθμολογίες σε αναλύσεις χρυσού. Δεύτερον, διενεργούμε επιλογή αναλύσεων με βάση τις προβλεπόμενες ακρίβειες αναλύσεων υποψήφιων αναλύσεων από εναλλακτικά συστήματα, με στόχο τη βελτίωση των συνολικών αποτελεσμάτων. Τέλος, προβλέπουμε τις κατατάξεις συστήματος για τις υποβολές από δύο κοινές εργασίες με βάση τους προβλεπόμενους μέσους όρους ακρίβειας ανάλυσης. Όλα τα πειράματα διεξάγονται σε δύο διαφορετικούς τομείς και δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας είναι αποτελεσματική.', 'it': "Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) rappresenta frasi come grafici diretti, aciclici e radicati, con l'obiettivo di catturarne il significato in un formato leggibile a macchina. L'analisi AMR converte frasi di linguaggio naturale in tali grafici. Tuttavia, valutare un parser su nuovi dati tramite il confronto con grafici AMR creati manualmente è molto costoso. Inoltre, vorremmo essere in grado di rilevare analisi di qualità discutibile, o preferire risultati di sistemi alternativi selezionando quelli per i quali possiamo valutare una buona qualità. Proponiamo la previsione dell'accuratezza AMR come compito di predire diverse metriche di correttezza per un'analisi AMR generata automaticamente - in assenza della corrispondente analisi oro. Sviluppiamo un modello di regressione neurale end-to-end multi-output ed eseguiamo tre studi di casi: in primo luogo, valutiamo la capacità del modello di predire le accuratezze di analisi AMR e testiamo se può assegnare in modo affidabile punteggi elevati alle analisi d'oro. In secondo luogo, eseguiamo la selezione dell'analisi basata sulla precisione di analisi prevista dei analisi candidati da sistemi alternativi, con l'obiettivo di migliorare i risultati complessivi. Infine, prevediamo i ranghi di sistema per le presentazioni di due attività condivise AMR sulla base delle loro medie di accuratezza di analisi previste. Tutti gli esperimenti sono condotti su due diversi domini e mostrano che il nostro metodo è efficace.", 'lt': 'Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) reiškia tiesioginius, aciklinius ir šakninius grafikus skirtus sakinius, kuriais siekiama juos sugauti mašinoje skaitomais formatais. AMR analizavimas paverčia natūralius kalbos sakinius tokiais grafikais. Tačiau analizatoriaus naujų duomenų vertinimas palyginant su rankiniu būdu sukurtomis AMR grafikomis yra labai brangus. Taip pat norėtume sugebėti nustatyti abejotinos kokybės analizes arba pagerinti alternatyvių sistemų rezultatus pasirinkdami tas, kurioms galime įvertinti gerą kokybę. Mes siūlome AMR tikslumo prognozę kaip užduotį prognozuoti keletą automatiškai sukaupto AMR analizavimo tikslumo metrijų, jei nėra atitinkamo aukso analizavimo. Kuriame neurologinį daugiafunkcinį regresijos model į nuo galo iki galo ir atliekame tris atvejų tyrimus: pirma, vertiname modelio gebėjimą prognozuoti AMR analizės tikslumą ir patikriname, ar jis gali patikimai priskirti aukštus rezultatus aukso analizėms. Antra, atliekame analizavimo atranką, pagrįstą numatomu analizavimo tikslumu, kurį atlieka alternatyvių sistemų kandidatai, siekiant pagerinti bendrus rezultatus. Galiausiai prognozuojame sistemų eilutes, pagal kurias pateiktos dvi bendros užduotys, remiantis prognozuojamais analizės tikslumo vidurkiais. All experiments are carried out across two different domains and show that our method is effective.', 'mk': 'Апстрактна претстава на значењето (AMR) претставува реченици како директирани, акциклични и корени графики, кои имаат за цел да го фатат нивното значење во машински читлив формат. Анализирањето на AMR ги претвора речениците на природен јазик во вакви графики. Сепак, оценувањето на анализаторот на новите податоци преку споредба со рачно создадените графики на AMR е многу скапо. Исто така, би сакале да можеме да откриеме анализи на сомневачки квалитет, или да ги преферираме резултатите на алтернативните системи со избор на оние за кои можеме да го процениме добар квалитет. Предложуваме претпоставување на прецизноста на АМР како задача за претпоставување на неколку метрики на коректност за автоматски генерирана анализа на АМР - во отсуство на соодветната златна анализа. Развиваме нервен модел на регресија од крај до крај и спроведуваме три случаи студии: прво, го проценуваме капацитетот на моделот за предвидување на прецизноста на анализирањето на АМР и тестираме дали може доверливо да додели високи резултати на златните анализирања. Второ, спроведуваме избор на анализирање врз основа на предвидена прецизност на анализирање на кандидатските анализирања од алтернативни системи, со цел подобрување на целосните резултати. Конечно, предвидуваме системски рангови за поднесувања од две заеднички задачи на АМР врз основа на нивните предвидени просечни прецизности на анализата. Сите експерименти се спроведуваат во две различни домени и покажуваат дека нашиот метод е ефикасен.', 'kk': 'Абстрактикалық мәліметті (AMR) сөздерді бағытталған, акцикллық және түйінгі графикалар ретінде көрсетеді. Олардың мағынасын машинаның оқуға болатын пішімінде алу үшін. AMR талдауы табиғлық тіл сөздерін бұл графиктерге аударады. Бірақ, жаңа деректерді талдау мәліметі қолмен құрылған AMR графиктеріне салыстыру арқылы өте маңызды. Сонымен қатар, біз сұрақ сапасының талдауын, немесе альтернативті жүйелердің нәтижесін таңдап, жақсы сапасын бағалай алатын нәтижесін таңдай аламыз. Біз AMR дұрыстығын алтын талдау жоқ болса, автоматты түрде құрылған AMR талдау үшін бірнеше метрикалық дұрыстығын түзету тапсырмасының тапсырмасы ретінде ұсынамыз. Біз невралдың соңындағы көп шығыс регрессия моделін жасап, үш жағдай зерттеуді орындаймыз: біріншіден, біріншіден, AMR талдау дұрыстығын бақылап, ол алтын талдау үшін жоғары нәтижелерді көрсету мүмкіндігін тексеріп Екіншіден, біз кандидаттардың талдау дұрыстығын альтернативті жүйелерден талдау үшін таңдау таңдауын орындаймыз. Барлық нәтижелерді жақсарту үшін. Соңында, біз жүйелік жолдарын бір AMR ортақ тапсырмалардың орташасынан жіберу үшін жүйелік жолдарын таңдап көрдік. Олардың тапсырмалардың орташасына негізінде. Барлық тәжірибелер екі түрлі доменге жұмыс істейді. Біздің тәжірибеміздің эффективті көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) represents sentences as directed, acyclic and rooted graphs, aiming at capturing their meaning in a machine readable format.  Menghurai AMR mengubah kalimat bahasa semulajadi ke graf seperti itu. Namun, penilaian penghurai pada data baru dengan cara perbandingan dengan graf AMR yang dicipta secara manual sangat mahal. Juga, kami ingin dapat mengesan maklumat kualiti yang dipertanyakan, atau memilih hasil sistem alternatif dengan memilih yang mana kita boleh menilai kualiti yang baik. Kami cadangkan ramalan ketepatan AMR sebagai tugas meramalkan beberapa metrik ketepatan untuk huraian AMR yang dijana secara automatik - tanpa huraian emas yang sepadan. Kami mengembangkan model regresi multi-output hujung-hujung saraf dan melakukan tiga kajian kes: pertama-tama, kami menilai kemampuan model untuk meramalkan ketepatan huraian AMR dan menguji sama ada ia boleh mengarahkan skor tinggi kepada huraian emas dengan yakin. Kedua, kita melakukan pemilihan hurai berdasarkan persamaan hurai yang dijangka bagi hurai calon dari sistem alternatif, dengan tujuan untuk meningkatkan keputusan keseluruhan. Finally, we predict system ranks for submissions from two AMR shared tasks on the basis of their predicted parse accuracy averages.  Semua eksperimen dilakukan melalui dua domain yang berbeza dan menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita berkesan.', 'ml': 'അസ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്റ്റ് പ്രതിനിധിയുടെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം (AMR) നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200d, അക്സൈക്കിക്കും വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ച ഗ്രാഫുകള്\u200d എന്ന AMR പാര്\u200dജ് ചെയ്യുന്നത് സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ വാക്കുകളെ ഇതുപോലുള്ള ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റിലേക്ക് മാറ എന്നാലും AMR ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റുകള്\u200d കൈയ്യില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d പുതിയ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒരു പരാജയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d പറ്റുന്ന വ്യവസ്ഥയുടെ പാര്\u200dസുകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ആഗ്രഹിക്കുന്നു, അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d മറ്റൊരു സിസ്റ്റമു നമ്മള്\u200d എഎംആര്\u200d ശരിയായ പ്രവചനങ്ങളാണ് പ്രാദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നത്. ഒരു സ്വയമായി ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ എംആര്\u200d പാര്\u200dസിന്റെ പാര്\u200dസിനു വേണ്ടി കുറച്ച് മീറ്റ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുരുഷന്\u200d അവസാനത്തേക്കുള്ള അവസാനത്തേക്കുള്ള മാതൃകയുണ്ടാക്കുകയും മൂന്നു കേസ് പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. ആദ്യം നമ്മള്\u200d AMR പാര്\u200dസ് പാര്\u200dസ് പ രണ്ടാമതായി, നമ്മള്\u200d പാര്\u200dസ് തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നത് പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട പാര്\u200dസ് പാര്\u200dസില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്ത സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന അവസാനം, നമ്മള്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും രണ്ട് എഎംആര്\u200d പങ്കെടുത്ത ജോലികളില്\u200d നിന്നും കീഴടങ്ങുന്നതിനായി പ്രവചിക്കുന്ന All experiments are carried out across two different domains and show that our method is effective.', 'no': 'Abstrakt gjennomsnittsrepresentasjon (AMR) representerer setningar som direkte, aksikliske og roterte grafikk, med mål på å henta meningen sine i ei maskinelesbar format. AMR- tolking konverterer naturspråkssetningar til slike grafikk. Det er likevel veldig kostna å evaluera ein tolkar på nye data med samanlikning med manuelt oppretta AMR- grafen. Vi ønskjer også å kunne finna tolkar av spørsmålbare kvalitet, eller foretrekke resultat av alternative systemer ved å velja dei som vi kan vurdere godt kvalitet. Vi foreslår AMR-nøyaktighet som oppgåva for å foreslå fleire metrikar av rettighet for ei automatisk generert AMR-tolking – i manglinga av den tilsvarande gullstilleren. Vi utviklar ein neuralt ende-til-slutt multi-utgangsmodul for regresjon og utfører tre tilfeldige studiar: først, vi evaluerer modellen kapasiteten til å foregå AMR-tolkingakkurasjon og tester om det kan tilordne høge poeng til gullstiller. For andre, utfører vi tolking utvalet basert på foregåande tolking av kandidat-tolking frå alternativ systemer, med målet å forbetra overalt resultat. I slutt forventar vi systemrekkefølgje for tilføringar frå to AMR delte oppgåver på grunn av dei foregåande tolkingsrektene. Alle eksperimenter vert utført over to ulike domene og vist at metoden vårt er effektiv.', 'mt': 'Rappreżentazzjoni tat-tifsira astrata (AMR) tirrappreżenta sentenzi bħala grafiċi diretti, a ċikliċi u għeruq, bil-għan li jinqabdu t-tifsira tagħhom f’format li jinqara mill-magna. L-analiżi AMR tikkonverti sentenzi tal-lingwa naturali f’grafiki bħal dawn. However, evaluating a parser on new data by means of comparison to manually created AMR graphs is very costly.  Barra minn hekk, nixtiequ nkunu kapaċi niskopru l-analiżijiet ta’ kwalità dubjuża, jew nippreferu r-riżultati ta’ sistemi alternattivi billi nagħżlu dawk li għalihom nistgħu nivvalutaw kwalità tajba. Aħna nipproponu t-tbassir tal-preċiżjoni tal-AMR bħala l-kompitu li nibbrevedu diversi metriċi ta’ korrettezza għal analiżi awtomatikament iġġenerata tal-AMR - fin-nuqqas tal-analiżi tad-deheb korrispondenti. Aħna niżviluppaw mudell newrali ta’ rigressjoni multi-output minn tarf s a tarf u nagħmlu tliet studji ta’ każijiet: l-ewwel nett, a ħna nivvalutaw il-kapaċit à tal-mudell li jipprevedi l-preċiżjonijiet tal-analiżi tal-AMR u jittestjaw jekk jistax jassenja b’mod affidabbli punteġġi għoljin lill-analiżi tad-deheb. It-tieni nett, nagħmlu għażla tal-analiżijiet ibbażata fuq preċiżjonijiet tal-analiżijiet imbassra tal-analiżijiet kandidati minn sistemi alternattivi, bil-għan li jittejbu r-riżultati globali. Fl-aħħar nett, aħna nipprevedu l-klassifikazzjonijiet tas-sistema għas-sottomissjonijiet minn żewġ kompiti kondiviżi tal-AMR abbażi tal-medja prevista tal-eżattezza tal-analiżi tagħhom. L-esperimenti kollha jitwettqu f’żewġ oqsma differenti u juru li l-metodu tagħna huwa effettiv.', 'pl': 'Abstract Reprezentacja znaczenia (AMR) reprezentuje zdania jako wykresy kierowane, acykliczne i zakorzenione, mające na celu uchwycenie ich znaczenia w formacie nadającym się do odczytu maszynowego. AMR parsing konwertuje zdania języka naturalnego na takie wykresy. Ocena parsera na nowych danych poprzez porównanie z ręcznie tworzonymi wykresami AMR jest jednak bardzo kosztowna. Chcielibyśmy również być w stanie wykryć parsy o wątpliwej jakości lub preferować wyniki alternatywnych systemów, wybierając te, dla których możemy ocenić dobrą jakość. Proponujemy przewidywanie dokładności AMR jako zadanie przewidywania kilku wskaźników poprawności dla automatycznie generowanego parsu AMR w przypadku braku odpowiedniej parzy złota. Opracowujemy neuronowy model regresji typu end-to-end i wykonujemy trzy studia przypadków: po pierwsze, oceniamy zdolność modelu do przewidywania dokładności analizy AMR i testujemy, czy może on niezawodnie przypisać wysokie wyniki do analizy złota. Po drugie, wykonujemy selekcję pars na podstawie przewidywanych dokładności pars kandydatów z systemów alternatywnych, w celu poprawy ogólnych wyników. Wreszcie, przewidujemy rankingi systemowe dla zgłoszeń z dwóch wspólnych zadań AMR na podstawie ich przewidywanych średnich dokładności parsowania. Wszystkie eksperymenty przeprowadzane są w dwóch różnych dziedzinach i pokazują, że nasza metoda jest skuteczna.', 'ro': 'Reprezentarea abstractă a semnificației (AMR) reprezintă propozițiile ca grafice direcționate, aciclice și înrădăcinate, având ca scop captarea semnificației acestora într-un format citibil automat. Analizarea AMR convertește propozițiile limbajului natural în astfel de grafice. Cu toate acestea, evaluarea unui parser pe date noi prin comparație cu graficele AMR create manual este foarte costisitoare. De asemenea, dorim să putem detecta analize de calitate discutabilă sau prefera rezultatele sistemelor alternative prin selectarea celor pentru care putem evalua o bună calitate. Propunem predicția acurateții AMR ca sarcină de a anticipa mai multe măsurători de corectitudine pentru un pars AMR generat automat - în absența parsului corespunzător de aur. Dezvoltăm un model de regresie neurală end-to-end multi-output și efectuăm trei studii de caz: în primul rând, evaluăm capacitatea modelului de a prezice precizia analizării AMR și testăm dacă acesta poate atribui în mod fiabil scoruri mari analizelor aurii. În al doilea rând, efectuăm selecția parselor bazată pe precizia parselor anticipată a parselor candidate din sisteme alternative, cu scopul de a îmbunătăți rezultatele generale. În cele din urmă, prezicem rangurile sistemului pentru trimiterile din două sarcini partajate AMR pe baza mediilor de precizie prevăzute de analiză. Toate experimentele sunt efectuate pe două domenii diferite și arată că metoda noastră este eficientă.', 'sr': 'Abstraktički značajni predstavnik (AMR) predstavlja rečenice kao upućene, akcikličke i korijene grafike, u cilju da uhvati njihovo značenje u formaciji za čitanje mašine. AMR analiza pretvara prirodne rečenice jezika u takve grafike. Međutim, procjena parser a o novim podacima usporedbom sa ručno stvorenim grafikama AMR je veoma skupa. Takođe bismo želeli da otkrijemo analizu sumnjivih kvaliteta ili preferiramo rezultate alternativnih sustava birajući one za koje možemo proceniti dobru kvalitet. Predlažemo predviđanje preciznosti AMR kao zadatak predviđanja nekoliko metrika ispravnosti za automatski proizvedeni AMR pars - u odsustvu odgovarajućeg zlatnog parsa. Razvijamo model neuronskog kraja do kraja višestruke regresije i izvršavamo tri studije slučajeva: prvo, procjenjujemo kapacitet model a predviđanja preciznosti analize AMR-a i testiramo može li vjerojatno dati visoke rezultate zlatnim parsima. Drugo, izvršavamo analizu izbora na temelju predviđenih preciznosti analize kandidata iz alternativnih sustava, sa ciljem poboljšanja ukupnih rezultata. Konačno predviđamo sistemske redove za podatke iz dva AMR zajedničkog zadatka na temelju njihovih predviđenih prosječnih ispitivanja tačnosti. Svi eksperimenti su provedeni preko dva različita domena i pokazuju da je naš metod efikasan.', 'si': 'අස්ප්\u200dරේක්ට් අදහස් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය (AMR) ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරන්නේ වචනය ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය, සායික්\u200dරිකා AMR විශ්ලේෂණය ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වගේ විස්තර කරනවා. නමුත්, අළුත් දත්තේ විශේෂකයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ AMR ග්\u200dරාෆ් වලින් සම්බන්ධ විශේෂකය සඳහා මුළු වි ඒවගේම, අපි කැමතියි ප්\u200dරශ්න විශේෂයේ පරීක්ෂණය හොයාගන්න, නැත්තම් වෙනස් පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තෝරාගන්න, අපි හොඳ අපි AMR හරියට අනතුරු විශ්වාස කරනවා ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් නිර්මාණය කරපු AMR විශ්වාස කරපු විශ්වාස කරපු වැඩක් විදිහට, සම්බ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය අවසානය කරනවා වඩා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් වඩා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් වඩා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් වඩා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  දෙවෙනි විදියට, අපි පරීක්ෂණය තෝරණය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් පද්ධතියෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විශ්වාස කරන්න, සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරතිචා අන්තිමේදී, අපි පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා AMR දෙන්නෙක් කැමතියි වැඩක් පරික්ෂා කරනවා ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරමාණය කරපු  හැම ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක්ම වෙනස් ඩෝමේන් දෙකක් වෙනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ඒ වගේම පෙන්වන්න අපේ විදිය', 'so': 'Kalajarida (AMR) waxaa loola jeedaa erayada lagu hago, akaykliil iyo xariijiyo, kaas oo lagu talo galay in lagu qabto micneheeda qaab lagu akhriyo. Jardinta AMR waxay ku bedelaa hadalka afka asalka ah oo u bedelaa sawirada. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qiimeynta baaritaanka ku saabsan macluumaadka cusub waa qaali in la barbardhigo sawirada horumarinta AMR. Sidoo kale waxaan doonaynaa inaannu awoodno in aan helno baaritaanka qiimeeya tayada la weydiin karo ama aan ka dooran karno resultiyada nidaamka kala duwan marka aan dooranno kuwa aan qiimeyn karno qiimeynta qiimo wanaagsan. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa AMR si saxda ah oo loo sii sheegayo shaqada ku saabsan koox metric oo hagaagsan oo loo sameeyo baarlamaanka AMR - iyadoo aan jirin baarlamaanka dahabka la mid ah. Waxaynu horumarinaynaa model dhammaadka koobka ah oo ugu dambaysta soo baxa oo aan sameynaa saddex waxbarasho oo xaalad ah: marka ugu horeysa, waxaynu qiimeynaynaa awoodda qaababka ku saabsan kooxda AMR, waxaana imtixaanaynaa in ay si aamin ah u dhigi karto baaritaanka dahabka. Second, waxaynu sameynaa doorasho baarlamaanka, taas oo lagu saleyn karo si saxda ah ee baarlamaha ka mid ah nidaamka kala duduwan, taas oo la jeedo in aan horumarino dhamaantooda. Ugu dambaysta waxaan ka sii sheegaynaa nidaamka inay ka soo diraan labo xafiid oo AMR ah, taas oo lagu saleynayo heerka rasmiga ah ee la sii sheegay. Imtixaanka oo dhan waxaa lagu sameeyaa laba meelood oo kala duduwan, waxayna muujiyaan in qaabkeenu ay tayo u leedahay.', 'sv': 'Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) representerar meningar som riktade, acykliska och rotade grafer, som syftar till att fånga deras betydelse i ett maskinläsbart format. AMR parsing omvandlar naturliga språkmeningar till sådana grafer. Att utvärdera en parser på nya data genom jämförelse med manuellt skapade AMR-grafer är dock mycket kostsamt. Vi vill också kunna upptäcka tolkningar av tvivelaktig kvalitet, eller föredra resultat av alternativa system genom att välja dem för vilka vi kan bedöma god kvalitet. Vi föreslår AMR noggrannhet prediktion som uppgiften att förutsäga flera mätvärden för korrekthet för en automatiskt genererad AMR parse - i avsaknad av motsvarande gold parse. Vi utvecklar en neural end-to-end multi-output regressionsmodell och utför tre fallstudier: Först utvärderar vi modellens förmåga att förutsäga AMR parse noggrannhet och testar om den tillförlitligt kan tilldela höga poäng till gold parses. För det andra utför vi parse selection baserat på förutspådda parse noggrannhet av kandidater parses från alternativa system, i syfte att förbättra övergripande resultat. Slutligen förutspår vi systemrankningar för inlämningar från två delade AMR-uppgifter baserat på deras förutspådda analysnoggrannhetsmedelvärden. Alla experiment utförs över två olika domäner och visar att vår metod är effektiv.', 'ta': 'குறுக்குதல் பொருள் (AMR) நேர்வழி மற்றும் மூலம் வரைபடங்களாக வாக்கியங்களை குறிக்கும், இயந்திரம் படிக்கக்கூடிய வடிவத்தில் அவர்களுடைய அர்த்தத் AMR பாகுபடுத்தல் இயல்பான மொழியின் வாக்கியங்களை இவ்வாறு வரைபடங்களாக மாற்றுகிறது. ஆனால், AMR வரைபடங்களை கைமுறையாக உருவாக்குவதற்கு ஒப்பிடும் வழியாக புதிய தரவில் ஒரு மதிப்பீட்டை மதிப்பிடுதல் மி மேலும், நாம் கேள்வி தரமான தொகுதிகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க விரும்புகிறோம், அல்லது மாற்று அமைப்புகளின் முடிவு நாம் AMR சரியான முன்வாக்குதலை தானாகவே உருவாக்கப்பட்ட ஏம்ஆர் பார்ச் பொருத்தமான தங்க பார்ச் இல்லாமல் பல மீட்ரிக்கள் சரியான முறையை முன் நாம் பல வெளியீட்டு திருப்ப மாதிரி உருவாக்கி மூன்று நிகழ்ச்சி படிப்புகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறோம்: முதலில், AMR பார்ச் சரிவுகளை எதிர்பார்க்க முடியும் மாதிரி மதிப இரண்டாவது, நாம் மாற்று அமைப்புகளில் இருந்து தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட தேர்வை முடிவு முடிவுகளை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு அடிப்படையில் பார்க இறுதியில், நாம் முற்றிலும் இரண்டு AMR பகிர்ந்த பணிகளில் இருந்து ஒப்புக்கொள்ள முறைமையை முன்வாக்குகிறோம். முன்னோ அனைத்து பரிசோதனைகளும் இரண்டு வித்தியாசமான களங்கள் முழுவதும் செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் எங்கள் முறைய', 'mn': 'Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) нь машины унших боломжтой хэлбэрээр тэдний утгыг ойлгох зорилготой, акцикл болон суурь график гэсэн үг юм. AMR хуваалцах нь байгалийн хэл өгүүлбэрийг ийм график рүү шилжүүлнэ. Гэхдээ шинэ өгөгдлийн талаар ажиллагчийг гараар бүтээгдэхүүнтэй харьцуулахад үнэ цэнэтэй. Мөн бид асуудалтай сайн чанарын талаар, эсвэл өөрчлөлтийн системийн үр дүнг тайлбарлаж, сайн сайн чанарыг шалгаж чадна. Бид AMR-ын зөв тодорхойлолт гэх мэт олон метрик зөв тодорхойлолтыг автоматаар гаргасан AMR хуваалцааны ажил гэх мэт санал дэвшүүлдэг. Бид мэдрэлийн төгсгөлд олон үржүүлэх регрессийн загварыг хөгжүүлж гурван тохиолдол судалгаа хийдэг. Эхлээд, бид АМР-ын хуваалтын зөв тохиолдлыг тодорхойлох боломжтой байдлыг тооцоолж, алт хуваалтын хуваалтын өндөр то Хоёрдугаарт, бид сонголтыг хуваалцах хэрэглэгчдийн тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолт дээр хийдэг. Олон төрлийн үр дүнг сайжруулах зорилго. Эцэст нь бид системийн хуваалцааны дундаж тодорхойлолтын үндсэн 2 АМР-ын хуваалцааны ажил дээр дамжуулах хэмжээсүүдийг таамаглаж байна. Бүх туршилтууд хоёр өөр хэсэгт хийгдсэн бөгөөд бидний арга нь үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ur': '(AMR) مطلب مطلب مطلوب مطلوب مطلوب مطلوب مطلوب کے مطابق عبارت کرتا ہے جس طرح دکھائے جاتے ہیں، آسیکلیک اور جڑی گراف کی طرح۔ AMR پارسینگ طبیعی زبان جماعتوں کو اس طرح کے گراف میں تبدیل کرتا ہے. However, evaluating a parser on new data by means of comparison to manually created AMR graphs is very expensive. اور ہم چاہتے ہیں کہ شک کرنے والے کیفیت کے پارس کو پہچان سکیں یا الٹی سیستموں کے نتائج کو ترجیح دیں جن کے لئے ہم بہترین کیفیت کا ارزش کر سکتے ہیں۔ ہم AMR دقیق پیش بینی کے طور پر پیش بینی کررہے ہیں کہ بہت سی میٹریک سیدھی پیش بینی کے طور پر اپنے ساتھ ایجاد کیے گئے AMR پارس کے لئے۔ ہم ایک نئورل انتظام سے متعدد-آورٹ ریگرس موڈل کو ایجاد کرتے ہیں اور تین کیس تحقیقات کرتے ہیں: پہلی بار، ہم نے موڈل کا مقدار AMR پارس دقیقات کی پیش بینی کی ہے اور امتحان کریں کہ یہ سونے پارس کے لئے بہت سی اسکور مقرر کر سکتا ہے یا نہیں۔ دوسرا، ہم انتخاب کا پارس کر رہے ہیں جو انتخاب کی پیش بینی کی پارس دقیقات پر قابل تحقیقات کے متعلق مختلف سیستموں سے ہے، جتنے نتیجے بہتر کرنے کے لئے ہے. آخر میں ہم نے سیستم کے درجے پیش بینی کریں کہ دو AMR شریک کام کے لئے ان کی پیش بینی کی دقیق متوسط پر ان کے مقرر کردہ مشترک کام کے مطابق مستقل کریں۔ تمام آزمائش دو مختلف دومین میں چلتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ اثر ہے۔', 'vi': 'Bản tóm tắt Nghĩa trang (AMR) đại diện cho các câu như các biểu đồ đạo diễn, gương nang và nguyên bản, nhằm mục đích xác định ý nghĩa của nó theo dạng có thể đọc được máy. Giao dịch phân tách ngôn ngữ tự nhiên thành các biểu đồ. Tuy nhiên, đánh giá một góc của dữ liệu mới bằng cách so sánh với biểu đồ AMR được tạo bằng tay thì rất tốn kém. Chúng tôi cũng muốn tìm ra các phân tách chất lượng nghi vấn, hoặc muốn có kết quả của các hệ thống thay thế bằng cách chọn những hệ thống mà chúng tôi có thể đánh giá chất lượng tốt. Chúng tôi đề xuất dự đoán độ chính xác AMR như nhiệm vụ dự đoán vài thước đo độ chính xác của một phân tách AMR tự động tạo trong khi không có vị tha vàng tương ứng. Chúng tôi phát triển một mô hình hồi phục hàng loạt kết thần kinh và thực hiện ba ca nghiên cứu: đầu tiên, chúng tôi đánh giá khả năng dự đoán các chính xác phân tích của AMR và thử nghiệm liệu nó có thể chắc chắn phân tích cao cho các phân tách vàng. Thứ hai, chúng tôi thực hiện việc chọn phân tích dựa trên độ chính xác dự đoán của ứng viên từ các hệ thống khác, với mục đích cải thiện kết quả tổng thể. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi dự đoán xếp hạng hệ thống để phát biểu từ hai nhóm AMR chia sẻ nhiệm vụ dựa trên tính trung bình chính xác dự đoán của họ. Tất cả các thí nghiệm được thực hiện trên hai lĩnh vực khác nhau và cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta hiệu quả.', 'uz': "Name Name Lekin, AMR grafiklarini qoʻlbola yaratish uchun yangi maʼlumotga moslash qiymati juda qiymati. Шунингдек, биз саволлар сифатини аниқлашимиз ёки бошқа система natijaларини танлашни истаймиз, биз яхши сифатни аниқлаб олишга қодир бўламиз. Biz AMR tashkilotlarini avtomatik yaratilgan AMR парламентнинг bir necha metrik тўғриликни тақдим этиш вазифаси деб тақдим этамиз - мувофиқ gull parsing emas. Biz bir necha chiqarish modelini yaratib, uchta xabarlarni bajaramiz. Birinchi marta, biz AMR'ning tashkilotlarini tasdiqlash imkoniyatini qiymatimiz va u yuqori darajaga yuqori darajalarni olib tashlashga imkoniyat qilamiz. Ikkinchi so'zda, biz o'zgartirish tizimdan tashkilotlar tashkilotlarining tashkilotlarini bajaramiz, hamma natijalarni oshirish uchun. Finally, we predict system ranks for submissions from two AMR shared tasks on the basis of their predicted parse accuracy averages.  Hamma tajribalar ikkita boshqa domen ichida bajarildi va bizning usuli ishlaydi.", 'bg': 'Представителството на значението (АМР) представлява изречения като насочени, ациклични и вкоренени графики, целящи да уловят тяхното значение в машинно четим формат. Архивирането преобразува изреченията на естествения език в такива графики. Въпреки това, оценяването на анализатор на нови данни чрез сравнение с ръчно създадени графики е много скъпо. Също така бихме искали да можем да откриваме парси със съмнително качество или да предпочитаме резултати от алтернативни системи, като избираме тези, за които можем да оценим доброто качество. Предлагаме прогнозиране на точността на АМР като задача за прогнозиране на няколко показателя за коректност за автоматично генериран АМР анализ - при липса на съответния златен анализ. Разработваме невронен модел от край до край многоизходен регресионен модел и извършваме три казуса: първо, оценяваме капацитета на модела да предвижда точността на анализа на АМР и тестваме дали той може надеждно да присвоява високи резултати на анализа на златото. На второ място, извършваме подбор на парси въз основа на прогнозираните точности на парса на кандидатите от алтернативни системи, с цел подобряване на общите резултати. И накрая, прогнозираме системните рангове за подавания от две споделени задачи въз основа на техните прогнозни средни стойности за точност на анализиране. Всички експерименти се провеждат в две различни области и показват, че методът ни е ефективен.', 'nl': 'Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) vertegenwoordigt zinnen als gerichte, acyclische en gewortelde grafieken, gericht op het vastleggen van hun betekenis in een machine leesbaar formaat. AMR parsing zet zinnen in natuurlijke taal om in dergelijke grafieken. Het evalueren van een parser op nieuwe data door middel van vergelijking met handmatig gemaakte AMR grafieken is echter erg kostbaar. Ook willen we parsen van twijfelachtige kwaliteit kunnen detecteren, of de voorkeur geven aan resultaten van alternatieve systemen door degene te selecteren waarvoor we goede kwaliteit kunnen beoordelen. We stellen AMR nauwkeurigheidsprognose voor als de taak om verschillende metrics van correctheid te voorspellen voor een automatisch gegenereerde AMR parse in afwezigheid van de overeenkomstige goudparse. We ontwikkelen een neuraal end-to-end multi-output regressiemodel en voeren drie casestudies uit: ten eerste evalueren we de capaciteit van het model om AMR parse nauwkeurigheiden te voorspellen en testen of het betrouwbaar hoge scores kan toewijzen aan goudparsen. Ten tweede voeren we parse selectie uit op basis van voorspelde parse nauwkeurigheiden van kandidaat parses uit alternatieve systemen, met als doel de algemene resultaten te verbeteren. Tot slot voorspellen we systeemranglijsten voor inzendingen van twee gedeelde AMR-taken op basis van hun voorspelde parse-nauwkeurigheidsgemiddelden. Alle experimenten worden uitgevoerd over twee verschillende domeinen en tonen aan dat onze methode effectief is.', 'de': 'Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) stellt Sätze als gerichtete, azyklische und verwurzelte Graphen dar, mit dem Ziel, ihre Bedeutung in einem maschinenlesbaren Format zu erfassen. AMR Parsing konvertiert Sätze natürlicher Sprache in solche Graphen. Die Auswertung eines Parsers auf neuen Daten durch Vergleich mit manuell erstellten AMR-Graphen ist jedoch sehr kostspielig. Außerdem möchten wir Parsen von fragwürdiger Qualität erkennen können oder Ergebnisse alternativer Systeme bevorzugen, indem wir diejenigen auswählen, für die wir gute Qualität beurteilen können. Wir schlagen AMR Genauigkeit Vorhersage als Aufgabe vor, mehrere Metriken der Korrektheit für einen automatisch generierten AMR Parse zu prognostizieren, wenn der entsprechende Gold Parse fehlt. Wir entwickeln ein neuronales End-to-End Multi-Output Regressionsmodell und führen drei Fallstudien durch: Zunächst evaluieren wir die Fähigkeit des Modells, AMR Parse Genauigkeiten vorherzusagen und testen, ob es Gold Parsen zuverlässig High Scores zuweisen kann. Zweitens führen wir Parse-Selektion basierend auf vorhergesagten Parse-Genauigkeiten von Kandidatenparsen aus alternativen Systemen durch, mit dem Ziel, die Gesamtergebnisse zu verbessern. Schließlich prognostizieren wir Systemrankings für Einreichungen von zwei gemeinsam genutzten AMR-Aufgaben auf der Grundlage ihrer prognostizierten Parse-Genauigkeitsdurchschnitte. Alle Experimente werden über zwei verschiedene Domänen hinweg durchgeführt und zeigen, dass unsere Methode effektiv ist.', 'ko': '추상적 의미 표현(AMR)은 문장을 유방향도, 무환도, 유근도로 표현하는데 기계가 읽을 수 있는 형식으로 의미를 얻기 위한 것이다.AMR 해석은 자연 언어 문장을 이러한 그래픽으로 변환합니다.그러나 수동으로 작성된 AMR 그림과 비교를 통해 새 데이터의 해상도를 평가하는 것은 매우 비싸다.그 밖에 우리는 품질에 문제가 있는 해석을 검출하거나 우리가 양호한 품질을 평가할 수 있는 시스템을 선택함으로써 대체 시스템의 결과를 선택할 수 있기를 희망한다.우리가 AMR 정확도 예측을 제기한 임무는 자동으로 생성된 AMR 해석의 몇 가지 정확성 도량을 예측하는 것이다. 즉, 상응하는 Gold 해석이 없는 상황에서.우리는 신경단에서 단까지의 다수출 회귀 모델을 개발하고 세 가지 사례 연구를 실시했다. 첫째, 우리는 이 모델이 AMR 해석 정밀도를 예측하는 능력을 평가하고 gold 해석에 높은 점수를 믿음직스럽게 분배할 수 있는지 테스트했다.그 다음에 우리는 대체 시스템의 후보 해석의 예측 해석 정밀도에 따라 해석 선택을 집행하는데 전체적인 결과를 향상시키는 것이 목적이다.마지막으로 두 AMR 공유 임무의 평균 해석 정밀도에 따라 제출된 시스템 순위를 예측합니다.모든 실험은 두 가지 다른 분야에서 진행되었는데, 그 결과 우리의 방법이 효과적임을 나타냈다.', 'fa': 'نمایش معنی مطلق (AMR) جمله\u200cها به عنوان گراف\u200cهای هدایت، سیکلی و ریشه\u200cهای مستقیم را نمایش می\u200cدهد، که هدف گرفتن معنی\u200cشان را در یک شکل قابل خواندن ماشین است. بررسی AMR جمله\u200cهای زبان طبیعی را به چنین گرافیک تبدیل می\u200cکند. با این حال، ارزیابی یک بازیگر در اطلاعات جدید به وسیله مقایسه با گرافهای AMR دستی ساخته بسیار ارزشمند است. همچنین می\u200cخواهیم قادر باشیم که بررسی\u200cها از کیفیت شک\u200cکننده یا نتیجه\u200cهای سیستم\u200cهای جایگزینی را با انتخاب کردن آن\u200cها که می\u200cتوانیم کیفیت خوبی را ارزیابی کنیم. ما پیشنهاد دقیق پیش بینی AMR را به عنوان وظیفه پیش بینی چند متری درستی برای یک تجزیه آمریکا تولید شده است - در غیر از تجزیه طلا متصل شده است. ما یک مدل بازگشت متعدد به پایان پایان\u200cهای عصبی را توسعه می\u200cکنیم و سه مطالعه پرونده انجام می\u200cدهیم: اول، توانایی مدل را در پیش\u200cبینی دقیقات بازگشت آمریکا تحقیق می\u200cکنیم و امتحان می\u200cکنیم که آیا می\u200cتواند به یقین امتحان امتیاز بالا را به بازگشت طلا بدهد. دوم، ما انتخاب تحلیل را بر اساس دقیقات تحلیل پیش\u200cبینی از دستگاه\u200cهای کاندیدا از سیستم\u200cهای جایگزینی انجام می\u200cدهیم، با هدف improving overall results. بالاخره، ما درجات سیستم را پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکنیم برای تحویل از دو کار مشترک AMR بر اساس متوسط دقیق تحویل پیش\u200cبینی آنها. تمام آزمایشات در دو دامنه متفاوت انجام می شوند و نشان می دهند که روش ما موثر است.', 'hr': 'Abstraktički značajni predstavnik (AMR) predstavlja rečenice kao upućene, akcikličke i korijenjene grafike, čime se cilja uhvatiti njihovo značenje u pročitljivom obliku stroja. Analiza AMR preobraća prirodne jezičke rečenice u takve grafike. Međutim, procjena analizatora o novim podacima usporedbom s ručno stvorenim grafikama AMR je vrlo skupa. Također, željeli bismo biti u stanju otkriti analize sumnjive kvalitete ili preferirati rezultate alternativnih sustava birajući one za koje možemo procijeniti dobru kvalitetu. Predlažemo predviđanje preciznosti AMR-a kao zadatak predviđanja nekoliko metrika ispravnosti za automatski proizvedenu AMR analizu u odsustvu odgovarajućeg zlatnog analizu. Razvijamo model neuronskog kraja do kraja višestrukog regresije i izvršimo tri studija slučajeva: prvo, procjenjujemo kapacitet model a predviđanja preciznosti analize AMR-a i testiramo može li vjerojatno dodijeliti visoke rezultate zlatnom analizu. Drugo, izvršavamo analizu izbora na temelju predviđene preciznosti analize kandidata iz alternativnih sustava s ciljem poboljšanja ukupnih rezultata. Konačno predviđamo redove sustava za podatke iz dvije AMR zajedničke zadatke na temelju njihovih predviđenih mjerenih preciznosti analize. Svi eksperimenti su provedeni u dva različita domena i pokazuju da je naš metod učinkovit.', 'tr': "Abstrakt Maýdany Görkezilişi AMR analyzasy tebigy dil sözlerini şöyle grafiklere üýtgedýär. Ýöne, täze maglumatlar hakyndaky bir täze maglumaty elimden oluşan AMR grafiklerine karşılaştırmak üçin değerlendirmek örän pahalıdır. Munuň üçin, biz soraglamazlyk howpsaly tanyşdyrmak isleýäris, ýöne başga sistemalaryň netijesini saýlamak isleýäris we gowy mykdarlygy barlap bilýän netijesini saýlamak isleýäris. Biz AMR'nin doğruluk tahmini, birkaç metrik doğruluk önlenmesinin görevi olarak teklif ediyoruz. - Biz näyral soňunda bir çoklu çykyş regressiýa modelini döredip, üç ýagdaý çykyş edip bilýäris: birinjisi, AMR a ýlamasynyň dogrylygyny tahmin etmek üçin modeliniň ukypyny deňleýäris we ol altyn çykyşlara ýokarylyk notlaryny bejerebilir mi diýip barýarys. Ikinjisi, kandidyň tapawutlarynyň önümlenen tapawutlaryň dogrylygyny başga sistemlerden çykyş edip, hemme netijeleri gelişmek üçin çykyş edýäris. Soňunda, biz sistemiň depeleri iki AMR aýratynyň üýtgeden çykyş düzgünlerine gönderilýän işi öngörüp otyrdyk. Hemme deneyler iki dürli sahada işlenilýär we biziň metodamyzyň täsirli bolandygyny görkezýär.", 'sw': 'Kuondoa maana ya Representation (AMR) inawakilisha sentensi kama zinavyoongozwa, michezo na picha za asili, kwa lengo la kuonyesha maana yao katika mfumo wa mashine yanayosomeka. Uimbaji wa AMR hubadilisha hukumu za lugha za asili katika picha hizo. Hata hivyo, kutathmini mchambuzi juu ya data mpya kwa njia ya kulinganisha na picha za AMR zilizotengenezwa manufaa ni gharama sana. Pia, tunapenda kuwa na uwezo wa kutambua viwango vya maswali, au tunapendelea matokeo ya mifumo mbadala kwa kuchagua wale ambao tunaweza kutathmini sifa nzuri. Tunazipendekeza kutabiri sahihi ya AMR kama jukumu la kutabiri mbili kadhaa za sahihi kwa ajili ya bunge la AMR lililotengenezwa automatically - bila kutokuwepo kwa bunge la dhahabu linalofanana. Tunaendeleza modeli ya mwisho wa matokeo ya taratibu ya taratibu nyingine na kutekeleza tafiti tatu za kesi: kwanza, tunapitia uwezo wa modeli wa kutabiri ukweli wa usahihi wa mazao ya AMR na kujaribu kama inaweza kutengeneza vipimo vya juu kwa mabango ya dhahabu. Pili, tunafanya uchaguzi wa bunge kwa kutumia ukweli wa magereza ya urais kutoka kwenye mfumo mbadala, kwa lengo la kuboresha matokeo yote. Mwisho, tunatabiri mfumo unaofanywa na madaraka kutoka kazi mbili za AMR kwa msingi wa wastani wa urahisi unaotabiriwa. Majaribio yote yanafanywa katika maeneo mawili tofauti na yanaonyesha kuwa njia yetu ni yenye ufanisi.', 'da': 'Abstrakt Meaning Representation (AMR) repræsenterer sætninger som dirigerede, acykliske og rodfæstede grafer, der sigter mod at fange deres betydning i et maskinlæsbart format. AMR parsing konverterer naturlige sprogsætninger til sådanne grafer. Men at evaluere en parser på nye data ved hjælp af sammenligning med manuelt oprettede AMR grafer er meget dyrt. Vi vil også gerne kunne opdage fortolkninger af tvivlsom kvalitet eller foretrække resultater af alternative systemer ved at vælge dem, som vi kan vurdere god kvalitet for. Vi foreslår AMR nøjagtighedsforudsigelse som opgave at forudsige flere målinger af korrekthed for en automatisk genereret AMR parse - i mangel af den tilsvarende guld parse. Vi udvikler en neural end-to-end multi-output regressionsmodel og udfører tre casestudier: For det første evaluerer vi modellens evne til at forudsige AMR parse nøjagtigheder og tester, om den pålideligt kan tildele høje score til gold parses. For det andet udfører vi parse selection baseret på forudsigede parse nøjagtigheder af kandidater parses fra alternative systemer, med det formål at forbedre overordnede resultater. Endelig forudsiger vi systemrangeringer for indsendelser fra to delte AMR opgaver på grundlag af deres forventede parse nøjagtighed gennemsnit. Alle eksperimenter udføres på tværs af to forskellige domæner og viser, at vores metode er effektiv.', 'id': 'Perwakilan Arti Abstrakt (AMR) mewakili kalimat sebagai grafik direksi, asiklik dan akar, bertujuan untuk menangkap arti mereka dalam format yang dapat dibaca mesin. Penghuraian AMR mengubah kalimat bahasa alami ke grafik seperti itu. Namun, mengevaluasi parser pada data baru dengan cara perbandingan dengan grafik AMR yang dibuat secara manual sangat mahal. Juga, kami ingin dapat mendeteksi analisis kualitas yang dipertanyakan, atau memilih hasil dari sistem alternatif dengan memilih yang kita dapat menilai kualitas yang baik. Kami mengusulkan prediksi akurasi AMR sebagai tugas untuk memprediksi beberapa metrik kebenaran untuk analisis AMR yang secara otomatis dihasilkan - tanpa analisis emas yang cocok. Kami mengembangkan model regresi multi-output dari akhir ke akhir saraf dan melakukan tiga studi kasus: pertama-tama, kami mengevaluasi kapasitas model untuk memprediksi akurasi analisis AMR dan menguji apakah ia dapat mengatur skor tinggi pada analisis emas. Kedua, kami melakukan seleksi analisis berdasarkan akurasi analisis yang diprediksi dari analisis kandidat dari sistem alternatif, dengan tujuan meningkatkan hasil keseluruhan. Akhirnya, kami memprediksi rangka sistem untuk pengiriman dari dua tugas AMR berbagi berdasarkan rata-rata akurasi analisis yang diprediksi mereka. Semua eksperimen dilakukan di dua domain yang berbeda dan menunjukkan bahwa metode kita efektif.', 'am': "የአካሪክ መልዕክት (AMR) አካሄድ፣ የካክሊክ እና የሥር ቀለሞች እንዲያስተካክሉ፣ አካሄሪውን በመስኮት በሚችል መጠቀም እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡ አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ ምንም እንኳን አዲስ ዳታዎችን በማስተካከል በአዲስ አዲስ አዲስ አካል ላይ ማተካክሎ አዲስ ቀለሞች እጃቸውን ለመተካከል በጣም ዋጋ ነው፡፡ እናም የምንጠይቅ ጥያቄ ፓርላማ ማግኘት እንፈልጋለን፥ ወይም የጥሩ ጥሩ ማረጋገጥን የሚችሉትን ምርጫ እንሻለን፡፡ የአሜሪካ አካባቢ ፓርቲ በተለየ ወርቅ ፓርቲ ውጤት ሳይኖር ብዙዎችን የሥርዓት ማህበረሰብ ማሳየትን ለመቀበል እናስባለን፡፡ We develop a neural end-to-end multi-output regression model and perform three case studies: firstly, we evaluate the model's capacity of predicting AMR parse accuracies and test whether it can reliably assign high scores to gold parses.  በሁለተኛው፣ የፓርላማ ምርጫ በተለየው የፓርላማ ፓርቲዎች እርግጠኛ ነው፡፡ በመጨረሻውም የፓርስ ጥቅምት ጥቅምነት በተቀጠረበት የሁለት አሜሪክ ክፍልፍሎች ለጥያቄ ስራዎችን ለመቀበል እናውቃለን፡፡ ሁሉም ፈተናዎች በሁለት ልዩ አካባቢዎች ውስጥ ይደረጋሉ እናም ዘዴያችን ጥሩ እንዲሆን ያሳያቸዋል፡፡", 'hy': 'Աբստրակտ նշանակության ներկայացումը (AMR) ներկայացնում է նախադասությունները ուղղությամբ, շրջանակներով և արմատավորված գրաֆիկներով, որոնք նպատակում են վերցնել իրենց իմաստը մեքենան կարելի է կարդալ: AMR-ի վերլուծությունը բնական լեզվի նախադասությունները վերածում է այդպիսի գրաֆիկների: Այնուամենայնիվ, նոր տվյալների վերլուծության գնահատումը ձեռքով ստեղծված AMR գրաֆիկների հետ համեմատության միջոցով շատ թանկ է: Մենք նաև ցանկանում ենք կարողանալ հայտնաբերել քննարկվող որակի վերլուծումները կամ նախընտրել այլընտրանքային համակարգերի արդյունքները՝ ընտրելով այն համակարգերը, որոնց համար մենք կարող ենք գնահատել լավ որակը: Մենք առաջարկում ենք AMR ճշգրիտության կանխատեսումը որպես ավտոմատ ստեղծված AMR-ի վերլուծության որոշ չափերի ճշգրիտության կանխատեսումը, առանց համապատասխան ոսկու վերլուծության: Մենք զարգանում ենք մի նյարդային վերջ-վերջ բազմազան արտադրողական ռեգրեսիայի մոդել և կատարում ենք երեք դեպքերի ուսումնասիրություններ. առաջինը, մենք գնահատում ենք մոդելի կարողությունը կանխատեսել AMR-ի վերլուծության ճշգրտությունը և ստուգել, արդյոք այն կարող է վստահելի հաշվարկնե Երկրորդ, մենք կատարում ենք վերլուծության ընտրությունը, հիմնված նախատեսված վերլուծության ճշմարտությունների վրա, որոնք կատարվում են այլընտրանքային համակարգերից, որպեսզի բարելավեն ընդհանուր արդյունքները: Վերջապես, մենք կանխագուշակում ենք համակարգը երկու AMR-ի ընդհանուր առաջադրանքների ընթացքում, հիմնված նրանց կանխագուշացված վերլուծության ճշգրտության միջիների վրա: Բոլոր փորձերը կատարվում են երկու տարբեր ոլորտներում և ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը արդյունավետ է:', 'sq': 'Përfaqësuesja Abstrakte e Dënimit (AMR) përfaqëson fjalët si grafikë të drejtuar, aksiklikë dhe me rrënjë, që synojnë të kapin kuptimin e tyre në një format të lexueshëm nga makina. Analizimi i AMR konverton fjalët e gjuhës natyrore në grafikë të tilla. Megjithatë, vlerësimi i një analizues të të dhënave të reja nëpërmjet krahasimit me grafikët e krijuar manualisht të AMR është shumë i kushtueshëm. Gjithashtu, ne dëshirojmë të jemi në gjendje të zbulojmë analiza të cilësisë së dyshimtë, apo të preferojmë rezultatet e sistemeve alternative duke zgjedhur ato për të cilat mund të vlerësojmë cilësinë e mirë. Ne propozojmë parashikimin e saktësisë së AMR si detyrë të parashikimit të disa metrikëve të saktësisë për një analizë automatike të gjeneruar AMR - në mungesë të analizës së artë korrespondente. Ne zhvillojmë një model të regresionit nervor nga fundi në fund dhe kryejmë tre studime rastesh: s ë pari, vlerësojmë aftësinë e model it për parashikimin e saktësisë së analizimit të AMR dhe testojmë nëse mund të caktojë me siguri rezultate të larta në analizat e artë. Së dyti, ne kryejmë zgjedhjen e analizave bazuar në saktësitë e parashikuara të analizave të kandidatëve nga sistemi alternativë, me qëllim përmirësimin e rezultateve të përgjithshme. Më në fund, parashikojmë rendin e sistemit për paraqitjet nga dy detyra të përbashkëta AMR në bazë të mesatarëve të parashikuara të saktësisë së analizave të tyre. Të gjitha eksperimentet janë kryer në dy fusha të ndryshme dhe tregojnë se metoda jonë është efektive.', 'bs': 'Abstraktički značajni predstavnik (AMR) predstavlja rečenice kao upućene, akcikličke i korijenjene grafike, ciljane na uhvativanje njihovog značenja u formatu za čitanje mašine. Analiza AMR preobraća prirodne jezičke rečenice u takve grafike. Međutim, procjena parser a o novim podacima usporedbom s ručno stvorenim grafikama AMR je veoma skupa. Također, želimo biti u stanju da otkrijemo analizu sumnjive kvalitete ili preferiramo rezultate alternativnih sustava birajući one za koje možemo procijeniti dobru kvalitetu. Predlažemo predviđanje preciznosti AMR kao zadatak predviđanja nekoliko metrika ispravnosti za automatski proizvedenu AMR analizu u odsustvu odgovarajućeg zlatnog analizu. Razvijamo model neuronskog kraja do kraja multi-output regresije i izvršavamo tri studija slučajeva: prvo, procjenjujemo kapacitet model a predviđanja preciznosti analize AMR-a i testiramo može li vjerojatno dati visoke rezultate zlatnim analizacijama. Drugo, izvršavamo analizu izbora na temelju predviđene preciznosti analize kandidata iz alternativnih sustava, sa ciljem poboljšanja ukupnih rezultata. Konačno predviđamo sistemske redove za podatke iz dva podjeljena zadatka AMR-a na temelju njihovih predviđenih prosječnih ispitivanja preciznosti. Svi eksperimenti su provedeni preko dva različita domena i pokazuju da je naš metod efikasan.', 'bn': 'মানে প্রতিনিধির মানে (AMR) নির্দেশ, একাইক্লিক এবং মূল গ্রাফ হিসেবে রায়ের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে, যার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে মেশিনের পাঠযোগ্য ফরম AMR পার্সিং এ ধরনের গ্রাফে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার বাক্য পরিবর্তন করে। কিন্তু হাতে AMR গ্রাফ তৈরি করার মাধ্যমে নতুন তথ্য সম্পর্কে একটি প্যালেজার মূল্যায়ন করা খুব বেশী দাম। এছাড়াও, আমরা প্রশ্নিত মানের পার্স সনাক্ত করতে চাই, অথবা বিকল্প সিস্টেমের ফলাফল বেছে নিতে পারি যেগুলো আমরা ভাল মানের মূল্য বেছে নি আমরা এমআরের সঠিকভাবে ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী হিসেবে প্রস্তাব করছি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এক এমআর পার্জের জন্য বেশ কয়েকটি সঠিক মিট্রিক ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করার ক আমরা একটি নিউরেল শেষ পর্যন্ত মাল্টি আউটপুট প্রতিরোধের মডেল তৈরি করি এবং তিনটি কেস গবেষণা শেষ করি: প্রথমত, আমরা এমআর পার্সের সঠিকভাবে ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করতে পারি এবং পরীক্ষা করি এটি  দ্বিতীয়, আমরা পার্স নির্বাচন করি বিকল্প সিস্টেম থেকে প্রার্থী পার্সের সঠিকভাবে ভিত্তিতে প্রার্থী পার্সের নির্বাচন, যার উদ শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করি যে তাদের ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী পার্সের গড়ের গড়ে দুই এমআরের কাজের ভিত্তিতে প্রকাশিত হয়েছে। All experiments are carried out across two different domains and show that our method is effective.', 'ca': "La Representació Abstract a del Signe (AMR) representa frases com gràfics direccionats, acíclics i arrelats, mirant a capturar el seu significat en un format llegible a màquina. L'analització AMR converteix frases de llenguatge natural en aquests gràfics. Però la valoració d'un analitzador de dades noves per comparar amb gràfics AMR creats manualment és molt costosa. També ens agradaria ser capaços de detectar analistes de qualitat dubtable, o preferir resultats de sistemes alternativs seleccionant els que podem valorar bona qualitat. Proposem predicció de la precisió AMR com a tasca de predicció de diverses mètriques de correctesa per a una analització AMR generada automàticament - en ausencia de l'analització dorada correspondent. Desenvolvem un model de regressió neuronal de extrem a extrem i fem tres estudis de cas: en primer lloc, evaluem la capacitat del model de predir les precisions d'analització AMR i compruem si pot asignar de manera fiable altes puntuacions a analitzacions d'or. En segon lloc, fem selecció d'analització basada en precisions predites d'analització de candidats de sistemes alternativs, amb l'objectiu de millorar els resultats globals. Finalment, predim els rangs del sistema per les presentacions de dues tasques compartides AMR sobre la base de les mitjanes predites de precisió de l'analisi. Tots els experiments es fan en dos dominis diferents i demostren que el nostre mètode és efectiu.", 'af': "Abstrakte Meaning Representation (AMR) verteenwoordig setinge as direkteerde, aksikliske en wortelde grafieke, wat doel om hul betekening in 'n masjien leesbaar formaat te vang. AMR verwerking omskakel natuurlike taal setnings na sodanige grafieke. Maar, die evaluering van 'n ontleerder op nuwe data deur middel van vergelyking met Hand gemaak AMR grafieke is baie kosbaar. Ons wil ook in staat wees om verwerking van gevraagbare kwaliteit te verkry of die resultate van alternatiewe stelsels te verkies deur die gekies van die een waarvan ons goeie kwaliteit kan asseer. Ons voorstel AMR presies voorskou as die taak van voorskou van verskeie metries van korrekheid vir 'n automaties genereerde AMR verwerking - in absence van die ooreenstemmende goud verwerking. Ons ontwikkel 'n neurale end-to-end multi-output regresie model en uitvoer drie geval studie: eerste, ons evalueer die model se kapasiteit van voorskou van AMR verwerking akkurasies en toets of dit vertroulik hoë punte aan goud verwerking kan toewys. Tweede, ons uitvoer verwerking keuse gebaseer op voorskoude verwerking presies van kandidate verwerking van alternatiewe stelsels, met die doel van verbetering van die hele resultate. Eindelik, ons voorskou stelsel ranke vir onderskrywings van twee AMR gedeelde taak op die basis van hulle voorskoude onderskrywing regverdige gemiddelde. Alle eksperimente word uitgevoer deur twee verskillende domeine en wys dat ons metode effektief is.", 'et': 'Tähendusesindus (AMR) esindab lauseid suunatud, atsükliliste ja juurdunud graafikutena, eesmärgiga jäädvustada nende tähendus masinloetavas vormingus. AMR parsimine teisendab looduskeele laused sellisteks graafikuteks. Kuid parseri hindamine uute andmete põhjal käsitsi loodud AMR graafikutega on väga kulukas. Samuti sooviksime tuvastada küsitava kvaliteediga parse või eelistada alternatiivsete süsteemide tulemusi, valides need, mille jaoks saame kvaliteeti hinnata. Pakume AMR täpsuse prognoosimise ülesandeks ennustada mitmeid korrektsusmõõdikuid automaatselt genereeritud AMR parsi jaoks - vastava kullaparsi puudumisel. Töötame välja neuraalse lõpp-otsa multiväljundi regressioonimudeli ja teostame kolm juhtumiuuringut: esiteks hindame mudeli suutlikkust ennustada AMR parsimise täpsust ja testime, kas see suudab kullaparsimisele usaldusväärselt määrata kõrgeid tulemusi. Teiseks teeme parsimisvaliku alternatiivsete süsteemide kandidaadiparsimiste prognoositud parsimistapsuse põhjal eesmärgiga parandada üldist tulemust. Lõpuks prognoosime kahe AMR-i jagatud ülesande esitamise süsteemi järjestusi nende prognoositud parsimistäpsuse keskmiste põhjal. Kõik katsed viiakse läbi kahes erinevas valdkonnas ja näitavad, et meie meetod on tõhus.', 'fi': 'Abstrakti Meaning Representation (AMR) edustaa lauseita ohjattuina, asyklisinä ja juurtuneina kaavioina, joiden tarkoituksena on tallentaa niiden merkitys koneellisesti luettavassa muodossa. AMR-jäsennys muuntaa luonnollisen kielen lauseet tällaisiksi kaavioiksi. Analysoijan arvioiminen uusien tietojen perusteella käsin luotuihin AMR-kaavioihin on kuitenkin erittäin kallista. Haluamme myös pystyä havaitsemaan kyseenalaisen laadun parseja tai suosimaan vaihtoehtoisten järjestelmien tuloksia valitsemalla ne, joille voimme arvioida hyvää laatua. Ehdotamme AMR:n tarkkuuden ennustamista useiden tarkkuusmittarien ennustamiseksi automaattisesti luodulle AMR:n jäsentämiselle - ilman vastaavaa kultajäsennystä. Kehitämme neurologisen end-to-end-multioutput regressiomallin ja suoritamme kolme tapaustutkimusta: ensin arvioimme mallin kykyä ennustaa AMR-jäsennystarkkuutta ja testaamme, pystyykö se luotettavasti määrittämään korkeat pisteet kullan jäsentämiseen. Toiseksi suoritamme jäsennysvalinnan vaihtoehtoisista järjestelmistä tulevien ehdokasjäsennysten ennakoitujen jäsennystarkkuuksien perusteella tavoitteena parantaa kokonaistuloksia. Lopuksi ennustamme kahden jaettavan AMR-tehtävän lähetyksille järjestelmäsijoituksia niiden arvioidun jäsennystarkkuuden keskiarvojen perusteella. Kaikki kokeet tehdään kahdella eri alueella ja osoittavat, että menetelmämme on tehokas.', 'cs': 'Abstrakt Reprezentace významu (AMR) představuje věty jako řízené, acyklické a kořeněné grafy s cílem zachytit jejich význam ve strojově čitelném formátu. AMR parsing převádí věty přirozeného jazyka do takových grafů. Hodnocení parseru na nových datech pomocí porovnání s ručně vytvořenými AMR grafy je však velmi nákladné. Také bychom chtěli být schopni detekovat parsy pochybné kvality, případně upřednostňovat výsledky alternativních systémů výběrem těch, pro které můžeme hodnotit dobrou kvalitu. Navrhujeme predikci přesnosti AMR jako úkol předpovědět několik metrik správnosti pro automaticky generovanou analýzu AMR při absenci odpovídající analýzy zlata. Vyvíjíme neuronový end-to-end multi-výstupní regresní model a provádíme tři případové studie: nejprve vyhodnotíme schopnost modelu předpovídat přesnosti AMR parse a testujeme, zda může spolehlivě přiřadit vysoké skóre k analýze zlata. Za druhé provádíme výběr analýzy na základě předpokládaných přesností analýzy kandidátů z alternativních systémů s cílem zlepšit celkové výsledky. Nakonec předpovídáme systémové hodnocení pro podání ze dvou sdílených úkolů AMR na základě jejich předpokládaných průměrů přesnosti parse. Všechny experimenty jsou prováděny ve dvou různých oblastech a ukazují, že naše metoda je účinná.', 'az': 'Abstrakt İmzalar (AMR) maşına oxuyabilən formada onların anlamını almaq niyyətində cümlələri göstərir. AMR ayırması təbiətli dil cümlələrini böyük grafiklərə çevirir. Ancaq, yeni məlumatların parçacısını öz əlində yaratdığı AMR grafiklərinə qarşılaşdırmaq vasitəsilə değerlendirmək çox qiymətlidir. Həmçinin şübhə edilə bilən keyfiyyətin ayırılmalarını və ya alternatif sistemlərin sonuçlarını seçmək istəyirik, yaxşı keyfiyyəti değerləşdirə bilərək. Biz AMR doğruluğu təmin edirik ki, müəyyən edilən altın analizi olmadan, avtomatik olaraq ürəklənmiş AMR analizi üçün bir neçə metrik doğruluğu təmin etmək üçün. Biz bir nöral sona qədər çox-çıxış regresiya modelini təhsil edirik və üç məs əl təhsil etdik: ilk dəfə, modelinin AMR analizi təhsil etmə qüvvəsini təşkil edirik və onun altın analizi təhsil edə biləcəyini təhsil edirik. İkinci olaraq, çox sonuçlarını yaxşılaşdırmaq məqsədilə, müəyyən edilmiş müəyyən edilmiş təmizləmə tərzlərinə görə seçimləri təmizləyirik. Sonunda, biz sistem dərəcələrini təmin edirik ki, onların təmin edilmiş paylaşdırma dərəcələrinə görə iki AMR paylaşdırılmış işlərdən göndərilər. Bütün eksperimentlər iki müxtəlif domena boyunca işlədilər və metodumuzun etkilidir.', 'jv': 'absolute Language text-tool-action Nambah, awak dhéwé arep nggawe Perintah Panisar kang dipunangé kapan sing apik, uga njaluk sistem sing wis dipunangé awak dhéwé iso nggawe kalitas apik dhéwé. We suggered AM R exact preamber as the task of preambing a number of meter of right-ness for an automatically generated ARR PASS - in the presence of the conflicting goldfire Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem Neral Start-to-end multi-output Regresyon model dan gewasi perusahaan 3 Kasar Manual Sayensi, we do dhéwé tau ngerasai perusahaan kelas suprotakno karo pangusahaan kelas pangalan text-tool-action Awak dhéwé éntuk aksi iki sakjane sampeyan gak dhéwé lan ngerasah hal cara ngono nggawe aksi iki.', 'ha': "@ action: button Parse na AMR ya mayar da salon maganar asiyya cikin wannan grafika. Amma, an ƙaddara wani Paramer a kan data na yanzu, da misãli ga wanda aka halitta grafyutan AMR da hannun, yana mai girma. Kayya, tuna so, za'a iya gane parse masu tsarin da za'a tambaya, ko kuma mu fi fi fĩfĩta matsalar na'urar masu shida-dabar, da kuma mu zãɓe su da tsarin da za'a iya qiymar da su da kyauta mai kyau. Tune goyyar da AMR tabbatacce kamar aikin ka yi bayani na wasu metric masu sahiya wa parse na AMR farat ɗaya - kuma ba da mai daidai da parse na zĩnãriya. Tuna samar da wata motel mai ƙaranci zuwa ƙarami-ƙari na-ƙari na rubutu kuma ke cika lissafi uku: Dukkan na, za mu yi tafiyar zaɓen parse a kan karatun da aka ƙayyade tsari na parse daga tsari masu shida, don haka da aimakin ya kyautata matsalan koda. Haƙĩƙa, munã gabani da system matsayi masu sakaita daga aikin biyu na AMR wanda aka raba shi, a kan karatun tsari da aka ƙayyade. An sami duk jarrabai a cikin duk biyu dabam-dabam, kuma ana nũna hanyoyinmu yana da amfani.", 'sk': 'Predstavljanje pomena (AMR) predstavlja stavke kot usmerjene, aciklične in koreninjene grafike, katerih cilj je zajeti njihov pomen v strojno berljivem formatu. Razčlenitev AMR pretvori stavke naravnega jezika v take grafe. Vendar pa je ocenjevanje razčlenjevalnika na novih podatkih s primerjavo z ročno ustvarjenimi grafi AMR zelo drago. Prav tako bi želeli, da bi lahko zaznali parse vprašljive kakovosti, ali pa bi imeli raje rezultate alternativnih sistemov z izbiro tistih, za katere lahko ocenimo dobro kakovost. Predlagamo napoved natančnosti AMR kot nalogo napovedovanja več meritev pravilnosti za samodejno generirano razčlenitev AMR - v odsotnosti ustrezne razčlenitve zlata. Razvijamo nevronski multi-output regresijski model od konca do konca in izvajamo tri študije primerov: najprej ocenimo zmogljivost modela za napovedovanje natančnosti razčlenitve AMR in testiramo, ali lahko zanesljivo dodeli visoke rezultate razčlenitvi zlata. Drugič, izvajamo izbiro razčlenjevanja na podlagi predvidenih natančnosti razčlenjevanja kandidatov iz alternativnih sistemov, s ciljem izboljšanja splošnih rezultatov. Nazadnje napovedujemo sistemske razvrstitve za predložitve iz dveh skupnih opravil AMR na podlagi njihovih predvidenih povprečij natančnosti razčlenitve. Vsi poskusi se izvajajo na dveh različnih področjih in kažejo, da je naša metoda učinkovita.', 'bo': "Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) represents sentences as directed, acyclic and rooted graphs, aiming to capture their meaning in a machine readable format. The aim is to capture their meaning in a machine readable format. AMR དབྱེ་སྟངས་པར་སྤྱིར་རྒྱུན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ཚིག་རྟགས་འདི་ལ་འགྱུར་བ ཡིན་ནའང་། ལག་བཟོས་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་པའི་AMR་རིས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གསར་འཛུགས་པའི་ལག ད་དུང་། ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བའི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་བཙལ་འཛིན་བྱེད་དགོས། ཡང་ན་ We propose AMR accuracy prediction as the task of predicting several metrics of correctness for an automatically generated AMR parse - in absence of the corresponding gold parse. We develop a neural end-to-end multi-output regression model and perform three case studies: firstly, we evaluate the model's capacity of predicting AMR parse accuracies and test whether it can reliably assign high scores to gold parses. གཉིས་པ་: ང་ཚོས་བདེན་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་གྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཟིན་བྲིས་ཐབས་ལམ་ནས་ཕར་སྐྱེལ་ཞིབ་འབད་རྒྱུ་དང་། མཐའ་མར་དུ། ང་ཚོས་རིམ་པ་དེ་ཚོའི་སྔོན་ཟིན་པའི་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་རྒྱུ་དང་། ལག་འཁྱེར་ཆ་ཡོངས་རྫོགས་མི་འདྲ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་བྱེད་སྲིད་པ་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པར།", 'he': 'מייצג משמעות אבסטרטית (AMR) מייצג משפטים כגרפים ממוקדים, אציקליים ושורשים, שמתכוונים לתפוס את המשמעות שלהם בצורה קריאה במכונה. מחקר AMR הופך משפטים שפה טבעיים לגרפים כאלה. עם זאת, הערכה של מעבד על נתונים חדשים באמצעות השוואה לגרפים AMR שנוצרים ידנית היא מאוד יקרה. בנוסף, אנחנו רוצים להיות מסוגלים לזהות מערכות של איכות פקפקת, או להעדיף תוצאות של מערכות אלטרנטיביות על ידי בחירת אלה שאנחנו יכולים להעריך איכות טובה. We propose AMR accuracy prediction as the task of predicting several metrics of correctness for an automatically generated AMR parse - in absence of the corresponding gold parse.  אנו מפתחים מודל גידול מולטל-יציאה של סוף-סוף עצבי ונבצע שלושה מחקרי מקרים: ראשית, אנו מעריכים את היכולת של המודל לחזות מדויקות בדיקות AMR ולבדוק אם הוא יכול להזמין בהאמנות נקודות גבוהות למבחנים זהב. שנית, אנו מבצעים בחירת ניתוח מבוססת על מדויקות ניתוח מתוכננות של ניתוחים מועמדים מערכות אלטרנטיביות, במטרה לשפר תוצאות כלליות. סוף סוף, אנו חושפים שורות מערכת לשלוחות משני משימות משותפות AMR על בסיס ממוצעי בדיקת המחקר הנצפויים שלהם. All experiments are carried out across two different domains and show that our method is effective.'}
{'en': 'An Argument-Marker Model for Syntax-Agnostic Proto-Role Labeling', 'es': 'Un modelo de marcadores de argumentos para el etiquetado de protoroles independiente de la sintaxis', 'ar': 'نموذج علامة الوسيطة لتسمية الأدوار الأولية النحوية-الحيادية', 'fr': "Un modèle de marqueur d'argument pour l'étiquetage de proto-rôles agnostique par syntaxe", 'pt': 'Um modelo de marcador de argumento para rotulagem de proto-função agnóstica de sintaxe', 'ja': '構文認識プロトロールラベリングの引数-マーカーモデル', 'hi': 'सिंटैक्स-अज्ञेयवादी प्रोटो-रोल लेबलिंग के लिए एक तर्क-मार्कर मॉडल', 'ru': 'Аргументарно-маркерная модель для синтаксис-агностической проторолевой маркировки', 'zh': '用与语法无关者原型角表参数模形', 'ga': 'Múnla Marcála Argóinte le haghaidh Lipéadú Comhréire-Agnóiseach Prótacail-Ról', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Argument-Marker modell a szintaxis-Agnostic proto-role címkézéshez', 'el': 'Ένα μοντέλο επιχειρήματος-σήμανσης για τη σύνταξη-αγνωστική πρωτο-σήμανση ρόλων', 'it': "Un modello di Argument-Marker per l'etichettatura Sintassi-Agnostica Proto-Role", 'mk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Sintakso-agnostikos proto-vaidmens ženklinimo argumentų ženklinimo modelis', 'ms': 'Model Penanda Argumen untuk Label Proto-Rol Sintaks-Agnostik', 'kk': 'Синтаксис- агностикалық протокол- рольді белгілеу үшін аргумент- маркер үлгісі', 'ml': 'സിന്റാക്സ്- ആഗ്നോസ്റ്റിക് പ്രോട്ടോ- റോള്\u200d ലാബിലിംഗിനുള്ള ആര്\u200dഗമെന്റ്- മാര്\u200dക്കറ്റ് മോഡല്\u200d', 'mt': 'Mudell tal-Markatur tal-Argumenti għat-Tikkettar tal-Proto-Rwol Sintassiku-Aġenotiku', 'mn': 'Синтаксис-агностик протокол-роль маркер загвар', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'Un model de marcaj argument pentru etichetarea protorolului sintaxial-agnostic', 'pl': 'Model argument-marker dla syntax-agnostycznego proto-role etykietowania', 'si': 'Name', 'sr': 'Model маркера аргумента за маркетиране синтакс-агностично протокола', 'so': 'Model for Syntax-Agnostic Protocol-Rule', 'ta': 'ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தும் நெறி முன்னோட்டு விளிம்புகளுக்கான ஒரு அருகுறி குறி மாதிரி', 'ur': 'سینٹکس-اگنیسٹیک پروٹو-رول لیبلینگ کے لئے آرگنم-مارکر موڈل', 'sv': 'En argumentmarkörmodell för syntaxAgnostisk protorollmärkning', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô hình A Argument-Marker for syntax-Agnosic Proto-Role Labling', 'bg': 'Модел на аргументи за синтаксично агностично етикетиране на пророли', 'hr': 'Model markera argumenata za označavanje sintaksa-Agnostičkog protorola', 'nl': 'Een argument-marker model voor syntax-Agnostic proto-role labeling', 'da': 'En argumentmarkørmodel til syntaks-agnostisk protorollemærkning', 'de': 'Ein Argument-Marker Modell für syntax-Agnostic Proto-Role Labeling', 'ko': '문법 알 수 없는 원형 캐릭터 표시의 매개 변수 표기 모델', 'id': 'Model Penanda Argumen untuk Label Proto-Rol Sintaks-Agnostik', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Mradi wa Makubaliano kwa Makubaliano ya Kizazi', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Sintaks-agnostik Proto-Rol Etiketleme üçin bir Argument-Marker Modeli', 'sq': 'Name', 'am': 'Syntax-Agnostic Proto-Role', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Sintaks-Agnostik protokol-rol etiketi üçün Argument-Marker Modeli', 'bn': 'সিন্ট্যাক্স- আগনোস্টিক প্রোটো- রোলিং-এর জন্য আর্গুমেন্ট- মার্কার মডেল', 'bs': 'Model markera argumenta za označavanje sintaksa-Agnostičkog protorola', 'ca': "Un model de marcador d'arguments per etiquetar el protrol sintàstic", 'et': 'Argumenti- märgistuse mudel süntaksi- agnostilise protorolli märgistamiseks', 'cs': 'Argument-Marker Model pro syntax-Agnostic Proto-Role Labeling', 'fi': 'Argumenttimerkkimalli synteettistä aggnostista protoroolimerkintää varten', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Model označevalnika argumentov za sintaksno- agnostično proto- vlogo', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'An Argument-Marker Model for Syntax-Agnostic Proto-Role Labeling', 'bo': 'An Argument-Marker Model for Syntax-Agnostic Proto-Role Labeling'}
{'en': 'Semantic proto-role labeling (SPRL) is an alternative to semantic role labeling (SRL) that moves beyond a categorical definition of roles, following Dowty’s feature-based view of proto-roles. This theory determines agenthood vs. patienthood based on a participant’s instantiation of more or less typical agent vs. patient properties, such as, for example, volition in an event. To perform SPRL, we develop an ensemble of hierarchical models with self-attention and concurrently learned predicate-argument markers. Our method is competitive with the state-of-the art, overall outperforming previous work in two formulations of the task (multi-label and multi-variate Likert scale pre- diction). In contrast to previous work, our results do not depend on gold argument heads derived from supplementary gold tree banks.', 'fr': "L'étiquetage de proto-rôle sémantique (SPRL) est une alternative à l'étiquetage sémantique des rôles (SRL) qui va au-delà d'une définition catégorique des rôles, suivant la vision des proto-rôles basée sur les fonctionnalités de Dowty. Cette théorie détermine l'agentivité par rapport à la patience en fonction de l'instanciation par un participant de propriétés plus ou moins typiques de l'agent par rapport au patient, comme, par exemple, la volonté dans un événement. Pour effectuer une SPRL, nous développons un ensemble de modèles hiérarchiques avec attention personnelle et marqueurs prédicat-argument appris simultanément. Notre méthode est compétitive par rapport à l'état de la technique, surpassant globalement les travaux précédents dans deux formulations de la tâche (prédiction d'échelle de Likert multi-étiquettes et multivariée). Contrairement aux travaux précédents, nos résultats ne dépendent pas des têtes d'argument aurifères dérivées de banques d'arbres aurifères supplémentaires.", 'pt': 'A rotulagem semântica de proto-funções (SPRL) é uma alternativa à rotulagem semântica de papéis (SRL) que vai além de uma definição categórica de papéis, seguindo a visão de proto-funções baseada em recursos da Dowty. Essa teoria determina a condição de agente versus a condição de paciente com base na instanciação de um participante de propriedades mais ou menos típicas do agente versus do paciente, como, por exemplo, volição em um evento. Para realizar o SPRL, desenvolvemos um conjunto de modelos hierárquicos com autoatenção e marcadores predicado-argumento aprendidos concomitantemente. Nosso método é competitivo com o estado da arte, superando em geral trabalhos anteriores em duas formulações da tarefa (previsão de escala de Likert multi-rótulo e multivariada). Em contraste com trabalhos anteriores, nossos resultados não dependem de cabeças de argumentos de ouro derivadas de bancos de árvores de ouro suplementares.', 'ar': 'يعتبر تصنيف الأدوار الأولية الدلالية (SPRL) بديلاً لوصف الأدوار الدلالية (SRL) الذي يتجاوز التعريف القاطع للأدوار ، باتباعًا لعرض Dowty القائم على الميزات للأدوار الأولية. تحدد هذه النظرية الفاعلية مقابل الصبر استنادًا إلى تجسيد المشارك للعامل النموذجي أكثر أو أقل مقابل خصائص المريض ، مثل ، على سبيل المثال ، الإرادة في حدث ما. لأداء SPRL ، نقوم بتطوير مجموعة من النماذج الهرمية مع الانتباه الذاتي وعلامات الحجة الأصلية المكتسبة بشكل متزامن. طريقتنا قادرة على المنافسة مع أحدث ما توصلت إليه التكنولوجيا ، وتتفوق بشكل عام على العمل السابق في صيغتين للمهمة (توقع مقياس ليكرت متعدد العلامات ومتنوع). على عكس العمل السابق ، فإن نتائجنا لا تعتمد على رؤوس الحجج الذهبية المستمدة من بنوك شجرة الذهب التكميلية.', 'es': 'El etiquetado semántico de protoroles (SPRL) es una alternativa al etiquetado semántico de roles (SRL) que va más allá de una definición categórica de roles, siguiendo la visión de los protoroles basada en características de Dowty. Esta teoría determina la edad frente a la paternidad en función de la instanciación por parte de un participante de propiedades más o menos típicas del agente frente al paciente, como, por ejemplo, la volición en un evento. Para realizar SPRL, desarrollamos un conjunto de modelos jerárquicos con autoatención y marcadores de predicados y argumentos aprendidos simultáneamente. Nuestro método es competitivo con el estado de la técnica, superando en general el trabajo anterior en dos formulaciones de la tarea (predicción de escala Likert multietiqueta y multivariante). A diferencia de trabajos anteriores, nuestros resultados no dependen de argumentos de oro derivados de bancos de árboles de oro suplementarios.', 'ja': 'セマンティックプロトロールラベル（ SPRL ）は、Dowtyのプロトロールの特徴ベースのビューに従って、役割のカテゴリカルな定義を超えたセマンティックロールラベル（ SRL ）の代替手段です。この理論は、多かれ少なかれ典型的な薬剤対患者特性、例えば、事象における意志などの参加者のインスタンス化に基づいて、エイゲンスド対患者性を決定する。SPRLを実行するために、自己注目と同時に学習された述語-引数マーカーを備えた階層モデルのアンサンブルを開発します。私たちの方法は、最先端のものと競合しており、タスクの2つの定式化（マルチラベルおよびマルチバリアントリカートスケール事前辞書）で全体的に以前の仕事を上回っています。これまでの仕事とは対照的に、私たちの結果は、補助的なゴールドツリーバンクから派生したゴールドの議論ヘッドに依存していません。', 'zh': '语义原型角表(SPRL)语义角表(SRL)之代方,其越角色之类定义,循Dowty原型角视图。 其论以参与者多少典摄与患之实化来定守耐性,事之情也。 为SPRL者,发一自关,与同时学者谓词参数标记之分。 先进有竞争力,二公式(多表变量Likert尺预判词)中总体优于前事。 比之前事,不赖补金树库黄金论证头。', 'ru': 'Семантическая проторолевая маркировка (SPRL) является альтернативой семантической ролевой маркировке (SRL), которая выходит за рамки категориального определения ролей, следуя характеристикам проторолей Даути. Эта теория определяет agenthood по сравнению с терпением на основе инстанцирования участником более или менее типичных свойств агента по сравнению с пациентом, таких как, например, волеизъявление в событии. Для выполнения SPRL мы разрабатываем ансамбль иерархических моделей с самовниманием и параллельно изучаемыми маркерами предикатов-аргументов. Наш метод конкурирует с современным, в целом превосходя предыдущую работу в двух формулировках задачи (многометодное и многовариантное предпроектное исследование шкалы Лайкерта). В отличие от предыдущей работы, наши результаты не зависят от голов золотых аргументов, полученных от дополнительных банков золотых деревьев.', 'hi': 'सिमेंटिक प्रोटो-रोल लेबलिंग (एसपीआरएल) शब्दार्थ भूमिका लेबलिंग (एसआरएल) का एक विकल्प है जो भूमिकाओं की एक स्पष्ट परिभाषा से परे जाता है, जो डॉवी के प्रोटो-भूमिकाओं के फीचर-आधारित दृश्य का पालन करता है। यह सिद्धांत एजेंटहुड बनाम रोगीत्व को निर्धारित करता है जो एक प्रतिभागी के अधिक या कम विशिष्ट एजेंट बनाम रोगी गुणों के तत्कालीकरण के आधार पर होता है, जैसे कि, उदाहरण के लिए, एक घटना में इच्छा। एसपीआरएल करने के लिए, हम आत्म-ध्यान और समवर्ती रूप से सीखे गए विधेय-तर्क मार्करों के साथ पदानुक्रमित मॉडल का एक पहनावा विकसित करते हैं। हमारी विधि अत्याधुनिक कला के साथ प्रतिस्पर्धी है, समग्र रूप से कार्य के दो योगों (मल्टी-लेबल और मल्टी-वैरिएट लायकर्ट स्केल प्री-डिक्शन) में पिछले काम को पीछे छोड़ देती है। पिछले काम के विपरीत, हमारे परिणाम पूरक सोने के पेड़ बैंकों से व्युत्पन्न सोने के तर्क सिर पर निर्भर नहीं करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Is rogha eile é lipéadú séimeantach próta-róil (SPRL) ar lipéadú róil shéimeantach (SRL) a théann níos faide ná sainmhíniú catagóiriúil ar róil, de réir dhearcadh gné-bhunaithe Dowty ar phrótróil. Cinneann an teoiric seo gníomhaireacht vs. otharacht bunaithe ar mheandarach rannpháirtí ar níos mó nó níos lú de ghnáthghníomhairí vs. airíonna othair, mar shampla, deoin in imeacht. Chun SPRL a chur i gcrích, forbraímid ensemble de mhúnlaí ordlathacha le marcóirí féinaird agus argóintí réamhfhoghlama i gcomhthráth. Tá ár modh iomaíoch leis an úrscothacht, ag dul i bhfeabhas ar an iomlán ar shaothar roimhe seo in dhá fhoirmliú den tasc (réamhaisnéis scála Likert illipéad agus ilathraithe). I gcodarsnacht le hobair roimhe seo, ní bhraitheann ár dtorthaí ar chinn argóintí óir a dhíorthaítear ó bhainc chrainn óir forlíontacha.', 'el': 'Η σημασιολογική σήμανση πρωτορόλων (SPRL) είναι μια εναλλακτική λύση στη σημασιολογική σήμανση ρόλων (SRL) που κινείται πέρα από έναν κατηγορηματικό ορισμό ρόλων, ακολουθώντας την άποψη του Ντόwty για πρωτορόλους βάσει χαρακτηριστικών. Αυτή η θεωρία καθορίζει τον παράγοντα έναντι της υπομονής με βάση την στιγμιαία απεικόνιση από έναν συμμετέχοντα περισσότερο ή λιγότερο τυπικών ιδιοτήτων παράγοντα έναντι ασθενούς, όπως, για παράδειγμα, η βούληση σε ένα γεγονός. Για την εκτέλεση αναπτύσσουμε ένα σύνολο ιεραρχικών μοντέλων με αυτοπροσοχή και συγχρόνως διδασκόμενους δείκτες προδιάθεσης-επιχειρήματος. Η μέθοδος μας είναι ανταγωνιστική με την τελευταία τεχνολογία, συνολικά ξεπερνώντας τις προηγούμενες εργασίες σε δύο διατυπώσεις της εργασίας (πολυ-ετικέτα και πολυ-μεταβλητή κλίμακα προεπιλογή). Σε αντίθεση με προηγούμενες εργασίες, τα αποτελέσματά μας δεν εξαρτώνται από κεφάλαια επιχειρημάτων χρυσού που προέρχονται από συμπληρωματικές τράπεζες χρυσοδέντρων.', 'hu': 'A szemantikus proto-role címkézés (SPRL) alternatívája a szemantikus szerep címkézésnek (SRL), amely túlmutat a szerepek kategorikus definícióján, a Dowty proto-roles funkcióalapú nézetét követve. Ez az elmélet meghatározza az ügynökséget vs. a betegséget a résztvevő többé-kevésbé tipikus ügynökség vs. a beteg tulajdonságai, mint például az akarat egy eseményben. Az SPRL végrehajtásához hierarchikus modellek együttesét fejlesztjük ki önfigyelemmel és ezzel egyidejűleg tanult predikát-argumentum markerekkel. Módszerünk versenyképes a legkorszerűbb technológiával, általánosságban felülmúlja a korábbi munkát a feladat két formulációjában (multi-label és multi-various Likert skála előterjesztés). Az előző munkákkal ellentétben eredményeink nem függnek a kiegészítő aranyfa bankokból származó arany argumentációs fejektől.', 'ka': 'Semantic proto-role labeling (SPRL) არის semantic role labeling (SRL) ალტენტიფიკაცია, რომელიც პროტის კატეგორიკალური განსაზღვრების გარეშე მოძრაობს, რომელიც Dowty-ს პროტიპოლის ფუნქტურების განსაზღვრებული ხედვის. ეს თეორია განსაზღვრავს ადენტიოდის vs. პაციენტიოდის განსაზღვრავს, როგორც მოვლენდებელი უფრო ან ცოტა ტიპული ადენტის განსაზღვრავობის განსაზღვრებაზე, როგორც, მაგალითად, მოვლენებაში მოვლენებ SPRL-ს გავაკეთებთ, ჩვენ იერაქტიკური მოდელების დავიწყებთ, რომელიც თავიდან დაახლოებით და ერთადერთად დავისწავლეთ პრედიკატიკური არგუმენტის მარკერებით. ჩვენი მეტი კონპექტიურია ხელოვნის სახელსაწყისთვის, ყველაფერი უფრო გავაკეთებული წინა სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამ ნაქთრვ პვჱსლრართ ნვ ჱაგთჟწგარ ჲრ ჱლარნთრვ აპდსმვნრთ ჲრ ეჲოლჲმვნრნთ ჱლარნთ ბვნკთ.', 'lt': 'Semantinis proto-rolo ženklinimas (SPRL) yra alternatyva semantiniam rolo ženklinimui (SRL), kuris peržengia kategorijinį rolų apibrėžimą, atsižvelgiant į Dowty charakteristikas pagrįstą proto-rolų vaizdą. Ši teorija nustato agentiškumą, palyginti su paciento metodu, remiantis dalyvio pasireiškimu, kad yra daugiau ar mažiau tipiškas agent a s, palyginti su paciento savybėmis, pvz., pasireiškimo tūris. Siekdami atlikti SPRL, mes kuriame hierarchinių modelių rinkinį su savarankišku dėmesiu ir tuo pačiu metu išmoktais argument ų žymekliais. Mūsų metodas yra konkurencingas su pažangiausiu, bendrai atliktu ankstesniu darbu dviejose užduoties formuluotėse (daugelio ženklų ir daugelio skirtingų Likerto skalės įspėjimas). Priešingai nei ankstesnis darbas, mūsų rezultatai nepriklauso nuo aukso argument ų galvutų, gautų iš papildomų aukso medžių bankų.', 'it': "L'etichettatura semantica proto-role (SPRL) è un'alternativa all'etichettatura semantica dei ruoli (SRL) che va oltre una definizione categorica dei ruoli, seguendo la visione basata sulle funzionalità di Dowty dei proto-role. Questa teoria determina agenthood vs. patienthood in base all'istanziazione da parte di un partecipante di proprietà agente più o meno tipiche vs. paziente, come, ad esempio, la volontà in un evento. Per eseguire SPRL, sviluppiamo un insieme di modelli gerarchici con auto-attenzione e marcatori predicato-argomento appresi contemporaneamente. Il nostro metodo è competitivo con lo stato dell'arte, superando complessivamente il lavoro precedente in due formulazioni del compito (pre-dizione scala Likert multi-label e multi-variata). Contrariamente al lavoro precedente, i nostri risultati non dipendono dalle teste di argomento in oro derivate da banche di alberi d'oro supplementari.", 'kk': "Semantic proto- role labeling (SPRL) is a semantic role labeling (SRL) that moves beyond a categorical definition, following Dowty's feature-based view of proto- roles. Бұл теория қатысушылардың көптеген немесе кемінде қалыпты агенттің қасиеттері мен пациенттің қасиеттеріне негізделген агентоды және пациенттің қасиеттерін анықтайды, мысалы, оқиғалардың қасиеттері. СПРЛ орындау үшін біз иерархиялық моделдерді өзіміздің өзіміздің өзіміздің өзіміздің өзіміздің өзіміздің өзіміздің өзіміздің өзіміздің қа Біздің әдіміміз әртүрлі әртүрлі әртүрлі, тапсырманың екі формулацияларында алдыңғы жұмыс істеген (көп жарлық және көп әртүрлі Likert масштабының алдыңғы дикциясы). Алдыңғы жұмыс жұмысына қарсы, нәтижелеріміз алтын аргументтерінің бағыттарынан қосымша алтын ағаш банктарынан шығарылған аргументтеріне тәуелді емес.", 'ms': "Semantic proto-role labeling (SPRL) is an alternative to semantic role labeling (SRL) that moves beyond a categorical definition of roles, following Dowty's feature-based view of proto-roles.  Teori ini menentukan agensi vs. patienthood berdasarkan kejadian peserta yang lebih atau kurang agen tipik vs. ciri-ciri pesakit, seperti, contohnya, kecewaan dalam peristiwa. Untuk melaksanakan SPRL, kami mengembangkan kumpulan model hierarkis dengan perhatian diri dan penunjuk argumen-predikat yang dipelajari secara bersamaan. Kaedah kami adalah bersaing dengan kemajuan-kemajuan, keseluruhan melampaui kerja terdahulu dalam dua formulasi tugas (prediksi skala Likert berbilang-label dan berbilang-variasi). Sebaliknya dengan kerja sebelumnya, hasil kita tidak bergantung pada kepala argumen emas yang berasal dari bank pokok emas tambahan.", 'mk': 'Семантичкото обележување на прото-улоги (SPRL) е алтернатива на семантичкото обележување на улоги (SRL) што се движи надвор од категоричната дефиниција на улоги, по погледот на Доути на прото-улогите базиран на карактеристики. Оваа теорија ја одредува агенцијата против пациентноста врз основа на институцијата на учесникот на повеќе или помалку типични агенти против пациентските сопствености, како што е, на пример, волицијата во случај. За да извршиме СПРЛ, развиваме ансембл на хиерархични модели со себеси внимание и истовремено научени маркери за предикат-аргумент. Нашиот метод е конкурентен со најсовремената, целокупно надминувајќи ја претходната работа во две формулации на задачата (преддикција за мултиетикет и мултиваријативната скала на Ликерт). За разлика од претходната работа, нашите резултати не зависат од главите на златни аргументи изведени од дополнителните златни дрвја банки.', 'ml': "സെമാന്റിക് പ്രോട്ടോ- റോള്\u200d ലേബിള്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നത് സെമാന്റിക് റോള്\u200d ലേബിളിന്\u200dറെ (SRL) ഒരു മാറ്റം ആണ്. അത് പ്രോട്ടോ- റോളുകളുടെ പ്രോട്ടോയുടെ സ്വഭാവിക വി This theory determines agenthood vs. patienthood based on a participant's instantiation of more or less typical agent vs. patient properties, such as, for example, volition in an event.  SPRL പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വയം ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകളുടെ ഒരു മാന്ത്രികമാണ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നത്. ഇപ്പോള്\u200d പഠ ഞങ്ങളുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d കലാകാര്യത്തോടൊപ്പം മത്സരിക്കുന്നതാണ്, മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് മുഴുവന്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് രണ് മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും വിരോധമാണെങ്കില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണവാദ്യാഭ്യാസം തലയില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കു", 'mt': 'It-tikkettar tal-proto-rwol Semantiku (SPRL) huwa alternattiva għat-tikkettar tar-rwol semantiku (SRL) li jmur lil hinn minn definizzjoni kategorika tar-rwoli, wara l-viżjoni ta’ Dowty bbażata fuq il-karatteristiċi tal-proto-role s. Din it-teorija tiddetermina l-a ġenzija vs. il-metodu tal-pazjent ibbażat fuq l-istanzjazzjoni ta’ parteċipant ta’ aġent aktar jew inqas tipiku vs. proprjetajiet tal-pazjent, bħal, pereżempju, volizzjoni f’każ. Biex twettaq l-SPRL, niżviluppaw ensemble ta’ mudelli ġerarkiċi b’attenzjoni awtonoma u b’markaturi predikati-argumenti mgħallma fl-istess ħin. Il-metodu tagħna huwa kompetittiv ma’ l-aktar avvanzat, li jwettaq ħidma pre ċedenti b’mod ġenerali f’żewġ formulazzjonijiet tal-kompitu (predizzjoni fuq skala ta’ Likert b’ħafna tikketti u b’ħafna varjazzjonijiet). B’kuntrast max-xogħol preċedenti, ir-riżultati tagħna ma jiddependux fuq ir-ras tal-argument tad-deheb derivati minn banek supplimentari tas-siġar tad-deheb.', 'no': 'Semantisk protoroletiketting (SPRL) er ein alternativ for semantisk rolletiketting (SRL) som flyttar over ein kategorisk definisjon av rolar etter Dowty sin funksjonsbasert vising av protorolar. Denne teorien bestemmer agenthood mot patienthood basert på ein deltakaren s in instansering av fleire eller mindre typiske egenskaper for agent mot pasienten, som for eksempel volisjon i ein hending. For å utføra SPRL, utviklar vi ein ensembel av hierarkiske modeller med selvmerksomhet og samtidig lært predikat-argument-merker. Metoden vårt er konkurrentivt med kunsttilstanden, som overalt utfører tidlegare arbeid i to formasjonar av oppgåva (fleire merkelapper og fleire variasjonar før- diksjon på likkert). I contrast to previous work, our results are not dependent on gold argument heads derived from supplementary gold tree banks.', 'pl': "Semantyczne znakowanie proto-role (SPRL) jest alternatywą dla semantycznego znakowania roli (SRL), które wychodzi poza kategoryczną definicję ról, zgodnie z funkcjami Dowty'ego widoku proto-roli. Teoria ta określa czynnik kontra cierpliwość na podstawie instancji przez uczestnika mniej lub bardziej typowych właściwości czynnika vs. pacjenta, takich jak np. wola w zdarzeniu. Aby wykonać SPRL, opracowujemy zespół hierarchicznych modeli z uwagą na siebie i jednocześnie uczonymi znacznikami predykatów argumentów. Nasza metoda jest konkurencyjna z najnowocześniejszymi technologiami, ogólnie przewyższa poprzednie prace w dwóch formułach zadania (wieloznakowa i wielowymiarowa predykcja skali Likerta). W przeciwieństwie do poprzednich prac nasze wyniki nie zależą od głów argumentów złota uzyskanych z uzupełniających banków drzew złota.", 'mn': "Semantic proto-role labeling (SPRL) is a semantic role labeling (SRL) which moves beyond a categorical definition of role s, following Dowty's feature-based view of proto-roles. Энэ онолын хувьд оролцогчдын хувьд илүү эсвэл бага ерөнхий агент эсвэл өвчтөнүүдийн хувьцааны тухай ажиллагааны эсрэг өвчтөнүүдийн хувьцааны тухай ажиллагааг тодорхойлдог. СПРЛ хийх үед бид өөртөө анхаарлын төвлөрүүлэлтийн загваруудыг бүтээж, мөн адилхан аргументын загваруудыг суралцдаг. Бидний арга нь урлагийн төвшинд өрсөлдөг, даалгаварын хоёр томъёоны даалгавартай ажиллаж байгаа зүйл юм. Өмнөх ажлын эсрэг бидний үр дүн нь алтын аргументын толгойд хамаарахгүй.", 'ro': 'Etichetarea semantică a protorolurilor (SPRL) este o alternativă la etichetarea semantică a rolurilor (SRL), care depășește o definiție categorică a rolurilor, urmând viziunea bazată pe caracteristici a lui Dowty asupra protorolurilor. Această teorie determină comportamentul agent vs. răbdare pe baza instanțierii unui participant a proprietăților mai mult sau mai puțin tipice ale agentului vs. pacientului, cum ar fi, de exemplu, voliția într-un eveniment. Pentru a efectua SPRL, dezvoltăm un ansamblu de modele ierarhice cu auto-atenție și markeri predicat-argument învățați concomitent. Metoda noastră este competitivă cu cea mai modernă tehnologie, depășind în general lucrările anterioare în două formulări ale sarcinii (pre-dicționare pe scară Likert cu etichete multiple și variații). Spre deosebire de lucrările anterioare, rezultatele noastre nu depind de capetele de argument de aur derivate din băncile suplimentare de arbori de aur.', 'si': 'සෙමැන්ටික් ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන ලේබලින් (SPRL) කිරීම සෙමැන්ටික් ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන ලේබලින් (SRL) වලට ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන විශේ මේ සාමාන්\u200dය විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ සාමාන්\u200dය විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරු SPRL නිර්මාණය කරගන්න, අපි ස්වයංග්\u200dරහයේ අවධානය සමග සිද්ධ විදියට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට අවධානය කරනවා. අපේ විධානය තර්ජනය විදියට ඉන්නේ කිරීමේ ස්ථානය සමග, වැඩේ විදියට පසුගිය වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට පසුගිය වැඩ දෙකක් විදියට (ව මුලින් වැඩට විරුද්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සුන්ධ විශ්වාස කරන්නේ නෑ සුන්ධ විශ', 'so': 'Semantic-role-role lab (SPRL) waa mid kale oo bedel ah qayb semantic ah oo ku dhaqdhaqaaqsan qoraal ka mid ah qayb-qeyb ah, kaasoo raacaya aragtida farsamada ee Dowty. Tiyaatarkaas ayaa go’aanka ka gaara xanuunsiga ka mid ah oo ku saleysan in uu qofka ka qeybqaatay si ka badan ama ka yar u sameeyo hantidiisa bukaanka, tusaale ahaan jirdilka. Si aan u sameyno SPRL, waxaynu korinnaa muusiko hierarchical ah oo ay iskula jeedaan, islamarkaasna waxaynu barnay markhaatiyada horumarinta. Qoraalkayagu waa mid ku dadaalaya xaaladda farshaxanta, dhamaan shaqo hore oo ku sameynaya laba qaab oo shaqada (kala duduwan iyo kala duduwan kala duduwan oo la mid ah baaritaanka hore). Taas ka duwan shuqulkii hore, resultinnadayadu kuma xirna madaxyo dood oo dahab ah oo ka soo baxay bankiyada dahabka ah.', 'sr': 'Semantička etiketiranja protouloga (SPRL) je alternativa semantičkoj etiketi uloga (SRL), koja se kreće izvan kategorijske definicije uloga, nakon što je Dowtyjev pogled na funkcijama baziran na protoulovima. Ova teorija određuje agentood protiv pacijenta na osnovu instancije učesnika više ili manje tipičnih imovina agent a protiv pacijenata, na primer, voljenja u događaju. Da bismo izvršili SPRL, razvili smo ensemble hijerarhijskih modela sa samopouzdanjem i istovremeno naučili predikatne markere argumenta. Naša metoda je konkurentna sa stanjem umjetnosti, ukupno iznenađujući prethodni rad u dve formulacije zadatka (višestruka etiketa i viševarijantna preddikcija Likertske skale). U suprotnosti sa prethodnim poslom, naši rezultati ne zavise od zlatnih argument glava iz dodatnih zlatnih drveæa.', 'sv': 'Semantic proto-role labeling (SPRL) är ett alternativ till semantisk rollmärkning (SRL) som rör sig bortom en kategorisk definition av roller, enligt Dowtys funktionsbaserade syn på protoroller. Denna teori avgör agenthood vs patienthood baserat på deltagarens instantiering av mer eller mindre typiska agent vs patientegenskaper, såsom till exempel viljan i en händelse. För att utföra SPRL utvecklar vi en ensemble hierarkiska modeller med självuppmärksamhet och samtidigt lärda predikat-argumentmarkörer. Vår metod är konkurrenskraftig med den senaste tekniken och överlappar överlag tidigare arbete i två formuleringar av uppgiften (multi-label och multi-variate Likert skala pre-diktion). Till skillnad från tidigare arbete beror våra resultat inte på guldargumenthuvuden som härrör från kompletterande guldträdsbanker.', 'ta': "செமாண்டிக் போர்டோ- பங்கு குறிப்பிடுதல் (SPRL) என்பது பெமான்டிக் பங்கு விளையாட்டிற்கு மாற்று. அது பங்களின் வகையான விளக்கத்திற்கு மேல் நகரும், டோவ்டி This theory determines agenthood vs. patienthood based on a participant's instantiation of more or less typical agent vs. patient properties, such as, for example, volition in an event.  SPRL செயல்படுத்துவதற்கு, நாம் தன்னை கவனத்துடன் ஒரு மாதிரி மாதிரிகளை உருவாக்குகிறோம் மற்றும் தற்போது கற்றுக் கொண்டு முன் எங்கள் முறைமை கலை நிலையில் போராடுகிறது, மொத்தமாக முந்தைய வேலையை இரண்டு வடிவமைப்பில் செயல்படுத்துகிறது (பல- label மற்றும் பல- மாறி போன்ற அளவு முன் அ முந்தைய வேலைக்கு எதிராக, எங்கள் விளைவுகள் சார்ந்து தங்க வார்த்தை தலைவர்கள் சார்ந்து கொள்வதில்லை நிரூபி", 'ur': 'سیمنٹی پروٹو-رول لیبلینگ (SPRL) سیمنٹی رول لیبلینگ (SRL) کے بدلے ایک الٹ ہے جو رول کے کلاٹی تعریف کے بعد ڈوٹی کے فرصت کی بنیاد پر پروٹو-رول کی نظر کے پیچھے چلتی ہے. یہ نظریہ ایک مشرکین کے زیادہ یا کم طبیعی اگنٹ علیھ السّلام کے معاملہ پر اگنٹوڈ علیھ السّلام کے مقابلہ میں مقرر کرتا ہے، جیسے ایک حادثہ میں محبت ہے. SPRL کا عمل کرنے کے لئے، ہم نے اپنے آپ کی توجه کے ساتھ حیراتیکل مدلکوں کی ایک مثال پیدا کیا ہے اور ایک دوسرے سے مختلف حجت مارکر سکھایا ہے. ہمارا طریقہ هنر کی حالت کے ساتھ مسابقه ہے، کل پہلے کام کی دو فرمول میں (بہت سی لیبل اور بہت سی متفاوت لیکرٹ کی مقدار سے پہلے لکھنے کے لئے) کام کرتا ہے۔ اگلے کام کے مقابلہ میں، ہمارے نتیجے سونے کے درخت بانک سے اضافہ ہوئے سونے کے سروں پر اعتبار نہیں ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Bu nazarda taʼminlovchi bo'lganlarni o'zgarishga ko'proq ko'p oddiy ajratishga asosida qo'shilgan qo'llanmalarni aniqlaydi. Masalan, hodisada volition. SPRL ishga tushirish uchun biz o'zimni o'zini o'zingiz paydo bilan foydalanishimiz va hozirda predicate-argument markers bilan o'rganamiz. Bizning usuli San'atning holati bilan rivojlanishimiz mumkin, shu vazifaning ikki formatlarida umumiy ishni bajarishimiz mumkin (ko'plab- ko'plab va ko'plab- oʻlchami huddi bir xil boshqa chegarasining pre-dictionary). Oldingi ish bilan boshqa o'zgarishga, bizning natijalarimiz qoʻshimcha daraxt banks orqali gull argumentarining boshqarlariga qo'llanmagan.", 'vi': 'Phân tích con rắn đặt ra các vai, như một thay thế cho mô phỏng các vai trò theo quy định về mặt phân biệt. Giả thuyết này xác định các đặc vụ tương đương tình cảm dựa trên s ự hiện diện của một người tham gia về đặc vụ hay ít điển hình chống lại tính chất bệnh nhân, ví dụ, tham gia vào một sự kiện. Để thực hiện SPRL, chúng tôi phát triển một kết hợp của các mô hình cấp trên cùng với sự chú ý và đồng thời học các đánh dấu xã hội. Phương pháp của chúng ta cạnh tranh với công nghệ hiện đại, hoàn toàn vượt trội hơn các công trình trước trong hai công thức của nhiệm vụ (đa nhãn và đa số môi trường thích hợp). Trái với công việc trước đây, kết quả của chúng ta không phụ thuộc vào những lời lẽ vàng lấy từ các ngân hàng gốc vàng khác.', 'bg': 'Семантичното етикетиране на прото-роли (SPRL) е алтернатива на семантичното етикетиране на роли (SRL), което излиза отвъд категоричното определение на ролите, следвайки характеристиките на Доути за прото-ролите. Тази теория определя агентността срещу пациентството въз основа на инстанцията на участника на повече или по-малко типични свойства на агента срещу пациента, като например волята в дадено събитие. За изпълнение на СРЛ разработваме ансамбъл от йерархични модели със самовнимание и едновременно научени предикат-аргументи маркери. Методът ни е конкурентен с най-съвременните технологии, като цяло надминава предишната работа в две формулировки на задачата (многоетикетна и многоварителна предварителна скала на Лиерт). За разлика от предишната работа, нашите резултати не зависят от златните аргументи, получени от допълнителни златни дървета банки.', 'nl': "Semantic proto-role labeling (SPRL) is een alternatief voor semantische role labeling (SRL) dat verder gaat dan een categorische definitie van rollen, volgens Dowty's feature-based view van proto-rollen. Deze theorie bepaalt agenthood vs. patient op basis van de instantiatie door een deelnemer van min of meer typische agent vs. patiënteigenschappen, zoals bijvoorbeeld wil in een gebeurtenis. Om SPRL uit te voeren, ontwikkelen we een ensemble van hiërarchische modellen met zelfaandacht en tegelijkertijd geleerd predicaat-argument markers. Onze methode is concurrerend met de state-of-the-art en overtreft over het algemeen eerdere werk in twee formuleringen van de taak (multi-label en multi-variate Likert schaal predictie). In tegenstelling tot vorig onderzoek zijn onze resultaten niet afhankelijk van gouden argumentkoppen afgeleid van aanvullende goudboombanken.", 'da': 'Semantisk proto-rollemærkning (SPRL) er et alternativ til semantisk rollemærkning (SRL), der går ud over en kategorisk definition af roller, efter Dowtys funktionsbaserede syn på proto-roller. Denne teori bestemmer agenthood vs. patientlighed baseret på en deltagers instantiation af mere eller mindre typiske agent vs. patientegenskaber, såsom for eksempel vilje i en begivenhed. For at udføre SPRL udvikler vi et ensemble af hierarkiske modeller med selvopmærksomhed og samtidig lærte prædikat-argumentmarkører. Vores metode er konkurrencedygtig med state-of-the-art og overgår generelt tidligere arbejde i to formuleringer af opgaven (multi-label og multi-variate Likert skala prædiktion). I modsætning til tidligere arbejde afhænger vores resultater ikke af guldargumenthoveder afledt af supplerende guldtræbanker.', 'hr': 'Semantička označavanja protouloga (SPRL) je alternativa semantičkoj označavanju uloga (SRL), koja se kreće izvan kategorijske definicije uloga, nakon što je Dowtyjev pogled na funkcijama baziran na protoulozi. Ova teorija određuje agentood protiv pacijenta na temelju instancije učesnika više ili manje tipičnih vlasništva agent a protiv pacijenata, na primjer voljenja u događaju. Da bismo izvršili SPRL, razvijamo ensemble hijerarhijskih modela sa samopouzdanjem i istovremeno naučili predikatne znakove argumenta. Naša metoda je konkurentna s stanjem umjetnosti, ukupno iznosi prethodni rad u dvije formulacije zadatka (višeoznačene i višerazličite preddikcije o mjeri Likerta). U suprotnosti s prethodnim radom, naši rezultati ne zavise od zlatnih argument glava iz dodatnih zlatnih drveća.', 'id': 'Label proto-peran semantis (SPRL) adalah alternatif untuk label peran semantis (SRL) yang bergerak melewati definisi kategoris peran, mengikuti pemandangan proto-peran berdasarkan fitur Dowty. Teori ini menentukan agensi vs. metode pasien berdasarkan instansi peserta dari lebih atau kurang agen tipis vs. properti pasien, seperti, contohnya, kehendak dalam sebuah peristiwa. Untuk melakukan SPRL, kami mengembangkan sebuah ensemble model hierarkis dengan perhatian sendiri dan pada saat yang sama belajar penanda predikat-argumen. Metode kami adalah kompetitif dengan state-of-the-art, secara umum melampaui pekerjaan sebelumnya dalam dua formulasi tugas (multi-label dan multi-variate skala Likert prediksi). Berbeda dengan pekerjaan sebelumnya, hasil kita tidak bergantung pada kepala argumen emas yang berasal dari bank pohon emas tambahan.', 'de': 'Semantic Proto-Role Labeling (SPRL) ist eine Alternative zur semantischen Rollenbeschriftung (SRL), die über eine kategorische Rollendefinition hinausgeht und Dowtys feature-based Ansicht von Proto-Rollen folgt. Diese Theorie bestimmt Agentum vs. Patientschaft basierend auf der Instanziierung eines Teilnehmers mehr oder weniger typischer Agent vs. Patienteneigenschaften, wie z.B. Wille in einem Ereignis. Zur Durchführung von SPRL entwickeln wir ein Ensemble hierarchischer Modelle mit Selbstaufmerksamkeit und gleichzeitig erlernten Prädikat-Argument-Markern. Unsere Methode ist wettbewerbsfähig mit dem Stand der Technik und übertrifft die bisherigen Arbeiten in zwei Formulierungen der Aufgabe (Multi-Label und Multi-Variate Likert Scale Prediktion). Im Gegensatz zu früheren Arbeiten hängen unsere Ergebnisse nicht von Gold-Argumentköpfen ab, die aus ergänzenden Goldbaumbanken abgeleitet wurden.', 'ko': '의미원형캐릭터표지(SPRL)는 의미캐릭터표지(SRL)의 대체 방법으로 캐릭터의 분류 정의를 초월하고 Dowty가 특징을 바탕으로 하는 원형캐릭터의 보기를 따른다.이 이론은 참여자가 많든 적든 전형적인 대리인과 환자 속성(예를 들어 사건의 의지)에 대한 실례화에 따라 대리인과 환자 간의 관계를 확정한다.SPRL을 실행하기 위해 술어 매개변수 태그를 학습하는 자체 주의 및 계층형 모델 집합을 개발했습니다.우리의 방법은 최신 기술에 비해 경쟁력이 있고 전체적으로 보면 임무의 두 공식(다중 라벨과 다변량 릭터 계량표 예측)에서 이전의 작업보다 우수하다.이전의 업무에 비해 우리의 결과는 금수은행에서 나온 금 파라미터에 의존하지 않는다.', 'fa': 'برچسب نقشه\u200cهای پیشینه\u200cای (SPRL) یک جایگزینی برای برچسب نقشه\u200cهای semantic (SRL) است که فراتر از یک تعریف kategoriی از نقشه\u200cها حرکت می\u200cکند، پس از دید ویژه\u200cهای پیشینه\u200cهای Dowty بر پایه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای نقشه\u200cهای پیشینه\u200cای. این نظریه ماموریت علیه مریضی بر اساس تعریف ماموریت بیشتر یا کمتر معمولی بر علیه ویژگی بیمار، مثلاً دوستی در یک حادثه، تعریف می کند. برای اجرای SPRL، ما یک جمله از مدل های معمولی با توجه به خودمان و همزمان نشان\u200cدهندگان معمولی را یاد گرفتیم. روش ما با وضعیت هنر مسابقه است، عمومی که کارهای قبلی را انجام می\u200cدهد در دو فرمول کار (مقیاس پیش\u200cگفتن لیکرت متفاوت و متفاوت متفاوت). در مقابل کارهای قبلی، نتیجه های ما بر سر دلیل طلایی که از بانک درخت طلایی اضافه شده بستگی ندارند.', 'sw': 'Jukumu la utaratibu wa kimapenzi (SPRL) ni mbadala wa jukumu la kimapenzi linalobeba zaidi ya ufafanuzi wa makundi, kufuatia mtazamo wa kitendo cha Dowty. Kinadharia hiki kinaamua maafisa dhidi ya ugonjwa unaofanywa na mshiriki kwa kuanzishwa kwa mtumiaji wa a in a ya kawaida dhidi ya vifaa vya mgonjwa, kwa mfano, vurugu katika tukio hilo. Ili kutekeleza SPRL, tunatengeneza mfumo wa mifano yenye kujitegemea na wakati huo tunajifunza viungo vya hoja. Utawala wetu ni ushindani na hali ya sanaa, kwa ujumla wa kufanya kazi zilizopita katika miundo mbili ya kazi (mipango mingi na tofauti tofauti tofauti kama ilivyofanana na udikteta). Tofauti na kazi zilizopita, matokeo yetu hayatategemea vichwa vya hoja za dhahabu vilivyotokana na benki za miti ya dhahabu za ziada.', 'tr': "Semantik proto-rol etiketlemesi (SPRL) semantik rol etiketlemesi (SRL) kategoriýaly rollerden öňünde geçir, Dowty'nin özelliklere tabanly proto-rolleriň görnüşine görä. Bu teori bir iştirakçin in, daha az ya da az s ıradan ajanların, hasta özelliklerinin, örneğin, bir olayda sevgiye dayanarak agentod ve sabırsızlığı belirleýär. SPRL'i ýerine ýetirmek üçin, özüne üns berip öwrenmek we ýene-de öwrenmek üçin bir iýerarhiýa nusgalaryň köpüsi gelişýäris. Bizim yöntemimiz sungat durumu ile döşemelendir. Her zamanki işin iki formülasynda (çoklu etiketli ve çoklu çeşitli Likert ölçeki öndeksiyonda) geçen işleri çözmektedir. Öňki işiň ýagdaýynda, netijelerimiz altyn agaç bankalardan uzaklaşdyran argüm kellelerine ynamly däl.", 'af': "Semantiese protoroletiketting (SPRL) is 'n alternatief vir semantiese roletiketting (SRL) wat beweeg buite 'n kategoriese definisie van role s, volgens Dowty se funksie-gebaseerde aansig van protoroles. Hierdie teorie bepaal agentood teen pacientood gebaseer op 'n deelnimmer se instansie van meer of minder tipies agent teen pacientode eienskappe, soos, byvoorbeeld, vollosie in 'n gebeurtenis. Om SPRL te uitvoer, ontwikkel ons 'n ensemble van hierarkies modele met self-aandag en samekomstig geleer predikaat-argument merkers. Ons metode is rekenaar met die state-of-the-art, totaal uitgevoerde vorige werk in twee formasies van die taak (multi-label en multi-variate Likert skaal voor-diksie). In contrast to previous work, our results are not dependent on gold argument heads derived from supplementary gold tree banks.", 'sq': 'Etiketimi Semantik proto-role (SPRL) është një alternativë ndaj Etiketimit Semantik Role (SRL) që kalon përtej një përcaktimi kategorik të roleve, pas pamjes s ë Dowty-t bazuar në funksionet e proto-roleve. Kjo teori përcakton agjensinë vs. pacientëzimin bazuar në instancimin e një pjesëmarrësi të agjentit më pak apo më pak tipik vs. pronësitë e pacientit, të tilla si, për shembull, vullneti në një ngjarje. Për të kryer SPRL, ne zhvillojmë një komplet modelesh hierarkikë me vetë-vëmendje dhe në të njëjtën kohë mësuar shenjat predicate-argument. Metoda jonë është konkurruese me gjendjen e teknologjisë, duke ekzekutuar punën e mëparshme në dy formulime të detyrës (paradikcioni me shumë etiketa dhe me shumë variata të shkallës Likert). Në kundërshtim me punën e mëparshme, rezultatet tona nuk varen nga kokat e argumenteve të artë të nxjerra nga bankat shtesë të pemëve të artë.', 'am': 'የሴሜንቲክ ፕሮሮሮኮ-role (SPRL) የፕሮሮጀክት-ክፍለ ክፍል በሚያሳየው የክፍተት ትርፍን በሚያሳየው (SRL) መተላለፊያ ነው፡፡ ይህም ታሪዮ በተካሄደው ወቅት፣ በተጨማሪው፣ ወይም በተጨማሪው የጦማር ምርጫዎች፣ እንደምሳሌ፣ በተቃውሞ ግንኙነት ላይ የሚቆርጥ፣ የሽታና አካባቢ አካባቢ እና ታናሽነትን በመፍጠር ይቆጥራል፡፡ SPRL ለማድረግ፣ የሐራራርካዊ ሞዴላዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የሥርዓታችን ሥርዓት አካባቢ አካባቢ እና በብዙ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩን አስቀድሞ መክፈት የሚደረገውን ስራ በሁለት ፎርማት ማሳየት ነው፡፡ የቀድሞው ሥራ በተለየ ፍሬያችን ከጨርቅ ዛፍ ቅርንጫፎች የወርቅ ክርክር ራሶችን አያደገፍም።', 'hy': 'Սեմանտիկ պրոտո-դեր պիտակ (SP RL) սեմանտիկ դեր պիտակ պիտակ է, որը շարժվում է դերերի կատեգորիկական սահմանումից դուրս, ըստ Դութի պրոտո-դերերի հատկանիշներով հիմնված տեսանկյունից: Այս տեսությունը որոշում է, թե ինչպես է գործողությունը հակառակ հիվանդության միջոցով հիմնված մասնակիցների մոտ ավելի կամ ավելի քիչ տիպիկ գործոնի պահին հակառակ հիվանդության հատկությունների վրա, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ պատահականությունը: ՍպՌԼ կատարելու համար մենք ստեղծում ենք հիերարխիկ մոդելների համակարգ ինքնաուշադրության հետ և միևնույն ժամանակ սովորված բարդ բանավեճերի մարկետներով: Մեր մեթոդը մրցակցություն է ամենաբարձր տեխնոլոգիայի հետ, ընդհանուր առմամբ գերազանցում է նախորդ աշխատանքը խնդրի երկու ձևերում (բազմաթիվ պիտակ և բազմատարբեր Լիկերտի սանդղակի նախաբառ): Ի հակադրություն նախորդ աշխատանքին, մեր արդյունքները կախված չեն ոսկու փաստարկման գլխավորներից, որոնք ստացվում են ավելացված ոսկու ծառերի բանկերից:', 'az': "Semantik proto-rol etiketi (SPRL) proto-rollərin görünüşünün ardınca Dowty'nin özelliklərinə dayanan görünüşünün kategoriyanın təsdiqlənməsindən ötürü s ürüşən semantik rol etiketi (SRL) alternatifi idi. Bu nəzəriyyə, iştirakçin in daha çox ya da az tipik agent və s əbirlərin özellikləri kimi, məsələn, səhifələrində sevgi tərzlərinə dayanan agenthood və patienthood vasitəsini təsdiqləyir. SPRL-i təqdim etmək üçün, özünü dikkat edən hiyerarşik modellərin və həmçinin öyrəndiyimiz predikat argumentlərin işaretçiləri təhsil edirik. Bizim metodumuz sanatın durumu ilə müqayisədir, bu işin iki formülünün əvvəlki işləri müqayisədir. Əvvəlki işə baxmayaraq, sonuçlarımız altın arqüsü başlıqlarına bağlı olmaz.", 'bn': 'সেম্যান্টিক প্রোটোরো ভূমিকা লেবেল (এসপিআরএল) হচ্ছে সেমেন্টিক ভূমিকা লেবেলের (এসআরএল) এর একটি বিকল্প যা ক্ষেত্রীয় ভূমিকার সংজ্ঞার বাইরে চলে যায়, যা প্রো এই তত্ত্বাবধানে অংশগ্রহণকারীদের অনেক বা কম সাধারণ এজেন্ট বা রোগীদের বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর ভিত্তিতে অংশগ্রহণকারীদের প্রতিষ্ঠানের উপরে সি এসপিআরএল প্রদর্শনের জন্য আমরা হিরেরার্কিক মডেলের একটি স্বতন্ত্র তৈরি করি আত্মমনোযোগ দিয়ে এবং সাথে যুক্তি পূর্ববর্তী আর্গুম আমাদের পদ্ধতি শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের সাথে প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতা করছে, কাজের দুই ধরনের পূর্ববর্তী কাজের সম্মুখীন হয়েছে (বহুলেবেল এবং বহুভ পূর্ববর্তী কাজের বিপরীতে, আমাদের ফলাফল সোনার যুক্তির মাথার উপর নির্ভর করে না যা স্বর্ণ গাছের ব্যাংক থেকে পাওয়া হয়', 'bs': 'Semantička etiketa protouloga (SPRL) je alternativa semantičkoj etiketi uloga (SRL), koja se kreće izvan kategorijske definicije uloga, nakon što je Dowtyjev pogled na funkcijama baziran na protoulovima. Ova teorija određuje agentood protiv pacijenta na osnovu instancije učesnika više ili manje tipičnih vlasništva agent a protiv pacijenata, na primjer voljenja u događaju. Da bi izvršili SPRL, razvijemo ensemble hijerarhijskih modela sa samopouzdanjem i istovremeno naučili predikatne znakove argumenta. Naša metoda je konkurentna s državom umjetnosti, ukupno iznosi prethodni rad u dvije formulacije zadatka (multi-label i multi-variate Likert scale pre-diction). U suprotnosti sa prethodnim radom, naši rezultati ne zavise od zlatnih argument glava iz dodatnih zlatnih drveća.', 'ca': "L'etiquetatge de proto-rols semàntic (SPRL) és una alternativa a l'etiquetatge de rols semàntic (SRL) que passa més enllà d'una definició categórica de rols, segons la visió de Dowty basada en característiques de proto-rols. Aquesta teoria determina l'agentitat vs. la forma de pacient basada en l'instanciació d'un participant d'un agent més o menys típic vs. les propietats del pacient, com per exemple, la volució en un evento. Per a fer SPRL, desenvolupem un conjunt de models jeràrquics amb autoatenció i marcadors de predicat-argument aprenguts alhora. El nostre mètode és competitiu amb l'última tecnologia, que supera la feina anterior en dues formulacions de la tasca (predició d'escala Likert multietiquetada i multivariada). Contrariament a la feina anterior, els nostres resultats no depenen dels caps d'arguments d'or derivats de bancs d'arbres d'or suplementaris.", 'cs': 'Sémantické značení proto-role (SPRL) je alternativou k sémantickému značení rolí (SRL), které se přesahuje kategorickou definici rolí, podle Dowtyho pohledu na proto-role založeného na funkcích. Tato teorie určuje agentův charakter versus pacientskost na základě instancie účastníka více či méně typických vlastností agenta versus pacienta, jako je například vůle v události. Pro provedení SPRL vytváříme soubor hierarchických modelů se sebepozorností a současně učenými značkami predikátů argumentů. Naše metoda je konkurenční s nejmodernějšími a celkově překonává předchozí práci ve dvou formulacích úlohy (multi-label a multi-variate Likertova stupnice predikce). Na rozdíl od předchozí práce nezávisí naše výsledky na zlatých argumentech odvozených z doplňkových bank zlatých stromů.', 'et': 'Semantiline proto-rolli märgistamine (SPRL) on alternatiiv semantilisele rolli märgistamisele (SRL), mis läheb kaugemale rollide kategoorialisest definitsioonist, järgides Dowty funktsioonipõhist vaadet proto-rollidest. See teooria määrab agentsuse vs patsientsuse, põhinedes osaleja enam või vähem tüüpiliste agendi vs patsiendi omaduste kehtestamisel, nagu näiteks tahte sündmuses. SPRL-i teostamiseks töötame välja hierarhiliste mudelite ansambli enesetähelepanu ja samaaegselt õppitud predikaadi-argumendi markeritega. Meie meetod on konkurentsivõimeline kaasaegse tehnikaga, üldiselt ületab varasemaid tööd kahes ülesande vormis (mitme märgisega ja mitme muutujaga Likerti skaala eeldiktsioon). Erinevalt varasematest töödest ei sõltu meie tulemused täiendavatest kullapuupankadest saadud kullaargumentidest.', 'fi': 'Semanttinen proto-roolimerkintä (SPRL) on vaihtoehto semanttiselle roolimerkinnälle (SRL), joka ylittää roolien kategorisen määritelmän Dowtyn ominaisuuspohjaisen protoroolinäkymän mukaisesti. Tämä teoria määrittelee agentiaation vs. patientiteetin sen perusteella, että osallistuja instantiaatio enemmän tai vähemmän tyypillisiä agentti vs. potilas ominaisuuksia, kuten esimerkiksi tahto tapahtumassa. SPRL:n suorittamiseksi kehitämme hierarkkisten mallien kokonaisuuden, jossa on itsetarkkaavaisuutta ja samanaikaisesti opittuja predikaatti-argumenttimarkkereita. Menetelmämme kilpailee uusimpien tekniikoiden kanssa ja on yleisesti ottaen parempi kuin aiemmat työt kahdessa tehtävän formulaatiossa (monimerkkinen ja monivariaattinen Likert-asteikko). Toisin kuin aikaisemmassa työssä, tulokset eivät riipu kullan argumenttipenkeistä johdetuista kullan argumenttipenkeistä.', 'jv': 'semanti proto-rol etiketing (SpaRL) is an Alternate to semanti roling label Genjer-Genjer ProgressBarUpdates Awakdhéwé wis dipolehasno karo stêt-of-the-arts, gak nggawe barang nggawe uwis rampun sing dibutuhke duwé ngempatan (multi-label lan multi-Variate Likert scale before-diktion). Tulung ning carane sing dumadhi, akeh sing ngomong nik akeh sing ngejaraké segala winih sing ngeweh dumadhi winih, sing uwis mangan sing nyelehke ditambah Panjenengan', 'sk': 'Semantično označevanje proto-vlog (SPRL) je alternativa semantičnemu označevanju vlog (SRL), ki presega kategorično definicijo vlog in sledi Dowtyjevemu funkcijskemu pogledu proto-vlog. Ta teorija določa agentnost proti pacientnosti na podlagi udeleženega instanciacije bolj ali manj tipičnih lastnosti agenta proti pacientu, kot je na primer volja v dogodku. Za izvedbo SPRL razvijamo ansambel hierarhičnih modelov s samopozornostjo in sočasno učenimi predikatno-argumentnimi markerji. Naša metoda je konkurenčna z najsodobnejšimi in na splošno boljša od prejšnjih del v dveh formulacijah naloge (preddicija več oznak in več spremenljivk Likertove lestvice). V nasprotju s prejšnjim delom naši rezultati niso odvisni od zlatih argumentov, ki izhajajo iz dodatnih bank zlatih dreves.', 'ha': "@ item: inmenu Wannan teori na ƙaddara masu motsi da rauni a kan wani mai haɗi ko kuma mafi ƙaranci wa matsayin masu nau'i, kamar misali, abun a cikin wani abu. To perform SPRL, we develop an ensemble of hierarchical models with self-attention and concurrently learned predicate-argument markers.  Tayiyinmu yana yin gaura da halin-sanar, da jumla mai bajara aikin na farko a cikin biyu surori-aikin (multi-label da multi-variant kamar misali-pre-dictionary). Tã motsa da aikin da ya gabãta, matsalarmu ba ta dõgara ga jãyayya na zĩnãriya daga banki na zĩnãriya.", 'bo': "Semantic proto-role labeling (SPRL) is an alternative to semantic role labeling (SRL) that moves beyond a categorical definition of role s, following Dowty's feature-based view of proto-roles. This theory determines agenthood vs. patienthood based on a participant's instantiation of more or less typical agent vs. patient properties, such as, for example, volition in an event. To perform SPRL, we develop an ensemble of hierarchical models with self-attention and concurrently learned predicate-argument markers. ང་ཚོའི་ལམ་ལུགས་འདི་སྒྱུ་རྩལ་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་འབྲས་བ་འདི་ལ་སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གྲང་ཐོག་གི་སྔར་སྒྲིག", 'he': "תווית פרוטו-תפקיד סמנטית (SPRL - Semantic proto-role label) היא אלטרנטיבה לתווית תפקיד סמנטי (SRL - Semantic proto-role label) שמעברת מעבר לגדרת תפקידים קטגורית, בעקבות הנוף של דוטי מבוסס על תכונות של פרוטו-תפקידים. This theory determines agenthood vs. patienthood based on a participant's instantiation of more or less typical agent vs. patient properties, such as, for example, volition in an event.  כדי לבצע SPRL, אנחנו מפתחים סמל של דוגמנים היררכיים עם תשומת לב עצמית ומלמדים באותו הזמן סימני טיעון-קודם. השיטה שלנו היא תחרותית עם המצב האמנותי, ביצוע כללי מעל עבודה קודמת בשני התצורות של המשימה (קודם-דיקציה במספר תווים ומספר-ויריאטים ליקרט). בניגוד לעבודה הקודמת, התוצאות שלנו לא תלויות בראשי טיעון זהב שנוצרו מבנקי עץ זהב נוספים."}
{'en': 'Bayesian Inference Semantics : A Modelling System and A Test Suite', 'ar': 'دلالات الاستدلال البايزي: نظام النمذجة ومجموعة الاختبار', 'fr': "Sémantique d'inférence bayésienne\xa0: un système de modélisation et une suite de tests", 'es': 'Semántica de inferencia bayesiana: un sistema de modelado y un conjunto de pruebas', 'pt': 'Semântica de Inferência Bayesiana: Um Sistema de Modelagem e um Conjunto de Testes', 'ja': 'ベイズ推論セマンティクス：モデリングシステムとテストスイート', 'zh': '贝叶斯推理语义学:建模系统及试套件', 'hi': 'Bayesian अनुमान शब्दार्थ: एक मॉडलिंग प्रणाली और एक टेस्ट सुइट', 'ru': 'Байесовская семантика вывода: система моделирования и тестовый набор', 'ga': 'Séimeantaic Tátail Bayesian: Córas Samhaltaithe agus Svuít Tástála', 'el': 'Σημασία Συμπερασμάτων: Ένα σύστημα μοντελοποίησης και μια σουίτα δοκιμών', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Bayesian Inference Semantics: A Modelling System and A Test Suite', 'it': 'Semantica di inferenza bayesiana: un sistema di modellazione e una suite di test', 'kk': 'Bayesian Inference Semantics: Моделинг жүйесі және сынақтар тізімі', 'mk': 'Бајезиски инференциски семантики: Моделирачки систем и тестирачки апартName', 'lt': 'Bayesian Inference Semantics: Modelling System and A Test Suite', 'ms': 'Semantik Inferensi Bayesian: Sistem Modeling dan Suite Ujian', 'mt': 'Semanti ta’ Inferenza Bayesian: Sistema ta’ Mudellar u Suite tat-Test', 'ml': 'ബെയിസിയന്\u200d കുഴപ്പമുള്ള സെമാന്\u200dടിക്സ്: ഒരു മോഡിലിങ്ങ് സിസ്റ്റം, ഒരു പരീക്ഷ സ്യൂട്ട്', 'ro': 'Semantica inferenței bayesiane: un sistem de modelare și o suită de testare', 'no': 'Name', 'mn': 'Bayesian Inference Semantics: A Modelling System, A Test Suite', 'sr': 'Semantika Bejzijske infekcije: Modelirani sistem i testni paket', 'si': 'බේසියාන් අවශ්\u200dය සෙමාන්ටික්ස්: මොඩේලින් පද්ධතියක් සහ පරීක්ෂා සුයිට්', 'so': 'Bayesian Inference Semantics: A Modelling System and A test Suite', 'sv': 'Bayesian Inference Semantics: Ett modelleringssystem och en testsvit', 'pl': 'Bayesowska semantyka wniosków: system modelowania i zestaw testowy', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Bayesian Inference Semantics: A Modelling System and A Test Suite', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Liên minh nhiều nước Đức: A Modelling System and A Test phòng', 'bg': 'Байезийска семантика на заключенията: система за моделиране и тест комплект', 'nl': 'Bayesian Inference Semantics: een modelleringssysteem en een testsuite', 'da': 'Bayesian Inference Semantics: Et modelleringssystem og en testsuite', 'hr': 'Semantika Bayesijske infekcije: Modelirani sustav i testni paket', 'de': 'Bayesian Inference Semantics: Ein Modellierungssystem und eine Testsuite', 'id': 'Bayesian Inference Semantics: A Modelling System and A Test Suite', 'ko': '베일스 추리어의: 모델링 시스템과 테스트 세트', 'fa': 'سیستم مدل\u200cسازی و یک سویت آزمایش', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Semantics of Bayesia Introduction: A Modelling System and A Test', 'tr': 'Bayesian küçük semantik: A Modeling System and A Test Suite', 'sq': 'Bayesian Inference Semantics: A Modelling System and A Test Suite', 'am': 'የባያየስዊ ምርጫዎች ስሜናቲክ: A Modelling System and A Test Suite', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'বেয়েসিয়ান ইনফেরেন্স সেমান্টিক: একটি মডেলিং সিস্টেম এবং একটি পরীক্ষা সাইট', 'ca': "Semàtics Bayesians d'Inferència: Un sistema de modelació i un suite de prova", 'cs': 'Bayesovská inferenční sémantika: modelovací systém a testovací sada', 'bs': 'Semantika Bejzijske infekcije: Modelirani sistem i testni paket', 'et': 'Bayesi järelduste semantika: modelleerimissüsteem ja testikomplekt', 'fi': 'Bayesian inference semantiikka: mallinnusjärjestelmä ja testisarja', 'az': 'Bayesian Inference Semantik: Modelling System və A Test Suit', 'jv': 'bayesyan Info semanti: A model System lan A Test Suit', 'he': 'סמנטיקת אינפרנציה בייסיאנית: מערכת דגמניות וסוויט מבחן', 'sk': 'Bayezijska semantika inference: sistem modeliranja in testni komplet', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Bayesian Inference Semantics: A Modeling System and A Test Suite'}
{'en': 'We present BIS, a Bayesian Inference Semantics, for probabilistic reasoning in natural language. The current system is based on the framework of Bernardy et al. (2018), but departs from it in important respects. BIS makes use of Bayesian learning for inferring a hypothesis from premises. This involves estimating the probability of the hypothesis, given the data supplied by the premises of an argument. It uses a syntactic parser to generate typed syntactic structures that serve as input to a model generation system. Sentences are interpreted compositionally to probabilistic programs, and the corresponding truth values are estimated using sampling methods. BIS successfully deals with various probabilistic semantic phenomena, including frequency adverbs, generalised quantifiers, generics, and vague predicates. It performs well on a number of interesting probabilistic reasoning tasks. It also sustains most classically valid inferences (instantiation, de Morgan’s laws, etc.). To test BIS we have built an experimental test suite with examples of a range of probabilistic and classical inference patterns.', 'ar': 'نقدم BIS ، دلالات الاستدلال البايزي ، للتفكير الاحتمالي في اللغة الطبيعية. يعتمد النظام الحالي على إطار عمل Bernardy et al. (2018) لكنه يخرج عنها في نواحٍ مهمة. يستخدم BIS التعلم البايزي لاستنتاج فرضية من المباني. يتضمن هذا تقدير احتمالية الفرضية ، بالنظر إلى البيانات التي توفرها مباني الحجة. يستخدم محللًا نحويًا لإنشاء هياكل نحوية مكتوبة تعمل كمدخل لنظام توليد النموذج. يتم تفسير الجمل بشكل تركيبي للبرامج الاحتمالية ، ويتم تقدير قيم الحقيقة المقابلة باستخدام طرق أخذ العينات. يتعامل BIS بنجاح مع مختلف الظواهر الدلالية الاحتمالية ، بما في ذلك ظروف التردد ، والمحددات الكمية المعممة ، والأدوية الجنيسة ، والمسندات الغامضة. يؤدي أداءً جيدًا في عدد من مهام التفكير الاحتمالي المثيرة للاهتمام. كما أنه يحافظ على الاستدلالات الأكثر كلاسيكية (إنشاء مثيل ، وقوانين دي مورغان ، وما إلى ذلك). لاختبار BIS قمنا ببناء مجموعة اختبار تجريبية مع أمثلة لمجموعة من أنماط الاستدلال الاحتمالية والكلاسيكية.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos o BIS, uma Semântica de Inferência Bayesiana, para raciocínio probabilístico em linguagem natural. O sistema atual é baseado na estrutura de Bernardy et al. (2018), mas se afasta dele em aspectos importantes. O BIS faz uso do aprendizado bayesiano para inferir uma hipótese a partir de premissas. Isso envolve estimar a probabilidade da hipótese, dados os dados fornecidos pelas premissas de um argumento. Ele usa um analisador sintático para gerar estruturas sintáticas tipadas que servem como entrada para um sistema de geração de modelo. As sentenças são interpretadas composicionalmente para programas probabilísticos, e os valores de verdade correspondentes são estimados usando métodos de amostragem. O BIS lida com sucesso com vários fenômenos semânticos probabilísticos, incluindo advérbios de frequência, quantificadores generalizados, genéricos e predicados vagos. Ele tem um bom desempenho em várias tarefas interessantes de raciocínio probabilístico. Ela também sustenta a maioria das inferências classicamente válidas (instanciação, leis de Morgan, etc.). Para testar o BIS, construímos um conjunto de testes experimental com exemplos de uma variedade de padrões de inferência probabilísticos e clássicos.', 'fr': "Nous présentons BIS, une sémantique d'inférence bayésienne, pour le raisonnement probabiliste en langage naturel. Le système actuel est basé sur le cadre de Bernardy et al. (2018), mais s'en éloigne sur des points importants. Le BIS utilise l'apprentissage bayésien pour déduire une hypothèse à partir de prémisses. Cela implique d'estimer la probabilité de l'hypothèse, compte tenu des données fournies par les prémisses d'un argument. Il utilise un analyseur syntaxique pour générer des structures syntaxiques typées qui servent d'entrée à un système de génération de modèles. Les phrases sont interprétées en fonction de la composition des programmes probabilistes, et les valeurs de vérité correspondantes sont estimées à l'aide de méthodes d'échantillonnage. BIS traite avec succès divers phénomènes sémantiques probabilistes, y compris les adverbes de fréquence, les quantificateurs généralisés, les génériques et les prédicats vagues. Il s'acquitte bien d'un certain nombre de tâches intéressantes de raisonnement probabiliste. Il soutient également la plupart des déductions classiquement valides (instanciation, lois de Morgan, etc.). Pour tester BIS, nous avons créé une suite de tests expérimentaux avec des exemples d'une gamme de modèles d'inférence probabilistes et classiques.", 'es': 'Presentamos BIS, una semántica de inferencia bayesiana, para el razonamiento probabilístico en lenguaje natural. El sistema actual se basa en el marco de Bernardy et al. (2018), pero se aparta de él en aspectos importantes. El BIS utiliza el aprendizaje bayesiano para inferir una hipótesis a partir de las premisas. Esto implica estimar la probabilidad de la hipótesis, dados los datos proporcionados por las premisas de un argumento. Utiliza un analizador sintáctico para generar estructuras sintácticas mecanografiadas que sirven como entrada a un sistema de generación de modelos. Las oraciones se interpretan de manera compositiva según programas probabilísticos, y los valores de verdad correspondientes se estiman mediante métodos de muestreo. El BIS trata con éxito varios fenómenos semánticos probabilísticos, incluidos los adverbios de frecuencia, los cuantificadores generalizados, los genéricos y los predicados vagos. Se desempeña bien en una serie de tareas interesantes de razonamiento probabilístico. También sostiene la mayoría de las inferencias válidas clásicamente (instanciación, leyes de Morgan, etc.). Para probar BIS, hemos creado un conjunto de pruebas experimentales con ejemplos de una gama de patrones de inferencia probabilísticos y clásicos.', 'ja': '自然言語における確率論的推論のためのBIS、ベイズ推論セマンティクスを提示します。 現在のシステムはBernardy et al .( 2018)の枠組みに基づいているが、重要な点でそれから逸脱している。 BISは、前提から仮説を推論するためにベイズ学習を利用している。 これには、引数の前提によって提供されるデータを考慮して、仮説の確率を推定することが含まれます。 構文解析器を使用して、モデル生成システムへの入力として機能する型付けされた構文構造を生成します。 文は、確率的プログラムに構成的に解釈され、対応する真理値は、サンプリング法を使用して推定される。 BISは、頻度の副詞、一般化された量化子、ジェネリック、および曖昧な述語を含む、さまざまな確率的意味論的現象をうまく扱う。 これは、いくつかの興味深い確率的推論タスクで優れたパフォーマンスを発揮します。 また、最も古典的に有効な推論（インスタンス化、ド・モルガンの法則など）も支持する。 BISをテストするために、確率的および古典的な推論パターンの範囲の例を含む実験的なテストスイートを構築しました。', 'hi': 'हम प्राकृतिक भाषा में संभाव्य तर्क के लिए बीआईएस, एक बायेसियन अनुमान शब्दार्थ प्रस्तुत करते हैं। वर्तमान प्रणाली बर्नार्डी एट अल (2018) के ढांचे पर आधारित है, लेकिन महत्वपूर्ण मामलों में इससे प्रस्थान करती है। बीआईएस परिसर से एक परिकल्पना का अनुमान लगाने के लिए बायेसियन सीखने का उपयोग करता है। इसमें परिकल्पना की संभावना का अनुमान लगाना शामिल है, एक तर्क के परिसर द्वारा आपूर्ति किए गए डेटा को देखते हुए। यह टाइप किए गए वाक्यात्मक संरचनाओं को उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक वाक्यात्मक पार्सर का उपयोग करता है जो एक मॉडल पीढ़ी प्रणाली के इनपुट के रूप में कार्य करता है। वाक्यों को संभाव्य कार्यक्रमों के लिए रचनात्मक रूप से व्याख्या की जाती है, और इसी सत्य मूल्यों का अनुमान नमूना विधियों का उपयोग करके लगाया जाता है। बीआईएस सफलतापूर्वक आवृत्ति क्रियाविशेषण, सामान्यीकृत क्वांटिफायर, जेनेरिक और अस्पष्ट विधेय सहित विभिन्न संभाव्य शब्दार्थ घटनाओं से निपटता है। यह कई दिलचस्प संभाव्य तर्क कार्यों पर अच्छी तरह से प्रदर्शन करता है। यह सबसे शास्त्रीय रूप से मान्य अनुमानों (इंस्टेंटेशन, डी मॉर्गन के कानूनों, आदि) को भी बनाए रखता है। बीआईएस का परीक्षण करने के लिए हमने संभाव्य और शास्त्रीय अनुमान पैटर्न की एक श्रृंखला के उदाहरणों के साथ एक प्रयोगात्मक परीक्षण सूट बनाया है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем BIS, семантику байесовских умозаключений, для вероятностного рассуждения на естественном языке. Существующая система основана на рамках Bernardy et al. (2018), но отходит от нее в важных аспектах. БИС использует байесовское обучение для вывода гипотезы из предпосылок. Это включает в себя оценку вероятности гипотезы, учитывая данные, представленные предпосылками аргумента. Он использует синтаксический парсер для генерации типизированных синтаксических структур, которые служат в качестве входных данных для системы генерации моделей. Предложения интерпретируются композиционно к вероятностным программам, а соответствующие значения истины оцениваются методами выборки. БИС успешно справляется с различными вероятностными семантическими явлениями, включая частотные наречия, обобщенные квантификаторы, дженерики и расплывчатые предикаты. Он хорошо справляется с рядом интересных задач вероятностного рассуждения. Он также поддерживает большинство классически действительных выводов (инстанцирование, законы де Моргана и т.д.). Для проверки BIS мы построили экспериментальный тестовый набор с примерами ряда вероятностных и классических шаблонов вывода.', 'zh': '臣等建BIS,一贝叶斯推理语义学,施于自然语言中概率推理。 今之统,Bernardy et al. (2018)之框架,而偏于要者也。 BIS以贝叶斯学推假设。 此度伪设之概率,给定论前提之数也。 其用语法解析器以成类型化语法结构,以为系统之输。 句以组解为概率程,而以采样度其真值。 BIS成治诸概率语义,兼频率副词,广义量词,泛型模糊谓词。 其在众趣概率推理见善。 又多持经典有效者推论(例化,德摩根定律等)。 试BIS,构一实验试套件,其一系概率经推理模式之示例。', 'ga': 'Cuirimid BIS, Séimeantaic Tátail Bayesian i láthair, le haghaidh réasúnú dóchúlachta i dteanga nádúrtha. Tá an córas reatha bunaithe ar chreat Bernardy et al. (2018), ach imíonn sé uaidh ar bhealaí tábhachtacha. Úsáideann BIS foghlaim Bayesian chun hipitéis a bhaint as áitribh. Is éard atá i gceist leis seo ná meastachán a dhéanamh ar dhóchúlacht na hipitéise, i bhfianaise na sonraí a sholáthraíonn áitreabh argóint. Úsáideann sé parsálaí comhréire chun struchtúir chomhréire clóscríofa a ghiniúint a fheidhmíonn mar ionchur i gcóras giniúna samhla. Déantar abairtí a léirmhíniú go comhdhéanamh do chláir dóchúlachta, agus déantar na luachanna fírinne comhfhreagracha a mheas trí úsáid a bhaint as modhanna samplála. Déileálann BIS go rathúil le feiniméin shéimeantacha dóchúlachta éagsúla, lena n-áirítear adverbs minicíochta, cainníochtaithe ginearálaithe, cineálacha, agus tuar doiléir. Feidhmíonn sé go maith ar roinnt tascanna réasúnaíochta dóchúlachta suimiúla. Coinníonn sé freisin an chuid is mó de na tátail atá bailí go clasaiceach (an tionscnamh, dlíthe de Morgan, etc.). Chun BIS a thástáil, tá sraith tástála turgnamhach tógtha againn le samplaí de raon patrún tátail dóchúlachta agus clasaiceach.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια Μπεγιεζική Σημασία Συμπερασμάτων, για πιθανολογική συλλογιστική στη φυσική γλώσσα. Το σημερινό σύστημα βασίζεται στο πλαίσιο του Bernardy et al. (2018), αλλά αποκλίνει από αυτό σε σημαντικές πτυχές. Η BIS χρησιμοποιεί την Bayesian μάθηση για να συναχθεί μια υπόθεση από τις εγκαταστάσεις. Αυτό περιλαμβάνει την εκτίμηση της πιθανότητας της υπόθεσης, δεδομένου των δεδομένων που παρέχονται από τις προϋποθέσεις ενός επιχειρήματος. Χρησιμοποιεί έναν συντακτικό αναλυτή για να δημιουργήσει πληκτρολογημένες συντακτικές δομές που χρησιμεύουν ως εισαγωγή σε ένα σύστημα δημιουργίας μοντέλων. Οι προτάσεις ερμηνεύονται σύνθετα σε πιθανολογικά προγράμματα και οι αντίστοιχες τιμές αλήθειας υπολογίζονται χρησιμοποιώντας μεθόδους δειγματοληψίας. Η BIS ασχολείται επιτυχώς με διάφορα πιθανολογικά σημασιολογικά φαινόμενα, συμπεριλαμβανομένων επιρρίφων συχνότητας, γενικευμένων ποσοτικών συντελεστών, γενικών και αόριστων υπαρκτών. Λειτουργεί καλά σε μια σειρά από ενδιαφέροντα καθήκοντα πιθανολογικής συλλογιστικής. Υποστηρίζει επίσης τα πιο κλασικά έγκυρα συμπεράσματα (στιγμιαία, νόμοι του ντε Μόργκαν κ.λπ.). Για να εξετάσουμε την BIS έχουμε δημιουργήσει μια πειραματική σειρά δοκιμών με παραδείγματα μιας σειράς πιθανών και κλασικών προτύπων συμπερασμάτων.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a BIS-t, egy bayesiai inferencia szemantikát, a valószínűsíthető érvelésre a természetes nyelvben. A jelenlegi rendszer Bernardy et al. (2018) keretein alapul, de fontos szempontból eltér tőle. A BIS a bayesiai tanulást használja a helyiségekből való következtetésre. Ez magában foglalja a hipotézis valószínűségének becslését, figyelembe véve az érv alapján szolgáltatott adatokat. Egy szintaktikus elemzőt használ, hogy megadott szintaktikus struktúrákat generáljon, amelyek bemenetként szolgálnak egy modell generáló rendszer. A mondatokat kompozíciósan valószínűsíthető programokhoz értelmezik, és a megfelelő igazságértékeket mintavételi módszerekkel becsülik. A BIS sikeresen foglalkozik különböző valószínűségi szemantikai jelenségekkel, beleértve a frekvenciahatározókat, az általánosított számszerűsítőket, a generikusokat és a homályos predikátumokat. Jól teljesít számos érdekes valószínűségi érvelési feladatot. A legtöbb klasszikusan érvényes következtetést is fenntartja (instantiation, de Morgan törvényei stb.). A BIS teszteléséhez egy kísérleti tesztcsomagot építettünk fel, amely számos valószínűségi és klasszikus következtetési mintát tartalmaz.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ვიყენებთ BIS-ს, ბაიზიანური სემანტიკის ინფერენცია, პირველური ენაში შესაბამისი პარამენტიკისთვის. მიმდინარე სისტემა ბერნაპდი et al-ის ფრამეტრიდან დაბაზიან. (2018) მაგრამ მისი მნიშვნელოვანი განმავლობაში გადასვლა. BIS გამოიყენება ბაიზიანის სწავლებას, რომელიც პრემიზიდან ჰიპოტეზას გადატანა. ეს არის ჰიპოტეზის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც მონაცემები, რომელიც არგუმენტის პრომენტებით დაეხმარებული მონაცემები. ის გამოყენება სინტექტიკური პასუტერის სინტექტიკური სტრუქტურების შექმნა, რომელიც მოდელის შექმნა სისტემის შენახვა. სიტყვები კომპოზიციოლურად შესაბამისი პროგრამებისთვის გარგებულია, და შესაბამისი მნიშვნელობის მნიშვნელობა გამოყენებულია, რომელიც გამოყენებული BIS წარმატებით განსხვავებული პრობილისტიკური სმენტიკური ფანომენტების შესახებ, როგორც წარმატებულება, გენერალიზებული კვანტატიფიკატები, გენერიკები და გაგური პრედიკატები ეს ძალიან საინტერესო შესაბამისი რაოდენობის რაოდენობაში მუშაობა. ეს ასევე უფრო კლასიკურად მნიშვნელოვანი ინფრენციები (ინტენციაცია, დე მოპდანის законодательства და ა.შ.). BIS-ის ტესტისთვის ჩვენ შევქმნა ექსპერიმენტალური ტესტის სუტი, რომელიც მაგალითად შესაბამისი და კლასიკური ინფერიციის მონაცემებების მაგალითად.', 'it': "Presentiamo BIS, un Semantics Bayesian Inference, per ragionamento probabilistico nel linguaggio naturale. Il sistema attuale si basa sul quadro di Bernardy et al. (2018), ma si allontana da esso per aspetti importanti. BIS fa uso dell'apprendimento bayesiano per dedurre un'ipotesi dalle premesse. Ciò comporta la stima della probabilità dell'ipotesi, dati i dati forniti dalle premesse di un argomento. Utilizza un parser sintattico per generare strutture sintattiche digitate che servono da input per un sistema di generazione di modelli. Le frasi sono interpretate compositivamente a programmi probabilistici, e i corrispondenti valori di verità sono stimati utilizzando metodi di campionamento. BIS si occupa con successo di vari fenomeni semantici probabilistici, tra cui avverbi di frequenza, quantificatori generalizzati, generici e predicati vaghi. Svolge bene una serie di interessanti compiti di ragionamento probabilistico. Sostiene anche la maggior parte delle inferenze classicamente valide (istanziazione, leggi di Morgan, ecc.). Per testare BIS abbiamo costruito una suite sperimentale di test con esempi di una serie di modelli di inferenza probabilistica e classica.", 'lt': 'Mes pristatome BIS, Bayesian Inference Semantics, kad būtų galima pagrįsti natūralia kalba. Dabartinė sistema grindžiama Bernardy et al. sistema (2018 m.), tačiau svarbiais aspektais nuo jos nukrypsta. BIS naudojasi Bayesian mokymu, kad būtų galima daryti hipotezę iš patalpų. Tai apima hipotezės tikimybės įvertinimą, atsižvelgiant į argumento patalpose pateiktus duomenis. Ji naudoja sintaksinį analizatorių, kad generuotų tipuojamą sintaksinę struktūrą, kuri naudojama kaip modelio gamybos sistemos įvestis. Nuorodos interpretuojamos pagal sudėtį į probabilistines programas, o atitinkamos tiesos vertės apskaičiuojamos naudojant mėginių ėmimo metodus. BIS sėkmingai sprendžia įvairius probabilistinius semantinius reiškinius, įskaitant dažnio nepageidaujamus reiškinius, generalizuotus kiekybinius rodiklius, generinius rodiklius ir neapibrėžtus rodiklius. Jis gerai atlieka keletą įdomių probabilistinių pagrįstumo užduočių. Ji taip pat grindžiama labiausiai klasikinėmis išvadomis (instanciacija, de Morgano įstatymai ir t. t.). Siekdami išbandyti BIS sukūrėme eksperimentinį bandymų rinkinį su įvairių probabilistinių ir klasikinių išvadų modelių pavyzdžiais.', 'mk': 'Презентираме БИС, Бејезиска инференциска семантика, за веројатно размислување на природен јазик. The current system is based on the framework of Bernardy et al. (2018), but departs from it in important respects.  БИС го користи Бејезиското учење за да донесе хипотеза од просториите. Ова вклучува проценка на веројатноста на хипотезата, со оглед на податоците што ги обезбедуваат условите на аргументот. Користи синтактички анализатор за генерирање на типирани синтактички структури кои служат како влог во систем на генерација на модели. Речениците се интерпретираат композиционално на веројатни програми, а соодветните вредности на вистината се проценуваат користејќи методи на примерок. БИС успешно се справува со различни веројатни семантични феномени, вклучувајќи и фреквентни аварберби, генерализирани квантификатори, генерални и нејасни предикати. Добро работи на неколку интересни веројатни задачи за размислување. Исто така, се одржуваат најкласички валидни инференции (институција, законите на Де Морган итн.). За да го тестираме БИС изградивме експериментален тестовен апартман со примери на голем број веројатни и класични конференциски шеми.', 'kk': 'Біз BIS-ді, байезиялық инференциялық семантикалық, табиғи тілде маңызды сезім үшін таңдаймыз. Қолданыстағы жүйе Бернарди эл. эл. бағдарламасының негізінде тұрады, бірақ оның маңызды сәйкестіктеріне қалды. BIS презентациялардың гипотезиясын басқару үшін Байезия оқытуын қолданады. Бұл гипотезаның маңыздылығын бағалау мүмкіндігі, аргументтің премияларынан берілген деректерді. Бұл үлгі құру жүйесіне келтірілген синтактикалық құрылғыларды құру үшін синтактикалық талдаушы қолданылады. Сөздер маңызды бағдарламаларға композициялық түрлендіріледі, мәліметтерді түрлендіру әдістерімен қолданылады. BIS сәтті әртүрлі ықтималдық семантикалық пайдаланулармен, жиілік adverbs, жалпы квантификациялық, генерикалық және көлемі предикаттар болып келеді. Бұл бірнеше қызықты маңыздылық тапсырмаларды жақсы орындайды. Сонымен қатар, классикалық және дұрыс жағдайларды сақтайды. BIS сынақтарын тексеру үшін біз мәселелердің және классикалық инференциялық үлгілерінің мәселелерін жасадық.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan BIS, Semantik Inferensi Bayesian, untuk alasan kemungkinan dalam bahasa semulajadi. Sistem semasa berdasarkan kerangka Bernardy et al. (2018), tetapi meninggalkannya dalam aspek penting. BIS menggunakan belajar Bayesia untuk menyimpulkan hipotesis dari tempat. Ini melibatkan penghargaan kemungkinan hipotesis, mengingat data yang diberikan oleh premis argumen. Ia menggunakan penghurai sintaktik untuk menghasilkan struktur sintaktik ditaip yang berkhidmat sebagai input ke sistem generasi model. Hukuman diterjemahkan secara komposisi kepada program kemungkinan, dan nilai kebenaran yang sepadan diharapkan menggunakan kaedah pengumpulan. BIS berjaya berurusan dengan beberapa fenomena semantik kemungkinan, termasuk adverbs frekuensi, kuantifikasi umum, generik, dan predikat yang tidak jelas. Ia berjalan dengan baik pada beberapa tugas kemungkinan yang menarik. Ia juga mengandungi kesimpulan yang paling sah klasik (instantiasi, undang-undang de Morgan, dll.). Untuk menguji BIS kami telah membina suite ujian percubaan dengan contoh julat corak kemungkinan dan kesimpulan klasik.', 'ml': "നമ്മള്\u200d ബിഐഎസിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു ബെയിസ്യന്\u200d അഭിപ്രായം സെമാന്റിക്സ്, സ്വാഭാഷയിലെ സാധ്യഭാഷയില്\u200d സംസാരി ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ സിസ്റ്റം ബെര്\u200dണാര്\u200dഡി എറ്റ് അല്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമാണ്. 2018, പക്ഷെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത്തില്\u200d ന ബിഐഎസ് ബെയിസ്യന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിന് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു ഹൈപ്പിറ്റസിസിനെ പ്രോഗിപ്പിക്കാനാണ്. ഇത് ഹൈപ്പിറ്റസിസിന്റെ സാധ്യതയാണെന്ന് കണക്കാക്കുന്നത്, ഒരു വാദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന്റെ മുന്\u200dപില്\u200d നിന്ന് ഉപയോ ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d തലമുറയുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിലേക്ക് സേവിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സിനിട്ടാക്ടിക്ക് ടൈപ്പ് ചെയ്ത സിന്\u200dടാക്റ് സാധ്യതയുള്ള പ്രോഗ്രാമുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ശിക്ഷ വ്യക്തിപ്രഖ്യാപിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ മൂല്ല്യങ്ങള്\u200d ടാമ്പിള്\u200d രീ ബിഎസ് വിജയിച്ചു വ്യത്യസ്തമായ സെമാന്റിക്ക് സംഭവിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നുണ്ട്, ഫ്രെയിന്\u200dസി ആവർപ്പുകളുമായി, ജനറലിക്കുന്ന വിധികള്\u200d, സാധ കുറച്ച് രസകരമായ കാര്യങ്ങളില്\u200d അത് നന്നായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു. It also sustains most classically valid inferences (instantiation, de Morgan's laws, etc.).  ബിഐഎസ് പരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പരീക്ഷണ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്\u200dറെ സ്യൂട്ട് ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിട്ടുണ്ട്. ഒരു സാധ്യതയുള്ള", 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw BIS, Semanti ta’ Inferenza Bajesjana, għal raġunament probabilistiku fil-lingwa naturali. The current system is based on the framework of Bernardy et al. (2018), but departs from it in important respects.  BIS jagħmel użu mit-tagħlim Bayesian biex tiġi inferita ipoteżi mill-bini. Dan jinvolvi l-istima tal-probabbiltà tal-ipoteżi, minħabba d-dejta pprovduta mill-bini ta’ argument. Tuża analizzatur sintetiku biex tiġġenera strutturi sintetiċi tat-tip li jservu bħala input għal sistema ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ mudell. Is-sentenzi huma interpretati b’mod kompożittiv għal programmi probabilistiċi, u l-valuri korrispondenti tal-verità huma stmati bl-użu ta’ metodi ta’ teħid ta’ kampjuni. BIS jittratta b’suċċess diversi fenomeni semantiċi probabilistiċi, inklużi avverbs ta’ frekwenza, kwantifikaturi ġeneralizzati, ġeneriċi, u predikati vagi. Hija twettaq tajjeb fuq għadd ta’ kompiti interessanti ta’ raġunament probabilistiku. Hija ssostni wkoll l-aktar inferenzi klassikament validi (istanzjazzjoni, il-liġijiet ta’ de Morgan, eċċ.). Biex jittestjaw il-BIS inbnew sett ta’ testijiet sperimentali b’eżempji ta’ firxa ta’ mudelli ta’ inferenza probabilistiċi u klassiċi.', 'mn': 'Бид байгалийн хэл дээрх магадлал ойлголтын тулд Байзийн Инференцийн Semantics-г бий болгодог. Одоо байгаа систем Бернарди и аль хэлбэрээр суурилсан. (2018) Гэхдээ үүнийг чухал хүндрэлтэй холбоотой. BIS нь байгалийн суралцах суралцаа ашиглаж байдаг. Энэ нь таамаглалын магадлалыг тооцоолж, аргументын орон зайд өгөгдлийн тооцоолж байна. Энэ нь бичигдсэн синтактикийн хуваагч ашигладаг. Загварын үйлдвэрлэлийн системд орлуулах боломжтой синтактикийн бүтэц үүсгэдэг. Хэрэглэгүүд магадлал хөтөлбөр болон харьцуулсан үнэн утгатай адилхан үлгэрийн арга ашиглаж байдаг. BIS нь олон магадлал боломжтой семантик явдалтай амжилттай хамтран ажилладаг. Энэ нь ихэвчлэн адал явдал, ерөнхийлөгчийн хэмжээсүүд, генерал болон тодорхойлолтой хэмжээсүүдтэй хамтран ажилладаг. Энэ нь маш сонирхолтой магадлал ойлголтын ажил дээр ажилладаг. Энэ нь мөн хамгийн сонгодог хэмжээсүүдийг хадгалдаг. BIS-г шалгахын тулд бид туршилтын шинжлэх ухааны жишээлүүдийг бүтээсэн.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer BIS, ein Bayesian Inference Semantics, for sannsynlig rasjon i naturspråk. Den gjeldande system et er basert på rammeverket av Bernardy et al. (2018), men avsluttar seg frå han i viktig respekt. BIS gjer bruk av Bayesian læring for å få ein hipotese frå område. Dette involverer estimating av sannsynligheten på hypotesien, gitt data oppgjeven av område av eit argument. Det brukar ein syntaksisk tolkar for å laga skrivne syntaksiske strukturar som tjener som inndata til eit modellegenereringssystem. Uttrykk vert tolka saman til sannsynlige program, og tilsvarande sannsynlighetsverdiane er estimerte med samplingsmetodar. BIS arbeider med forskjellige sannsynlige semantiske fenomenar, inkludert frekvensadverber, generelliserte kvantifikatorar, generiske og vague predikatar. Det utfører godt på mange interessante sannsynlige oppgåver. Det inneheld også mest klassisk gyldige inferensen (instantiasjon, de Morgan sin lov osv.). For å test a BIS har vi bygd eit eksperimentell test suite med eksemplar av eit rekkje av sannsynlige og klassiske infeksjonsmaterne.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy BIS, Bayesowską semantykę wniosków, dla prawdopodobieństwa rozumowania w języku naturalnym. Obecny system opiera się na ramach Bernardy i al. (2018), ale odchodzi od niego pod ważnymi względami. BIS wykorzystuje naukę bayesowską do wnioskowania hipotezy z założeń. Polega to na oszacowaniu prawdopodobieństwa hipotezy, biorąc pod uwagę dane dostarczone przez założenia argumentu. Wykorzystuje parser składni do generowania typowych struktur składni, które służą jako wejście do systemu generowania modeli. Zdania są interpretowane kompozycyjnie do programów probabilistycznych, a odpowiednie wartości prawdy są oszacowane metodami próbkowania. BIS z powodzeniem zajmuje się różnymi prawdopodobnymi zjawiskami semantycznymi, w tym przysłówkami częstotliwości, uogólnionymi kwantyfikatorami, generykami i niejasnymi predykatami. Dobrze sprawdza się w szeregu interesujących zadań prawdopodobnego rozumowania. Podtrzymuje również najbardziej klasycznie ważne wnioski (instancja, prawa de Morgana itp.). Aby przetestować BIS zbudowaliśmy eksperymentalny zestaw testów z przykładami szeregu prawdopodobnych i klasycznych wzorców wnioskowania.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm BIS, o Semantică bayeziană de inferență, pentru raționamentul probabilistic în limbajul natural. Sistemul actual se bazează pe cadrul lui Bernardy et al. (2018), dar se îndepărtează de el în aspecte importante. BIS utilizează învățarea bayeziană pentru deducerea unei ipoteze din premise. Aceasta presupune estimarea probabilității ipotezei, având în vedere datele furnizate de premisele unui argument. Utilizează un parser sintactic pentru a genera structuri sintactice tipărite care servesc ca intrare într-un sistem de generare de modele. Sentințele sunt interpretate compozițional în programe probabilistice, iar valorile adevărului corespunzătoare sunt estimate folosind metode de eșantionare. BIS se ocupă cu succes de diferite fenomene semantice probabilistice, inclusiv adverbe de frecvență, cuantificatoare generalizate, generice și predicate vagi. Se desfășoară bine pe o serie de sarcini interesante de raționament probabilistic. De asemenea, susține cele mai clasice deducții valabile (instanțiere, legile lui Morgan, etc.). Pentru a testa BIS am construit o suită experimentală de testare cu exemple de modele de inferență probabilistică și clasică.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo BIS, bejzijski semantik, za verovatno razmišljanje na prirodnom jeziku. Trenutni sistem se temelji na okviru Bernardy et al. (2018), ali odlazi od njega u važnim poštovanjima. BIS koristi Bayesiansko učenje za inficiranje hipoteze iz prostora. To uključuje procjenu verovatnosti hipoteze, s obzirom na podatke dostavljene prostorijama argumenta. Koristi sintaktički analizator kako bi stvorio napisane sintaktičke strukture koje služe kao ulaz u sistem model a generacije. Pravila su kompozicionalno interpretisana na verovatne programe, a odgovarajuće vrijednosti istine procjenjuju se koristeći metode uzorka. BIS se uspješno bavi različitim verovatnim semantičkim fenomenima, uključujući reklame frekvencije, generalizovane kvantifikatore, generike i nevažne predikate. To dobro izvodi na broju zanimljivih verovatnih zadataka za razumanje. Također održava najklasičnije vrijedne inferencije (instancija, zakoni de Morgan itd.). Da bismo testirali BIS, izgradili smo eksperimentalni test apartman sa primjerima niza verovatnih i klasičnih uzorka infekcije.', 'si': 'අපි බේසියාන් සෙමාන්ටික්ස් එකක්, ස්වභාවික භාෂාවට ප්\u200dරතිශ්නය විශ්වාසිකයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිශ්නය කරනව ප්\u200dරස්ථාන පද්ධතිය බර්නර්ඩි එට් ල් ගේ පද්ධතියට අධාරිත වෙනවා. (2018), ඒත් ඒකෙන් වැදගත් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dර BIS එක බේසියාන් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වෙනුවෙන් පාවිච්චි කරනවා. මේක අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාසය ගැන අනුමාණය කරනවා, ත්\u200dරක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් දෙන්න තොරතුරු දෙන්න. Name වාක්ය සම්පූර්ණ විදියට සම්පූර්ණ විදියට සම්පූර්ණ විදියට සම්පූර්ණ විදියට සම්පූර්ණ විදි BIS සමහරවිට විවිධ සංභාවිත සිමාන්තික සිමාන්තික සිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සමග වැඩ කරනවා, සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරනවා, සාමාන්\u200dය විශ ඒක හොඳින් වැඩ කරනවා සංභාවිත විශ්වාසයෙන් හොඳ වැඩ කරන්න. ඒක තමයි ගොඩක් ලාස්ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාසිකයෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙනවා. BIS පරීක්ෂණා කරන්න අපි පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණ සූට් එකක් හදලා තියෙන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dයතාවක් සහ සාමාන්\u200dයතාවක් සහ සාමා', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo wadaa BIS oo ah Bayesian Inference Semantics, sabab suurtagal ah oo ku qoran afka dabiicadda ah. The current system is based on the framework of Bernardy et al. (2018), but departs from it in important respects.  BIS wuxuu isticmaalaa barashada Bayesian si ay uga fekeraan fikrada tuurka. Taasi waxay ku saabsan tahay qiimeynta suurtagalka munaafiqiinta, marka lagu siiyo macluumaadka ay ku qoran yihiin howlaha muran. Waxay isticmaaltaa baaritaanka syntactika si uu u sameeyo dhismo la qoray oo u adeega sida input u sameeyo nidaamka muusikada. Xaaladaha waxaa lagu turjumaa si kamid ah barnaamijyo suurtagal ah, qiimaha runta waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa isticmaalka qaababka sameynta. BIS wuxuu suurtagal ahaan u macaamiloodaa waxyaabo kala duduwan oo suurtagal ah, kuwaas oo ka mid ah shahaadada dhaqdhaqaalaha, xisaabta geneeral, iyo wax baas ah. Wuxuu si wanaagsan ugu sameeyaa shaqooyin badan oo suurtagal ah oo xiiso leh. Sidoo kale waxaa lagu daryeelaa cudurooyin aad u shaqeeya (tusaale ahaan sharciyada Morgan, etc.) Si a an u imtixaano BIS ayaan u dhisnay hab imtixaan ah oo tusaalayaal ah tusaalooyin kala duduwan oo isbitaal ah.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar BIS, en Bayesian Inference Semantics, för sannolika resonemang i naturligt språk. Det nuvarande systemet bygger på ramen för Bernardy et al. (2018), men avviker från det i viktiga avseenden. BIS använder sig av bayesiskt lärande för att härleda en hypotes från lokaler. Detta innebär att man uppskattar sannolikheten för hypotesen, med tanke på de data som tillhandahålls av premisser för ett argument. Den använder en syntaktisk parser för att generera typskrivna syntaktiska strukturer som fungerar som indata till ett modellgenereringssystem. Meningar tolkas kompositionellt till sannolikhetsprogram, och motsvarande sanningsvärden uppskattas med hjälp av provtagningsmetoder. BIS hanterar framgångsrikt olika sannolikhetsmässiga semantiska fenomen, inklusive frekvensadverb, generaliserade kvantifierare, generiska och vaga predikater. Den presterar bra på ett antal intressanta sannolikhetsmässiga resonemang uppgifter. Den upprätthåller också de flesta klassiskt giltiga slutsatser (instantiering, de Morgans lagar, etc.). För att testa BIS har vi byggt en experimentell testsvit med exempel på en rad sannolika och klassiska inferensmönster.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் பிஎஸ், ஒரு பேயீசியன் பிரச்சனை செமான்டிக்ஸ் காண்பிக்கிறோம், இயல்பான மொழியில் காரணங்களுக்கு. தற்போதைய அமைப்பு பெர்னர்டி மற்றும் அல் சட்டத்தின் அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது, ஆனால் அதை முக்கியமான விகிதத்தில் விட்ட பிஎஸ் பையேசியன் கற்றுக்கொள்ள பயன்படுத்துகிறது மூலங்களிலிருந்து ஒரு ஹைப்பிரசியலை பாதிக்கும். இது ஒரு வார்த்தையின் முன்னிருப்புகளால் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட தகவல் அனுமதிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது கணினியின் சாத்தியமான மதிப் Name வாக்குறுக்கள் சாத்தியமான நிரல்களுக்கு ஒருங்கிணைப்பாக விளக்கப்படுகின்றன, மற்றும் பொருத்தமான உண்மை மதிப்பு பிஎஸ் வெற்றிகரமாக வெற்றிகரமான பாதிப்பு விஷயங்களைக் கொண்டு விளையாடுகிறது, பொதுவாக்கப்பட்ட அளவு, மரபணு மற்றும் குறிப்பிட்ட முன்னோ இது சில சுவாரஸ்யமான வேலைகளில் நன்றாக செய்கிறது. அது பெரும்பாலான செல்லுபடியான நோய்களை பாதுகாக்குகிறது (நேரத்தில், து மோர்கான் விதிகள், மற்றும்) பிஎஸ் சோதிக்க நாம் ஒரு சோதனையான சோதனையின் மூலம் உருவாக்கியுள்ளோம் சாத்தியமான மற்றும் வகுப்பான நோய் முறைகளின் உ', 'ur': 'ہم BIS، ایک Bayesian Inference Semantics کو پیش کرتے ہیں، شائستہ دلیل طبیعی زبان میں۔ موجود سیسٹم Bernardy et al کے فرمیک پر بنیاد ہے، لیکن اس سے اہم احترام کے ساتھ چھوڑ جاتا ہے. بیس نے بیس کی تعلیم کی استعمال کرتا ہے کہ مکان سے ایک فرضی آزاد کرے۔ یہ فرضی کے احتمال کا مطالبہ ہے، اس کے ذریعہ سے ایک دلیل کے مطابق دیے گئے ہیں. یہ ایک سینٹاکتیک پارچر کو استعمال کرتا ہے تایپ کی سینٹاکتیک ساختاریوں کو جوڑنے کے لئے جو ایک موڈل نسل سیسٹم کے اندر اینپیٹ کے طور پر استعمال کرتے ہیں. مفصل محبوب پروگراموں کے ساتھ تفسیر کی جاتی ہیں، اور مطابق حقیقی ارزش سمپل طریقوں کے مطابق تفسیر کی جاتی ہیں. BIS موفقیت کے ساتھ مختلف احتمالات سیمانٹی فائدے کے ساتھ معاملہ کیا گیا ہے، فرکانسی ابلورز کے ساتھ، عمومی کوانتیفر، جنریل، اور غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر یہ بہت اچھا کام کرتا ہے کہ بہت اچھا کام کرتا ہے۔ یہ سب سے زیادہ کلاسیک صاحب اعتبار ہے۔ BIS کی آزمائش کے لئے ہم نے ایک آزمائش تست سوئٹ بنایا ہے کہ ایک طرح کی مثالیں بنائیں کہ شائستہ اور کلاسیک آزمائش پٹرنس کے ذریعے۔', 'uz': "Biz Bayezcha inference Semantiklarni hozir qilamiz, biz asl tildagi sabablar uchun. Joriy tizim Bernardy et al. (2018) yaratilgan asosida, lekin bu muhim darajada chiqqan. BIS buyruqlardan hypothesis o'zgarishga ishlatadi. Bu haqida bog'liq hozirdagi maʼlumotlarni qiymatlashga ega. Name Hujjatlar taʼminlovchi dasturlarga bogʻliq tarjima qilinadi, va qiymatning qiymati sampul usullari yordamida hisoblanadi. BIS muvaffaqiyatli o'zgarishga muvaffaqiyatli o'zgarishga ega bo'lishi mumkin, frequency davlatlari, aniqlangan tizimlar, genetika va vagan prefikrlar. Bu juda qiziqarli bo'lgan narsalarni bajaradi. Ularning ko'pchiligi klassik haqiqiqiy kasalliklarni davom etadi (tashkilotlar, de Morgan qoidalari va etc.) Biz BIS sinov qilish uchun biz bir jarayon sinov moslamani yaratdik, balki ko'pchilik va klassik kasallik shakllari modellari bilan bir misol.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu BIA, một liên minh điểm Bayisian Semantice Semantics, vì trình bày xác suất trong ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Hệ thống hiện tại dựa trên khung hình của Bernardy et al. (ng8), nhưng thay đổi quan trọng. BS sử dụng học tại Bayisian để ám chỉ một giả thuyết từ các cơ sở. Đây là ước tính xác suất của giả thuyết, dựa trên dữ liệu được cung cấp từ cơ sở của một cuộc tranh luận. Nó dùng một phân tách cấu trúc cú pháp để tạo ra cấu trúc cấu trúc cú pháp để nhập vào hệ thống sản xuất mẫu. Câu thần thoại được giải thích theo tỉ lệ với các chương trình thử nghiệm, và giá trị sự thật tương ứng được đánh giá bằng cách lấy mẫu. Tổ Chức lớn đã giải quyết được các hiện tượng theo nguyên tắc hên xui, bao gồm các quảng cáo tần số, số lượng lớn, gien, và những khó khăn mơ hồ. Nó thực hiện tốt với một số công việc lý lẽ xác thực thú vị. Nó cũng chứa đựng ngụ ý hợp lệ nhất (tức thì, luật của Morgan, v. d. Để kiểm tra BIA, chúng tôi đã xây dựng một phòng thí nghiệm với các ví dụ về các mô hình nhận biết xác suất và cổ điển.', 'bg': 'Представяме БИС, Байезийска семантика на заключенията, за вероятностно разсъждаване в естествен език. Настоящата система се основава на рамката на Бернарди и др. (2018), но се отклонява от нея във важни аспекти. BIS използва Байезийското учене за извеждане на хипотеза от предпоставки. Това включва оценка на вероятността за хипотезата, като се имат предвид данните, предоставени от предпоставките на даден аргумент. Той използва синтактичен анализатор, за да генерира типирани синтактични структури, които служат като вход за система за генериране на модели. Изреченията се интерпретират композиционно към вероятностни програми, а съответните стойности на истината се оценяват с помощта на методи за вземане на проби. BIS успешно се занимава с различни вероятни семантични явления, включително честотни adverbи, генерализирани количествители, генерични и неясни предикати. Той изпълнява добре редица интересни задачи за вероятност разсъждаване. Той поддържа и най-класически валидни заключения (инстанция, закони на Морган и т.н.). За да тестваме БИС, изградихме експериментален тест пакет с примери за набор от вероятни и класически модели на заключения.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer BIS, en Bayesian Inference Semantics, for sandsynligvis ræsonnement i naturligt sprog. Det nuværende system er baseret på rammerne af Bernardy et al. (2018), men afviger fra det i vigtige henseender. BIS gør brug af bayesisk læring til at udlede en hypotese fra premisser. Dette indebærer en estimering af sandsynligheden for hypotesen i betragtning af de data, der leveres af præmisserne for et argument. Det bruger en syntaktisk fortolker til at generere indtastede syntaktiske strukturer, der tjener som input til et model generation system. Sætninger fortolkes kompositionelt til sandsynlighedsprogrammer, og de tilsvarende sandhedsværdier estimeres ved hjælp af prøveudtagningsmetoder. BIS beskæftiger sig med forskellige sandsynlighedsmæssige semantiske fænomener, herunder frekvensadverber, generaliserede kvantifiere, generiske og vage prædikater. Det udfører godt på en række interessante sandsynlighedsmæssige ræsonnementsopgaver. Den indeholder også de fleste klassiske gyldige konklusioner (instantiation, de Morgans love osv.). For at teste BIS har vi bygget en eksperimentel testsuite med eksempler på en række sandsynlighedsmønstre og klassiske inferensmønstre.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo BIS, semantiku Bayesijske infekcije, za vjerojatno razumljivanje na prirodnom jeziku. Trenutni sustav se temelji na okviru Bernardy et al. (2018), ali odlazi od njega u važnom pogledu. BIS koristi Bayesiansko učenje za inficiranje hipoteze iz prostora. To uključuje procjenu vjerojatnosti hipoteze, s obzirom na podatke dostavljene prostorijama argumenta. Koristi sintaktički analizator kako bi stvorio napisane sintaktičke strukture koje služe kao ulaz u sistem model a generacije. Pravila su kompozicionalno interpretirana na vjerovatne programe, a odgovarajuće vrijednosti istine procjenjuju se koristeći metode uzorka. BIS se uspješno bavi različitim vjerojatnim semantičkim fenomenima, uključujući reklame učestalosti, generalizirane kvantifikatore, generike i nevažne predikate. To dobro izvodi na broju zanimljivih vjerojatnih zadataka za razumanje. Također održava najklasičnije vrijedne inferencije (instancija, zakoni de Morgan itd.). Da bismo testirali BIS, izgradili smo eksperimentalni test apartman s primjerima niza verovatnih i klasičnih uzorka infekcije.', 'nl': "We presenteren BIS, een Bayesian Inference Semantics, voor probabilistisch redeneren in natuurlijke taal. Het huidige systeem is gebaseerd op het kader van Bernardy et al. (2018), maar wijkt er in belangrijke opzichten van af. BIS maakt gebruik van Bayesiaans leren voor het afleiden van een hypothese vanuit premises. Dit houdt in dat de waarschijnlijkheid van de hypothese wordt geschat, gezien de gegevens die worden verstrekt door de premissen van een argument. Het gebruikt een syntactische parser om getypte syntactische structuren te genereren die dienen als input voor een model generatie systeem. Zinnen worden samengestelde geïnterpreteerd naar probabilistische programma's, en de overeenkomstige waarheidswaarden worden geschat met behulp van steekproefmethoden. BIS behandelt met succes verschillende probabilistische semantische fenomenen, waaronder frequentie bijwoorden, algemene kwantificers, generica en vage predicaten. Het presteert goed op een aantal interessante probabilistische redeneringstaken. Het ondersteunt ook de meest klassiek geldige conclusies (instantiatie, de wetten van de Morgan, enz.). Om BIS te testen hebben we een experimentele testsuite gebouwd met voorbeelden van een reeks probabilistische en klassieke inferentiepatronen.", 'de': 'Wir präsentieren BIS, eine Bayesische Schlussfolgerungssemantik, für probabilistisches Denken in natürlicher Sprache. Das derzeitige System basiert auf dem Rahmen von Bernardy et al. (2018), weicht aber in wichtigen Punkten davon ab. BIS nutzt Bayesisches Lernen, um eine Hypothese aus Prämissen abzuleiten. Dies beinhaltet die Schätzung der Wahrscheinlichkeit der Hypothese angesichts der Daten, die von den Prämissen eines Arguments geliefert werden. Es verwendet einen syntaktischen Parser, um typisierte syntaktische Strukturen zu generieren, die als Eingabe für ein Modellgenerierungssystem dienen. Sätze werden kompositorisch zu probabilistischen Programmen interpretiert und die entsprechenden Wahrheitswerte mit Sampling-Methoden geschätzt. BIS beschäftigt sich erfolgreich mit verschiedenen probabilistischen semantischen Phänomenen, einschließlich Frequenzadverben, generalisierten Quantifizierern, Generika und vagen Prädikaten. Es erfüllt eine Reihe interessanter probabilistischer Argumentationsaufgaben. Es stützt sich auch auf klassisch gültige Schlussfolgerungen (Instanziierung, de Morgansche Gesetze usw.). Um BIS zu testen, haben wir eine experimentelle Testsuite mit Beispielen für eine Reihe probabilistischer und klassischer Inferenzmuster erstellt.', 'fa': 'ما BIS را برای دلیل احتمالاتی در زبان طبیعی پیشنهاد می کنیم. سیستم فعلی بر اساس چهارچوب برناردی و آل (۲۰۱۸) است، ولی با احترام مهم از آن دور می\u200cشود. BIS از یادگیری بایزی استفاده می\u200cکند تا فرضیه\u200cای از محل\u200cها را درآورد. این شامل ارزیابی احتمال فرضیه است، با توجه به داده\u200cها که توسط محل\u200cهای یک ارزیابی داده می\u200cشود. این استفاده از یک بازیگر سنتاکتیک برای تولید ساختارهای سنتاکتیک نوشته که به عنوان ورودی به سیستم تولید مدل می\u200cکنند. جمله\u200cها به صورت تفسیر به برنامه\u200cهای احتمالات تفسیر می\u200cشوند، و ارزش\u200cهای حقیقت با استفاده از روش\u200cهای نمونه\u200cبندی تخمین می\u200cشوند. BIS با موفقیت با پدیده\u200cهای احتمالات semantic مختلف، شامل آفرینش\u200cهای فرکانس، مقدار\u200cشناسایی\u200cهای ژنرال، ژنرال و غیر قابل توجه است. این در تعداد کارهای احتمالات منطقی جالب انجام می دهد. همچنین بیشترین آلودگی\u200cهای کلاسیک قابل استفاده می\u200cکند. برای آزمایش BIS، ما یک سوئت آزمایش آزمایش را با مثالها از طریق الگوهای احتمالاتی و کلاسیک آزمایش ساختیم.', 'id': 'We present BIS, a Bayesian Inference Semantics, for probabilistic reasoning in natural language.  Sistem saat ini berdasarkan kerangka Bernardy et al. (2018), tapi meninggalkannya dalam hal penting. BIS menggunakan belajar Bayesia untuk menyimpulkan hipotesis dari ruang. Ini melibatkan memperkirakan kemungkinan hipotesis, mengingat data yang diberikan oleh ruang argumen. Ia menggunakan parser sintaks untuk menghasilkan struktur sintaks tertip yang layak sebagai input ke sistem generasi model. Hukuman diterjemahkan secara komposisional ke program probabilis, dan nilai kebenaran yang sepadan diharapkan menggunakan metode sampel. BIS berhasil berurusan dengan berbagai fenomena semantis probabilis, termasuk rekaman frekuensi, kuantifikator generalisasi, generik, dan predikat yang tidak jelas. Ini berhasil dengan baik pada beberapa tugas pemikiran probabilis yang menarik. Hal ini juga mendukung kesimpulan yang paling klasik (instantiasi, hukum de Morgan, dll.). Untuk menguji BIS kami telah membangun suite ujian percobaan dengan contoh dari jangkauan pola probabilis dan klasik inferensi.', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha BIS, Semantiki za Kuingiliwa na Bayesia, kwa sababu inayowezekana kuzingatia kwa lugha ya asili. Mfumo wa sasa unategemea mfumo wa Bernardy et al. (2018), lakini unaondoka kwa heshima muhimu. BIS inatumia mafunzo ya Bayesia kwa kuathiri imani ya unafiki kutoka maeneo. Hii inahusisha kutathmini uwezekano wa dhana hiyo, kwa kuzingatia taarifa zilizotolewa na maeneo ya hoja. Inatumia mchambuzi wa ushirikiano wa kutengeneza muundo wa pamoja unaotumika kama input kwa mfumo wa kizazi. Hukumu zinatafsiriwa kwa pamoja kwa programu zinazowezekana, na thamani za kweli zinakadiriwa kwa kutumia njia za sampuli. BIS kwa mafanikio makubaliano na hali mbalimbali inayowezekana na aina mbalimbali, ikiwa ni pamoja na matangazo ya kiwango, viwango vikuu, jenia na utabiri usio sahihi. Inafanya vizuri katika kazi kadhaa za kuvutia zinazowezekana kuwa na maana. Pia inaendelea maambukizi yanayothibitika sana (kwa mara, sheria za de Morgan, etc.). Ili jaribio la BIS tumetengeneza kituo cha majaribio yenye mifano ya aina mbalimbali za maambukizi ya kiganjani.', 'ko': '우리는 자연 언어의 확률 추리에 사용되는 베일스 추리의 의미 BIS를 제시했다.현재 시스템은 Bernardy 등(2018)의 구조를 바탕으로 하지만 중요한 부분에서는 다르다.BIS는 베일스 학습을 이용해 전제에서 가설을 추정한다.논점 전제에서 제공한 데이터를 감안하면 이것은 가설을 추정하는 확률과 관련된다.이것은 문법 분석기를 사용하여 유형화된 문법 구조를 생성하고 모델 생성 시스템의 입력으로 한다.문장은 조합 방식으로 확률 프로그램으로 해석하고 표본 추출 방법으로 상응하는 진가를 평가한다.BIS는 주파수 부사, 광의량사, 범형, 모호술어를 포함한 다양한 확률적 의미 현상을 성공적으로 처리했다.그것은 많은 재미있는 확률 추리 임무에서 양호하게 나타난다.그것은 또한 가장 고전적인 효과적인 추론 (실례화, 데모건의 법칙 등) 을 지지한다.BIS를 테스트하기 위해 일련의 확률과 고전적인 추리 모델의 예시를 포함하는 실험 테스트 키트를 구축했다.', 'tr': "BIS'i, beýeziýan Inference Semantikleri, tebigy dilde mümkinçilik sebäplere tanyýarys. Häzirki sistema Bernardy et al. (2018-nji ýyllar arasynda) ýöne çykar. BIS öykümlerinden bir hipotezi çykarmak için Bayezi öğrenmesini kullanıyor. Bu hipotesinin muhtemeleni tahmin edebilir, bir argüm alanlarıyla sunulan veriler sayesinde. Bu sistemi model döredilme sistemine giriş şeklinde üçin ýazylan sintaktik yapılar oluşturmak üçin bir sintaktik oýlayıcı kullanır. Sözler möhüm programlere terjime edildi we bellenen hakyky mykdarlar Sample çykyş hillerden ullanylar. BIS farklı olasılık semantik fenomenlerle, frekans reklamları, genelleştirilmiş miktarlarda, generikler ve soysuz predikatlar arasında başarıyla ilgileniyor. Ol gyzykly sanly möhüm sebäplerde gowy gazanýar. Munuň köp klasik taýýarlanmagyny (görnüş, Morganyň kanunlaryna we şeýle etmäge mejbur edýär). BIS barlamak üçin bir deneysel sahypa düzenledik. Muhtemelen we klasik hasaplanjak örnekleri bilen örnekler bilen.", 'af': "Ons aanbied BIS, 'n Bayesian Inference Semantics vir waarskynlik redensie in natuurlike taal. Die huidige stelsel is gebaseer op die raamwerk van Bernardy et al. (2018), maar afgaan van dit in belangrike respekte. BIS maak gebruik van Bayesian leer vir 'n hipotesis van premisies te verwyder. Hierdie bedoel die waarskynlikheid van die hipotees te vurdering, gegee die data wat deur die premisies van 'n argument verskaf word. Dit gebruik 'n sintakteel ontwerker om te genereer tipe sintakteel strukture wat dien as invoer na' n model generasie stelsel. Soektog word saamstig uitgelaai na waarskynlik program, en die ooreenstemmende waarheid word uitgelaai deur te gebruik van samplingsmetodes. BIS suksesvol verwerk met verskeie waarskynlike semantiese fenomene, insluitend frekwensieadverbs, genereliseerde quantifiers, generieke en vague predikate. Dit doen goed op 'n aantal interessante waarskynlik redekende taak. Dit hou ook die mees klassieke geldige inferences (instansiasie, de Morgan se wette, ensfh.). Om BIS te toets, het ons 'n eksperimentale toets suite gebou met voorbeelde van 'n reeks waarskynlik en klassieke inferensie patrone.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim BIS, një Bayesian Inference Semantics, për arsyetim probabilist në gjuhën natyrore. Sistemi aktual është bazuar në kuadrin e Bernardy et al. (2018), por largohet nga ai në aspekte të rëndësishme. BIS makes use of Bayesian learning for inferring a hypothesis from premises.  Kjo përfshin vlerësimin e probabilitetit të hipotezës, duke marrë parasysh të dhënat e furnizuara nga një argument. It uses a syntactic parser to generate typed syntactic structures that serve as input to a model generation system.  Dënimet interpretohen në mënyrë kompozitive në programet probabiliste dhe vlerat e së vërtetës korrespondente vlerësohen duke përdorur metodat e marrjes së mostrave. BIS merret me sukses me fenomene të ndryshme probabiliste semantike, duke përfshirë reklamat frekuence, kuantifikuesit e gjeneralizuar, gjenerikët dhe predikatat e paqarta. Ajo funksionon mirë në një numër detyrash interesante të arsyetimit probabilist. Ajo mban gjithashtu inferencat më klasike të vlefshme (instantiacion, ligjet e de Morgan, etj.). Për të testuar BIS kemi ndërtuar një suite eksperimentale testesh me shembuj të një game të modeleve probabiliste dhe klasike inference.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք Բեյզիայի ինֆերանսի սեմանտիկա Բիզեսիայի բնական լեզվի հավանական մտածողության համար: Այսօրվա համակարգը հիմնված է Բերնարդի և այլների շրջանակների վրա (2018 թվականին), բայց հեռանում է նրանից կարևոր հարցերով: ԲԻՍ-ն օգտագործում է Բեյզիացի ուսումնասիրությունը հիպոթեզի հանելու համար: Սա ներառում է հիպոթեզի հավանականության գնահատումը, հաշվի առնելով տվյալները, որոնք տրամադրվում են բանավեճի ենթադրության միջոցով: Այն օգտագործում է սինտակտիկ վերլուծում, որպեսզի ստեղծի սինտակտիկ կառուցվածքներ, որոնք օգտագործվում են որպես մոդել ստեղծելու համակարգի ներմուծք: Առասությունները թարգմանվում են հավանական ծրագրերի հետ, և համապատասխան ճշմարտության արժեքները հաշվարկվում են նմուշներ վերցնելու մեթոդներով: ԲիՍ-ը հաջողությամբ վերաբերում է տարբեր հավանական սեմանտիկ երևույթներին, ներառյալ հաճախականության արձագանքներին, ընդհանուր չափչացողներին, ընդհանուր տեսակներին և անորոշ պատկերներին: Այն լավ է աշխատում մի շարք հետաքրքիր հավանական մտածողական խնդիրների վրա: Այն նաև հաստատում է ամենադասական ճշգրիտ եզրակացությունները (ինտենցիալացիան, դե Մորգանի օրենքները, և այլն): ԲիՍ-ի փորձարկման համար մենք կառուցել ենք փորձարկման համակարգ հավանական և դասական հետևանքների տարբերակների օրինակներով:', 'am': 'ባያየስዊ የስማቴክስ ብኤሲን አቀናብናለን፡፡ የአሁኑ ስርዓት በርርዳርy እና አል (2018) በመሠረት ላይ ነው፣ ነገር ግን በአማላዊ ክፍል ይሄዳል፡፡ BIS makes use of Bayesian learning for inferring a hypothesis from premises.  ይህ የንፍቅና መፍትሄ የንፍቅና ውጤት ማድረግ ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪው ፕሮግራም የተጠቃሚ ምርጫዎችን ለመፍጠር የሚጠቅመውን የሲንተርካክቲክ መሠረቶች ለመፍጠር ይጠቅማል፤ በዓይነቱ ትውልድ ውስጥ እንደሚገልጽ ይግባ፡፡ የሥርዓቶች በተለየ ፕሮግራም እንዲያስተማሩ ይተረጉማሉ፤ የእውነትም ዋጋ ምሳሌዎችን በመጠቀም ይቆጥራሉ። በይዞታዊ ቦታዎች፣ የቁጥጥር አካባቢዎች፣ የብሔራዊ ስብሰባዎች፣ የgeneric እና የግልፅ ጉዳይ እና የፍላጎት ጉዳይ የሚቆጠሩ የሆኑት የስምታዊ ስህተት ይታሰናዳሉ፡፡ በአጠቃሚ የአሳማሚ ጉዳይ ላይ መልካም ነው፡፡ ደግሞም የሞርጋን ሕግ፣ አብዛኛዎቹ የክላሲካዊ ደዌዎች ያቆማል፡፡ በይሲን ለመፈትናት የሞከረኞች ፍትሕት ፍትሕ እና የክላሲካዊ ነጥቦች ምሳሌዎችን ሠርተናል፡፡', 'bn': "আমরা বেয়েসিয়ান ইনফেরেন্স সেম্যান্টিকের বিআইএস-কে উপস্থাপন করছি প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় যুক্তির জন্য। বর্তমান সিস্টেম বার্নার্ডি এবং আল এর ফ্রেমের উপর ভিত্তিক। ২০১৮, কিন্তু গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভাবে তা থেকে চলে যায়। বিআইএস বায়েসিয়ান শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করেছে বায়েসিয়ান জায়গাগুলো থেকে হাইপিথিসিকে আক্রান্ত করার জন্য। এই বিষয়টির সম্ভাবনা হিসেবে বিবেচনা করা হচ্ছে, যেখানে যুক্তি দিয়ে তথ্য প্রদান করা হয়। এটি একটি সিন্ট্যাকটিক ব্যবহার করে টাইপ করা সিন্ট্যাকটিক কাঠামো তৈরি করার জন্য যা মডেল প্রজন্ম সিস্টেমে ইনপুট হি শাস্তি সম্ভাব্য প্রোগ্রামের জন্য সহজলভাবে ব্যাখ্যা করা হয় এবং সংশ্লিষ্ট সত্যের মান নম্বর ব্যবহার করে হিসেব করা হয়। বিএস সফলভাবে বিভিন্ন সম্ভাব্য সেমেন্টিক্যান্টিক বিষয়গুলোর সাথে চুক্তি করেছে, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে ফ্রিয়েন্সি অ্যাডবার্ব, সাধারণ এটা অনেক মজার কাজের উপর ভালো করে। It also sustains most classically valid inferences (instantiation, de Morgan's laws, etc.).  বিআইএস পরীক্ষা করার জন্য আমরা একটি পরীক্ষামূলক পরীক্ষার স্যুট তৈরি করেছি সম্ভবত এবং ক্লাসিক্যাল আক্রান্ত প্যানেটের উদাহরণের", 'az': "Biz BIS'i təbii dilində mümkün olaraq düşünüş üçün Bayesian Inference Semantics təşkil edirik. Hazırkı sistem Bernardy et al. (2018-ci ildə), amma möhkəm tərzdə ondan uzaqlaşır. BIS tərəflərdən hipotezi çəkmək üçün Bayesiya öyrənməsini istifadə edir. Bu hipotezin mümkünlüyünü hesablamasına dahil edir. Bu, modellərin nəsil sisteminə girişi olaraq yazılmış sintaktik yapılar yaratmaq üçün sintaktik bir parçacını istifadə edir. Sözlər mümkün olaraq proqramlara təfsil edilir, və uyğunlaşan doğru qiymətlər nümunə çəkmə metodlarından istifadə edilir. BIS müxtəlif mümkünlük semantik fenomenlərlə müvəffəqiyyətlə müvəffəqiyyət edir, frekans reklamları, generalized quantifiers, generiklər və müxtəlif predikatları dahil. Bu çox maraqlı mümkün olaraq dəyişiklik işlərdə yaxşı işlər edir. Bu da klasik olaraq mütləq dəyişiklik dəyişiklikləri (instanciation, de Morgan's laws, etc.). BIS imtahana çəkmək üçün mümkün olaraq və klasik infeksiya modellərinin məsəlləri ilə eksperimentli test suiti inşa etdik.", 'ca': "We present BIS, a Bayesian Inference Semantics, for probabilistic reasoning in natural language.  El sistema actual està basat en el marc de Bernardy et al. (2018), però s'aparta d'ell en aspectes importants. BIS utilitza l'aprenentatge bayèsicper deduir una hipòtesi dels locals. Això implica estimar la probabilitat de l'hipòtesi, dadas les dades proporcionades pels premises d'un argument. Utilitza un analitzador sinàctic per generar estructures sinàctiques tipulades que serveixen com entrada a un sistema de generació de models. Les frases s'interpreten de manera compositiva a programes probabilistes, i els valors de veritat correspondents s'estiman fent servir mètodes de mostració. BIS tracta amb èxit diversos fenomens semàntics probabilistes, incloent adverss de freqüències, quantificadors generalitzats, genèrics i predicats vags. Es fa bé en una sèrie de tasques de raonament probabilista interessants. It also sustains most classically valid inferences (instantiation, de Morgan's laws, etc.).  Per provar BIS hem construït una suite de proves experimentals amb exemples d'una gama de patrons de inferència probabilistes i clàssiques.", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo BIS, bejzijski semantik, za vjerojatno razmišljanje na prirodnom jeziku. Trenutni sistem se temelji na okviru Bernardy et al. (2018), ali odlazi od njega u važnim poštovanjima. BIS koristi Bayesiansko učenje za inficiranje hipoteze iz prostora. To uključuje procjenu vjerojatnosti hipoteze, s obzirom na podatke dostavljene prostorijama argumenta. Koristi sintaktički analizator kako bi stvorio napisane sintaktičke strukture koje služe kao ulaz u sistem model a generacije. Kazne su kompozicionalno interpretirane na vjerovatne programe, a odgovarajuće vrijednosti istine procjenjuju se koristeći metode uzorka. BIS se uspješno bavi različitim vjerojatnim semantičkim fenomenima, uključujući reklame frekvencije, generalizirane kvantifikatore, generike i nevažne predikate. To dobro izvodi na broju zanimljivih vjerojatnih zadataka za razumanje. To također održava najklasičnije vrijedne inferencije (instancija, zakoni de Morgan itd.). Da bismo testirali BIS, izgradili smo eksperimentalni test apartman sa primjerima niza verovatnih i klasičnih uzorka infekcije.', 'cs': 'Představujeme BIS, Bayesovskou inferenční sémantiku, pro pravděpodobnostní uvažování v přirozeném jazyce. Současný systém je založen na rámci Bernardyho et al. (2018), ale odchází od něj v důležitých ohledech. BIS využívá Bayesovského učení k odvození hypotézy z prostor. To zahrnuje odhad pravděpodobnosti hypotézy vzhledem k údajům poskytnutým předpoklady argumentu. Používá syntaktický parser k generování typovaných syntaktických struktur, které slouží jako vstup do systému generování modelu. Věty jsou interpretovány kompozičně do pravděpodobnostních programů a odpovídající hodnoty pravdy jsou odhadovány metodami vzorkování. BIS se úspěšně zabývá různými pravděpodobnostními sémantickými jevy, včetně frekvenčních příslovců, generických a vágních predikátů. Dobře funguje na řadě zajímavých pravděpodobnostních úkolů uvažování. Rovněž obsahuje klasicky platné závěry (instanciace, de Morganovy zákony atd.). Pro testování BIS jsme vytvořili experimentální testovací sadu s příklady řady pravděpodobnostních a klasických inferenčních vzorů.', 'et': 'Esitleme BIS, Bayesi järeldussemantika, tõenäosuslikuks arutluseks looduskeeles. Praegune süsteem põhineb Bernardy jt. (2018) raamistikul, kuid erineb sellest olulistes aspektides. BIS kasutab bayesia õppimist hüpoteesi järeldamiseks eeldustest. See hõlmab hüpoteesi tõenäosuse hindamist, arvestades argumendi eelduste esitatud andmeid. See kasutab süntaktilist parserit, et genereerida tüüpi süntaktilised struktuurid, mis toimivad sisendina mudeli genereerimise süsteemis. Laused tõlgendatakse koostiselt tõenäosusprogrammideks ja vastavad tõeväärtused hinnatakse valimimeetodite abil. BIS tegeleb edukalt erinevate tõenäosuslike semantiliste nähtustega, sealhulgas sagedusadverbide, üldiste kvantifitseerijate, geneeriliste ja ebamääraste predikaatidega. See täidab hästi mitmeid huvitavaid tõenäosuslikke arutlusülesandeid. See toetab ka kõige klassikaliselt kehtivamaid järeldusi (instantiation, de Morgani seadused jne). BIS testimiseks oleme ehitanud eksperimentaalse testikomplekti erinevate tõenäosuslike ja klassikaliste järelduste näidetega.', 'fi': 'Esit채mme BIS:n, bayesilaisen p채채ttelysemantiikan, todenn채k철isyysp채채ttelyyn luonnollisella kielell채. Nykyinen j채rjestelm채 perustuu Bernardy et al.:n (2018) viitekehykseen, mutta poikkeaa siit채 t채rkeilt채 osin. BIS hy철dynt채채 bayesialaista oppimista hypoteesin p채채ttelyyn l채ht철kohdista. T채m채 edellytt채채 hypoteesin todenn채k철isyyden arvioimista, kun otetaan huomioon argumentin l채ht철kohdat. Se k채ytt채채 syntaktista j채sent채j채채 luodakseen typoituja syntaktisia rakenteita, jotka toimivat sy철tteen채 mallinnusj채rjestelm채채n. Lausekkeet tulkitaan kompositiivisesti todenn채k철isiksi ohjelmiksi ja vastaavat totuusarvot arvioidaan otantamenetelmill채. BIS k채sittelee menestyksekk채채sti erilaisia todenn채k철isi채 semanttisia ilmi철it채, kuten taajuusdermereit채, yleistyneit채 kvantikaattoreita, geneerisi채 ja ep채m채채r채isi채 predikaatteja. Se toimii hyvin useissa mielenkiintoisissa todenn채k철isyysp채채ttelyteht채viss채. Se tukee my철s klassisesti p채tevi채 johtop채채t철ksi채 (instantiation, de Morganin lait jne.). BIS:n testaamista varten olemme rakentaneet kokeellisen testisarjan, jossa on esimerkkej채 todenn채k철isist채 ja klassisista p채채ttelymalleista.', 'jv': "Kita gunakake BIS, semanti kuwi bayesyan Info, kanggo ndelok olarawista tresnaning ing pribadi. Ngawe sistem sing bisa mbatalé nang nggunaké cuasaké Berdadi et al (2008), nangungu-kiper diolah sing dikarepaké sing dikarepaké. BIS kuwi sawetara kelas bayesi nggambar deweke seneng supatistik apa lawasno Iki ngerti nggawe pertualangan kanggo ngerasakno pertualangan Jejaring structural navigation BIS ngomong akeh sing gagalé karo akeh semanti sing gak perbudhakan, gambar tarjamahan 'perbudhakan' ya, kaliwat(limiter), jenerakser(generic), lan suwak-perbudhakan Olèh sing diranggawe barang akeh sing apik perbudhakan bukane Ora iso nggawe akeh basa sing luwih apik dhéwé, iso nglarang (cara-cara, susah-cara). Jejaring BIS", 'ha': "Tuna halatar da BIS, a Bayesian Infection Semantics, kan an iya yiwuwa sabo da ke cikin harshen asiyya. Ana ƙayyade tsarin da ake kai yanzu a kan firam na Berardy et al. (2018), kuma yana kashewa daga gare ta da muhimu. BIS yana amfani da karatun Bayesian da za'a yi wa'anar wani littafi daga premises. Wannan yana ƙunsa da ikon a yinin da aka gaura data da za'a gaura da wani argument. Yana amfani da wani parameter na syntactic dõmin ya ƙiƙira tsaro wanda aka typa na syntactic da ke amfani da shi zuwa wani tsarin da za'a sami. Ana fassara musamman zuwa shiryoyin ayuka masu yiwuwa, da kuma an ƙaddara kima masu inganci da kuma a yi amfani da shiryoyin misãlai. BIS yana sakan bayan abubuwa masu yiwuwa, kamar misalin mutane, da masu samun mutane, da bakwai, da kuma bayani. It performs well on a number of interesting probabilistic reasoning tasks.  Yana daɗa mafiya ƙaranci da maras ko da cutar mala'a masu inganci (daidai'ar de morgan, da haka). Dõmin jarraba BIS, Mun gina wani jarrabi mai jarrabãwa da misãlai na wasu misãlai masu yiwuwa da ke samu'a cikin wata cutar kasa.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo BIS, bajzijsko sklepno semantiko, za verjetnostno razmišljanje v naravnem jeziku. Sedanji sistem temelji na okviru Bernardyja et al. (2018), vendar se od njega odmika v pomembnih vidikih. BIS uporablja bajzijsko učenje za sklepanje hipoteze iz prostorov. To vključuje oceno verjetnosti hipoteze glede na podatke, ki jih zagotavljajo predpostavke argumenta. Uporablja sintaktični razčlenjevalec za ustvarjanje tipiranih sintaktičnih struktur, ki služijo kot vhod v sistem generacije modela. Stavki so kompozicijsko interpretirani v verjetnostne programe, ustrezne resnične vrednosti pa so ocenjene z metodami vzorčenja. BIS se uspešno ukvarja z različnimi verjetnostnimi semantičnimi pojavi, vključno s frekvenčnimi adverbi, generaliziranimi kvantikatorji, generičnimi in nejasnimi predikati. Dobro opravlja številne zanimive naloge verjetnostnega razmišljanja. Podpira tudi najbolj klasično veljavne sklepe (instanciacija, de Morganovi zakoni itd.). Za testiranje BIS smo zgradili eksperimentalni testni paket s primeri vrste verjetnostnih in klasičnih sklepnih vzorcev.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים את BIS, סמנטיקת אינפרנס בייסיאנית, לסיבה סבירית בשפה טבעית. המערכת הנוכחית מבוססת על המסגרת של ברנרדי וכל. (2018), אך מתרחקת ממנה במובנים חשובים. BIS משתמש בלמדה בייזית כדי להוציא היפותזה מהמקומות. זה כולל הערכה של הסבירות של ההיפתוזה, בהתחשב במידע שנספק על ידי המקום של טיעון. הוא משתמש במחקר סינטאקטי כדי ליצור מבנים סינטאקטיים מודפסים ששימשים ככניסה למערכת דוגמנית דוגמנית. המשפטים מתפרשים באופן מורכב לתוכניות סיבירוליסטיות, והערכים האמת המתאימים מתערכים באמצעות שיטות דגימות. BIS מתמודד בהצלחה עם תופעות סמנטיות סמוניסטיות שונות, כולל פרסומות תדירות, מכוניות גנרליזציות, גנרליות, וקודמות לא ברורות. הוא מבצע היטב במספר משימות הסיבה הסבירה מעניינות. הוא גם שומר על המסקנות הכי קבועות קלאסית (ביקורת, החוקים של דה מורגן, וכו.). כדי לבדוק את BIS בנינו סוויטה מבחן ניסויים עם דוגמאות של טווח של דפוסי ההנחה הסבירה וקלאסית.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་BIS(Bayesian Inference Semantics)ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་ཆེད་ཅིག་སྤྲོད་དགོས་མཐུན་གྱི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ཡིན། ད་ལྟོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་Bernardy et al ཡི་གཞུང་ཐོག་ལས་གཞི་བཞག་ཡོད། ༢༠༡༨་ཡིན། ཡིན་ནའང་དེ་ལ་གལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ལས་གཡ BIS འདི་གྲངས་འཛིན་པང་གླིང་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཕྱོགས་ལས་Bayesian སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། This involves estimating the probability of the hypothesis, given the data supplied by the premises of an argument. It uses a syntactic parser to generate typed syntactic structures that serve as input to a model generation system. ཚིག་གྲངས་འདི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་བྱ་རིམ་ལ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་པའམ་མཐུན་གྱི་རིན་ཐང BIS མཐའ་འཁོར་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཆེས་ཉིད་ཅིག་གི་སྣང་ཚུལ་ལས་རྐྱེན་བྱུང་བ་འདུག། དེ་ནི་ལས་མཐོང་སྣང་ཆེན་དང་ཐོག་ལས་སླེབས་པའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་གྲངས་ཀ་ལས་སྒྲུབ་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་རེད། ད་ལྟ་བུའི་སྲོལ་རྒྱུན་གྱིས་ཕལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡོད། BIS ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་དེ་ང་ཚོས་རྐྱེན་ཆེན་དང་སྐད་རྒྱུན་གྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་དཔེ་བས།'}
{'en': 'Incivility Detection in Online Comments', 'es': 'Detección de incivilidad en los comentarios en línea', 'ar': 'كشف الفظاظة في التعليقات على الإنترنت', 'fr': "Détection d'incivilité dans les commentaires en ligne", 'pt': 'Detecção de incivilidade em comentários online', 'ja': 'オンラインコメントでの不快感検出', 'zh': '在线论者不文明检测', 'hi': 'ऑनलाइन टिप्पणियों में असभ्यता का पता लगाना', 'ga': 'Brath Neamhghabhálachta i dTuairimí Ar Líne', 'ru': 'Обнаружение нежизнеспособности в онлайн-комментариях', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση ανισοτήτων σε διαδικτυακά σχόλια', 'hu': 'Inkivitásérzékelés az online megjegyzésekben', 'it': "Rilevamento dell'incidenza nei commenti online", 'lt': 'Neaktyvumo nustatymas internetinėse pastabose', 'mk': 'Детектирање на инцивилност во онлајн коментари', 'kk': 'Онлайн түсініктемелерінде инцивиталық анықтау', 'ml': 'ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d അഭിപ്രായത്തിലെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Sejbien tal-Inċivilità fil-Kummenti Online', 'ms': 'Pengesanan Incivility dalam Komen Online', 'mn': 'Онлайн загваруудын нээлттэй тодорхойлолт', 'no': 'Oppdaging av inkivilitet i nettkommentarar', 'ro': 'Detectarea incivilității în comentariile online', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie nierówności w komentarzach online', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje nestabilnosti u online komentarima', 'si': 'Comment', 'so': 'Shaqo la’aanta ka baaraandegista bogga internetka', 'sv': 'Inkivitetsdetektering i onlinekommentarer', 'ta': 'இணைய குறிப்புகளில் உள்ள செயல்பாடு கண்டுபிடிப்பு', 'ur': 'آنلاین کمانٹروں میں غیر قابل تعلیم', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Phát hiện tính linh tính trên mạng', 'bg': 'Откриване на неактивност в онлайн коментарите', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje nestabilnosti u online komentarima', 'da': 'Registrering af inktivitet i onlinekommentarer', 'nl': 'Inciviliteitsdetectie in online commentaren', 'fa': 'پیدا کردن پیچیدگی در توضیح\u200cهای آنلاین', 'de': 'Inkivitätserkennung in Online-Kommentaren', 'ko': '온라인 평론에서의 문명하지 못한 검측', 'id': 'Incivility Detection in Online Comments', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa Utawala katika Maoni ya Mtandaoni', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk Töwziňlikleri Aňlamak', 'sq': 'Zbulimi i paaftësisë në komentet online', 'af': 'Comment', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': 'Online T…ôrc√ºm…ôl…ôrind…ô Incivility Detection', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje integriteta u online komentarima', 'bn': 'অনলাইন মন্তব্যে ইনসিভেলিটি সনাক্ত', 'ca': 'Detecció de la Incivilitat en Comentaris en línia', 'cs': 'Detekce nesrovnalosti v online komentářích', 'et': 'Iniviitiivsuse tuvastamine internetikommentaarides', 'fi': 'Epäaktiivisuuden tunnistus verkkokommenteissa', 'ha': 'Incivility Detection in Online Comments', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje nestabilnosti v spletnih komentarjih', 'he': 'גילוי חוסר הציוד בהערות באינטרנט', 'jv': 'Incidity detection in online komentar', 'bo': 'དྲ་བ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཚོགས་ནང་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་རྟོགས་བ'}
{'en': 'Incivility in public discourse has been a major concern in recent times as it can affect the quality and tenacity of the discourse negatively. In this paper, we present neural models that can learn to detect name-calling and vulgarity from a newspaper comment section. We show that in contrast to prior work on detecting toxic language, fine-grained incivilities like namecalling can not be accurately detected by simple models like logistic regression. We apply the models trained on the newspaper comments data to detect uncivil comments in a Russian troll dataset, and find that despite the change of domain, the model makes accurate predictions.', 'pt': 'A incivilidade no discurso público tem sido uma grande preocupação nos últimos tempos, pois pode afetar negativamente a qualidade e a tenacidade do discurso. Neste artigo, apresentamos modelos neurais que podem aprender a detectar xingamentos e vulgaridade em uma seção de comentários de jornal. Mostramos que, em contraste com o trabalho anterior na detecção de linguagem tóxica, incivilidades refinadas, como xingamentos, não podem ser detectadas com precisão por modelos simples, como regressão logística. Aplicamos os modelos treinados nos dados de comentários de jornais para detectar comentários incivis em um conjunto de dados de trolls russos e descobrimos que, apesar da mudança de domínio, o modelo faz previsões precisas.', 'es': 'La incivilidad en el discurso público ha sido una preocupación importante en los últimos tiempos, ya que puede afectar negativamente la calidad y la tenacidad del discurso. En este artículo, presentamos modelos neuronales que pueden aprender a detectar insultos y vulgaridad en la sección de comentarios de un periódico. Demostramos que, a diferencia de los trabajos anteriores sobre la detección del lenguaje tóxico, los incivilidades de grano fino, como los insultos, no pueden detectarse con precisión mediante modelos simples como la regresión logística. Aplicamos los modelos entrenados en los datos de comentarios de periódicos para detectar comentarios inciviles en un conjunto de datos de trolls rusos, y descubrimos que, a pesar del cambio de dominio, el modelo hace predicciones precisas.', 'fr': "L'incivilité dans le discours public a été une préoccupation majeure ces derniers temps, car elle peut affecter négativement la qualité et la ténacité du discours. Dans cet article, nous présentons des modèles neuronaux qui peuvent apprendre à détecter les insultes et la vulgarité à partir d'une section de commentaires de journaux. Nous montrons que contrairement aux travaux antérieurs sur la détection du langage toxique, les incivilités fines comme les injures ne peuvent pas être détectées avec précision par des modèles simples tels que la régression logistique. Nous appliquons les modèles formés sur les données des commentaires de journaux pour détecter les commentaires incivils dans un jeu de données de trolls russes, et nous constatons que malgré le changement de domaine, le modèle fait des prévisions précises.", 'ar': 'كانت الفظاظة في الخطاب العام مصدر قلق كبير في الآونة الأخيرة لأنها يمكن أن تؤثر سلبًا على جودة الخطاب ومثابرته. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم نماذج عصبية يمكنها تعلم اكتشاف الشتائم والابتذال من قسم التعليقات في الصحف. لقد أظهرنا أنه على عكس العمل السابق للكشف عن اللغة السامة ، لا يمكن اكتشاف الفظاظة الدقيقة مثل تسمية الأسماء بدقة من خلال نماذج بسيطة مثل الانحدار اللوجستي. نطبق النماذج المدربة على بيانات تعليقات الصحف لاكتشاف التعليقات غير المدنية في مجموعة بيانات القزم الروسية ، ووجدنا أنه على الرغم من تغيير المجال ، فإن النموذج يقدم تنبؤات دقيقة.', 'hi': 'सार्वजनिक प्रवचन में असभ्यता हाल के दिनों में एक प्रमुख चिंता का विषय रही है क्योंकि यह प्रवचन की गुणवत्ता और दृढ़ता को नकारात्मक रूप से प्रभावित कर सकती है। इस पेपर में, हम तंत्रिका मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो एक समाचार पत्र टिप्पणी अनुभाग से नाम-कॉलिंग और अश्लीलता का पता लगाना सीख सकते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि विषाक्त भाषा का पता लगाने पर पहले के काम के विपरीत, नेमकॉलिंग जैसी बारीक-अच्छी असभ्यताओं को लॉजिस्टिक प्रतिगमन जैसे सरल मॉडल द्वारा सटीक रूप से पता नहीं लगाया जा सकता है। हम एक रूसी ट्रोल डेटासेट में असभ्य टिप्पणियों का पता लगाने के लिए समाचार पत्र टिप्पणी डेटा पर प्रशिक्षित मॉडल लागू करते हैं, और पाते हैं कि डोमेन के परिवर्तन के बावजूद, मॉडल सटीक भविष्यवाणियां करता है।', 'ja': '公の場での不機嫌さは、議論の質と粘り強さに悪影響を及ぼす可能性があるため、近年大きな懸念事項となっている。本稿では、新聞のコメント欄から、ネームコールや下品さを検出することを学ぶことができるニューラルモデルを紹介する。我々は、有毒言語の検出に関する以前の研究とは対照的に、ロジスティック回帰のような単純なモデルでは、名前呼び出しのような細かい非文明性を正確に検出することができないことを示しています。私たちは新聞のコメントデータで訓練されたモデルを適用してロシアのトロールデータセットの非シビルコメントを検出し、ドメインの変更にもかかわらず、モデルが正確な予測を行うことを発見しました。', 'zh': '近者,公语不文明行常为主,以其质坚生负面影响。 于本文中,吾发神经模形,可以学报纸论检诟鄙。 臣等明与前检有毒语之事相比,如骂詈之细粒度非文明行不可以逻辑归等。 宜于报纸论数以检之俄罗斯巨魔集者不明论之,虽域有变化,而模形犹得其正占。', 'ru': 'Непримиримость в публичном дискурсе в последнее время является серьезной проблемой, поскольку она может негативно сказаться на качестве и устойчивости дискурса. В этой статье мы представляем нейронные модели, которые могут научиться обнаруживать вызов имени и вульгарность из раздела комментариев газеты. Мы показываем, что в отличие от предыдущей работы по обнаружению токсичного языка, мелкозернистые дефекты, такие как присвоение имен, не могут быть точно обнаружены с помощью простых моделей, таких как логистическая регрессия. Мы применяем модели, обученные по данным комментариев газет, чтобы обнаружить нецивилизованные комментарии в российском наборе данных троллей, и обнаруживаем, что, несмотря на изменение домена, модель делает точные прогнозы.', 'ga': 'Is mór an imní í an neamh-inghlacthacht sa dioscúrsa poiblí le blianta beaga anuas mar go bhféadfadh tionchar diúltach a bheith aige ar cháilíocht agus ar sheasmhacht an dioscúrsa. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair múnlaí néaracha ar féidir a fhoghlaim chun glaoch ar ainmneacha agus leochaileacht a bhrath ó mhír tuairimí nuachtáin. Léirímid, i gcodarsnacht le hobair a rinneadh roimhe seo ar theanga thocsaineach a bhrath, nach féidir éagothromaíochtaí míne cosúil le glaoch ainmneacha a bhrath go cruinn trí mhúnlaí simplí mar aischéimniú lóistíochta. Cuirimid na samhlacha oilte ar shonraí tuairimí an nuachtáin i bhfeidhm chun tráchtanna neamhshibhialta a bhrath i dtacar sonraí troll na Rúise, agus aimsímid, in ainneoin an athraithe fearainn, go ndéanann an tsamhail tuar cruinn.', 'ka': 'ახალი დროში, სახელსაწყობოლო დისკურსში იყო მნიშვნელოვანი დარწმუნება, რადგან ის შეუძლია გააკეთება დისკურსების კალგატი და დარწმუნება negativურად. ჩვენ ამ გვერდიში ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ნეიროლური მოდელები, რომლებიც შეუძლია ვისწავლოთ სახელის სახელის და სუგურაციის განახლებას გვერდილის კომენტრების წევრიდა ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ პირველი სამუშაო სამუშაო ტექსიკური ენათის განახსნა კონტრანტურად, როგორც სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო მოდელები, როგორც ლოგისტიკურ ჩვენ მოდელები, რომლებიც ახალგაზრულების კომენტრების მონაცემებზე გავაკეთებთ, რომლებიც პროსია ტროლის მონაცემების შესახებ არაფერი კომენტრების მონაცემების შესახებ, და მოდელ', 'hu': 'A nyilv찼nos diskurzusban val처 철sszeegyeztethetetlens챕g az ut처bbi id흷kben komoly aggodalomra ad okot, mivel negat챠van befoly찼solhatja a diskurzus min흷s챕g챕t 챕s kitart찼s찼t. Ebben a tanulm찼nyban olyan neur찼lis modelleket mutatunk be, amelyek megtanulj찼k felismerni a n챕vh챠v찼st 챕s a vulgarit찼st egy 첬js찼gjegyz챕sek r챕sz챕b흷l. Megmutatjuk, hogy a m챕rgez흷 nyelv kimutat찼s찼ra ir찼nyul처 kor찼bbi munk찼kkal ellent챕tben a finomszem킥 esz챕lyess챕gek, mint p챕ld찼ul a n챕vh챠v찼s, nem lehet pontosan kimutatni egyszer킥 modellekkel, mint p챕ld찼ul a logisztikai regresszi처. Az 첬js찼gjegyz챕sek adataira k챕pzett modelleket alkalmazzuk, hogy 챕szlelj체k az orosz troll adatk챕szletben tal찼lhat처 nem vil찼gos megjegyz챕seket, 챕s meg찼llap챠tjuk, hogy a domain v찼ltoz찼s ellen챕re a modell pontos el흷rejelz챕seket tesz.', 'el': 'Η ανισορροπία στον δημόσιο διάλογο αποτελεί μείζονα ανησυχία τον τελευταίο καιρό καθώς μπορεί να επηρεάσει αρνητικά την ποιότητα και την επιμονή του λόγου. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε νευρωνικά μοντέλα που μπορούν να μάθουν να ανιχνεύουν ονομασίες και χυδαιότητα από ένα τμήμα σχολίων εφημερίδων. Δείχνουμε ότι σε αντίθεση με προηγούμενες εργασίες για την ανίχνευση τοξικής γλώσσας, λεπτόκοκκες ανωμαλίες όπως η κλήση ονομάτων δεν μπορούν να ανιχνευθούν με ακρίβεια από απλά μοντέλα όπως η λογιστική παλινδρόμηση. Εφαρμόζουμε τα μοντέλα που εκπαιδεύονται στα δεδομένα σχολίων εφημερίδων για να ανιχνεύσουμε απερίσκεπτα σχόλια σε ένα ρωσικό σύνολο δεδομένων τρολ και διαπιστώνουμε ότι παρά την αλλαγή του τομέα, το μοντέλο κάνει ακριβείς προβλέψεις.', 'kk': 'Жаңа уақытта көпшілікті дискурстарда бұл дискурстардың сапасы мен жетістігін негативті түсіндіре алады. Бұл қағазда, біз жаңалық түсініктер бөлімінен атау және көпшілікті анықтау үшін үйрене алатын невралдық моделдерді таңдаймыз. Біз алдыңғы жұмыс істеу үшін логистикалық регрессия секілді қарапайым үлгілерден табылмайды. Біз қағаз мәліметтерінде оқылған үлгілерді Руссия трол деректерінің түсініктемелерін табу үшін қолданып, доменнің өзгерістеріне қарамастан, үлгісі дұрыс түсініктемелерді табылады.', 'it': "L'incivilità nel discorso pubblico è stata una grande preoccupazione negli ultimi tempi in quanto può influenzare negativamente la qualità e la tenacia del discorso. In questo articolo, presentiamo modelli neurali che possono imparare a rilevare la chiamata di nome e la volgarità da una sezione di commento del giornale. Mostriamo che, a differenza dei precedenti lavori sul rilevamento del linguaggio tossico, le incivilità a grana fine come la chiamata dei nomi non possono essere rilevate con precisione da modelli semplici come la regressione logistica. Applichiamo i modelli addestrati sui dati dei commenti del giornale per rilevare commenti incivili in un dataset troll russo, e scopriamo che nonostante il cambio di dominio, il modello fa previsioni accurate.", 'lt': 'Pastaraisiais metais visuomenės diskurso nestabilumas kelia didelį susirūpinimą, nes gali neigiamai paveikti diskurso kokybę ir tvirtumą. Šiame laikraštyje pristatome nervinius modelius, kurie gali išmokti aptikti vardą ir pažeidžiamumą iš laikraščio komentarų skyriaus. Mes parodome, kad priešingai nei ankstesnis toksinės kalbos nustatymo darbas, smulkių grūdų, pavyzdžiui, pavadinimų vadinimo, negalima tiksliai nustatyti taikant paprastus modelius, pavyzdžiui, logistinę regresiją. Taikome laikraščiuose parengtus modelius komentuojame duomenis, kad nustatytume neoficialias komentaras Rusijos trollo duomenų rinkinyje, ir nustatome, kad nepaisant domeno pokyčių modelis daro tikslias prognozes.', 'mk': 'Неквалитетот во јавниот дискурс беше голема загриженост во последните времиња, бидејќи може негативно да влијае на квалитетот и тензитетот на дискурсот. Во овој весник, претставуваме нервни модели кои можат да научат да детектираат име и вулгарност од одделот за коментари на весниците. Ние покажуваме дека во разлика од претходната работа за детектирање на токсичен јазик, фино населени инцивилитети како именувањето не можат да бидат прецизно детектирани со едноставни модели како што е логистичката регресија. Ние ги применуваме моделите обучени во весниците коментираат податоци за детектирање на нецивилни коментари во рускиот трол податок, и откриваме дека и покрај промената на доменот, моделот прави прецизни предвидувања.', 'ms': 'Kegagalan dalam perbicaraan awam telah menjadi kebimbangan besar pada masa-masa yang lalu kerana ia boleh mempengaruhi kualiti dan ketepatan perbicaraan negatif. Dalam kertas ini, kita memperkenalkan model saraf yang boleh belajar untuk mengesan panggilan nama dan vulgariti dari seksyen komentar kertas. We show that in contrast to prior work on detecting toxic language, fine-grained incivilities like namecalling cannot be accurately detected by simple models like logistic regression.  Kami melaksanakan model yang dilatih pada data komentar surat khabar untuk mengesan komentar yang tidak biasa dalam set data troll Rusia, dan mencari bahawa walaupun perubahan domain, model membuat ramalan yang tepat.', 'mt': 'L-in ċività fid-diskors pubbliku kienet tħassib kbir f’dawn l-a ħħar żminijiet peress li tista’ taffettwa b’mod negattiv il-kwalità u t-tenaċit à tad-diskors. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw mudelli newrali li jistgħu jitgħallmu jsibu l-isem u l-vulgarità minn taqsima tal-kummenti tal-gazzetti. Aħna nuru li b’kuntrast max-xogħol preċedenti dwar l-iskoperta ta’ lingwa tossika, in ċivilitajiet ta’ ħbub irfinati bħall-isem call ma jistgħux jiġu skoperti b’mod preċiż minn mudelli sempliċi bħar-rigressjoni loġistika. Aħna napplikaw il-mudelli mħarrġa fuq id-dejta tal-kummenti tal-gazzetti biex jinstabu kummenti mhux ċivili f’sett ta’ dejta tat-troll Russu, u nsibu li minkejja l-bidla fid-dominju, il-mudell jagħmel tbassir preċiż.', 'ml': 'പൊതു സംസാരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d സ്വാഭാവം ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ സംസാരത്തിന്റെ സ്വാഭാവിതത്തിന് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. പേര് വിളിക്കുന്നതും ഭൂമിയുടെ വിഭാഗത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പേര് വിള പേര് വിളിക്കുന്നതിന് മുമ്പ് ജോലി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിന് വിരോധമാണെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു തരുന്നു. ലോഗിക്ക് വിരോധത്തിന് പോലുള ഒരു റഷ്യന്\u200d ട്രോള്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d അസാധാരണമില്ലാത്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പത്രത്തില്\u200d പരിശീലിച്ച മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Олон нийтийн ярианд байх нь саяхан үед маш их санаа зовоож байлаа. Энэ нь ярианы сайн чанар болон хамаагүй нөлөөлж чадна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид мэдээлэл дээрх сэтгүүлийн хэсэгт нэр нэрлэх, эмзэг байдлыг олж сурах мэдрэлийн загваруудыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид өмнө ажлын эсрэгээр хохиромжтой хэл олохын тулд нэрлэлт гэх мэт тохиромжтой тохиромжтой тохиромжтой зүйлсийг логистик сэтгэл хөдлөл шиг энгийн загварууд нь тодорхойлж чадахгүй гэдгийг харуул Бид сонин дээр сургалтын загваруудыг Российн тролын өгөгдлийн сан дээр тодорхойлж буй загваруудыг олж мэдэхэд зориулсан загваруудыг ашиглаж, загвар нь тодорхой таамаглалт хийдэг.', 'no': 'Inkivilitet i offentlige diskursar har vært ein stor bekymring i nyleg tid som han kan påvirke kvaliteten og tjenerleiken på diskursen negativt. I denne papiret presenterer vi neuralmodeller som kan lære å finna namnlasting og vulgaritet frå eit kommentar på papir. Vi viser at kontrast med førre arbeid på oppdaging av toksisk språk kan ikkje finna nokså fin-korniske inkiviliter som namnlasting av enkle modeller som logistisk regresjon. Vi bruker modellen som trengte på informasjonskommentarar for å finna ungeville kommentarar i eit russisk trolsk datasett, og finn at selv om endringa av domenet, gjer modellen nøyaktig forhåndsvising.', 'ro': 'Incitilitatea în discursul public a fost o preocupare majoră în ultima vreme, deoarece poate afecta negativ calitatea și tenacitatea discursului. În această lucrare, prezentăm modele neuronale care pot învăța să detecteze chemarea de nume și vulgaritatea dintr-o secțiune de comentarii din ziar. Noi arătăm că, spre deosebire de lucrările anterioare privind detectarea limbajului toxic, incivilitățile cu granule fine precum denumirea nu pot fi detectate cu precizie prin modele simple precum regresia logistică. Aplicăm modelele instruite pe datele comentariilor ziarului pentru a detecta comentariile necivile dintr-un set de date troll rusesc și constatăm că, în ciuda schimbării domeniului, modelul face previziuni precise.', 'pl': 'Nieczystość w dyskursie publicznym była w ostatnich czasach głównym problemem, ponieważ może negatywnie wpływać na jakość i wytrwałość dyskursu. W artykule przedstawiamy modele neuronowe, które mogą nauczyć się wykrywać imiona i wulgarność z sekcji komentarzy gazety. Pokazujemy, że w przeciwieństwie do wcześniejszych prac nad wykrywaniem toksycznego języka, drobnoziarnistych niedociągłości, takich jak wywoływanie nazw, nie mogą być dokładnie wykryte przez proste modele, takie jak regresja logistyczna. Wykorzystujemy modele przeszkolone na danych komentarzy gazety do wykrywania niecywilnych komentarzy w rosyjskim zbiorze danych trolli i stwierdzamy, że pomimo zmiany domeny model dokonuje dokładnych przewidywań.', 'so': 'Dhaqaalaha hadalka dadweynaha waxaa saameyn ku yeelan kara suurtagalka iyo kirada hadalka. Warqadan waxaynu ku qornaa tusaalooyin neurada ah oo ku baran karta in ay ka ogaato magaca magaca iyo garashada, qeyb ka mid ah kommentaha warqadda. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in horay u sii jeedo shaqo ku saabsan aqoonsiga luqada caqliga ah, dhaqdhaqaaq qaali ah sida magaca magac looma cadayn karo tusaale fudud sida dib u soo celinta jimicsiga. Tusaalada lagu tababariyey macluumaadka wargeyska ayaannu ku codsanaynaa si aan u ogaano commentarada aan sharciga ahayn oo lagu qoro shabakadda wargelinta Ruushka, waxaana ka helaynaa in kastoo beddelka gudaha, modelkuna wuxuu ka dhigaa wax sii sheegta si saxda ah.', 'sr': 'Nedavno je bila velika zabrinutost u javnim diskusijama jer može negativno utjecati na kvalitetu i održavanje diskusija. U ovom novinama predstavljamo neuralne modele koji mogu naučiti da otkriju poziv imena i vulgarnost iz sekcije komentara novina. Pokazujemo da u suprotnosti sa prethodnim radom o otkrivanju toksičnog jezika, fino zrno inkiviliteta poput imena ne može biti precizno otkrivena jednostavnim modelima poput logističke regresije. Primjenjujemo modele obučene na novinama komentare podataka za otkrivanje neizbežnih komentara u ruskom trolskom setu podataka, i saznamo da, uprkos promjenom domena, model čini tačne predviđanja.', 'sv': 'Incivibilitet i den offentliga diskursen har varit ett stort problem på senare tid eftersom det kan påverka diskursens kvalitet och uthållighet negativt. I denna uppsats presenterar vi neurala modeller som kan lära sig att upptäcka namnupprop och vulgaritet från en tidnings kommentarssektion. Vi visar att i motsats till tidigare arbete med att upptäcka giftigt språk, finkorniga inciviliteter som namnkallelse inte kan detekteras korrekt med enkla modeller som logistisk regression. Vi använder de modeller som tränats på tidningens kommentarsdata för att upptäcka ocivila kommentarer i ett ryskt trolldataset, och konstaterar att modellen trots domänbytet gör exakta förutsägelser.', 'si': 'සාමාජික කතා කරණාවට විශේෂතාවක් තියෙන්නේ අලුත් වෙලාවට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙලා තියෙන්නේ ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට මේ පත්තරේ අපි පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් න්\u200dයූරාල් මොඩේල් එකක් තියෙන්නේ නම් කෝල් එක හා විශේෂතාවක් හොයාගන්න ප අපි පෙන්වන්නේ විෂ්\u200dය භාෂාව හොයාගන්න කලින් කලින් වැඩේ ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන්, නාමකිරීම් වගේ හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් සාමාන්\u200dය මොඩේල අපි රුසියානු ට්\u200dරෝල් දත්ත සැකසුම් වලින් ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තොරතුරු දත්ත ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම හ', 'ur': 'اچھے موقع میں جماعت کی صحبت میں زیادہ مشکل ہے جس طرح یہ صحبت کی کیفیت اور مضبوطی کے باعث ناپسند ہو سکتا ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے نیورال موڈل پیش کیے ہیں جو ایک کاغذ کی کمانٹ بخشی سے نام کی آواز اور آہستگی کا تلاش کرنا سکتے ہیں. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ پہلے کے کام کے مقابلہ میں جسم کی زبان کا تلاش کرنے کے لئے بہترین دانے کی غلط ہے جیسے نام کی تلاش کے ذریعہ ایک ساده موڈل کے ذریعہ سیدھی طرح تلاش نہیں کی جاتی۔ ہم نے روسی ٹرول ڈیٹ سٹ میں غیر قابل تعلیم کرنے کے لئے مجموعہ کی مدلکوں کو استعمال کیا ہے، اور یہ معلوم ہے کہ ڈومین کی تبدیلی کے بغیر، مدل دقیق پیش بینی کرتا ہے.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் பொது பேச்சில் உள்ள பாதுகாப்பு ஒரு மிகப் பெரிய கவலை இருக்கிறது ஏனெனில் அது பேச்சின் தரம் மற்றும் வீட்டில இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் புதிய மாதிரிகளை கொண்டிருக்கிறோம். பெயர் அழைப்பு மற்றும் பாதுகாப்பை கண்டுபிடிக்க கற்ற We show that in contrast to prior work on detecting toxic language, fine-grained incivilities like namecalling cannot be accurately detected by simple models like logistic regression.  நாம் செய்திக்காட்டியில் பயிற்சி மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் ஒரு ருஷ்யன் ட்ராக்ல் தகவல்களில் குறிப்பிடாத குறிப்புகளை கண்டுபிடிக்', 'uz': "Yaqinda davomida davomida davomida muvaffaqiyatli eng muhim eng muhimdir, chunki u gapiruvchi suhbatning sifatida va davomida yomon ishlatishi mumkin. Bu hujjatda, biz gazeta izohning qismlaridan nom va vulganimni aniqlashni o'rganadigan neyron modellarni present qilamiz. Biz o'ylaymiz, o'smini o'rganishdan oldin ishni o'rganishdan oldin ishni ko'rsatganimiz, o'xshash qo'llanmalar sifatida o'xshash qo'llanmalar o'zgartirib boʻlmaydi, logistik boshqarish kabi oddiy modellarni aniqlash mumkin. Biz roʻyxatga o'rganilgan modellarni qoʻllamiz, Ruscha trolllar maʼlumotidagi shaxsiy izohlarni aniqlash uchun foydalanamiz va uni domen o'zgarishda foydalanishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Sự tham nhũng trong thuyết trình công cộng đã là một mối lo ngại lớn trong những ngày gần đây vì nó có thể ảnh hưởng tiêu cực đến chất lượng và kiên trì của bài giảng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu các mô hình thần kinh có thể học cách gọi tên và thô tục từ một phần bình luận của báo chí. Chúng tôi cho thấy, đối với những nghiên cứu về ngôn ngữ độc hại, các khuynh hướng xám xịt như gọi tên không thể được phát hiện chính xác bằng các mô hình đơn giản như sự hồi phục hậu cần. Chúng tôi áp dụng các mẫu được đào tạo trên các dữ liệu của các báo chí để phát hiện những nhận xét sai trong bộ dữ liệu của Troll Nga, và thấy rằng mặc dù đã thay đổi miền, mẫu cung cấp những dự đoán chính xác.', 'bg': 'Инцивилизацията в публичния дискурс е основна грижа в последно време, тъй като може да повлияе негативно на качеството и упоритостта на дискурса. В тази статия представяме невронни модели, които могат да се научат да откриват названията и вулгарността от секция за коментари във вестника. Показваме, че за разлика от предишната работа по откриване на токсичен език, фини прояви като назоваване не могат да бъдат точно открити чрез прости модели като логистична регресия. Ние прилагаме моделите, обучени върху данните за коментарите на вестниците, за да откриваме нецивилизовани коментари в руски тролски набор от данни и откриваме, че въпреки промяната на домейна моделът прави точни прогнози.', 'nl': 'Inciviliteit in het publieke discours is de laatste tijd een grote zorg geweest, omdat het de kwaliteit en vasthoudendheid van het discours negatief kan beïnvloeden. In dit artikel presenteren we neurale modellen die kunnen leren om roeping en vulgariteit te detecteren vanuit een commentaarsectie van een krant. We tonen aan dat in tegenstelling tot eerder onderzoek naar het detecteren van toxische taal, fijnkorrelige inciviliteiten zoals namecalling niet nauwkeurig kunnen worden gedetecteerd door eenvoudige modellen zoals logistieke regressie. We passen de modellen toe die getraind zijn op de commentaargegevens van kranten om onbeleefde commentaren te detecteren in een Russische trol dataset, en vinden dat ondanks de verandering van domein, het model nauwkeurige voorspellingen maakt.', 'hr': 'Nedavno je velika zabrinutost u javnim diskusijama, jer može negativno utjecati na kvalitetu i stanju diskusije. U ovom novinu predstavljamo neuronske modele koji mogu naučiti otkriti poziv imena i vulgarnost iz odjela komentara novina. Pokazujemo da u suprotnosti s prethodnim radom na otkrivanju toksičnog jezika, fino zrno inkiviliteta poput imenovanja ne može biti precizno otkrivena jednostavnim modelima poput logističke regresije. Primjenjujemo modele obučene na novinama podaci za otkrivanje neizbježnih komentara u ruskoj trolskoj podaci i otkrijemo da, uprkos promjeni domena, model čini tačne predviđanja.', 'de': 'Inkivilität im öffentlichen Diskurs war in letzter Zeit ein großes Anliegen, da sie die Qualität und Beharrlichkeit des Diskurses negativ beeinflussen kann. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir neuronale Modelle vor, die lernen können, Namensgebungen und Vulgarität aus einem Zeitungskommentar zu erkennen. Wir zeigen, dass im Gegensatz zu früheren Arbeiten zur Erkennung toxischer Sprache feinkörnige Incivilitäten wie Namensaufruf nicht durch einfache Modelle wie logistische Regression genau detektiert werden können. Wir wenden die Modelle an, die auf den Kommentardaten der Zeitung trainiert wurden, um unzivile Kommentare in einem russischen Troll-Datensatz zu erkennen, und stellen fest, dass das Modell trotz der Änderung der Domäne genaue Vorhersagen macht.', 'id': 'Kegagalan dalam pembicaraan publik telah menjadi kepentingan utama pada saat-saat terakhir karena dapat mempengaruhi kualitas dan tenasi pembicaraan negatif. Dalam koran ini, kami mempersembahkan model saraf yang dapat belajar untuk mendeteksi panggilan nama dan vulgaritas dari bagian komentar koran. Kami menunjukkan bahwa dalam perbedaan dengan pekerjaan sebelumnya untuk mendeteksi bahasa beracun, incivilitas berwarna gandum seperti panggilan nama tidak dapat ditemukan dengan akurat oleh model sederhana seperti regresi logistik. Kami menerapkan model yang dilatih di komentar koran data untuk mendeteksi komentar yang tidak biasa dalam set data troll Rusia, dan menemukan bahwa meskipun perubahan domain, model membuat prediksi yang akurat.', 'da': 'Inkivitet i den offentlige diskurs har været en stor bekymring i den seneste tid, da det kan påvirke diskursens kvalitet og vedholdenhed negativt. I denne artikel præsenterer vi neurale modeller, der kan lære at opdage navneopråb og vulgaritet fra en avis kommentar sektion. Vi viser, at i modsætning til tidligere arbejde med at detektere giftige sprog, finkornede uhændeligheder som navngivning ikke kan detekteres præcist ved simple modeller som logistisk regression. Vi anvender de modeller, der er trænet på avis kommentarer data, til at registrere uovile kommentarer i et russisk trold datasæt, og finder ud af, at modellen på trods af domæneændringen, giver nøjagtige forudsigelser.', 'fa': 'در اخیر زمان\u200cهای اخیر نگرانی بزرگی در صحبت عمومی است که می\u200cتواند کیفیت و استراحت صحبت را منفی تأثیر دهد. در این کاغذ، ما مدل عصبی را نشان می دهیم که می توانند یاد بگیرند که نام زنگ زدن و آلودگی را از بخش توضیح روزنامه یاد بگیرند. ما نشان می دهیم که در مقابل کارهای پیشینه روی کشف زبان سمی، غیر قابل توجه به دانه\u200cهای خوشمزه مانند نام زنگ زدن قابل دقیق توسط مدل\u200cهای ساده مانند بازگشت لوژیک شناسایی نمی\u200cشود. ما مدل های آموزش یافته روی روزنامه داده ها را برای شناسایی توضیح غیرقابل توضیح در یک مجموعه داده های ترول روسیه استفاده می کنیم، و پیدا می کنیم که با وجود تغییر دامنه، مدل پیش بینی دقیق می کند.', 'sw': 'Kutokuwepo kwa mazungumzo ya umma umekuwa na wasiwasi mkubwa katika nyakati za hivi karibuni kwa sababu inaweza kuathiri ubora na usafiri wa mazungumzo haya bila kuchanganyikiwa. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka mifano ya neurali ambayo inaweza kujifunza kugundua wito na hali ya hatari kutoka sehemu ya maoni ya gazeti. Tunaonyesha kwamba tofauti na kazi ya kabla ya kutambua lugha yenye toksa, vifaa vizuri vilivyowekwa kama vile jina haliwezi kugundua kwa vizuri kama vile ukandamizaji wa kimaadili. Tunatumia mifano ya kufundishwa kwenye taarifa za maoni ya gazeti ili kutambua maoni yasiyo na haki katika seti ya tahadhari za Urusi, na kutambua kwamba pamoja na mabadiliko ya ndani, mtindo huo unafanya utabiri sahihi.', 'tr': 'Halkara gürrüňlerde döwlet gürrüňlerde ýakynlaşyk ýok wagtlarda nähili ünsü bolup biler, gürrüňleriň keyfiýeti we täsirini täsirli edip biler. Bu kagyzda, biz täze bir gazet komentarynyň sözlerinden ady we ýüregi tanamagy öwrenip biljek neural nusgalary tanyýarys. Biz öňki işiňde toksik dili tapmakda, diňe diýmek ýaly süýtgeli dökülmeler bilen ol logistik regresiýa ýaly basit nusgalar tarapyndan takyk tapylyp bilmeýändigini görkeýäris. Biz gazetde eğitilen modelleri Rus trol verilerinde nähili terjimeleri tapmak üçin ýazyklanýar we şol modelleriň üýtgedigine rağmen, modelleriň dogry tahmini bar.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 공공 언어 중의 문명하지 못한 것은 줄곧 주요한 문제였는데, 왜냐하면 그것은 언어의 질과 강인성에 부정적인 영향을 미치기 때문이다.본고에서 우리는 신문 평론 부분의 지명과 저속을 측정하는 신경 모형을 제시했다.우리는 이전에 유독언어를 검출하는 작업에 비해 지명과 같은 세립도 문명하지 못한 행위는 간단한 모델(예를 들어 논리 회귀)을 통해 정확하게 검출할 수 없다는 것을 발견했다.우리는 신문 평론 데이터에 훈련된 모델을 응용하여 러시아 트롤 데이터가 집중된 불문명한 평론을 검측하였는데 지역에 변화가 생겼음에도 불구하고 이 모델은 여전히 정확한 예측을 할 수 있음을 발견하였다.', 'af': "Oninkryflikheid in openbare diskursie is 'n groot bekommerding in onlangse tyde as dit kan invloek die kwaliteit en ondersteuning van die diskursie negatief. In hierdie papier, laat ons voorsien neurale modele wat kan leer om naam- roep en vulgariteit te vind van 'n koerant kommentaar seksie. Ons wys dat in kontras met voorheede werk om toxiese taal te ontdek, fyn-graan inkiviliteit soos naam oproep kan nie presies deur eenvoudige modele soos logistike regresie ontdek word nie. Ons toewend die modele wat op die koerant opgelei is om onklike kommentaar in 'n Russiese trol datastel te vind, en vind dat, behalwe die verandering van domein, die model maak presies voorskou.", 'sq': 'Incivility in public discourse has been a major concern in recent times as it can affect the quality and tenacity of the discourse negatively.  Në këtë gazetë, ne paraqesim modele neurale që mund të mësojnë të zbulojnë emrin e thirrjes dhe vulgaritetin nga një seksion komentesh të gazetës. Ne tregojmë se në kundërshtim me punën e mëparshme në zbulimin e gjuhës toksike, incivilitete të holla si emërimi nuk mund të zbulohen saktësisht nga modele të thjeshta si regresioni logjistik. We apply the models trained on the newspaper comments data to detect uncivil comments in a Russian troll dataset, and find that despite the change of domain, the model makes accurate predictions.', 'am': 'በአሁኑ ዘመን የህዝብ ንግግር ውስጥ የፍላጎት ጉዳይ የንግግሩን ብዛት እና መደጋጋገሚያ በሽልማት ላይ የሚችል ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የኒስትር ዓይነቶች ከጋዜጠኛ ትምህርት ክፍል የስሜን ጥሪ እና ሽፋትን ለማግኘት የሚችሉትን እናቀርባለን፡፡ አስቀድሞ የጥቁር ቋንቋን ለማግኘት የሚደረገውን ሥራ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ እንደተጠራጠሩ ጥሩ የተመሳሳይ አካባቢዎች እንደ logistic ትክክል እንደሆነ ቀላል ምሳሌዎች ማግኘት አይችልም፡፡ የጋዜጠኞቹን አስተያየት ዳታዎችን እናጠይቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Վերջին ժամանակներում հանրային խոսակցության անզգացումը մեծ անհանգստացում է եղել, քանի որ այն կարող է բացասական ազդեցություն ունենալ խոսակցության որակի և ճկունության վրա: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք նյարդային մոդելներ, որոնք կարող են սովորել հայտնաբերել անվանումները և խուսափելիությունը թերթի մեկնաբանության հատվածից: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ հակառակ թունավոր լեզու հայտնաբերման նախորդ աշխատանքին, նույնպես կոչվող անվանումների նմանատիպ պատճառները չեն կարող ճշգրիտ հայտնաբերվել պարզ մոդելների, ինչպիսիք են լոգոստիկ ռեգրեսիան: Մենք կիրառում ենք թերթերի վրա սովորեցված մոդելները, որոնք վերաբերում են մեկնաբանությունների տվյալներին, որպեսզի հայտնաբերենք անվայելի մեկնաբանություններ ռուսական տրոլ տվյալների համակարգում, և հայտնաբերում ենք, որ չնայած բնագավառի փո', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক সময়ে জনগণের কথোপকথনে অকৃতজ্ঞতা বিশেষ উদ্বেগ ছিল যেহেতু এটি এই কথোপকথনের মান এবং নেতিবাচক প্রভাবিত করতে পারে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা নিউরেল মডেল উপস্থাপন করছি যারা সংবাদপত্রের মন্তব্যের বিভাগ থেকে নামের কল এবং বিভিন্ন বিষয়টি সনাক্ত করত আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে ব্যাক্তিগত ভাষা খুঁজে বের করার আগের কাজের বিপরীতে, যেমন নামের নামে ডাকার মত সুন্দর কার্যক্রম সঠিকভাবে সনাক্ত করা যাবে না। আমরা সংবাদপত্রের তথ্যে প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল প্রয়োগ করি রাশিয়ার ট্রোল ডাটাসেটে অভিল মন্তব্য খুঁজে বের করার জন্য, আর আমরা খুঁজে পাই যে ডোমেইন পরিবর্তন সত', 'bs': 'Nedavno je bila velika zabrinutost na javnim diskusijama jer može negativno utjecati na kvalitetu i stanju diskusije. U ovom novinu predstavljamo neuralne modele koji mogu naučiti otkriti poziv imena i vulgarnost iz sekcije komentara novina. Pokazujemo da u suprotnosti sa prethodnim radom na otkrivanju toksičnog jezika, fino zrncane inkivilitete poput imenovanja ne mogu biti precizno otkriven prostim modelima poput logističke regresije. Primjenjujemo modele obučene na novinama komentare podataka za otkrivanje neizbježnih komentara u ruskom trolskom setu podataka i pronalazimo da, uprkos promjenom domena, model čini tačne predviđanja.', 'ca': "L'incivilitat en el discurs públic ha estat una gran preocupació en els últims temps perquè pot afectar negativament la qualitat i la tenacitat del discurs. En aquest article, presentem models neuronals que poden aprendre a detectar el nom i la vulgaritat d'una secció de comentaris del diari. Mostrem que, a diferent de la feina anterior en la detecció de llenguatges tòxics, les incivilitats fines com anomenar noms no poden ser detectades amb precisió per models simples com la regressió logística. Aplicam els models entrenats en els diaris comenteixen dades per detectar comentaris incevils en un conjunt de dades russos de trolls, i descobrim que malgrat el canvi de domini, el model fa prediccions exactes.", 'az': 'Halkı söhbətlərdə inkişaf edilməsi son zamanlarda böyük bir endişe idi, çünki bu söhbətlərin keyfiyyətini və təhlükəsini negatif təsir edə bilər. Bu kağızda, bir gazetdə nöyrənmə bölümündən ismin ça ğırılmasını və vulgarlığını öyrənə bilən nöyrə modelləri göstəririk. Biz əvvəlki işin zehirli dili keşfetməsindən əvvəlki işə baxmayacağını göstəririk ki, adı çağırmaq kimi təmiz dənələr, logistik regresi kimi basit modellər təşkil edilməz. Biz gazetdə təhsil edilmiş modelləri Rus trollu verilənlərin məlumatlarını keşfetmək üçün təhsil edilən məlumatları təmin edirik və bu modellərin dəyişikliklərinə baxmayaraq, dəyişiklik tədbirləri təmin edir.', 'cs': 'Nesrovnalost veřejného diskurzu je v poslední době hlavním problémem, protože může negativně ovlivnit kvalitu a houževnatost diskurzu. V tomto článku představujeme neuronové modely, které se mohou naučit detekovat jména a vulgaritu z části novinových komentářů. Ukazujeme, že na rozdíl od dřívějších prací na detekci toxického jazyka nelze jednoduchými modely, jako je logistická regrese, přesně detekovat jemnozrnné nesrovnalosti, jako je jmenování. Používáme modely trénované na novinových komentářích, abychom zjistili, že i přes změnu domény, model dělá přesné předpovědi.', 'et': 'Avaliku diskursuse aktiivsus on viimasel ajal olnud suur mure, kuna see võib mõjutada diskursuse kvaliteeti ja püsivust negatiivselt. Käesolevas töös tutvustame närvimudeleid, mis õpivad avastama ajalehe kommentaaride jaotisest nimekutsumist ja vulgaalsust. Me näitame, et erinevalt varasemast tööst toksilise keele tuvastamisel ei saa peeneteralisi sündmusi, nagu nimekutsumine, täpselt tuvastada lihtsate mudelitega, nagu logistiline regressioon. Rakendame ajalehe kommentaaride andmetel koolitatud mudeleid, et tuvastada vene trollide andmekogumis ebaviisakaid kommentaare ning leiame, et vaatamata domeeni muutumisele teeb mudel täpseid prognoose.', 'fi': 'Julkisen diskurssin inkiviiliteetti on ollut viime aikoina suuri huolenaihe, sillä se voi vaikuttaa kielteisesti diskurssin laatuun ja sitkeyteen. Tässä artikkelissa esitellään neuromalleja, jotka voivat oppia tunnistamaan nimihuutoa ja vulgariteettia sanomalehden kommenttiosiosta. Osoitamme, että toisin kuin aiemmin tehty myrkyllisen kielen havaitsemistyö, hienorakeisia inciviliteettejä, kuten nimikutsumista, ei voida tarkasti havaita yksinkertaisilla malleilla, kuten logistisella regressiolla. Sovellamme sanomalehtien kommenttitietoihin koulutettuja malleja tunnistamaan epäsiistejä kommentteja venäläisessä peikkoaineistossa ja huomaamme, että verkkotunnuksen muutoksesta huolimatta malli tekee tarkkoja ennusteita.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé karo hal-hal nganggo kaluluh dumadhi sing gak bener tentang kanggo nguasai supaya kuwi kaluwalhe lan ijol-ijolan kuwi ora iso nguasai mênêr terus-ijolan. Nang mapaké iki, kéné dadi model nan alat sing iso nggambar nggawe jata-winih lan nggawe barang karo sekang komentar kuwi perintar. Awak dhéwé éntuk karo akeh sabanjuré ing pancen dumadhi luwih dumadhi iki, nik awak dhéwé kuwi duluran, ngono nambah sing ora bisa pasakno akeh sampeyan model sing koyo ngono régleksi (logistik). Awak dhéwé aplikasi model sing ditambahak karo pertualisan karo pertualisan sing dadi nggawe pertualisan karo pertualisan kuwi nggawe barang dhéwé, kuwi nggawe barang dhéwé, model kuwi nggawe pertualisan wih-wih apik dhéwé.', 'he': 'חוסר הציבור בתנאי ציבורי היה דאגה גדולה בזמנים האחרונים, כיוון שהוא יכול להשפיע על איכות ועמדות התנאי שלילית. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים דוגמנים עצביים שיכולים ללמוד לזהות קריאות בשמות ובולגריות מחלק הערות בעיתון. אנו מראים כי בניגוד לעבודה קודמת על גילוי שפה רעילה, פגיעות מוצפנות כמו קריאת שם לא יכולות להיגלות בדיוק על ידי דוגמנים פשוטים כמו חזרה לוגיסטית. אנו משתמשים בדוגמנים מאומנים על נתוני הערות בעיתון כדי לזהות הערות בלתי נבונות בסט נתוני טרול רוסי, ומצאים שלמרות השינוי של שטח, הדוגמנית עושה ציפויים מדויקים.', 'sk': 'Incivilnost javnega diskurza je v zadnjem času glavna skrb, saj lahko negativno vpliva na kakovost in vztrajnost diskurza. V prispevku predstavljamo nevronske modele, ki se lahko naučijo zaznati imenovanje in vulgarnost iz oddelka komentarjev časopisov. Pokazali smo, da v nasprotju s predhodnim delom pri odkrivanju strupenih jezikov drobnozrnatih incivilnosti, kot je imenovanje, ni mogoče natančno zaznati s preprostimi modeli, kot je logistična regresija. Modele, usposobljene na podlagi podatkov o časopisnih komentarjih, uporabljamo za zaznavanje nevilnih komentarjev v ruskem naboru podatkov trolov in ugotovimo, da model kljub spremembi domene natančno napoveduje.', 'ha': "Ina-wahala da magana a cikin jamii a yanzu kwanan da yake iya shagala ga sifantin da bakwai. Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da misãlai na neura, wanda za su iya sanar su iya gane sunan kirãyi da sura daga rabon kalmar mai raɗari. Tuna nũna cewa, sami da ruwan aiki na gaba ga gane harshen mai giza, ba za'a gane abubuwa mai kyau kamar sunan kirãyi ba da inganci da misãlai masu sauƙi kamar rajistan logistic. Tuna amfani da misãlai wanda aka sanar da shi a kan karatun-karatun dõmin ka gane wa'azi masu basu'a cikin danne-danne na rususi, kuma mu gane cewa, kuma, kõ da an musanya musanyi na Domin, misalin ya sanya bayani na gaske.", 'bo': 'མི་མང་གི་བསམ་བརླག་སྐབས་ནང་གི་འཕེལ་རྒྱ་ནག་དུ་གཏོང་འཕེལ་མཐུན་ནི་ཉེ་ཆར་ཡིན་པས། གང་འདྲ་ཡིན་ཡང་སླེབས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་གནས་སྟ འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་དྲ་དམའ་དབུགས་ཀྱི་མིང་མེད་དང་སྙིང་ཁང་ཅིག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་སྟོན འུ་ཅག་གིས་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་རྟགས་ལ་ཕན་ཚུན་བློ་གཏོང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་ཐོག་མའི་མ་དབུགས་གཟུགས་རིས་དེ་ཚོ་སྒྲུང་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་མཆན་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་རྟོགས་བཤོལ་བྱེད་སྐབས་བཤད་བྱས་མེད་ད'}
{'en': 'Generating Animations from Screenplays', 'ar': 'توليد الرسوم المتحركة من سيناريوهات', 'es': 'Generar animaciones desde guiones', 'fr': "Génération d'animations à partir de scénarios", 'pt': 'Gerando animações a partir de roteiros', 'ja': '脚本からアニメーションを生成する', 'zh': '自剧本生动画', 'hi': 'स्क्रीनप्ले से एनिमेशन जनरेट करना', 'ru': 'Создание анимации из сценариев', 'ga': 'Beochan a Ghiniúint ó Screenplays', 'el': 'Δημιουργία κινούμενων σχεδίων από σενάρια', 'it': 'Generare animazioni dalle schermate', 'kk': 'Экран ойындарынан анимацияларын құру', 'ka': 'Name', 'lt': 'Animacijų iš ekrano kūrimas', 'mk': 'Генерирање анимации од екранските снимки', 'ml': 'സ്ക്രീന്\u200d കളികളില്\u200d നിന്നും ആനിമേഷനുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Il-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Annimazzjonijiet minn Skrinplays', 'mn': 'Экран тоглогчдын зураг үүсгэх', 'no': 'Lagar animasjonar frå skjermspelar', 'ro': 'Generarea animațiilor din ecrane', 'hu': 'Animációk generálása forgatókönyvekből', 'si': 'ස්ක්\u200dරීන් ප්ලේයිම් වලින් ඇනිමේෂන් නිර්මාණය කරනවා', 'so': 'Generating Animations from Screenplays', 'sv': 'Generera animeringar från skärmspel', 'ta': 'திரை விளையாடுகளில் இருந்து அசைவூட்டத்தை உருவாக்குகிறது', 'ms': 'Menjana Animasi dari Main Skrin', 'pl': 'Generowanie animacji ze scenariuszy', 'sr': 'Generisanje animacija iz ekranskih igrača', 'ur': 'اسکرینپ پلی سے انیامیشن پیدا کی جاتی ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tạo hình hoạt cảnh', 'hr': 'Generiranje animacija iz ekranskih igrača', 'bg': 'Генериране на анимации от сценарии', 'nl': "Animaties genereren uit scenario's", 'da': 'Genererer animationer fra skærmbilleder', 'de': 'Animationen aus Drehbüchern generieren', 'id': 'Membuat Animasi dari Main Skrin', 'fa': 'ایجاد Animations از بازی\u200cهای پرده\u200cها', 'ko': '시나리오에서 애니메이션 생성', 'sw': 'Kutengeneza wanyama kutoka kwenye michezo ya Screen', 'tr': 'Äpişgelerden janlaşdyrylar', 'af': 'Skep Animasies van Skermspeletjies', 'sq': 'Duke krijuar animacione nga ekrani', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Էկրանխաղերից ստեղծելով անիմացիաներ', 'az': 'Ekran Oyunları', 'bn': 'স্ক্রীনপ্লেইস থেকে অ্যানিমেশন তৈরি করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Generiranje animacija iz ekranskih igrača', 'ca': 'generar animacions a partir de màquines', 'cs': 'Generování animací ze scénářů', 'et': 'Animatsioonide genereerimine stsenaariumidest', 'fi': 'Luodaan animaatioita käsikirjoituksista', 'jv': 'Screensaver disable', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje animacij iz scenarijev', 'bo': 'Disc Image', 'he': 'יצירת נימוסים משחקי מסך'}
{'en': 'Automatically generating animation from natural language text finds application in a number of areas e.g. movie script writing, instructional videos, and public safety. However, translating natural language text into animation is a challenging task. Existing text-to-animation systems can handle only very simple sentences, which limits their applications. In this paper, we develop a text-to-animation system which is capable of handling complex sentences. We achieve this by introducing a text simplification step into the process. Building on an existing animation generation system for screenwriting, we create a robust NLP pipeline to extract information from screenplays and map them to the system’s knowledge base. We develop a set of linguistic transformation rules that simplify complex sentences. Information extracted from the simplified sentences is used to generate a rough storyboard and video depicting the text. Our sentence simplification module outperforms existing systems in terms of BLEU and SARI metrics. We further evaluated our system via a user study : 68 % participants believe that our system generates reasonable animation from input screenplays.', 'pt': 'A geração automática de animação a partir de texto em linguagem natural encontra aplicação em várias áreas, por exemplo, roteiro de filmes, vídeos instrutivos e segurança pública. No entanto, traduzir texto em linguagem natural em animação é uma tarefa desafiadora. Os sistemas de texto para animação existentes podem lidar apenas com frases muito simples, o que limita suas aplicações. Neste artigo, desenvolvemos um sistema de texto para animação capaz de lidar com frases complexas. Conseguimos isso introduzindo uma etapa de simplificação de texto no processo. Com base em um sistema de geração de animação existente para roteiro, criamos um pipeline de NLP robusto para extrair informações de roteiros e mapeá-las para a base de conhecimento do sistema. Desenvolvemos um conjunto de regras de transformação linguística que simplificam frases complexas. As informações extraídas das frases simplificadas são usadas para gerar um storyboard aproximado e um vídeo que descreve o texto. Nosso módulo de simplificação de frases supera os sistemas existentes em termos de métricas BLEU e SARI. Avaliamos ainda mais nosso sistema por meio de um estudo com usuários: 68% dos participantes acreditam que nosso sistema gera animação razoável a partir de roteiros de entrada.', 'ar': 'يؤدي إنشاء الرسوم المتحركة تلقائيًا من نص بلغة طبيعية إلى العثور على تطبيق في عدد من المجالات على سبيل المثال كتابة سيناريو الفيلم ومقاطع الفيديو التعليمية والسلامة العامة. ومع ذلك ، فإن ترجمة نص اللغة الطبيعية إلى رسوم متحركة مهمة صعبة. يمكن لأنظمة تحويل النص إلى رسوم متحركة الحالية التعامل مع جمل بسيطة للغاية ، مما يحد من تطبيقاتها. في هذا البحث ، قمنا بتطوير نظام تحويل النص إلى رسوم متحركة قادر على التعامل مع الجمل المعقدة. نحقق ذلك من خلال إدخال خطوة تبسيط النص في العملية. بناءً على نظام إنشاء الرسوم المتحركة الحالي لكتابة السيناريو ، نقوم بإنشاء خط أنابيب قوي للغة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية لاستخراج المعلومات من السيناريوهات وتعيينها إلى قاعدة معرفة النظام. نقوم بتطوير مجموعة من قواعد التحول اللغوي التي تبسط الجمل المعقدة. يتم استخدام المعلومات المستخرجة من الجمل المبسطة لإنشاء لوحة عمل تقريبية وفيديو يصور النص. تتفوق وحدة تبسيط الجمل الخاصة بنا على الأنظمة الحالية من حيث مقاييس BLEU و SARI. قمنا بتقييم نظامنا من خلال دراسة المستخدم: يعتقد 68٪ من المشاركين أن نظامنا يولد رسومًا متحركة معقولة من شاشات الإدخال.', 'es': 'La generación automática de animaciones a partir de texto en lenguaje natural tiene aplicación en varias áreas, por ejemplo, redacción de guiones de películas, videos instructivos y seguridad pública. Sin embargo, traducir texto en lenguaje natural a animación es una tarea difícil. Los sistemas de conversión de texto a animación existentes solo pueden manejar oraciones muy simples, lo que limita sus aplicaciones. En este artículo, desarrollamos un sistema de conversión de texto a animación que es capaz de manejar oraciones complejas. Lo logramos introduciendo un paso de simplificación del texto en el proceso. Basándonos en un sistema de generación de animación existente para la escritura de guiones, creamos una sólida canalización de PNL para extraer información de los guiones y asignarlos a la base de conocimientos del sistema. Desarrollamos un conjunto de reglas de transformación lingüística que simplifican las oraciones complejas. La información extraída de las oraciones simplificadas se utiliza para generar un guion gráfico aproximado y un video que representa el texto. Nuestro módulo de simplificación de frases supera a los sistemas existentes en términos de métricas BLEU y SARI. Evaluamos nuestro sistema a través de un estudio de usuarios: el 68% de los participantes cree que nuestro sistema genera una animación razonable a partir de guiones de entrada.', 'fr': "La génération automatique d'animations à partir de texte en langage naturel trouve des applications dans un certain nombre de domaines, tels que l'écriture de scénarios de films, les vidéos pédagogiques et la sécurité publique. Cependant, traduire un texte en langage naturel en animation est une tâche ardue. Les systèmes texte-animation existants ne peuvent traiter que des phrases très simples, ce qui limite leurs applications. Dans cet article, nous développons un système texte-animation capable de traiter des phrases complexes. Nous y parvenons en introduisant une étape de simplification du texte dans le processus. En nous appuyant sur un système de génération d'animation existant pour l'écriture de scénarios, nous créons un solide pipeline de NLP pour extraire les informations des scénarios et les mapper à la base de connaissances du système. Nous développons un ensemble de règles de transformation linguistique qui simplifient les phrases complexes. Les informations extraites des phrases simplifiées sont utilisées pour générer un storyboard approximatif et une vidéo décrivant le texte. Notre module de simplification des phrases surpasse les systèmes existants en termes de métriques BLEU et SARI. Nous avons ensuite évalué notre système via une étude utilisateur\xa0: 68\xa0% des participants pensent que notre système génère une animation raisonnable à partir de scénarios saisis.", 'zh': '自然语言文本自生动画多有应用,如电影剧本编次,教学视频公共安全。 然转自然语言文本动画一挑战性之任也。 今文本至动画统惟理非常简单句,此限其用也。 在本文中,我们开发了一个能理杂句子的文本到动画系统。 我们在流程中引入文本简化步步。 于今动画生编剧,创一强NLP管道,取信于剧本,映于统知识库。 开言转法,以简杂句。 简句取息以成粗视频。 吾句简化模块于BLEU、SARI指标优于今。 以用户论之:68%者参与者以我之系统为生理之动画剧本。', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा पाठ से स्वचालित रूप से एनीमेशन उत्पन्न करने से कई क्षेत्रों में आवेदन मिलता है जैसे कि फिल्म स्क्रिप्ट लेखन, अनुदेशात्मक वीडियो और सार्वजनिक सुरक्षा। हालांकि, प्राकृतिक भाषा पाठ का एनीमेशन में अनुवाद करना एक चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य है। मौजूदा टेक्स्ट-टू-एनीमेशन सिस्टम केवल बहुत ही सरल वाक्यों को संभाल सकते हैं, जो उनके अनुप्रयोगों को सीमित करता है। इस पेपर में, हम एक टेक्स्ट-टू-एनीमेशन सिस्टम विकसित करते हैं जो जटिल वाक्यों को संभालने में सक्षम है। हम प्रक्रिया में एक पाठ सरलीकरण कदम पेश करके इसे प्राप्त करते हैं। स्क्रीनराइटिंग के लिए एक मौजूदा एनीमेशन जनरेशन सिस्टम पर बिल्डिंग, हम स्क्रीनप्ले से जानकारी निकालने और उन्हें सिस्टम के ज्ञान के आधार पर मैप करने के लिए एक मजबूत एनएलपी पाइपलाइन बनाते हैं। हम भाषाई परिवर्तन नियमों का एक सेट विकसित करते हैं जो जटिल वाक्यों को सरल बनाते हैं। सरलीकृत वाक्यों से निकाली गई जानकारी का उपयोग पाठ को चित्रित करने वाले किसी न किसी स्टोरीबोर्ड और वीडियो को उत्पन्न करने के लिए किया जाता है। हमारे वाक्य सरलीकरण मॉड्यूल BLEU और एसएआरआई मैट्रिक्स के संदर्भ में मौजूदा प्रणालियों outperforms. हमने एक उपयोगकर्ता अध्ययन के माध्यम से अपने सिस्टम का मूल्यांकन किया: 68% प्रतिभागियों का मानना है कि हमारा सिस्टम इनपुट स्क्रीनप्ले से उचित एनीमेशन उत्पन्न करता है।', 'ja': '自然言語のテキストからアニメーションを自動生成すると、映画のスクリプト書き込み、インストラクションビデオ、公共の安全など、多くの分野でアプリケーションが見つかります。 しかし、自然言語のテキストをアニメーションに翻訳することは困難な作業です。 既存のテキストツーアニメーションシステムは、アプリケーションを制限する非常に単純な文章しか処理できません。 本稿では、複雑な文章を扱えるテキストツーアニメーションシステムを開発する。 プロセスにテキストの簡略化ステップを導入することで、これを実現します。 既存の脚本作成用アニメーション生成システムを基に、脚本から情報を抽出し、システムのナレッジベースにマッピングするための堅牢なNLPパイプラインを作成します。 複雑な文章を簡素化する一連の言語変換ルールを開発しています。 簡略化された文章から抽出された情報は、テキストを描写する大まかなストーリーボードおよびビデオを生成するために使用される。 文の簡略化モジュールは、BLEUとSARIの指標で既存のシステムを上回っています。ユーザー調査を通じてさらに当社のシステムを評価しました。68%の参加者は、当社のシステムが入力された脚本から合理的なアニメーションを生成すると信じています。', 'ru': 'Автоматическое создание анимации из текста на естественном языке находит применение в ряде областей, например, в написании сценариев фильмов, обучающих видео и общественной безопасности. Однако перевод текста на естественном языке в анимацию - сложная задача. Существующие системы преобразования текста в анимацию могут обрабатывать только очень простые предложения, что ограничивает их применение. В данной работе мы разрабатываем систему анимации текста, которая способна обрабатывать сложные предложения. Мы достигаем этого, вводя в процесс этап упрощения текста. Основываясь на существующей системе генерации анимации для сценариев, мы создаем надежный конвейер NLP для извлечения информации из сценариев и привязки их к базе знаний системы. Мы разрабатываем набор правил языковой трансформации, которые упрощают сложные предложения. Информация, извлеченная из упрощенных предложений, используется для создания грубой раскадровки и видеоролика, изображающего текст. Наш модуль упрощения предложений превосходит существующие системы по показателям BLEU и SARI. Мы дополнительно оценили нашу систему с помощью пользовательского исследования: 68% участников считают, что наша система генерирует разумную анимацию из входных сценариев.', 'ga': 'Trí bheochan a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch ó théacs teanga nádúrtha aimsítear feidhm i roinnt réimsí m.sh. scríobh script scannáin, físeáin teagaisc, agus sábháilteacht an phobail. Mar sin féin, is tasc dúshlánach é téacs teanga nádúrtha a aistriú go beochan. Ní féidir le córais téacs-go-beochana atá ann faoi láthair ach abairtí an-simplí a láimhseáil, rud a chuireann srian lena bhfeidhmchláir. Sa pháipéar seo, forbraímid córas téacs-go-beochan atá in ann abairtí casta a láimhseáil. Bainimid é seo amach trí chéim shimpliú téacs a thabhairt isteach sa phróiseas. Ag tógáil ar chóras giniúna beochana atá ann cheana le haghaidh scríbhneoireacht scáileáin, cruthaímid píblíne láidir NLP chun faisnéis a bhaint as scripteanna scannáin agus iad a mhapáil go dtí bonn eolais an chórais. Forbraímid sraith rialacha claochlaithe teanga a shimplíonn abairtí casta. Baintear úsáid as an eolas a bhaintear as na habairtí simplithe chun clár scéil garbh agus fístéip a chruthú a thaispeánann an téacs. Is fearr lenár modúl simplithe pianbhreithe na córais atá ann cheana i dtéarmaí méadracht BLEU agus SARI. Rinneamar measúnú breise ar ár gcóras trí staidéar úsáideora: creideann 68% de na rannpháirtithe go ngineann ár gcóras beochan réasúnta ó scripteanna ionchuir.', 'ka': 'ავტომატურად ანიმაციის წარმოიქმნა თავისუფალური ენერგიის ტექსტიდან პროგრამის რამდენიმე ფაილებში, მაგალითად ფილმის სკრიპტის წერილება, ინსტრუქტურული ვიდეოები მაგრამ, ბუნებრივი ენერგიის ტექსტის ანიმიკაციაში გადატანა შესაძლებელი რაოდენობა. არსებობს ტექსტის ანიმეციის სისტემი შეუძლია მხოლოდ მხოლოდ მარტივი სიტყვები, რომელიც მათი პროგრამების შედგა. ამ წიგნიში, ჩვენ ტექსტის ანიმაციის სისტემის განვითარებით, რომელიც შეუძლია კომპლექსი სიტყვების გარეშე. ჩვენ ეს პროცესში ტექსტის განსახულებლად გავაკეთებთ. ჩვენ შევქმნა ძალიან ძალიან NLP ფეხლინი, რომ ინფორმაციას სკრინოდან გამოვაკეთოთ და შევქმნა ისინი სისტემის მეცნიერების ბაზაზე. ჩვენ განვითარებთ ლენგურისტიკური ტრანფიგურაციის წესები, რომლებიც კომპლექსიკური წესების გამოყენება. ინფორმაცია გამოყენებული სიტყვებიდან გამოყენებული სიტყვებიდან გამოყენება, რომ ტექსტის გამოყენება ძალიან სიტყვების და ვიდეოს შექმნა. ჩვენი წესების განსხვავება მოდულია უფრო გავაკეთება მსგავსი სისტემის შესახებ BLEU და SARI მეტრიკის შესახებ. ჩვენ შემდეგ ჩვენი სისტემა გამოყენებელი სწავლის გამოყენებაზე გავუმუშავეთ: 68% მოთავსდებელი იფიქრობენ რომ ჩვენი სისტემა წარმოიდგინელი ანიმაცია ჩვენი', 'el': 'Η αυτόματη δημιουργία κινούμενων σχεδίων από κείμενο φυσικής γλώσσας βρίσκει εφαρμογή σε διάφορους τομείς, π.χ. συγγραφή σεναρίων ταινιών, εκπαιδευτικά βίντεο και δημόσια ασφάλεια. Ωστόσο, η μετάφραση κειμένου φυσικής γλώσσας σε κινούμενα σχέδια είναι ένα δύσκολο έργο. Τα υπάρχοντα συστήματα κειμένου-κίνησης μπορούν να χειριστούν μόνο πολύ απλές προτάσεις, γεγονός που περιορίζει τις εφαρμογές τους. Σε αυτή την εργασία, αναπτύσσουμε ένα σύστημα κειμένου-σε-κινούμενα σχέδια που είναι ικανό να χειριστεί πολύπλοκες προτάσεις. Αυτό επιτυγχάνουμε εισάγοντας ένα βήμα απλούστευσης του κειμένου στη διαδικασία. Βασιζόμενοι σε ένα υπάρχον σύστημα δημιουργίας κινούμενων σχεδίων για τη συγγραφή σεναρίων, δημιουργούμε έναν ισχυρό αγωγό για να εξάγουμε πληροφορίες από σενάρια και να τις χαρτογραφήσουμε στη βάση γνώσεων του συστήματος. Αναπτύσσουμε ένα σύνολο κανόνων γλωσσικού μετασχηματισμού που απλοποιούν πολύπλοκες προτάσεις. Οι πληροφορίες που εξάγονται από τις απλοποιημένες προτάσεις χρησιμοποιούνται για τη δημιουργία ενός τραχύ σεναρίου και βίντεο που απεικονίζουν το κείμενο. Η ενότητα απλοποίησης προτάσεων μας ξεπερνά τα υπάρχοντα συστήματα όσον αφορά τις μετρήσεις BLEU και SARI. Αξιολογήσαμε περαιτέρω το σύστημά μας μέσω μελέτης χρηστών: 68% οι συμμετέχοντες πιστεύουν ότι το σύστημά μας παράγει λογική κίνηση από σενάρια εισόδου.', 'kk': 'Табиғи тілден анимациялау автоматты түрде бірнеше аумақтарда, мысалы, фильм скрипті жазу, мәлімет бейнелері және қауіпсіздік. Name Бірақ, табиғи тілді анимацияға аудару - қиын тапсырма. Бар мәтіннен анимациялау жүйелері тек қарапайым сөйлемелерді шектеуге болады. Бұл қолданбаларын шектеуге болады. Бұл қағазда біз комплекс сөйлемелерді қадағалай алатын мәтін анимациялау жүйесін құрамыз. Біз бұл процестің мәтінді қарапайым көмегімен жеткіземіз. Экран жазуларының анимациялау жүйесін құру үшін біз экран ойындарынан мәліметті тарқату үшін жүйесінің білім негізіне картасын құрамыз. Біз лингвистикалық түрлендіру ережелерін құрамыз, кәдімгі сөздерді қарапайым көмектеседі. Қарапайым сөздерден алынған мәлімет мәтінді көрсету үшін қиын жүгірткі және видео құрылады. Біздің сөздерді қарапайым модуліміз BLEU және SARI метрикалық тәртібімен бар жүйелерді жасайды. Біз жүйемізді пайдаланушыларды зерттеу арқылы бағаладық: 68% қатысушылар жүйеміздің енгізу сұлбаларынан тәуелді анимациясын жасайтын деп ойлайды.', 'mk': 'Автоматски генерирање анимација од текстот на природниот јазик ја пронајде апликацијата во неколку области, како што е пишувањето на филмски скрипти, инструкционалните видеа и јавната безбедност. Сепак, преведувањето на текстот на природниот јазик во анимација е предизвикувачка задача. Постојаните системи од текст до анимација можат да се справат со многу едноставни реченици, кои ги ограничуваат нивните апликации. In this paper, we develop a text-to-animation system which is capable of handling complex sentences.  We achieve this by introducing a text simplification step into the process.  Изградувајќи на постојан систем на генерација на анимации за скринпирање, создаваме силен нафтовод НЛП за извлекување информации од екранските снимки и мапирање на нив на базата на знаење на системот. Развиваме набор на правила за јазична трансформација кои ги поедноставуваат комплексните реченици. Информациите извадени од поедноставените реченици се користат за генерирање груба табла за приказни и видео на текстот. Our sentence simplification module outperforms existing systems in terms of BLEU and SARI metrics. We further evaluated our system via a user study: 68% participants believe that our system generates reasonable animation from input screenplays.', 'lt': 'Automatiškai sukuriama animacija iš natūralaus kalbos teksto randama programa daugelyje sričių, pvz., filmų scenarijų rašymas, mokymo vaizdo įrašai ir visuomenės saugumas. However, translating natural language text into animation is a challenging task.  Esamos teksto–animacijos sistemos gali tvarkyti tik labai paprastus sakinius, kurie apriboja jų taikymą. Šiame dokumente sukuriame teksto ir animacijos sistemą, kuri gali tvarkyti sudėtingus sakinius. Mes tai siekiame įtraukdami teksto supaprastinimo žingsnį į procesą. Remdamiesi esama ekrano rašymo animacijos generavimo sistema, sukuriame tvirtą NLP vamzdyną, kad išimtume informaciją iš ekrano įrašų ir žemėlapį į sistemos žinių bazę. Kuriame kalbų keitimo taisyklių rinkinį, supaprastinantį sudėtingus sakinius. Information extracted from the simplified sentences is used to generate a rough storyboard and video depicting the text.  Mūsų sakinių supaprastinimo modulis viršija esamas BLEU ir SARI metrines sistemas. Toliau vertinome savo sistemą atlikdami vartotojų tyrimą: 68 proc. dalyvių mano, kad mūsų sistema sukuria pagrįstą animaciją iš įėjimo ekrano.', 'hu': 'Az animáció automatikus generálása természetes nyelvű szövegből számos területen talál alkalmazást, például filmforgatókönyv írása, oktató videók és közbiztonság. A természetes nyelvű szöveg animációba való fordítása azonban kihívást jelent. A meglévő szöveg-animációs rendszerek csak nagyon egyszerű mondatokat tudnak kezelni, ami korlátozza alkalmazásukat. Ebben a tanulmányban olyan szöveg-animációs rendszert fejlesztünk ki, amely képes komplex mondatok kezelésére. Ezt úgy érjük el, hogy bevezetjük a szöveg egyszerűsítését a folyamatba. A forgatókönyvírás meglévő animációs generációs rendszerére építve egy robusztus NLP csővezetéket hozunk létre, amely információkat nyer ki a forgatókönyvekből, és feltérképezi őket a rendszer tudásbázisához. Olyan nyelvi átalakítási szabályokat dolgozunk ki, amelyek egyszerűsítik a komplex mondatokat. Az egyszerűsített mondatokból kinyert információkat a szöveget ábrázoló durva forgatókönyv és videó generálására használják. A mondat-egyszerűsítő modulunk felülmúlja a meglévő rendszereket a BLEU és a SARI mutatók tekintetében. Felhasználói tanulmány segítségével értékeltük továbbá rendszerünket: a résztvevők 68%-a úgy véli, hogy rendszerünk ésszerű animációt generál a bemeneti forgatókönyvekből.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും ആനിമേഷന്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നത് സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വയം കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു. ഉദാഹരണ However, translating natural language text into animation is a challenging task.  നിലവിലുള്ള പദാവലിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ആനിമേഷന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റമിനുകള്\u200d ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ടെക്സ്റ്റ് മുതല്\u200d ആനിമേഷന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ കൈകാര്യം കൈ പ്രക്രിയയിലേക്ക് ഒരു ടെക്സ്റ്റെക്സ് എളുപ്പമുള്ള പടി പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഇത് എത സ്ക്രീന്\u200d എഴുതുന്നതിനായി നിലവിലുള്ള ആനിമേഷന്\u200d തലമുറയുടെ സിസ്റ്റമില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d NLP പൈപ്പൈലൈന്\u200d നാം ഒര നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു കൂട്ടം ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. അത് കുഴപ്പമുള്ള വാക്കു എളുപ്പമുള്ള വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും എടുത്തുകൊണ്ടുവന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പദാവലി കാണിക്കുന്നതിന് കഠിനമായ സ്റ്റോബോ നമ്മുടെ വാക്ക് ലളിതമാക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റമുള്ള പ്രക്രിയകള്\u200d ബ്ലിയുവിന്റെയും സാറിയിലെ മെറ്റിക്സിന്റെയും  നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തെ കൂടുതല്\u200d വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തി: 68% പങ്കാളികള്\u200d വിശ്വസിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ഇന്\u200d', 'mt': "Automatically generating animation from natural language text finds application in a number of areas e.g. movie script writing, instructional videos, and public safety.  Madankollu, it-traduzzjoni tat-test tal-lingwa naturali fl-animazzjoni hija kompitu ta’ sfida. Is-sistemi eżistenti tat-test għall-animazzjoni jistgħu jimmaniġġjaw biss sentenzi sempliċi ħafna, li jillimitaw l-applikazzjonijiet tagħhom. F’dan id-dokument, qed niżviluppaw sistema ta’ test għall-animazzjoni li kapaċi timmaniġġja sentenzi kumplessi. Aħna nilħqu dan billi jintroduċu pass ta' simplifikazzjoni tat-test fil-proċess. Filwaqt li nibnu fuq sistema eżistenti ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ animazzjoni għall-iskrinjar, a ħna nħolqu pipeline NLP b’saħħtu biex neħħew l-informazzjoni mill-iskrinjar u nmappjawhom lejn il-bażi tal-għarfien tas-sistema. We develop a set of linguistic transformation rules that simplify complex sentences.  L-informazzjoni estratta mis-sentenzi ssimplifikati tintuża biex tiġġenera storyboard u vidjo grossi li jiddeskrivu t-test. Our sentence simplification module outperforms existing systems in terms of BLEU and SARI metrics. Aħna evalwajna aktar is-sistema tagħna permezz ta' studju tal-utenti: 68% tal-parteċipanti jemmnu li s-sistema tagħna tiġġenera animazzjoni raġonevoli minn skrinjas ta' input.", 'it': "La generazione automatica di animazioni dal testo in linguaggio naturale trova applicazione in una serie di aree, ad esempio la scrittura di sceneggiature cinematografiche, video didattici e sicurezza pubblica. Tuttavia, tradurre testo in linguaggio naturale in animazione è un compito impegnativo. I sistemi di testo-animazione esistenti possono gestire solo frasi molto semplici, il che limita le loro applicazioni. In questo articolo sviluppiamo un sistema di testo-animazione in grado di gestire frasi complesse. A tal fine introduciamo nel processo una fase di semplificazione del testo. Basandoci su un sistema esistente di generazione di animazioni per la sceneggiatura, creiamo una solida pipeline NLP per estrarre informazioni dalle sceneggiature e mapparle alla base di conoscenze del sistema. Sviluppiamo un insieme di regole di trasformazione linguistica che semplificano frasi complesse. Le informazioni estratte dalle frasi semplificate vengono utilizzate per generare uno storyboard grezzo e un video raffigurante il testo. Il nostro modulo di semplificazione delle frasi supera i sistemi esistenti in termini di metriche BLEU e SARI. Abbiamo ulteriormente valutato il nostro sistema attraverso uno studio utente: il 68% dei partecipanti ritiene che il nostro sistema generi un'animazione ragionevole dalle sceneggiature di input.", 'no': 'Lagar animasjon frå naturspråksteksten automatisk finn program i mange område, f.eks. skriving av filmskript, instruksjonsvideoar og offentleg trygg. Omsetjing av naturspråket til animasjonen er imidlertid eit vanskeleg oppgåve. Det eksisterande tekst-til-animasjonssystemet kan berre handtera svært enkle setningar, som begrenser programmet sine. I denne papiret utviklar vi eit tekst- til- animasjonssystem som kan handtera komplekse setningar. Vi oppnår dette ved å introdusera ein tekstforenklingsteg i prosessen. For å bygge på eit eksisterande animasjonssystem for skjermskriving, oppretter vi ein robust NLP- røyr for å pakka ut informasjon frå skjermspelar og kartera dei til systemets kjenningsbasen. Vi utviklar eit sett språkstransformeringsreglar som forenklar komplekse setningar. Informasjon utpakka frå dei enkelte setningane vert brukt for å laga eit vanskeleg storleik og video som viser teksten. Dette setningsmodulet utfører dei eksisterande systema med BLEU og SARI-metrikn. Vi evaluerte systemet vårt lenger via ein brukarstudie: 68% deltakarar tror at systemet vårt genererer raskt animasjon frå inndata-skjermspelar.', 'ro': 'Generarea automată a animației din text în limbaj natural găsește aplicații într-o serie de domenii, de exemplu scrierea scenariului de film, videoclipuri instrucționale și siguranța publică. Cu toate acestea, traducerea textului în limbaj natural în animație este o sarcină dificilă. Sistemele text-animate existente pot gestiona doar propoziții foarte simple, ceea ce limitează aplicațiile lor. În această lucrare, dezvoltăm un sistem text-animat capabil să gestioneze propoziții complexe. Realizăm acest lucru prin introducerea unui pas de simplificare a textului în proces. Bazându-ne pe un sistem existent de generare a animației pentru scenariu, creăm o conductă NLP robustă pentru extragerea informațiilor din scenarii și cartografierea lor la baza de cunoștințe a sistemului. Dezvoltăm un set de reguli de transformare lingvistică care simplifică propozițiile complexe. Informațiile extrase din propozițiile simplificate sunt utilizate pentru a genera un storyboard dur și un video care descrie textul. Modulul nostru de simplificare a frazelor depășește sistemele existente în ceea ce privește valorile BLEU și SARI. Am evaluat în continuare sistemul nostru printr-un studiu de utilizator: 68% dintre participanți consideră că sistemul nostru generează animații rezonabile din scenariile de intrare.', 'ms': 'Menjana animasi secara automatik dari teks bahasa semulajadi mencari aplikasi dalam beberapa kawasan, cth. penulisan skrip filem, video arahan, dan keselamatan awam. Namun, menerjemahkan teks bahasa alami ke dalam animasi adalah tugas yang mencabar. Sistem teks-ke-animasi yang wujud hanya boleh mengendalikan kalimat yang sangat mudah, yang membatasi aplikasi mereka. Dalam kertas ini, kita mengembangkan sistem teks-ke-animasi yang mampu mengendalikan kalimat kompleks. Kami mencapainya dengan memperkenalkan langkah pemudahan teks ke dalam proses. Membangun pada sistem generasi animasi yang wujud untuk menulis skrin, kami mencipta saluran paip NLP yang kuat untuk mengekstrak maklumat dari main skrin dan petanya ke pangkalan pengetahuan sistem. Kami mengembangkan satu set peraturan perubahan bahasa yang mempermudahkan kalimat kompleks. Maklumat yang diekstrak dari kalimat mudah digunakan untuk menghasilkan papan cerita kasar dan video menggambar teks. Modul kemudahan kalimat kami melebihi sistem sedia ada dalam terma metrik BLEU dan SARI. Kami mengevaluasi sistem kami melalui kajian pengguna: 68% peserta percaya bahawa sistem kami menghasilkan animasi yang masuk akal dari skrin input.', 'sr': 'Automatski generiranje animacije iz teksta prirodnog jezika nalazi se aplikacija u mnogim područjima, npr. pisanje filmskih skripta, instruktivnih video i javne sigurnosti. Međutim, prevod prirodnog jezika u animaciju je izazovan zadatak. Postojeći sistemi teksta do animacije mogu podnijeti samo jednostavne rečenice, koje ograničavaju njihove aplikacije. U ovom papiru razvijemo sistem teksta do animacije koji je sposoban da vodi kompleksne rečenice. To smo postigli predstavljanjem tekstualnog pojednostavljanja koraka u proces. Na postojećem sistemu generacije animacija za snimanje scenarija, stvorimo jačan NLP pipeline kako bi izvukli informacije iz snimka i mapirali ih na sistemsku bazu znanja. Razvijamo set lingvističkih transformacijskih pravila koje jednostavljaju kompleksne rečenice. Informacije izvedene iz jednostavnih rečenica koriste se za proizvedenje teških prikazivača i video koji pokazuju tekst. Naš modul pojednostavljanja rečenice iznosi postojeće sisteme u smislu BLEU-a i SARI metrike. Dalje smo procenili naš sistem kroz studiju korisnika: 68% učesnika veruju da naš sistem stvara razumnu animaciju iz snimanja snimaka.', 'so': 'Shaqoyinka sawirada ah e e laga soo sameeyo qoraalka afka dabiiciga ah wuxuu dalban karaa codsiga meelo badan, tusaale ahaan qoraalka filimada, fiidiyowyada hagitaanka iyo ammaanka dadweynaha. Si kastaba ha ahaatee ku turjumidda qoraalka afka dabiiciga ah ee ku saabsan animatiyadu waa shaqo dhibaato badan. Isticmaalka sawirada ah ee uu heysto waxay maamuli karaan erayo aad u fudud oo kaliya, kaas oo ku xadi kara codsigooda. In this paper, we develop a text-to-animation system which is capable of handling complex sentences.  Waxan baannu gaadhnaa marka aan soo bandhijinno tallaabo sahlisan oo qoraal ah. Buildayno nidaam muuqashada ah oo ku qoran screenshaha, waxaynu sameynaa gabayl la dhacay NLP si a an macluumaad uga soo saarno ciyaaraha screenshaha waxaana ku sawiraa aasaaska aqoonta nidaamka. Waxaan horumarinaa sharciyada is-beddelka luuqadaha, taasoo fududeeya hadallada adag. Macluumaadka ka soo baxay erayada sahlan waxaa loo isticmaalaa in uu sameeyo qalabka warqadda iyo fiidiyowga sawirida qoraalka. Heshiiska fududaanka ee ereyadeenu wuxuu ka muujiyaa nidaamka joogta ee BLEU iyo metricyada SARI. Sidoo kale waxaynu nidaamka ku qiimeynay waxbarashada isticmaalka: 68% ka qayb galay waxay aaminsamayaan in nidaamka ay ka soo bandhigaan sawir rasmi ah oo ay ka timaadaan ciyaaraha screenshaha.', 'pl': 'Automatyczne generowanie animacji z tekstu języka naturalnego znajduje zastosowanie w wielu obszarach, np. pisanie scenariuszy filmów, filmy instrukcyjne i bezpieczeństwo publiczne. Jednak tłumaczenie tekstu języka naturalnego na animację jest trudnym zadaniem. Istniejące systemy tekstowo-animacyjne mogą obsługiwać tylko bardzo proste zdania, co ogranicza ich zastosowanie. W artykule opracowujemy system tekstowo-animacyjny, który jest w stanie obsługiwać złożone zdania. Osiągamy to poprzez wprowadzenie etapu uproszczenia tekstu do procesu. Opierając się na istniejącym systemie generowania animacji dla scenariuszy, tworzymy solidny rurociąg NLP, który pozwala wydobyć informacje ze scenariuszy i mapować je do bazy wiedzy systemu. Opracowujemy zestaw reguł transformacji językowej, które upraszczają złożone zdania. Informacje uzyskane z uproszczonych zdań są wykorzystywane do generowania szorstkiego storyboardu i wideo przedstawiającego tekst. Nasz moduł uproszczenia zdań przewyższa istniejące systemy pod względem wskaźników BLEU i SARI. Ponadto oceniliśmy nasz system poprzez badanie użytkownika: 68% uczestnicy uważają, że nasz system generuje rozsądną animację z scenariuszy wejściowych.', 'sv': 'Automatisk generering av animation från naturligt språk text hittar tillämpning inom ett antal områden, t.ex. filmmanusskrift, instruktionsvideor och allmän säkerhet. Att översätta naturligt språk text till animation är dock en utmanande uppgift. Befintliga text-till-animationssystem kan endast hantera mycket enkla meningar, vilket begränsar deras tillämpningar. I denna uppsats utvecklar vi ett text-till-animationssystem som kan hantera komplexa meningar. Vi uppnår detta genom att införa ett steg för att förenkla texten i processen. Med utgångspunkt i ett befintligt system för animering för manuskript skapar vi en robust NLP-pipeline för att extrahera information från manuskript och kartlägga dem till systemets kunskapsbas. Vi utvecklar en uppsättning språkliga transformationsregler som förenklar komplexa meningar. Information som extraheras från de förenklade meningarna används för att generera en grov storyboard och video som skildrar texten. Vår modul för förenkling av meningar överträffar befintliga system när det gäller BLEU- och SARI-värden. Vi utvärderade vidare vårt system genom en användarstudie: 68% av deltagarna tror att vårt system genererar rimlig animation från inmatningsskriven.', 'si': 'ස්වාභික භාෂාව පාළුවෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාව සිද්ධිය විද්\u200dයාපනය කරන්න ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාව සිද්ධිය විද්\u200dයාපනය හ නමුත්, ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව පාළුවක් ජීවිතයට පරිවර්තනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න වැඩක්. ඉතින් ඉතින් පාළුවට ඇනිමේෂන් පද්ධතිය බොහොම සාමාන්ය වාක්ය විතරයි, ඒකෙන් ඔවුන්ගේ යුද්ධිය ස මේ පැත්තට, අපි පාළ පැත්තට ඇනිමේෂණ් පද්ධතියක් විස්තර කරනවා, ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්ණ වචනයක් විස්තර කරන්න පුළ අපි මේක පුළුවන් වෙනවා පාළුවක් සාමාන්\u200dයය පැත්තක් පරීක්ෂණයට. ස්ක්\u200dරීන් ලිපිනය සඳහා තියෙන්න තියෙන ඉන්න ඇනිමේෂන් පද්ධතියක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, අපි ස්ක්\u200dරීන් ප්ලේයින් වලින් තොරතුරු අරගෙ අපි භාෂාවික වෙනස් නීතියක් විශ්වාස කරනවා ඒ වගේම සංපුර්ණ වචනයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා. සාමාන්\u200dය වාක්ය වලින් තොරතුරු නිර්මාණය කරන්න භාවිත කරයි. පාළුව පෙන්වන්න බොරු ස්ටෝරිබෝර්ඩ සහ ව අපේ වාක්ෂාව සරලකුණු මොඩියුල් එක්ක තියෙන්නේ පද්ධතිය බ්ලූස් සහ SARI මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් වලින් ප්\u200dරත අපි අපේ පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණයක් පරීක්ෂණයක් විසින් විශ්වාස කරනවා: 68% ප්\u200dරතිකාරියෝ විශ්වාස කරනවා අපේ පද්ධතිය ප', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி உரையிலிருந்து அசைவூட்டத்தை தானாகவே உருவாக்குதல் பயன்பாட்டை பல புலங்களில் கண்டுபிடிக்கும். உதாரணமாக படக் குறு ஆனால், இயல்பான மொழி உரையை அசைவூட்டத்திற்கு மொழிபெயர்த்துவது சவாலிக்கும் பணியாகும். தற்போதைய உரையில் இருக்கும் அசைவூட்ட அமைப்புகள் மிகவும் எளிய வாக்கியங்களை மட்டும் கையாள முடியும், அது தங் இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் சிக்கலான வாக்கியங்களை கையாள முடியும் உரையில் இருந்து அசைவூட்ட அமைப்பை உருவாக்குக ஒரு உரை எளிதாக்குதல் படி செயல்பாட்டிற்கு நாம் இதை அடைக்கிறோம். திரையில் எழுதுவதற்கான ஒரு தற்போதைய அசைவூட்டு உருவாக்கும் அமைப்பின் அறிவு அடிப்படையில் உள்ள தகவலை வெளியேற்றுவதற்கு NLP பைப்பெல்லையை உர நாம் சிக்கலான வாக்குகளை எளிதாக்கும் மொழிமாற்றம் விதிகளை உருவாக்குகிறோம். எளிதாக்கப்பட்ட வாக்கியங்களிலிருந்து வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட தகவல் உரையை காண்பிக்கும் கடினமான storyboard மற்றும் வீடியோ  எங்கள் வாக்கு எளிமைப்படுத்தல் கூறு BLEU மற்றும் SARI மெட்ரிக்களை வெளியேறுகிறது. நாங்கள் பயனர் படிப்பு மூலம் எங்கள் கணினியை மேலும் மதிப்பிட்டோம்: 68% பங்கீட்டாளர்கள் நம்புகிறார்', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл текстээс автоматаар анимацийг бий болгох нь олон хэсэгт хэрэглэмж олдог. Жишээ нь, кино скрипт бичих, заах бичлэг, нийтийн аюулгүй байдал. Гэхдээ байгалийн хэл текстийг анимацийн оронд орлуулах нь хэцүү ажил. Харин одоогийн текст-с анимацийн системүүд зөвхөн маш энгийн өгүүлбэрийг зохицуулж чадна. Энэ нь өөрсдийн хэрэглээ хязгаарлаж чадна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид комплекс өгүүлбэрийг удирдах боломжтой текст болон анимацийн системийг хөгжүүлнэ. Бид үүнийг үйл явцдаа текст хялбарчлалын алхам бий болгодог. Экран бичлэг дээр суурилсан анимацийн бүтээлч систем дээр бий болгож, бид дэлгэц тоглоомоос мэдээллийг аваад системийн мэдээллийн суурь руу газрын зураг бүтээж байна. Бид хэлний шилжүүлэх дүрмийг хөгжүүлдэг. Хөгжлийн өгүүлбэрээс гаргасан мэдээлэл текстийг харуулж буй хэцүү түүхлэгч болон видео үүсгэх үед хэрэглэгддэг. Бидний өгүүлбэр хялбарчлалын модуль BLEU болон SARI метрикийн хувьд сууж байгаа системүүдийг үр дүнтэй болгодог. Бид системийг хэрэглэгчийн судалгаагаар баталсан: 68% оролцогчид бидний систем орлуулагдсан шинэ анимацийг бий болгодог гэдэгт итгэдэг.', 'ur': 'Name اگرچہ، طبیعی زبان کے متن کو انیامین میں ترجمہ کرنا ایک مشکل کام ہے. Existing text-to-animation systems can handle only very simple sentences, which limits their applications. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک ٹیکسٹ-ٹ آنیمیٹ سیسٹم کو ایجاد کرتے ہیں جو پیچیدہ جماعتوں کی مدد کرنے کے قابل ہے. ہم اسے پہنچا رہے ہیں ایک پیغام پر ایک آسانی سطح کے ذریعہ۔ اسکرینکریٹ کے لئے ایک موجود آنیمیٹ نسل سیسٹم پر بنایا گیا ہے، ہم ایک مضبوط NLP پیپ لین بناتے ہیں کہ اسکرینپل سے معلومات نکالیں اور اسے سیسٹم کے علم بنسس تک نقشه بنائیں۔ ہم ایک مجموعہ زبانی تغییر قوانین کو تغییر دیتے ہیں جو پیچیدہ جماعت کو آسان کر دیتے ہیں۔ ساده کلمات سے اٹھایا گیا معلومات ایک سخت سٹوری بورڈ اور ویڈیو پیدا کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. ہماری جماعت simplification موڈیل BLEU اور SARI متریک کے مطابق موجود سیستموں کو کامل کرتا ہے۔ ہم نے اپنے سیسٹم کو یوسٹر کی تحقیق کے ذریعہ مطالبہ کیا: 68% شرکت کرنے والوں کو معتقد ہے کہ ہماری سیسٹم input screenplays سے منطقی آنیمیٹ پیدا کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, tabiiy tilning matnni animatikasga tarjima qilish qiyin vazifasi. Mavjud matn- to- animation tizimi faqat juda oddiy soʻzlarni boshqarish mumkin. Bu dasturlarni moslash mumkin. Bu hujjatda biz murakkab so'zlarni boshqarish imkoniyatini yaratish mumkin. Biz buni ishga tushunamiz jarayonlarni soddalashni o'rganish uchun. Name Biz murakkab so'zlarni saqlash uchun tillarni o'zgartirish qoidalarini yaratishmiz. Name Bizning so'zlarimiz oddiylik moduli BLEU va SARI metriklarida mavjud tizimlarni bajaradi. Biz foydalanuvchi tahrirchi orqali tizimimizni koʻchirib chiqardik: 68% ta'limlar, bizning tizimmiz kiritish oynalaridan juda yaxshi animatiyatni yaratadi.", 'vi': 'Tự động tạo hoạt cảnh từ văn bản ngôn ngữ tự nhiên tìm thấy ứng dụng trong một số khu vực như là văn bản điện ảnh, ảnh hướng dẫn và an ninh công cộng. Tuy nhiên, dịch văn bản ngôn ngữ tự nhiên thành hoạt động là một nhiệm vụ khó khăn. Các hệ thống văn bản với hoạt động có thể xử lý các câu đơn giản, giới hạn ứng dụng của chúng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi phát triển một hệ thống văn bản với hoạt động có khả năng xử lý các câu phức tạp. Chúng ta sẽ đạt được điều đó bằng cách tiến hành một bước tiến trong quá trình dễ dàng. Dựa trên hệ thống s ản xuất hoạt hình đang tồn tại cho việc biên kịch, chúng tôi sẽ tạo ra một đường ống thoát y nổi bật để lấy thông tin từ các kịch bản và đưa chúng vào căn cứ kiến thức của hệ thống. Chúng tôi phát triển một loạt các quy tắc biến đổi ngôn ngữ, đơn giản các câu phức tạp. Thông tin rút ra từ những câu đơn giản được dùng để tạo ra một bản truyện và một đoạn video đầy hình ảnh. Mô- đun mô phỏng bản án của chúng ta vượt qua hệ thống hiện tại theo dạng LEU và âm lượng SARI. Chúng tôi đã đánh giá hệ thống qua một nghiên cứu người dùng: 66T. Các diễn viên tin rằng hệ thống của chúng tôi tạo ra hoạt động hợp lý từ các màn hình nhập.', 'bg': 'Автоматично генериране на анимация от текст на естествен език намира приложение в редица области, например писане на сценарии на филми, инструкционни видеоклипове и обществена безопасност. Превеждането на текста на естествен език в анимация обаче е трудна задача. Съществуващите системи от текст към анимация могат да обработват само много прости изречения, което ограничава тяхното приложение. В тази статия разработваме система от текст към анимация, която е способна да обработва сложни изречения. Постигаме това чрез въвеждане на стъпка за опростяване на текста в процеса. Въз основа на съществуваща система за генериране на анимации за сценарии, ние създаваме здрав тръбопровод за НЛП, който извлича информация от сценарии и ги картографира до базата от знания на системата. Разработваме набор от правила за лингвистична трансформация, които опростяват сложните изречения. Информацията, извлечена от опростените изречения, се използва за генериране на груб сценарий и видео, изобразяващи текста. Нашият модул за опростяване на изречения превъзхожда съществуващите системи по отношение на показателите. Освен това оценихме нашата система чрез потребителско проучване: 68% участници смятат, че нашата система генерира разумна анимация от входящи сценарии.', 'da': 'Automatisk generering af animation fra naturligt sprog tekst finder anvendelse på en række områder, f.eks. filmmanuskriptskrivning, instruktionsvideoer og offentlig sikkerhed. Men det er en udfordrende opgave at oversætte natursprogtekst til animation. Eksisterende tekst-til-animation systemer kan kun håndtere meget enkle sætninger, hvilket begrænser deres applikationer. I denne artikel udvikler vi et tekst-til-animationssystem, der er i stand til at håndtere komplekse sætninger. Vi opnår dette ved at indføre et trin til forenkling af teksten i processen. Med udgangspunkt i et eksisterende animationssystem til manuskriptskrivning skaber vi en robust NLP pipeline til at udtrække oplysninger fra manuskripter og kortlægge dem til systemets vidensbase. Vi udvikler et sæt sproglige transformationsregler, der forenkler komplekse sætninger. Oplysninger udvundet fra de forenklede sætninger bruges til at generere en grov storyboard og video, der skildrer teksten. Vores sætning forenkling modul overgår eksisterende systemer med hensyn til BLEU- og SARI-målinger. Vi evaluerede yderligere vores system via en brugerundersøgelse: 68% af deltagerne mener, at vores system genererer rimelig animation fra input manuskripts.', 'hr': 'Automatski proizvedenje animacije iz teksta prirodnog jezika nalazi se aplikacija u broju područja, npr. pisanje filmskih skripta, instruktivnih snimaka i javne sigurnosti. Međutim, prevoditi prirodni jezik tekst u animaciju je izazovan zadatak. Postojeći sustavi teksta do animacije mogu riješiti samo veoma jednostavne rečenice, koje ograničavaju njihove aplikacije. U ovom papiru razvijamo sistem teksta do animacije koji je sposoban za rješavanje kompleksnih rečenica. To smo postigli uvođenjem tekstovnog pojednostavljanja koraka u proces. Na temelju postojećeg sustava generacije animacija za snimanje scenarija, stvorili smo snažnu NLP cijevi kako bi izvukli informacije iz snimaka i mapirali ih na bazu znanja sustava. Razvijamo set pravila o jezičkoj transformaciji koji jednostavljaju složene rečenice. Informacije izvučene iz jednostavnih rečenica koriste se za proizvedenje teške prikazničke ploče i video koji pokazuju tekst. Naš modul pojednostavljanja rečenica iznosi postojeće sustave u smislu BLEU-a i SARI metrike. Dalje smo procijenili naš sustav putem ispitivanja korisnika: 68% učesnika vjeruju da naš sustav stvara razumnu animaciju iz snimka ulaska.', 'nl': "Het automatisch genereren van animaties uit natuurlijke taal tekst vindt toepassing op een aantal gebieden, zoals het schrijven van filmscripts, instructievideo's en openbare veiligheid. Het vertalen van natuurlijke taal tekst naar animatie is echter een uitdagende taak. Bestaande tekst-naar-animatie systemen kunnen slechts zeer eenvoudige zinnen verwerken, wat hun toepassingen beperkt. In dit artikel ontwikkelen we een tekst-naar-animatie systeem dat in staat is om complexe zinnen te verwerken. Dit bereiken we door een stap in de vereenvoudiging van de tekst in te voeren. Voortbouwend op een bestaand animatie generatiesysteem voor scriptschrijven, creëren we een robuuste NLP pipeline om informatie uit scenario's te halen en in kaart te brengen aan de kennisbank van het systeem. We ontwikkelen een reeks taalkundige transformatieregels die complexe zinnen vereenvoudigen. Informatie uit de vereenvoudigde zinnen wordt gebruikt om een ruw storyboard en video te genereren die de tekst weergeeft. Onze module voor zinsvereenvoudiging overtreft bestaande systemen op het gebied van BLEU- en SARI-statistieken. We hebben ons systeem verder geëvalueerd via een gebruikersstudie: 68% deelnemers geloven dat ons systeem redelijke animaties genereert uit input scenario's.", 'de': 'Die automatische Erzeugung von Animationen aus natursprachlichem Text findet Anwendung in einer Reihe von Bereichen, z.B. beim Schreiben von Filmskripten, Lehrvideos und der öffentlichen Sicherheit. Natürliche Texte in Animationen zu übersetzen ist jedoch eine herausfordernde Aufgabe. Bestehende Text-to-Animations-Systeme können nur sehr einfache Sätze verarbeiten, was ihre Anwendung einschränkt. In diesem Beitrag entwickeln wir ein Text-to-Animationssystem, das in der Lage ist, komplexe Sätze zu verarbeiten. Dies erreichen wir, indem wir einen Schritt zur Vereinfachung des Textes in den Prozess einführen. Aufbauend auf einem bestehenden Animations-Generierungssystem für Drehbücher erstellen wir eine robuste NLP-Pipeline, um Informationen aus Drehbüchern zu extrahieren und sie der Wissensdatenbank des Systems zuzuordnen. Wir entwickeln eine Reihe sprachlicher Transformationsregeln, die komplexe Sätze vereinfachen. Informationen, die aus den vereinfachten Sätzen extrahiert werden, werden verwendet, um ein grobes Storyboard und Video zu generieren, das den Text darstellt. Unser Satzvereinfachungsmodul übertrifft bestehende Systeme in Bezug auf BLEU- und SARI-Metriken. Wir haben unser System anhand einer Nutzerstudie weiter evaluiert: 68% Teilnehmer glauben, dass unser System aus Eingabedrehbüchern vernünftige Animationen generiert.', 'id': "Membuat animasi secara otomatis dari teks bahasa alami menemukan aplikasi di beberapa daerah, contohnya menulis skrip film, video instruksional, dan keselamatan publik. Namun, menerjemahkan teks bahasa alami ke animasi adalah tugas yang menantang. Sistem teks-ke-animasi yang ada hanya dapat menangani kalimat yang sangat sederhana, yang membatasi aplikasi mereka. Dalam kertas ini, kita mengembangkan sistem teks-ke-animasi yang mampu menangani kalimat kompleks. We achieve this by introducing a text simplification step into the process.  Building on an existing animation generation system for screenwriting, we create a robust NLP pipeline to extract information from screenplays and map them to the system's knowledge base.  Kami mengembangkan set peraturan transformasi bahasa yang menyederhanakan kalimat kompleks. Informasi yang diekstraksi dari kalimat sederhana digunakan untuk menghasilkan papan cerita kasar dan video menggambar teks. Modul penyimplifikasi kalimat kita melebihi sistem yang ada dalam terma metrik BLEU dan SARI. Kami lebih lanjut mengevaluasi sistem kami melalui penelitian pengguna: 68% peserta percaya bahwa sistem kami menghasilkan animasi yang masuk akal dari layar input.", 'sw': 'Kujitengeneza sura kutoka maandishi ya lugha ya asili hugundua matumizi katika maeneo kadhaa ya filamu kama vile kuandika, video za ufundishaji na usalama wa umma. Hata hivyo, kutafsiri maandishi ya lugha ya asili kuwa ya uchunguzi ni kazi ya changamoto. Existing text-to-animation systems can handle only very simple sentences, which limits their applications.  Katika karatasi hii, tunatengeneza mfumo wa simu za viganjani ambao una uwezo wa kukabiliana na sentensi ngumu. Tunapata hili kwa kuanzisha hatua ya urahisi katika mchakato. Kujenga mfumo wa uzalishaji wa picha kwa ajili ya kuandika screenzi, tunatengeneza pipeline ya NLP iliyokuwa imeibwa ili kupata taarifa kutoka kwenye michezo ya screenzi na kutengeneza ramani kwa mfumo wa ufahamu wa mfumo. Tunaendeleza kanuni za mabadiliko ya lugha ambazo zinarahisisha sentensi tata. Taarifa zilizotolewa kutoka kwenye sentensi rahisi inatumiwa kutengeneza rekodi ngumu na video inayoonyesha maandishi hayo. Utawala wetu wa urahisi wa hukumu unaonyesha mifumo iliyopo kwa mujibu wa mbinu za BLEU na SARI. Tulifuatilia zaidi mfumo wetu kupitia utafiti wa mtumiaji: washiriki 68% wanaamini kwamba mfumo wetu unatengeneza sura yenye maana kutoka kwenye michezo ya filamu.', 'fa': 'به طور خودکار تولید انیمیشن از متن زبان طبیعی کاربرد در تعداد منطقه\u200cای می\u200cیابد، مثال نوشتن سند فیلم، ویدئوهای آموزشی و امنیت عمومی. ولی ترجمه کردن متن زبان طبیعی به انیمیشن یک کار سخت است. سیستم\u200cهای متن به انیمیشن موجود تنها جمله\u200cهای بسیار ساده\u200cای را کنترل می\u200cکنند که کاربردهای آنها را محدود می\u200cکند. در این کاغذ، ما یک سیستم متن به انیمیشن را توسعه می\u200cکنیم که قادر است در کنترل جمله\u200cهای پیچیده باشد. ما این را با توجه به یک قدم ساده\u200cسازی متن به فرایند رسیدیم. با ساختن روی سیستم نسل\u200cهای آنیمیشن موجود برای نوشتن صفحه، یک لوله\u200cی NLP قدرتمند برای خروج اطلاعات از صفحه\u200cهای صفحه و نقشه\u200cاش به پایگاه دانش سیستم ایجاد می\u200cکنیم. ما مجموعه قوانین تغییر زبان\u200cشناسی را توسعه می\u200cکنیم که جمله\u200cهای پیچیده را ساده می\u200cکند. اطلاعاتی که از جمله\u200cهای ساده\u200cشده استفاده می\u200cشود برای تولید یک storyboard سخت و ویدئو که متن را نشان می\u200cدهد استفاده می\u200cشود. مدول ساده\u200cسازی مجازات ما از سیستم\u200cهای موجود به عنوان متریک BLEU و SARI اجرا می\u200cکند. ما سیستم خود را از طریق یک مطالعه کاربر ارزیابی کردیم: 68 درصد شرکتگران باور دارند که سیستم ما از نمایش\u200cهای داخلی منطقی آینمایش را تولید می\u200cکند.', 'ko': '자연 언어 텍스트에서 자동으로 애니메이션을 생성하면 영화 스크립트 작성, 교육 영상과 공공 안전 등 많은 분야에 응용할 수 있다.그러나 자연 언어의 텍스트를 애니메이션으로 번역하는 것은 도전적인 임무이다.기존의 텍스트는 애니메이션 시스템에서만 매우 간단한 문장을 처리할 수 있기 때문에 그것들의 응용을 제한한다.본고에서 우리는 복잡한 문장을 처리할 수 있는 텍스트를 애니메이션 시스템에 개발했다.우리는 절차에 텍스트의 간소화 절차를 도입함으로써 이 점을 실현한다.기존의 시나리오 애니메이션 생성 시스템을 토대로 우리는 강력한 NLP 파이프라인을 만들어 시나리오에서 정보를 추출하고 이를 시스템의 지식 라이브러리에 비추었다.우리는 복잡한 문장을 간소화하는 언어 변환 규칙을 개발했다.간략한 문장에서 추출한 정보는 텍스트를 묘사하는 대략적인 이야기판과 영상을 만드는 데 쓰인다.우리의 문장 간소화 모듈은 BLEU와 SARI 지표에서 기존 시스템보다 우수하다.우리는 사용자 연구를 통해 우리의 시스템을 한층 더 평가했다. 68%의 참여자들은 우리의 시스템이 입력한 시나리오에서 합리적인 애니메이션을 생성할 수 있다고 생각했다.', 'tr': 'Doýal dilden janlaşdyrmak üçin bir näçe sahypalarda uygulama tapýar, ýaz. film skripti ýazma, g örkezilişi wideo we jemgyýetçilik eminligi. Ýöne, tebigy dili janlaşdyrma täze bir buýrukdur. Öň bar metin-we animasiýa sistemalary diňe aňsatlyk sözleri çykaryp bilýär. Bu ýerler uygulamalaryny çykarýar. Bu kagyzda çykyş sözleri başaryp biljek metin-tenzim sistemasyny geliştirdik. Biz bu işi prosese esaslaşdyrarak ýetip bilýäris. Ekranlary ýazmak üçin bir bar animasiýa döredijilik sistemine inşa etmek üçin güýçli NLP pipelini çykarýarys we olaryň sistemiň bilgi bazyna görkezmek üçin ýigşirli bir NLP pipelini bejerdik. Biz bir topar lingwistiki üýtgetmek kurallaryny gelişýäris ki, karmaşık sözleri diňleştirir. Basitleştirilen sözlemlerden çykylýan maglumat metini görkezmek üçin peýdalanýar. Biziň sözlerimiz ýeňlemek modulymyz BLEU we SARI metrikleri ýaly bar sistemalary çykarýar. Biz sistemimizi ulançylar öňünden çykardyk: 68% sahypalar sistemimiziň girdi ekranlardan makul animasiýa döredip ynanýarlar.', 'sq': "Gjenerimi automatik i animacionit nga teksti i gjuhës natyrore gjen aplikimin në një numër fushësh, për shembull shkrimi i scenarit të filmit, videot mësuese dhe siguria publike. Megjithatë, përkthimi i tekstit të gjuhës natyrore në animacion është një detyrë sfiduese. Sistemet ekzistuese tekst-në-animacion mund të trajtojnë vetëm fraza shumë të thjeshta, që kufizojnë aplikimet e tyre. Në këtë letër, ne zhvillojmë një sistem teksti-në-animacion që është i aftë për të trajtuar fjalët komplekse. Ne e arrijmë këtë duke futur një hap të thjeshtësimit të tekstit në proces. Duke ndërtuar në një sistem ekzistues të gjenerimit të animacioneve për shkrimin e skrinit, ne krijojmë një tubacion të fortë NLP për të nxjerrë informacionin nga skenarët dhe t'i hartojmë a to në bazën e njohurive të sistemit. Ne zhvillojmë një sërë rregullash të transformimit gjuhësor që thjeshtojnë fjalimet komplekse. Informacioni i nxjerrë nga fjalët e thjeshta përdoret për të gjeneruar një tabelë tregimi të ashpër dhe video që përshkruan tekstin. Modulli ynë i thjeshtësimit të fjalëve ekziston mbi sistemet ekzistuese lidhur me metrikat BLEU dhe SARI. Ne vlerësuam më tej sistemin tonë nëpërmjet një studimi përdorues: 68% e pjesëmarrësve besojnë se sistemi ynë gjeneron animacion të arsyeshëm nga skenarët e hyrjes.", 'af': "Outomaties genereer animasie van natuurlike taal teks soek toepassing in 'n aantal areas, bv. film skrif, instruksieflike videos en publieke veiligheid. Maar die vertaling van natuurlike taal teks in animasie is 'n pragtige taak. Bestaande teks-na-animasie stelsels kan slegs baie eenvoudige teikens hanteer, wat hulle toepassings beperk. In hierdie papier ontwikkel ons 'n teks-na-animasie stelsel wat is in staat om komplekse setings te behandel. Ons het dit bereik deur 'n teks eenvoudiging stap in die proses te introduseer. By gebou op 'n bestaande animasie generasie stelsel vir skermskryfing, skep on s 'n kragtige NLP pipelyn om inligting uit skermspeletjies uit te pak en kaart hulle na die stelsel se kennis basie. Ons ontwikkel 'n stel lingwisiese transformasie reëls wat komplekse setings vereenvoudig. Informasie uitgepak van die eenvoudige setings word gebruik om 'n rou storybord en video te genereer wat die teks vertoon word. Ons seting vereenvoudiging module uitvoer bestaande stelsels in terms van BLEU en SARI metries. Ons het ons stelsel verder deur 'n gebruiker studie evalueer: 68% deelnaders glo dat ons stelsel redelike animasie genereer van invoer skermspeletjies.", 'hy': 'Անիմատիկ կերպով անիմացիա ստեղծելը բնական լեզվի տեքստից գտնում է ծրագիր մի շարք ոլորտներում, օրինակ ֆիլմի սցեպտոր գրելը, դասավանդական տեսանյութերը և հանրային անվտանգությունը: Այնուամենայնիվ, բնական լեզվի տեքստի թարգմանը անիմացիայի մեջ դժվար խնդիր է: Գոյություն ունեցող տեքստի-անիմացիոն համակարգերը կարող են գործել միայն շատ պարզ նախադասություններով, որոնք սահմանափակում են իրենց ծրագրերը: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք զարգանում ենք տեքստի-անիմացիոն համակարգ, որը կարող է վերահսկել բարդ նախադասությունները: Մենք սա հասնում ենք այս գործընթացի մեջ տեքստի պարզաբանման քայլ ներկայացնելով: Հիմնվելով գոյություն ունեցող անիմացիայի ստեղծման համակարգի վրա, մենք ստեղծում ենք ուժեղ ՆԼՊ խողովակաշար, որպեսզի տեղեկատվությունը ստանանք էկրանի նկարներից և քարտեզագրենք դրանք համակարգի գիտելիքների հիմքում: Մենք զարգանում ենք լեզվաբանական վերափոխման կանոններ, որոնք պարզաբանում են բարդ նախադասությունները: Պարզեցված նախադասություններից ստացված տեղեկատվությունը օգտագործվում է խիստ պատմությունների տախտակ և տեսահոլովակ ստեղծելու համար, որը ներկայացնում է տեքստը: Մեր նախադասությունների պարզաբանման մոդուլը գերազանցում է գոյություն ունեցող համակարգերը, ինչպիսիք են ԲԼԵՎ և Սարիի չափումները: Մենք նաև գնահատեցինք մեր համակարգը օգտագործողների ուսումնասիրության միջոցով: 68 տոկոս մասնակիցները հավատում են, որ մեր համակարգը ստեղծում է խելամիտ անիմացիա ներմուծման էկրաններում:', 'am': 'Automatically generating animation from natural language text finds application in a number of areas e.g. movie script writing, instructional videos, and public safety.  ነገር ግን የፍጥረቱ ቋንቋ ጽሑፎችን ለመቀበል ወደ አናውጤት የሚያስተባብል ስራ ነው፡፡ የአሁኑ የጽሑፍ-ወደ-animation ሲስተም ፕሮግራሞቻቸውን ግንኙነት የሚያስቀምጥ በጣም ቀላል ቃላት ብቻ ይችላል። በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የጽሑፍ ወደ አቀማመጥ ሥርዓት መግለጫ የሚችል ሙከራን መቆጣጠር የሚችል ነው፡፡ ይህንን ለማግኘት የጽሑፍ ቀላል እርምጃን ወደ ፕሮግራም በመግለጥ እናደርጋለን፡፡ እስክሪን የቋንቋው ለውጥ ሥርዓቶችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር የግንኙነታችን ቀላልነት ሞዴል BLEU እና SARI ሜትሪኮች ውስጥ ያሉትን ሥርዓቶች ይወጣል። ሲስተምሩን በተጠቃሚ ትምህርት ማድረግ ደግሞ አስተዋልነው፤ 68 በመቶ ተጋሪዎቻችን ሲስማታችን ከinput እስክሪን ጨዋታ የሚያስፈልገውን ፍጥረት እንዲያሳስል ያምናሉ፡፡', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা লেখা থেকে অ্যানিমেশন স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সৃষ্টি করা হয়েছে বেশ কয়েকটি এলাকায় অ্যাপ্লিকেশন পাওয়া যায়, যেমন চল তবে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার লেখা অ্যানিমেশনে অনুবাদ করা একটি চ্যালেঞ্জিক কাজ। বিদ্যমান টেক্সট- থেকে অ্যানিমেশন সিস্টেম শুধুমাত্র খুব সাধারণ বাক্য সামলাতে পারে, যা তাদের অ্যাপ In this paper, we develop a text-to-animation system which is capable of handling complex sentences.  আমরা এটা অর্জন করি প্রক্রিয়ার মধ্যে একটি টেক্সট সুস্পষ্ট পদক্ষেপ পরিচালনা করে। স্ক্রীন লেখার জন্য একটি বিদ্যমান অ্যানিমেশন প্রজন্ম সিস্টেমে নির্মাণ করা হচ্ছে, আমরা স্ক্রীন প্লেস থেকে তথ্য বের করে সিস্টেমের জ্ঞানে আমরা ভাষাগত পরিবর্তনের কিছু নিয়ম তৈরি করি যা জটিল শাস্তি সহজ করে। সুস্পষ্ট বাক্য থেকে উৎপাদন করা তথ্য লেখাটি দেখানোর জন্য একটি কঠিন স্টোরিবোর্ড এবং ভিডিও তৈরি করা হয়। আমাদের বাক্য সহজেকশন মডিউল বিলিউ এবং সারির মেট্রিকের মাধ্যমে বিদ্যমান সিস্টেমের বিষয়টি প্রকাশ করে। আমরা ব্যবহারকারীর একটি গবেষণার মাধ্যমে আমাদের সিস্টেমের পরিমাণ মূল্যায়ন করেছি: ৬৮% অংশগ্রহণকারীরা বিশ্বাস করে যে আমাদের', 'ca': "La generació automàtica d'animació a partir del text del llenguatge natural troba aplicacions en diverses àrees, per exemple escriptura d'escriptura de pel·lícules, vídeos instructius i seguretat pública. Tanmateix, traduir el text del llenguatge natural a l'animació és una tasca difícil. Els sistemes existents de text a animació només poden gestionar frases molt senzilles, que limitan les seves aplicacions. En aquest article desenvolupem un sistema de text a animació capaç de manejar frases complexes. Ho aconseguim introduint un pas de simplificació del text en el procés. Construïnt-nos en un sistema de generació d'animació existent per escriure pantalla, creem un robust tub NLP per extrair informació de les pantalles i mapejar-les a la base de coneixements del sistema. Desenvolvem un conjunt de normes de transformació lingüística que simplifiquen frases complexes. La informació extraïda de les frases simplificades s'utilitza per generar un quadre d'històries brut i un vídeo que representa el text. El nostre módul de simplificació de frases supera els sistemes existents en termes de BLEU i SARI. Vam evaluar el nostre sistema a través d'un estudi d'usuari: el 68% de participants creuen que el nostre sistema genera animació raonable a partir de les pantalles d'entrada.", 'az': 'T…ôbi…ôtli dil metind…ôn animasyon yaradńĪlńĪŇüńĪnda bir ne√ß…ô sah…ôl…ôrd…ô uyńüulama b…ônz…ôr film skriptl…ôri yazmaq, √∂yr…ônm…ôk videolarńĪ v…ô halkńĪ t…ôhl√ľk…ôsizlik tapńĪr. Ancaq, t…ôbi…ôtli dil metinl…ôrini animasyona √ßevirm…ôk √ß…ôtin bir iŇüdir. √Ėn√ľmd…ôki m…ôtn-animasiya sisteml…ôri yalnńĪz √ßox basit c√ľml…ôl…ôr idar…ô ed…ô bil…ôr, bu da onlarńĪn uyńüulamalarńĪnńĪ sńĪnńĪrlar. Bu kańüńĪzda, kompleks s√∂zl…ôri idar…ô ed…ô bil…ôn m…ôtn-animasiya sistemini t…ôhsil edirik. Biz bunu iŇül…ôtm…ôy…ô bir m…ôtn basitl…ôŇüdirm…ôsini t…ôŇükil edirik. Ekranlar yazńĪlmasńĪ √ľ√ß√ľn m√ľ…ôyy…ôn bir animasyon n…ôsili sistemin…ô inŇüa edirik, ekranlardan m…ôlumatlarńĪ √ßńĪxartmaq v…ô sistemin bilgi bazńĪna mapa etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn q√ľvv…ôtli NLP pipeline yaratdńĪq. Biz m√ľxt…ôlif s√∂zl…ôri asanlaŇüdńĪrńĪr. Basit c√ľml…ôl…ôrd…ôn alńĪnan m…ôlumat m…ôlumatńĪ g√∂st…ôr…ôn √ß…ôtin storyboard v…ô video yaratmaq √ľ√ß√ľn istifad…ô edilir. Bizim c√ľml…ôl…ôrimizin basitlaŇüdńĪrma moduluńüu, BLEU v…ô SARI metrikl…ôri il…ô m√∂vcud sisteml…ôrin √ľst√ľn…ô √ßńĪxarńĪr. Biz sistemimizi istifad…ô√ßi t…ôhsil vasit…ôsil…ô daha da deńüerl…ôŇüdirdik: 68% istifad…ô√ßil…ôr sistemimizin girdi ekranlarńĪndan m√ľnasib…ôtli animasyon yaratdńĪńüńĪna inanńĪrlar.', 'cs': 'Automatické generování animace z textu přirozeného jazyka najde aplikaci v řadě oblastí, např. psaní filmových scénářů, instrukční videa a veřejná bezpečnost. Překlad textu přirozeného jazyka do animace je však náročný úkol. Stávající text-to-animation systémy zvládají pouze velmi jednoduché věty, což omezuje jejich aplikace. V tomto článku vyvíjíme text-to-animation systém, který je schopen zvládnout složité věty. Toho dosáhneme zavedením kroku zjednodušení textu do procesu. Na základě stávajícího systému generování animací pro scénář vytváříme robustní NLP pipeline pro extrahování informací ze scénářů a mapování do znalostní báze systému. Vyvíjíme sadu pravidel jazykové transformace, která zjednodušují složité věty. Informace extrahované ze zjednodušených vět se používají k generování hrubého scénáře a videa zobrazujícího text. Náš modul pro zjednodušení vět překonává stávající systémy, pokud jde o metriky BLEU a SARI. Náš systém jsme dále hodnotili prostřednictvím uživatelské studie: 68% účastníci se domnívají, že náš systém generuje rozumnou animaci ze vstupních scénářů.', 'bs': 'Automatski proizvedenje animacije iz teksta prirodnog jezika nalazi se aplikacija u mnogim područjima, npr. pisanje filmskih skripta, instruktivnih snimaka i javne sigurnosti. Međutim, prevod prirodnog jezika u animaciju je izazovan zadatak. Postojeći sistemi teksta do animacije mogu podnijeti samo jednostavne rečenice, koje ograničavaju njihove aplikacije. U ovom papiru razvijamo sistem teksta do animacije koji je sposoban za rješavanje kompleksnih rečenica. To smo postigli predstavljajući korak pojednostavljanja teksta u proces. Na temelju postojećeg sistema generacije animacije za snimanje scenarija, stvorili smo snažnu NLP cijevinu kako bi izvukli informacije iz snimaka i mapirali ih na bazu znanja sistema. Razvijamo set pravila za preobraćanje jezika koji jednostavljaju kompleksne rečenice. Informacije izvučene iz jednostavnih rečenica se koriste za proizvedenje teške prikaznice i video koji pokazuju tekst. Naš modul pojednostavljanja rečenica iznosi postojeće sustave u smislu BLEU-a i SARI metrike. Dalje smo procijenili naš sistem kroz studiju korisnika: 68% učesnika vjeruju da naš sistem stvara razumnu animaciju iz snimanja snimaka.', 'et': 'Looduskeelsest tekstist animatsiooni automaatne genereerimine leiab rakenduse mitmes valdkonnas, näiteks filmi stsenaariumi kirjutamine, õppevideod ja avalik ohutus. Looduskeelse teksti tõlkimine animatsiooniks on aga keeruline ülesanne. Olemasolevad tekstist animatsiooniks muutuvad süsteemid suudavad käsitleda ainult väga lihtsaid lauseid, mis piirab nende rakendusi. Käesolevas töös töötame välja teksti-animatsiooni süsteemi, mis on võimeline käsitlema keerukaid lauseid. Me saavutame selle, lisades protsessi teksti lihtsustamise sammu. Tuginedes olemasolevale animatsioonide genereerimise süsteemile stsenaariumide kirjutamiseks loome tugeva NLP torujuhtme stsenaariumidest teabe väljavõtmiseks ja süsteemi teadmistebaasi kaardistamiseks. Töötame välja keelelise muundamise reeglid, mis lihtsustavad keerukaid lauseid. Lihtsustatud lausetest saadud teavet kasutatakse teksti kujutava karmi storyboard ja video genereerimiseks. Meie lausete lihtsustamise moodul ületab olemasolevaid süsteeme BLEU ja SARI mõõdikute osas. Hindasime oma süsteemi veelgi kasutajauuringu kaudu: 68% osalejatest usub, et meie süsteem loob sisendstsenaariumidest mõistlikku animatsiooni.', 'fi': 'Animaation luonti luonnollisesta tekstistﾃ､ automaattisesti lﾃｶytﾃ､ﾃ､ sovelluksia useilla aloilla, kuten elokuvakﾃ､sikirjoituksessa, opetusvideoissa ja yleisessﾃ､ turvallisuudessa. Luonnonkielen tekstin kﾃ､ﾃ､ntﾃ､minen animaatioksi on kuitenkin haastava tehtﾃ､vﾃ､. Nykyiset tekstistﾃ､ animaatioksi -jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､t pystyvﾃ､t kﾃ､sittelemﾃ､ﾃ､n vain hyvin yksinkertaisia lauseita, mikﾃ､ rajoittaa niiden soveltamista. Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ tyﾃｶssﾃ､ kehitﾃ､mme tekstistﾃ､ animaatioon perustuvan jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､n, joka pystyy kﾃ､sittelemﾃ､ﾃ､n monimutkaisia lauseita. Saavutamme tﾃ､mﾃ､n ottamalla prosessiin tekstin yksinkertaistamisvaiheen. Kehitﾃ､mme olemassa olevan kﾃ､sikirjoituksen animaatioiden luontijﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､n pohjalta vankan NLP-putken, jonka avulla kerﾃ､ﾃ､mme tietoa kﾃ､sikirjoituksista ja kartoitamme ne jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､n tietopohjaan. Kehitﾃ､mme joukon kielenmuutoksen sﾃ､ﾃ､ntﾃｶjﾃ､, jotka yksinkertaistavat monimutkaisia lauseita. Yksinkertaistetuista lauseista poimittuja tietoja kﾃ､ytetﾃ､ﾃ､n tuottamaan karkea kuvakﾃ､sikirjoitus ja video, joka kuvaa tekstiﾃ､. Lausekkeiden yksinkertaistamismoduulimme on BLEU- ja SARI-mittareiden osalta parempi kuin olemassa olevat jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､t. Arvioimme jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ﾃ､mme myﾃｶs kﾃ､yttﾃ､jﾃ､tutkimuksen avulla: 68% osallistujista uskoo jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､mme tuottavan kohtuullisen animaation kﾃ､sikirjoituksista.', 'jv': 'Ngawe jenengan animation suku kelangan pribadi kanggo nggawe aplikasi kanggo tinik ning arep, sampeyan seneng pisar film, video sampeyan ngon keamanan publik. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness text-to-animation sistem sing bisa nguasar barang sampeyan luwih Nang pepul iki, awak dhéwé nggawe sistem Text-to-animation sing bisa nguasar kelas barang sing apik. Awak dhéwé nggawe iki dadi nggawe barang seneng pisan seneng nggawe Iyo nggawe sistem animation sing gawe nggo ngwalikno, awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sing bote NLP kanggo nggawe informasi layar kanggo ngirim barang dhéwé lan mapaké dhéwé nganggo sistem sing berkas sabanjuré. Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sistem kanggo nggawe luwih bantuan nggawe barang kelas barang kelas. translation" means "shift" / "displacement Punika \'Simplification\' modul sing dipun-perusahaan uwong gawe sistem sing ana sing paling nggambar barang CLUE karo SERI Metika. Awak dhéwé éntuk nggambar sistem nambah kanggo sabanjuré: 60% pating kanggo pisan karo sistem sing nyimpen animation sing dikarepaké katêpakan neng dolanan ping nyeramu.', 'sk': 'Samodejno ustvarjanje animacije iz besedila naravnega jezika najde aplikacijo na številnih področjih, npr. pisanje scenarijev filmov, navodilni video posnetki in javna varnost. Vendar pa je prevajanje besedila naravnega jezika v animacijo zahtevna naloga. Obstoječi sistemi besedila v animacijo lahko obravnavajo le zelo preproste stavke, kar omejuje njihovo uporabo. V prispevku smo razvili sistem besedila v animacijo, ki je sposoben obravnavati kompleksne stavke. To dosežemo z uvedbo koraka poenostavitve besedila v proces. Na podlagi obstoječega sistema za generiranje animacij za scenarije ustvarjamo robusten plinovod NLP za pridobivanje informacij iz scenarijev in jih mapiramo v bazo znanja sistema. Razvijamo niz pravil jezikovne transformacije, ki poenostavljajo kompleksne stavke. Informacije, pridobljene iz poenostavljenih stavkov, se uporabljajo za ustvarjanje grobe storyboard in video, ki prikazuje besedilo. Naš modul za poenostavitev stavkov presega obstoječe sisteme v smislu meritev BLEU in SARI. Naš sistem smo nadalje ocenili z uporabniško študijo: 68% udeležencev meni, da naš sistem ustvarja razumno animacijo iz vhodnih scenarijev.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis A lokacin da, zane fassarar littãfin harshen asiyya zuwa surori ya zama wani aikin mai tsõratar. @ action: button Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata matsayi-zuwa-surori, wanda yana iya iya iya amfani da mummunan aiki masu husũma. Tuna sami wannan da Muke iya ƙara wata hanyor rubutu cikin aikin. Yi ƙiƙiro a kan tsarin halin motsi da ake kai yanzu wa fuskar kwamfyuta, za'a ƙiƙiro wata pilin na NLP da aka yi riƙo dõmin ya nuna maɓalli daga filayen fuskar kwamfyuta kuma za'a karya su zuwa kan banza na'ar masanin na'ura. Tuna motsar wasu sharciyar jujjuya cikin harshen, da mai sauƙin ayuka masu husũma. Yi amfani da maɓallin wanda aka canza daga filayen da aka sauƙa ƙe don ya zaɓi wani lodi mai nau'i da video mai nuna matsayin. Our sentence simplification module outperforms existing systems in terms of BLEU and SARI metrics. Mun ƙaddara ƙaranci na'urarmu don a yi amfani da shi: 68% mãsu shirin haɗuwa sun yi ĩmãni cẽwa na'asarmu yana samun surori mai inganci daga filayen fuskar kwamfyuta.", 'bo': "Automatically generating animation from natural language text finds application in a number of areas e.g. movie script writing, instructional videos, and public safety. Examples: ཡིན་ནའང་། སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ཡིག་གེ་དཔེ་བསྐྲུན་གཏོང་ནི་ལས་འགུལ་འདུག Existing text-to-animation systems can handle very simple sentences, which limits their applications. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་གེ་ལ་འཆར་ཡན་ལག་ཅིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག་རྟགས་ལ་སྒྲིག་ཀྱི་ཚིག་ར ང་ཚོས་འདི་ལས་སྦྱོར་ནང་དུ་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་སྔོན་འཛུགས་གྱི་གྲལ་རིམ་གསལ་བཤད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། Building on an existing animation generation system for screenwriting, we create a robust NLP pipeline to extract information from screenplays and map them to the system's knowledge base. ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་དབྱིབས་འགྱུར་བ་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་གིས་གཏོང་དགོས། Information extracted from the simplified sentences is used to generate a rough storkeyboard and video depicting the text. Our sentence simplification module outperforms existing systems in terms of BLEU and SARI metrics. ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་བརྩལ་ཞིབ་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཞིག་གིས་གཞན་པ་ཞིག་དཔྱད་བྱས་ན། ཞུགས་སྡུད་པའི་རྒྱལ་སྐྱོར་68", 'he': 'Automatically generating animation from natural language text finds application in a number of areas e.g. movie script writing, instructional videos, and public safety.  עם זאת, התרגום טבעי טקסט לשפה לאנימאציה הוא משימה מאתגרת. מערכות טקסט-לאנימיציה קיימות יכולות להתמודד רק עם משפטים פשוטים מאוד, שמגבלות את התוכניות שלהם. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מפתחים מערכת טקסט-לאנימאציה שיכולה לטפל במשפטים מורכבים. We achieve this by introducing a text simplification step into the process.  בניין על מערכת יוצרת אנימציה קיימת לכתיבת מסך, אנו יוצרים צינור NLP חזק כדי להוציא מידע מהמסך ולמפת אותם לבסיס הידע של המערכת. אנחנו מפתחים קבוצה של חוקי שינוי שפתיים שמפשטים משפטים מורכבים. מידע שנוצא מהמשפטים הפשוטים משתמש כדי ליצור ספרד סיפורים קשה וידאו שמצייר את הטקסט. מודול הפשטות המשפטים שלנו מוביל מערכות קיימות בנוגע למטריות BLEU וסארי. הערכנו יותר את המערכת שלנו באמצעות מחקר משתמש: 68% משתתפים מאמינים שהמערכת שלנו מייצרת אנימציה הגיונית מסרטים כניסה.'}
{'en': 'SemEval-2019 Task 1 : Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with UCCA', 'ar': 'مهمة SemEval-2019 1: التحليل الدلالي متعدد اللغات باستخدام UCCA', 'es': 'Tarea 1 de SemEval-2019: Análisis semántico multilingüe con UCCA', 'pt': 'SemEval-2019 Tarefa 1: Análise semântica multilíngue com UCCA', 'fr': 'SemEVAL-2019 Tâche 1\xa0: Analyse sémantique multilingue avec UCCA', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019タスク1 ： UCCAとのクロスリンガルセマンティック解析', 'ru': 'SemEval-2019 Задача 1: Межязычный семантический анализ с UCCA', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019 任1:用UCCA跨语言语义解析', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 1: UCCA के साथ क्रॉस-लिंगुअल सिमेंटिक पार्सिंग', 'ga': 'SemEval-2019 Tasc 1: Parsáil Shéimeantach Thrasteangach le UCCA', 'el': 'Εργασία 1: Διάγλωσση Σημαντική Ανάλυση με την UCCA', 'ka': 'SemEval-2019 პარამეტრი 1: მრავალური Semantic Parsing with UCCA', 'hu': 'SemEval-2019 1. feladat: Többnyelvű szemantikus értelmezés az UCCA-val', 'it': 'SemEval-2019 Task 1: Analisi semantica multilingue con UCCA', 'kk': 'SemEval- 2019 тапсырма 1: UCCA- мен бірнеше тілді Semantic талдау', 'lt': '1 uždavinys: tarpkalbinis Semantinis analizavimas su UCCA', 'ms': 'SemEval-2019 Tugas 1: Penghuraian Semantik Bersaling Bahasa dengan UCCA', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 1: ക്രോസ്- ലിങ്ക് സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് UCCA കൊണ്ട്', 'mk': 'SemEval-2019 задача 1: Круглавно семантично анализирање со УККА', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Task 1: Cross-language Semantic Parsing with UCCA', 'pl': 'SemEval-2019 Zadanie 1: Parsowanie semantyczne wielojęzyczne z UCCA', 'ro': 'SemEval-2019 Sarcina 1: Interpretarea semantică translingvă cu UCCA', 'no': 'SemEval-2019 Oppgåve 1: Krysspråk semantisk tolking med UCCA', 'si': 'සම්වේල්-2019 වැඩක් 1: ක්\u200dරොස් භාෂාවික සෙමාන්ටික විශ්ලේෂණය UCCA එක්ක', 'mt': 'SemEval-2019 Kompitu 1: Analiżi Semantika Translingwi mal-UCCA', 'sv': 'SemEval-2019 Uppgift 1: Tvärspråkig semantisk tolkning med UCCA', 'sr': 'Semeval-2019 zadatak 1: preko jezika semantičko analiziranje sa UCCA-om', 'so': 'SemEval-2019 Shaqada 1: Baarida luqada Cross-language Semantic Parsing with UCCA', 'ur': 'سیم اول-2019 ٹاکس ۱: UCCA کے ساتھ کروس-زبان سیمنٹی پارسینگ', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 1: Cross- language Semantic Parsing with UCCA', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifa 1: Cross- language Semantic Parsing with UCCA', 'vi': 'Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-2009 1: con phân tích chất kỳ ngoại với UCCA.', 'da': 'SemEval-2019 Opgave 1: Tværsproget semantisk parsing med UCCA', 'nl': 'SemEval-2019 Taak 1: Meertalige semantische parsing met UCCA', 'hr': 'SemEval-2019 zadatak 1: međujezička semantička analiza s UCCA-om', 'de': 'SemEval-2019 Aufgabenstellung 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing mit UCCA', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Междуезичен семантичен анализ с УКЗ', 'id': 'SemEval-2019 Tugas 1: Parsing Semantik Berbahasa Bersaling dengan UCCA', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019 작업 1: UCCA를 사용한 다국어 의미 분석', 'fa': 'عملۀ ۱ نیم Eval-2019: تجزیه\u200cهای متوسط زبان با UCCA', 'sw': 'SemEval-2019 Kazi 1: UCCA', 'af': 'SemEval-2019 Opdrag 1: Cross-language Semantic Parsing met UCCA', 'tr': 'SemEval-2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with UCCA', 'sq': 'SemEval-2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with UCCA', 'am': 'Eval-2019 ስራ 1: Cross-language Semantic Parsing with UCCA', 'hy': 'Սեմեվալ 2019 թվականի առաջին հանձնարարությունը՝ UCCA-ի հետ փոխլեզվով սեմատիկ վերլուծությունը', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Görev 1: UCCA ilə çox dilli Semantik Parsing', 'ca': 'SemEval-2019 Tarefa 1: Analització Semàtica translingüística amb UCCA', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2019 কাজ ১: ক্রস-ভাষার সেম্যান্টিক পার্সিং ইউসিকিএ দিয়ে', 'bs': 'Semeval-2019 Zadnji zadatak 1: Međujezičko semantičko analiziranje sa UCCA-om', 'fi': 'SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 1: Kielten välinen semanttinen käsittely UCCA:n kanssa', 'cs': 'SemEval-2019 Úkol 1: Cross-jazyčné sémantické parsování s UCCA', 'et': 'SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 1: Keeleülene semantiline arutelu UCCA-ga', 'jv': 'semiinval-2011 task 1: Kros-language semanti Parasing with UKA', 'ha': 'QScriptBreakpointsModel', 'he': 'SemEval-2019 משימה 1: בדיקת סמנטית בין שפתיים עם UCCA', 'sk': 'SemEval-2019 Naloga 1: Medjezično semantično razpravljanje z UCCA', 'bo': 'SemEval-2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with UCCA'}
{'en': 'We present the SemEval 2019 shared task on Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) parsing in English, German and French, and discuss the participating systems and results. UCCA is a cross-linguistically applicable framework for semantic representation, which builds on extensive typological work and supports rapid annotation. UCCA poses a challenge for existing parsing techniques, as it exhibits reentrancy (resulting in DAG structures), discontinuous structures and non-terminal nodes corresponding to complex semantic units. The shared task has yielded improvements over the state-of-the-art baseline in all languages and settings. Full results can be found in the task’s website.https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160.', 'ar': 'نقدم مهمة SemEval 2019 المشتركة حول التحليل التوضيحي المعرفي العالمي (UCCA) باللغات الإنجليزية والألمانية والفرنسية ، ونناقش الأنظمة والنتائج المشاركة. UCCA هو إطار عمل متعدد اللغات قابل للتطبيق للتمثيل الدلالي ، والذي يبني على عمل تصنيفي واسع النطاق ويدعم التعليقات التوضيحية السريعة. يمثل UCCA تحديًا لتقنيات التحليل الحالية ، حيث يعرض إعادة الدخول (مما يؤدي إلى هياكل DAG) ، والهياكل غير المستمرة والعقد غير الطرفية المقابلة للوحدات الدلالية المعقدة. أسفرت المهمة المشتركة عن تحسينات على أحدث خط أساسي في جميع اللغات والإعدادات. يمكن العثور على النتائج الكاملة في موقع المهمة على الويب <https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160>.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos a tarefa compartilhada do SemEval 2019 sobre análise de Anotação Cognitiva Conceitual Universal (UCCA) em inglês, alemão e francês e discutimos os sistemas e resultados participantes. UCCA é uma estrutura multilinguística aplicável para representação semântica, que se baseia em extenso trabalho tipológico e suporta anotações rápidas. O UCCA representa um desafio para as técnicas de análise sintática existentes, pois exibe reentrância (resultando em estruturas DAG), estruturas descontínuas e nós não terminais correspondentes a unidades semânticas complexas. A tarefa compartilhada gerou melhorias em relação à linha de base de última geração em todos os idiomas e configurações. Os resultados completos podem ser encontrados no site da tarefa <https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160>.', 'es': 'Presentamos la tarea compartida de SemEval 2019 sobre el análisis de la Anotación Cognitiva Conceptual Universal (UCCA) en inglés, alemán y francés, y discutimos los sistemas participantes y los resultados. La UCCA es un marco de aplicación interlingüística para la representación semántica, que se basa en un extenso trabajo tipológico y admite anotaciones rápidas. UCCA plantea un desafío para las técnicas de análisis existentes, ya que exhibe reentrada (lo que resulta en estructuras DAG), estructuras discontinuas y nodos no terminales correspondientes a unidades semánticas complejas. La tarea compartida ha producido mejoras con respecto a la línea de base de vanguardia en todos los idiomas y entornos. Los resultados completos se pueden encontrar en el sitio web de la tarea < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'fr': "Nous présentons la tâche partagée SemEval 2019 sur l'analyse de l'annotation cognitive conceptuelle universelle (UCCA) en anglais, allemand et français, et discutons des systèmes participants et des résultats. UCCA est un cadre interlinguistique applicable pour la représentation sémantique, qui s'appuie sur un travail typologique approfondi et prend en charge l'annotation rapide. L'UCCA pose un défi pour les techniques d'analyse existantes, car elle présente une réentrée (résultant en des structures DAG), des structures discontinues et des nœuds non terminaux correspondant à des unités sémantiques complexes. La tâche partagée a permis d'améliorer la base de référence de pointe dans toutes les langues et tous les contextes. Les résultats complets peuvent être consultés sur le site Web de la tâche < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.", 'ja': '私たちは、英語、ドイツ語、フランス語の普遍的概念認知アノテーション（ UCCA ）構文解析に関するSemEval 2019共有タスクを提示し、参加システムと結果について話し合います。UCCAは、セマンティック表現のためにクロスリンガルに適用可能なフレームワークであり、広範なタイプ研究に基づいており、迅速なアノテーションをサポートしています。UCCAは、既存の構文解析技術に課題をもたらします。これは、複雑なセマンティックユニットに対応する再突入（ DAG構造をもたらす）、不連続な構造、および非終端ノードを示すためです。共有タスクは、すべての言語と設定で最先端のベースラインよりも改善されています。完全な結果は、タスクのウェブサイトにあり<https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160>ます。', 'zh': '臣等言SemEval 2019通名识注(UCCA)共享之务,以英语,德语与法语解析,论其统终。 UCCA者,语言之语义框架,立于广类型学之上,而赞其速注也。 UCCA挑战于今解析术者,重入性(DAG构),不连续结构应杂语义单元之非终端节点也。 凡言语设中,共事皆先进之基线。 可以网站<https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160>得全者也。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем совместную задачу SemEval 2019 по анализу универсальной концептуальной когнитивной аннотации (UCCA) на английском, немецком и французском языках и обсуждаем участвующие системы и результаты. UCCA является межлингвистически применимой структурой для семантического представления, которая основывается на обширной типологической работе и поддерживает быструю аннотацию. UCCA представляет проблему для существующих методов синтаксического анализа, поскольку он демонстрирует повторное вхождение (что приводит к структурам DAG), прерывистые структуры и нетерминальные узлы, соответствующие сложным семантическим единицам. Совместная задача позволила добиться улучшений по сравнению с современным базовым уровнем на всех языках и во всех условиях. Полные результаты можно найти на сайте задания<https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160>.', 'hi': 'हम अंग्रेजी, जर्मन और फ्रेंच में पार्सिंग यूनिवर्सल वैचारिक संज्ञानात्मक एनोटेशन (यूसीसीए) पर SemEval 2019 साझा कार्य प्रस्तुत करते हैं, और भाग लेने वाली प्रणालियों और परिणामों पर चर्चा करते हैं। यूसीसीए शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व के लिए एक क्रॉस-भाषाई रूप से लागू ढांचा है, जो व्यापक टाइपोलॉजिकल कार्य पर बनाता है और तेजी से एनोटेशन का समर्थन करता है। यूसीसीए मौजूदा पार्सिंग तकनीकों के लिए एक चुनौती है, क्योंकि यह पुन: प्रवेश (डीएजी संरचनाओं के परिणामस्वरूप), असंतत संरचनाओं और जटिल शब्दार्थ इकाइयों के अनुरूप गैर-टर्मिनल नोड्स प्रदर्शित करता है। साझा कार्य ने सभी भाषाओं और सेटिंग्स में अत्याधुनिक आधार रेखा पर सुधार किया है। पूर्ण परिणाम कार्य की वेबसाइट <https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160> में पाए जा सकते हैं।', 'ga': "Cuirimid tasc comhroinnte SemEval 2019 i láthair ar pharsáil Anótála Cognaíoch Coincheapa Uilíoch (UCCA) i mBéarla, i nGearmáinis agus i bhFraincis, agus pléimid na córais agus na torthaí rannpháirteacha. Is creat tras-teangeolaíoch é UCCA le haghaidh ionadaíocht shéimeantach, a thógann ar obair thíopeolaíochta fhairsing agus a thacaíonn le nótáil thapa. Cruthaíonn UCCA dúshlán do theicníochtaí parsála atá ann cheana féin, mar go léiríonn sé athiontráil (struchtúir DAG mar thoradh air), struchtúir neamhleanúnacha agus nóid neamh-theirmineacha a fhreagraíonn d'aonaid shéimeantacha casta. Tá feabhsuithe tagtha ar an mbunlíne úrscothach i ngach teanga agus suíomh mar gheall ar an tasc roinnte. Tá torthaí iomlána le fáil ar shuíomh Gréasáin an taisc < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ 2019 წლის SemEval-ს ჩვენებთ საერთო დავალება ინგლისური, გერმანური და ფრანგური სისტემის და შედეგების განსხვავებაში. UCCA არის სემონტიკური გამოსახულებელი სემპენტიკური გამოსახულებელი ფრამეტრი, რომელიც განახულებული ტიპოლოგიური სამუშაოში დააყენება და მხოლოდ სიჩქარე ანოტაციის UCCA იყენებს ძალიან განსხვავებული ტექნექციების გამოცდილობა, როგორც ის გამოჩვენებს განსხვავებას (DAG სტრუქტურაციების შემდეგ), განსხვავებული სტრუქტურები და არ-ტერმინალური კონდიები, რო საზოგადოებული დავალება ყველა ენების და პარამეტრების მზოგადომის განმავლობაზე გაუქმედება. სამუშაო შესაძლებელია დავალების გვერდიდან < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 - ეა.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε την κοινή εργασία για την ανάλυση της καθολικής εννοιολογικής νοητικής σχολιασμού (στα αγγλικά, γερμανικά και γαλλικά, και συζητάμε τα συμμετέχοντα συστήματα και τα αποτελέσματα. Το UCCA είναι ένα διαγλωσσικά εφαρμόσιμο πλαίσιο σημασιολογικής αναπαράστασης, το οποίο βασίζεται σε εκτεταμένη τυπολογική εργασία και υποστηρίζει την ταχεία σχολιασμό. Η UCCA αποτελεί πρόκληση για τις υπάρχουσες τεχνικές ανάλυσης, καθώς παρουσιάζει επανένταξη (με αποτέλεσμα δομές DAG), ασυνεχείς δομές και μη τελικούς κόμβους που αντιστοιχούν σε σύνθετες σημασιολογικές μονάδες. Η κοινή εργασία έχει επιφέρει βελτιώσεις έναντι της βάσης βάσης τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε όλες τις γλώσσες και ρυθμίσεις. Τα πλήρη αποτελέσματα μπορούν να βρεθούν στην ιστοσελίδα της εργασίας < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a SemEval 2019 közös feladatát az univerzális koncepciós kognitív megjegyzés (UCCA) elemzésével angol, német és francia nyelven, és megvitatjuk a résztvevő rendszereket és eredményeket. Az UCCA egy nyelveken átnyúló keretrendszer a szemantikai reprezentációhoz, amely kiterjedt tipológiai munkára épül és támogatja a gyors jegyzetelést. Az UCCA kihívást jelent a meglévő elemzési technikák számára, mivel visszatérést mutat (DAG struktúrákat eredményezve), szakaszos struktúrákat és komplex szemantikai egységeknek megfelelő nem terminális csomópontokat. A megosztott feladat minden nyelven és beállításban javult a legkorszerűbb alapterv. A teljes eredmény megtalálható a feladat weboldalán < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'it': "Presentiamo il compito condiviso SemEval 2019 sull'analisi dell'annotazione cognitiva concettuale universale (UCCA) in inglese, tedesco e francese, e discutiamo i sistemi e i risultati partecipanti. UCCA è un framework multilinguisticamente applicabile per la rappresentazione semantica, che si basa su un ampio lavoro tipologico e supporta l'annotazione rapida. L'UCCA rappresenta una sfida per le tecniche di analisi esistenti, in quanto mostra la reentranza (con conseguente struttura DAG), strutture discontinue e nodi non terminali corrispondenti a unità semantiche complesse. L'attività condivisa ha apportato miglioramenti rispetto alla linea di base all'avanguardia in tutte le lingue e impostazioni. I risultati completi possono essere trovati nel sito web dell'attività < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.", 'kk': 'Біз 2019 жылдың SemEval бөлінген тапсырманы "Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation" (UCCA) ағылшын, неміс және француз тілінде талдау жүйелерді және нәтижелерді талдап көрдік. UCCA - semantic representation үшін көптеген типтологиялық жұмыс үшін қолдануға арналған жұмыс бағдарламасы. Бұл үлкен типтологиялық жұмыс үшін құрылады және тез жазбаларды қолдайды UCCA барлық талдау технологияларына әсер етеді, себебі оның қайта бағыттауын (DAG құрылғыларына сәйкес келетін) көрсетеді, комплекс семантикалық бірліктерге сәйкес келетін құрылғылар мен терминал емес түйіндер. Ортақ тапсырманың барлық тілдер мен параметрлерінде суреттің негізгі жолында жақсартулары болды. Тапсырманың веб- сайтында толық нәтижелер табылады < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 യൂണിവല്\u200d കോണ്\u200dസെപ്റ്റല്\u200d കോണ്\u200dഗ്നിറ്റിവിന്\u200dറെ (UCCA) പാര്\u200dജിങ്ങ്, ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d ഫ്രെഞ്ചില്\u200d പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പേ സെമാന്റിക് പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കുവേണ്ടി യുസിക്കി ഒരു ക്രിസ്ലിങ്കില്\u200d പ്രയോഗപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് ആണ് അത് വിശാലമ നിലവിലുള്ള പാര്\u200dസിംഗ് സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200dക്ക് യുസിക്കി ഒരു വ്യാല്\u200dക്കെല്ലാം ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് വീണ്ടും നിര്\u200dത്തുന്നത് കാണിക്കുന്നു.  പങ്കാളിയുള്ള ജോലി എല്ലാ ഭാഷകളിലും സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളിലും സ്റ്റേറ്റ് - ആര്\u200dട്ട് ബേസ്ലൈനിലും മെച്ചപ്പെടുത് പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ജോലിയുടെ വെബ്സ്റ്റില്\u200d കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'mt': "Aħna nippreżentaw il-kompitu kondiviż SemEval 2019 dwar l-analiżi tal-Annotazzjoni Konċettwali Universali (UCCA) bl-Ingliż, il-Ġermaniż u l-Franċiż, u niddiskutu s-sistemi u r-riżultati parteċipanti. L-UCCA hija qafas translingwistikament applikabbli għar-rappreżentanza semantika, li jibni fuq xogħol tipiku estensiv u jappoġġja annotazzjoni rapid a. L-UCCA to ħloq sfida għat-tekniki tal-analiżi eżistenti, peress li turi l-konċentrazzjoni mill-ġdid (li tirriżulta fi strutturi DAG), strutturi kontinwi u nodi mhux terminali li jikkorrispondu għal unitajiet semantiċi kumplessi. Il-kompitu kondiviż wassal għal titjib fuq il-linja bażi l-aktar avvanzata fil-lingwi u l-ambjenti kollha. Full results can be found in the task's website < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.", 'mn': 'Бид 2019 оны SemEval-г Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) Англи, Герман, Французтай хуваалцаж, оролцох систем, үр дүнг ярилцаж байна. УККА бол олон хэлний хэлбэрээр хэрэглэгддэг систем юм. Энэ нь маш олон хэлбэрийн ажил дээр бүтээж, хурдан сэтгэл хөдлөлийг дэмжиж байна. УККА сууж буй хуваалцах техникуудын тулд зорилго бий болгодог. Яагаад гэвэл энэ нь дахин төвөгтэй байдал (DAG бүтээгдэхүүний үр дүнд) үзүүлдэг, төвөгтэй семантик нэгжтэй холбоотой зогсоох бүтээгдэхүүнүүд болон тер Бүх хэл болон тохиолдолд хуваалцагдсан ажил нь урлагийн үндсэн шугам дээр сайжруулсан. Бүтэн үр дүнг ажлын вебсайт дээр олж болно. https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome 2019 m. SemEval bendrą užduotį, susijusią su Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) analizavimu anglų, vokiečių ir prancūzų kalbomis, ir aptariame dalyvaujančias sistemas ir rezultatus. UCCA yra tarpkalbinė semantinio atstovavimo sistema, kuri grindžiama išsamiu tipologiniu darbu ir remia greitą annotaciją. UCCA poses a challenge for existing parsing techniques, as it exhibits reentrancy (resulting in DAG structures), discontinuous structures and non-terminal nodes corresponding to complex semantic units.  Dėl bendros užduoties visose kalbose ir aplinkybėse pagerėjo naujausia bazė. Visus rezultatus galima rasti užduoties interneto svetainėje < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'mk': 'We present the SemEval 2019 shared task on Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) parsing in English, German and French, and discuss the participating systems and results.  УККА е крослингвистички применлива рамка за семантична претстава, која се базира на екстремна типологичка работа и ја поддржува брзата анотација. UCCA poses a challenge for existing parsing techniques, as it exhibits reentrancy (resulting in DAG structures), discontinuous structures and non-terminal nodes corresponding to complex semantic units.  The shared task has yielded improvements over the state-of-the-art baseline in all languages and settings.  Целосни резултати се наоѓаат на веб-страницата на задачата < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer semiEval 2019 delt oppgåve om universale konseptuelle kognitiv notasjon (UCCA) som analyserer på engelsk, tysk og fransk, og diskuterer deltar systema og resultatene. UCCA er eit krysspråkstisk tilgjengeleg rammeverk for semantisk representasjon, som bygger på utvida typologisk arbeid og støttar rask notasjon. UCCA viser eit utfordring for eksisterande tolkingstekningar, sidan han viser reinntranse (som følgjer i DAG-strukturar), avslutta strukturar og ikkje-terminalnoder som tilsvarar komplekse semantiske einingar. Den delte oppgåva har fått forbedringar over statuslinja for kunsten i alle språk og innstillingar. Finn fulle resultat på oppgåvessida < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >', 'ms': 'We present the SemEval 2019 shared task on Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) parsing in English, German and French, and discuss the participating systems and results.  UCCA is a cross-linguistically applicable framework for semantic representation, which builds on extensive typological work and supports rapid annotation.  UCCA menghasilkan cabaran untuk teknik penghuraian yang ada, kerana ia menunjukkan kemegahan semula (yang mengakibatkan struktur DAG), struktur yang berhenti dan nod bukan terminal yang sepadan dengan unit semantik kompleks. The shared task has yielded improvements over the state-of-the-art baseline in all languages and settings.  Hasil penuh boleh ditemui dalam laman web tugas < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm sarcina comună SemEval 2019 privind analizarea Adnotării Cognitive Conceptuale Universale (UCCA) în limbile engleză, germană și franceză și discutăm sistemele și rezultatele participante. UCCA este un cadru interlingvistic aplicabil pentru reprezentarea semantică, care se bazează pe o muncă tipologică extinsă și sprijină adnotare rapidă. UCCA reprezintă o provocare pentru tehnicile de analizare existente, deoarece prezintă reentranță (rezultând structuri DAG), structuri discontinue și noduri non-terminale corespunzătoare unor unități semantice complexe. Activitatea partajată a adus îmbunătățiri față de nivelul de referință de ultimă generație în toate limbile și setările. Rezultatele complete pot fi găsite pe site-ul sarcinii < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo zajednički zadatak SemEval 2019 o univerzalnoj konseptualnoj kognitivnoj anotaciji (UCCA) za analizu na engleskom, nemačkom i francuskom jeziku i razgovaramo o sistemima i rezultatima sudjelovanja. UCCA je međujezički primjenjivan okvir za semantičku predstavu, koji se temelji na širokom tipološkom radu i podržava brzu annotaciju. UCCA predstavlja izazov za postojeće tehnike analize, jer pokazuje ponovnu kontrolu (rezultat u strukturi DAG), prekinute strukture i neoterminalne čvorove koje odgovaraju kompleksnim semantičkim jedinicama. Podijeljeni zadatak je povećao poboljšanje na početnoj liniji stanja umjetnosti na svim jezicima i postavima. Potpuni rezultati se nalaze na stranici zadatka < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy wspólne zadanie SemEval 2019 na temat analizy uniwersalnej koncepcyjnej annotacji poznawczej (UCCA) w języku angielskim, niemieckim i francuskim oraz omówimy uczestniczące systemy i wyniki. UCCA jest międzyjęzykowo stosowanym frameworkiem reprezentacji semantycznej, który opiera się na obszernej pracy typologicznej i wspiera szybką adnotację. UCCA stanowi wyzwanie dla istniejących technik parsowania, ponieważ wykazuje reentrancję (skutkującą strukturami DAG), struktury nieciągłe i niekońcowe węzły odpowiadające złożonym jednostkom semantycznym. Wspólne zadanie przyniosło ulepszenia w stosunku do najnowocześniejszej bazy bazowej we wszystkich językach i ustawieniach. Pełne wyniki można znaleźć na stronie internetowej zadania < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'si': 'අපි 2019 සෙම්වේල් එක්ක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂ කරනවා ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය, ජර්මන් සහ ෆ්\u200dරෑන්සියාන් වලින් පාර UCCA තමයි සෙමැන්ටික් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සඳහා විශාල භාෂාවික විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් ක්\u200dරියාකාරයෙක් UCCA සිද්ධ විශ්ලේෂණ තාක්ෂණය සඳහා අභ්\u200dයානයක් තියෙනවා, ඒක ප්\u200dරවර්තනය (DAG සැලසුම් සඳහා), අවස්ථාවක් සහ නොටර්මිනේල් නොඩ්ස් සම් සම්බන්ධ වැඩේ සියළු භාෂාවය සහ සැකසුම් වල ස්ථානය සඳහා ස්ථානයේ ස්ථානය-of-the-art-baseline වල සුදුස පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරතිපූර්ණ ප්\u200dරතිපූර්ණ වැඩසටහනේ හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >', 'so': 'Waxaannu soo bandhignaynaa shuqulka SemEval 2019 ee lagu qeybeeyey jaamacadda dhamaadka (UCCA) oo lagu baaraandegayo afka Ingiriis, Jarmal iyo Faraansiis, waxaana kala sheekeysanaynaa nidaamka qayb-qaadashada iyo resultiyada. UCCA waa qorshaha lagu isticmaalayo afka kala duwan, kaas oo ku dhisa shaqo aad u badan oo isticmaalaya oo ku caawinaya dhibaato dhaqso ah. UCCA waxay leedahay dhibaato ay leedahay qalabka baaritaanka ku jirta, sababtoo ah waxay muuqataa dib u celinta (taas oo sababtay dhismaha DAG), joojin dhismaha aan joojin iyo habaarka aan terminal ahayn oo u eg qalabka kooxaha semantika. Shaqada qayb ahaan loo qabtay waxay soo hormarisay horumarinta xaaladda farshaxanka oo dhan ku qoran luuqadaha iyo sahabaha oo dhan. Faahfaahin buuxa waxaad ka heleysaa bogagga shabakadda shaqada < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar SemEval 2019 delade uppgift om Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) parsing på engelska, tyska och franska, och diskuterar de deltagande systemen och resultaten. UCCA är ett tvärlingvistiskt tillämpbart ramverk för semantisk representation, som bygger på omfattande typologiskt arbete och stöder snabb notering. UCCA utgör en utmaning för befintliga tolkningstekniker, eftersom den uppvisar reentrans (vilket resulterar i DAG-strukturer), diskontinuära strukturer och icke-terminala noder motsvarande komplexa semantiska enheter. Den delade uppgiften har lett till förbättringar jämfört med den senaste baslinjen på alla språk och inställningar. Fullständiga resultat hittar du på uppgiftens webbplats < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் செம்வால் 2019 பகிர்ந்த பணியை காண்பிக்கிறோம் உலகளாவிய முறையான குறிப்பு அறிவிப்பு (UCCA) ஆங்கிலத்தில், ஜெர்மன் மற்றும் பிரெஞ்சில UCCA ஒரு முழு மொழியில் பயன்படுத்தப்படும் சட்டம் பெம்மான்டிக் குறிப்பிடுதலுக்கு, அது விரைவான தொழில்நுட்பம் வேலையில் கட் UCCA ஏற்கனவே இருக்கும் பாடல் தொழில்நுட்பத்திற்கான சவால் இருக்கிறது, ஏனெனில் அது மீண்டும் ஒழுங்குப்படுத்தும் (DAG structures), நிறுத்தும் அமைப்புகள் மற்றும்  பகிர்ந்த பணி அனைத்து மொழிகள் மற்றும் அமைப்புகளிலும் முன்னேற்றங்களை நிலையில்- கலை அடிப்படையில் முன்னேற முழு முடிவுகள் பணியின் இணையதளத்தில் கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியும் < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'ur': 'ہم ۲۰۱۹ سیم ایولی کا مشترک کام انگلیسی، جرمنی اور فرانسوی میں پارس کررہے ہیں اور مشترک سیسٹم اور نتیجے کے بارے میں بحث کررہے ہیں. UCCA سیمنٹی نمایش کے لئے ایک مختلف زبان کے طور پر قابل استعمال ہونے والی فرموک ہے، جو بڑے ٹائیپٹولوژیک کام پر بناتا ہے اور سریع نمایش کی مدد کرتا ہے. UCCA موجود پارسینگ ٹیکنیک کے لئے ایک چال ڈالتا ہے، جس طرح وہ دوبارہ کنٹرنسی (DAG ساختاروں کے نتیجہ میں) دکھاتا ہے، قطع ساختار اور غیر ترمینل نوڈ جو پیچیدہ سیمانٹیک یونیٹوں کے ساتھ مطابق ہیں۔ مشترک کام نے تمام زبانوں اور تنظیمات میں ایٹیٹ-آرت-بیس لین پر بہترین ترقی پیدا کی ہے. کام کے ویٹس ویٹس میں پورے نتائج پا سکتے ہیں < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >', 'uz': 'Biz SemEval 2019 tashkilotni Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) ingliz, Olmon va Fransuz tilida birlashtirishga ega qilamiz, va ishlash tizimlarini va natijalarini kuzatamiz. UCCA - semantik representation uchun qoʻllanmagan muloqat qoʻllaniladigan freym. Bu juda kengaytirilgan typologik vazifalarini yaratadi va tez taʼminlovchini qoʻllaydi. UCCA poses a challenge for existing parsing techniques, as it exhibits reentrancy (resulting in DAG structures), discontinuous structures and non-terminal nodes corresponding to complex semantic units.  Boʻlishilgan vazifa hamma tillar va moslamalar davomida shaxsiyatlarni bajarildi. Toʻliq natijalar vazifa saytida topilmadi < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi xin giới thiệu công việc chia sẻ của SemEvl 2009 về giải thích ngôn ngữ truyền dẫn chung (UCCA) phân tích bằng tiếng Anh, Đức và Pháp, và thảo luận về hệ thống và kết quả. Cơ quan ngoại ngữ ngữ học ứng dụng về mặt ngữ pháp về phân biệt chữ, dựa trên các công việc quy mô rộng và hỗ trợ ghi chú nhanh. Cơ quan cấu tạo tạo tạo một thử thách cho các kỹ thuật phân tích tồn tại, vì nó hiển thị tái nhập vai (kết quả là cấu trúc DAG), cấu trúc ngắt quãng và các nút chưa phải cuối tương ứng với các đơn vị văn học phức tạp. Nhiệm vụ chia sẻ đã nâng cao hoàn cảnh cơ bản thời đại của mọi ngôn ngữ và thiết lập. Toàn bộ kết quả có thể tìm thấy trên trang web của tác vụ https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 -̀.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer SemEval 2019 fælles opgave om Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) parsing på engelsk, tysk og fransk, og diskuterer de deltagende systemer og resultater. UCCA er en tværsproget anvendelig ramme for semantisk repræsentation, som bygger på omfattende typologisk arbejde og understøtter hurtig notering. UCCA udgør en udfordring for eksisterende parsing teknikker, da det udviser reentration (resulterer i DAG strukturer), diskontinuelle strukturer og ikke-terminale noder svarende til komplekse semantiske enheder. Den delte opgave har givet forbedringer i forhold til den avancerede oprindelige plan på alle sprog og indstillinger. Fulde resultater kan findes på opgavens hjemmeside < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'bg': 'Представяме споделената задача "Универсална концептуална когнитивна анотация" на английски, немски и френски език и обсъждаме участващите системи и резултати. UCCA е междулингвистично приложима рамка за семантично представяне, която се основава на обширна типологична работа и поддържа бърза анотация. UCCA поставя предизвикателство за съществуващите техники за анализ, тъй като показва реинтрантност (което води до структури на DAG), прекъснати структури и нетерминални възли, съответстващи на сложни семантични единици. Споделената задача доведе до подобрения спрямо най-съвременната базова линия във всички езици и настройки. Пълни резултати можете да намерите в уебсайта на задачата < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'nl': 'We presenteren de SemEval 2019 gedeelde taak over Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) parsen in het Engels, Duits en Frans, en bespreken de deelnemende systemen en resultaten. UCCA is een cross-linguïstisch toepasbaar framework voor semantische representatie, dat voortbouwt op uitgebreid typologisch werk en snelle annotatie ondersteunt. UCCA vormt een uitdaging voor bestaande parsetechnieken, omdat het reentrantie vertoont (resulterend in DAG-structuren), discontinuïge structuren en niet-terminale knooppunten die overeenkomen met complexe semantische eenheden. De gedeelde taak heeft verbeteringen opgeleverd ten opzichte van de state-of-the-art baseline in alle talen en instellingen. Volledige resultaten zijn te vinden op de website van de taak < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo zajednički zadatak u semiEvalu 2019. godine o univerzalnoj konceptualnoj kognitivnoj annotaciji (UCCA) analiziranju na engleskom, njemačkom i francuskom jeziku i razgovaranju o sustavima i rezultatima sudjelovanja. UCCA je međujezički primjenjivan okvir za semantičku predstavu, koji se temelji na širokom tipološkom radu i podržava brzu annotaciju. UCCA predstavlja izazov za postojeće tehnike analize, jer pokazuje ponovnu kontrolu (rezultat DAG struktura), prekinute strukture i neoterminalne čvorove odgovarajuće kompleksnim semantičkim jedinicama. Zajednički zadatak je povećao poboljšanje u početnoj liniji stanja umjetnosti na svim jezicima i postavima. Potpuni rezultati se nalaze na stranici zadatka < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >', 'de': 'Wir stellen die gemeinsame Aufgabe SemEval 2019 zum Parsen von Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) in Englisch, Deutsch und Französisch vor und diskutieren die beteiligten Systeme und Ergebnisse. UCCA ist ein sprachübergreifend anwendbares Framework für semantische Repräsentation, das auf umfangreicher typologischer Arbeit aufbaut und eine schnelle Annotation unterstützt. UCCA stellt eine Herausforderung für bestehende Parsing-Techniken dar, da es Reentranz (was zu DAG-Strukturen führt), diskontinuierliche Strukturen und nicht-terminale Knoten aufweist, die komplexen semantischen Einheiten entsprechen. Die gemeinsame Aufgabe hat in allen Sprachen und Einstellungen Verbesserungen gegenüber der State-of-the-Art-Baseline erzielt. Die vollständigen Ergebnisse finden Sie auf der Website der Aufgabe < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'id': 'We present the SemEval 2019 shared task on Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) parsing in English, German and French, and discuss the participating systems and results.  UCCA merupakan rangkaian yang berlaku secara saling bahasa untuk representation semantis, yang membangun pada kerja tipologi ekstensif dan mendukung annotasi cepat. UCCA mengakibatkan tantangan untuk teknik penghuraian yang ada, karena menunjukkan reentransi (yang menghasilkan struktur DAG), struktur diskontinus dan node non-terminal yang cocok dengan unit semantis kompleks. Tugas berbagi telah memberikan peningkatan atas garis dasar state-of-the-art dalam semua bahasa dan pengaturan. Hasil penuh dapat ditemukan di situs tugas < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'fa': 'ما عملش مشترک عمومی را در انگلیسی، آلمانی و فرانسوی جهانی (UCCA) برای تقسیم کردن به انگلیسی، آلمانی و فرانسوی نشان می دهیم، و در مورد سیستم\u200cهای مشترک و نتیجه\u200cهای مشترک صحبت می\u200cکنیم. UCCA یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار UCCA یک چالش برای تکنیک\u200cهای تجزیه\u200cکننده موجود قرار می\u200cدهد، همانطور که آن بازگرداندن (به نتیجه ساختارهای DAG) را نمایش می\u200cدهد، ساختارهای متوقف و گره\u200cهای غیر ترمینال که با واحدهای semantic پیچیده می\u200cباشند. وظیفه مشترک در تمام زبان\u200cها و تنظیمات بهترین\u200cها را بر روی خط\u200cهای پایین\u200cهنری به وجود آورد. نتایج کامل در وبسایت کار پیدا می\u200cشود < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 .', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha kazi hiyo ya SemEval 2019 ilishirikisha katika Tamko la Kimataifa la Kutambua UCCA kwa Kiingereza, Kijerumani na Kifaransa, na kujadili mifumo ya kushiriki na matokeo. UCCA ni mfumo unaotumika kwa kutumia lugha kwa ajili ya uwakilishi wa kimapenzi, ambao unajenga kwenye kazi za kiutamaduni na kusaidia uchunguzi wa haraka. UCCA in a changamoto kwa mbinu zilizopo za wimbo, kama inavyoonyesha msimamo mkali (na matokeo ya miundombinu ya DAG), kusitisha miundombinu yasiyo ya msingi yanayohusiana na vifaa vikali vya kimapenzi. Kazi hiyo ya kushirikiana imesababisha maendeleo ya hali ya mambo ya sanaa katika lugha zote na mazingira. Matokeo kamili yanaweza kupatikana kwenye tovuti ya kazi < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'ko': 'SemEval 2019의 영어, 독일어, 프랑스어 등 공통개념인지표시(UCCA) 분석 공유 임무를 소개하고 임무에 참여하는 시스템과 결과를 논의했다.UCCA는 다양한 언어에 적용되는 의미 표현 프레임워크로 광범위한 유형학 작업을 바탕으로 빠른 주석을 지원한다.UCCA는 중입성(DAG 구조를 초래), 불연속 구조와 복잡한 의미 단원에 대응하는 비단말 노드를 나타내기 때문에 기존의 해석 기술에 도전했다.모든 언어와 환경에서 공유 임무는 가장 선진적인 기선보다 개선되었다.완전한 결과는 퀘스트 사이트에서 찾을 수 있습니다<https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160>.', 'tr': 'Biz SemEval 2019-nji ýylda Uniwersal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) iňlisçe, nemesçe we fransuzça habarlaşýan işi bilen ylalaşýarys we olar sistemalary we netijeleri bilen baglaşýarys. UCCA semantik temsil etmek için çoklu dilli bir çerçevesidir. Bu şekilde geniş tipolojik işlerinde inşa edir we çalt duyglanma destekleýär. UCCA öň bar analýşim teknikleri üçin bir kynçylyk bar, sebäbi tekrarlyk(DAG strukturlarynyň netijesi), sarhoş semantik birimlere meňzeşli strukturlary we terminal nodelary görkez. Paýlaşýan zadyň ähli diller we düzümlerdeň durumynda ýagdaýlary çykardy. Tam netijeler göreriniň habatynda tapylýar < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >', 'sq': "Ne paraqesim detyrën e përbashkët të SemEval 2019 mbi analizimin e anotacionit konceptual universal (UCCA) në anglisht, gjerman dhe francez dhe diskutojmë sistemet dhe rezultatet pjesëmarrëse. UCCA është një kuadër i aplikueshëm ndërgjuhësor për përfaqësimin semantik, i cili mbështetet në punën e gjerë tipologjike dhe mbështet anotacionin e shpejtë. UCCA përbën një sfidë për teknikat ekzistuese të analizimit pasi ekspozon ripërqëndrim (që rezulton në struktura DAG), struktura të ndërprera dhe noda jo-terminale që korrespondojnë me njësitë semantike komplekse. Detyra e përbashkët ka sjellë përmirësime në lidhje me bazën më të lartë në të gjitha gjuhët dhe rregullimet. Full results can be found in the task's website < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.", 'af': "Ons stel die SemEval 2019 deel taak op Universele Konsensieële Kognitiewe Annotasie (UCCA) wat in Engels, Duits en Frans verwerk, en bespreek die gedeeltelike stelsels en resultate. UCCA is 'n kruis-lingwisiese aanwenbaar raamwerk vir semantiese voorstelling, wat bou op uitbreidige tipologiese werk en ondersteun vinnige annotasie. UCCA stel 'n uitdrukking vir bestaande verwerking teknike, omdat dit reentrancie (resultaat in DAG strukture), onderhou strukture en non-terminaal nodes wat ooreenstemmende met komplekse semantiese eenhede. Die gedeelde taak het verbeteringe oor die state-of-the-art baseline in alle tale en instellings gegee. Volle resultate kan gevind word in die taak se webwerp < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >", 'am': 'የሴmEval 2019 የዓለማዊ Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) ስራ በንግግሊዝኛ፣ ጀርመን እና ፈረንሳይ ማጋራት እና ተጋሪዎችን ስርዓቶች እና ፍሬታዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ UCCA በተለየ ቋንቋ ለsemantic መልዕክት የተጠቀመ የፍሬም ነው፤ ይህ በተለየ ጥያቄ ሥራ ላይ ይሠራል፡፡ UCCA የአካባቢ ፓርቲ ቴክኖክቶችን (ዳጂ ግንኙነት እንዲያሳየው የDAG ግንኙነት)፣ የመቆጣጠር ግንኙነት እና በተጨማሪው የተርሚናዊ ዩንቨሮች የሚመሳሳይ ያልተማሪ ኖሮች የሚያሳየው ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ The shared task has yielded improvements over the state-of-the-art baseline in all languages and settings.  ሙሉ ውጤቶች በስራ ገጽ ውስጥ ይገኛሉ < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք 2019 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" համագործակցված խնդիրը Անգլերենում, գերմաներենում և ֆրանսերենում, և քննարկում ենք մասնակցության համակարգերը և արդյունքները: UCCA-ը սեմանտիկ ներկայացման միջլեզվաբանական համակարգ է, որը հիմնված է էքսպանսիվ տիպոլոգիական աշխատանքի վրա և աջակցում է արագ նոտացիա: UCCA poses a challenge for existing parsing techniques, as it exhibits reentrancy (resulting in DAG structures), discontinuous structures and non-terminal nodes corresponding to complex semantic units.  Այս ընդհանուր խնդիրը բարելավել է ամենաբարձր հիմքերի վերաբերյալ բոլոր լեզուներում և միջոցներում: Ամբողջ արդյունքները գտնվում են խնդրի կայքում https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 ]:', 'az': 'Biz 2019-ci SemEval paylaşıb üniversal konseptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) barəsində İngilizce, Alman və Fransız dilində ayırılır və iştirak sistemlərini və sonuçlarını mübahisə edirik. UCCA, semantik göstəricisi üçün çox dilli olaraq uyğunlaşan bir çerçevesidir, ki, geniş tipolojik işlərdə inşa edir və tez tələsirləndirir. UCCA mövcud ayrılma tekniklərinin çətinliklərini göstərdiyi kimi, yenidən daxillik göstərir (DAG yapılarından sonrakı), müxtəlif yapılar və kompleks semantik ünvanlara uyğun terminal düyünü göstərir. Bütün dillərdə və ayarlarda bölünən işlər təmizlənmək tərzini art ırdı. Tüm sonuçlar görevinin sitəsində tapıla bilər < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo zajednički zadatak SemEval 2019 o univerzalnoj konceptualnoj kognitivnoj Annotaciji (UCCA) za analizu na engleskom, njemačkom i francuskom jeziku i razgovaramo o sudjelujućim sistemima i rezultatima. UCCA je međujezički primjenjivan okvir za semantičku predstavu, koji se temelji na širokom tipološkom radu i podržava brzu annotaciju. UCCA predstavlja izazov za postojeće tehnike analize, jer pokazuje ponovnu kontrolu (rezultat DAG struktura), prekinute strukture i neoterminalne čvorove koji odgovaraju kompleksnim semantičkim jedinicama. Zajednički zadatak je povećao poboljšanje u početnoj liniji stanja umjetnosti na svim jezicima i postavima. Potpuni rezultati se nalaze na stranici zadatka < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 - Da.', 'bn': 'আমরা সেমইভাল ২০১৯ সালে বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের কনসেপ্টুয়াল কন্সিপ্টুয়েল কোনোনোটেশন (ইউসিকিএ) পার্জিং ভাষায় শেয়ার করেছি এবং অংশগ্রহণের ব্য UCCA is a cross-linguistically applicable framework for semantic representation, which builds on extensive typological work and supports rapid annotation.  ইউসিকিএ বিদ্যমান পার্সিং প্রযুক্তির জন্য একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ প্রদান করেছে, যেহেতু এটি পুনরায় নিয়ন্ত্রণ প্রদর্শন করছে (যার ফলে ডিএজি কাঠামো প্রদর্শন করে), বিরত থামানো  শেয়ার করা কাজ সকল ভাষা এবং বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের বেসাইনে উন্নতি প্রদান করেছে। কাজের ওয়েবসাইটে পুরো ফলাফল পাওয়া যাবে < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >', 'ca': "Presentam la tasca compartida SemEval 2019 sobre l'analització de la Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) en anglès, alemany i francès, i discutem els sistemes i resultats participants. UCCA és un marc translingüísticament aplicable per a la representació semàntica, que es basa en una extensa feina tipològica i suporta una ràpida anotació. UCCA representa un repte per a les tècniques d'analització existents, com mostra reentrança (que resulta en estructures DAG), estructures discontinues i nodos no terminals que corresponden a unitats semàntiques complexes. La tasca compartida ha donat millors en relació amb la base de referència més avançada en totes les llengües i configuracions. Els resultats complets es troben a la web de la tasca < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.", 'et': 'Tutvustame SemEval 2019 jagatud ülesannet universaalse kontseptuaalse kognitiivse annotatsiooni (UCCA) parsimisel inglise, saksa ja prantsuse keeles ning arutame osalevaid süsteeme ja tulemusi. UCCA on semantilise esituse keeleülene raamistik, mis põhineb ulatuslikul tüpoloogilisel tööl ja toetab kiiret märgistamist. UCCA kujutab endast väljakutset olemasolevatele parsimistehnikatele, kuna sellel esineb taasentratsiooni (mille tulemuseks on DAG struktuurid), katkematuid struktuure ja keerukatele semantilistele üksustele vastavaid mitteterminalseid sõlmesid. Ühisülesanne on parandanud kõigis keeltes ja sätetes võrreldes kaasaegse algtasemega. Täielikud tulemused leiate ülesande veebisaidilt < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme SemEval 2019:n yhteisen tehtävän Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) jäsentämisestä englanniksi, saksaksi ja ranskaksi sekä keskustelemme osallistuvista järjestelmistä ja tuloksista. UCCA on monikielisesti sovellettava semanttisen esittämisen viitekehys, joka perustuu laajaan typologiseen työhön ja tukee nopeaa merkitsemistä. UCCA asettaa haasteen olemassa oleville jäsennystekniikoille, koska siinä esiintyy uudelleenkeskittämistä (jolloin syntyy DAG-rakenteita), epäjatkuvia rakenteita ja ei-terminaalisia solmuja, jotka vastaavat monimutkaisia semanttisia yksiköitä. Jaettu tehtävä on tuottanut parannuksia uusimpaan perusaikatauluun kaikilla kielillä ja asetuksilla. Täydelliset tulokset löytyvät tehtävän verkkosivuilta < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'cs': 'Představujeme sdílený úkol SemEval 2019 na univerzální koncepční kognitivní anotaci (UCCA) parsování v angličtině, němčině a francouzštině a diskutujeme o zúčastněných systémech a výsledcích. UCCA je crosslingvisticky aplikovaný rámec pro sémantickou reprezentaci, který staví na rozsáhlé typologické práci a podporuje rychlou anotaci. UCCA představuje výzvu pro stávající parsovací techniky, protože vykazuje reentranci (výsledkem jsou DAG struktury), diskontinuální struktury a nekterminální uzly odpovídající složitým sémantickým jednotkám. Sdílený úkol přinesl zlepšení oproti nejmodernějšímu základnímu principu ve všech jazycích a nastaveních. Úplné výsledky najdete na webových stránkách úkolu < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nambah seminval 2011 9 nggawe sawian nggawe Universi ????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????? Universal UKA thos a shock for current PASS teknik, as it Expires recurrpance (output in DEG architectures), disntinuuus structural and non terminal nodes that match to komplex semanti unit. Pending-Pending-Pending Laptop" and "Desktop https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo skupno nalogo SemEval 2019 o univerzalni konceptualni kognitivni anotaciji (UCCA) v angleščini, nemščini in francoščini ter razpravljamo o sodelujočih sistemih in rezultatih. UCCA je medjezikovno uporaben okvir za semantično predstavitev, ki temelji na obsežnem tipološkem delu in podpira hitro označevanje. UCCA predstavlja izziv za obstoječe tehnike razčlenjanja, saj kaže ponovno vključenost (kar ima za posledico strukture DAG), prekinjene strukture in neterminalna vozlišča, ki ustrezajo kompleksnim semantičnim enotam. Opravilo v skupni rabi je prineslo izboljšave v primerjavi z najsodobnejšim osnovnim načrtom v vseh jezikih in nastavitvah. Celotne rezultate lahko najdete na spletni strani opravila < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'ha': 'Tuna halarce the SemEV 2019 share job on Universal Conceptural Cognitive Annonation (UCCA) paring in English, Jarman and French, kuma sami yi jayayya a cikin shirin system and matsalar. UCCA is a cross-linguistically applicable framework for semantic representation, which builds on extensive typological work and supports rapid annotation.  UCCA yana da wata tsãwa ga masu buƙata na masu buƙata, kamar yadda ta nuna farawa (mai riƙon bakwai DAG), ana saka shutturin da kuma na-tsari masu kamid da sunayen semantic. Yin aikin da aka raba shi ya ƙara improvements kan halin-mai-art cikin duk harshe da tsaro. Ana iya s ãmu cikakken matsalar cikin website na aikin aiki < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >', 'he': 'אנו מציגים את המשימה המשותפת של SemEval 2019 על ניתוח קונפטיבי אוניברסלי (Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation, UCCA) באנגלית, גרמנית וצרפתית, ודון על המערכות והתוצאות המשתתפות. UCCA is a cross-linguistically applicable framework for semantic representation, which builds on extensive typological work and supports rapid annotation.  UCCA מציב אתגר לטכניקות בדיקת קיימות, כיוון שהיא מראה התיכון מחדש (מה שהוביל במבנים DAG), מבנים מפסיקים וחומרים לא טרמינליים שמתאימים ליחידות סמנטיות מורכבות. המשימה המשותפת גרמה לשיפורים על המרכז המצבי ביותר בכל השפות והמסדרות. תוצאות מלאות יכולות למצוא באתר המשימה < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་2019ལོའི་SemEval 2019ཡིས་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚུལ་གྱི་ནང་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་སྤྱད་ཡོད། UCCA ནི་semantic representation(semantic) ལ་སྤྱོད་བཏུབ་པའི་གཞུང་ཆ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་འགྱུར་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འགྱུར་ UCCA poses a challenge for existing parsing techniques, as it exhibits reentrancy (resulting in DAG structures), discontinuous structures and non-terminal nodes corresponding to complex semantic units. སྐད་ཡིག་དང་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དེ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་རེད། བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་དེབ་ཚན་ཡོངས་རྫོགས་སྒྲིག་ཐུབ་པ < https://competitions.codalab.org/competitions/19160 >'}
{'en': 'ANA at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Contextual Emotion detection in Conversations through hierarchical LSTMs and BERT', 'ar': 'ANA في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: الكشف عن المشاعر السياقية في المحادثات من خلال LSTMs الهرمية و BERT', 'es': 'Tarea 3 de ANA en SemEval-2019: Detección de emociones contextuales en conversaciones a través de LSTM jerárquicas y BERT', 'fr': 'ANA au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Détection contextuelle des émotions dans les conversations par le biais de LSTM hiérarchiques et de BERT', 'pt': 'ANA no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Detecção contextual de emoções em conversas por meio de LSTMs hierárquicos e BERT', 'ja': 'ANA at SemEval -2019タスク3 ：階層的LSTMとBERTを介した会話でのコンテキスト感情の検出', 'ru': 'АНА на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Контекстуальное обнаружение эмоций в разговорах через иерархические LSTM и BERT', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 3 पर ANA: पदानुक्रमित LSTMs और BERT के माध्यम से वार्तालापों में प्रासंगिक भावना का पता लगाना', 'zh': 'ANA在SemEval-2019务3:重LSTMBERT检上下文情', 'ga': 'ANA ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Mothúchán Comhthéacsúil i gComhrá a bhrath trí LSTM ordlathach agus BERT', 'ka': 'ANA semiEval-2019 სამუშაო სამუშაო დავალება 3: კონტექსტური ემოციონის განახლება კონტაქციებში ჰიერაქტიკური LSTMs და BERT', 'hu': 'ANA a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: Kontextuális érzelmek felismerése a beszélgetésekben hierarchikus LSTMs és BERT segítségével', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Ανίχνευση συγκλονιστικών συναισθημάτων σε συζητήσεις μέσω ιεραρχικών και BERT', 'it': 'ANA a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Rilevazione delle emozioni contestuali nelle conversazioni attraverso LSTMs gerarchici e BERT', 'kk': 'АНА 3- тапсырма: Ейерархиялық LSTMs және BERT арқылы контексті көңіл күйін анықтау', 'mk': 'АНА на SemEval-2019 задача 3: Детектирање на контекстни емоции во конверзии преку хиерархични LSTMs и BERT', 'lt': 'ANA per 2019 m. pusmetį 3 užduotis: Kontekstinės emocijos nustatymas konversacijose naudojant hierarchinius LSTM ir BERT', 'ms': 'ANA pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Pengesanan Emosi Konteksual dalam Perbualan melalui LSTM dan BERT hierarkis', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3: ഹിയരാര്\u200dച്ചിക്കല്\u200d എസ്റ്റിമിസും ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയും മുകളിലൂടെ സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരത്തിലെ കൂട്ടു', 'mn': 'ANA at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection in Conversations through hierarchical LSTMs and BERT', 'mt': 'ANA f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 3: Sejbien ta’ Emożjonijiet Kuntest fil-Konversjonijiet permezz ta’ LSTMs ġerarkiċi u BERT', 'no': 'ANA på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3: Kontekstoppdaging av følelser i samtaler gjennom hierarkiske LSTMs og BERT', 'pl': 'ANA w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Kontekstowe wykrywanie emocji w rozmowach za pomocą hierarchicznych LSTMów i BERT', 'ro': 'ANA la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Detectarea emoțiilor contextuale în conversații prin LSTMs ierarhice și BERT', 'sr': 'ANA na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: Kontekstualno otkrivanje emocija u razgovorima kroz hijerarhičke LSTMs i BERT', 'sv': 'ANA på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Kontextuell känslodetektering i konversationer genom hierarkiska LSTMs och BERT', 'si': 'ANA at semeval-2019 Job 3: Contextal Emotion Detection in Conversations Through hièrarArchic LSTMs and BERT', 'so': 'ANA at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion in Conversations through hierarchical LSTMs and BERT', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணியில் ANA: உயர்நிலை LSTMs மற்றும் BERT மூலம் உரையாடலில் உள்ள உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பு', 'ur': 'سیمیوئل-2019 ٹاکس 3 میں ANA: سیمیوئل-2019 ٹاکس 3 میں کنٹکسٹیول احساسات شناسایی کی باتوں کے ذریعہ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'ANA tại Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-209: Phát hiện cảm xúc liên tiếp trong quá trình đối thoại qua các cử tri thứ phân và BERT', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Откриване на контекстуални емоции в разговорите чрез йерархични ЛТМ и БЕРТ', 'nl': 'ANA bij SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Contextuele Emotiedetectie in Gesprekken via hiërarchische LSTMs en BERT', 'da': 'ANA på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Kontekstuel følelse detektering i samtaler gennem hierarkiske LSTMs og BERT', 'hr': 'ANA na semiEval-2019 zadatku 3: Kontekstno otkrivanje emocija u razgovorima kroz hijerarhičke LSTMs i BERT', 'de': 'ANA bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Kontextuelle Emotionserkennung in Gesprächen durch hierarchische LSTMs und BERT', 'id': 'ANA di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Deteksi Emosi Konteksual dalam Perbualan melalui LSTM dan BERT hierarkis', 'fa': 'ANA در ماموریت ۳: شناسایی احساسات متوسط در مکالمات از طریق LSTMs و BERT', 'ko': 'ANA가SemEval-2019퀘스트3: 층별 LSTM과 BERT를 통해 대화에서의 상황 정서 측정', 'sw': 'ANA kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 3: Ugunduzi wa Emotion wa Mazungumzo kwa kupitia LSTMs na BERT', 'tr': 'ANA at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection in Conversations through hierarchical LSTMs and BERT', 'sq': 'ANA në SemEval-2019 Task 3: Detection Contextual Emotions in Conversations through hierarchical LSTMs and BERT', 'am': 'ስራ 3:Contextual Emotion detection in Conversations via hierarchical LSTMs and BERT', 'hy': 'ԱՆԱ-ն 2019-ի կիսագնդի 3. հանձնարարությունը. հաղորդակցման ընթացքում կոնտեքստալ զգացմունքների հայտնաբերումը հիերարխիկ LStms-ների և BER-ների միջոցով', 'az': 'Üçüncü Görev 3: Hiyerarşik LSTMs və BERT vasitəsilə Konuşuşmalarda müxtəlif Emotion Detection', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৩: হিয়েরার্কিল এলস্টিম এবং বার্টির মাধ্যমে আলোচনায় বিদ্যমান সংক্রান্ত তথ্য সনাক্ত করা হয়েছে।', 'bs': 'ANA na semiEval-2019 Task 3: Kontekstno otkrivanje emocija u razgovorima kroz hijerarhičke LSTMs i BERT', 'ca': 'ANA a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection in Conversations through hierarchical LSTMs and BERT', 'cs': 'Úkol 3: Detekce kontextových emocí v konverzacích prostřednictvím hierarchických LSTMů a BERT', 'af': 'ANA by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 3: Konteksual Emotie beskrywing in Gespraak deur hierarkies LSTMs en BERT', 'fi': 'ANA SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 3: Kontekstuaalisen tunteen havaitseminen keskusteluissa hierarkkisten LSTMien ja BERT:n avulla', 'et': 'ANA SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 3: Kontekstuaalsete emotsioonide tuvastamine vestlustes hierarhiliste LSTMde ja BERT kaudu', 'jv': 'ANA at seminval-2011 task 3: context emutation detection', 'sk': 'ANA na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Zaznavanje kontekstualnih čustev v pogovorih prek hierarhičnih LSTMs in BERT', 'he': 'ANA ב SemEval-2019 משימה 3: גילוי רגשות קונטקסטיים בשיחות באמצעות LSTMs הייררכיים וברט', 'ha': 'ANA at SemEV-2019 Tafiyar 3: ContContent Emission Find in Conversation through hierorchical LStM and BERT', 'bo': 'ANA at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion detection in Conversations through hierarchical LSTMs and BERT'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the system submitted by ANA Team for the SemEval-2019 Task 3 : EmoContext. We propose a novel Hierarchi- cal LSTMs for Contextual Emotion Detection (HRLCE) model. It classifies the emotion of an utterance given its conversational con- text. The results show that, in this task, our HRCLE outperforms the most recent state-of- the-art text classification framework : BERT. We combine the results generated by BERT and HRCLE to achieve an overall score of 0.7709 which ranked 5th on the final leader board of the competition among 165 Teams.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة النظام المقدم من فريق ANA لمهمة SemEval-2019 3: EmoContext. نقترح نموذج LSTMs Hierarchi- جديد لاكتشاف المحتوى السياقي (HRLCE). يصنف عاطفة الكلام في ضوء سياق المحادثة. تظهر النتائج أنه في هذه المهمة ، يتفوق HRCLE الخاص بنا في الأداء على أحدث إطار لتصنيف النص: BERT. لقد قمنا بدمج النتائج التي تم الحصول عليها بواسطة BERT و HRCLE لتحقيق النتيجة الإجمالية 0.7709 والتي احتلت المرتبة الخامسة في لوحة المتصدرين النهائية للمسابقة من بين 165 فريقًا.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le système soumis par l'équipe ANA pour la Tâche 3 du SEMEval-2019\xa0: EmoContext. Nous proposons un nouveau modèle LSTM hiérarchique pour la détection contextuelle des émotions (HRLCE). Il classe l'émotion d'un énoncé en fonction de son contexte conversationnel. Les résultats montrent que, dans cette tâche, notre HRCLE surpasse le cadre de classification de texte le plus récent\xa0: BERT. Nous combinons les résultats générés par BERT et HRCLE pour obtenir un score global de 0,7709 qui se classe 5e au classement final de la compétition parmi 165 équipes.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve o sistema apresentado pela Equipa ANA para a Tarefa 3 do SemEval-2019: EmoContext. Propomos um novo modelo de LSTMs Hierárquicos para Detecção de Emoções Contextuais (HRLCE). Classifica a emoção de um enunciado dado seu contexto conversacional. Os resultados mostram que, nesta tarefa, nosso HRCLE supera o mais recente framework de classificação de texto de última geração: BERT. Combinamos os resultados gerados pelo BERT e HRCLE para alcançar uma pontuação geral de 0,7709, que ficou em 5º lugar na tabela de classificação final da competição entre 165 equipes.', 'es': 'Este documento describe el sistema presentado por el equipo de ANA para la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2019: EmoContext. Proponemos un novedoso modelo LSTM jerárquico para la detección de emociones contextuales (HRLCE). Clasifica la emoción de un enunciado dado su contexto conversacional. Los resultados muestran que, en esta tarea, nuestro HRCLE supera al más reciente marco de clasificación de textos de última generación: BERT. Combinamos los resultados generados por BERT y HRCLE para lograr una puntuación general de 0.7709, que ocupó el quinto lugar en la tabla de clasificación final de la competencia entre 165 equipos.', 'ja': '本稿では、ANAチームがSemEval -2019 Task 3: EmoContextのために提出したシステムについて説明する。私たちは、文脈感情検出（ HRLCE ）モデルのための新規のヒエラルキーLSTMを提案します。発話の感情を会話的な文章で分類します。結果は、このタスクでは、当社のHRCLEが最新の最先端のテキスト分類フレームワークであるBERTを上回っていることを示しています。BERTとHRCLEによって生成された結果を組み合わせて、総合スコア0.7709を達成しました。これは、165チーム中、コンペティションの最終リーダーボードで5位にランクインしました。', 'zh': '本文ANA团队为SemEval-2019任3:EmoContext提交之统。 一以上下文情检(HRLCE)模以新型LSTM。 以语言之会话文本对语之情而类之。 结果表明此,吾HRCLE优于最新之先进者框架:BERT。 合BERT与HRCLE生成,得0.7709之总分,排名第5位于165团队之终排行榜。', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе описывается система, представленная командой ANA для задачи 3 SemEval-2019: EmoContext. Мы предлагаем новую иерархическую модель LSTM для контекстного обнаружения эмоций (HRLCE). Он классифицирует эмоции высказывания, учитывая его разговорный текст. Результаты показывают, что в этой задаче наша HRCLE превосходит самую последнюю современную систему классификации текстов: BERT. Мы объединяем результаты, полученные BERT и HRCLE, чтобы получить общий балл 0,7709, который занял 5-е место в финальной таблице лидеров соревнований среди 165 команд.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2019 कार्य 3: EmoContext के लिए ANA टीम द्वारा प्रस्तुत सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है। हम प्रासंगिक भावना का पता लगाने (HRLCE) मॉडल के लिए एक उपन्यास Hierarchi- cal LSTMs का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। यह एक उच्चारण की भावना को वर्गीकृत करता है जो इसके संवादात्मक संयोजन को देखते हुए है। परिणामों से पता चलता है कि, इस कार्य में, हमारा HRCLE सबसे हाल ही में अत्याधुनिक पाठ वर्गीकरण ढांचे से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है: BERT। हम BERT और HRCLE द्वारा उत्पन्न परिणामों को 0.7709 का समग्र स्कोर प्राप्त करने के लिए जोड़ते हैं जो 165 टीमों के बीच प्रतियोगिता के अंतिम नेता बोर्ड पर 5 वें स्थान पर है।', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcóras a chuir Foireann ANA isteach le haghaidh Tasc 3 SemEval-2019: EmoContext. Molaimid samhail LSTM Ordlathach nua le haghaidh Braite Mothúcháin Comhthéacsúla (HRLCE). Rangaíonn sé mothúchán cainte i bhfianaise a chomhthéacs comhrá. Léiríonn na torthaí, sa tasc seo, go sáraíonn ár HRCLE an creat aicmithe téacs úrscothach is déanaí: BERT. Comhcheanglaímid na torthaí a ghineann BERT agus HRCLE chun scór iomlán de 0.7709 a bhaint amach a bhí sa 5ú háit ar bhord ceannais deiridh an chomórtais i measc 165 Foireann.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az ANA Team által benyújtott rendszert a SemEval-2019 feladat 3: EmoContent. Újszerű hierarchikus LSTMs-eket javasolunk a kontextuális érzelmek detektálására (HRLCE). Besorolja egy beszéd érzelmét, tekintettel a beszélgetési szövegére. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy ebben a feladatban HRCLE túllép a legújabb korszerű szövegosztályozási keretrendszerben: a BERT. A BERT és HRCLE által generált eredményeket egyesítve 0,7709 összpontszámot érünk el, amely 165 csapat között az 5. helyen állt a verseny végső vezető listáján.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα που υποβλήθηκε από την Ομάδα ΑΝΑ για την εργασία 3: Εμπλοκontext. Προτείνουμε ένα νέο Hierarchical LSTMs for Contextual Emotion Detection (HRLCE) μοντέλο. Κατηγοριοποιεί το συναίσθημα μιας ομιλίας δεδομένης της συζήτησης της. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι, σε αυτό το έργο, η HRCLE μας ξεπερνά το πιο πρόσφατο πλαίσιο ταξινόμησης κειμένου τελευταίας τεχνολογίας: BERT. Συνδυάζουμε τα αποτελέσματα των BERT και HRCLE για να πετύχουμε μια συνολική βαθμολογία 0.7709 που κατατάχθηκε 5η στην τελική κατάταξη του διαγωνισμού μεταξύ 165 Ομάδων.', 'ka': 'ამ გვერდის სისტემა, რომელიც ANA ჯგუფის სამუშაო- 2019 დავალების სამუშაო: EmoContext- ის გამოყენება. ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ პრომენტის ჰიერაფი- კალური LSTMs კონტექსტური ემოციონის მოდელზე (HRLCE). ის კლასიფიკაცია სიტყვების ემოციას, რომელიც მისი კონტაქციო კონტაქციო ტექსტის შესახებ. შედეგი გამოჩვენება, რომ ამ დავალებში ჩვენი HRCLE უფრო ახალგაზრდა ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის კლასიფიკაციის ფრამეტრი: BERT. ჩვენ კომბიუნეთებთ ბერტი და HRCLE წარმოდგენების შედეგი, რომ 0.7709 წარმოდგენა, რომელიც ხუთი წარმოდგენია ბოლო ლიდერის კომპრენტების ბოლოში 165 ჯგუფის ერთად.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il sistema presentato dal Team ANA per SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContent. Proponiamo un nuovo modello di LSTMs gerarchici per la rilevazione delle emozioni contestuali (HRLCE). Classifica l'emozione di un discorso dato il suo contenuto conversazionale. I risultati mostrano che, in questo compito, il nostro HRCLE supera il più recente quadro di classificazione dei testi all'avanguardia: BERT. Combiniamo i risultati generati da BERT e HRCLE per ottenere un punteggio complessivo di 0,7709 che si è classificato quinto nella classifica finale della competizione tra 165 squadre.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma ANA grupės pateikta sistema, skirta 2019 m. pusiau įvertinimo 3 uždaviniui: EmoContext. Siūlome naują Hierarchinių LSTM kontekstinės emocijos nustatymo (HRLCE) model į. Ji klasifikuoja žodžio emocijas atsižvelgiant į savo kalbos tekstą. Rezultatai rodo, kad šioje užduotyje mūsų HRCLE pasiekė naujausią naujausią teksto klasifikavimo sistemą BERT. Sujungiame BERT ir HRCLE gautus rezultatus, kad būtų pasiektas bendras 0,7709 balas, kuris buvo penktas galutinėje 165 komandų konkurso lyderių taryboje.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз жарым- 2019 тапсырмасының ANA тобының жүйесін түсіндіреді: EmoContext. Біз жаңа Hirarchi- cal LSTMs (HRLCE) көңіл көңіл анықтау үшін моделін ұсынамыз. Ол өзінің айналысу мәтініне келтірілген сөздердің емоцияларын шектеп береді. Нәтижелер осы тапсырмада, HRCLE- мәтін классификациясының ең жаңа күйін жасайды: BERT дегенді көрсетеді. Біз BERT және HRCLE жасалған нәтижелерді жинақтаймыз. Біз 165 топ арасындағы конкурстың соңғы басшыларының 5-ші жолын жеткізу үшін 0,7709 деген жалпы нәтижелерді жинақтаймыз.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува системот поднесен од АНА тимот за SemEval-2019 задача 3: EmoContext. Предложуваме нов хиерархиски- кален ЛСТМ за модел за детекција на контекстни емоции (ХРЛЦЕ). Ја класификува емоцијата на израз со оглед на својот кон- текст за разговори. Резултатите покажуваат дека, во оваа задача, нашата ХРКЛЕ ја надминува најновата текстова класификација рамка: БЕРТ. Ние ги комбинираме резултатите генерирани од БЕРТ и ХРКЛЕ за да постигнеме вкупна оценка од 0,7709, која се рангираше на петтото место на финалниот водечки одбор на натпреварот меѓу 165 тимови.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem yang dihantar oleh Pasukan ANA untuk SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: EmoContext. Kami cadangkan LSTM Hierarchi-cal baru untuk pengesan emosi konteks (HRLCE). Ia mengklasifikasikan emosi bagi ungkapan diberi con- teks perbualannya. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahawa, dalam tugas ini, HRCLE kami melampaui kuasa pengeklasifikasi teks terbaru: BERT. We combine the results generated by BERT and HRCLE to achieve an overall score of 0.7709 which ranked 5th on the final leader board of the competition among 165 Teams.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ വിശദീകരിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3: എമോക്ടെക്സ്റ്റ്. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ഹീറാര്\u200dക്കി- കാള്\u200d എല്\u200dസ്റ്റിഎസ്സിസിനെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. കോണ്\u200dട്ടെക്സ്റ്റല്\u200d എംആര്\u200dഎല്\u200d അതിന്റെ സംസാരിക്കുന്ന കോണ്\u200d ടെക്സ്റ്റ് നല്\u200dകിയ വാക്കുകളുടെ വികാരങ്ങളെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ HRCLE ഏറ്റവും അടുത്ത അവസ്ഥ- ആർട്ട് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫ്രെയിമെന്\u200dറ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു: ബെര്\u200dട്ടും ഹെര്\u200dസിലും ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. ഒരു മൊത്തം സ്കോര്\u200d പ്രാപിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി. അത് 165 ടീം കൂട്ടത്തിലെ അവസാന ന ന', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema ppreżentata mit-Tim ANA għas-SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContext. Aħna qed nipproponu mudell ġdid ta’ LSTMs Hierarchi- cal for Contextual Emotion Detection (HRLCE). Hija tikklassifika l-emozzjoni ta’ dikjarazzjoni fid-dawl tat-test ta’ konverżjoni tagħha. Ir-riżultati juru li, f’dan il-kompitu, l-HRCLE tagħna qed tippreżenta l-aktar qafas reċenti ta’ klassifikazzjoni tat-test avvanzat: BERT. Aħna ngħaqdu r-riżultati ġġenerati mill-BERT u l-HRCLE biex niksbu punteġġ globali ta’ 0.7709 li kien il-ħames fil-bord tal-mexxej finali tal-kompetizzjoni fost 165 Tim.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet som er sendt av ANA-gruppa for semiEval-2019 oppgåva 3: EmoContext. Vi foreslår eit nytt hierarki- kall LSTMs for kontekst- følelsesoppdaging (HRLCE). Den klassifiserer følelsen til eit uttrykk gitt sin konversjonal con- tekst. Resultatet viser at HRCLE vår i denne oppgåva utfører den siste tilstanden til kunstklassifikasjonsframmeverket: BERT. Vi kombinerer resultatene generert av BERT og HRCLE for å oppnå eit generell poeng av 0,7709 som rangerte 5. på den siste lederaren av konkurransen blant 165 grupper.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul transmis de Echipa ANA pentru Sarcina SemEval-2019 3: EmoContent. Propunem un nou model de LSTMs ierarhic pentru detectarea emoţiilor contextuale (HRLCE). Clasifică emoţia unei pronunţări având în vedere contextul său conversaţional. Rezultatele arată că, în această sarcină, HRCLE-ul nostru depășește cel mai recent cadru de clasificare a textelor de ultimă generație: BERT. Combinăm rezultatele generate de BERT și HRCLE pentru a obține un scor total de 0.7709, care s-a clasat pe locul 5 în clasamentul final al competiției în rândul a 165 de echipe.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje system zgłoszony przez zespół ANA do SemEval-2019 Zadania 3: EmoContext. Proponujemy nowy hierarchiczny model LSTMs dla kontekstowego wykrywania emocji (HRLCE). Klasyfikuje emocje wypowiedzi biorąc pod uwagę jego kontekst konwersacyjny. Wyniki pokazują, że w tym zadaniu nasz HRCLE przewyższa najnowocześniejszy system klasyfikacji tekstów: BERT. Łączymy wyniki generowane przez BERT i HRCLE, aby osiągnąć ogólny wynik 0.7709, który zajął piątą klasyfikację finałowej klasyfikacji konkursu wśród 165 Teams.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас ANA баг 2019 оны SemEval-3 даалгаварын системийг тайлбарладаг. Бид шинэ шинэ Hierarchi-cal LSTMs нь Contextual Emotion Detection (HRLCE) загварын төлөвлөгөөнд санал болгож байна. Энэ нь харилцааны контекст өгсөн хэлэлцээний сэтгэл хөдлөлийг тодорхойлж байна. Үүний үр дүнд бидний HRCLE-ын хамгийн сүүлийн үеийн урлагийн текст хуваалтын хэмжээсүүдийг багасгаж чадна. Бид BERT болон HRCLE-ын гарсан үр дүнг 0.7709 хүртэл нийтлэг хэмжээнд нийтлэг хүртэл нийтлэг хүртэл нийтлэг нийтлэг хүртэл нийтлэг нийтлэг нийтлэг нийтлэг нийтлэг дээр 165 багийн сүүлийн удирдагч дээ', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුව ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්නේ ANA කණ්ඩායම් සම්වේල- 2019 වැඩක් 3: EmoContext යෙන්. අපි සංවිධානය හියාර්චි- කාලික LSTMs ගැන සංවිධානයක් හොයාගන්න (HRLCE) මොඩේල් එකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. ඒක තමුන්ගේ වාර්තාවක් පිළිගන්න පුළුවන්ගේ හැඟීම විශේෂය කරනවා. ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ මේ වැඩේ අපේ HRCLE එක අලුත් වැඩිය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය: BERT. අපි BERT සහ HRCLE නිර්මාණය කරපු ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka kooxda ANA ee u soo dhiibay SemEval-2019 shaqo 3: EmoContext. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa muusikada Heerarchi-cal LSTMs ee ku saabsan heshiiska xasaradda (HRLCE). Waxay qeyb ka dhigtaa hissiga hadalka oo la siiyo qoraalka ku hadla. Abaalku wuxuu muujiyaa in, shuqulkaas, HRCLE ayaa soo saara xaaladda ugu dambeeya ee-u-art-text-classification framework: BERT. Waxaan isku daryeelaynaa resultinta BERT iyo HRCLE, si aan u gaadhno koox guud oo 0.7709, taasoo ka sarraysa 5aad hogaamiya ugu dambeeya kooxda u dhexeeya 165 kooxda.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver det system som ANA Team lämnat in för SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContent. Vi föreslår en ny hierarkisk LSTMs för kontextuell känslodetektion (HRLCE) modell. Den klassificerar känslan av ett yttrande med tanke på dess konversationskonvention. Resultaten visar att vår HRCLE i denna uppgift överträffar den senaste toppmoderna textklassificeringsramen: BERT. Vi kombinerar resultaten från BERT och HRCLE för att uppnå en totalpoäng på 0,7709 som rankades 5:e på den slutliga ledartavlan i tävlingen bland 165 lag.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem podignut od strane ANA Tim za posao 3: EmoContext. Predlažemo novu hijeračku LSTMs za kontekstualnu detekciju emocija (HRLCE). Klasifikuje emocije govora, pod obzirom na svoj razgovor. Rezultati pokazuju da, u ovom zadatku, naš HRCLE iznosi najnoviji okvir klasifikacije teksta u stanju umjetnosti: BERT. Kombinujemo rezultate koji su stvorili BERT i HRCLE kako bi postigli ukupni rezultat 0,7709, koji je postao 5. na konačnom odboru lidera konkurencije među 165 tima.', 'ur': 'This paper describes the system submitted by ANA Team for the SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContext. ہم نے ایک نوم Hierarchi- cal LSTMs کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ متوسط احساسات شناسایی (HRLCE) موڈل کے لئے۔ یہ ایک بات کا احساس مخصوص کرتا ہے جو اس کی مخصوص مخصوص ٹیکسٹ دیتی ہے۔ نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے HRCLE نے اگلوں سے اچھی موقعیت-of-the-art-text classification frameworks: BERT. ہم نے BERT اور HRCLE کے ذریعے پیدا ہوئے نتائج کو ترکیب کرلیا ہے کہ 0.7709 کی ایک عمومی امتیاز پہنچ سکیں جو 165 ٹیموں میں پائمین لیڈر بورد پر پائمین رقم رکھا تھا.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் ANA குழு செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 3: EmoContext வழங்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பை விவரிக்கிறது. நாங்கள் சூழல் உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பு (HRLCE) மாதிரிக்க ஒரு புதிய உயர்ச்சி- கல் LSTMs மாதிரிக்கிறது. இது ஒரு வார்த்தையின் உணர்வை வகைப்படுத்துகிறது அதன் பேச்சு con- உரை The results show that, in this task, our HRCLE outperforms the most recent state-of- the-art text classification framework: BERT.  நாம் BERT மற்றும் HRCLE உருவாக்கப்பட்ட முடிவுகளை ஒன்று சேர்க்கிறோம் மொத்த மதிப்பு 0. 7709 அது 165 குழுக்களில் முடிந்த கடைசி தலைவர் பலகையில் 5', 'uz': "Bu hujjat SemEval-2019 Vazifa 3: EmoContext (ANA Team) yaratilgan tizimni anglatadi. Biz Kontrakta Emotionni aniqlash (HRLCE) modeli uchun novel Hierarchi- cal LSTMs dasturini talab qilamiz. Bu so'zning bir xil con- matnning hisobini moslash mumkin. Natijalar shu vazifasida, bizning HRCLE eng yaqin holatni bajaradi- sanam matn classifikasining holatini bajaradi: BERT. We combine the results generated by BERT and HRCLE to achieve an overall score of 0.7709 which ranked 5th on the final leader board of the competition among 165 Teams.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống được gửi bởi đội ANA cho nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 9 3: EmoContact. Chúng tôi đề xuất một kiểu Hierarchi al LSTM để phát hiện cảm xúc liên tiếp (HRLCE). Nó phân loại cảm xúc của một lời nói ra theo cách nói của nó. Kết quả cho thấy, trong nhiệm vụ này, loại giải thoát loại giải mã được giải mã văn bản hiện đại nhất: BERT. Chúng tôi kết hợp kết hợp kết quả của BERT và HRL để đạt được số lượng tổng ghi 0.799 được xếp hạng thứ năm trên hội đồng lãnh đạo cuối cùng trong các đội 165.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва системата, представена от екипа на АНА за задача 3: Емоконтекс. Предлагаме нов Йерархичен модел за откриване на контекстуални емоции. Той класифицира емоцията на дадено изказване предвид разговорния му контекст. Резултатите показват, че при тази задача нашата ХРКЛ надминава най-новата рамка за класификация на текста: БЕРТ. Комбинираме резултатите, генерирани от БЕРТ и ХРКЛЕ, за да постигнем общ резултат от 0.7709, който се класира на 5-то място в последния лидерски борд на състезанието сред 165 отбора.', 'nl': 'Deze paper beschrijft het systeem dat door ANA Team is ingediend voor de SemEval-2019 Taak 3: EmoContext. We stellen een nieuw Hierarchisch LSTMs voor Contextual Emotion Detection (HRLCE) model voor. Het classificeert de emotie van een uiting gezien de conversatie context. De resultaten tonen aan dat onze HRCLE in deze taak het meest recente state-of-the-art tekstclassificatieframework overtreft: BERT. We combineren de resultaten van BERT en HRCLE om een totaalscore te behalen van 0.7709 die 5e werd op de laatste klassement van de competitie onder 165 Teams.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver systemet indsendt af ANA Team til SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: EmoContent. Vi foreslår en ny hierarkisk LSTMs for Contextual Emotion Detection (HRLCE) model. Den klassificerer følelsen af en udtalelse i betragtning af dens samtaletekst. Resultaterne viser, at vores HRCLE i denne opgave overgår den nyeste tekstklassifikationsramme: BERT. Vi kombinerer resultaterne fra BERT og HRCLE for at opnå en samlet score på 0,7709, som rangerede 5. på den endelige leder af konkurrencen blandt 165 hold.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sustav podignut timom ANA za posao 3: EmoContext. Predlažemo novu hijeračku LSTMs za kontekstualnu detekciju emocija (HRLCE). To potvrđuje emocije govora s obzirom na razgovor. Rezultati pokazuju da u ovom zadatku naš HRCLE iznosi najnoviji okvir klasifikacije teksta u stanju umjetnosti: BERT. Kombinaramo rezultate koji su proizvedeni BERT i HRCLE kako bi postigli ukupni rezultat 0,7709, koji je postao 5. na konačnom odboru vođa natjecanja među 165 tima.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt das System, das ANA Team für die SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContext eingereicht hat. Wir schlagen ein neuartiges hierarchisches LSTMs zur kontextuellen Emotionsdetektion (HRLCE) vor. Sie klassifiziert die Emotion einer Äußerung aufgrund ihres Gesprächskontextes. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser HRCLE bei dieser Aufgabe das neueste Textklassifizierungsrahmen übertrifft: BERT. Wir kombinieren die Ergebnisse von BERT und HRCLE, um eine Gesamtwertung von 0.7709 zu erzielen, die in der letzten Bestenliste des Wettbewerbs unter 165 Teams fünft belegt wurde.', 'ko': '본고는ANA팀이SemEval-19퀘스트3:EmoContext에 제출한 시스템을 묘사한다.우리는 상하문 감정 검측(HRLCE)에 사용되는 새로운 층별 LSTMs 모델을 제시했다.그것은 말의 회화 언어 환경에 따라 그의 감정을 분류한다.그 결과 이 작업에서 우리의 HRCLE는 최신의 최신 텍스트 분류 프레임워크인 BERT보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.BERT와 HRCLE이 도출한 결과를 종합해 총 0.7709점으로 165개 구단 경기에서 5위를 차지했다.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem yang dikirim oleh Tim ANA untuk SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: EmoContext. Kami mengusulkan LSTM Hierarchi-cal novel untuk model deteksi emosi kontekstual (HRLCE). Ini mengklasifikasi emosi dari sebuah ucapan diberikan con- text percakapannya. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa, dalam tugas ini, HRCLE kita melampaui batas terbaru rangka klasifikasi teks terbaru: BERT. We combine the results generated by BERT and HRCLE to achieve an overall score of 0.7709 which ranked 5th on the final leader board of the competition among 165 Teams.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم را توسط تیم ANA برای کار ۳: EmoContext توصیف می\u200cکند. ما یک نویس هیرارچی- cal LSTMs برای کشف احساسات متوسط (HRLCE) پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. این احساسات یک سخنرانی را با متن مکالمه\u200cاش مخفی می\u200cکند. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که در این وظیفه، HRCLE ما بیشترین چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها ما نتایج\u200cهای توسط BERT و HRCLE را ترکیب می\u200cکنیم تا یک امتیاز عمومی 0.7709 را به دست آورد که پایین رهبران مسابقه بین ۱۹۵ تیم درجه\u200cای بود.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo uliotolewa na timu ya ANA kwa ajili ya SemEval-2019 Kazi 3: EmoContext. Tunawapendekeza mtindo wa kisasa wa Hierarchi-cal LSTMs kwa ajili ya Kuchunguza Uchunguzi wa Kimataifa (HRLCE). Inaelezea hisia za hotuba iliyotolewa na ujumbe wake wa mazungumzo. The results show that, in this task, our HRCLE outperforms the most recent state-of- the-art text classification framework: BERT.  Tunaunganisha matokeo yaliyotengenezwa na BERT na HRCLE ili kufikia kiwango cha jumla cha 0.7709 ambacho kilikuwa cha tano katika kiongozi wa mwisho wa mashindano kati ya timu 165.', 'tr': "Bu kağıt ANA Team for the SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContext tarafından gönderilen sistemi tasvir edir. Biz Hierarchi- cal LSTMsi Kontekstual Emotion Detection (HRLCE) modeli üçin bir roman teklif ediyoruz. Bu sözleriň duýgyny görkezilişinden con-text duýgyny ylalaýar. Netijenler, bu görelde HRCLE'imiziň iň soňky durumlaryň -sanat metin klasifikasyonuň çerçevesini çykarýandygyny görkezýär: BERT. BERT we HRCLE tarapyndan döredilen netijeleri 0.7709 sany toparlamak üçin 5-nji derejä bölegimizi 165 topar aralygynda çykýarys.", 'sq': 'This paper describes the system submitted by ANA Team for the SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContext.  Ne propozojmë një model të ri Hierarchi- cal LSTMs për zbulimin e emocioneve kontekstuale (HRLCE). Klasifikon emocionin e një shprehjeje duke dhënë tekstin e saj të bisedës. The results show that, in this task, our HRCLE outperforms the most recent state-of- the-art text classification framework: BERT.  Ne kombinojmë rezultatet e gjeneruara nga BERT dhe HRCLE për të arritur një rezultat të përgjithshëm prej 0.7709 i cili u rendit i pesti në bordin përfundimtar të udhëheqësit të konkurrencës midis 165 ekipave.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die stelsel wat deur ANA-Skep ingestuur is vir die semiEval- 2019 taak 3: EmoContext. Ons voorstel 'n roman Hierarchi- cal LSTMs vir Konteksual Emotion Deteksie (HRLCE) model. Dit klassifiseer die emosie van 'n uitspraak wat sy gesprekslyklike con- text gegee het. Die resultate vertoon dat, in hierdie taak, ons HRCLE uitvoer die mees nuutste status-of-die-kunste teks klassifikasie raamwerk: BERT. Ons kombinieer die resultate wat deur BERT en HRCLE genereer is om 'n heeltemal telling van 0,7709 te bereik wat 5de rang op die eindelike leierbord van die sameswerking tussen 165 Team.", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የANA ቡድን ለSemEval-2019 ስራ 3: EmoContext የተገኘውን ስርዓት ይናገራል፡፡ የሄራርክሲ-የቋንቋ ልSTMs ለContextual Emotion Detection (HRLCE) ሞዴል እናሳልጋለን፡፡ የንግግር እውቀት የሚናገረውን አካባቢ ጽሑፍ ያስተካክላል፡፡ ፍጥረቶቹ በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ HRCLE የአሁኑን የጽሑፍ ትክክለኛ ሥርዓት ማድረግ ነው::BERT በBERT እና HRCLE የደረገውን ውጤቶች በ165 የጭፍሮች መጨረሻ መሪ ቦርድ ላይ የ0.7709 ውጤት ለማግኘት እናሳስባለን፡፡', 'hy': "This paper describes the system submitted by ANA Team for the SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContext.  Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր Հիերարխիկական ԼՍԹՄ-ներ, որպեսզի համընդհանուր զգացմունքների հայտնաբերման (HRLCE) մոդելը: Այն դասակարգում է արտահայտության զգացմունքները, հաշվի առնելով իր խոսակցական կոնտեքստը: Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ այս խնդրի ընթացքում մեր ՀՌՔԼ-ը գերազանցում է ամենահետաքրքիր տեքստի դասակարգման շրջանակը' ԲԵՌԹ: Մենք համադրում ենք BER-ի և HNCLE-ի ստեղծված արդյունքները, որպեսզի հասնենք 0.779 միավոր գնահատականը, որը գտնվում է 5րդ դասարանում 165 թիմերի մրցակցության վերջնական առաջնորդների խորհրդի մեջ:", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৩: এমোকন্টেক্স। We propose a novel Hierarchi- cal LSTMs for Contextual Emotion Detection (HRLCE) model.  এটি একটি বক্তব্যের অনুভূতিকে বিশ্লেষণ করে তার কথোপকথন কন-টেক্সট দিয়েছে। ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে, এই কাজে আমাদের এইচআরসিলের সাম্প্রতিক অবস্থার সবচেয়ে সাম্প্রতিক-শিল্প-শিল্পের টেক্সফ্রেম: বেরেট। ১৬৫ দলের মধ্যে প্রতিযোগিতার শেষ নেতৃত্ব বোর্ডের মধ্যে প্রতিযোগিতায় আমরা বের্ট এবং এইচআরসিলের তৈরি ফলাফলের সাথে একত্রিত করি।', 'az': 'Bu kağıt ANA Takımı təyin etdiyi sistemi semiEval-2019 Gözmü 3: EmoContext üçün təyin edir. Biz yeni bir hiyarchi-cal LSTMs təklif edirik ki, müxtəlif Emotion Detection (HRLCE) modeli üçün. Bu, söhbətlərini dəyişdirmiş bir kəlamın hissini sıralar edir. Sonuçlar göstərir ki, bu işdə, HRCLE-imiz son-günlük məktub klasifikasiyası çerçevesini aşırı çıxarır: BERT. Biz BERT və HRCLE tarafından ürəkləndirilən sonuçları birləşdiririk ki, böyük 0,7709 dərəcəsinin 5. dərəcəsini 165 dərəcənin son liderlərinin hökmünü yerinə yetirmək üçün.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el sistema presentat per l'equip ANA per la tasca 3: EmoContext. Proposem un nou model Hierarchic-cal LSTMs per a la detecció d'emocions contextuals (HRLCE). Classifica l'emoció d'una expressió dada el seu con text conversacional. Els resultats demostren que, en aquesta tasca, la nostra HRCLE supera el marc de classificació de text més recent: BERT. Combinem els resultats generats per BERT i HRCLE per aconseguir una puntuació global de 0,7709 que va ser la 5ª a la junta líder final de la competició entre 165 equips.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem podignut tim ANA za posao 3: EmoContext. Predlažemo novu hijeračku LSTMs za kontekstualnu detekciju emocija (HRLCE). To povezuje emocije govora s obzirom na razgovor. Rezultati pokazuju da, u ovom zadatku, naš HRCLE iznosi najnoviji okvir klasifikacije teksta u stanju umjetnosti: BERT. Kombinaramo rezultate koji su stvorili BERT i HRCLE kako bi postigli ukupni rezultat 0,7709, koji je postao 5. na konačnom odboru lidera konkurencije među 165 tima.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje systém předložený ANA týmem pro SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContext. Navrhujeme nový hierarchický LSTMs pro kontextovou detekci emocí (HRLCE) model. Klasifikuje emoce projevu vzhledem k jeho konverzačnímu kontextu. Výsledky ukazují, že v tomto úkolu naše HRCLE překonává nejnovější klasifikační rámec textu: BERT. Kombinujeme výsledky BERT a HRCLE, abychom dosáhli celkového skóre 0.7709, které se umístilo na pátém místě ve finálovém žebříčku soutěže mezi 165 týmy.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse ANA meeskonna poolt SemEval-2019 ülesande 3 jaoks esitatud süsteemi: EmoContext. Pakume välja uudse Hierarhilise LSTMi kontekstuaalse emotsiooni tuvastamise mudeli (HRLCE). See klassifitseerib sõnavõtu emotsiooni, arvestades selle vestluskonteksti. Tulemused näitavad, et selles ülesandes ületab meie HRCLE uusimat kaasaegset teksti klassifitseerimisraamistikku: BERT. Ühendame BERTi ja HRCLE poolt saadud tulemused, et saavutada üldine skoor 0,7709, mis oli 165 meeskonna seas viies.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan ANA Teamin toimittamaa järjestelmää SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContext. Ehdotamme uutta Hierarkisia LSTMs-malleja kontekstuaalisten tunteiden havaitsemiseksi (HRLCE). Se luokittelee ilmaisun tunteen keskustelevan kontekstin perusteella. Tulokset osoittavat, että HRCLE on tässä tehtävässä nopeampi kuin uusin tekstiluokitusjärjestelmä: BERT. Yhdistämme BERT:n ja HRCLE:n tuottamat tulokset saavuttaaksemme kokonaispisteen 0,7709, joka sijoittui viidenneksi kilpailun viimeisessä johtoryhmässä 165 joukkueen joukossa.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki oleh pancen sistem sing isiné tarjamahan ANA Group kanggo semebal-2011 task 3: emuo context. Awak dhéwé nggunakake basa Normali, akeh- cal LTT- Ketoan kanggo model contextual emuation detection (HRLKE). politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Rejalakno ngomong, ning task iki, HRKEL nambah iso nggawe barang kelas-karo iso nggawe barang seneng pisan seneng pisan: BERT. Awak dhéwé pisan winih sing gagalé BERT karo HRKE nggawe barang berarti 0.7', 'he': 'הנייר הזה מתאר את המערכת שנשלחה על ידי צוות ANA עבור המשימה SemEval-2019 3: EmoContext. אנו מציעים LSTMs הייררכי-קלי חדש עבור מודל גילוי רגשות קונטקסטיים (HRLCE). הוא מסווג את הרגשות של ביטוי בהתחשב בטקסט השיחה שלו. התוצאות מראות שבמשימה הזאת, HRCLE שלנו מפעיל את המסגרת הטקסט המאוחרת ביותר: BERT. אנחנו משלבים את התוצאות שנוצרו על ידי BERT והHRCLE כדי להשיג נקודה כללית של 0.7709 שהורג ב-5 במנהיג הסופי של התחרות בין 165 צוותים.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana na tsarin da aka aika da Team na ANA wa Tafiyar da SemEV-2019 3: EmoContent. Tuna goyyar da wani motsi na Hierrrchi-cal LStM wa Cikakken Tafiyar da Haƙĩƙa na'ura (HRLCE). Yana ƙayyade hison maganar da aka ba da matsayin da ake yi matafiya da shi. Mataimakin na nuna cewa, a cikin wannan aikin, HRCLE na fara mafi ƙaranci halin-the-art-the-art classified frame: BERT. Munã haɗa matsalar da BERT da HRCLE ta samu'ar 0.7709 wanda ya ranka 5 kan ƙarshen birnin ya yi competitin a cikin jamii 165.", 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan sistem, ki ga je ekipa ANA predložila za nalogo 3 SemEval-2019: EmoContext. Predlagamo nov model hierarhičnih LSTMs za zaznavanje kontekstualnih čustev (HRLCE). Razvršča čustvo izgovora glede na njegov pogovorni kontekst. Rezultati kažejo, da v tej nalogi naš HRCLE presega najnovejši najsodobnejši okvir za klasifikacijo besedil: BERT. Rezultate BERT in HRCLE združujemo, da dosežemo skupni rezultat 0,7709, ki se je uvrstil na 5. mesto na končnem vodilnem odboru tekmovanja med 165 ekipami.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ ANA ཚོ་ཁག་ལ་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་སྐྱོང་ལྡན་2019 ལ་དུས་ལྡན་གསུམ་པ་: EmoContext་དང་། We propose a novel Hierarchi- cal LSTMs for Contextual Emotion Detection (HRLCE) model. འདི་སྒྲུང་གཏམ་་གླེང་རིམ་གྱི་སྣང་ཚུལ་དབྱེ་བ་བཟོས་ཡོད། གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་དེ་ལྟའི་ལས་འགུལ་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་HRCLE་གིས་གསར་དུ་འཕགས་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་མང་ཤོས་ཡོད་པ་ཅིག་གནད་སྡུད་ཡིག་གི་ We combine the results generated by BERT and HRCLE to achieve an overall score of 0.7709 which ranked 5th on the final leader of the competition among 165 Teams.'}
{'en': 'SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter', 'ar': 'مهمة SemEval-2019 5: الكشف بلغات متعددة عن خطاب الكراهية ضد المهاجرين والنساء في تويتر', 'es': 'Tarea 5 de SemEval-2019: Detección multilingüe del discurso de odio contra inmigrantes y mujeres en Twitter', 'pt': 'Tarefa 5 do SemEval-2019: Detecção multilíngue de discurso de ódio contra imigrantes e mulheres no Twitter', 'fr': 'SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 5\xa0: Détection multilingue des discours de haine contre les immigrés et les femmes sur Twitter', 'ja': 'SEMEval -2019タスク5 ： Twitterにおける移民と女性に対するヘイトスピーチの多言語検出', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019务5:多言检Twitter移民妇人之怨言', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 5: चहचहाना में आप्रवासियों और महिलाओं के खिलाफ नफरत भाषण का बहुभाषी पता लगाना', 'ru': 'SemEval-2019 Задача 5: Многоязычное выявление ненавистнических высказываний против иммигрантов и женщин в Twitter', 'ga': 'SemEval-2019 Tasc 5: Brath Ilteangach um Fhuathchaint i gCoinne Inimircigh agus Mná ar Twitter', 'ka': 'SemEval-2019 დავალება 5: მრავალური განვიცნობა მხარდაჭერების სიტყვას იმიგრანტებზე და ქალებზე Twitter-ში', 'it': "SemEval-2019 Task 5: Rilevazione multilingue del discorso d'odio contro immigrati e donne su Twitter", 'el': 'Εργασία 5: Πολυγλωσσική ανίχνευση ρητορικής μίσους κατά μεταναστών και γυναικών στο Twitter', 'hu': 'SemEval-2019 5. feladat: A bevándorlók és nők elleni gyűlöletbeszéd többnyelvű felismerése Twitteren', 'ms': 'SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Pengesanan Bicara Berbahasa terhadap Imigrant dan Wanita dalam Twitter', 'mk': 'Првата задача на SemEval-2019: Мултијазично откривање на говорот на омраза против имигрантите и жените на Твитер', 'kk': 'Жарты- 2019 Тапсырма 5: Твиттердегі иммигранттер мен әйелдердің қарсы жек сөйлесінің көптілігін анықтау', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 5: വെറുപ്പുകാര്\u200dക്കും സ്ത്രീകള്\u200dക്കും വിരോധമായി വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരിക്കുന്ന പല ഭാഷകള്\u200d ഡി', 'mt': 'SemEval-2019 Kompitu 5: Sejbien Multilingwi ta’ diskors ta’ mibegħda kontra l-immigranti u n-nisa fuq Twitter', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter', 'lt': '5 užduotis: Nekenčiųjų kalbų prieš imigrantus ir moteris daugiakalbis nustatymas Twitter', 'ro': 'SemEval-2019 Sarcina 5: Detectarea multilingvă a discursului de ură împotriva imigranților și femeilor în Twitter', 'sr': 'Zadnji zadatak 5: Multijezički otkrivanje govora o mržnji protiv imigranta i žena na Twitteru', 'no': 'SemEval-2019 Oppgåve 5: Multispråk oppdaging av hatspråk mot imigrantar og kvinner i Twitter', 'pl': 'SemEval-2019 Zadanie 5: Wielojęzyczne wykrywanie mowy nienawiści wobec imigrantów i kobiet na Twitterze', 'sv': 'SemEval-2019 Uppgift 5: Flerspråkig upptäckt av hattal mot invandrare och kvinnor i Twitter', 'si': 'Halfeval-2019 වැඩක් 5: ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி', 'ur': 'نیم Eval-2019 ٹاکس ۵: ٹویٹر میں مہاجرین اور عورتوں کے مقابلے میں عداوت کی سخنرانی بہت سی زبان کی تلاش', 'so': 'Shaqooyinka SemEval-2019 5: Shaqeynta luqadaha badan ee hat hadal Against dadka dalka u soo guuray iyo dumarka Twitterka', 'uz': "SemEval- 2019 Vazifa 5: Twitterda Muhammadlar va ayollar Agar Hat Speech (Hat Speech) haqida ko'plab topish", 'vi': 'Nhiệm vụ Semkhai thác-thẩm tê 5: phát hiện ngôn ngữ rộng về tiếng nói ghét bỏ người nhập cư và phụ nữ trên Twitter', 'bg': 'Задача 5: Многоезично откриване на речта на омразата срещу имигранти и жени в Туитър', 'da': 'SemEval-2019 Opgave 5: Flersproget afsløring af hadtale mod indvandrere og kvinder på Twitter', 'hr': 'Zadnji zadatak 5: multijezički otkrivanje govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena na Twitter-u', 'nl': 'SemEval-2019 Taak 5: Meertalige detectie van haatspraak tegen immigranten en vrouwen in Twitter', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019퀘스트 5: 트위터에서 이민과 여성에 대한 증오 발언 다국어 검출', 'de': 'SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 5: Mehrsprachige Erkennung von Hassreden gegen Einwanderer und Frauen in Twitter', 'fa': 'ماموریت ۵: شناسایی از سخنرانی دشمنی علیه مهاجران و زنان توئیتر', 'id': 'SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Deteksi Multilingual of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women on Twitter', 'tr': 'SemEval-2019 Görev 5', 'af': 'SemEval-2019 Opdrag 5: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter', 'am': 'ስምEval-2019 ስራ 5: ከትዊተር የተሰደዱት እና ሴቶችን ላይ ጥል ንግግር ላይ የብዙ ቋንቋ ማውጣት', 'hy': 'ՍեմԷվալ 2019-ի 5-րդ հանձնարարությունը. Թվիթերում ազդանշանների և կանանց դեմ ատելության բազմալեզու հայտնաբերումը', 'sw': 'SemEval-2019 Kazi 5: Utafiti wa lugha nyingi wa Hotuba ya Hati dhidi ya Wahamiaji na Wanawake kwenye mtandao wa Twita', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Görev 5: İncillər və qadınlar ilə qarşı nifrət sözlərinin çoxlu dil keşfeti', 'sq': 'SemEval-2019 Detyra 5: Zbulimi shumëgjuhësor i fjalimit të urrejtjes kundër imigrantëve dhe grave në Twitter', 'bs': 'SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Detection of hate speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter', 'ca': 'SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women on Twitter', 'cs': 'SemEval-2019 Úkol 5: Vícejazyčná detekce nenávistné řeči proti přistěhovalcům a ženám na Twitteru', 'fi': 'SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 5: Maahanmuuttajien ja naisten vihapuheen monikielinen havaitseminen Twitterissä', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৫: টুইটারে অভিবাসী এবং নারীদের বিরুদ্ধে ঘৃণা ভাষার বিরুদ্ধে বহুভাষায় গ্রহণ করা হয়েছে।', 'et': 'SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 5: Sisserändajate ja naiste vihakõne mitmekeelne avastamine Twitteris', 'jv': 'semiinval-2011 task 5: Rasane ingkang plural', 'sk': 'SemEval-2019 Naloga 5: Večjezično odkrivanje sovražnega govora proti priseljencem in ženskam v Twitterju', 'he': 'SemEval-2019 משימה 5: גילוי רבות שפות של נאום שנאה נגד המגירים ונשים בטוויטר', 'ha': 'SemEal-2019 Task 5: Multural Finding of Hate Spelling against Imrants and mãtã in Twitter', 'bo': 'SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter'}
{'en': 'The paper describes the organization of the SemEval 2019 Task 5 about the detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Spanish and English messages extracted from Twitter. The task is organized in two related classification subtasks : a main binary subtask for detecting the presence of hate speech, and a finer-grained one devoted to identifying further features in hateful contents such as the aggressive attitude and the target harassed, to distinguish if the incitement is against an individual rather than a group. HatEval has been one of the most popular tasks in SemEval-2019 with a total of 108 submitted runs for Subtask A and 70 runs for Subtask B, from a total of 74 different teams. Data provided for the task are described by showing how they have been collected and annotated. Moreover, the paper provides an analysis and discussion about the participant systems and the results they achieved in both subtasks.', 'ar': 'تصف الورقة تنظيم SemEval 2019 Task 5 حول الكشف عن خطاب الكراهية ضد المهاجرين والنساء في الرسائل الإسبانية والإنجليزية المستخرجة من Twitter. تم تنظيم المهمة في مهمتين فرعيتين مرتبطتين بالتصنيف: مهمة فرعية ثنائية رئيسية للكشف عن وجود خطاب كراهية ، ومهمة أدق مكرسة لتحديد المزيد من الميزات في المحتويات البغيضة مثل الموقف العدواني والهدف الذي تمت مضايقته ، لتمييز ما إذا كان التحريض ضد فرد وليس ضد جماعة. كانت HatEval واحدة من أكثر المهام شيوعًا في SemEval-2019 بإجمالي 108 تشغيلات مقدمة لـ Subtask A و 70 مرة لـ Subtask B ، من إجمالي 74 فريقًا مختلفًا. يتم وصف البيانات المقدمة للمهمة من خلال إظهار كيفية جمعها والتعليق عليها. علاوة على ذلك ، تقدم الورقة تحليلًا ومناقشة حول أنظمة المشاركين والنتائج التي حققتها في كلتا المهمتين الفرعيتين.', 'es': 'El artículo describe la organización de la Tarea 5 de SemEval 2019 sobre la detección del discurso de odio contra inmigrantes y mujeres en los mensajes en español e inglés extraídos de Twitter. La tarea se organiza en dos subtareas de clasificación relacionadas: una subtarea binaria principal para detectar la presencia de discurso de odio, y una más detallada dedicada a identificar otras características en los contenidos de odio, como la actitud agresiva y el objetivo acosado, para distinguir si la incitación está en contra de un individual en lugar de grupal. HaTeval ha sido una de las tareas más populares en SemeVal-2019 con un total de 108 ejecuciones enviadas para la subtarea A y 70 ejecuciones para la subtarea B, de un total de 74 equipos diferentes. Los datos proporcionados para la tarea se describen mostrando cómo se han recopilado y anotado. Además, el documento proporciona un análisis y una discusión sobre los sistemas de participantes y los resultados que lograron en ambas subtareas.', 'fr': "L'article décrit l'organisation de la tâche 5 du SemEval 2019 sur la détection des discours de haine contre les immigrés et les femmes dans les messages en espagnol et en anglais extraits de Twitter. La tâche est organisée en deux sous-tâches de classification connexes\xa0: une sous-tâche binaire principale pour détecter la présence de discours haineux, et une sous-tâche plus fine consacrée à l'identification d'autres caractéristiques dans les contenus haineux tels que l'attitude agressive et la cible harcelée, afin de déterminer si l'incitation est contre un individuel plutôt qu'en groupe. HatEval a été l'une des tâches les plus populaires de SemeVal-2019 avec un total de 108 essais soumis pour la sous-tâche A et 70 essais pour la sous-tâche B, sur un total de 74 équipes différentes. Les données fournies pour la tâche sont décrites en montrant comment elles ont été collectées et annotées. De plus, le document fournit une analyse et une discussion sur les systèmes participants et les résultats qu'ils ont obtenus dans les deux sous-tâches.", 'pt': 'O artigo descreve a organização da Tarefa 5 do SemEval 2019 sobre a detecção de discurso de ódio contra imigrantes e mulheres em mensagens em espanhol e inglês extraídas do Twitter. A tarefa está organizada em duas subtarefas de classificação relacionadas: uma subtarefa binária principal para detectar a presença de discurso de ódio e uma subtarefa mais refinada dedicada a identificar outras características em conteúdos de ódio, como a atitude agressiva e o alvo assediado, para distinguir se o a incitação é contra um indivíduo e não contra um grupo. HatEval tem sido uma das tarefas mais populares no SemEval-2019, com um total de 108 execuções enviadas para a Subtarefa A e 70 execuções para a Subtarefa B, de um total de 74 equipes diferentes. Os dados fornecidos para a tarefa são descritos mostrando como eles foram coletados e anotados. Além disso, o artigo fornece uma análise e discussão sobre os sistemas participantes e os resultados que eles alcançaram em ambas as subtarefas.', 'ja': 'この論文では、Twitterから抽出されたスペイン語と英語のメッセージにおける移民と女性に対するヘイトスピーチの検出に関するSemEval 2019タスク5の組織について説明しています。このタスクは、ヘイトスピーチの存在を検出するための主要なバイナリサブタスクと、攻撃的な態度や嫌がらせを受けたターゲットなどのヘイトコンテンツのさらなる特徴を特定するための細かいサブタスクの2つの関連する分類サブタスクで構成されており、煽りがグループではなく個人に対するものであるかどうかを区別します。HatEvalは、SemEval -2019で最も人気のあるタスクの1つであり、合計74の異なるチームからサブタスクAのための合計108の実行とサブタスクBのための70の実行が提出されました。タスクのために提供されたデータは、それらがどのように収集され、注釈付けされたかを示すことによって説明されます。さらに、この論文では、参加者システムとその両方のサブタスクで達成された結果についての分析と議論を提供します。', 'zh': '论叙SemEval 2019务5,5及Twitter之西班牙语英语消息移民妇人之仇言。 分为二事:一曰二元子务,以检仇言,以及细粒度子,专以知仇,以别群。 HatEval 常为 SemEval-2019 中最受欢迎之一,凡 74 异者团队上 108 次子职 A 行与 70 次子 B 行。 供职之数,因见采注。 此外,参与者系统及两子事,剖析讨论。', 'hi': 'पेपर ट्विटर से निकाले गए स्पेनिश और अंग्रेजी संदेशों में आप्रवासियों और महिलाओं के खिलाफ नफरत भरे भाषण का पता लगाने के बारे में SemEval 2019 टास्क 5 के संगठन का वर्णन करता है। कार्य को दो संबंधित वर्गीकरण उप-कार्यों में आयोजित किया जाता है: घृणा भाषण की उपस्थिति का पता लगाने के लिए एक मुख्य बाइनरी सबटास्क, और एक महीन-दाने वाला एक जो घृणित सामग्री में आगे की विशेषताओं की पहचान करने के लिए समर्पित है जैसे कि आक्रामक रवैया और लक्षित परेशान किया गया, यह भेद करने के लिए कि क्या उत्तेजना एक समूह के बजाय किसी व्यक्ति के खिलाफ है। HatEval SemEval-2019 में सबसे लोकप्रिय कार्यों में से एक रहा है, जिसमें कुल 74 अलग-अलग टीमों से, Subtask A के लिए कुल 108 प्रस्तुत रन और Subtask B के लिए 70 रन प्रस्तुत किए गए हैं। कार्य के लिए प्रदान किए गए डेटा को यह दिखाकर वर्णित किया जाता है कि उन्हें कैसे एकत्र और एनोटेट किया गया है। इसके अलावा, पेपर प्रतिभागी प्रणालियों और दोनों उप-कार्यों में प्राप्त परिणामों के बारे में एक विश्लेषण और चर्चा प्रदान करता है।', 'ru': 'В статье описывается организация задачи 5 SemEval 2019 по выявлению ненавистнических высказываний против иммигрантов и женщин в испанских и английских сообщениях, извлеченных из Twitter. Задача разбита на две связанные между собой подзадачи классификации: основная двоичная подзадача для обнаружения наличия ненавистнических высказываний и более тонкая подзадача, посвященная выявлению дополнительных признаков в ненавистническом контенте, таких как агрессивное отношение и преследуемая цель, чтобы отличить, если подстрекательство направлено против отдельного лица, а не против группы. HatEval была одной из самых популярных задач в SemEval-2019 с в общей сложности 108 представленных прогонов для Подзадачи A и 70 прогонов для Подзадачи B, в общей сложности 74 различных команд. Данные, предоставленные для задачи, описываются путем демонстрации того, как они были собраны и аннотированы. Кроме того, в документе содержится анализ и обсуждение систем участников и результатов, достигнутых ими в рамках обеих подзадач.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar cur síos ar eagrú Thasc SemEval 2019 5 maidir le fuathchaint in aghaidh inimirceach agus ban a bhrath i dteachtaireachtaí Spáinnise agus Béarla a bhaintear as Twitter. Eagraítear an tasc i dhá fhothasc aicmithe gaolmhara: príomhfhothasc dhénártha chun láithreacht fuathchaint a bhrath, agus ceann níos míne atá dírithe ar ghnéithe breise a aithint in ábhair ghránna ar nós an dearcadh ionsaitheach agus an sprioc a bhfuil ciapadh air, chun idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir an is in aghaidh duine aonair seachas grúpa a dhéantar an ghríosú. Bhí HatEval ar cheann de na tascanna is mó tóir i SemEval-2019 le 108 ritheann curtha isteach le haghaidh Fothasc A agus 70 rith le haghaidh Fothasc B, as 74 fhoireann dhifriúla san iomlán. Déantar cur síos ar na sonraí a chuirtear ar fáil don tasc trí thaispeáint conas a bailíodh agus a bhfuil nótaí curtha leo. Ina theannta sin, cuireann an páipéar anailís agus plé ar fáil faoi na córais rannpháirtithe agus na torthaí a bhain siad amach sa dá fhothasc.', 'ka': 'ბოლოდან 2019 წლის SemEval-ის პროგრამის ორგანიზაციას აღწერა 5-ზე, რომელიც მპატი სიტყვების განაკვირდება იმიგრანტების და ქალთან სპანელი და ანგლისური შეტყობინებების დავალება ორი დაკავშირებული კლასიფიკაციის საშუალებაში ორივე დაკავშირებულია: საშუალებო სიტყვების საშუალებაზე, და საშუალებო საშუალებო საშუალებაში, როგორც ადგრესიური გექნება და საშუალებული მიზეზი, განსხვავება თუ სიტყვები ინდიველზე არა ჯ HatEval იყო SemEval-2019 წლის უფრო პოლიპური დავალების ერთ-ერთი, რომელიც 108 წლის გადატანა Subtask A და 70 წლის გადატანა Subtask B წლის საერთოდ 74 განსხვავებული ჯგუფი. მონაცემები, რომლებიც დაიყენებული დავალებისთვის, აღწერა, როგორ შეიყენებულია და მონიტორებულია. დამატებით, დაახლოებით ანალიზაცია და დისუზაცია განსაზღვრებელი სისტემებზე და შედეგი, რომლებიც ისინი მოქმედება ორივე საკუთხებში.', 'el': 'Η εργασία περιγράφει την οργάνωση της εργασίας για την ανίχνευση ρητορικής μίσους κατά μεταναστών και γυναικών σε ισπανικά και αγγλικά μηνύματα που εξάγονται από το Twitter. Το έργο οργανώνεται σε δύο συναφείς δευτερεύουσες εργασίες ταξινόμησης: μια κύρια δυαδική δευτερεύουσα εργασία για την ανίχνευση της παρουσίας ρητορικής μίσους, και μια λεπτόκοκκη δευτερεύουσα εργασία αφιερωμένη στον εντοπισμό περαιτέρω χαρακτηριστικών σε μισητά περιεχόμενα όπως η επιθετική στάση και ο στόχος που παρενοχλείται, για να διακρίνει αν η υποκίνηση είναι εναντίον ενός ατόμου και όχι μιας ομάδας. Η HatEval ήταν μια από τις πιο δημοφιλείς εργασίες στο SemEval-2019 με συνολικά 108 υποβληθείσες εκτελέσεις για Υποεργασία Α και 70 εκτελέσεις για Υποεργασία Β, από συνολικά 74 διαφορετικές ομάδες. Τα δεδομένα που παρέχονται για την εργασία περιγράφονται δείχνοντας τον τρόπο συλλογής και σχολιασμού τους. Επιπλέον, η εργασία παρέχει ανάλυση και συζήτηση για τα συστήματα συμμετεχόντων και τα αποτελέσματα που πέτυχαν και στις δύο δευτερεύουσες εργασίες.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2019 Task 5 szervezését a bevándorlók és nők elleni gyűlöletbeszéd felismeréséről spanyol és angol üzenetekben a Twitterről kivont üzenetekben. A feladat két kapcsolódó osztályozási alcsoportba rendeződik: egy fő bináris alcsoport a gyűlöletbeszéd jelenlétének felismerésére, és egy finomabb szemcséjű alcsoport, amely a gyűlöletes tartalmak további jellemzőinek azonosítására szolgál, mint például az agresszív attitűd és a zaklatott célpont, annak megkülönböztetésére, hogy az ösztönzés inkább egy egyén ellen van-e, mint egy csoport ellen. A HatEval volt az egyik legnépszerűbb feladat a SemEval-2019-ben, összesen 108 bejelentett futással az A alfeladatra és 70 futással a B alfeladatra, összesen 74 különböző csapatból. A feladathoz megadott adatokat úgy írják le, hogy bemutatják, hogyan gyűjtötték és jegyzetelték őket. Ezenkívül a tanulmány elemzést és beszélgetést nyújt a résztvevői rendszerekről és azokról az eredményekről, amelyeket mindkét alcsoportban elértek.', 'lt': 'Dokumente aprašoma 2019 m. SemEval 5 užduotis dėl neapykantos kalbos prieš imigrantus ir moteris aptikimo ispanų ir anglų kalbomis, gautomis iš Twitter. Ši užduotis organizuojama dviem susijusiais klasifikavimo subtask a is: pagrindiniu dviejų subtasku, skirtais neapykantos kalbos aptikimui, ir geriau apibūdinta, skirta nustatyti papildomus neapykantos turinio požymius, pavyzdžiui, agresyvų požiūrį ir priekabiavamą tikslą, siekiant nustatyti, ar paskatinimas yra prieš asmenį, o ne grupę. HatEval has been one of the most popular tasks in SemEval-2019 with a total of 108 submitted runs for Subtask A and 70 runs for Subtask B, from a total of 74 different teams.  Duomenys apie užduotį aprašomi nurodant, kaip jie buvo surinkti ir užrašyti. Be to, dokumente pateikiama analizė ir diskusija apie dalyvių sistemas ir jų rezultatus abiejuose paklausimuose.', 'it': "L'articolo descrive l'organizzazione del Task 5 SemEval 2019 sulla rilevazione dei discorsi di odio contro immigrati e donne nei messaggi spagnoli e inglesi estratti da Twitter. Il compito è organizzato in due sottoattività di classificazione correlate: una principale sottomissione binaria per rilevare la presenza di discorsi d'odio, e una più fine dedicata all'identificazione di ulteriori caratteristiche nei contenuti odiosi come l'atteggiamento aggressivo e il bersaglio molestato, per distinguere se l'incitamento è contro un individuo piuttosto che un gruppo. HatEval è stato uno dei compiti più popolari in SemEval-2019 con un totale di 108 run presentate per il Sottocompito A e 70 run per il Sottocompito B, da un totale di 74 team diversi. I dati forniti per l'attività sono descritti mostrando come sono stati raccolti e annotati. Inoltre, l'articolo fornisce un'analisi e una discussione sui sistemi partecipanti e sui risultati ottenuti in entrambe le sottoattività.", 'mk': 'Во весникот се опишува организацијата на SemEval 2019 задачата 5 за откривање на говорот на омраза против имигрантите и жените на шпански и англиски пораки извадени од Твитер. Оваа задача е организирана во две поврзани класификациски подпрашања: главна бинарна подпрашање за откривање на присуството на говорот на омраза, и подобро насочена задача посветена на идентификација на понатамошни карактеристики во омразна содржина како што е агресивниот став и метата навредена, за да се разликува дали инцијативата е против инди HatEval беше една од најпопуларните задачи во SemEval-2019 со вкупно 108 испратени трки за Subtask A и 70 трки за Subtask B, од вкупно 74 различни тимови. Податоците обезбедени за задачата се опишуваат покажувајќи како се собрани и анотирани. Покрај тоа, весникот обезбедува анализа и дискусија за системите на учесниците и резултатите што ги постигнаа во двете потпрашања.', 'kk': 'Қағаз 2019 жыл бөлігінің 5- ші тапсырмасының біріншісін Испандық және ағылшын хабарламаларынан шығарылған иммигранттердің және әйелдердің қарсылығын таңдау туралы таңдайды. Тапсырма екі сәйкес келтірілген классификациялау суретінде орнатылады: қарсылық сөздерді анықтау үшін негізгі бинарлық сурет, және топтың орнына қарсылық қарсылығын таңдау үшін қарсылық мазмұның жалғастыру мүмкіндіктерін таңдау үшін, жалғастыру үшін,  HatEval SemEval-2019 жылы ең жалпы тапсырмалардың бірі болды, бұл тапсырма A және 70 Subtask B және 74 түрлі топтардан тапсырмалар үшін 108 жұмыс істеді. Тапсырманың келтірілген деректері қалай жинақталғанын көрсетумен анықталады. Қазір қағаз қатысушылардың жүйелері туралы анализ және дискуссия береді және олардың екі жағында жеткізген нәтижелері.', 'ms': 'The paper describes the organization of the SemEval 2019 Task 5 about the detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Spanish and English messages extracted from Twitter.  The task is organized in two related classification subtasks: a main binary subtask for detecting the presence of hate speech, and a finer-grained one devoted to identifying further features in hateful contents such as the aggressive attitude and the target harassed, to distinguish if the incitement is against an individual rather than a group.  HatEval adalah salah satu tugas paling populer di SemEval-2019 dengan total 108 jalanan dihantar untuk Subtask A dan 70 jalanan untuk Subtask B, dari total 74 pasukan yang berbeza. Data yang disediakan untuk tugas diterangkan dengan menunjukkan bagaimana ia telah dikumpulkan dan dicatat. Selain itu, kertas menyediakan analisis dan diskusi tentang sistem peserta dan keputusan yang mereka mencapai dalam kedua-dua sub-tanya.', 'mt': 'Id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-organizzazzjoni tas-SemEval 2019 Task 5 dwar id-detezzjoni ta’ diskors ta’ mibegħda kontra l-immigranti u n-nisa f’messaġġi Spanjoli u Ingliżi estratti minn Twitter. Il-kompitu huwa organizzat f’żewġ sottomistoqsijiet ta’ klassifikazzjoni relatati: sottomistoqsija binarja ewlenija għall-identifikazzjoni tal-preżenza ta’ diskors ta’ mibegħda, u waħda b’għeneb irfinat iddedikata għall-identifikazzjoni ta’ karatteristiċi oħra f’kontenut mibegħda bħall-attitudni aggressiva u l-mira fastidjata, biex tiddistingwi jekk l-in ċitament huwiex kontra individwu aktar milli grupp. HatEval kienet waħda mill-kompiti l-aktar popolari f’SemEval-2019 b’total ta’ 108 runs sottomessi għas-Subkompitu A u 70 runs għas-Subkompitu B, minn total ta’ 74 tim differenti. Id-dejta pprovduta għall-kompitu hija deskritta billi turi kif inġabru u ġew annotati. Barra minn hekk, id-dokument jipprovdi analiżi u diskussjoni dwar is-sistemi parteċipanti u r-riżultati li kisbu fiż-żewġ sottomistoqsijiet.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ടാസ്ക് 5 ന്റെ സംഘടനയെ വിവരിക്കുന്നു. സ്പാനിഷ് സ്ത്രീകള്\u200dക്കും സ്ത്രീകള്\u200dക്കും വിരോധമായ വെറുപ്പു വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനും വെറുപ്പുള്ള ഉള്ളടക്കങ്ങളില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വെറുപ്പുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു ബൈനറി ഉപജോലിയില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിക്രമത്ത ഹാറ്റെവാല്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2019ലെ ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലികളില്\u200d ഒരാളായിരുന്നു. അതിന്റെ മൊത്തം 108 സബ്ബ്ബസ് എയില്\u200d നിന്നും 70 സബ്ബസ് ബിക്ക പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കാനുള്ള ഡേറ്റാ വിശദീകരിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു പിന്നെ ആ പത്രത്തില്\u200d പങ്കാളികളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തെക്കുറിച്ചും പങ്കാളികളുടെ ഫലങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ചും ഒരു അന്വേഷണവും ചര്\u200d', 'mn': 'Харин сонин 2019 оны SemEval-ын 5 даалгаварын байгууллагын тухай ярьж байна. Израгчид, испан, Англи хэлний эмэгтэйчүүдийн эсрэг үзэн ядуурлын илтгэлийг Twitter-ээс гаргасан. Энэ ажил хоёр холбоотой хэлбэрээр зохион байгуулагдсан: үзэн ядах илтгэлийн байр сургалтын гол хоёр давхар сургалтын сургалтын сургалтын сургалтын тулд зохион байгуулагдсан, хамтдаа эсрэг хүн төрөлхтний харилцааны илүү хэмжээсүүдийг тодорхойлж чадахад зориулагдсан, зо HatEval нь SemEval-2019 оны хамгийн алдартай ажил болсон бөгөөд 108 Subtask A болон 70 runs for Subtask B, нийтлэл 74 өөр баг байсан. Тэдний хэрхэн цуглуулж, сэтгэл хөдлөл авсан талаар өгөгдлийг тайлбарлаж байна. Үүнээс гадна цаас нь оролцогчдын системийн талаар шинжилгээ, ярилцлага болон тэдний хоёр дахин дахин хийсэн үр дүнг гаргадаг.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea descrie organizarea SemEval 2019 Task 5 privind detectarea discursului de ură împotriva imigranților și femeilor în mesajele spaniole și engleze extrase de pe Twitter. Sarcina este organizată în două subactivități de clasificare conexe: o subactivitate binară principală pentru detectarea prezenței discursului la ură și una mai fină dedicată identificării altor caracteristici în conținuturile pline de ură, cum ar fi atitudinea agresivă și ținta hărțuită, pentru a distinge dacă incitarea este împotriva unui individ mai degrabă decât a unui grup. HatEval a fost una dintre cele mai populare sarcini din SemEval-2019, cu un total de 108 rulări depuse pentru Subsarcina A și 70 rulări pentru Subsarcina B, dintr-un total de 74 de echipe diferite. Datele furnizate pentru activitate sunt descrise prin arătarea modului în care au fost colectate și adnotate. În plus, lucrarea oferă o analiză și discuție despre sistemele participanților și rezultatele obținute în ambele subactivități.', 'no': 'Papiret beskriver organisasjonen av semiEval 2019 oppgåva 5 om oppdaginga av hatespråk mot imigrantar og kvinner i spansk og engelsk meldingar utpakka frå Twitter. Oppgåva er organisert i to relaterte klassifikasjonssubspørjingar: ein hovudbinær underspørjing for å oppdaga framstanden av hatespråk, og ein finsterkorn spesifisert for å identifisera fleire funksjonar i hattige innhaldet, slik som aggressiv attitude og målet påverka, for å distisera om oppgåva er mot ein individuell i staden for ein gruppe. HatEval har been one of the most popular tasks in SemEval-2019 with a total of 108 submitted runs for Subtask A and 70 runs for Subtask B, from a total of 74 different teams. Data oppgjevne for oppgåva vert beskriven ved å visa korleis dei er samla og oppmerka. Papiret gjev også ein analyse og diskusjon om deltakarsystemet og resultatet dei oppnådd i begge underspørsmål.', 'sr': 'U novinama se opisuje organizacija zadatka 5. polovice 2019. o otkrivanju govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena na španjolskoj i engleskoj poruci izvedenih iz Twitter. Ovaj zadatak je organizovan u dva povezanih podmetaka klasifikacije: glavna binarna podpitanja za otkrivanje prisutnosti govora mržnje, i najbolja zrnca posvećena identifikaciji daljnjih karakteristika u mržnjim sadržajima poput agresivnog stava i meta uznemirenog, kako bi se razlikovao da li je podsticanje protiv pojedinca umjesto grupe. HatEval je jedan od najpopularnijih zadataka u semiEvalu-2019. sa ukupno 108 predanih trgovina za subtask A i 70 trgovina za subtask B, od ukupno 74 različitih timova. Podaci predviđeni za zadatak opisuju pokazujući kako su prikupljeni i annotirani. Nadalje, novine pružaju analizu i diskusiju o sustavima učesnika i rezultatima koje su postigli u oba podrška.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano organizację SemEval 2019 Task 5 dotyczącą wykrywania mowy nienawiści wobec imigrantów i kobiet w hiszpańskich i angielskich wiadomościach wydobytych z Twittera. Zadanie jest zorganizowane w dwóch powiązanych z nim podzadaniach klasyfikacyjnych: głównym podzadaniem binarnym służącym wykryciu obecności mowy nienawiści oraz drobniejszym podzadaniu poświęconym identyfikacji dalszych cech w treściach nienawiści, takich jak agresywna postawa i nękany cel, aby rozróżnić, czy podżeganie jest raczej przeciwko jednostce niż grupie. HatEval był jednym z najpopularniejszych zadań w SemEval-2019 z łącznie 108 zgłoszonych biegów dla Podzadania A i 70 biegów dla Podzadania B, z łącznie 74 różnych zespołów. Dane dostarczone do zadania opisane są poprzez pokazanie, w jaki sposób zostały zebrane i adnotacje. Ponadto w artykule przedstawiono analizę i dyskusję na temat systemów uczestniczących oraz osiągniętych wyników w obu podzadaniach.', 'si': 'පත්තරේ 2019 සෙම්වේල් කාර්ය 5 ගැන සංස්ථානය විස්තර කරනවා ස්පැනිස් සහ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි පණිවිඩයෙන් ට්විටර් වලින් පිටව The job is Organised in Two ties classification subtask: a core binary subtask for Detection of the presence of Hate Talk, and a Finer-Graned one dedited to ID more Featherful Fearts in Detressive Contexts, as the aggressive Attitude and the Targe Harssed, to discrnguish if the incitment is adverse to an individual than a group. හැට්වේල් සෙම්වෙල්-2019 වල ඉන්න තියෙන ප්\u200dරමාණික වැඩක් එකක් වෙලා ඉන්නේ සුබ් වැඩක් A සහ 70 රන්ස් සබ් වැඩක් B වලට, සම්පූර්ණ කණ්ඩා කාර්යය වෙනුවෙන් පෙන්වන්න තොරතුරු විස්තර කරනවා ඔවුන් කොහොමද සංගුණු කරලා තියෙන්නේ. ඒ වගේම, පත්තරේ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් සහ කතා කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්ලේෂණයක් සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් දෙන්න', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் செம்Eval 2019 பணியின் நிறுவனத்தை விவரிக்கிறது செம்வால் 2019 செயல் 5 பற்றி தேவைப்படுகிறது சிப்பானிஷ் மற்றும் ஆங்க இந்த செயல் இரண்டு தொடர்புடைய வகுப்பு துணை பணிகளில் நிறுவப்பட்டுள்ளது: வெறுப்பு பேச்சின் இருப்பொருளை கண்டுபிடிக்க ஒரு முக்கிய இருநிலை உபயோகிக்கும், மற்றும் ஒரு சிறந்த சிறப்பாக்கப ஹாட்வால் செம்Eval-2019ல் மிகவும் பெரிய வேலைகளில் ஒன்றாக இருந்தது, மொத்தமாக 108 உப பணி A மற்றும் 70 துணை பணி B க்கு இயக்குகிறது, மொத்தமாக 74 வேறு குழ செயலுக்கான தகவல் வரையறுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது எப்படி அவர்கள் சேகரிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் குறிப்பிட்டுள்ளது என் Moreover, the paper provides an analysis and discussion about the participant systems and the results they achieved in both subtasks.', 'so': 'Warqaddu wuxuu ku qoran yahay ururka shaqada SemEval 2019 oo ku saabsan caddeynta hadalka nebcaadiga ah ee dadka dalka u soo guuray iyo dumarka Isbanish iyo Ingiriis laga soo saaray Twitterka. Shaqada waxaa lagu qabanqaabiyaa laba tashkood oo la xiriira fasaxa: waa xabsi labaad oo ku saabsan in la ogaado joogitaanka hadalka nebcaalka ah, iyo mid ka wanaagsan oo la xiriira in lagu aqoonsado qalabka la nacay, tusaale ahaan qalabka caasinimada iyo waxyaabaha la dhibay, si uu u kala caddeeyo in dhacdadu uu ka gees yahay qof a an koox ahayn. HatEval wuxuu ahaa mid ka mid ah hawlaha ugu maarufan ee SemEval-2019 oo dhamaan 108 koox u soo dirtay subtask A iyo 70 koox u gaar ah Subtask B, waxayna ka mid yihiin 74 koox oo kala duduwan. Macluumaadka shaqada waxaa lagu qoraa tusaale ahaan loo soo ururiyey oo lagu dhibay. Sidoo kale warqaddu waxay ka heleysaa baaritaan iyo sheekeysi ku saabsan nidaamka dadka ka qayb qaata iyo arimaha ay labada shaqooyin ku soo gaadheen.', 'sv': 'Uppsatsen beskriver organisationen av SemEval 2019 Task 5 om detektering av hattal mot invandrare och kvinnor i spanska och engelska meddelanden hämtade från Twitter. Uppgiften är organiserad i två relaterade klassificeringsunderuppgifter: en huvudbinär underuppgift för att upptäcka förekomsten av hattal, och en finkornig underuppgift ägnad åt att identifiera ytterligare drag i hatiskt innehåll som aggressiv attityd och det mål som trakasseras, för att urskilja om incitamentet är mot en individ snarare än en grupp. HatEval har varit en av de mest populära uppgifterna i SemEval-2019 med totalt 108 inlämnade körningar för deluppgift A och 70 körningar för deluppgift B, från totalt 74 olika team. Data som tillhandahålls för uppgiften beskrivs genom att visa hur de har samlats in och kommenterats. Vidare ger uppsatsen en analys och diskussion om deltagarsystemen och de resultat de uppnått i båda deluppgifterna.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ نے ۲۰۱۹ ٹاکس ۵ کے سامنے اسپانیایی اور انگلیسی پیغام سے نکالے ہوئے مہاجرین اور عورتوں کے مقابلے میں نفرت کی بات پتہ کی ہے۔ یہ کام دو رابطہ دار کلاسیفوں میں سازمان کیا گیا ہے: ایک اصلی دوئناری زیب خواست ہے کہ نفرت بولنے کی موجودگی پہچان سکے اور ایک بہتر دانہ ہے جس کا ایک گروپ کے بغیر کسی شخص کے مقابلہ میں اضافہ کرنا چاہتا ہے۔ HatEval SemEval-2019 میں سب سے زیادہ مشهور کاموں میں سے ایک ہے جس میں 108 Subtask A اور 70 runs کے لئے Subtask B کے لئے جمع ہوئے ہیں، 74 مختلف ٹیموں سے۔ اس کام کے لئے پیش کئے ہوئے اطلاعات کے ذریعہ دکھائے جاتے ہیں کہ وہ کس طرح جمع کئے گئے ہیں اور کس طرح دکھائے گئے ہیں۔ اس کے علاوہ، کاغذ ایک تحلیل اور بحث کے ذریعہ مشترک سیستموں اور نتائج جن کو وہ دونوں دفتروں میں پہنچا رہے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Qogʻoz SemEval 2019 Tayyor 5 o'zgarishlar va Ispanish va Inglizcha xabarlarni aniqlash haqida o'zgarishni anglatadi. Bu vazifa ikkita bog'liq darajalashtirish vazifalarda qo'shiladi: Hat so'zni aniqlash uchun asosiy binar tub vazifani aniqlash uchun boshqa bir boshqaruv boshqaruv va bir guruhdan foydalanuvchi tarkibini aniqlash uchun qo'shimcha qo'llab-qo'shiladi. HatEval SemEval-2019dagi eng katta vazifalardan biri, bu tub vazifa A uchun umuman 108 ishlari va Subtask B uchun 70 ishga tushirilgan, butun 74 turli guruhdan boshlanadi. Name Koʻrsatgich, qogʻoz o'qituvchilar tizimlari haqida taʼminlovchi va ikkita vazifalarga erishilgan natijalarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Bài báo mô tả tổ chức của Nhiệm vụ SemEvl 209 5 về việc phát hiện giọng nói thù ghét từ người nhập cư và phụ nữ ở Tây Ban Nha và Anh trích xuất từ Twitter. Nhiệm vụ được tổ chức trong hai giai đoạn phân tích liên quan: một nhị phân chính là yêu cầu tìm ra sự hiện diện của ngôn ngữ thù ghét, và một phần mềm hơn dành cho việc xác định các tính năng khác trong nội dung hận thù như thái độ hung hăng và mục tiêu bị quấy rối, để phân biệt việc kích động chống lại một cá nhân hơn là một nhóm. HatEvol đã là một trong những công việc phổ biến nhất ở SemEvol-209 với một số lượng lớn 108 được gửi chạy cho Subask A và 70Name chạy cho Subask B, from a tổng hợp 74 different Team. Dữ liệu cung cấp cho nhiệm vụ được mô tả bằng cách hiển thị cách thu thập và ghi chú chúng. Hơn nữa, bài báo cung cấp một phân tích và thảo luận về hệ thống tham gia và kết quả đạt được từ cả hai mặt phụ đề.', 'bg': 'Статията описва организацията на Задача 5 за откриване на речта на омразата срещу имигранти и жени в съобщения на испански и английски език, извлечени от Туитър. Задачата е организирана в две свързани подзадачи за класификация: основна двоична подзадача за откриване на присъствието на реч на омразата и по-фина, посветена на идентифицирането на допълнителни характеристики в омразното съдържание като агресивно отношение и тормозена мишена, за да се разграничи дали подтикването е срещу индивид, а не група. ХатЕвал е една от най-популярните задачи в СемЕвал-2019 с общо 108 подадени проби за Подзадача А и 70 проби за Подзадача Б, от общо 74 различни отбора. Данните, предоставени за задачата, са описани, като се показва как са събрани и анотирани. Освен това докладът предоставя анализ и дискусия за системите участници и резултатите, които те постигат в двете подзадачи.', 'hr': 'U novinama se opisuje organizacija zadatka 5. polovice 2019. o otkrivanju govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena na španjolskoj i engleskoj poruci izvedenih iz Twitter. Ovaj zadatak je organiziran u dva povezanih podrška klasifikacije: glavna binarna podrška za otkrivanje prisutnosti govora mržnje, i najbolja zrnca posvećena identifikaciji daljnjih karakteristika u mržnjim sadržajima poput agresivnog stava i meta uznemirenog, kako bi se razlikovao da li je podsticanje protiv osobe umjesto grupe. HatEval je jedan od najpopularnijih zadataka u semiEval-2019. s ukupno 108 predanih trgovina za subtask A i 70 trgovina za subtask B, od ukupno 74 različitih timova. Podaci predviđeni za zadatak opisuju pokazujući kako su prikupljeni i annotirani. Nadalje, u novinama pružaju analizu i raspravu o sustavima učesnika i rezultatima koje su postigle u obje podrške.', 'de': 'Der Beitrag beschreibt die Organisation der SemEval 2019 Task 5 zur Erkennung von Hassreden gegen Immigranten und Frauen in spanischen und englischen Nachrichten, die aus Twitter extrahiert wurden. Die Aufgabe ist in zwei verwandte Klassifikations-Teilaufgaben gegliedert: eine Haupt-binäre Teilaufgabe zur Erkennung des Vorhandenseins von Hassreden und eine feinere Teilaufgabe zur Identifizierung weiterer Merkmale in hasserfüllten Inhalten wie der aggressiven Haltung und dem belästigten Ziel, um zu unterscheiden, ob die Anstiftung gegen eine Einzelperson und nicht gegen eine Gruppe gerichtet ist. HatEval war eine der beliebtesten Aufgaben in SemEval-2019 mit insgesamt 108 eingereichten Durchläufen für Teilaufgabe A und 70 Durchläufen für Teilaufgabe B, von insgesamt 74 verschiedenen Teams. Die für die Aufgabe bereitgestellten Daten werden beschrieben, indem gezeigt wird, wie sie gesammelt und kommentiert wurden. Darüber hinaus bietet der Beitrag eine Analyse und Diskussion über die Teilnehmersysteme und deren Ergebnisse in beiden Teilaufgaben.', 'nl': 'Het artikel beschrijft de organisatie van de SemEval 2019 Task 5 over het opsporen van haatspraak tegen immigranten en vrouwen in Spaanse en Engelse berichten uit Twitter. De taak is georganiseerd in twee verwante classificatiesubtaken: een primaire binaire subtaak voor het detecteren van de aanwezigheid van haatspraak, en een fijnere subtaak gewijd aan het identificeren van verdere kenmerken in haatdragende inhoud, zoals de agressieve houding en het doel dat wordt lastiggevallen, om te onderscheiden of de aanzet is tegen een individu in plaats van een groep. HatEval is een van de meest populaire taken in SemEval-2019 met in totaal 108 ingediende runs voor Subtaak A en 70 runs voor Subtaak B, van in totaal 74 verschillende teams. Gegevens die voor de taak worden verstrekt, worden beschreven door te laten zien hoe ze zijn verzameld en geannoteerd. Daarnaast geeft het artikel een analyse en discussie over de deelnemerssystemen en de resultaten die ze in beide subtaken hebben bereikt.', 'da': 'Artiklen beskriver organiseringen af SemEval 2019 Opgave 5 om afsløring af hadefuldtale mod indvandrere og kvinder i spanske og engelske beskeder udvundet fra Twitter. Opgaven er organiseret i to beslægtede klassificeringsunderopgaver: en primær binær underopgave til at detektere tilstedeværelsen af hadefuld tale, og en finere underopgave dedikeret til at identificere yderligere træk i hadefuldt indhold såsom den aggressive holdning og det chikanerede mål, for at skelne, om opfordringen er imod en person snarere end en gruppe. HatEval har været en af de mest populære opgaver i SemEval-2019 med i alt 108 indsendte løb til Underopgave A og 70 løb til Underopgave B, fra i alt 74 forskellige hold. Data, der leveres til opgaven, beskrives ved at vise, hvordan de er indsamlet og noteret. Desuden giver artiklen en analyse og diskussion om deltagersystemerne og de resultater, de opnåede i begge underopgaver.', 'ko': '본고는 트위터에서 추출한 스페인어와 영어 정보에서 이민자와 여성을 향한 혐오 발언을 검출하는 것과 관련된 SemEval 2019 미션5의 조직 상황을 기술한다.이 임무는 두 가지 관련 분류자 임무로 나뉜다. 하나는 주요한 이진자 임무로 원한 언론의 존재를 측정하는 데 사용되고, 다른 하나는 더욱 세밀한 하위 임무로 원한 내용의 진일보한 특징, 예를 들어 공격적인 태도와 소란을 피우는 목표를 식별하여 선동이 단체가 아닌 개인을 대상으로 하는지 구분하는 데 사용된다.HatEval은 SemEval-2019에서 가장 인기 있는 임무 중 하나로 74개 팀이 108차례의 하위 임무 a에 대한 운행, 70차례의 하위 임무 B에 대한 운행을 제출했다.작업에 대한 데이터는 수집과 주석을 표시하는 것을 통해 설명됩니다.그 밖에 본고는 참여자 시스템과 두 개의 하위 임무에서 얻은 성과를 분석하고 토론했다.', 'id': 'Koran menggambarkan organisasi SemEval 2019 Task 5 tentang deteksi pidato kebencian terhadap imigran dan wanita dalam pesan bahasa Spanyol dan Inggris yang dikeluarkan dari Twitter. Tugas ini terorganisir dalam dua subtasks klasifikasi terkait: subtasks binari utama untuk mendeteksi kehadiran pidato kebencian, dan yang lebih baik-grained yang dedikasi untuk mengidentifikasi karakteristik lanjut dalam isi kebencian seperti sikap agresif dan sasaran terganggu, untuk membedakan apakah incitasi melawan individu daripada kelompok. HatEval adalah salah satu tugas paling populer di SemEval-2019 dengan total 108 jalanan yang dihantar untuk Subtask A dan 70 jalanan untuk Subtask B, dari total 74 tim yang berbeda. Data yang disediakan untuk tugas diterangkan dengan menunjukkan bagaimana mereka telah dikumpulkan dan dicatat. Selain itu, kertas memberikan analisis dan diskusi tentang sistem peserta dan hasil yang mereka capai dalam kedua subtasks.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hilo linaelezea shirika la Task la SemEval 2019 la 5 kuhusu kutambuliwa kwa hotuba ya chuki dhidi ya wahamiaji na wanawake wa Kihispania na Uingereza zilizotolewa kwenye mtandao wa Twita. Kazi hiyo imeandaliwa katika majukumu mawili yanayohusiana na makundi: jukumu kubwa la binafsi kwa kutambua uwepo wa hotuba ya chuki, na mtu aliyekamatwa kwa lengo la kutambua zaidi tabia za chuki kama vile mtazamo wa kibaguzi na lengo la kuteswa, kutofautisha kama tukio hilo ni dhidi ya mtu binafsi badala ya kundi. HatEval imekuwa moja ya kazi maarufu zaidi nchini SemEval-2019 yenye jumla ya 108 zilizotolewa na mashindano ya Ujumbe wa A na 70 kwa ajili ya Ujumbe B, kutoka jumla ya timu 74 tofauti. Taarifa zinazotolewa kwa kazi hiyo zinaelezwa kwa kuonyesha jinsi walivyokusanyika na kuchanganyikiwa. Zaidi ya hayo, gazeti hilo linatoa uchambuzi na mjadala kuhusu mifumo ya washiriki na matokeo yaliyopata katika kazi hizo mbili.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سازمان ماموریت پنجم سال ۲۰۱۹ را در مورد کشف سخنرانی متنفر در برابر مهاجران و زنان اسپانیایی و پیغام انگلیسی که از توئیتر خارج شده\u200cاند توضیح می\u200cدهد. این وظیفه در دو قسمت مختلف رابطه سازی می\u200cشود: یک قسمت دویینی اصلی برای شناسایی موجود سخنرانی ناخوشایند، و یک قسمت پاکیزه\u200cتر که برای شناسایی ویژه\u200cهای بیشتری در محتوای ناخوشایند مانند رفتار ناخوشایند و هدف ناخوشایند است، برای تشخیص دادن آیا این آسیب بر یک فرد به جای یک گروه است. HatEval یکی از مهمترین وظیفه\u200cهای شعبده\u200cترین در شعبه ۲۰۱۹ بوده است، با جمعیت ۱۸۸ مسابقه\u200cای برای Subtask A و ۷۰ مسابقه برای Subtask B، از جمعیت ۷۴ تیم متفاوت. داده\u200cها برای این کار توصیف می\u200cشود با نشان دادن چگونه جمع شده و آگاهی شده\u200cاند. در ضمن، کاغذ یک تحلیل و بحث در مورد سیستم مشترک و نتیجه\u200cهایی که در هر دو زیر سؤال رسیده\u200cاند را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند.', 'tr': 'Gazet 2019-nji 첵yly흫 semi-Eval a첵akyny흫 5-nji G철revi 2-nji g철챌menler we a첵allar arasynda 첵igren첵채n 챌yky힊lygyny Twitter-dan 챌ykaryl첵ar. Bu bu첵ruk ikinji g철rn철힊im subatlarynda d체zenlen첵채r: 첵igren첵채n s철zlerini흫 esasy binary a 힊agyny tanamak 체챌in bir s체첵tge챌, we grupy흫 첵erine bu sowgady흫 첵igren첵채n barlygyny tanamak 체챌in bir s체첵tge챌 bar. HatEval SemEval-2019-nji 첵yldaky i흫 me힊hur zadyny흫 biri bolup ge챌di we 108 ta첵첵arlar Subtask A we 70 ta첵첵arlar Subtask B we 74 체첵tge힊ik toparyndan bellenildi. G철rev 체챌in berilen maglumatlar n채hili 첵ygnandygyny we n채hili du첵첵andygyny g철rkez첵채n bilen tassyklan첵ar. Gazet hem i힊tirak챌i sistemalary we netijelerini hem 챌철zg체tlerde 챌철z체mler we 챌철z체mler bar.', 'af': "Die papier beskrywe die organisasie van die SemEval 2019 Opdrag 5 oor die opdekking van haat spreek teen imigrante en vroue in Spaanse en Engelse boodskappe wat uit Twitter uitgevoer het. Die taak is organiseer in twee verwante klasifikasie ondersoek:  'n hoof binêre ondersoek vir ontdekking van die voorkoms van haat spreek, en 'n finer-graad een wat geassosieer is om verdere funksies in haatlike inhoud te identifiseer soos die aggressiewe aanhouding en die doel verdrukking, te ondersoek of die inkoms teen 'n individueel in plaas van 'n groep is. HatEval is een van die mees populêre opdragte in SemEval-2019 met 'n totaal van 108 voorgestuurde hardloop vir Subtask A en 70 hardloop vir Subtask B, van 'n totaal van 74 verskillende teams. Data verskaf vir die taak word beskrywe deur te wys hoe hulle versamel en gekommerd is. Daarop verskaf die papier 'n analiseer en diskusie oor die deelnaders-stelsels en die resultate wat hulle in beide onderwerpe bereik het.", 'sq': 'Gazeta përshkruan organizatën e SemEval 2019 Task 5 rreth zbulimit të fjalimit të urrejtjes kundër emigrantëve dhe grave në mesazhet spanjolle dhe angleze të nxjerra nga Twitter. Detyra është organizuar në dy nëndetyra klasifikuese të lidhura: një nëndetyrë kryesore binare për zbulimin e pranisë së fjalimit të urrejtjes dhe një më të bukur të përkushtuar për identifikimin e karakteristikave të mëtejshme në përmbajtje urrejtjeje të tilla si qëndrimi agresiv dhe objektivi i ngacmuar, për të dalluar nëse nxitja është kundër një individ në vend të një grupi. HatEval ka qenë një nga detyrat më popullore në SemEval-2019 me një total prej 108 kandidatash të paraqitura për Subtask A dhe 70 kandidatash për Subtask B, nga një total prej 74 ekipe të ndryshme. Të dhënat e dhëna për detyrën janë përshkruar duke treguar se si janë mbledhur dhe shënuar. Përveç kësaj, gazeta ofron një analizë dhe diskutim rreth sistemeve pjesëmarrëse dhe rezultateve që arritën në të dy nënpyetjet.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt 2019-in SemEval Task 5-inin İspanyolca və İngilizce ismarışlarına Twitter-dən çıxarılan imigrantlərə və qadınlara qarşı nifrət sözlərinin keşfetməsi barəsində xəbər verir. Bu işin iki bağlı klasifikasyon aparılığında organize edilir: nifrət sözlərinin varlığını tanıtmaq üçün an a binar aparılıq, həmçinin grupdan başqa bir kişinin qarşısında müsibət müəyyən edilməsi üçün daha xeyirli təsirli təsirlərin və nifrət məqsədilərinin daha çox təsirli təsirlərini tanıtmaq üçün başqalarını ayırd etmək üçün. HatEval SemEval-2019-də ən popularlı işlərdən biri idi. Subtask A və Subtask B üçün 70 işlər tərəfindən 74 müxtəlif tərəflərdən 108 işlər tərəfindən göndərildi. Gözməyə bəxş edilən məlumatlar necə toplandığını göstərək tanımlıdır. Əvvəlcə, kağıt iştirakçi sistemlərin analizi və müzakirə etdiyi sonuçları ilə hər ikisində nəticə etdi.', 'am': 'ፕሬዝዳንቱ የሴmEval 2019 ስራ 5 ላይ በተዊተር ላይ በተሰደዱት ስፓኒሽ እና በኢንጂልኛ እና በኢንጂልኛ መልእክቶች ላይ የጥላቻን ንግግር ለማግኘት ይናገራል፡፡ ስራው በሁለት ተከታታታይ ክፍል ውስጥ ነው: የጥል ንግግር መሆኑን ለማግኘት የዋነኛ ብናር ጉዳይ ነው፤ እና በጉዳዩ ላይ የሚጠሉትን አካባቢ እና ተቃውሞ የሚታወቀውን ጥቅረት እና ተቃውሞ የሚታወቅ የጥላቻ ውይይቶች ላይ የተመሳሳይ ነው፡፡ HatEval has been one of the most popular tasks in SemEval-2019 with a total of 108 submitted runs for Subtask A and 70 runs for Subtask B, from a total of 74 different teams.  ዳታዎች እንዴት እንደተሰበሰቡና እንዳስደነቁ በማሳየት የሚታወቁ ናቸው፡፡ ደብዳቤውም ስለተጋሪዎቹ ስርዓቶች እና በሁለቱ ስርዓቶች ውስጥ ያገኙትን ፍሬዎች የሚያስተምርና ውይይት ይሰጣል፡፡', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল ২০১৯ কাজের সংগঠনের বিষয়টি বর্ণনা করেছে যে টুইটার থেকে বের করা অভিবাসী এবং স্প্যানিশ এবং ইংরেজী বার্তার বি এই কাজটি দুটি সম্পর্কিত শ্রেণীবিভাগের সাবক্ষেত্রে আয়োজন করা হয়েছে: ঘৃণা ভাষণের উপস্থিতি খুঁজে বের করার জন্য একটি প্রধান বাইনারী সাবটারি কাজ এবং একটি সুন্দর গ্রেফতার করা হয়েছে যারা ঘৃণার হাতিভাল সেমইভাল-২০১৯-এর সবচেয়ে জনপ্রিয় কাজের মধ্যে একটি ছিলেন, যার মোট ১০৮ জন সাবাক্ষাৎকার এ এবং ৭০ জন সাবাক্ষাস বিরোধী দল থেকে ৭৪ জন বিভি কাজের জন্য তথ্য বর্ণনা করা হয়েছে কিভাবে তাদের সংগ্রহ করা হয়েছে এবং বিরক্ত করা হয়েছে। এছাড়াও এই পত্রিকাটি অংশগ্রহণকারীদের সিস্টেম সম্পর্কে বিশ্লেষণ এবং আলোচনা দিয়েছে এবং উভয় সাবটাকাজে তারা অর্জন করে', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է 2019 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ 5"-ի կազմակերպությունը, որը վերաբերում է ատելության խոսքի հայտնաբերմանը իսպաներեն և անգլերենում Թվիթերից դուրս բերված հաղորդագրություններին: The task is organized in two related classification subtasks: a main binary subtask for detecting the presence of hate speech, and a finer-grained one devoted to identifying further features in hateful contents such as the aggressive attitude and the target harassed, to distinguish if the incitement is against an individual rather than a group.  Հաթեվալը ՍեմԵվալ-2019 թվականի ամենահայտնի առաջադրանքներից մեկն էր, որի ընդհանուր թիվը կազմում էր հինգ հինգ առաջադրանք, իսկ հինգ հինգ հինգ առաջադրանք կազմում էր հինգ հինգ առաջադրանք: Data provided for the task are described by showing how they have been collected and annotated.  Ավելին, թուղթը ներկայացնում է վերլուծություն և քննարկում մասնակիցների համակարգերի և նրանց երկու ենթահարցերում հասած արդյունքների մասին:', 'bs': 'U novinama se opisuje organizacija zadatka 5 iz polovice 2019. o otkrivanju govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena na španjolskoj i engleskoj poruci izvedenih iz Twitter. Taj zadatak je organiziran u dva povezanih podrška klasifikacije: glavna binarna podrška za otkrivanje prisutnosti govora mržnje, i najbolja zrnca posvećena identifikaciji daljnjih karakteristika u mržnji sadržaj poput agresivnog stava i meta napadnuta, kako bi se razlikovala da li je podsticanje protiv pojedinca umjesto grupe. HatEval je bio jedan od najpopularnijih zadataka u semiEval-2019. sa ukupno 108 predanih trgovina za subtask A i 70 trgovina za subtask B, od ukupno 74 različitih timova. Podaci predviđeni za zadatak opisuju pokazujući kako su prikupljeni i annotirani. Nadalje, papir pruža analizu i diskusiju o sustavima učesnika i rezultatima koje su postigli u obje podrške.', 'cs': 'Článek popisuje organizaci SemEval 2019 Task 5 o detekci nenávistné řeči vůči imigrantům a ženám ve španělských a anglických zprávách extrahovaných z Twitteru. Úkol je uspořádán do dvou souvisejících klasifikačních dílčích úkolů: hlavní binární podúkol pro detekci přítomnosti nenávistné řeči a jemnější podúkol věnovaný identifikaci dalších rysů nenávistného obsahu, jako je agresivní postoj a obtěžovaný cíl, aby bylo rozlišeno, zda je podněcování spíše proti jednotlivci než skupině. HatEval byl jedním z nejoblíbenějších úkolů v SemEval-2019 s celkem 108 odeslaných běhů pro Subúkol A a 70 běhů pro Subúkol B, celkem 74 různých týmů. Data poskytnutá pro úkol jsou popsána tím, jak byla shromážděna a anotována. Příspěvek navíc poskytuje analýzu a diskusi o systémech účastníků a výsledcích, kterých dosáhli v obou dílčích úkolech.', 'fi': 'Artikkeli kuvaa SemEval 2019 Task 5 -tapahtuman järjestämistä maahanmuuttajiin ja naisiin kohdistuvan vihapuheen havaitsemisesta Twitteristä otetuissa espanjan- ja englanninkielisissä viesteissä. Tehtävä on järjestetty kahteen toisiinsa liittyvään luokittelun alatehtävään: pääasiallinen binaarinen alatehtävä vihapuheen havaitsemiseksi ja hienojakoisempi, joka on omistettu tunnistamaan vihasisällön muita ominaisuuksia, kuten aggressiivinen asenne ja ahdisteltu kohde, jotta voidaan erottaa, onko yllytys yksilöä vastaan eikä ryhmää vastaan. HatEval on ollut yksi SemEval-2019:n suosituimmista tehtävistä yhteensä 108 ajoa osatehtävään A ja 70 ajoa osatehtävään B, yhteensä 74 tiimistä. Tehtävää varten annetut tiedot kuvataan osoittamalla, miten ne on kerätty ja merkitty. Lisäksi työssä analysoidaan ja keskustellaan osallistujien järjestelmistä ja niiden molemmissa osatehtävissä saavutetuista tuloksista.', 'et': 'Artiklis kirjeldatakse SemEval 2019 ülesande 5 korraldamist sisserändajate ja naiste vastu suunatud vihakõne avastamiseks Twitterist väljavõetud hispaania- ja ingliskeelsetes sõnumites. Ülesanne on organiseeritud kaheks seotud klassifitseerimise alamülesandeks: peamine binaarne alamülesanne vihakõne olemasolu tuvastamiseks ja peenema alamülesanne, mis on pühendatud vihakõne edasiste omaduste tuvastamisele, nagu agressiivne suhtumine ja ahistatav sihtmärk, et eristada, kas õhutamine on pigem indiviidi kui grupi vastu. HatEval on olnud SemEval-2019 üks populaarsemaid ülesandeid, kus allülesandele A esitati 108 jooksu ja alaülesandele B 70 jooksu kokku 74 erinevast meeskonnast. Ülesande jaoks esitatud andmeid kirjeldatakse, näidates, kuidas neid on kogutud ja märgitud. Lisaks analüüsitakse ja arutatakse osalejate süsteeme ja nende saavutatud tulemusi mõlemas alamülesandes.', 'ca': "El paper descriu l'organització de la tasca 5 de SemEval 2019 sobre la detecció del discurs d'odi contra immigrants i dones en missatges espanyols i anglesos extraits de Twitter. La tasca està organitzada en dues subtaskes de classificació relacionades: una subtask a binaria principal per detectar la presença de discurs d'odi, i una més fina dedicada a identificar altres característiques en continguts odiosos com l'actitud agressiva i l'objectiu assetjat, per distingir si l'incitació està contra un individu en comptes d'un grup. HatEval ha estat una de les tasques més populars de SemEval-2019 amb un total de 108 execucions enviades per Subtask A i 70 execucions per Subtask B, d'un total de 74 equips diferents. Data provided for the task are described by showing how they have been collected and annotated.  A més, el paper proporciona una an àlisi i una discussió sobre els sistemes participants i els resultats que van aconseguir en ambdues subtaskes.", 'jv': 'Perintah panjenengan rambarang panjenengan kelas seminval 2011 task 5 babagan kelas kuwi nggawe barang kanggo ngilangno iki bakal dumadhi kuwi mruput kanggo ngilangno karo perkara Panjenengan lan kelas ingkang diputara tuwitir. task is Organizer HAHA DELAH wis mungkane karo halekaé populer sing gak bener ning seminval-2011 barêng wong liyane sing tolakan san ataké mangan kanggo Subtask A lan 75 runs kanggo Subtask B, mengkane karo kara mengkane karo 75 mlayen. Name Nambah, peuter sing nyebuté pancen karo sistem sing pisan-pisan lan banjur sing mbukaké supaya iki dadi sing luwih apik nyelarane.', 'he': 'העיתון מתאר את ארגון המשימה 5 של SemEval 2019 על גילוי נאום שנאה נגד מהגרים ונשים בהודעות ספרדיות ואנגליות שנוצאות מטוויטר. המשימה מאורגנת בשני תחתונים מסווגים קשורים: תחתונה בינרית עיקרית לגלות נוכחות נאום שנאה, וחתונה מוקדשת יותר לזהות תכונות נוספות בתוכן שנאה כמו הגישה האגרסיבית והמטרה המוטרדת, כדי להבחין אם התעללות היא נגד אדם במקום קבוצה. HatEval היה אחד המשימות הפופולריות ביותר בסמיוול-2019 עם בסך הכל 108 רצויות מועברות עבור Subtask A ו-70 רצויות עבור Subtask B, מכל 74 קבוצות שונות. נתונים שנספקים למשימה מתארים על ידי הצגת איך הם אוספים ומציינים. חוץ מזה, העבודה מספקת ניתוח ודיון על מערכות המשתתפים והתוצאות שהם השיגו בשני השאלות.', 'ha': "The paper describes the organization of the SemEval 2019 Task 5 about the detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Spanish and English messages extracted from Twitter.  An organize wani aikin da ke cikin task õkin biyu masu husũma: wani muhimmin bincike wa ya gane presence of an ƙi, kuma an kifi-grafi wani wanda ke da amfani da shi dõmin ya gane wasu feature cikin abin da ke ƙi kamar aikin kibitacce da wanda aka haramta shi, dõmin ka rarraba idan an yi inci shi ne a kan wani mutum ko kuma a kan wani jama'a. Hateval has been one of the most popular tasks in SemEal-2019 with a sum of 108 wanda aka bãyar run for Subjob A and 70 runs for Subjob B, daga duk 74 dabam-dabam. Ana bayyana data wanda aka samar da shi a kan aikin ka nuna yadda aka samo da kuma aka zartar da su. Furan wannan, takardar na bãyar da analyi da jãyayya masu husũma na'urar musamman da matsalatan su sami cikin aikin biyu.", 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisana organizacija naloge 5 SemEval 2019 o odkrivanju sovražnega govora proti priseljencem in ženskam v španskih in angleških sporočilih iz Twitterja. Naloga je organizirana v dveh sorodnih klasifikacijskih podnalogah: glavno binarno podnalogo za odkrivanje prisotnosti sovražnega govora in natančnejšo, namenjeno prepoznavanju nadaljnjih značilnosti sovražnih vsebin, kot sta agresivni odnos in nadlegovani tarči, da bi razlikovali, ali je spodbujanje proti posamezniku in ne skupini. HatEval je bila ena najbolj priljubljenih nalog v SemEval-2019 s skupno 108 oddanimi nalogami za Podnalogo A in 70 teki za Podnalogo B, od skupno 74 različnih ekip. Podatki, zagotovljeni za opravilo, so opisani tako, da prikazujejo, kako so bili zbrani in označeni. Poleg tega prispevek vsebuje analizo in razpravo o sistemih udeležencev in rezultatih, ki so jih dosegli v obeh podnalogah.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་གིས་2019ལྟ་བུའི་སྡོད་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཨིན་སུའི་ནང་གི་བུད་མེད་སྣང་བ་དང་བུད་མེད་སྐད་བཤད་པ་ཚོར་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཨ བྱ་འགུལ་ནི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོད་པའི་དབྱེ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་བཀོད་སྒྲིག་གི་རྒྱུ་དངོས། རྩ་བའི་ཟུར་བ་ཅིག་ཕྱིར་ཉེན་གཞུང་བའི་སྐད་འགན་བློ་གཏོང་དང་། HatEval SemEval-2019 ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་གི་ཆེས་ཤོས་བའི་བྱ་སྟངས་ལས་གཅིག་རེད། དེ་གྲངས་ཀ་ཡོངས་བསྡོམས་ནས་108 གཡོག བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་བྱིས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་དེ་ཇི་ལྟར་བསྡུ་ཡོད་པ་དང་གསལ་བཤད་བྱས་ནས་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཡོད། ད་དུང་། ཤོག་བྱང་གིས་ཞུགས་པ་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་སྐྱོན་རུང་བའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དང་བཤད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'SemEval-2019 Task 6 : Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval)', 'fr': 'SemEval-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: Identifier et catégoriser le langage offensant dans les médias sociaux (OffenseVal)', 'pt': 'Tarefa 6 do SemEval-2019: Identificando e categorizando linguagem ofensiva nas mídias sociais (OffensEval)', 'es': 'Tarea 6 de SemEval-2019: Identificación y categorización del lenguaje ofensivo en las redes sociales (OffensEval)', 'ar': 'مهمة SemEval-2019 6: تحديد وتصنيف اللغة الهجومية في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي (OffensEval)', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019务6:识类社交媒体中攻击性语(OffensEval)', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 6: सोशल मीडिया में आपत्तिजनक भाषा की पहचान और वर्गीकरण (OffensEval)', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019タスク6 ：ソーシャルメディアにおける不快な言葉の識別と分類（ OffensEval ）', 'ru': 'SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Выявление и категоризация оскорбительных слов в социальных сетях (OffensEval)', 'ga': 'SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Teanga Iontach sna Meáin Shóisialta a Aithint agus a Chatagóiriú (OffensEval)', 'hu': 'SemEval-2019 6. feladat: A sértő nyelv azonosítása és kategorizálása a közösségi médiában (OffensEval)', 'el': 'Εργασία 6: Αναγνώριση και κατηγοριοποίηση της προσβλητικής γλώσσας στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης', 'ka': 'SemEval-2019 დავალება 6: სოციალური მედიაში უფრო უფრო უფრო დიდინტიფიკაცია და კატეგორიზაცია (OffensEval)', 'it': 'SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identificare e categorizzare il linguaggio offensivo nei social media (OffensEval)', 'kk': 'Жарым- Eval- 2019 6 тапсырма: Оциялық медиақтар тілді анықтау және санаттарды баптау (OffensEval)', 'lt': 'SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval)', 'mk': 'SemEval-2019 задача 6: Идентификување и категоризирање на навреден јазик во социјалните медиуми (OffensEval)', 'mt': 'SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6: Identifikazzjoni u Kategorizzazzjoni tal-Lingwa Offensiva fil-Midja Soċjali (OffensEval)', 'ml': 'സെമ്Eval- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6: സോഷ്യല്\u200d മെഡിയയില്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുകയും വ്യവസാനിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്ന ഭാഷ (ഓഫെന്\u200dസ്\u200cവാല്\u200d)', 'ms': 'SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Mengenalpasti dan Mengkategori Bahasa Tersinggung dalam Media Sosial (OffensEval)', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval)', 'no': 'Semeval-2019 Oppgåve 6: Identifikasjon og kategorisering av offensive språk i sosialmedia (OffensEval)', 'ro': 'SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: Identificarea și categorizarea limbajului ofensiv în rețelele sociale (OffensEval)', 'pl': 'SemEval-2019 Zadanie 6: Identyfikowanie i kategorizowanie języka ofensywnego w mediach społecznościowych (OffensEval)', 'si': 'Half-2019 වැඩ 6: සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා (Offenseval)', 'so': 'Shaqada SemEval-2019 6: Identification and categorizing luqada rasmi ah ee ku qoran macluumaadka bulshada (OffensEval)', 'sr': 'SemEval-2019 zadatak 6: identifikacija i kategorizacija oficijalnog jezika u socijalnim medijima (OffensEval)', 'sv': 'SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: Identifiera och kategorisera kränkande språk i sociala medier (OffensEval)', 'ta': 'SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval)', 'ur': 'سیم Eval-2019 ٹاکس ۶: سوسیل میڈیا میں نافذی زبان شناسایی اور کاٹی کرتی ہے (OffensEval)', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifa 6: Social Media (OffensEval) Identification and categorizing Offensive Language', 'vi': 'Nhiệm vụ Sáu: xác định và phân loại Ngôn ngữ Hành động trên phương tiện xã hội', 'bg': 'Задача 6: Идентифициране и категоризиране на офанзивен език в социалните медии', 'hr': 'Zadnji zadatak 6: identifikacija i kategorizacija neposlušnog jezika u socijalnim medijima (OffensEval)', 'da': 'SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: Identificering og kategorisering af offensivt sprog i sociale medier (OffensEval)', 'nl': 'SemEval-2019 Taak 6: Het identificeren en categoriseren van offensieve taal in sociale media (OffensEval)', 'de': 'SemEval-2019 Aufgabenstellung 6: Offensive Sprache in Social Media identifizieren und kategorisieren (OffensEval)', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019 퀘스트 6: 소셜 미디어에서의 공격적인 언어 식별 및 분류(Offenseval)', 'id': 'SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Identifikasi dan Kategorisasi Bahasa Tersinggung dalam Media Sosial (OffensEval)', 'fa': 'ماموریت ۶: شناسایی و تقسیم زبان نیرومندی در رسانه اجتماعی (OffensEval)', 'sw': 'SemEval-2019 Kazi 6: Kutambua na Kugawanya Lugha ya Uhuru katika Vyombo vya habari vya kijamii (OffensEval)', 'sq': 'SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval)', 'tr': 'SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval)', 'af': 'SemEval-2019 Opdrag 6: Identifikasie en Kategoriseering Offensive Taal in Sosiale Media (OffensEval)', 'am': 'ስምEval-2019 ስራ 6: ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ (OffensEval)', 'hy': 'ՍեմԷվալ-2019 Վերջին հանձնարարությունը. Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում վնասավոր լեզուների բացահայտումը և դասակարգումը (ՕֆենսԷվալ)', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Görev 6: Sosyal Mediyalarda Önüllü Dili tanıma və Kategoriyalama (OffensEval)', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2019 কাজ 6: সামাজিক মিডিয়াতে অফিসেন্সিভ ভ ভাষা পরিচিতি এবং বিভিন্ন ভাষা (অফিনসেভাল)', 'bs': 'Zadnji zadatak 6: identifikacija i kategorizacija neposlušnog jezika u socijalnim medijima (OffensEval)', 'ca': 'SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval)', 'fi': 'SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 6: Hyökkäävän kielen tunnistaminen ja luokittelu sosiaalisessa mediassa (OffensEval)', 'et': 'SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 6: Ründava keele tuvastamine ja kategoriseerimine sotsiaalmeedias (OffensEval)', 'cs': 'SemEval-2019 Úkol 6: Identifikace a kategorizace útočného jazyka v sociálních médiích (OffensEval)', 'jv': 'semiinval-2011 task 6: ID and category', 'ha': '@ info: status', 'sk': 'SemEval-2019 Naloga 6: Identifikacija in kategorizacija ofenzivnega jezika v socialnih medijih (OffensEval)', 'he': 'SemEval-2019 משימה 6: זיהוי וקטגוריזציה שפה פגיעה במדיה חברתית (OffensEval)', 'bo': 'SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval)'}
{'en': 'We present the results and the main findings of SemEval-2019 Task 6 on Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval). The task was based on a new dataset, the Offensive Language Identification Dataset (OLID), which contains over 14,000 English tweets, and it featured three sub-tasks. In sub-task A, systems were asked to discriminate between offensive and non-offensive posts. In sub-task B, systems had to identify the type of offensive content in the post. Finally, in sub-task C, systems had to detect the target of the offensive posts. OffensEval attracted a large number of participants and it was one of the most popular tasks in SemEval-2019. In total, nearly 800 teams signed up to participate in the task and 115 of them submitted results, which are presented and analyzed in this report.', 'fr': "Nous présentons les résultats et les principales conclusions de la tâche 6 de SEMEVAL-2019 sur l'identification et la catégorisation du langage offensant dans les médias sociaux (OffenseVAL). La tâche reposait sur un nouvel ensemble de données, Offensive Language Identification Dataset (OLID), qui contient plus de 14 000 tweets en anglais, et comportait trois sous-tâches. Dans la sous-tâche A, les systèmes ont été invités à faire la distinction entre les publications offensives et non offensives. Dans la sous-tâche B, les systèmes devaient identifier le type de contenu offensant dans la publication. Enfin, dans la sous-tâche C, les systèmes devaient détecter la cible des postes offensifs. OffenseVal a attiré un grand nombre de participants et c'était l'une des tâches les plus populaires de SemEval-2019. Au total, près de 800 équipes se sont inscrites pour participer à la tâche et 115 d'entre elles ont soumis des résultats, qui sont présentés et analysés dans ce rapport.", 'ar': 'نقدم النتائج والنتائج الرئيسية لمهمة SemEval-2019 6 حول تحديد وتصنيف اللغة الهجومية في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي (OffensEval). استندت المهمة إلى مجموعة بيانات جديدة ، وهي مجموعة بيانات تحديد اللغة الهجومية (OLID) ، والتي تحتوي على أكثر من 14000 تغريدة باللغة الإنجليزية ، وتضمنت ثلاث مهام فرعية. في المهمة الفرعية أ ، طُلب من الأنظمة التمييز بين الوظائف الهجومية وغير الهجومية. في المهمة الفرعية ب ، كان على الأنظمة تحديد نوع المحتوى المسيء في المنشور. أخيرًا ، في المهمة الفرعية C ، كان على الأنظمة اكتشاف هدف المواقع الهجومية. جذبت OffensEval عددًا كبيرًا من المشاركين وكانت من أكثر المهام شيوعًا في SemEval-2019. في المجموع ، اشترك ما يقرب من 800 فريق للمشاركة في المهمة وقدم 115 منهم النتائج ، والتي تم تقديمها وتحليلها في هذا التقرير.', 'es': 'Presentamos los resultados y los principales hallazgos de la Tarea 6 de SemEval-2019 sobre Identificación y categorización del lenguaje ofensivo en las redes sociales (OffensEval). La tarea se basó en un nuevo conjunto de datos, el Conjunto de Datos de Identificación del Lenguaje Ofensivo (OLID), que contiene más de 14 000 tuits en inglés y presenta tres subtareas. En la subtarea A, se pidió a los sistemas que discriminaran entre publicaciones ofensivas y no ofensivas. En la subtarea B, los sistemas tenían que identificar el tipo de contenido ofensivo en la publicación. Finalmente, en la subtarea C, los sistemas tenían que detectar el objetivo de los puestos ofensivos. OffensEval atrajo a un gran número de participantes y fue una de las tareas más populares en Semeval-2019. En total, casi 800 equipos se inscribieron para participar en la tarea y 115 de ellos presentaron resultados, que se presentan y analizan en este informe.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos os resultados e as principais conclusões da Tarefa 6 do SemEval-2019 sobre Identificação e Categorização de Linguagem Ofensiva em Mídias Sociais (OffensEval). A tarefa foi baseada em um novo conjunto de dados, o Offensive Language Identification Dataset (OLID), que contém mais de 14.000 tweets em inglês e apresentou três subtarefas. Na subtarefa A, os sistemas foram solicitados a discriminar entre postagens ofensivas e não ofensivas. Na subtarefa B, os sistemas tinham que identificar o tipo de conteúdo ofensivo na postagem. Finalmente, na subtarefa C, os sistemas tinham que detectar o alvo dos postos ofensivos. OffensEval atraiu um grande número de participantes e foi uma das tarefas mais populares no SemEval-2019. No total, cerca de 800 equipes se inscreveram para participar da tarefa e 115 delas apresentaram resultados, que são apresentados e analisados neste relatório.', 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアにおける不快な言語の識別と分類（ OffensEval ）に関するSemEval -2019タスク6の結果と主な調査結果を提示します。このタスクは、14,000を超える英語のツイートを含む新しいデータセット、攻撃的言語識別データセット（ OLID ）に基づいており、3つのサブタスクが含まれていました。サブタスクAでは、攻撃的なポストと非攻撃的なポストを区別するシステムが求められた。サブタスクBでは、システムは投稿内の不快なコンテンツの種類を特定する必要がありました。最後に、サブタスクCでは、システムは攻撃ポストのターゲットを検出する必要がありました。OffensEvalは多数の参加者を集め、SemEval -2019で最も人気のあるタスクの1つでした。合計で、800近くのチームがタスクに参加するために登録し、そのうち115チームが結果を提出し、このレポートで提示および分析されます。', 'zh': '吾言SemEval-2019知类社交媒体犯言者6(OffensEval)见也。 其务在一新数集,即犯性言语识数集(OLID),其包过14,000条英语推文,并有三子。 在子职A中,统被求分进攻性与非进攻性职。 在子职B中,统须识帖中反感之类。 最后,在子务C中,统须检测攻哨。 OffensEval多引参与者,此SemEval-2019之最受欢迎者也。 凡有近800团队名,115一团队言之,具以状闻。', 'hi': 'हम परिणाम और SemEval-2019 कार्य 6 के मुख्य निष्कर्षों को सोशल मीडिया (OffensEval) में आक्रामक भाषा की पहचान और वर्गीकरण पर प्रस्तुत करते हैं। यह कार्य एक नए डेटासेट, आक्रामक भाषा पहचान डेटासेट (ओएलआईडी) पर आधारित था, जिसमें 14,000 से अधिक अंग्रेजी ट्वीट शामिल हैं, और इसमें तीन उप-कार्य शामिल हैं। उप-कार्य ए में, सिस्टम को आक्रामक और गैर-आक्रामक पदों के बीच भेदभाव करने के लिए कहा गया था। उप-कार्य बी में, सिस्टम को पोस्ट में आक्रामक सामग्री के प्रकार की पहचान करनी थी। अंत में, उप-कार्य सी में, सिस्टम को आक्रामक पदों के लक्ष्य का पता लगाना था। OffensEval ने बड़ी संख्या में प्रतिभागियों को आकर्षित किया और यह SemEval-2019 में सबसे लोकप्रिय कार्यों में से एक था। कुल मिलाकर, लगभग 800 टीमों ने कार्य में भाग लेने के लिए साइन अप किया और उनमें से 115 ने परिणाम प्रस्तुत किए, जिन्हें इस रिपोर्ट में प्रस्तुत और विश्लेषण किया गया है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем результаты и основные выводы задачи 6 SemEval-2019 по выявлению и классификации оскорбительных выражений в социальных сетях (OffensEval). Эта задача основывалась на новом наборе данных - наборе данных для идентификации оскорбительного языка (OLID), который содержит более 14 000 твитов на английском языке и включает три подзадачи. В подзадаче А системам было предложено проводить различие между наступательными и ненаступательными постами. В подзадаче B системы должны были определить тип оскорбительного контента в сообщении. Наконец, в подзадаче С системы должны были обнаруживать цель наступательных постов. OffensEval привлек большое количество участников и это была одна из самых популярных задач в SemEval-2019. Всего на участие в задании записалось около 800 команд и 115 из них представили результаты, которые представлены и проанализированы в данном отчете.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair na torthaí agus príomhthorthaí Tasc 6 SemEval-2019 maidir le Teanga Ionsaitheach a Aithint agus a Chatagóiriú sna Meáin Shóisialta (OffensEval). Bhí an tasc bunaithe ar thacar sonraí nua, an Tacar Sonraí Aitheantais Teanga Ionsaitheach (OLID), ina bhfuil breis agus 14,000 tvuít Béarla, agus bhí trí fhothasc i gceist leis. I bhfothasc A, iarradh ar chórais idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir poist ionsaitheacha agus neamh-ionsaitheacha. I bhfothasc B, bhí ar chórais an cineál ábhair maslach sa phostáil a shainaithint. Ar deireadh, i bhfothasc C, bhí ar chórais sprioc na bpost ionsaitheach a bhrath. Mheall OffensEval líon mór rannpháirtithe agus bhí sé ar cheann de na tascanna ba choitianta in SemEval-2019. San iomlán, chláraigh beagnach 800 foireann le páirt a ghlacadh sa tasc agus chuir 115 acu torthaí isteach, a chuirtear i láthair agus a ndéantar anailís orthu sa tuarascáil seo.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε τα αποτελέσματα και τα κύρια ευρήματα της εργασίας 6 για τον εντοπισμό και την κατηγοριοποίηση της προσβλητικής γλώσσας στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Η εργασία βασίστηκε σε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων, το σύνολο δεδομένων αναγνώρισης προσβλητικής γλώσσας (OLID), το οποίο περιέχει πάνω από 14.000 αγγλικά tweets, και περιελάμβανε τρεις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες. Στο δευτερεύον έργο Α, ζητήθηκε από τα συστήματα να κάνουν διάκριση μεταξύ επιθετικών και μη επιθετικών θέσεων. Στο δευτερεύον έργο Β, τα συστήματα έπρεπε να προσδιορίσουν τον τύπο του προσβλητικού περιεχομένου στη δημοσίευση. Τέλος, στην υποεργασία Γ, τα συστήματα έπρεπε να εντοπίσουν τον στόχο των επιθετικών θέσεων. Το προσέλκυσε μεγάλο αριθμό συμμετεχόντων και ήταν ένα από τα πιο δημοφιλή καθήκοντα στο SemEval-2019. Συνολικά, σχεδόν 800 ομάδες υπογράφηκαν για να συμμετάσχουν στο έργο και 115 από αυτές υπέβαλαν αποτελέσματα, τα οποία παρουσιάζονται και αναλύονται στην παρούσα έκθεση.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a SemEval-2019 Feladat 6. feladatának eredményeit és főbb eredményeit a támadó nyelv azonosításáról és kategorizálásáról a közösségi médiában (OffensEval). A feladat egy új adatkészleten, az Offensive Language Identification Dataset (OLID) alapult, amely több mint 14 000 angol tweetet tartalmaz, és három alfeladatot tartalmaz. Az A. alcsoportban a rendszereket arra kérték, hogy különbséget tegyenek a sértő és a nem sértő állások között. A B. alcsoportban a rendszereknek azonosítaniuk kellett a posztban található sértő tartalom típusát. Végezetül, a C. alcsoportban a rendszereknek észlelniük kellett a támadó állomások célpontját. Az OffensEval nagyszámú résztvevőt vonzott, és ez volt az egyik legnépszerűbb feladat a SemEval-2019-ben. Összesen közel 800 csapat jelentkezett be a feladatban való részvételre, közülük 115 nyújtott be eredményeket, amelyeket ebben a jelentésben bemutatunk és elemezünk.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ სამუშაო-2019 სამუშაო დავალების 6-ის პროცემების გამოყენება და კატეგორიზაცია სამუშაო მედიაში (OffensEval). პარამეტრი ახალი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის ინდენტიფიკაციის მონაცემების (OLID) დაბაზია, რომელიც 14 000-ზე მეტი ანგლისური tweets იყო და სამი სამუშაო მონაცემები იყო. A-ში სისტემები მოთხოვრებულია, რომ დისკრიმინაცია განაცენებული და არაფერიგური პოსტის შორის. B-ში სისტემები უნდა იდენტიფიკუროთ საფუნქციო შემდგომარების ტიპი. საბოლოოდ, სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო C-ში, სისტემი უნდა განვიხილოთ სამუშაო სამუშაო პოსტის მისამართი. OffensEval გადატანა დიდი რაოდენობა მოთავსწავლებელი და ეს იყო ერთი საუკეთესი პოლიპური დავალების SemEval-2019-ში. ყველაფერად 800 ჯგუფი დაწყენებულია, რომ დაიწყენოთ საქაღალდეში, და 115 იყო შედეგი, რომლებიც ამ შეტყობინებაში იყოს და ანალიზებულია.', 'kk': 'Біз жалпы нәтижелерді және негізгі тапсырма 6- жылы Америкалық медиақтардың (OffensEval) бағдарламасының анықтау және санаттарының негізгі тапсырмаларын көрсетедік. Тапсырма жаңа деректер жиынына негізделген, Тілдерді идентификациялау деректер жиынына (OLID) бағдарламасы. Бұл 14 000 ағылшын tweets арқылы, ол үш ішкі тапсырмаларды көрсетеді. A-ның ішкі тапсырмасында жүйелерді қарсылық және қарсылық емес орындар арасында бөліктеу сұралды. B ішкі тапсырмасында жүйелер поштаның қандай қандай қандай мазмұнын анықтау керек. Соңында, C ішкі тапсырманың жүйелерінде қарсы жолдарды анықтау керек. OffensEval қатысушылардың көп санын қатысушылардың бірі болды және бұл semiEval-2019 жылы ең жақсы тапсырмалардың бірі болды. Жалпы 800 топ тапсырмаға қатынау үшін қолтаңбаланған және 115 топ тапсырмаға қатынау үшін тапсырманың нәтижесін тапсырмалады, олар осы хабарламада көрсетіледі және анализ', 'it': "Presentiamo i risultati e i principali risultati di SemEval-2019 Task 6 sull'identificazione e categorizzazione del linguaggio offensivo nei social media (OffensEval). Il compito si basava su un nuovo set di dati, l'Offensive Language Identification Dataset (OLID), che contiene oltre 14.000 tweet in inglese, e presentava tre sottoattività. Nel sottocompito A, ai sistemi è stato chiesto di discriminare tra posti offensivi e non offensivi. Nel sottocompito B, i sistemi dovevano identificare il tipo di contenuto offensivo nel post. Infine, nel sottocompito C, i sistemi dovevano rilevare l'obiettivo dei posti offensivi. OffensEval ha attirato un gran numero di partecipanti ed è stato uno dei compiti più popolari in SemEval-2019. In totale, quasi 800 team si sono iscritti per partecipare al compito e 115 di loro hanno presentato i risultati, che sono presentati e analizzati in questo rapporto.", 'lt': 'Pateikiame rezultatus ir pagrindinius rezultatus, gautus pagal 6 užduotį „SemEval-2019“ dėl žalingos kalbos nustatymo ir klasifikavimo socialinėje žiniasklaidoje (OffensEval). Ši užduotis buvo grindžiama nauju duomenų rinkiniu, Offensive Language Identification Datasetu (OLID), kuriame yra daugiau kaip 14 000 anglų tweetų ir kuriame buvo trys uždaviniai. A poskirsnyje sistemų buvo paprašyta diskriminuoti pažeidžiančias ir ne pažeidžiančias pareigas. B poskirsnyje sistemos turėjo nustatyti pažeidžiamo turinio pobūdį. Galiausiai C poskyryje sistemos turėjo nustatyti užpuolimo vietų tikslą. OffensEval pritraukė daug dalyvių ir tai buvo viena populiariausių užduočių SemEval-2019 m. Iš viso šioje ataskaitoje pateikiami ir analizuojami rezultatai buvo pasirašyti beveik 800 komandų, iš kurių 115 pateikė rezultatus.', 'mk': 'Ги претставуваме резултатите и главните заклучоци на SemEval-2019 задачата 6 за идентификување и категоризирање на навредливиот јазик во социјалните медиуми (OffensEval). Оваа задача беше базирана на нов набор податоци, наборот на податоци за идентификација на навреден јазик (OLID), кој содржи повеќе од 14.000 англиски твитови, и во неа беа прикажани три подзадачи. Во подзадачата А, системите беа побарани да дискриминираат меѓу офанзивните и неофанзивните места. Во подзадачата Б, системите мораа да го идентификуваат типот на навредна содржина во постот. Конечно, во подзадачата Ц, системите мораа да ја детектираат целта на нападните места. OffensEval привлече голем број учесници и беше една од најпопуларните задачи во SemEval-2019 година. Вкупно, скоро 800 тимови се пријавија за учество во задачата и 115 од нив поднесоа резултати, кои се претставени и анализирани во овој извештај.', 'ml': 'സോഷ്യല്\u200d മെഡിയയില്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുകയും വ്യവസാനിപ്പിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ ഫലങ്ങളും പ്രധാനഫലങ്ങളും സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2019 ടാസ്ക് 6 ന ഈ ജോലി ഒരു പുതിയ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിനെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിരുന്നു. അതില്\u200d 14,000 കൂടുതല്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടീറ്റുകളുണ്ട്. അതിന്റെ മൂന്നു ഉപാധികള്\u200d ക സബ് ജോലിയില്\u200d ആക്രമിക്കുന്ന പോസ്റ്റുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കാന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റമുണ്ടായിരുന്നു. Sub-task B-ല്\u200d, പോസ്റ്റില്\u200d എത്ര ആക്രമിക്കുന്ന ഉള്ളടക്കം തിരിച്ചറിയേണ്ടതുണ്ടായിരുന്നു. അവസാനം, സബ് ജോലി സിയില്\u200d, ആക്രമിക്കുന്ന പോസ്റ്റുകളുടെ ലക്ഷ്യം കണ്ടെത്തണം. ഓഫെന്\u200dസ് എവാല്\u200d ഒരുപാട് പങ്കാളികളെ ആകര്\u200dഷിച്ചു. അത് സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019-ലെ ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലികളില്\u200d ഒന്നായി മൊത്തം 800 ടീമുകള്\u200d ജോലിയില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d ഒപ്പിട്ടിരുന്നു. അവയില്\u200d 115 ടീമുകള്\u200d സമ്മതിച്ചു. ഈ റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടില്\u200d കൊട', 'ms': 'We present the results and the main findings of SemEval-2019 Task 6 on Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval).  Tugas ini berdasarkan set data baru, Set Data Identifikasi Bahasa Offensif (OLID), yang mengandungi lebih dari 14,000 tweet Inggeris, dan ia mengandungi tiga sub-tugas. Dalam sub-tugas A, sistem diminta untuk mendiskriminasi antara pos yang menyerang dan tidak menyerang. Dalam sub-tugas B, sistem perlu mengenalpasti jenis kandungan serangan di pos. Akhirnya, dalam sub-tugas C, sistem perlu mengesan sasaran pos serangan. OffensEval menarik sejumlah besar peserta dan ia adalah salah satu tugas paling populer di SemEval-2019. Jumlahnya, hampir 800 pasukan mendaftar untuk berpartisipasi dalam tugas dan 115 daripada mereka menghantar keputusan, yang dipaparkan dan dianalisis dalam laporan ini.', 'mn': 'Бид нийгмийн мэдээллийн (OffensEval) хэлний талаар SemEval-2019-ийн 6 даалгаварын үр дүнг болон гол ололтуудыг тайлбарлаж байна. Үүний ажил нь шинэ өгөгдлийн сангийн үндсэн, оффенсив хэлний идентификацийн өгөгдлийн санг (OLID), 14,000 гаруй Англи хэлний tweets байдаг бөгөөд энэ нь гурван суб-даалгавартай байдаг. A-ын суб-даалгавраар системүүд хүчирхийллэг, буруутгагүй байдлын хоорондоо ялгаа холбогдохыг хүсч байсан. Б-ийн суб-задалгаанд системүүд тайлбарлах хэрэгтэй байсан. Эцэст нь, С-ийн суб-даалгавар дээр, системүүд хоригдлын зорилго олж мэдэх шаардлагатай байсан. OffensEval олон оролцогчдыг татаж, 2019 оны SemEval-ын хамгийн алдартай ажил байсан. Нийт 800 баг ажил дээр оролцохын тулд оролцож байлаа. 115 нь үр дүнг өгсөн. Энэ мэдээллээр үзүүлж, анализ өгсөн.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer resultatene og hovudfinningane av halvEval-2019 oppgåve 6 om identifisering og kategorisering av offensive språk i sosiale medier (OffensEval). Oppgåva vart basert på ein ny dataset, den Offensive Language Identification Dataset (OLID), som inneheld over 14 000 engelsk tweets, og det oppgjeve tre underoppgåver. I underoppgåve A ble systemet bedt om å diskriminere mellom offensiv og ikkje-offensiv postar. I underoppgåva B må systemet identifisera typen offensivinnhaldet i post. I underoppgåva C må systemet finna målet til offensive postar. OffensEval attracted a large number of participants and it was one of the most popular tasks in SemEval-2019. I alt er nesten 800 grupper signert til å delta i oppgåva og 115 av dei sendte resultata, som vert presentert og analysert i denne rapporten.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy wyniki i główne wnioski SemEval-2019 Task 6 na temat identyfikacji i kategorizacji języka ofensywnego w mediach społecznościowych (OffensEval). Zadanie zostało oparte na nowym zbiorze danych, Offensive Language Identification Dataset (OLID), który zawiera ponad 14.000 angielskich tweetów i obejmował trzy podzadania. W podzadaniu A systemy zostały poproszone o rozróżnienie postów ofensywnych i nieofensywnych. W podzadaniu B systemy musiały zidentyfikować rodzaj treści obraźliwych w postie. Wreszcie w podzadaniu C systemy musiały wykryć cel stanowisk ofensywnych. OffensEval przyciągnął dużą liczbę uczestników i był to jedno z najpopularniejszych zadań w SemEval-2019. Ogólnie rzecz biorąc, do udziału w zadaniu zgłosiły się blisko 800 zespoły, a 115 z nich przesłały wyniki, które zostały przedstawione i analizowane w niniejszym raporcie.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm rezultatele și principalele constatări ale Task 6 SemEval-2019 privind identificarea și clasificarea limbajului ofensiv în rețelele sociale (OffensEval). Activitatea s-a bazat pe un nou set de date, Ofensive Language Identification Dataset (OLID), care conține peste 14.000 de tweet-uri în limba engleză și a cuprins trei subsarcini. În subsarcina A, sistemelor li s-a cerut să discrimineze între posturile ofensive și cele non-ofensive. În subsarcina B, sistemele au trebuit să identifice tipul de conținut ofensator din post. În cele din urmă, în subsarcina C, sistemele au trebuit să detecteze ținta posturilor ofensive. OffensEval a atras un număr mare de participanți și a fost una dintre cele mai populare sarcini în SemEval-2019. În total, aproape 800 de echipe s-au înscris pentru a participa la sarcină și 115 dintre ele au prezentat rezultate, care sunt prezentate și analizate în acest raport.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo rezultate i glavne nalaze zadatka 6 za semiEval-2019 o identifikaciji i kategorizaciji službenog jezika u socijalnim medijima (OffensEval). Taj zadatak je bio temeljen na novoj seti podataka, podataka za identifikaciju jezika Offensive (OLID), koja sadrži preko 14.000 engleskih tweets, i ima tri podzadataka. U podzadatku A, sistemi su traženi da diskrimiraju između ofanzivnih i neofanzivnih postova. U podzadatku B, sistemi su morali da identifikuju vrstu ofanzivnog sadržaja u postaji. Konačno, u podzadatku C, sistemi su morali otkriti cilj napadajućih postova. OffensEval je privukao veliki broj sudionika i bio je jedan od najpopularnijih zadataka u semiEvalu-2019. Ukupno, skoro 800 timova potpisalo je da bi sudjelovalo u zadatku i 115 od njih predali rezultate, koje su predstavljene i analizirane u ovom izveštaju.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සහ සාමාජික භාෂාව (Offenseval) තියෙන ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණය 6 වැඩේ ප්\u200dරධාන සොයාගත ක මේ වැඩේ අළුත් දත්ත සැටියක් අධාරණය කරලා තියෙනවා, අධාරණ භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණ දත්ත සැටිය (OLID), ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ට්විට් 14,000 වඩා  A සබ් වැඩේ පද්ධතිය අහලා තියෙන්නේ පද්ධතිය අපරාධකාරය සහ අපරාධකාරය නැති පොස්ටල් අතර වෙනස් කරන්න B සබ-වැඩේ පද්ධතියේ පද්ධතියේ පොස්ට් වලින් අපරාධක සාමාන්\u200dය වර්ගයක් තියෙන්න ඕනි. අන්තිමේදි, සබ් වැඩක් C වල, පද්ධතිය පද්ධතියේ අපරාධකාරණ පොස්ටල් ලක්ෂණය හොයාගන්න ඕනි. OffensEvel ගොඩක් අංකයෙක් අල්ලගෙන හිටියා, ඒක සෙම්වල්-2019 වල ඉන්න ප්\u200dරමාණික වැඩක් එකක්. සම්පූර්ණයෙන්, කණ්ඩායම් 800 ක් හම්බවුණා වැඩේ සම්පූර්ණය කරන්න, ඒ වගේම එයාලගේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa resultiyada iyo dhamaadka ugu horeeya ee shaqada SemEval-2019 6 ee ku saabsan aqoonsiga iyo categoriza luqada sooshalka (OffensEval). Shaqada waxaa lagu saleyn jiray sawir cusub oo macluumaadka aqoonsiga luqada (OLID), kaas oo ku qoran wax ka badan 14,000 oo af Ingiriis ah, waxaana ku qoran saddex shaqo oo hoos loo dhigay. Xeerka A waxaa lagu dalbaday in lagu takooro nidaamka oo u dhexeeya boostada cadaawayaasha iyo kuwa aan xadgudubnayn. Sub-shaqada B waxaa habboon in nidaamka ay ku aqoonsadaan nooca waxyaabaha xadgudubka ah. Finally, in sub-task C, systems had to detect the target of the offensive posts.  OffensEval wuxuu soo waday dadka badan, wuxuuna ahaa mid ka mid ah shaqada ugu maaruf ee SemEval-2019. Dhammaan waxaa loo saxeeyey in dhowr 800 koox oo ay ka qeybqaadaan shaqada, 115 koox ka mid ahna waxay soo dhiibeen resultooyin, kuwaas oo lagu soo bandhigay oo lagu sawiray warqadan.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar resultaten och de viktigaste resultaten av SemEval-2019 Task 6 om identifiering och kategorisering av offensivt språk i sociala medier (OffensEval). Uppgiften baserades på en ny datauppsättning, Offensive Language Identification Dataset (OLID), som innehåller över 14 000 engelska tweets, och den innehöll tre underuppgifter. I underuppgift A uppmanades system att diskriminera mellan offensiva och icke-offensiva poster. I underuppgift B måste systemen identifiera typen av stötande innehåll i inlägget. Slutligen, i underuppgift C, system var tvungna att upptäcka målet för de offensiva posterna. OffensEval lockade ett stort antal deltagare och det var en av de mest populära uppgifterna i SemEval-2019. Totalt anmälde sig nästan 800 team för att delta i uppgiften och 115 av dem lämnade in resultat som presenteras och analyseras i denna rapport.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw ir-riżultati u s-sejbiet ewlenin tas-SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6 dwar l-Identifikazzjoni u l-Kategorizzazzjoni tal-Lingwa Offensiva fil-Midja Soċjali (OffensEval). Il-kompitu kien ibbażat fuq sett ta’ dejta ġdid, id-Dataset ta’ Identifikazzjoni tal-Lingwa Offensiva (OLID), li fih aktar minn 14,000 tweet Ingliż, u kellu tliet sottokompiti. In sub-task A, systems were asked to discriminate between offensive and non-offensive posts.  Fis-sottokompitu B, is-sistemi kellhom jidentifikaw it-tip ta’ kontenut offensiv fil-post. Fl-aħħar nett, fis-sottokompitu C, is-sistemi kellhom jidentifikaw il-mira tal-postijiet offensivi. OffensEval ġibdet għadd kbir ta’ parteċipanti u kien wieħed mill-kompiti l-aktar popolari f’SemEval-2019. B’kollox, kważi 800 tim iffirmaw biex jipparteċipaw fil-kompitu u 115 minnhom ippreżentaw riżultati, li huma ppreżentati u analizzati f’dan ir-rapport.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் செம்Eval-2019 செயல் 6 முக்கிய கண்டுபிடிப்புகளையும் காண்பிக்கிறோம் சமூக ஊடகங்களில் தொடர்பு மொழி( OffensEval) அடையாளம் மற்றும இந்த செயல் புதிய தரவுத்தளத்தின் அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது, அதில் 14,000 க்கு மேற்பட்ட ஆங்கிலத்திற்கு மேல் இருக்கும் மூன்று துணை பணிகளை குறிக துணை செயல் A-ல், முறைமைகள் கேட்கப்பட்டுள்ளார்கள் செயல்படுத்தல் மற்றும் மீறுதல் அல்லாத போதுகளுக்கிடையே வ துணை செயல் B இல், முறைமைகள் போதையில் எத்தனை மீண்டும் உள்ளடக்கங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும். இறுதியாக, துணை செயல் C-ல், முறைமைகள் குறிக்கும் அஞ்சல்களின் இலக்கை கண்டறிய வேண்டும். OffensEval attracted a large number of participants and it was one of the most popular tasks in SemEval-2019.  மொத்தமாக, கிட்டத்தட்ட 800 குழுக்கள் பணியில் பங்கிடுவதற்காக கையெழுத்திடப்பட்டுள்ளன மற்றும் 115 குழுக்கள் வழங்கப்பட்ட மு', 'ur': 'ہم نے نتیجے اور اولین نتیجے سوسیل میڈیا میں (OffensEval) سیم Eval-2019 ٹاکس ۶ کی پیدا کی ہیں۔ اس کام نے ایک نوی ڈاٹ سٹ پر بنیاد رکھا تھا، اوفنسیو زبان شناسایی ڈاٹَسِٹ (OLID) جس میں 14,000 سے زیادہ انگلیسی ٹویٹ ہیں، اور اس نے تین سوب-ٹاکس کو شامل کیا تھا. A کے زیر کاروبار میں، سیستموں سے کہا گیا تھا کہ فساد کے اور غیر فساد کے پوسٹوں کے درمیان جدائی کریں. ساب-ٹاکس ب میں، سیستموں کو پوسٹ میں فساد منصفات کی طرح پہچان لینے کی ضرورت تھی. آخر میں، سوب-ٹاکس میں، سیسٹم کے لئے فاسق پوسٹوں کا موقع پہچان لینے کی ضرورت تھی. OffensEval نے بہت سے مشرکین کو اٹھا لیا اور یہ سب سے زیادہ مشرکین کاموں میں سے تھا۔ اکثر، تقریباً 800 ٹیموں نے کام میں شرکت کرنے کے لئے ثبت کی اور ان میں 115 نتائج پیش کیے، جو اس راپورت میں پیش کیے جاتے ہیں اور تحقیق کیے جاتے ہیں.', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi trình bày kết quả và kết quả chính của Nhiệm vụ Semkhai thác và phân loại Ngôn ngữ Hành động trên phương tiện xã hội (OffensEvl). Nhiệm vụ được dựa trên một tập tin mới, Bộ dữ liệu nhận diện Ngôn ngữ Hành động (OLD) chứa hơn 414,000 English tweet, và nó có ba nhiệm vụ phụ. Trong giai đoạn A, hệ thống được yêu cầu phân biệt giữa những vị trí tấn công và không tấn công. Trong giai đoạn B, hệ thống phải xác định dạng nội dung tấn công trong bài báo. Cuối cùng, trong nhiệm vụ C, hệ thống đã phát hiện mục tiêu của các trạm tấn công. OffensEvl thu hút nhiều người tham gia và đó là một trong những nhiệm vụ phổ biến nhất ở SemEvl-209. Tóm lại, gần 800 nhóm tham gia tham gia phi vụ này và 115 đã cung cấp kết quả được đệ trình và phân tích trong bản báo cáo này.', 'uz': "Biz jamiyat media (OffensEval) soʻzi tilni aniqlash va kattalashtirish uchun SemEval-2019 Vazifaning 6 asosiy natijalarini koʻrsatimiz. Bu vazifa 14 000 dan ortiq ingliz Twitter (OLID) maʼlumot bazasi yaratilgan yangi maʼlumot sahifasi asosida yaratilgan va bu uchta tub vazifalar bilan ishlatiladi. Ushbu vazifa A'da, tizimlarni offensiv va hech qanday harakat vazifalar orasidan ajratish talab qilindi. Ushbu vazifa B bilan tizimning turini aniqlash kerak edi. Oxirgi, C sub-vazifani, tizim offensive postlarining maqsadini aniqlash kerak. Eval ko'pchilik participlarni ko'p ishlatadi va u SemEval-2019-yildan eng mashhur vazifalarning biri edi. Umumiy bo'lgan 800 guruhi vazifani qidirish uchun imzolangan va ularning 115 natijalari joʻnatilgan va bu 报告da aniqlangan natijalari.", 'bg': 'Представяме резултатите и основните констатации на задача 6 за идентифициране и категоризиране на офанзивен език в социалните медии (ОфънсЕвал). Задачата се основава на нов набор от данни, който съдържа над 14 000 английски туитове и включва три подзадачи. В подзадача А системите бяха помолени да дискриминират между офанзивни и неофанзивни постове. В подзадача Б системите трябваше да идентифицират типа обидно съдържание в публикацията. И накрая, в подзадача С, системите трябваше да засекат целта на офанзивните постове. ОфенсЕвал привлече голям брой участници и беше една от най-популярните задачи в СемЕвал-2019. Общо близо 800 екипа се записаха да участват в задачата, като 115 от тях представиха резултати, които са представени и анализирани в този доклад.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo rezultate i glavne nalaze zadatka 6 za pola ispitivanja 2019. godine o identifikaciji i kategorizaciji neposlušnog jezika u socijalnim medijima (OffensEval). Taj zadatak je bio temeljen na novoj seti podataka, podataka za identifikaciju jezika Offensive (OLID), koja sadrži preko 14.000 engleskih tweets, i uključila je tri podzadataka. U podzadatku A, sustavi su tražili diskriminaciju između napadajućih i ne-napadajućih postova. U podzadatku B, sustavi su morali identificirati vrstu ofanzivnog sadržaja u postaji. Konačno, u podzadatku C, sustavi su morali otkriti cilj napadajućih mjesta. OffensEval je privukao veliki broj učesnika i bio je jedan od najpopularnijih zadataka u semiEvalu-2019. Ukupno, skoro 800 timova potpisalo je da bi sudjelovalo u zadatku i 115 od njih predali rezultate, koje su predstavljene i analizirane u ovom izvješću.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer resultaterne og de vigtigste resultater af SemEval-2019 Task 6 om identificering og kategorisering af offensivt sprog i sociale medier (OffensEval). Opgaven var baseret på et nyt datasæt, Offensive Language Identification Dataset (OLID), som indeholder over 14.000 engelske tweets, og det indeholdt tre underopgaver. I underopgave A blev systemer bedt om at skelne mellem offensive og ikke-offensive poster. I underopgave B skulle systemerne identificere typen af krænkende indhold i indlægget. Endelig, i underopgave C, systemer var nødt til at opdage målet for de offensive poster. OffensEval tiltrak et stort antal deltagere, og det var en af de mest populære opgaver i SemEval-2019. I alt tilmeldte sig næsten 800 teams til at deltage i opgaven, og 115 af dem indsendte resultater, som præsenteres og analyseres i denne rapport.', 'nl': 'We presenteren de resultaten en de belangrijkste bevindingen van SemEval-2019 Taak 6 over het identificeren en categoriseren van offensieve taal in sociale media (OffensEval). De taak was gebaseerd op een nieuwe dataset, de Offensive Language Identification Dataset (OLID), die meer dan 14.000 Engelse tweets bevat, en het bevatte drie subtaken. In deeltaak A werden systemen gevraagd onderscheid te maken tussen aanstootgevende en niet-aanstootgevende posten. In subtaak B moesten systemen het type aanstootgevende inhoud in de post identificeren. Ten slotte moesten systemen in subtaak C het doel van de offensieve posten detecteren. OffensEval trok een groot aantal deelnemers aan en het was een van de meest populaire taken in SemEval-2019. In totaal hebben bijna 800 teams zich aangemeld om deel te nemen aan de taak en 115 van hen heeft resultaten ingediend, die worden gepresenteerd en geanalyseerd in dit rapport.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren die Ergebnisse und die wichtigsten Ergebnisse der SemEval-2019 Task 6 zur Identifizierung und Kategorisierung offensiver Sprache in Social Media (OffensEval). Die Aufgabe basierte auf einem neuen Datensatz, dem Offensive Language Identification Dataset (OLID), der über 14.000 englische Tweets enthält und drei Teilaufgaben enthielt. In Teilaufgabe A wurden Systeme aufgefordert, zwischen offensiven und nicht offensiven Posten zu unterscheiden. In Teilaufgabe B mussten die Systeme die Art des anstößigen Inhalts im Beitrag identifizieren. Schließlich mussten die Systeme in Teilaufgabe C das Ziel der offensiven Posten erkennen. OffensEval zog eine große Anzahl von Teilnehmern an und es war eine der beliebtesten Aufgaben in SemEval-2019. Insgesamt haben sich fast 800 Teams zur Teilnahme an der Aufgabe angemeldet und 115 von ihnen Ergebnisse eingereicht, die in diesem Bericht vorgestellt und analysiert werden.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan hasil dan penemuan utama dari SemEval-2019 Tugas 6 mengenai Identifikasi dan Kategorisasi Bahasa Meninggal dalam Media Sosial (OffensEval). Tugas ini berdasarkan dataset baru, dataset Identifikasi Bahasa Offensive (OLID), yang mengandung lebih dari 14.000 tweet Inggris, dan memiliki tiga sub-tugas. Dalam sub-tugas A, sistem diminta untuk diskriminasi antara posisi offensive dan non-offensive. Dalam sub-tugas B, sistem harus mengidentifikasi jenis konten serangan di pos. Akhirnya, dalam sub-tugas C, sistem harus mendeteksi sasaran dari pos serangan. OffensEval menarik banyak peserta dan itu salah satu tugas paling populer di SemEval-2019. Dalam jumlah, hampir 800 tim mendaftar untuk berpartisipasi dalam tugas dan 115 dari mereka mengirim hasil, yang ditetapkan dan dianalisis dalam laporan ini.', 'ko': '우리는 SemEval-2019 미션 6가 소셜미디어에서 공격적인 언어(Offenseval)를 식별하고 분류하는 결과와 주요 발견에 대해 보여 주었다.이 작업은 세 개의 하위 임무가 있는 공격적 언어 인식 데이터 세트(OLID)를 기반으로 한 새로운 데이터 세트를 기반으로 한다.하위 임무 A에서는 공격적인 직책과 비공격적인 직책을 체계적으로 구분하도록 요구한다.서브퀘스트 B에서 시스템은 게시물의 공격적인 내용의 유형을 식별해야 한다.마지막으로 서브퀘스트 C에서 시스템은 반드시 공격 초소의 목표를 검측해야 한다.Offenseval은 많은 참여자를 끌어들여SemEval-2019에서 가장 인기 있는 임무 중 하나이다.모두 800개 팀이 이 임무에 참가 신청을 했는데 그 중에서 115개 팀이 결과를 제출했고 본 보고서는 이 결과를 소개하고 분석했다.', 'fa': 'ما نتیجه\u200cها و نتیجه\u200cهای اصلی عملیات ششم سال ۲۰۱۹ را در مورد شناسایی و برگزیدن زبان نیرومند در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی (OffensEval) نشان می\u200cدهیم. این وظیفه بر اساس مجموعه داده\u200cهای جدید، DataIdentification Language Offensive (OLID) است که بیش از ۱۴٫۰۰۰ tweets انگلیسی را دارد و سه تابع زیر کار را مشخص می\u200cکند. در زیر وظیفه A، سیستم\u200cها خواسته شده بود که بین وضعیت\u200cهای تجاوز و غیر تجاوز جدا شوند. در زیر کاری B، سیستم\u200cها باید نوع محتوای تجاوز را در پست شناسایی کنند. بالاخره، در زیر کار C، سیستم\u200cها باید هدف\u200cهای نقطه\u200cهای تجاوز را تشخیص دهند. OffensEval تعداد زیادی از شرکتگران را جذب کرد و یکی از مهمترین وظیفه\u200cهای مربوط به SemEval-2019 بود. در جمله، تقریباً 800 تیم برای شرکت در کار امضا شده و 115 از آنها نتایج ارائه داده شده، که در این گزارش ارائه داده شده و تحلیل شده است.', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha matokeo na matokeo makuu ya kazi 6 ya SemEval-2019 kuhusu kutambua na Kuweka Lugha Huru katika Vyombo vya habari vya kijamii (OffensEval). The task was based on a new dataset, the Offensive Language Identification Dataset (OLID), which contains over 14,000 English tweets, and it featured three sub-tasks.  Katika jukumu la A, mfumo uliuliulizwa kutofautisha kati ya makala zenye mashambulizi na zisizo na makosa. Katika kazi za subira B, mifumo ilipaswa kutambua aina ya maudhui yanayodhalilisha katika makala hiyo. Mwisho, katika juhudi la subira C, mifumo ilibidi kutambua lengo la makala za mashambulizi. OffensEval aliwavutia washiriki wengi na ilikuwa ni moja ya kazi maarufu zaidi katika SemEval-2019. Kwa ujumla, takriban timu 800 walisaini kushiriki kazi hiyo na 115 kati yao waliwasilisha matokeo, ambayo yanawasilishwa na kuchambuliwa katika ripoti hii.', 'tr': "Biz netijeleri we SemEval-2019 Taýgyzyň 6-nji Taýgyzyny Soýdaly Medýäniýasynda (OffensEval) identifikaýan we Kategoriýasynda esasy tapylýarys. Bu buýruk täze bir veri setirine daýanýar, Offensive Dil Kimligi Maglumaty (OLID), 14,000 iňlisçe tweets bolan we üç alt-zady bardy. A sub-task sistemalarda suçlu we suçlu bolmadyk ýerler arasynda aýratmagy sorady. B sub-task sistemlerinde sahypa daşykly maksadyny belli etmeli bolupdyr. Soňunda, sub-task C'de sistemlerde juwasy postlaryň maksadyny tapmaly boldy. OffensEval birnäçe chikançylary çekdi we SemEval-2019-njy iň meşhur zadynyň biri. Toplam 800 topar işe goşulmak üçin baglaşdy we 115 topar çykyş etdi. Bu raporda çykylýar we çözülýär.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim rezultatet dhe gjetjet kryesore të SemEval-2019 Task 6 on Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval). Detyra u bazua në një grup të ri të të dhënash, baza e të dhënave për identifikimin e gjuhës ofensive (OLID), e cila përmban mbi 14,000 tweets angleze dhe përfshinte tre nëndetyra. Në nëndetyrën A, sistemet u kërkuan të diskriminojnë midis vendeve ofensive dhe vendeve jo ofensive. Në nëndetyrën B, sistemet duhej të identifikonin llojin e përmbajtjes ofensive në post. Më në fund, në nëndetyrën C, sistemet duhej të zbulonin objektivin e vendeve ofensive. OffensEval tërhoqi një numër të madh pjesëmarrëssh dhe ishte një nga detyrat më popullore në SemEval-2019. Në total, gati 800 ekipe u nënshkruan për të marrë pjesë në detyrë dhe 115 prej tyre paraqitën rezultate që paraqiten dhe analizohen në këtë raport.', 'af': "Ons stel die resultate en die hoofgevindings van SemEval-2019 Opdrag 6 op identifiseer en kategoriseer offensiewe taal in sosiale media (OffensEval). Die taak was gebaseer op 'n nuwe datastel, die Offensive Taal Identifikasie Dataset (OLID), wat oor 14,000 Engelske tweets bevat, en dit het drie sub-taak gedoen. In subtaak A is stelsels gevra om te diskrimineer tussen offensive en non-offensive posts. In subtaak B, het stelsels die tipe offensivele inhoud in die pos moet identifiseer. Eindelik, in Sub-Task C, het stelsels die doel van die offensive pos ontdek moet word. OffensEval het 'n groot aantal deelnaders aantrek en dit was een van die mees populêre opdragte in SemEval-2019. In totaal, byna 800 teams het ingeteken om in die taak te deel en 115 van hulle die resultate ingestuur, wat in hierdie raporteer voorsien en analyseer word.", 'am': 'በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ውስጥ የሥልጣን ቋንቋን ማግኘት እና መፍጠርን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ስራው 14,000 የበዛ ኢንጂልኛ ትዊተሮች የሚኖረው የአዲስ የቋንቋ ማidentification ዳታ ማዕከላዊ (OLID) የተገኘ አዲስ ዳታተር የተደረገ ነው፣ ሦስትም ደብዳቤዎችን የሚያስቀምጥ ነው፡፡ In sub-task A, systems were asked to discriminate between offensive and non-offensive posts.  በ አካባቢ ስራ B፣ የፖስቲካ ቋንቋ ውስጥ የሚያስጨንቀው የሆኑን መግለጫ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በመጨረሻውም የስራ ክፍል ሲካሄዱ የዓመፀኛ ድምጾችን ማግኘት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ Eval ብዙ ተጋሪዎችን አቀረበ በሴምEval-2019 ከታዋቂው ስራ አንዱ ነው፡፡ በሙሉ፣ በሥራው ለመጋቢት የ800 ተሟጋቾች ተቃውሞ ሰጥተዋል፡፡', 'hy': 'We present the results and the main findings of SemEval-2019 Task 6 on Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval).  Այս խնդիրը հիմնված էր նոր տվյալների համակարգի վրա, Օֆենսիվ լեզվի հայտնաբերման տվյալների համակարգի (ՕԼԻԴ), որը պարունակում է ավելի քան 14,000 անգլերեն թվիթեր, և այն պարունակում էր երեք ենթախնդիր: Ա-ի ենթախնդրի մեջ համակարգերը խնդրեցին խտրականություն անել գայթակղիչ և ոչ գայթակղիչ դիրքերի միջև: Բ ենթախնդրի մեջ համակարգերը ստիպված էին հայտնաբերել տեղադրության վրա գրավիչ պարունակության տեսակը: Վերջապես, C-ի ենթախնդրի մեջ համակարգերը ստիպված էին հայտնաբերել հարձակվող տեղամասների նպատակը: ՕֆենսԵվալը շատ մասնակիցներ գրավեց, և դա ամենահայտնի առաջադրանքներից մեկն էր ՍեմԵվալ-2019 թվականին: Ընդհանուր առմամբ, գրեթե 800 թիմ ներգրավվեցին այդ խնդրի մասնակցելու համար, և նրանցից 114-ը ներկայացրեցին արդյունքներ, որոնք ներկայացվում և վերլուծում են այս զեկույցում:', 'ca': "Presentam els resultats i els principals descobriments de SemEval-2019 Task 6 on Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval). La tasca es basava en un nou conjunt de dades, el conjunt de dades d'identificació ofensiva del llenguatge (OLID), que conté més de 14.000 tweets anglesos i que conté tres sub-tasques. En la subtasca A, els sistemes van demanar que discriminessin entre posts ofensius i no ofensius. En la subtasca B, els sistemes havien de identificar el tipus de contingut ofensiu al post. Finalment, en la subtasca C, els sistemes havien de detectar l'objectiu dels postos ofensius. OffensEval attracted a large number of participants and it was one of the most popular tasks in SemEval-2019.  En total, gairebé 800 equips es van inscriure a participar en la tasca i 115 d'ells van presentar resultats, que són presentats i analitzats en aquest informe.", 'az': 'Biz sonu√ßlarńĪ v…ô …ôsas findings of SemEval-2019 Task 6 on Identifying and Categorizing OffensEval in Social Media (OffensEval). Bu iŇüin yeni veril…ôn qutusuna dayanan, Offensive Dil Identification Dataset (OLID), 14.000 ńįngiliz…ô tweets i√ß…ôrisind…ô v…ô √ľ√ß sub-task ńĪ g√∂st…ôrildi. A sub-task sisteml…ôrind…ô h…ôddi aŇümaq v…ô h…ôddi aŇümaq m…ôlumatlarńĪ arasńĪnda ayrńĪlmaq ist…ôdil…ôr. B sub-task sisteml…ôrin m…ôlumatńĪnńĪn m…ôlumatńĪnńĪn n√∂v√ľn√ľ t…ôsdiql…ôm…ôsi lazńĪm idi. Sonunda, C-nin alt-iŇü sisteml…ôrind…ô h…ôddi-b√ľt√ľn m…ôlumatlarńĪn niŇüan…ôsini ke√ßm…ôsi lazńĪm idi. OffensEval bir √ßox iŇütirak√ßil…ôri t…ôl…ôb etdi v…ô bu semiEval-2019-d…ô …ôn popularlńĪ iŇü idi. Toplam olaraq, iŇü…ô katńĪlmaq √ľ√ß√ľn yaxńĪn 800 takńĪm imzaladńĪ v…ô 115 n…ôtic…ôl…ôri bu raporda g√∂st…ôrildi v…ô analiz edildi.', 'bn': 'আমরা সামাজিক মিডিয়ায় অফিসিভ ভ ভাষা পরিচিতি এবং শ্রেণীকরণের জন্য সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের প্রধান ফলাফল এবং প্রধান ফলাফল উপস্থাপন করছি। এই কাজটি একটি নতুন ডাটাসেটের ভিত্তিতে ভিত্তিক ছিল, অফেনসেভ ভ ভাষা পরিচয়ের তথ্য (ওলিডি), যার মধ্যে ১৪,০০০ ইংরেজি টুইট রয়েছে এবং তিনটি  সাব-কাজ A-এ, আক্রমণ এবং অআক্রমণের পোস্টের মধ্যে বৈষম্য করার জন্য ব্যবস্থাগুলোকে প্রশ্ন করা হয়েছে। সাব-কাজ বিতে পোস্টে কি ধরনের আক্রান্ত বিষয়বস্তুকে চিহ্নিত করতে হবে। শেষ পর্যন্ত, সাব-কাজ সি-এ, আক্রমণ পোস্টের লক্ষ্য খুঁজে বের করতে হবে। OffensEval attracted a large number of participants and it was one of the most popular tasks in SemEval-2019.  সম্প্রায় ৮০০ দল এই কাজে অংশগ্রহণের জন্য স্বাক্ষর করেছে এবং তাদের মধ্যে ১১৫টি ফলাফল প্রদান করেছে, যা এই রিপোর্টে উপস্থাপন করা হয়েছে এব', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo rezultate i glavne nalaze zadatka 6 za semiEval-2019 o identifikaciji i kategorizaciji neposlušnog jezika u socijalnim medijima (OffensEval). Taj zadatak je bio temeljen na novoj seti podataka, podataka za identifikaciju jezika Offensive (OLID), koja sadrži preko 14.000 engleskih tweets, i uključila je tri podzadataka. U podzadatku A, sistemi su traženi da se diskrimiraju između ofanzivnih i ne-ofanzivnih postova. U podzadatku B, sustavi su morali identificirati vrstu ofanzivnog sadržaja u postaji. Konačno, u podzadatku C, sistemi su morali otkriti cilj napadajućih mjesta. OffensEval je privukao veliki broj učesnika i bio je jedan od najpopularnijih zadataka u semiEvalu-2019. Ukupno, skoro 800 timova potpisalo je da bi učestvovali u zadatku i 115 od njih predali rezultate, koje su predstavljene i analizirane u ovom izvješću.', 'cs': 'Představujeme výsledky a hlavní poznatky SemEval-2019 Task 6 na identifikaci a kategorizaci útočného jazyka v sociálních médiích (OffensEval). Úloha byla založena na nové datové sadě, Offensive Language Identification Dataset (OLID), která obsahuje více než 14.000 anglických tweetů a obsahovala tři dílčí úlohy. V podúkolu A byly systémy požádány, aby rozlišovaly mezi urážlivými a neurážlivými příspěvky. V podúkolu B musely systémy identifikovat typ urážlivého obsahu v příspěvku. Konečně, v podúkolu C, systémy musely detekovat cíl útočných míst. OffensEval přilákal velký počet účastníků a byl to jeden z nejoblíbenějších úkolů SemEval-2019. Celkem se téměř 800 týmy přihlásily k účasti na úkolu a 115 z nich předložily výsledky, které jsou prezentovány a analyzovány v této zprávě.', 'et': 'Tutvustame SemEval-2019 ülesande 6 "Ründava keele tuvastamine ja kategoriseerimine sotsiaalmeedias" (OffensEval) tulemusi ja peamisi tulemusi. Ülesanne põhines uuel andmekogumil, ründava keele identifitseerimise andmekogumil (OLID), mis sisaldab üle 14 000 inglise säutsu, ja sellel oli kolm alamülesannet. Alaülesandes A paluti süsteemidel diskrimineerida ründavaid ja mitteründavaid postitusi. Alaülesandes B pidid süsteemid tuvastama postituse solvava sisu tüübi. Lõpuks, alamülesandes C pidid süsteemid tuvastama ründavate postide sihtmärgi. OffensEval meelitas ligi suure hulga osalejaid ja see oli üks populaarsemaid ülesandeid SemEval-2019. Kokku registreeris ülesandes osalema ligi 800 meeskonda ning 115 neist esitas tulemused, mida käesolevas aruandes esitatakse ja analüüsitakse.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme tulokset ja tärkeimmät löydökset SemEval-2019 Task 6 on Identifying and Categorizing Attensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval). Tehtävä perustui uuteen aineistoon, Offensive Language Identification Datasetiin (OLID), joka sisältää yli 14 000 englanninkielistä twiittiä, ja siihen sisältyi kolme alitehtävää. Osatehtävässä A järjestelmiä pyydettiin erottamaan hyökkäävät ja ei-hyökkäävät viestit. Osatehtävässä B järjestelmien täytyi tunnistaa viestissä olevan loukkaavan sisällön tyyppi. Lopuksi alitehtävässä C järjestelmien täytyi havaita hyökkäysasemien kohde. OffensEval houkutteli paljon osallistujia ja se oli yksi suosituimmista tehtävistä SemEval-2019. Tehtävään ilmoittautui yhteensä lähes 800 tiimiä, joista 115 antoi tuloksia, jotka esitellään ja analysoidaan tässä raportissa.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngewehke dadi lan mbukakipun nggawe barang semebal-2011 task 6 tentang kanggo ngilangno karo kategorise Inggal Ofensive Language ning soti Media (offensinval). task Nang apa-task A, sistem kang dipulangan nganggo cah-cah dumadhi iki apa ora ono cah-cah dumadhi S Sistem saiki, ditambah-task C, sisteme saiki ono bukane dadi cah nguasal mripat. offensinval ngewehke akeh akeh liyane sing sampeyan luwih dumadhi lan kanca wis mungkin cara sing populer sing gak nyeneng semiinval-2011. Tambah, narika 480 sing dumadhi nggawe ngupakano nggawe gerakan ing nggawe karo hal-hal, kawula-hal ujarane lan ujarane nggawe barang iki.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo rezultate in glavne ugotovitve naloge 6 SemEval-2019 o prepoznavanju in kategorizaciji ofenzivnega jezika v socialnih medijih (OffensEval). Opravilo je temeljilo na novem naboru podatkov, naboru podatkov o identifikaciji jezika ofenzivnega jezika (OLID), ki vsebuje več kot 14.000 angleških tweetov, in je vsebovalo tri podnaloge. V podnalogi A so morali sistemi razlikovati med napadalnimi in nežaljivimi objavami. V podnalogi B so morali sistemi identificirati vrsto žaljive vsebine v objavi. V podnalogi C so morali sistemi zaznati cilj napadalnih mest. OffensEval je privabil veliko število udeležencev in je bila ena najbolj priljubljenih nalog v SemEval-2019. V nalogo se je prijavilo skoraj 800 ekip, od njih jih je 115 predložilo rezultate, ki so predstavljeni in analizirani v tem poročilu.', 'ha': "Tune halatar da matsala da muhimman fassaran na SemEal-2019 na aikin 6 on Idonararing and Categorishing offisive language in society (offenseval). An ɗauki wannan aikin a kan wani tsari na Dane na Affida Lugha (OLID), wanda ke ƙunsa da wasu littattafai 14,000 na Ingiriya, kuma ya ƙayyade task õki uku. Kuma a cikin sub-aikin A, aka tambaye wasu na'ura da za'a rarrabe a tsakanin takarda da kuma bã masu ƙẽtare haddi ba. In sub-aikin B, ana buƙata tsarin ya gane nau'in tsarin da ke cikin bayani. Ga ƙarshe, a cikin sub-aikin C, ana buƙata in gane alama na maimaimain-abun. OffensEval attracted a large number of participants and it was one of the most popular tasks in SemEval-2019.  Gansa da jumla, taki 80,000 jama'a sun saini dõmin su yi shirin aikin wannan kuma 115 daga cikinsu suka bãyar da matsalar, waɗanda aka bãyar da shi kuma aka analyza a cikin wannan rapi.", 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים את התוצאות והמציאות העיקריות של SemEval-2019 משימה 6 על זיהוי וקטגוריזציה שפה פוגעת במדיה חברתית (OffensEval). המשימה היתה מבוססת על קבוצת נתונים חדשה, קבוצת נתונים לזהות שפת פגיעה (OLID), שמכילה מעל 14,000 טוויטים אנגליים, והיא מכילה שלושה תו-משימות. In sub-task A, systems were asked to discriminate between offensive and non-offensive posts.  בתפקיד B, מערכות היו צריכות לזהות את סוג התוכן הפגיע בתור. סוף סוף, בתפקיד סי, מערכות היו חייבות לגלות את המטרה של עמדות התקפה. OffensEval נמשך מספר גדול של משתתפים וזה היה אחד המשימות הכי פופולריות בסימEval-2019. בסך הכל, כמעט 800 צוותים נרשמו להשתתף במשימה ו-115 מהם שלחו תוצאות, שהוצגו ונבחנו בדו"ח הזה.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་ཁབ་ལྟ་བུ་དང་ཐོག་ལས་རྩ་བ་ཕྲན་པ་དང་རྩ་བའི་ཐོག་སྙམ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གནང་བ་ཡིན། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དུ་ཆོས་མཐ བྱ་འགུལ་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་གསར་པ་ཞིག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་Offensive Language Identification Dataset (OLID)དང་མཉམ་ལས་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འགྲེལ་བཙུགས་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ ཨིན་ཇ ལག་ལེན་པ་གཤམ་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ལ་འགྱུར་བའི་འགྱུར་བ་དང་ཁྱད་པར་མེད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་སོ་སོར་བཤད་དགོས་པ། sub-task B ནང་དུ་མ་ལག་གིས་གནས་ཡུལ་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ནང་དོན་གང་འདྲ་ཡིན་དགོས་པ མཐའ་མར་ལྡོག་རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་སྡེ་(sub-task)ནང་དུ་མ་ལག་གིས་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་གནས་ཡུལ་རྟོགས་དགོས་པ། OffensEval ཡིས་ཞུགས་པ་གཙོ་ཆེ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་བསྐྱེད་བྱས་ཡོད། དེ་ནི་SemEval-2019 ལྟ་བུའི་ལས་ཆོས་ཤིག བསྡུར་བརྗོད་བྱས་ན། མཁའ་དབུགས་roughly 800 མི་གནད་དོན་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྲིད་བྱས་པ་དང་། སྙན་ཞུ་འདི་ནང་སྤྲོད་ནས་'}
{'en': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU-HCM at SemEval 2019 Task 1 : Graph Transformation System from Stanford Basic Dependencies to Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)', 'ar': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU-HCM في SemEval 2019 المهمة 1: نظام تحويل الرسم البياني من تبعيات ستانفورد الأساسية إلى التعليق التوضيحي المعرفي المفاهيمي العالمي (UCCA)', 'fr': "DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM au SemEval 2019 Tâche 1\xa0: Système de transformation graphique des dépendances de base de Stanford à l'annotation cognitive conceptuelle universelle (UCCA)", 'es': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM en SemEval 2019 Tarea 1: Sistema de transformación de gráficos de las dependencias básicas de Stanford a la anotación cognitiva conceptual universal (UCCA)', 'pt': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU-HCM no SemEval 2019 Tarefa 1: Sistema de Transformação de Gráficos de Dependências Básicas de Stanford para Anotação Cognitiva Conceitual Universal (UCCA)', 'ja': 'DANGNT @ UIT.VNU-HCM at SemEval 2019 Task 1: Graph Transformation System from Stanford Basic Dependencies to Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)', 'hi': 'DANGNT@UIT। SemEval 2019 कार्य 1 पर VNU-HCM: ग्राफ़ ट्रांसफॉर्मेशन सिस्टम स्टैनफोर्ड बेसिक निर्भरताओं से यूनिवर्सल वैचारिक संज्ञानात्मक एनोटेशन (UCCA) के लिए', 'zh': 'DANGNT@UIT。 VNU-HCM在SemEval 2019务1:自斯坦福本赖通用右识注(UCCA)图形转换系统', 'ru': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU-HCM на SemEval 2019 Задача 1: Система преобразования графиков от базовых зависимостей Стэнфорда к универсальной концептуальной когнитивной аннотации (UCCA)', 'ga': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU-HCM ag SemEval 2019 Tasc 1: Córas Trasfhoirmithe Grafa ó Bhunspleáchais Stanford go Anótáil Chognaíoch Choincheapúil Uilíoch (UCCA)', 'hu': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU 1. feladat: Graf transzformációs rendszer a Stanford alapvető függőségektől az univerzális koncepciós kognitív jegyzékig (UCCA)', 'ka': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU - HCM 2019 წლის SemEval 2019 დავალება 1: სტანფორდის ფუნქტურაციის სისტემიდან სტანფორდის ფუნქტურაციის განსაკუთრებულობებიდან სუნქტურალური კონცენტიური კონტაქტიური', 'el': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU Εργασία 1: Σύστημα Μεταμόρφωσης Γραφημάτων από τις Βασικές Εξαρτήσεις του Στάνφορντ σε Οικουμενική Εννοούμενη Γνωσιακή σημείωση', 'it': "DANGNT@UIT.VNU Task 1: Sistema di trasformazione dei grafici dalle dipendenze di base di Stanford all'annotazione cognitiva concettuale universale (UCCA)", 'lt': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM at SemEval 2019 Task 1: Graph Transformation System from Stanford Basic Dependencies to Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)', 'ms': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM di SemEval 2019 Tugas 1: Sistem Transformasi Graf dari Stanford Basic Dependencies ke Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)', 'kk': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU - HCM 2019 жылдың semiEval тапсырмасында 1- тапсырма: Станфорд негізгі тәуелдіктерінен графикалық түрлендіру жүйесінен Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)', 'pl': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU Zadanie 1: System transformacji wykresu z podstawowych zależności Stanford do uniwersalnej koncepcyjnej adnotacji poznawczej (UCCA)', 'ro': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM la SemEval 2019 Sarcina 1: Sistemul de transformare a graficului de la Stanford Dependențe de bază la Adnotare Cognitivă Conceptuală Universală (UCCA)', 'no': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU - HCM ved semiEval 2019 oppgåve 1: Grafikk-transformasjonssystem frå Stanford Basic Dependencies til Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)', 'mn': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM at SemEval 2019 Task 1: Graph Transformation System from Stanford Basic Dependencies to Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)', 'sr': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU - HCM na semiEvalu 2019. zadatak 1: sistem transformacije grafa iz Stanforda osnovne zavisnosti do univerzalne konceptualne kognitivne annotacije (UCCA)', 'ml': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU - സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ടാസ്ക് 1: സ്റ്റാന്\u200dഫോര്\u200dഡില്\u200d നിന്നും അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലേക്കുള്ള ഗ്രാഫ് മാറ്റുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം സിസിംഗ', 'mt': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM f’SemEval 2019 Kompitu 1: Sistema ta’ Trasformazzjoni tal-Grafiki minn Dipendenzi Bażiċi ta’ Stanford għal Annotazzjoni Konċettwali Universali (UCCA)', 'mk': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -ХЦМ на SemEval 2019 задача 1: Графски трансформациски систем од Стенфорд основни зависности до универзална концептуална коњитивна анотација (УККА)', 'si': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU - HCM at semeval 2019 Job 1: Graph Transfer System from Stanford', 'so': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM at SemEval 2019 Task 1: Graph Transformation System from Stanford Basic Dependencies to Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)', 'sv': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM på SemEval 2019 Uppgift 1: Grafomvandlingssystem från Stanford grundläggande beroenden till Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)', 'ta': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU - செம்Eval 2019 செயல் 1: ஸ்டென்ஃபோர்ட் அடிப்படை சார்புகளிலிருந்து பொதுவான மாற்றம் அமைப்பு', 'ur': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM at SemEval 2019 Task 1: Graph Transformation System from Stanford Basic Dependencies to Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)', 'uz': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU - SemEval 2019 Vazifani 1: Stanford asosiy qismlaridan Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)', 'vi': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM tại SemEvol Task 1: Hệ thống biến hình đồ họa từ thuộc sự phụ thuộc cơ bản của Stanford đến Thông chú nhận thức chung (UCCA)', 'hr': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU - HCM na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 1: sustav transformacije grafa iz Stanford osnovne zavisnosti na univerzalnu konceptualnu kognitivnu annotaciju (UCCA)', 'nl': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU Taak 1: Grafische transformatiesysteem van Stanford Basisafhankelijkheden naar Universele Conceptuele Cognitieve Annotatie (UCCA)', 'bg': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU Задача 1: Графична трансформационна система от Станфордски основни зависимости към универсална концептуална когнитивна анотация', 'da': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU Opgave 1: Graftransformationssystem fra Stanford Grundlæggende Afhængigheder til Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)', 'de': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU Aufgabe 1: Graph Transformation System von Stanford Basic Dependencies zu Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)', 'id': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM di SemEval 2019 Tugas 1: Sistem Transformasi Graf dari Stanford Basic Dependencies ke Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)', 'ko': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU-2019년SemEval에서의 HCM 임무1: 스탠포드에서 유니버설 개념 인지 주석(UCCA)에 기본적으로 의존하는 도형 전환 시스템', 'fa': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM at SemEval 2019 Task 1: System Transformation Graph from Stanford Basic Dependencies to Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)', 'tr': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM at SemEval 2019 Task 1: Graph Transformation System from Stanford Basic Dependencies to Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)', 'sw': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM kwenye SemEval 2019 Tamko 1: Mfumo wa Uhamasishaji wa Graph kutoka Stanford Kutegemea Msingi wa UCCA (UCCA)', 'sq': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM në SemEval 2019 Task 1: Graph Transformation System from Stanford Basic Dependencies to Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)', 'am': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU ስራ 1: Graph Transformation System from Stanford Basic Dependencies to Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)', 'af': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU - HCM by SemEval 2019 Opdrag 1: Grafiese Transformasie Stelsel van Stanford Basiese Afhangigheids na Universele Konsensieële Kognitiewe Opmerking (UCCA)', 'hy': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -ՀԿՄ-ը 2019 թ. Սեմեվալ առաջին հանձնարարությունում. Գրաֆի փոխակերպման համակարգը Ստենֆորդի հիմնական կախվածություններից մինչև համաշխարհային գաղափարական գիտակցական հայտարարություն (UCCA)', 'az': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM 2019-in SemEval Task 1: Stanford Basic Dependencies to Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)', 'bn': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU - সেমইভাল ২০১৯ টাস্ক ১: স্ট্যানফোর্ডের মৌলিক নির্ভরশীল সিস্টেম থেকে বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের কনসেপ্টুয়াল কনফিকেটিভ কনফিকেটিভ বি', 'bs': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM na semiEvalu 2019. zadatak 1: sistem transformacije grafa iz Stanford osnovne zavisnosti do univerzalne konceptualne kognitivne annotacije (UCCA)', 'ca': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM at SemEval 2019 Task 1: Graph Transformation System from Stanford Basic Dependencies to Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)', 'cs': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU Úkol 1: Transformační systém grafu ze Stanfordských základních závislostí na univerzální koncepční kognitivní anotaci (UCCA)', 'et': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU Ülesanne 1: Graafilise muundamise süsteem Stanfordi põhisõltuvustest universaalseks kontseptuaalseks kognitiivseks annotatsiooniks (UCCA)', 'fi': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU Tehtﾃ､vﾃ､ 1: Kaavionmuutosjﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ Stanfordin perusriippuvuuksista universaaliin kﾃ､sitteellisiin kognitiivisiin annotointeihin (UCCA)', 'jv': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM at semiinval 2011 task 1: Graph Transformation System from STAforbasic dependncies to Universal Methodual CoGNative Anntative (UKA)', 'he': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM ב SemEval 2019 משימה 1: מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת סטנפורד', 'sk': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU Naloga 1: Grafični transformacijski sistem iz osnovnih odvisnosti Stanforda v univerzalno konceptualno kognitivno oponašanje (UCCA)', 'ha': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU - HCM at SemEV 2019 Tax 1: GraGraGraGraf Transformation Systems from Stanford Basic Debugs to Universal Conceptural Cognitive Annonation (UCCA)', 'bo': 'DANGNT@UIT.VNU -HCM at SemEval 2019 Task 1: Graph Transformation System from Stanford Basic Dependencies to Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the graph transfor-mation system (GT System) for SemEval 2019 Task 1 : Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)1. The input of GT System is a pair of text and its unannotated xml, which is a layer 0 part of UCCA form. The output of GT System is the corresponding full UCCA xml. Based on the idea of graph illustration and transformation, we perform four main tasks when building GT System. At the first task, we illustrate the graph form of stanford dependencies2 of input text. We then transform into an intermediate graph in the second task. At the third task, we continue to transform into ouput graph form. Finally, we create the output UCCA xml. The evaluation results show that our method generates good-quality UCCA xml and has a meaningful contribution to the semantic represetation sub-field in Natural Language Processing.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظام تحويل الرسم البياني (GT System) لـ SemEval 2019 Task 1: التحليل الدلالي متعدد اللغات مع التعليق التوضيحي الإدراكي المفاهيمي العالمي (UCCA) 1. مدخلات نظام GT عبارة عن زوج من النص و xml غير الموضح به ، وهو جزء من طبقة 0 من نموذج UCCA. ناتج نظام GT هو المقابل الكامل لـ UCCA xml. استنادًا إلى فكرة الرسم التوضيحي والتحويل ، نقوم بأربع مهام رئيسية عند إنشاء نظام GT. في المهمة الأولى ، قمنا بتوضيح شكل الرسم البياني لتبعيات ستانفورد 2 لنص الإدخال. ثم نتحول إلى رسم بياني وسيط في المهمة الثانية. في المهمة الثالثة ، نستمر في التحول إلى شكل الرسم البياني الناتج. أخيرًا ، قمنا بإنشاء إخراج UCCA xml. تظهر نتائج التقييم أن طريقتنا تولد نوعية جيدة من UCCA xml ولها مساهمة ذات مغزى في المجال الفرعي لإعادة التعيين الدلالي في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le système de transformation graphique (système GT) pour SemEval 2019 Task 1\xa0: Parsing sémantique cross-lingual avec Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) 1. L'entrée de GT System est une paire de texte et son xml non annoté, qui est une partie de couche 0 de la forme UCCA. La sortie du système GT est le XML UCCA complet correspondant. Sur la base de l'idée de l'illustration graphique et de la transformation, nous effectuons quatre tâches principales lors de la création de GT System. Dans la première tâche, nous illustrons la forme graphique des dépendances de Stanford/2 du texte d'entrée. Nous transformons ensuite en graphique intermédiaire dans la deuxième tâche. À la troisième tâche, nous continuons à nous transformer en graphique de sortie. Enfin, nous créons la sortie UCCA xml. Les résultats de l'évaluation montrent que notre méthode génère du XML UCCA de bonne qualité et apporte une contribution significative au sous-domaine de la représentation sémantique dans le traitement du langage naturel.", 'es': 'Este artículo describe el sistema de transformación de gráficos (GT System) para la Tarea 1 de SemEval 2019: Análisis semántico interlingüe con anotación cognitiva conceptual universal (UCCA) 1. La entrada de GT System es un par de texto y su xml no anotado, que es una parte de capa 0 del formulario UCCA. La salida de GT System es el correspondiente xml completo de UCCA. Basándonos en la idea de la ilustración y la transformación de gráficos, realizamos cuatro tareas principales al construir GT System. En la primera tarea, ilustramos la forma gráfica de las dependencias de stanford2 del texto de entrada. Luego nos transformamos en un gráfico intermedio en la segunda tarea. En la tercera tarea, continuamos transformándonos en forma de gráfico de salida. Finalmente, creamos la salida XML de UCCA. Los resultados de la evaluación muestran que nuestro método genera xml UCCA de buena calidad y tiene una contribución significativa al subcampo de representación semántica en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve o sistema de transformação de grafos (Sistema GT) para SemEval 2019 Tarefa 1: Análise Semântica Cruzada com Anotação Cognitiva Conceitual Universal (UCCA)1. A entrada do Sistema GT é um par de texto e seu xml não anotado, que é uma parte da camada 0 do formulário UCCA. A saída do GT System é o xml UCCA completo correspondente. Com base na ideia de ilustração e transformação de grafos, realizamos quatro tarefas principais na construção do GT System. Na primeira tarefa, ilustramos a forma gráfica das dependências stanford2 do texto de entrada. Em seguida, transformamos em um grafo intermediário na segunda tarefa. Na terceira tarefa, continuamos a transformar em forma de gráfico de saída. Por fim, criamos o xml UCCA de saída. Os resultados da avaliação mostram que nosso método gera xml UCCA de boa qualidade e tem uma contribuição significativa para o subcampo de representação semântica em Processamento de Linguagem Natural.', 'ja': '本稿では， SemEval 2019タスク1 ： Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) 1を用いたクロスリンガル・セマンティック・パーシングのためのグラフ・トランスフォーメーション・システム(GTシステム)について述べる． GT Systemの入力は、テキストとその注釈なしのxmlのペアであり、UCCAフォームのレイヤー0の一部です。GTシステムの出力は、対応するフルUCCA xmlです。グラフイラストレーションと変換のアイデアに基づいて、GTシステム構築時に4つの主要なタスクを実行します。最初のタスクでは、入力テキストのスタンフォード依存関係2のグラフ形式を示します。次に、2番目のタスクで中間グラフに変換します。3番目のタスクでは、引き続きOUPUTグラフ形式に変換します。最後に、出力UCCA xmlを作成します。評価結果は、我々の方法が質の高いUCCA xmlを生成し、自然言語処理のセマンティックリセットサブフィールドに有意義な貢献をしていることを示しています。', 'zh': '本文引SemEval 2019务1图转换系统(GT系统):具通名识注(UCCA)跨语言语义解析1。 GT System 输双文本及未注 xml, UCCA 表单第 0 层也。 GT 统者,全 UCCA xml也。 盖图形明变易之心,构GT统而行四务也。 首言输文本斯坦福赖2图形。 然后,我们在第二任中转换为中间图。 第三务,续转为输图。 最后创输 UCCA xml。 评估结果表明,吾法生高质量之UCCA xml,自然语言处中语义预置子域有义之献。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval 2019 कार्य 1 के लिए ग्राफ ट्रांसफोर-मेशन सिस्टम (जीटी सिस्टम) का वर्णन करता है: यूनिवर्सल वैचारिक संज्ञानात्मक एनोटेशन (यूसीसीए) 1 के साथ क्रॉस-लिंगुअल सिमेंटिक पार्सिंग। जीटी सिस्टम का इनपुट पाठ की एक जोड़ी है और इसका अननोटेड एक्सएमएल है, जो यूसीसीए फॉर्म का एक परत 0 हिस्सा है। जीटी सिस्टम का आउटपुट संबंधित पूर्ण UCCA xml है। ग्राफ चित्रण और परिवर्तन के विचार के आधार पर, हम जीटी सिस्टम का निर्माण करते समय चार मुख्य कार्य करते हैं। पहले कार्य में, हम इनपुट पाठ के स्टैनफोर्ड निर्भरता2 के ग्राफ़ रूप को चित्रित करते हैं। फिर हम दूसरे कार्य में एक मध्यवर्ती ग्राफ में बदल जाते हैं। तीसरे कार्य में, हम ouput ग्राफ फॉर्म में परिवर्तित करने के लिए जारी है। अंत में, हम आउटपुट UCCA xml बनाते हैं। मूल्यांकन परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारी विधि अच्छी गुणवत्ता वाले यूसीसीए एक्सएमएल उत्पन्न करती है और प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण में शब्दार्थ पुनर्निरीयोजन उप-क्षेत्र में एक सार्थक योगदान है।', 'ru': 'В данной статье описана система преобразования графов (система GT) для задачи 1 SemEval 2019: кросс-лингвистический семантический анализ с универсальной концептуальной когнитивной аннотацией (UCCA)1. Вход системы ГТ представляет собой пару текста и его неаннотированный xml, который является частью формы UCCA уровня 0. Выход системы ГТ - соответствующий полный xml UCCA. Основываясь на идее иллюстрации и преобразования графа, мы выполняем четыре основные задачи при построении Системы ГТ. На первом задании мы иллюстрируем графообразную форму зависимостей Стэнфорда2 входного текста. Затем мы преобразуемся в промежуточный граф во второй задаче. На третьей задаче мы продолжаем превращаться в форму выпадающего графа. Наконец, мы создаем выход UCCA xml. Результаты оценки показывают, что наш метод генерирует качественный UCCA xml и имеет значимый вклад в семантическое подполе повторения в обработке естественного языка.', 'ga': "Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcóras trasfhoirmithe graif (Córas GT) le haghaidh Tasc 1 SemEval 2019: Parsáil Shéimeantach Thrasteangach le Anótáil Chognaíoch Choincheapúil Uilíoch (UCCA)1. Is péire téacs é ionchur Córas GT agus a xml gan nótaí, atá mar chuid ciseal 0 d'fhoirm UCCA. Is é aschur Córas GT an xml iomlán UCCA comhfhreagrach. Bunaithe ar an smaoineamh maidir le léaráidí graif agus claochlú, déanaimid ceithre phríomhchúram agus Córas GT á thógáil againn. Ag an gcéad tasc, léirímid an fhoirm ghraif de spleáchais stanford2 den téacs ionchuir. Déanaimid graf idirmheánach ansin sa dara tasc. Ag an tríú tasc, leanaimid ar aghaidh ag athrú go foirm ghraif aschuir. Ar deireadh, cruthaímid an t-aschur UCCA xml. Léiríonn torthaí na meastóireachta go ngineann ár modh UCCA xml ar ardchaighdeán agus go gcuireann sé go mór leis an bhfo-réimse athléirithe shéimeantaigh i bPróiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha.", 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2019 feladat 1: Cross-lingual Semantik Parsing with Universal Conceptual Cognitive Notetation (UCCA) gráf transzformációs rendszerét (GT System) 1. A GT System bemenete egy pár szöveg és annak jelöletlen xml, ami az UCCA formájának 0 rétegét képezi. A GT System kimenete a megfelelő teljes UCCA xml. A grafikonok illusztrációjának és átalakításának ötlete alapján négy fő feladatot látunk el a GT System építésénél. Az első feladatnál bemutatjuk a bemeneti szöveg stanford függőségeinek grafikonformáját. Ezután a második feladat során közbenső gráfot alakítunk át. A harmadik feladatnál továbbra is átalakulunk ouput gráf formájává. Végül létrehozzuk az UCCA xml kimenetet. Az értékelési eredmények azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk jó minőségű UCCA xml-t generál, és jelentős mértékben hozzájárul a Natural Language Processing szemantikai reprezentation alterületéhez.', 'ka': 'ამ წიგნის შესახებ 2019 წიგნის SemEval- ის განსაზღვრება სისტემა (GT სისტემა) სამუშაო დავალების 1: სამუშაო სიმპანტიკური განსაზღვრება სამუშაო სიმპანტიკური განსაზღვრება სამუშა GT სისტემის შეტყობინება არის ტექსტის ორი და მისი არაცნობილი xml, რომელიც UCCA ფორმის 0- ელემენტია. GT სისტემის გამოსახულება არის შესაბამისი ყველა UCCA xml. გრაფიკური ინლუსტრაციის და ტრანფორმაციის იდეაზე, ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ ოთხი მნიშვნელოვანი დავალება, როდესაც GT სისტემის შექმნა. პირველი დავალებით, ჩვენ სტანფორდის დასახლოების გრაფიკური ფორმას გამოყენება2 ტექსტის. შემდეგ ჩვენ შევცვალოთ მეორე დავალებში შორის გრაფიკაში. მესამე დავალებით, ჩვენ დავიწყებთ გადატანქტირებას გრაფიკური ფორმაში. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ შექმნით UCCA xml გამოსახულება. შესაბამისი შედეგი გამოწვება რომ ჩვენი მეთოდი უფრო კარგი UCCA xml-ს შექმნა და აქვს მნიშვნელოვანი დამატება სემონტიკური რეპრესტიაციის სეპრესტიაციის პროცესში.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα μετατροπής γραφής (σύστημα GT) για το έργο 1: Διασγλωσσική Σημαντική Ανάλυση με καθολική εννοιολογική γνωστική σημείωση (UCCA)1. Η εισαγωγή του συστήματος είναι ένα ζευγάρι κειμένου και το μη σημειωμένο xml του, το οποίο είναι ένα στρώμα 0 μέρος της φόρμας UCCA. Η έξοδος του συστήματος GT είναι η αντίστοιχη πλήρης UCCA xml. Με βάση την ιδέα της απεικόνισης και του μετασχηματισμού γραφήματος, εκτελούμε τέσσερις κύριες εργασίες κατά την κατασκευή του συστήματος. Στην πρώτη εργασία, απεικονίζουμε τη μορφή γραφήματος των εξαρτήσεων του Στάνφορντ του κειμένου εισαγωγής. Στη συνέχεια μετατρέπουμε σε ενδιάμεσο γράφημα στη δεύτερη εργασία. Στο τρίτο έργο, συνεχίζουμε να μεταμορφώνουμε σε μορφή γραφήματος. Τέλος, δημιουργούμε την έξοδο UCCA xml. Τα αποτελέσματα της αξιολόγησης δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας παράγει καλής ποιότητας και έχει σημαντική συμβολή στο υποσύνολο σημασιολογικής αναπαράστασης στην Επεξεργασία Φυσικής Γλώσσας.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il sistema di trasfor-mation grafico (GT System) per SemEval 2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)1. L'input di GT System è una coppia di testo e la sua xml non notata, che è una parte layer 0 della forma UCCA. L'output di GT System è il corrispondente full UCCA xml. Sulla base dell'idea di illustrazione e trasformazione dei grafici, eseguiamo quattro compiti principali durante la costruzione di GT System. Al primo compito, illustreremo la forma del grafico delle dipendenze stanford2 del testo di input. Poi ci trasformiamo in un grafico intermedio nel secondo compito. Al terzo compito, continuiamo a trasformarci in forma di grafico ouput. Infine, creiamo l'output UCCA xml. I risultati della valutazione mostrano che il nostro metodo genera xml UCCA di buona qualità e ha un contributo significativo al sottocampo della repressione semantica in Natural Language Processing.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2019 жылдың жартық бағдарламасының графикалық трансформациялық жүйесін (GT жүйесі) 1- тапсырма үшін тапсырманы түсіндіреді: Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) 1- тілдегі біртілік шемантикалық талдау GT жүйесінің келтірісі - бір мәтін және оның белгісіз емес xml. Бұл UCCA пішінің 0- қабатты бөлігі. GT жүйесінің шығысы - сәйкес келетін UCCA xml. Графикалық иллюстрация және түрлендіру идеясына негізделген, GT жүйесін құрғанда төрт негізгі тапсырмаларды орындаймыз. Бірінші тапсырмада, Станфорд тәуелдіктерінің графикалық түрін көрсетеді. Содан кейін екінші тапсырманың арасындағы графика түрлендік. Үшінші тапсырманың үшінші тапсырмасында, график пішіміне аударып жалғастық. Соңында UCCA xml шығысын құрамыз. Бағалау нәтижелері біздің әдіміміз UCCA xml сапатты жақсы сапатты құрады және табиғи тіл процессерінің семантикалық репрезетациялау ішкі өрісіне маңызды көмек береді.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinama grafikos transformacijos sistema (GT sistema), skirta 2019 m. pusevaliui, 1 užduotis: tarpkalbinis Semantinis analizavimas su universaliąja koncepcine pažintine anotacija (UCCA)1. GT sistemos įvestis yra teksto pora ir jos nenotiruotas xml, kuris yra 0 sluoksnio UCCA formos dalis. GT sistemos išėjimas yra atitinkamas visas UCCA xml. Remiantis grafiko iliustracijos ir transformacijos idėja, statydami GT sistemą atliekame keturias pagrindines užduotis. Pirmojoje užduotyje parodomi grafiniai Stanford priklausomybės2 įvesties teksto pavidalai. Tuomet perskaičiuojame į tarpinį grafiką antroje užduotyje. Trečiajame uždavinyje mes ir toliau keičiamės į išvesties grafiką. Galiausiai sukuriame UCCA xml išėjimą. Vertinimo rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodas sukuria geros kokybės UCCA xml ir turi reikšmingą indėlį į semantinio represijos sritį gamtinės kalbos apdorojimo procese.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува системот за трансформација на графот (ГТ систем) за SemEval 2019 задача 1: Кросјазично семантично анализирање со универзална концептуална коњитивна анотација (УККА)1. Внесувањето на ГТ системот е пар текст и незабележан xml, кој е дел од слој 0 од формулата на УККА. Излезот на GT системот е соодветниот целосен UCCA xml. На основа на идејата на илустрација и трансформација на графикот, извршуваме четири главни задачи кога градиме ГТ систем. На првата задача, ја илустрираме графичката форма на зависностите на Стенфорд 2 на внесен текст. Потоа се трансформираме во меѓувремен граф во втората задача. At the third task, we continue to transform into ouput graph form.  Конечно, го создадовме излезот UCCA xml. Резултатите од проценката покажуваат дека нашиот метод генерира добро квалитетно UCCA xml и има значителен придонес во семантичкото подполе за репресија во процесот на природен јазик.', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ടാസ്ക് 1: ക്രോസ്- ലിങ്ക് സെമാന്\u200dഗ്രാഫ് സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിന്റെ ഗ്രാഫ് മാറ്റര്\u200d മാറ്റര്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം (ജിടി സിസ്റ്റി) വിവരിക GT സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ഒരു ജോഡി ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ആണ്. അതിന്റെ അപരിചിതമായ എക്സ്എല്\u200d, യുസികിഎ ഫോര്\u200dമാറ്റിന്റെ 0 നിലയ The output of GT System is the corresponding full UCCA xml.  ഗ്രാഫ് ഡ്രാഫ്രേഷനും മാറ്റം വരുത്തുന്നതിന്റെ ആശയം അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ജിടി സിസ്റ്റം പണിയുമ്പോള്\u200d നാല് പ്ര ആദ്യത്തെ ജോലിയില്\u200d, സ്റ്റാന്\u200dഫോര്\u200dഡിന്\u200dറെ ഗ്രാഫ് ഫോര്\u200dഡിന്\u200dറെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടാമത്തെ ജോലിയിലേക്ക് ഒരു ഇടയിലുള്ള ഗ്രാഫിലേക്ക് മാറ്റുന്നു. മൂന്നാമത്തെ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d നിങ്ങളുടെ ഗ്രാഫ് ഫോമിലേക്ക് മാറ്റുകയാണ്. അവസാനം, നമ്മള്\u200d UCCA എക്സ്\u200cഎക്സ്എല്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ഉത്തമമായ UCCA എക്സ്എല്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയയിലെ സെമാ', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас 2019 оны SemEval-ын график хэлбэрийн тусламжийн системийг (GT System) тайлбарладаг ажил 1: Олон хэлний Semantic Parsing with Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) 1. ГТ системийн орлуулалт нь хоёр текст ба түүний мэдэгдэхгүй xml юм. Энэ нь UCCA хэлбэрийн 0 давхар хэсэг юм. GT системийн бүтээгдэхүүний бүрэн UCCA xml юм. График дүрслэл болон өөрчлөлтийн санаа дээр бид GT системийг бүтээхэд 4 үндсэн ажил хийдэг. Эхний ажил дээр бид Станфордын хамааралтай байдлын график хэлбэрийг харуулж байна. Дараа нь бид хоёр дахь даалгаварын дундаж график болно. Гуравдагч даалгаварт бид зураг график хэлбэрт шилжүүлж байна. Эцэст нь бид UCCA xml гаргасан. Үүний үнэлгээ нь бидний арга нь UCCA xml-г сайн сайн чанартай боловсруулдаг ба Байгалийн хэл Процессорын semantic represetation sub-field-д маш чухал нөлөөлөх боломжтой байдаг.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje system transfor-macji wykresu (GT System) dla SemEval 2019 Zadanie 1: Parasowanie semantyczne między językami z uniwersalną koncepcyjną adnotacją poznawczą (UCCA)1. Wprowadzenie GT System to para tekstu i jego niezapisany xml, który jest warstwą 0 części formularza UCCA. Wyjściem GT System jest odpowiednia pełna UCCA xml. W oparciu o ideę ilustracji i transformacji wykresu wykonujemy cztery główne zadania budując system GT. W pierwszym zadaniu ilustrujemy formę wykresu zależności stanforda tekstu wejściowego. Następnie przekształcamy się w wykres pośredni w drugim zadaniu. W trzecim zadaniu kontynuujemy przekształcanie się w formę wykresu wyjściowego. Na koniec tworzymy wyjście UCCA xml. Wyniki oceny pokazują, że nasza metoda generuje dobrej jakości UCCA xml i ma znaczący wkład w podpole reprezentacji semantycznej w przetwarzaniu języka naturalnego.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver grafen transfor-matingssystemet (GT System) for halvEval 2019 Oppgåve 1: krysspråk semantisk tolking med universale konseptuelle kognitiv notasjon (UCCA) 1. Inndata av GT-systemet er eit par tekst og den ukjente xml, som er eit lag 0 del av UCCA-form. Utdata av GT-systemet er den tilsvarande fullstendige UCCA xml. Basert på ideen om grafikkillustrasjon og transformasjon, utfører vi fire hovudoppgåver ved bygging av GT-systemet. På den første oppgåva illustrerer vi grafen på stanford-avhengighet2 av innteksten. Vi transformerer så til eit middelgraf i den andre oppgåva. På den tredje oppgåva fortsetter vi å transformera til ouput-grafform. I slutt lager vi utdata UCCA xml. Evalueringsresultatet viser at metoden vårt generer godkvalitet UCCA xml og har ein betydelig bidrag til semantiske represetasjonsfeltet i naturspråk-prosessering.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema tat-trasformazzjoni tal-grafika (Sistema GT) għas-SemEval 2019 Kompitu 1: Analiżi Semantika Translingwi b’Annotazzjoni Konċettwali Universali (UCCA)1. L-input tas-Sistema GT huwa par ta’ test u l-xml mhux innotat tagħha, li hija saff 0 parti mill-form a UCCA. Il-produzzjoni tas-Sistema GT hija l-UCCA xml sħiħa korrispondenti. Abbażi tal-idea tal-illustrazzjoni u t-trasformazzjoni tal-grafika, nagħmlu erba’ kompiti ewlenin fil-bini tas-Sistema GT. At the first task, we illustrate the graph form of stanford dependencies2 of input text.  We then transform into an intermediate graph in the second task.  Fit-tielet kompitu, inkomplu nittrasformaw f’forma ta’ graff tal-output. Fl-aħħar nett, aħna nħolqu l-output UCCA xml. Ir-riżultati tal-evalwazzjoni juru li l-metodu tagħna jiġġenera xml UCCA ta’ kwalità tajba u għandu kontribut sinifikanti għas-sottokamp ta’ repressjoni semantika fil-Proċessar tal-Lingwi Naturali.', 'ms': 'This paper describes the graph transfor-mation system (GT System) for SemEval 2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)1.  Input Sistem GT adalah sepasang teks dan xml tanpa notasi, yang merupakan bahagian lapisan 0 bentuk UCCA. Output Sistem GT adalah UCCA xml penuh yang sepadan. Berdasarkan idea ilustrasi graf dan perubahan, kami melakukan empat tugas utama apabila membina Sistem GT. Pada tugas pertama, kita ilustrasikan bentuk graf dependensi Stanford We then transform into an intermediate graph in the second task.  Pada tugas ketiga, kita terus berubah menjadi bentuk graf output. Akhirnya, kita mencipta output UCCA xml. Hasil penilaian menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kami menghasilkan UCCA xml berkualiti yang baik dan mempunyai kontribusi yang bermakna kepada sub-medan penyesalan semantik dalam Pemprosesan Bahasa Sementara.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul de transformare grafică (GT System) pentru SemEval 2019 Task 1: Interpretarea semantică translingvă cu adnovare cognitivă conceptuală universală (UCCA)1. Introducerea GT System este o pereche de text și xml neanotat, care este o parte strat 0 a formei UCCA. Ieșirea GT System este corespunzătoare UCCA xml complet. Bazându-ne pe ideea ilustrării grafice și transformării, îndeplinim patru sarcini principale atunci când construim GT System. La prima sarcină, ilustrăm forma grafică a dependențelor stanford2 a textului de intrare. Apoi ne transformăm într-un grafic intermediar în a doua sarcină. La a treia sarcină, continuăm să ne transformăm în formă de grafic ouput. În cele din urmă, vom crea ieșirea UCCA xml. Rezultatele evaluării arată că metoda noastră generează xml UCCA de bună calitate și are o contribuție semnificativă la subcâmpul reprezentativ semantic în procesarea limbajului natural.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem transfor-mation (GT sistem) za pola Evala 2019. zadatak 1: krstojezičko semantičko analiziranje sa univerzalnom konceptualnom kognitivnom Annotacijom (UCCA)1. Ulaz GT Sisteme je par teksta i njen nepoznat xml, koji je sloj 0 deo forme UCCA-a. Izvoz GT sistema je odgovarajući puni UCCA xml. Na osnovu ideje ilustracije i transformacije grafika, obavljamo četiri glavne zadatke kada izgradimo GT sistem. Na prvom zadatku, ilustrujemo grafiku stanfordske zavisnosti 2 teksta. Onda pretvaramo u prosječni grafik u drugom zadatku. Na trećem zadatku, nastavljamo da transformišemo u oblik ouput grafika. Konačno stvorimo izvršnu UCCA xml. Rezultati procjene pokazuju da naš metod stvara dobre kvalitete UCCA xml i ima značajan doprinos semantičkom podpolju represetacije u procesu prirodnog jezika.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ සෙම්වේල් 2019 වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් ග්\u200dරාෆ් ට්\u200dරාන්ස්මේෂන් පද්ධතිය (GT පද්ධතිය) විස්තර කරනවා 1: ක්\u200dරාස් භාෂාවික සෙමාන්ටික ව @ info GT පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරතිපූර්ණ ප්\u200dරතිපූර්ණ UCCA xml සම්බන්ධයි. ග්\u200dරාෆ් ප්\u200dරතිකෘතිය සහ වෙනස් කරන්න අදහසට පස්සේ, අපි GT පද්ධතිය නිර්මාණය කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරධාන වැඩ 4ක් කරන්නේ පළමු වැඩේ අපි ස්ටැන්ෆෝර්ඩ් විශේෂතාව2 පෙන්වන්න පෙළුවන් විදිහට පෙන්වන්නේ. ඊට පස්සේ අපි දෙවෙනි වැඩේ අතර අතරාධ්\u200dයය ග්\u200dරාෆ් වලට වෙනස් කරනවා. තුන්වෙනි වැඩේ අපි පටන් ගන්නේ අයුපුට් ග්\u200dරාෆ් වර්ගයක් වෙනුවෙන්. අන්තිමේදි, අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරය UCCA xml නිර්මාණය කරනවා. අවශ්\u200dයය ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විධානය හොඳ ප්\u200dරතිශේෂතාවක් UCCA xml නිර්මාණය කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ භාෂාව ප්\u200dර', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka soo wareejinta qoraalka (GT-System) ee SemEval 2019 Shaqada 1: Xiriiriga korsashada ee luqada ah Semantic ee ku qoran dhamaanka jaamacadda (UCCA)1. Tirada GT waa labo text ah oo aan la aqoonin xml, taas oo qayb ka mid ah foomka UCCA. Laga soo baxa nidaamka GT waa mid u eg dhamaan UCCA xml. Sida lagu saleynayo fikrada sawirida iyo isbedelka, waxaynu sameynaa afar shaqo oo muhiim ah marka aan dhisno nidaamka GT. Shaqada ugu horeeyay waxaynu muujinaynaa qaabka sawirada ee stanford ku xiran sawirka input-2. We then transform into an intermediate graph in the second task.  Shaqada saddexaad waxaynu ku sii bedelaynaa foomka sawirka. Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu abuurnaa Output UCCA xml. Qiimeynta waxaa ka muuqda in qaababkayagu uu dhaliyo qiimo wanaagsan UCCA xml, wuxuuna ku leeyahay qayb muhiim ah oo ku saabsan hoos-bannaanta dib u celinta afka dabiicadda ah.', 'ta': 'SemEval 2019 செயல் 1: க்ராஸ்- மொழி செமாண்டிக் பாடல் உலகளாவி மாற்றும் குறியீடு குறியீடு அறிவிப்பு (UCCA) 1. GT அமைப்பின் உள்ளீடு ஒரு ஜோடி உரை மற்றும் அதன் அறியாத xml, அது UCCA வடிவத்தின் 0 அடுக்கு 0 பகுதியாகும். GT அமைப்பின் வெளியீடு பொருத்தமான முழு UCCA xml. GT அமைப்பை உருவாக்கும்போது நாம் நான்கு முக்கிய பணிகளை செயல்படுத்துகிறோம். முதல் செயலில், நாம் ஸ்டான்ஃபோர்டின் வடிவத்தை வரைபடத்தை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். உள்ளீடு உரையின் சார்பு 2. நாம் இரண்டாவது செயலில் நடுநிலையான வரைப்படத்தை மாற்றுகிறோம். மூன்றாவது பணியில், நாம் தொடர்ந்து வரைபடத்தை மாற்றுகிறோம். Finally, we create the output UCCA xml.  மதிப்பின் முடிவுகள் நம் முறைமையில் நல்ல தரம் UCCA எக்ஸ்எம்எல் உருவாக்குகிறது மற்றும் இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாட்டில் இருந்து அர்த்தமான மீ', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver graftransfor-mationssystemet (GT System) för SemEval 2019 Uppgift 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)1. Inmatningen av GT System är ett par text och dess oannoterade xml, vilket är ett lager 0 del av UCCA-formuläret. Utgången för GT System är motsvarande full UCCA xml. Utifrån idén om grafillustration och transformation utför vi fyra huvuduppgifter när vi bygger GT System. Vid den första uppgiften illustrerar vi grafformen för stanfordberoende2 av inmatningstext. Vi omvandlar sedan till en mellanliggande graf i den andra uppgiften. Vid den tredje uppgiften fortsätter vi att omvandla till ouput grafform. Slutligen skapar vi utmatningen UCCA xml. Utvärderingsresultaten visar att vår metod genererar UCCA xml av god kvalitet och har ett meningsfullt bidrag till delfältet semantisk repression i Natural Language Processing.', 'ur': 'This paper describes the transfor-mation system (GT System) for SemEval 2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) 1. جی ٹی سیسٹم کا انتشار ایک جوڑا ہے اور اس کی ناشناختہ xml ہے، جو UCCA فرم کی لری 0 حصہ ہے. GT سیسٹم کا اپوٹٹٹ پورا UCCA xml ہے۔ گراف کی تصویر اور تبدیل کی تصویر پر بنیاد ہے، جب ہم GT سیسٹم بناتے ہیں چار اصلی کام کرتے ہیں۔ پہلی کام میں، ہم نے استانفورد کے اعتباری کے گراف فرم کو نمایش دیتے ہیں. پھر ہم دوسرے کام میں ایک میانہ گراف تبدیل کرتے ہیں۔ تیسرے کام میں ہم آئوپ گراف فرم میں تبدیل رہے ہیں۔ آخر میں، ہم نے آوٹ پیٹ UCCA xml بنایا۔ ارزیابی نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ اچھی کیفیت UCCA xml کو پیدا کرتا ہے اور اس کے لئے طبیعی زبان پرسس میں سیمانٹی ریزرسٹ ساب فیلڈ کا معنی حصہ ہے.', 'uz': "Bu hujjat SemEval 2019 Vazifa 1: Universal Konceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) bilan KChart- Lingua Semantic Parsing (UCCA) 1. Name @ info: whatsthis GT tizimning natijasi toʻliq UCCA xml. Grafik tasavvur va o'zgartirish g'oyasi asosida, biz GT tizimini yaratishda to'rtta asosiy vazifalar bajaramiz. Birinchi vazifa bilan biz stanford shaklining tashkilotlarini tasavvur qilamiz. Keyin biz ikkinchi vazifaning orasidagi grafikni o'zgartirish. Uchinchi vazifanda, biz rasmni o'zgartirish davom etamiz. Oxiri, biz UCCA xml natijasini yaratimiz. Qiymatlar natijalari shunday ko'rsatadi, bizning usuli UCCA xml yaxshi darajada yaratishdir va tabiiy tillar vazifalarida semantik takrorlanish sub-maydonga ega bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả hệ thống truyền hình đồ thị (Hệ GT) cho nhiệm vụ Semkhai thác 99: Phân tích chất kỳ ngoại với Thông truyền dẫn chung với Thông truyền dẫn chung (UCCA)1. Thông tin nhập của Hệ thống GT là một đôi văn bản và xxol không ghi chú của nó, là một phần 0 của dạng UCCA. Sản phẩm của Hệ thống GT là tổng bộ UCCA xvu tương ứng. Dựa trên ý tưởng hình minh họa và biến dạng đồ thị, chúng tôi thực hiện bốn nhiệm vụ chính khi chế tạo Hệ thống GT. Tại nhiệm vụ đầu tiên, chúng tôi mô tả hình đồ thị của hãng quan hệ Stanford thuộc tính 2 của văn bản nhập. Sau đó chúng ta chuyển thành đồ thị phân cấp trong nhiệm vụ thứ hai. Ở nhiệm vụ thứ ba, chúng tôi tiếp tục biến thành hình đồ thị ouput. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi tạo ra UCCA xmal. Kết quả đánh giá cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta tạo ra đường phố ECCA tốt và mang lại một sự đóng góp có ý nghĩa cho mặt phụ đề phân biệt ngữ pháp của ngôn ngữ tự nhiên.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft het grafiektransfor-matie systeem (GT-systeem) voor SemEval 2019 Taak 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)1. De invoer van GT System is een paar tekst en de ongenoteerde xml, die een laag 0 deel van UCCA vorm is. De uitvoer van GT System is de overeenkomstige volledige UCCA xml. Gebaseerd op het idee van grafiekillustratie en transformatie, voeren we vier hoofdtaken uit bij het bouwen van GT System. Bij de eerste taak illustreren we de grafiekvorm van stanford afhankelijken2 van invoertekst. We transformeren dan in een tussengrafiek in de tweede taak. Bij de derde taak gaan we door met het transformeren naar outputgrafiekvorm. Ten slotte maken we de uitvoer UCCA xml. Uit de evaluatieresultaten blijkt dat onze methode UCCA xml van goede kwaliteit genereert en een betekenisvolle bijdrage levert aan het semantische representatie subveld in Natural Language Processing.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва графичната трансформационна система за Задача 1: Междуезична семантична обработка с универсална концептуална когнитивна анотация (УКК)1. Входът на GT Систем е чифт текст и нейният неописан xml, който е слой 0 част от формуляра. Изходът на GT System е съответната пълна UCCA xml. Въз основа на идеята за графична илюстрация и трансформация, изпълняваме четири основни задачи при изграждането на системата. При първата задача илюстрираме формата на графика на зависимостта на Станфорд 2 на входния текст. След това се трансформираме в междинна графика във втората задача. При третата задача продължаваме да се трансформираме във форма на изходна графика. И накрая, ние създаваме изхода UCCA xml. Резултатите от оценката показват, че методът ни генерира качествено и има значителен принос към семантичната репресия в обработката на естествения език.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje graf transfor-mation sistem (GT sustav) za pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 1: krstojezičko semantičko analiziranje s univerzalnom konceptualnom kognitivnom Annotacijom (UCCA) 1. Ulaz GT sustava je par teksta i njezin neoznačeni xml, što je sloj 0 dio oblika UCCA-a. Izvoz GT sustava je odgovarajući puni UCCA xml. Na temelju ideje ilustracije i transformacije grafika, obavljamo četiri glavne zadatke kada izgradimo GT sustav. Na prvom zadatku, ilustrujemo grafički oblik stanfordske ovisnosti 2 teksta. Onda pretvaramo u prosječni grafik u drugom zadatku. Na trećem zadatku, nastavljamo pretvoriti u oblik ouput grafika. Konačno stvorimo izlaz UCCA xml. Rezultati procjene pokazuju da naša metoda stvara kvalitetnu UCCA xml i ima značajan doprinos podpolju semantičke represetacije u procesu prirodnog jezika.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver graftransfor-mationssystemet (GT System) for SemEval 2019 Opgave 1: Tværsproget semantisk tolkning med Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)1. Indgangen af GT System er et par tekst og dens unanotated xml, som er et lag 0 del af UCCA formular. Udgangen af GT System er den tilsvarende fulde UCCA xml. Med udgangspunkt i ideen om grafillustration og transformation udfører vi fire hovedopgaver, når vi bygger GT System. Ved den første opgave illustrerer vi grafformen for stanford afhængigheder 2 af input tekst. Vi omdanner derefter til en mellemgraf i den anden opgave. Ved den tredje opgave fortsætter vi med at omdanne til ouput grafform. Endelig skaber vi output UCCA xml. Evalueringsresultaterne viser, at vores metode genererer UCCA xml af god kvalitet og har et meningsfuldt bidrag til det semantiske repræsentationsfelt i Natural Language Processing.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt das Graphentransfor-mationssystem (GT System) für SemEval 2019 Aufgabe 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)1. Die Eingabe von GT System ist ein Textpaar und seine nicht notierte XML, die ein Layer 0 Teil des UCCA-Formulars ist. Die Ausgabe von GT System ist die entsprechende volle UCCA xml. Basierend auf der Idee der Graphendarstellung und Transformation erfüllen wir vier Hauptaufgaben beim Bau von GT System. In der ersten Aufgabe veranschaulichen wir die Graphenform der Stanford-Abhängigkeiten2 des Eingabetextes. In der zweiten Aufgabe verwandeln wir uns dann in einen Zwischengraphen. Bei der dritten Aufgabe transformieren wir weiter in Output Graph Form. Schließlich erstellen wir die Ausgabe UCCA xml. Die Auswertungsergebnisse zeigen, dass unsere Methode qualitativ hochwertige UCCA xml generiert und einen sinnvollen Beitrag zum semantischen Repräsentationssubfeld in der Natural Language Processing leistet.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem transformasi grafik (Sistem GT) untuk SemEval 2019 Tugas 1: Parsing Semantik Selata-Bahasa dengan Annotasi Konceptif Universal (UCCA)1. Input dari Sistem GT adalah sepasang teks dan xml tanpa tanda, yang merupakan lapisan 0 bagian dari bentuk UCCA. The output of GT System is the corresponding full UCCA xml.  Berdasarkan ide ilustrasi grafik dan transformasi, kami melakukan empat tugas utama ketika membangun Sistem GT. Pada tugas pertama, kami menggambarkan bentuk grafik dari dependensi Stanford teks2 input. Kemudian kita berubah menjadi grafik intermedi dalam tugas kedua. Pada tugas ketiga, kita terus berubah menjadi bentuk grafik ouput. Akhirnya, kami menciptakan output UCCA xml. Hasil evaluasi menunjukkan bahwa metode kita menghasilkan kualitas UCCA xml yang baik dan memiliki kontribusi yang berarti untuk sub-medan represisi semantis dalam Proses Bahasa Alami.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval 2019 퀘스트 1의 도형 전환 시스템(GT 시스템): 유니버설 개념 인지 주석을 가진 다중 언어 의미 분석(UCCA) 1을 묘사한다.GT 시스템의 입력은 한 쌍의 텍스트와 주석이 없는 xml입니다. 이것은 UCCA 폼의 0층 부분입니다.GT 시스템의 출력은 해당하는 전체 UCCA xml입니다.도형 설명과 전환의 사상을 바탕으로 우리는 GT시스템을 구축할 때 네 가지 주요 임무를 완성했다.첫 번째 임무에서 우리는 텍스트를 입력하는 스탠퍼드 의존관계2의 도형 형식을 보여 주었다.그리고 우리는 두 번째 임무에서 그것을 중간도로 전환했다.세 번째 작업에서, 우리는 계속 출력도 형식으로 전환한다.마지막으로 UCCA xml 출력을 만듭니다.평가 결과에 따르면 우리의 방법은 고품질의 UCCA xml을 생성했고 자연 언어 처리에서의 의미 표시 서브 영역에 의미 있는 공헌을 했다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم تغییر\u200cسازی برای تغییر\u200cسازی\u200cسازی (سیستم GT) برای کار نیمه\u200cسازی 2019 توصیف می\u200cکند: تحلیل\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی ورودی سیستم GT یک جفت متن و xml غیر شناخته آن است که یک طبقه 0 از شکل UCCA است. نتیجه سیستم GT مربوط به کل xml UCCA است. بر اساس ایده\u200cی نمایش و تغییرات گراف، وقتی سیستم GT ساخت چهار کار اصلی انجام می\u200cدهیم. در اولین وظیفه، ما فرم بستگی استنفورد ۲ از متن ورودی را نشان می دهیم. سپس به یک گراف میانگین در کار دوم تغییر می دهیم. در وظیفه سوم، ما ادامه می دهیم که به فرم گراف ouput تبدیل کنیم. بالاخره، ما خروج UCCA xml را ایجاد می کنیم. نتیجه ارزیابی نشان می دهد که روش ما کیفیت خوبی UCCA xml را تولید می کند و یک کمک معنی برای زیر زمینه\u200cی بازنشستگی semantic در پردازش زبان طبیعی دارد.', 'sw': 'Papa hii inaelezea mfumo wa usafirishaji wa picha (Mfumo wa GT) kwa ajili ya SemEval 2019 Kazi 1: Uchunguzi wa lugha na Kimataifa ya UCCA (UCCA)1. Ujumbe wa Mfumo wa GT ni mbili za maandishi na kifaa chake kinachojulikana bila utambulisho, ambacho ni sehemu ya mfumo wa UCCA. Matokeo ya Mfumo wa GT ni sawa na jumla ya UCCA xml. Kutokana na wazo la picha na mabadiliko, tunafanya kazi nne muhimu wakati tunajenga Mfumo wa GT. Katika kazi ya kwanza, tunaelezea aina ya picha ya stanford inayotegemea maandishi ya input. Kisha tunabadilisha kuwa picha ya kati katika kazi ya pili. Katika juhudi la tatu, tunaendelea kubadilisha katika mfumo wa picha. Mwisho, tunatengeneza matokeo ya UCCA xml. Matokeo ya uchunguzi yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu inatengeneza ubora mzuri wa UCCA xml na in a mchango wa maana wa upinzani wa kimapenzi katika mchakato wa lugha ya asili.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan sistemin e transformimit të grafikut (GT System) për SemEval 2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)1. Hyrja e Sistemit GT është një çift teksti dhe xml i tij pa shënuar, i cili është një shtresë 0 pjesë e form ës UCCA. The output of GT System is the corresponding full UCCA xml.  Bazuar në idenë e ilustrimit dhe transformimit të grafikut, ne kryejmë katër detyra kryesore kur ndërtojmë Sistemin GT. Në detyrën e parë, ne ilustrojmë form ën grafike të varësive të Stanfords2 të tekstit të hyrjes. Pastaj ne transformojmë në një grafik të ndërmjetësuar në detyrën e dytë. Në detyrën e tretë, vazhdojmë të transformojmë në form ën e grafikut të daljes. Më në fund, ne krijojmë output UCCA xml. Rezultatet e vlerësimit tregojnë se metoda jonë gjeneron cilësi të mirë UCCA xml dhe ka një kontribut të rëndësishëm në nënfushën semantike të shtypjes në procesimin e gjuhës natyrore.', 'tr': "Bu kağıt SemEval 2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) GT Sisteminiň girişi bir metin çift we onuň bilinmedik xml-dir, bu da UCCA biçiminden bir gatlak 0 bölümidir. GT Sisteminiň çykyş dul UCCA xml'dir. Grafik suratlarynyň we üýtgewleriniň ideýasyna daýanýan bolsa, GT sistemini guranda dört sany işe ýetir. Ilkinji görelde, stanford baglançylygynyň 2-siniň girdi metiniň grafisini görkez. Sonra ikinji görevinde orta bir grafik olarak üýtgedik. Üçüncü görelde, ouput grafiki biçiminde üýtgetmeye devam edip duruyoruz. Soňunda UCCA çykyş xml bejerdik. Ýalňlamak netijesi biziň metodamyzyň UCCA xml gowy kaliýeti döredigini görkezýär we tebigy dil işlemlerinde semantik terjime etmek üçin wajyp täsiri bar.", 'am': '1: Cross-language Semantic Parsing with Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)1. የGT ስርዓት ውስጥ የጽሑፍ ሁለት እና ያልተሰየመ xml ነው፤ ይህም UCCA ፎርማት የ0 ደረጃ ነው። የGT ሲስተም ውጤት ሙሉ UCCA xml ነው። GT ስርዓት ሲሠራ አራት የዋነኛ ስራዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ At the first task, we illustrate the graph form of stanford dependencies2 of input text.  ከዚያም በሁለተኛው ስራ ውስጥ መካከለኛ ቀለም እናደርጋለን፡፡ በሦስተኛው ስራ ላይ እና ቀለም ፎርማት ለመለወጥ እንችላለን፡፡ በመጨረሻም የUCCA x ml ውጤት እናደርጋለን ምርጫው ውጤቶች የUCCA xml ጥሩ ሆኖ እንዲያሳየው እና በአዳማዊ ቋንቋ ክፍተት ውስጥ የsemantic repression sub field ጥያቄ መሆኑን የሚያስፈልጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'This paper describes the graph transfor-mation system (GT System) for SemEval 2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)1.  GT համակարգի ներմուծը մի զույգ տեքստ է և դրա աննոտացված xmL, որը UCCA ձևի 0 շերտ է: GT համակարգի արտադրությունը համապատասխանում է UCCA xmL-ին: Հիմնված գծագրի պատկերացման և վերափոխման գաղափարի վրա, մենք կատարում ենք չորս հիմնական առաջադրանքներ GT համակարգի կառուցման ժամանակ: Առաջին հանձնարարության ընթացքում մենք պատկերում ենք Ստենֆորդի կախվածությունների գրաֆիկական ձևը: Այնուհետև մենք վերածվում ենք միջին գծագրի երկրորդ խնդրում: Երրորդ խնդրի ժամանակ մենք շարունակում ենք վերածվել գրաֆիկի ձևի: Վերջապես մենք ստեղծում ենք UCCA xmL արտադրությունը: The evaluation results show that our method generates good-quality UCCA xml and has a meaningful contribution to the semantic represetation sub-field in Natural Language Processing.', 'az': "Bu kağıt 2019 Yarım Eval üçün Grafik Transfor-mation Sistemini (GT Sistemi) təsbiq edir: Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) ilə çox dilli Semantic Parsing təsbiq edir.1 GT Sisteminin girişi iki mətndir və onun bilinmədən xml. Bu, UCCA formunun 0-katı parçasıdır. GT Sisteminin çıxış tam UCCA xml idi. GT Sistemini inşa etdikdə dörd ana işlər etdik. İlk işdə, Stanford bağlılıqlarının grafiğini göstəririk. Sonra ikinci iş içində orta grafə dönüşürüz. Üçüncü işdə, ouput grafı formasına dəyişməyə devam edirik. Sonunda UCCA xml'i yaradırıq. Qıymet sonuçları, metodumuzun yaxşı kaliteli UCCA xml yaratdığını göstərir və təbiətli dil işləməsində semantik represetasyon altı sahəsinə anlamlı bir qismi var.", 'bn': 'এই কাগজটি সেমEval ২০১৯ কাজের জন্য গ্রাফ পরিবর্তন-মেশন সিস্টেমের (জিটি সিস্টেম) বর্ণনা করেছে: বিশ্ববিদ্যালয় কনসেপ্টুয়াল কোন্সিয়েটিভ অ্যানোটেশন ( GT সিস্টেমের ইনপুট একটি জোড়া টেক্সট এবং এর অজানা এক্সএল, যা UCCA ফর্মের একটি স্তরের ০ অংশ। GT সিস্টেমের আউটপুট হচ্ছে পূর্ণ UCCA এক্সএল। গ্রাফের কল্পনা এবং পরিবর্তনের চিন্তার ভিত্তিতে জিটি সিস্টেম বানানোর সময় আমরা চার প্রধান কাজ করি। প্রথম কাজে আমরা স্ট্যান্ডফোর্ডের গ্রাফ ফোর্ডের ফার্মটি ব্যাখ্যা করি ইনপুটের লেখার উপর নির্ভর করা ২ তারপর আমরা দ্বিতীয় কাজের মধ্যে একটা গ্রাফে পরিবর্তন করি। তৃতীয় কাজে আমরা অগ্রাফ ফর্মে পরিবর্তন করছি। অবশেষে, আমরা উৎপাদন UCCA এক্সএল তৈরি করি। মূল্যের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি ভাল মান ইউসিকিএ এক্সএমএল তৈরি করে এবং প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ার সামান্যিক পুনরুদ্ধার সাব', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje graf transfor-mation sistem (GT sistem) za pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 1: krstojezičko semantičko razmatranje sa univerzalnom konceptualnom kognitivnom Annotacijom (UCCA)1. Uvoz GT sustava je par teksta i njen nepoznat xml, koji je sloj 0 dio oblika UCCA-a. Izvoz GT sistema je odgovarajući puni UCCA xml. Na temelju ideje ilustracije i transformacije grafika, obavljamo četiri glavne zadatke kada izgradimo GT sistem. Na prvom zadatku, ilustrujemo grafički oblik stanfordske zavisnosti 2 teksta. Onda pretvaramo u prosječni grafik u drugom zadatku. Na trećem zadatku, nastavljamo da se pretvaramo u oblik ouput grafika. Konačno stvorimo izlaz UCCA xml. Rezultati procjene pokazuju da naša metoda stvara kvalitetnu UCCA xml i ima značajan doprinos podpolju semantičke represetacije u procesu prirodnog jezika.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el sistema de transformació del gràfic (GT System) per SemEval 2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation (UCCA)1. La entrada de GT System és un parell de text i el seu xml sense notar, que és una capa 0 part de form a UCCA. La producció del GT System és la correspondent UCCA xml. Sobre la idea d'il·lustració i transformació del gràfic, fem quatre tasques principals al construir el Sistema GT. En la primera tasca, il·lustrem la forma de gràfic de les dependencies d'Stanford 2 del text d'entrada. Ens transformem en un gràfic intermedi en la segona tasca. At the third task, we continue to transform into ouput graph form.  Finalment, creem la producció UCCA xml. The evaluation results show that our method generates good-quality UCCA xml and has a meaningful contribution to the semantic represetation sub-field in Natural Language Processing.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje grafový transforační systém (GT System) pro SemEval 2019 Úloha 1: Cross-jazyční sémantické parsování s univerzální koncepční kognitivní anotací (UCCA)1. Vstupem GT System je dvojice textu a jeho nezapsaný xml, který je vrstvou 0 součástí UCCA formuláře. Výstupem GT System je odpovídající plná UCCA xml. Na základě myšlenky grafové ilustrace a transformace plníme čtyři hlavní úkoly při stavbě GT systému. V prvním úkolu je ilustrována grafová forma stanfordových závislostí vstupního textu. V druhém úkolu se pak přeměníme na mezigraf. Ve třetím úkolu pokračujeme v transformaci do výstupního grafu. Nakonec vytvoříme výstup UCCA xml. Výsledky hodnocení ukazují, že naše metoda generuje kvalitní UCCA xml a má smysluplný přínos do sémantického reprezentačního podpole ve zpracování přirozeného jazyka.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die graaf transfor- mation stelsel (GT Stelsel) vir semiEval 2019 Opdrag 1: Cross- language Semantic verwerking met Universele Konsensuele Cognitive Annotation (UCCA) 1. 1. Die invoer van GT Stelsel is 'n paar teks en sy onbekende xml, wat is 'n laag 0 deel van UCCA vorm. Die uitset van GT stelsel is die ooreenstemmende volle UCCA xml. Basies op die idee van graaf ilustrasie en transformasie, ons uitvoer vier hoofde taak wanneer GT stelsel bou. By die eerste taak, ons illustreer die graafvorm van stanford afhanklikheid2 van invoer teks. Ons transformeer dan na 'n middelgrafiek in die tweede taak. By die derde taak, gaan ons voortgaan om te transformeer na ouput graafvorm. Eindelik skep ons die uitset UCCA xml. Die evaluasie resultate vertoon dat ons metode genereer goed-kwaliteit UCCA xml en het 'n betekende bydraag aan die semantiese hersteling sub-veld in Natuurlike Taal Prosessering.", 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse SemEval 2019 ülesande 1: keeleülene semantiline parsing koos universaalse kontseptuaalse kognitiivse annotatsiooniga (UCCA)1 graafilise transformatsioonisüsteemi (GT System). GT System sisend on paar teksti ja selle märkimata xml, mis on UCCA vormi 0 osa. GT System väljund on vastav täielik UCCA xml. Graafiku illustratsiooni ja muundamise ideele tuginedes täidame GT Systemi ehitamisel neli põhiülesannet. Esimesel ülesandel illustreerime sisendteksti stanfordi sõltuvuste2 graafikujäru. Seejärel teisendame teises ülesandes vahepealseks graafikuks. Kolmanda ülesande puhul jätkame muundamist väljundgraafiku kujul. Lõpuks loome väljundi UCCA xml. Hindamise tulemused näitavad, et meie meetod genereerib kvaliteetset UCCA xml ja annab olulise panuse semantilise representatsiooni alamvaldkonda looduskeele töötlemisel.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan SemEval 2019 Tehtävä 1: Kieltenvälinen semanttinen käsittely yleismaailmallisella käsitteellisellä kognitiivisella annotoinnilla (UCCA)1:n graafisen transfor-matiikkajärjestelmän (GT-järjestelmä). GT Systemin syöte on tekstipari ja sen merkitsemätön xml, joka on kerros 0 osa UCCA-lomaketta. GT Systemin tuotos on vastaava täysi UCCA xml. Graafisen havainnoinnin ja muuntamisen idean pohjalta suoritamme neljä päätehtävää GT Systemin rakentamisessa. Ensimmäisessä tehtävässä havainnollistamme syöttötekstin stanfordin riippuvuuksien2 graafisen muodon. Sitten muutamme välikaavioksi toisessa tehtävässä. Kolmannessa tehtävässä jatkamme muuntamista ouput graph -muotoon. Lopuksi luomme tulosteen UCCA xml. Arviointitulokset osoittavat, että menetelmämme tuottaa korkealaatuista UCCA xml:ta ja että sillä on merkittävä vaikutus luonnollisen kielen prosessoinnin semanttiseen repretaatioon.', 'jv': 'This paper describs the graphic translation for-mation System input of GT System is a para of text and it is the unalted xml, that is a layer 0 share of OCC format. output GT System iki ono melungane xml wong. Ngawe kang basa ning kedhanan surat karo nggambar lan transformasi, kita tigang 4 dadi panggunaké nung nggawe Sistem GT. Nang task perusahaan, kita lagi nggambar perusahaan seneng pisan nggambar 2 ng teks input Laptop" and "Desktop Nang pangantung wis telu, kita ngulinakake batir barang user Wulangan tengah unduh sistem menehi kelompok aturan sira nggawe barang kelompok ngono cara-kalitas Universal', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מתארת את מערכת הפרסומת הגרף (מערכת GT) עבור SemEval 2019 משימה 1: בדיקת סמנטית דרך שפתיים עם ניתוח קוניטיבי אוניברסלי (UCCA)1. הכניסה של מערכת GT היא זוג טקסט והxml שלה ללא ניתוח, שהוא חלק שכבה 0 של טופס UCCA. The output of GT System is the corresponding full UCCA xml.  בהתבסס על הרעיון של איזור גרף ושינוי, אנחנו מבצעים ארבעה משימות ראשיות כשבנינו מערכת GT. במשימה הראשונה, אנחנו מציגים את צורת הגרף של תלויות סטנפורד 2 של טקסט הכניסה. ואז אנחנו משתנים לגרף בינוני במשימה השנייה. במשימה השלישית, אנו ממשיכים להפוך לצורת גרף. סוף סוף, אנחנו יוצרים את ההוצאה UCCA xml. תוצאות הערכה מראות שהשיטה שלנו יוצרת איכות טובה UCCA xml ויש לה תרומה משמעותית לתי-שדה הדיכוי הסמנטי בתהליך השפה הטבעית.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan grafski transfor-matični sistem (GT System) za SemEval 2019 naloga 1: Medjezično semantično razpravljanje z univerzalno konceptualno kognitivno opombo (UCCA)1. Vhod sistema GT je par besedila in njegov neobvezan xml, ki je plast 0 del obrazca UCCA. Izhod sistema GT je ustrezna polna UCCA xml. Na podlagi ideje grafične ilustracije in transformacije izvajamo štiri glavne naloge pri gradnji sistema GT. Pri prvi nalogi ponazarjamo grafično obliko stanfordovih odvisnosti2 vhodnega besedila. Nato se v drugi nalogi pretvorimo v vmesni graf. Pri tretji nalogi se še naprej preoblikujemo v obliko izhodnega grafa. Na koncu ustvarimo izhod UCCA xml. Rezultati vrednotenja kažejo, da naša metoda ustvarja kakovostno UCCA xml in pomembno prispeva k semantičnemu reprezentacijskemu podpolju v obdelavi naravnega jezika.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཡན་ལག་ལེན་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་བཀོད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་རིམ་པ(GT System) for SemEval 2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with Universal Conceptual Cognitive Annotation GT མ་ལག་གི་འཇུག་ཚུལ་འདི་ཡིག་གེ་དང་འདིའི་རྒྱུས་མེད་པའི་xml གཉིས་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན། དེ་ནི་ UCCA རྣམ་པའི་བང་རིམ 0 རྣམ་གྲངས། GT མ་ལག་གི་ཨའུཊ་པུཊ་དེ་ཆ་མཉམ་ཡོད་པའི་UCCA xml ཡིག་ཆ་མཚུངས་པ འུ་ཅག་གི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་བཀྲམ་སྟོན་དང་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་ལ་གཞི་བཞག་ཡོད་པའི་དོན་ལ། ང་ཚོས་རྩ་བའི་བྱ་སྟངས་འདི་བཞིན་ བྱ་འགུལ་དང་པོ་དེ་ལ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་བཅས་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྩོམ་པ་གྱི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་མཉམ་དུ་སྟོན་ཡོད། དེ་ནས་ང་ཚོས་བྱ་འགུལ་གཉིས་པ་ནང་གི་རྣམ་གྲངས་རིགས་ཤིག་གི་བཟོ་བཅོས་བ་རེད། དེ་ལས་བྱས་གསུམ་པ་ལ་ང་ཚོ་འཕྲོ་མཐུད་དུ་རྣམ་པ་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་འགྱུར་བ་ནི། མཐའ་མར་མ་དེ་ལ། འུ་ཚོས་ཨའུཊི་པུཊི་UCCA xml གསར་འཛུགས་བྱེད། དབྱེ་ཞིབ་གི་གནད་དོན་དག་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་རིམ་པ་སྒྲིག་ཚད་ལྡན་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་པའི་ལྡོག་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་སྒྲིག་ནང་དུ་ཚོ', 'ha': "Bu takardan na bayyana the graf transfor-mation system (GT system) wa SemEL 2019 Tafiyar da 1: KCharselect unicode block name Ƙarawar GT na zama nau'i biyu na rubutu da ba'a san xml, wanda ke zama wani zane 0 na tsarin UCCA. Babbar da na GT na da cikakken UCCA xml. Basan da zaɓen shiryarwa na graph, za mu yi aiki huɗu a lokacin da za'a gina tsarin GT. Ga aikin na farko, muna bayyana fomat na stanfo da inganci na matsayin input2. We then transform into an intermediate graph in the second task.  Ga aikin na uku, za'a shige mu zuwa tsarin grafi. Gani, za'a sami gabatar da UCCA xml. Ana nuna cewa metodenmu yana ƙiƙiro tsari mai kyau na UCCA xml kuma yana da wani ma'auni zuwa sub-field na haramtar ranar zaman kashi na Asuraci."}
{'en': 'MaskParse@Deskin at SemEval-2019 Task 1 : Cross-lingual UCCA Semantic Parsing using Recursive Masked Sequence Tagging', 'ar': 'MaskParse @ Deskin في SemEval-2019 المهمة 1: التحليل الدلالي متعدد اللغات UCCA باستخدام علامات التسلسل المقنع العودية', 'pt': 'MaskParse@Deskin em SemEval-2019 Tarefa 1: Análise semântica UCCA multilíngue usando marcação de sequência mascarada recursiva', 'es': 'MaskParse @Deskin en SemeVal-2019 Tarea 1: Análisis semántico de UCCA en varios idiomas mediante el etiquetado recursivo de secuencias enmascaradas', 'fr': "MaskParse @Deskin à SemEval-2019 Tâche 1\xa0: Analyse sémantique UCCA multilingue à l'aide du marquage récursif de séquences masquées", 'ja': 'MaskParse @ Deskin at SemEval -2019 Task 1:再帰的マスクされたシーケンスタグを使用したクロスリンガルUCCAセマンティック解析', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 1 पर MaskParse@Deskin: क्रॉस-लिंगुअल यूसीसीए सिमेंटिक पार्सिंग पुनरावर्ती नकाबपोश अनुक्रम टैगिंग का उपयोग करके पार्सिंग', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019 事 1 MaskParse@Deskin:递归掩码跨语 UCCA 语义解析', 'ru': 'MaskParse@Deskin на SemEval-2019 Задача 1: Межъязычный семантический разбор UCCA с использованием рекурсивной маскированной маркировки последовательностей', 'ga': 'MaskParse@Deskin ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 1: Parsáil Shéimeantach UCCA Trastheangach ag úsáid Clibeáil Seicheamh Masc Athchúrsach', 'ka': 'MaskParse@Deskin semiEval-2019 დავალება 1: უფრო ენგური UCCA Semantic Parsing', 'el': 'MaskParse@Deskin Εργασία 1: Διάγλωσση Σημαντική Ανάλυση με χρήση ανακλαστικής μάσκας ακολουθίας', 'hu': 'MaskParse@Deskin A SemEval-2019 feladat 1: Többnyelvű UCCA szemantikus értelmezés rekurzív maszkos szekvencia címkézéssel', 'it': 'MaskParse@Deskin at SemEval-2019 Task 1: Analisi semantica UCCA cross-lingual utilizzando Recursive Masked Sequence Tagging', 'kk': 'MaskParse@Deskin 1- тапсырма жарым- Eval- 2019 жылы: қалқалаған қалқаламды тегтерді қолдану үшін көп- тілді UCCA жарым талдау', 'lt': 'MaskParse@Deskin 1 užduotis: tarpkalbinis UCCA seminis analizavimas naudojant rekursyvų maskuotą sekos žymėjimą', 'ms': 'MaskParse@Deskin - di SemEval-2019 Tugas 1: Penghuraian Semantik UCCA saling bahasa menggunakan Tagging Sekuensi Bertopeng Rekursif', 'mk': 'MaskParse@Deskin - на SemEval-2019 задача 1: Семантично анализирање на меѓујазикот UCCA користејќи рекурсивно маскирано означување на секвенција', 'mt': 'MaskParse@Deskin - f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 1: Parizzazzjoni Semantika translingwistika UCCA bl-użu ta’ Tagging tas-Sekwenza Maskata Rikorsiva', 'ml': 'MaskParse@Deskin സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 1: റിക്സുറസിവ് മാസ്റ്റ് ചെയ്ത സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ക്രോസ്- ലിങ്ക് യുസിക്കി ല', 'no': 'MaskParse@Deskin @ item: inlistbox', 'mn': 'MaskParse@Deskin SemEval-2019 Task 1: Cross-language UCCA Semantic Parsing using Recursive Masked sequence Tagging', 'pl': 'MaskParse@Deskin Zadanie 1: Wielojęzyczne parowanie semantyczne UCCA przy użyciu rekursywnego tagowania sekwencji maskowanej', 'ro': 'MaskParse@Deskin Sarcina 1: Interpretarea semantică translingvă UCCA folosind etichetarea secvenței mascate recursive', 'sr': 'MaskParse@Deskin Na pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 1: Semantičko analiziranje preko jezika UCCA koristeći rekursivnu maskiranu sekvencu', 'si': 'MaskParse@Deskin @ item: inlistbox', 'sv': 'MaskParse@Deskin på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 1: Tvärspråkig UCCA Semantic Parsing med Recursive Masked Sequence Tagging', 'so': 'MaskParse@Deskin Shaqo 1: Cross-language UCCA Semantic Parsing using Recursive Masked Sequence Tagging', 'ta': 'MaskParse@Deskin செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 1: குறுக்கு- மொழி UCCA செமாண்டிக் பாசிங் மீண்டும் தொகுதி வரிசை ஒட்டி பயன்படுத்தும்', 'ur': 'MaskParse@Deskin سیم Eval-2019 ٹاکس ۱ میں: کروس-زبان UCCA سیمنٹی پارسینگ کے مطابق دوبارہ ماسک سکوئنس ٹاگ کے مطابق', 'uz': 'MaskParse@Deskin Eval- 2019 vazifa 1: Recursive Masked Sequence Tagging using Cross- language UCCA Semantic Parsing', 'vi': 'MaskParse@Deskin Tại Nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm tê 1: Cắt con rối giao bằng thâm lún vào lớp phân tích bằng tần số mặt nạ', 'hr': 'MaskParse@Deskin Na pola evaluacije-2019. zadatak 1: Semantičko proučavanje preko jezika UCCA s primjenom rekursivnog označavanja maskiranog sekvence', 'da': 'MaskParse@Deskin på SemEval-2019 Opgave 1: Tværsproget UCCA Semantic Parsing ved hjælp af Recursive Masked Sequence Tagging', 'nl': 'MaskParse@Deskin Taak 1: Cross-lingual UCCA Semantic Parsing met behulp van recursieve gemaskerde sequentie tagging', 'de': 'MaskParse@Deskin Aufgabe 1: Cross-lingual UCCA Semantic Parsing mittels rekursiver maskierter Sequenz Tagging', 'id': 'MaskParse@Deskin - di SemEval-2019 Tugas 1: Penganalisan Semantik UCCA saling bahasa menggunakan Tagging Sekuensi Bertopeng Recursif', 'ko': 'MaskParse@DeskinSemEval-2019 작업 1: 반복 엄폐 시퀀스 태그를 사용한 다중 언어 UCCA 의미 분석', 'fa': 'MaskParse@Deskin در نیمه\u200cEval-2019 کار ۱: پاداش\u200cبندی متوسط زبان UCCA با استفاده از برچسب\u200cبندی\u200cهای متوسط ماسک دوباره', 'sw': 'MaskParse@Deskin Hifadhi ya SemEval-2019 1: Kimbuzi cha UCCA kwa lugha ya Cross-language kwa kutumia mifumo ya vifusi', 'tr': 'MaskParse@Deskin at SemEval-2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual UCCA Semantic Parsing using Recursive Masked Sequence Tagging', 'af': 'MaskParse@Deskin Na semiEval- 2019 Opdrag 1: Cross- language UCCA Semantic Parsing gebruik Rekursief Masked Sequence Tagging', 'sq': 'MaskParse@Deskin - në SemEval-2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual UCCA Semantic Parsing using Recursive Masked Sequence Tagging', 'am': 'MaskParse@Deskin Eval-2019 ስራ 1: Cross-language UCCA Semantic Parsing using Recursive Masked Sequence Tagging', 'bg': 'MaskParse@Deskin Задача 1: Семантично анализиране на междуезичен език чрез маркиране на рекурсивна маскирана последователност', 'hy': 'MaskParse@Deskin Դադար', 'az': 'MaskParse@Deskin Yarı-Eval-2019 Gözəl 1: Dərli-dilli UCCA Semantik Analizi Rekursiv Maskalı Sıradan Etiket', 'bn': 'MaskParse@Deskin সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ১: পুনরাবৃত্তিক মাসের মাধ্যমে ক্রস-ভাষায় ইউসিকিএ সেম্যান্টিক পার্সিং ব্যবহার করে ক্রস-ভাষা', 'ca': "MaskParse@Deskin - a SemEval-2019 tasca 1: Analització Semàtica translingüística de l'UCCA utilitzant etiquetes de seqüència mascada recursiva", 'bs': 'MaskParse@Deskin Na pola evaluacije-2019. zadatak 1: Semantičko analiziranje preko jezika UCCA koristeći rekursivno maskiranu sekvencu', 'cs': 'MaskParse@Deskin Úkol 1: Cross-lingual UCCA Sémantic Parsing pomocí rekursivního maskovaného sekvenčního tagování', 'fi': 'MaskParse@Deskin SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 1: Kielten välinen UCCA Semanttinen parsing käyttäen rekursiivista masked sequence taggingia', 'et': 'MaskParse@Deskin at SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 1: Keeleülene UCCA semantiline parsimine rekursiivse maskeeritud järjestuse sildistamise abil', 'jv': 'MaskParse@Deskin undo-type', 'ha': 'MaskParse@Deskin  at SemEval-2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual UCCA Semantic Parsing using Recursive Masked Sequence Tagging', 'he': 'MaskParse@Deskin  at SemEval-2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual UCCA Semantic Parsing using Recursive Masked Sequence Tagging', 'sk': 'MaskParse@Deskin Naloga 1: Medjezično semantično razporejanje UCCA z uporabo rekursivnega maskega zaporedja označevanja', 'bo': 'MaskParse@Deskin • at SemEval-2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual UCCA Semantic Parsing using Recursive Masked Sequence Tagging'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our recursive system for SemEval-2019 Task 1 : Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with UCCA. Each recursive step consists of two parts. We first perform semantic parsing using a sequence tagger to estimate the probabilities of the UCCA categories in the sentence. Then, we apply a decoding policy which interprets these probabilities and builds the graph nodes. Parsing is done recursively, we perform a first inference on the sentence to extract the main scenes and links and then we recursively apply our model on the sentence using a masking features that reflects the decisions made in previous steps. Process continues until the terminal nodes are reached. We chose a standard neural tagger and we focus on our recursive parsing strategy and on the cross lingual transfer problem to develop a robust model for the French language, using only few training samples', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظامنا التكراري لـ SemEval-2019 Task 1: التحليل الدلالي متعدد اللغات باستخدام UCCA. تتكون كل خطوة تكرارية من جزأين. نقوم أولاً بإجراء التحليل الدلالي باستخدام أداة تحديد التسلسل لتقدير احتمالات فئات UCCA في الجملة. بعد ذلك ، نطبق سياسة فك التشفير التي تفسر هذه الاحتمالات وتبني عقد الرسم البياني. يتم التحليل بشكل متكرر ، نقوم بإجراء أول استنتاج على الجملة لاستخراج المشاهد والروابط الرئيسية ثم نقوم بتطبيق نموذجنا بشكل متكرر على الجملة باستخدام ميزات إخفاء تعكس القرارات التي تم اتخاذها في الخطوات السابقة. تستمر العملية حتى يتم الوصول إلى العقد الطرفية. اخترنا أداة تمييز عصبية قياسية ونركز على إستراتيجية التحليل التكراري الخاصة بنا وعلى مشكلة النقل عبر اللغات لتطوير نموذج قوي للغة الفرنسية ، باستخدام عينات تدريب قليلة فقط', 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestro sistema recursivo para la Tarea 1 de SemEval-2019: Análisis semántico multilingüe con UCCA. Cada paso recursivo consta de dos partes. Primero realizamos análisis semántico utilizando un etiquetador de secuencia para estimar las probabilidades de las categorías UCCA en la oración. Luego, aplicamos una política de decodificación que interpreta estas probabilidades y construye los nodos del gráfico. El análisis se realiza de forma recursiva, realizamos una primera inferencia en la oración para extraer las escenas principales y los enlaces y luego aplicamos recursivamente nuestro modelo en la oración utilizando una función de enmascaramiento que refleja las decisiones tomadas en los pasos anteriores. El proceso continúa hasta que se llega a los nodos terminales. Elegimos un etiquetador neuronal estándar y nos centramos en nuestra estrategia de análisis recursivo y en el problema de la transferencia interlingüística para desarrollar un modelo robusto para el idioma francés, utilizando solo unas pocas muestras de entrenamiento', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre système récursif pour SEMEval-2019 Task 1\xa0: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with UCCA. Chaque étape récursive comprend deux parties. Nous effectuons d'abord une analyse sémantique à l'aide d'un séquenceur pour estimer les probabilités des catégories UCCA dans la phrase. Ensuite, nous appliquons une politique de décodage qui interprète ces probabilités et construit les nœuds du graphe. L'analyse se fait de manière récursive, nous effectuons une première inférence sur la phrase pour extraire les scènes principales et les liens, puis nous appliquons récursivement notre modèle sur la phrase à l'aide d'une fonction de masquage qui reflète les décisions prises lors des étapes précédentes. Le processus se poursuit jusqu'à ce que les nœuds terminaux soient atteints. Nous avons choisi un tagger neuronal standard et nous nous concentrons sur notre stratégie d'analyse récursive et sur le problème de transfert interlinguistique afin de développer un modèle robuste pour la langue française, en utilisant seulement quelques échantillons d'apprentissage", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nosso sistema recursivo para a Tarefa 1 do SemEval-2019: Análise semântica entre idiomas com UCCA. Cada passo recursivo consiste em duas partes. Primeiro realizamos a análise semântica usando um tagger de sequência para estimar as probabilidades das categorias UCCA na sentença. Em seguida, aplicamos uma política de decodificação que interpreta essas probabilidades e constrói os nós do grafo. A análise é feita de forma recursiva, realizamos uma primeira inferência na sentença para extrair as principais cenas e links e então aplicamos recursivamente nosso modelo na sentença usando recursos de mascaramento que refletem as decisões tomadas nas etapas anteriores. O processo continua até que os nós terminais sejam alcançados. Escolhemos um marcador neural padrão e nos concentramos em nossa estratégia de análise recursiva e no problema de transferência lingual cruzada para desenvolver um modelo robusto para o idioma francês, usando apenas algumas amostras de treinamento', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2019タスク1 ： UCCAとのクロスリンガルセマンティック解析のための再帰的システムについて説明する。各再帰ステップは2つの部分で構成されています。まず、シーケンスタグを使用してセマンティック解析を行い、文中のUCCAカテゴリの確率を推定します。次に、これらの確率を解釈し、グラフノードを構築するデコードポリシーを適用します。構文解析は再帰的に行われ、まず文に対して推論を行い、主要なシーンとリンクを抽出してから、前のステップでの決定を反映したマスキング機能を使用して文にモデルを再帰的に適用します。ターミナルノードに到達するまで処理を続行します。私たちは標準的なニューラルタガーを選択し、再帰的解析戦略とクロスリンガル転送問題に焦点を当てて、わずかなトレーニングサンプルを使用してフランス語のための堅牢なモデルを開発しました', 'zh': '本文述我SemEval-2019务1递归统,以UCCA跨语言语义解析。 每递归步驿二分。 先用序标记器行语义解析,以度句UCCA之概率。 然后以解码策解之概率而图形节点。 解析者,递归之所成也,一理以取大链接,然后用前策掩码功递归用吾法。 进程将继,至于终端节点。 吾等择一格之神经标器,专注吾递归解析策与跨语移问,以发一强法语模样,止用数练样本。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2019 कार्य 1 के लिए हमारी पुनरावर्ती प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है: UCCA के साथ क्रॉस-भाषी सिमेंटिक पार्सिंग। प्रत्येक पुनरावर्ती चरण में दो भाग होते हैं। हम पहले वाक्य में UCCA श्रेणियों की संभावनाओं का अनुमान लगाने के लिए एक अनुक्रम टैगर का उपयोग करके शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग करते हैं। फिर, हम एक डिकोडिंग नीति लागू करते हैं जो इन संभावनाओं की व्याख्या करती है और ग्राफ नोड्स का निर्माण करती है। पार्सिंग पुनरावर्ती रूप से किया जाता है, हम मुख्य दृश्यों और लिंक को निकालने के लिए वाक्य पर पहला अनुमान लगाते हैं और फिर हम पुनरावर्ती रूप से एक मास्किंग सुविधाओं का उपयोग करके वाक्य पर अपने मॉडल को लागू करते हैं जो पिछले चरणों में किए गए निर्णयों को दर्शाता है। प्रक्रिया तब तक जारी रहती है जब तक कि टर्मिनल नोड्स तक नहीं पहुंच जाते। हमने एक मानक तंत्रिका टैगर चुना और हम अपनी पुनरावर्ती पार्सिंग रणनीति पर और फ्रांसीसी भाषा के लिए एक मजबूत मॉडल विकसित करने के लिए क्रॉस लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर समस्या पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, केवल कुछ प्रशिक्षण नमूनों का उपयोग करके', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наша рекурсивная система для задачи 1 SemEval-2019: кросс-лингвистический семантический парсинг с UCCA. Каждый рекурсивный шаг состоит из двух частей. Сначала мы выполняем семантический синтаксический анализ с помощью тегера последовательностей для оценки вероятностей категорий UCCA в предложении. Затем мы применяем политику декодирования, которая интерпретирует эти вероятности и строит узлы графа. Разбор делается рекурсивно, мы делаем первый вывод о предложении, чтобы извлечь основные сцены и ссылки, а затем рекурсивно применяем нашу модель к предложению, используя маскирующие признаки, которые отражают решения, принятые на предыдущих шагах. Процесс продолжается до тех пор, пока не будут достигнуты терминальные узлы. Мы выбрали стандартный нейронный тегер и сосредоточились на нашей стратегии рекурсивного синтаксического анализа и на проблеме перекрестной языковой передачи, чтобы разработать надежную модель для французского языка, используя только несколько обучающих выборок', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcóras athfhillteach do Thasc 1 SemEval-2019: Parsáil Shéimeantach Thrasteangach le UCCA. Tá dhá chuid i ngach céim athchúrsach. Déanaimid parsáil shéimeantach ar dtús ag baint úsáide as clibeálaí seichimh chun na dóchúlachtaí sna catagóirí UCCA san abairt a mheas. Ansin, cuirimid polasaí díchódaithe i bhfeidhm a léirmhíníonn na dóchúlachtaí sin agus a thógann na nóid ghraif. Déantar an pharsáil go hathchúrsach, déanaimid an chéad tátal ar an abairt chun na príomh-radharcanna agus naisc a bhaint amach agus ansin cuirimid ár samhail i bhfeidhm go hathchúrsach ar an abairt ag baint úsáide as gnéithe cumhdaigh a léiríonn na cinntí a rinneadh sna céimeanna roimhe seo. Leanann an próiseas go dtí go sroichfear na nóid chríochfoirt. Roghnaíomar clibeálaí néaránach caighdeánach agus dírímid ar ár straitéis parsála athfhillteach agus ar an bhfadhb aistrithe tras-teangach chun samhail láidir a fhorbairt don Fhraincis, gan úsáid ach beagán samplaí oiliúna.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány ismerteti a SemEval-2019 1. feladat rekurzív rendszerét: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing UCCA-val. Minden rekurzív lépés két részből áll. Először a mondatban szereplő UCCA kategóriák valószínűségének becslésére végezzük a szemantikai elemzést egy sorozatgyűjtővel. Ezután egy dekódolási házirendet alkalmazunk, amely értelmezi ezeket a valószínűségeket és felépíti a gráf csomópontokat. A feldolgozás rekurzív módon történik, első következtetést végezünk a mondatról, hogy kivonjuk a fő jeleneteket és linkeket, majd rekurzív módon alkalmazzuk modellünket a mondatra olyan maszkoló funkciókkal, amelyek tükrözik az előző lépésekben hozott döntéseket. A folyamat addig folytatódik, amíg el nem érik a terminálcsomópontokat. Szabványos neurális címkézőt választottunk, és rekurzív elemzési stratégiánkra és a nyelvek közötti transzfer problémára összpontosítunk egy robusztus modell kidolgozására a francia nyelv számára, csak néhány képzési mintát használva.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το αναδρομικό μας σύστημα για την εργασία 1: Διάγλωσση Σημαντική Ανάλυση με UCCA. Κάθε αναδρομικό βήμα αποτελείται από δύο μέρη. Πρώτα κάνουμε σημασιολογική ανάλυση χρησιμοποιώντας ένα δείκτη ακολουθίας για να εκτιμήσουμε τις πιθανότητες των κατηγοριών UCCA στην πρόταση. Στη συνέχεια, εφαρμόζουμε μια πολιτική αποκωδικοποίησης που ερμηνεύει αυτές τις πιθανότητες και δημιουργεί τους κόμβους γραφήματος. Η ανάλυση γίνεται αναδρομικά, εκτελούμε ένα πρώτο συμπέρασμα για την πρόταση για να εξάγουμε τις κύριες σκηνές και τους συνδέσμους και στη συνέχεια εφαρμόζουμε αναδρομικά το μοντέλο μας στην πρόταση χρησιμοποιώντας χαρακτηριστικά απόκρυψης που αντικατοπτρίζουν τις αποφάσεις που έγιναν σε προηγούμενα βήματα. Η διαδικασία συνεχίζεται μέχρι να φτάσουν οι τερματικοί κόμβοι. Επιλέξαμε ένα τυποποιημένο νευρωνικό tagger και εστιάζουμε στη στρατηγική αναδρομικής ανάλυσης και στο πρόβλημα της διασυνοριακής μεταφοράς για να αναπτύξουμε ένα ισχυρό μοντέλο για τη γαλλική γλώσσα, χρησιμοποιώντας μόνο λίγα δείγματα εκπαίδευσης', 'ka': 'ჩვენი რეკურსიური სისტემა SemEval-2019 დავალების 1. დავალების განსაზღვრება: კრისი ენგური Semantic Parsing with UCCA. ყოველ რეკურსიური კონფიგურაცია ორი ნაწილის შექმნა. ჩვენ პირველად ვაკეთებთ სემონტიკური პარასუზაციის გამოყენება სექსიკური ტეგექტირების შესაძლებლობას გამოყენება. შემდეგ, ჩვენ გამოყენებთ დიკოდირების პოლიტიკის, რომელიც ამ შესაძლებლობების ინტერპუქციას და დავიყენებთ გრაფიკური კონდეები. პარამეტრება რეკსიგურად გავაკეთებულია, ჩვენ პირველი ინფრენციას წარმოდგენებთ მანძილური სენების და კავშირების გამოყენება და შემდეგ ჩვენ რეკსიგურად ჩვენი მოდელური გამოყენება მაქსინური ფუნ პროცესი გადასრულებულია, სანამ ტერმინალური კონდეები მიიღებენ. ჩვენ სტანდარული ნეიროლური ტეგეგერის მონიშნეთ და ჩვენი რეკურსიგური პანსტირების სტრატიგიაზე და კრესიგური ტრანსტირების პრობლემების გავაკეთეთ ძალიან მოდელი ფრანუს ენა', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il nostro sistema ricorsivo per SemEval-2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing con UCCA. Ogni passo ricorsivo è costituito da due parti. Per prima cosa eseguiamo l'analisi semantica utilizzando un tag di sequenza per stimare le probabilità delle categorie UCCA nella frase. Quindi, applichiamo una politica di decodifica che interpreta queste probabilità e costruisce i nodi grafici. Il parsing è fatto ricorsivamente, eseguiamo una prima inferenza sulla frase per estrarre le scene principali e i collegamenti e poi applichiamo ricorsivamente il nostro modello sulla frase utilizzando una funzione di mascheramento che riflette le decisioni prese nei passaggi precedenti. Il processo continua fino al raggiungimento dei nodi terminali. Abbiamo scelto un tag neurale standard e ci concentriamo sulla nostra strategia di analisi ricorsiva e sul problema del trasferimento cross-lingual per sviluppare un modello robusto per la lingua francese, utilizzando solo pochi campioni di formazione", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің қайталанатын жүйеңізді біртіндегі 1- тапсырма үшін тапсырманың қайталау жүйесін: UCCA- мен біртіндегі біртіндегі семантикалық талдау. Әрбір қайталанатын қадам екі бөліктен тұрады. Біз біріншіден UCCA санаттарының мүмкіндігін бағалау үшін реттегі тегжерін қолданып семантикалық талдауды орындаймыз. Содан кейін, бұл мүмкіндіктерді түсініп график түрлерін құру ережесін қолданамыз. Тапсырма қайталанбады, негізгі сәйкесті және сілтемелерді тарқату үшін бірінші сәйкестігін қайталап, кейін мәліметті қалқалау мүмкіндіктерімен қайталап қолданамыз. Процесс терминал түрлері жеткенше жалғастырады. Біз стандартты невралдық тегтерді таңдап, қайталанатын талдау стратегиясымызды және тілдерді көптеген аудару мәселелерімізді француз тілі үшін дұрыс үлгі моделін жасау үшін, тек бірнеше бақы', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma mūsų rekurencinė sistema „SemEval-2019“ 1 užduotis: tarpkalbinis Semantinis analizavimas su UCCA. Kiekvieną kartotinį žingsnį sudaro dvi dalys. We first perform semantic parsing using a sequence tagger to estimate the probabilities of the UCCA categories in the sentence.  Tada mes taikome dekodizavimo politiką, kuri aiškina šias tikimybes ir kuria grafinius mazgus. Paruošimas atliekamas pakartotinai, pirmą kartą darome išvadą apie sakinį, kad ištrauktume pagrindines scenas ir nuorodas, o paskui pakartotinai taikome savo model į į sakinį naudojant maskuojančias savybes, atspindinčias ankstesniuose etapuose priimtus sprendimus. Procesas tęsiasi tol, kol bus pasiekti galiniai mazgai. Pasirinkėme standartinį neurologinį žymenį ir daugiausia dėmesio skiriame mūsų rekurencinei analizavimo strategijai ir tarpkalbinio perdavimo problemai, kad parengtume tvirtą prancūzų kalbos model į, naudojant tik kelis mokymo pavyzdžius.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашиот рекурсивен систем за SemEval-2019 задача 1: Крајјазично семантичко анализирање со УККА. Секој рекурсивен чекор се состои од два дела. Прво спроведуваме семантично анализирање користејќи секвенциски тагер за проценка на веројатностите на категориите на УККА во реченицата. Потоа, применуваме политика на декодирање која ги интерпретира овие веројатности и ги гради графичките јазли. Анализирањето се прави рекурсивно, ние изведуваме прва конференција на реченицата за извлекување на главните сцени и врски и потоа рекурсивно го применуваме нашиот модел на реченицата користејќи маскирани карактеристики кои ги одразуваат одлуките донесени во претходните чекори. Процесот продолжува додека не се достигнат терминалните јазли. Избравме стандарден нервен означувач и се фокусираме на нашата рекусивна стратегија за анализирање и на проблемот со трансферот на меѓујазик за развој на силен модел за францускиот јазик, користејќи само неколку примероци за обука', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem rekursif kita untuk SemEval-2019 Tugas 1: Pengesahan Semantik Selata-Bahasa dengan UCCA. Setiap langkah rekursif terdiri dari dua bahagian. Kita pertama-tama melakukan penghuraian semantik menggunakan tag urutan untuk menghargai kemungkinan kategori UCCA dalam kalimat. Kemudian, kita gunakan polisi penyahkodan yang menerangkan kemungkinan ini dan membina nod graf. Menghurai dilakukan secara rekursif, kita melakukan kesimpulan pertama pada kalimat untuk mengekstrak adegan utama dan pautan dan kemudian kita rekursif melaksanakan model kita pada kalimat menggunakan ciri topeng yang mencerminkan keputusan yang dibuat dalam langkah terdahulu. Proses terus sehingga nod terminal dicapai. We chose a standard neural tagger and we focus on our recursive parsing strategy and on the cross lingual transfer problem to develop a robust model for the French language, using only few training samples', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2019 ടാസ്ക് 1: ക്രോസ്-ലിന്\u200dഗുള്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് യുസികായോടൊപ്പം കൊണ്ട് ക്രോസ്സ ഓരോ പിന്നീടും രണ്ട് ഭാഗങ്ങളിലാണ്. We first perform semantic parsing using a sequence tagger to estimate the probabilities of the UCCA categories in the sentence.  അപ്പോള്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഡികോഡിങ് പോലീസ് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഈ സാധ്യതകള്\u200d വ്യാഖ്യാപിക്കുകയും ഗ്രാഫ് നോഡുകള്\u200d  പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് വീണ്ടും ചെയ്യപ്പെട്ടു, പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സ്ഥലങ്ങളും ലിങ്കുകളും പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d വാക്കിന്റെ മുമ്പില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. മുന ടെര്\u200dമിനല്\u200d നോഡുകള്\u200d എത്തുന്നത് വരെ പ്രക്രിയ തുടരുന്നു. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സാധാരണ ന്യൂറല്\u200d ടാഗ്ഗര്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്തു. പിന്നെ നമ്മുടെ റിസ്റ്റര്\u200dച്ചിവ് പാര്\u200dസിഗ് സ്ട്രാറ്റിജിയിലും ക്രിസ്ലാന്\u200dസ് ഭാഷയില', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema rikorrenti tagħna għas-SemEval-2019 Kompitu 1: Analiżi Semantika Translingwi mal-UCCA. Kull pass rikorrenti jikkonsisti f’żewġ partijiet. L-ewwel nagħmlu analiżi semantika bl-użu ta’ tikkettatur tas-sekwenza biex nistmaw il-probabbiltà tal-kategoriji UCCA fis-sentenza. Imbagħad, napplikaw politika ta’ dekodifikazzjoni li tinterpreta dawn il-probabbiltà u tibni n-nodi tal-graff. L-analiżi ssir b’mod rikorrenti, nagħmlu l-ewwel inferenza dwar is-sentenza biex neħħew ix-xeni u r-rabtiet ewlenin u mbagħad nagħmlu l-mudell tagħna b’mod rikorrenti fuq is-sentenza billi nużaw karatteristiċi ta’ masking li jirriflettu d-deċiżjonijiet li ttieħdu f’passi preċedenti. Process continues until the terminal nodes are reached.  Aħżelna tikkettatur newrali standard u niffokaw fuq l-istrateġija ta’ analiżi rikorrenti tagħna u fuq il-problem a tat-trasferiment translingwi biex niżviluppaw mudell robust għall-lingwa Franċiża, bl-użu ta’ ftit kampjuni ta’ taħriġ biss', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний SemEval-2019 ажил 1-ийн дахин давтагдсан системийг тайлбарлаж байна: UCCA-тай олон хэлний Semantic Parsing. Дахин дахин дахин алхам бүр хоёр хэсэгт байдаг. Бид анхны дарааллын тагжуулагч ашиглаж UCCA категорийн магадлалыг тооцоолох боломжтой үйлдэл хийдэг. Дараа нь бид эдгээр магадлалыг илэрхийлж график цэгүүдийг бүтээж байгаа засгийн газрыг ашиглаж байна. Тайлбарлах нь дахин дахин хийгдсэн. Бид анхны үзүүлэлт болон холбоотой холбоотой гэсэн үг дээр анхны инфекцийг хийдэг. Дараа нь бид өмнөх алхам дээр хийсэн шийдвэрийг илэрхийлдэг хэлбэрээр загварыг дахин дахин ашиглаж өгүүлэлт Процесс терминал нууцууд хүртэх хүртэл үргэлжлүүлнэ. Бид стандарт мэдрэлийн тегжер сонгож, дахин дахин ажиллах стратегийг, хэл шилжүүлэх асуудал дээр анхаарлаа хандуулж, Французын хэл дээр зөвхөн хэд хэдэн сургалтын жишээг ашиглаж,', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver vår rekursiv system for semiEval-2019 oppgåve 1: Krysspråk semiantisk tolking med UCCA. Kvar rekursiv steg inneheld av to deler. Vi utfører først semantisk tolking med ein sekvenstagger for å vurdere sannsynlighetane for UCCA- kategoriane i setninga. Deretter bruker vi eit dekodingspolitikk som tolkar desse sannsynlege sannsynlege og bygger grafnodene. Tolking er gjennomført rekursivt, vi utfører ein første infeksjon på setninga for å pakka ut hovudscenene og lenkjer og så bruker vi modellen vårt på setninga rekursivt ved å bruka maskeringsfunksjonar som reflekserer avgjøringane i førre steg. Prosessen hald fram til terminalnodene er nådd. Vi valte ein standard neural tagger, og vi fokuserer på vår rekursiv tolkingsstrategi og på den krysssprøvningsproblemet for å utvikla ein robust modell for fransk språk, med bare få øvingsprøver', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz system rekursywny dla SemEval-2019 Zadanie 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with UCCA. Każdy krok rekursywny składa się z dwóch części. Najpierw wykonujemy parsowanie semantyczne za pomocą tagera sekwencji, aby oszacować prawdopodobieństwo kategorii UCCA w zdaniu. Następnie stosujemy politykę dekodowania, która interpretuje te prawdopodobieństwa i buduje węzły wykresu. Analiza odbywa się rekursywnie, wykonujemy pierwszą wniosek na zdanie, aby wyodrębnić główne sceny i linki, a następnie rekursywnie stosujemy nasz model na zdanie za pomocą funkcji maskowania, które odzwierciedlają decyzje podjęte w poprzednich krokach. Proces trwa aż do osiągnięcia węzłów końcowych. Wybraliśmy standardowy tager neuronowy i skupiamy się na naszej strategii rekursywnego parsowania oraz problemie transferu między językami, aby opracować solidny model dla języka francuskiego, wykorzystując tylko kilka próbek treningowych.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul nostru recursiv pentru SemEval-2019 Task 1: Interpretarea Semantică interlingvă cu UCCA. Fiecare pas recursiv constă din două părți. Mai întâi efectuăm analizarea semantică folosind un etichetor de secvență pentru a estima probabilitățile categoriilor UCCA din propoziție. Apoi, aplicăm o politică de decodare care interpretează aceste probabilități și construiește nodurile grafice. Parsing se face recursiv, efectuăm o primă deducție asupra propoziției pentru a extrage scenele principale și linkurile și apoi aplicăm recursiv modelul nostru asupra propoziției folosind o caracteristică de mascare care reflectă deciziile luate în pașii anteriori. Procesul continuă până când nodurile terminale sunt atinse. Am ales un etichetor neural standard și ne concentrăm pe strategia noastră de analizare recursivă și pe problema transferului interlingv pentru a dezvolta un model robust pentru limba franceză, folosind doar câteva mostre de instruire', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš rekursivni sistem za pola Evala-2019 zadatak 1: krstojezički semantički analizanje sa UCCA-om. Svaki rekursivni korak se sastoji od dva dijela. Prvo izvršavamo semantičku analizu koristeći tablicu sekvence da procenimo vjerojatnost kategorija UCCA u rečenici. Onda primjenjujemo politiku dekodiranja koja interpretira ove verovatnosti i izgradi graf čvorove. Oženjenje je određeno rekursivno, izvršimo prvu infekciju rečenice da izvučemo glavne scene i veze, a onda rekursivno primjenjujemo naš model na rečenicu koristeći maskiranje karakteristike koje odražavaju odluke donesene na prethodnim koracima. Proces se nastavlja dok ne stigne terminalni čvorovi. Izabrali smo standardnu neuralnu oznaku i fokusirali se na našu rekursivnu strategiju za analizu i na prekršeni jezički problem da razvijemo jak model francuskog jezika, koristeći samo nekoliko uzorka obuke', 'so': "Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka dib u soo celinta ee SemEval-2019 shaqo 1: Parsing afka Cross-language Semantic with UCCA. Qasab kasta oo dib u soo celinayo waxay ka mid yihiin laba qeybood. Marka ugu horeysa waxaynu sameynaa baaritaanka semantika si aan ugu qiimeyno suurtagalka kooxaha UCCA ee xafiiska. Markaas waxaynu codsanaynaa siyaasada deynta, taas oo turjumaya suurtagalkan iyo dhisaya hoyga sawirada. Markaas waxaa lagu sameeyaa baaritaanka, waxaynu ku sameynaa dhibaato ugu horraysa si aan u soo saarno sawirada iyo xiriirka ugu dhexeeya, kadibna waxaynu dib ugu codsanaynaa qaababka qaababka lagu soo jeedo goobaha hore ee go'aanka lagu sameeyay. Process wuxuu sii soconayaa ilaa uu gaadho goobaha ku yaala terminalka. Waxaannu doorannay qorshaha baaritaanka ee caadiga ah oo neurada ah, waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa qoraalka baaritaanka dib u dhigista iyo dhibaatada isbedelka luqada iskutallaabta ah si aan u korinno model boosto oo afka Faraansiinta ah, waxaynu isticmaalaynaa samooyinka wax yar oo tababarida", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt rekursiva system för SemEval-2019 Uppgift 1: Tvärspråkig semantisk tolkning med UCCA. Varje rekursivt steg består av två delar. Vi utför först semantisk tolkning med hjälp av en sekvenstaggare för att uppskatta sannolikheterna för UCCA-kategorierna i meningen. Sedan tillämpar vi en avkodningsprincip som tolkar dessa sannolikheter och bygger grafnoderna. Tolkning görs rekursivt, vi utför en första slutsats på meningen för att extrahera huvudscenerna och länkarna och sedan rekursivt tillämpar vi vår modell på meningen med hjälp av en maskeringsfunktion som återspeglar de beslut som fattats i tidigare steg. Processen fortsätter tills terminalnoderna nås. Vi valde en standard neural tagger och fokuserar på vår rekursiva parsningsstrategi och på det tvärspråkliga överföringsproblemet för att utveckla en robust modell för det franska språket, med endast ett fåtal träningsprover.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක පද්ධතිය සෙම්වෙල්-2019 වැඩේ 1: ක්\u200dරොස් භාෂාවික සෙමාන්ටික විශ්ලේෂණය UCCA ස හැම ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක පැත්තෙක්ම කොටස් දෙකක් තියෙනවා. අපි මුලින්ම සෙමාන්ටික් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා වාක්යේ UCCA වර්ගයක් ගැන සංභාවිත විශ්ලේෂණය අනුමාන කරන්න. ඊට පස්සේ, අපි ඩිකොඩින් පොලිසියක් භාවිතා කරනවා, ඒ වගේම මේ සංභාවත්වය අනුවිතරයි ග්\u200dරාෆ් නෝ විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරතිකාරණය කරලා තියෙනවා, අපි ප්\u200dරධාන ස්ථානය සහ සම්බන්ධය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධාන ස්ථානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධාන ස්ථානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිකාරය ස ටර්මිනල් නෝඩ්ස් ලැබෙන්න කලින් පරීක්ෂණය පටන් ගන්නවා. අපි ප්\u200dරමාණය න්\u200dයූරාල් ටැගර් එකක් තෝරාගත්තා, අපි අපේ ප්\u200dරමාණය විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதம் செம்Eval-2019 செயல் 1: கிராஸ்- மொழி செமாண்டிக் பாசிங் UCCA உடன். ஒவ்வொரு திரும்ப படி இரண்டு பகுதிகளில் உள்ளது. நாம் முதலில் ஒரு வரிசையில் ஒட்டி பாடலை பயன்படுத்தி UCCA வகுப்பின் வாக்கியத்திற்கு மதிப்பிட வேண்டும். பின்னர், நாம் ஒரு குறியீட்டு கொள்கையை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். அது இந்த சாத்தியங்களை விளக்குகிறது மற்றும் வரைபடத பாடல் மீண்டும் செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது, முக்கிய காட்சிகள் மற்றும் இணைப்புகளை வெளியேற்ற வாக்கியத்தில் முதல் பாதிப்பு செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது. பின்னர் நாம் முகத்த முனைய புள்ளிகள் அடையும் வரை செயல் தொடருகிறது. நாங்கள் ஒரு நிலையான புதிய ஒட்டி தேர்ந்தெடுத்தோம் மற்றும் நாம் எங்கள் திரும்ப ப பாடல் திட்டத்தை கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம் மற்றும் கிருஸ் மொ', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ہماری دوبارہ سیسٹم کی توصیف کرتا ہے کہ سیم ایوال-2019 ٹاکس ۱ کے لئے کروس-زبان سیمنٹی پارسینگ کے ساتھ۔ ہر دوبارہ دوبارہ قدم دو قسموں میں ہے۔ ہم پہلی بار سیمنٹی پارسینگ کو ایک سیمنٹ ٹاگر کے مطابق انجام دیتے ہیں کہ کلمز میں UCCA کاٹی کے احتمالات کا اندازہ لیں۔ پھر ہم ایک ڈیکوڈینگ پولیسی لازم کریں جو یہ احتمالات کا تعبیر کرتا ہے اور گراف نوڈ بناتا ہے۔ پارسینگ دوبارہ تکرار کر دی گئی ہے، ہم نے کلمز پر پہلی بار کفارہ کر دی ہے کہ اصلی صحیفوں اور لینکوں کو اٹھانے کے لئے اور پھر ہم دوبارہ اپنے مدل کو کلمز پر استعمال کرتے ہیں ایک ماسکینگ فرصت کے مطابق جو پہلے قدم میں فیصلہ کرتی ہے۔ پرسس ادامه دیتا ہے یہاں تک کہ ترمینل نوڈ پہنچ جاتی ہے. ہم نے ایک استاندارڈ نیورل ٹاگر کو انتخاب کیا اور ہم نے اپنے دوبارہ پارسینگ استراتژی پر تمرکز کیا اور کرس زبان ترنسیٹ مسئلہ پر فرنسی زبان کے لئے ایک مضبوط موڈل ایجاد کرنے کے لئے، صرف تھوڑے ٹرینیٹ نمونے کے است', 'uz': "Bu gaz SemEval-2019 Vazifa 1: UCCA bilan Cross-tillar Semantic Parsing. Har bir takrorlash orqali ikki qismga ega. We first perform semantic parsing using a sequence tagger to estimate the probabilities of the UCCA categories in the sentence.  Keyin biz bu haqida mavjud emas va grafik noylarini yaratish qoidani qoidamiz. Ko'rib chiqish, biz asosiy uslublarni va bogʻlamalarni chiqarish uchun birinchi muammolarni bajaramiz va keyin biz birinchi qadamni o'zgartirish uchun modelimizni qayta qo'llab qo'llab qo'yish imkoniyatlarini oldingi qadamdagi o'zgarishlarni ko'rsatish mumkin. Name Biz стандарт neyrolik taggerini tandik, biz qaytarik parsing strategimizga qarasamiz va tillar tarjima qilish muammolariga foydalanamiz va faqat bir necha ta'lim misollaridan foydalanish uchun foydalanuvchi modelni foydalanamiz.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả hệ thống đệ nhất của chúng ta với nhiệm vụ SemEvl-209: Con phân tích tinh dịch xuyên lục với UCCA. Mỗi bước xoay đều gồm hai phần. Trước tiên chúng ta thực hiện phân tích theo ngữ pháp dùng một hiệu lệnh để ước lượng cơ may của các phân loại UCCA trong câu. Sau đó, chúng tôi áp dụng chính sách giải mã, giải thích khả năng này và xây các nút đồ thị. Nghiên cứu được thực hiện thường xuyên, chúng tôi thực hiện một kết luận đầu tiên về câu án để trích ra các cảnh chính và kết nối và sau đó chúng tôi sử dụng hàng loạt mô hình của chúng tôi trên bản án sử dụng một tính năng che giấu phản ánh các quyết định trong những bước trước. Tiến trình tiếp tục cho đến khi đạt được các nút cuối. Chúng tôi đã chọn ra một giải pháp thần kinh tiêu chuẩn và chúng tôi tập trung vào chiến lược phân tích lại và vào vấn đề chuyển tiếp ngôn ngữ khác nhau để phát triển một mô hình vững chắc cho ngôn ngữ Pháp, sử dụng chỉ vài mẫu tập luyện', 'nl': 'Deze paper beschrijft ons recursieve systeem voor SemEval-2019 Taak 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with UCCA. Elke recursieve stap bestaat uit twee delen. We voeren eerst semantische parsing uit met behulp van een sequence tagger om de waarschijnlijkheid van de UCCA-categorieën in de zin te schatten. Vervolgens passen we een decoderingsbeleid toe dat deze waarschijnlijkheden interpreteert en de grafiekknooppunten bouwt. Parsen gebeurt recursief, we voeren een eerste conclusie uit op de zin om de belangrijkste scènes en links te extraheren en vervolgens passen we recursief ons model toe op de zin met behulp van een maskeringsfunctie die de beslissingen weergeeft die in eerdere stappen zijn genomen. Het proces gaat door tot de eindknooppunten zijn bereikt. We kozen voor een standaard neurale tagger en richten ons op onze recursieve parsing strategie en op het crosslingual transfer probleem om een robuust model te ontwikkelen voor de Franse taal, met slechts enkele trainingsvoorbeelden.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores rekursive system til SemEval-2019 Opgave 1: Tværsproget semantisk parsing med UCCA. Hvert rekursivt trin består af to dele. Vi udfører først semantisk parsing ved hjælp af en sekvenstagger til at estimere sandsynlighederne for UCCA kategorierne i sætningen. Derefter anvender vi en afkodningspolitik, der fortolker disse sandsynligheder og bygger grafknuderne. Parsing foretages rekursivt, vi udfører en første konklusion på sætningen for at udtrække hovedscenerne og links og derefter rekursivt anvender vi vores model på sætningen ved hjælp af en maskering funktioner, der afspejler beslutningerne truffet i tidligere trin. Processen fortsætter indtil terminalknuderne er nået. Vi valgte en standard neural tagger og fokuserer på vores rekursive parsing strategi og på tværsproget overførselsproblem for at udvikle en robust model for det franske sprog, ved hjælp af kun få træningsprøver', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš rekursivni sustav za pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 1: krstojezičko semantičko analiziranje s UCCA-om. Svaki rekursivni korak sastoji se od dva dijela. Prvo provodimo semantičku analizu koristeći označavač sekvencije kako bi procijenili vjerojatnost kategorija UCCA-a u rečenici. Onda primjenjujemo politiku dekodiranja koja interpretira ove mogućnosti i izgradi grafičke čvorove. Procjenjivanje je određeno rekursivno, izvršimo prvu infekciju na rečenici da izvučemo glavne scene i veze, a onda rekursivno primjenjujemo naš model na rečenici koristeći maskiranje karakteristike koja odražava odluke donijene na prethodnim koracima. Proces nastavlja dok se ne postignu terminalni čvorovi. Izabrali smo standardnu neuralnu oznake i fokusirali se na našu rekursivnu strategiju za analizu i na problem prekršnog jezičkog prijenosa kako bi razvili jak model francuskog jezika, koristeći samo nekoliko uzorka obuke', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt unser rekursives System für SemEval-2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with UCCA. Jeder rekursive Schritt besteht aus zwei Teilen. Zuerst führen wir semantisches Parsen mit einem Sequenz-Tagger durch, um die Wahrscheinlichkeiten der UCCA-Kategorien im Satz zu schätzen. Dann wenden wir eine Dekodierungsrichtlinie an, die diese Wahrscheinlichkeiten interpretiert und die Graphenknoten erstellt. Das Parsen erfolgt rekursiv, wir führen eine erste Inferenz auf den Satz durch, um die Hauptszenen und Links zu extrahieren, und dann wenden wir rekursiv unser Modell auf den Satz an, indem wir eine Maskierungsfunktion verwenden, die die Entscheidungen in früheren Schritten widerspiegelt. Der Prozess wird fortgesetzt, bis die Klemmenknoten erreicht sind. Wir haben uns für einen Standard-neuronalen Tagger entschieden und konzentrieren uns auf unsere rekursive Parsing-Strategie und das translinguale Transferproblem, um ein robustes Modell für die französische Sprache zu entwickeln, wobei nur wenige Trainingsbeispiele verwendet werden.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem rekursif kita untuk SemEval-2019 Tugas 1: Parsing Semantik Bersaling Bahasa dengan UCCA. Setiap langkah rekursif terdiri dari dua bagian. Pertama kita melakukan penghuraian semantis menggunakan tag urutan untuk memperkirakan kemungkinan dari kategori UCCA dalam kalimat. Kemudian, kita menerapkan kebijakan dekoding yang menerangkan kemungkinan ini dan membangun node grafik. Analisasi dilakukan secara rekursif, kami melakukan kesimpulan pertama pada kalimat untuk mengekstrak adegan utama dan link dan kemudian kami rekursif menerapkan model kami pada kalimat menggunakan fitur penyamaran yang mencerminkan keputusan yang dibuat dalam langkah sebelumnya. Proses terus berlanjut sampai node terminal dicapai. Kami memilih tagger saraf standar dan kami fokus pada strategi penghuraian rekursif kami dan pada masalah transfer bahasa salib untuk mengembangkan model yang kuat untuk bahasa Perancis, menggunakan hanya beberapa sampel pelatihan', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaelezea mfumo wetu wa kurejea kwa ajili ya SemEval-2019 Kazi 1: Uimbaji wa lugha ya Cross-language Semantic Parsing with UCCA. Kila hatua ya kurejea ni sehemu mbili. Kwanza tunafanya uchimbaji wa kimapenzi kwa kutumia mabango ya mfululizo ili kudhani uwezekano wa makundi ya UCCA katika hukumu hiyo. Kisha, tunatumia sera ya kupunguza inayotafsiri uwezekano huu na kujenga maeneo ya picha. Uimbaji umefanywa mara kwa mara, tunafanya maambukizi ya kwanza kwenye hukumu hiyo ili kuondoa mitazamo ya msingi na viungo vya kijamii na kisha kwa mara tunatumia muundo wetu kwenye hukumu hiyo kwa kutumia alama za kifua inayoonyesha maamuzi yaliyofanywa katika hatua zilizopita. Process continues until the terminal nodes arrive. Tumechagua bendera ya kawaida ya neurali na tunajikita kwenye mkakati wetu wa mabadiliko na tatizo la usafirishaji wa lugha kwa ajili ya kutengeneza muundo wa roboti kwa lugha ya Kifaransa, kwa kutumia sampuli chache tu za mafunzo', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-2019 임무1: UCCA의 다중 언어 의미 분석의 귀속 시스템을 묘사했다.각 귀속 절차는 두 부분으로 구성된다.먼저 문장의 UCCA 카테고리의 확률을 추정하기 위해 시퀀스 태그를 사용하여 의미 분석을 수행합니다.그리고 우리는 디코딩 전략을 응용하여 이러한 확률을 설명하고 그림 노드를 구축한다.해석은 귀착적으로 진행된다. 우리는 먼저 문장에 대해 추리를 해서 주요 장면과 링크를 추출한 다음에 우리는 앞에서 결정한 엄폐 특징을 반영하여 문장에 귀착적으로 우리의 모델을 응용한다.이 과정은 터미널 노드에 도달할 때까지 계속될 것이다.우리는 표준적인 신경 표기기를 선택했다. 우리는 우리의 귀속 해석 전략과 다중 언어 이동 문제에 전념했고 아주 적은 훈련 샘플만 사용하여 프랑스어를 위해 건장한 모델을 개발했다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم بازگرداننده\u200cی ما را برای تابع ۱ نیم\u200cEval-2019 توصیف می\u200cکند: بازرسی\u200cهای متوسط زبان با UCCA. هر قدم تکرار از دو قسمت است. ما اولین بار با استفاده از یک نقاشی ترکیب بررسی semantic انجام می\u200cدهیم تا احتمالات بررسی\u200cهای UCCA در جمله ارزیابی کند. بعدش، ما سیاست\u200cهای دیدکوندی را تفسیر می\u200cکنیم که این احتمالات را تفسیر می\u200cکند و گراف\u200cها را بسازیم. تولید کردن به طور تکرار انجام می\u200cشود، ما اولین آلودگی روی جمله انجام می\u200cدهیم تا صحنه\u200cهای اصلی و لینک\u200cها را اخراج کنیم، و سپس ما مدل خود را به طور تکرار بر جمله\u200cی جمله با ویژه\u200cهای ماسک\u200cبندی که تصمیم\u200cهای قبلی را در قدم\u200cهای قبلی تفکیر فرایند تا زمانی که گره\u200cهای ترمینال به رسیدن ادامه می\u200cدهد. ما یک نقاشی عصبی استاندارد را انتخاب کردیم و روی استراتژی تجزیه دوباره و روی مشکل انتقال زبان متفاوت تمرکز کردیم تا یک مدل قوی برای زبان فرانسوی توسعه کنیم، با استفاده از فقط چند نمونه آموزش', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz halkara sistemimizi UCCA ile karşılaştırılýan Taýça 1: Çapraz dilli Semantik Taýýarlama şeklinde tasvir edir. Her tekrarli adım iki bölümden bar. Biz ilkinji gezek semantik çözümlerini sözlemde UCCA kategoriýasynyň mümkinçiliklerini hasaplamak üçin bir terjime çözümlerini işleýäris Sonra bu olasılıkları yorumlayıp grafik düğümlerini inşa eden bir kodlama politikasını uygulayız. Çaplanjak gaýtalanança edildi, esasy sahypalary we baglaýyşlary çykarmak üçin ilkinji çarpyşymyzy çykaryp başladyk we soňra özümiziň modelini öňki adımlarda çözilen kararlaryny etmäge rugsat edip kabul etýäris. Terminal ködlemeleri ýetmesine çenli işlem devam edir. Biz standart neural etiketçisini saýladyk we rekursiv analýşim stratejimize we çapdaky dil transferleme meselesini Fransuz dilinde güýçli bir nusga döretmek üçin üns berdik. Diňe birnäçe okuw örneklerini ulanarak', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf ons rekursiewe stelsel vir SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 1: Kruistale Semantiese verwerking met UCCA. Elke rekursiewe stap bestaan van twee dele. Ons het eerste semantiese verwerking uitgevoer met 'n volgorde merker om die waarskynlikheid van die UCCA kategorie in die seting te vurdering. Dan, ons het 'n dekoding beleid aanwend wat hierdie waarskynlikheite uittel en die grafnode bou. Verwerking is rekursief gedoen, ons doen 'n eerste inferensie op die seting om die hoofgeskiene en skakels uit te pak en dan ons rekursief ons model op die seting aanwend met 'n maskeringsfunksies wat reflekteer die besluit wat in vorige stappe gemaak is. Proses gaan voort totdat die terminaal node bereik word. Ons het 'n standaard neurale merker gekies en ons fokus op ons rekursiewe verwerking strategie en op die kruistaal oordrag probleem om 'n kragtige model vir die Franse taal te ontwikkel, gebruik slegs paar opleeg voorbeelde", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва нашата рекурсивна система за Задача 1: Междуезична семантична обработка с УКК. Всяка рекурсивна стъпка се състои от две части. Първо извършваме семантичен анализ с помощта на тагер за последователност, за да оценим вероятностите на категориите в изречението. След това прилагаме политика за декодиране, която интерпретира тези вероятности и изгражда графичните възли. Анализирането се извършва рекурсивно, правим първо заключение на изречението, за да извлечем основните сцени и връзки и след това рекурсивно прилагаме модела си върху изречението, използвайки маскиращи функции, които отразяват решенията, взети в предишни стъпки. Процесът продължава до достигане на терминалните възли. Избрахме стандартен неврален тагер и се фокусираме върху нашата стратегия за рекурсивно анализиране и върху проблема с междуезичния трансфер, за да разработим здрав модел за френския език, използвайки само няколко примера за обучение', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan sistemin tonë rekursiv për SemEval-2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing me UCCA. Çdo hap rekursiv përbëhet nga dy pjesë. Ne së pari kryejmë analizimin semantik duke përdorur një shënues sekuence për të vlerësuar probabilitetet e kategorive UCCA në fjalim. Pastaj, ne aplikojmë një politikë dekodimi që interpreton këto probabilitete dhe ndërton nyjet e grafikut. Analizimi bëhet recursivisht, ne kryejmë një përfundim të parë në fjalim për të nxjerrë skenat kryesore dhe lidhjet dhe pastaj ne recursivisht aplikojmë model in tonë në fjalim duke përdorur një karakteristikë maskimi që pasqyron vendimet e bërë në hapat e mëparshëm. Procesi vazhdon deri sa të arrihen nodat e terminalit. Ne zgjodhëm një shënues nervor standard dhe përqëndrohemi në strategjinë tonë të analizimit rekursiv dhe në problemin e transferimit të gjuhës për të zhvilluar një model të fortë për gjuhën franceze, duke përdorur vetëm pak mostra trajnimi', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ለስምEval-2019 ስራ ስብሰባችንን የሚያሳውቃታል፡፡ የሁለተኛውም ደረጃ ሁለት ክፍል ነው:: በመጀመሪያ የUCCA ክፍለ ክፍተት የግንኙነት ግንኙነትን ለመቆጠር የስምናዊ ማኅበረሰብ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከዚያም፣ እነዚህን ምናልባት ትርጓሜ እና የመረጃ መኖሪያዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ማዘጋጀት በተጨማሪው ጊዜ፣ የዋና ደረጃዎችን እና ግንኙነቶችን ለመውጣት የፊደል ውርደትን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ተርሚናል የደናዳዊ የኔሩኤል ጋግሬን መረጥን እና በተመለከተው የፓርቲካዊ መዘርጋት strategy እና የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ለመለስ መከራን እና ለፈረንሳይዊው ቋንቋ ምሳሌ ለመፍጠር እና ጥቂት ትምህርት ምሳሌዎችን ብቻ በመጠቀም', 'hy': "Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր կրկնօրինակ համակարգը Սեմեվալ 2019-ի առաջին հանձնարարության համար' UCCA-ի հետ փոխլեզվով սեմատիկ վերլուծում: Յուրաքանչյուր կրկնօրինակ քայլ կազմված է երկու մասից: Սկզբում մենք կատարում ենք սեմանտիկ վերլուծությունը, օգտագործելով հաջորդականության նշան, որպեսզի գնահատենք UCCA-ի կատեգորիաների հավանականությունը նախադասության մեջ: Հետո մենք կիրառում ենք կոդավորման քաղաքականությունը, որը մեկնաբանում է այս հավանականությունները և կառուցում է գծագրի կետերը: Փորձարկումը կատարվում է կրկնօրինակ, մենք առաջին եզրակացությունը կատարում ենք նախադասության վերաբերյալ գլխավոր բնապատկերների և կապերի հանելու համար, հետո կրկնօրինակ կիրառում ենք մեր մոդելը նախադասության վրա, օգտագործելով ծածկում հատկություններ, որոնք Պրոցեսը շարունակվում է մինչև տերմինալ կետերը հասնում են: Մենք ընտրեցինք ստանդարտ նյարդային նշան և կենտրոնացրեցինք մեր կրկնօրինակ վերլուծության ռազմավարության վրա և լեզվի փոխանցման խնդիրների վրա, որպեսզի զարգացնենք ֆրանսերեն լեզվի համար ուժեղ մոդել, օգտագործելով միա", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের জন্য আমাদের পুনরাবৃত্তিক পদ্ধতির ব্যাখ্যা করছে: ক্রস-ভাষায় সেমান্টিক পার্জিং ইউসিকি প্রত্যেক পদক্ষেপের মধ্যে দুই অংশ আছে। আমরা প্রথমে সেমেন্টিক পার্সিং চালু করি একটি সেকেন্ড ট্যাগার ব্যবহার করে এই শাস্তিতে ইউসিকিএ বিভাগের সম্ভাবনা হিসেবে দে তারপর আমরা একটি ডিকোডিং নীতি প্রয়োগ করি যা এই সম্ভবত ব্যাখ্যা করে এবং গ্রাফ নোড বানায়। পার্সিং পুনরায় করা হয়েছে, আমরা প্রধান দৃশ্য এবং লিঙ্ক বের করার জন্য প্রথম আক্রান্ত ব্যবস্থা করেছি এবং তারপর আমরা পুনরায় মুখোশের বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করেছি একটি মুখোশ বৈশ টার্মিনাল নোড পৌঁছানোর পর্যন্ত প্রসেস চলছে। আমরা একটি স্ট্যান্ডার্ড নিউরেল ট্যাগার নির্বাচন করেছি এবং আমরা আমাদের পুনরাবৃত্তিক পার্সিং কৌশলের উপর মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি এবং ক্রস ভাষায় ট্রান্সফার', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš rekursivni sistem za pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 1: krstojezičko semantičko razmatranje sa UCCA. Svaki rekursivni korak se sastoji od dva dijela. Prvo izvršavamo semantičko analiziranje koristeći označavač sekvence kako bi procenili vjerojatnost kategorija UCCA-a u rečenici. Onda primjenjujemo politiku dekodiranja koja interpretira ove mogućnosti i izgradi graf čvorove. Procjenjivanje je određeno rekursivno, izvodimo prvu infekciju na rečenici da izvučemo glavne scene i veze, a onda rekursivno primjenjujemo naš model na rečenici koristeći maskiranje karakteristike koja odražava odluke donijene na prethodnim koracima. Proces nastavlja dok se ne postignu terminalni čvorovi. Izabrali smo standardnu neuralnu oznake i fokusirali se na našu rekursivnu strategiju za analizu i na problem prekršnog jezičkog prijenosa kako bi razvili jak model francuskog jezika, koristeći samo nekoliko uzorka obuke', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el nostre sistema recursiv per SemEval-2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing amb UCCA. Cada pas recursiu consisteix en dues parts. Primer fem l'analització semàntica utilitzant un etiquetador de seqüència per estimar les probabilitats de les categories UCCA de la frase. Llavors aplicam una política de descodificació que interpreta aquestes probabilitats i construeix els nodes del gràfic. L'analisi es fa recursivament, fem una primera inferència sobre la frase per extrair les escenes i enllaços principals i després aplicam recursivament el nostre model sobre la frase utilitzant una característica de mascarament que reflecteix les decisions fetes en pas anteriors. El procés continua fins que arriben als nodos terminals. Vam triar un etiquetador neural normal i ens centrem en la nostra estratègia d'analització recursiva i en el problem a de transfer ència de llengües per desenvolupar un model robust per a la llengua francesa, utilitzant només poques mostres d'entrenament", 'az': 'Bu kağıt bizim semiEval-2019 Task 1 sistemimizi təsdiqləyir: UCCA ilə çox dilli Semantik Parsing. Hər təkrar adım iki parçadan olur. Biz ilk dəfə UCCA kategoriyalarının mümkünlüyünü hesablamaq üçün seçmə etiketçisini istifadə edirik. Sonra, biz bu olasılıqları yorumlayıb graf düyünü inşa edir. Səfərlənmək təkrar edilir, əvvəlki adımlarda çəkilmiş kararları göstərən masking özelliklərini istifadə edən ilk cümlədə və bağlantıları çıxartmaq üçün ilk dəfərdə xəstəlik edirik. Terminal düyünün gələnədək işlər sürəklənir. Biz standart nöral etiketçisini seçdik və yenidən ayrılma stratejimizə və Fransız dili üçün çox güclü bir modellü təhsil etmək üçün çox çətin dil tərəfindən təhsil edirik.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie rekursiivset süsteemi SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 1: Keeleülene semantiline parsing UCCA-ga. Iga rekursiivne samm koosneb kahest osast. Esmalt teeme semantilist parsimist, kasutades järjestuse sildistajat, et hinnata lauses UCCA kategooriate tõenäosusi. Seejärel rakendame dekodeerimispoliitikat, mis tõlgendab neid tõenäosusi ja ehitab graafilised sõlmed. Parsimine toimub rekursiivselt, teeme lausest esimese järelduse, et välja võtta peastseenid ja lingid ning seejärel rakendame lausele rekursiivselt oma mudelit, kasutades varjamisfunktsioone, mis peegeldavad varasemates etappides tehtud otsuseid. Protsess jätkub kuni terminalisõlmedeni. Valisime standardse närvimärgistaja ja keskendume rekursiivsele parsimisstrateegiale ja keeleülese ülekande probleemile, et töötada välja tugev mudel prantsuse keele jaoks, kasutades vaid mõningaid koolitusnäiteid', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš rekurzivní systém pro SemEval-2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with UCCA. Každý rekurzivní krok se skládá ze dvou částí. Nejprve provádíme sémantickou parsování pomocí sekvenčního tageru k odhadu pravděpodobnosti UCCA kategorií ve větě. Pak aplikujeme dekódovací zásadu, která interpretuje tyto pravděpodobnosti a sestavuje uzly grafu. Analýza se provádí rekurzivně, provedeme první závěr k extrakci hlavních scén a odkazů a pak rekurzivně aplikujeme náš model na větu pomocí maskovacích prvků, které odrážejí rozhodnutí učiněná v předchozích krocích. Proces pokračuje až do dosažení terminálových uzlů. Vybrali jsme standardní neuronový tagger a zaměřili jsme se na naši rekurzivní parsovací strategii a na problém přenosu mezi jazyky, abychom vytvořili robustní model pro francouzský jazyk s použitím pouze několika vzorků tréninku.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan rekursiivista järjestelmäämme SemEval-2019 Task 1: Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with UCCA. Jokainen rekursiivinen vaihe koostuu kahdesta osasta. Suoritamme ensin semanttisen jäsentämisen sekvenssimerkillä arvioidaksemme lauseen UCCA-luokkien todennäköisyyksiä. Sitten käytämme dekoodauspolitiikkaa, joka tulkitsee nämä todennäköisyydet ja rakentaa graafiset solmut. Parsaus tehdään rekursiivisesti, teemme ensimmäisen johtopäätöksen lauseesta poistaaksemme pääkohtaukset ja linkit ja sitten sovellamme rekursiivisesti malliamme lauseeseen käyttäen naamioominaisuuksia, jotka heijastavat aiempien vaiheiden päätöksiä. Prosessi jatkuu, kunnes päätesolmut on saavutettu. Valitsimme normaalin neurotaggerin ja keskitymme rekursiiviseen jäsennysstrategiaamme ja monikieliseen siirtoongelmaan kehittääksemme vankan mallin ranskan kielelle käyttäen vain muutamia koulutusnäytteitä.', 'jv': 'This paper description us recurative System for semi-2011 task 1: krus-language semanti Sampeyan Awak dhéwé nggawe semanti nggawe sistem dilairakne seneng dadi sekondi nggawe cara-cara nggawe barang cara-cara nggawe barang urip. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepolitenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Attribute Proyek Neringan sampeyan nganggo terminal node sampeyan Awak dhéwé milih sing kudu nggawe mesthi, kuwi nggawe kudu nggawe gerakan kelas telungkur banjur kuwi kesempatan kanggo nggawe barang langgar kuwi nggawe model sing bisa perusahaan kanggo liman Frans.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naš rekurzivni sistem za nalogo 1 SemEval-2019: Medjezično semantično razpravljanje z UCCA. Vsak rekurzivni korak je sestavljen iz dveh delov. Najprej izvajamo semantično razčlenitev z označevalnikom zaporedja, da ocenimo verjetnosti kategorij UCCA v stavku. Nato uporabimo pravilnik dekodiranja, ki razlaga te verjetnosti in gradi grafska vozlišča. Razčlenitev poteka rekurzivno, izvedemo prvi sklep o stavku, da izvlečemo glavne prizore in povezave, nato pa rekurzivno uporabimo model na stavku z uporabo maskirnih funkcij, ki odražajo odločitve, sprejete v prejšnjih korakih. Proces se nadaljuje, dokler niso dosežena terminalna vozlišča. Izbrali smo standardni nevronski označevalnik in se osredotočili na našo strategijo rekurzivnega razčlenjanja in na problem medjezikovnega prenosa, da bi razvili robustni model za francoski jezik z uporabo le nekaj vzorcev usposabljanja.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את המערכת המחזורת שלנו עבור SemEval-2019 משימה 1: Each recursive step consists of two parts.  אנחנו קודם מבצעים בדיקת סמנטית באמצעות תג רצף כדי להעריך את הסבירות של הקטגוריות UCCA במשפט. ואז, אנו משתמשים במדיניות פיתוח שמפרקת את הסבירויות האלה ובנה את נודות הגרף. המחקר נעשה באופן חוזר, אנחנו מבצעים המסקנה הראשונה על המשפט כדי להוציא את הסצנות והקשרים העיקריים ואז אנו משתמשים באופן חוזר את הדוגמאל שלנו על המשפט באמצעות תכונות מסיכה שמשתקעות את ההחלטות שנעשו בצעדים הקודמים. תהליך ממשיך עד שהקשרים הטרמינליים יגיעו. We chose a standard neural tagger and we focus on our recursive parsing strategy and on the cross lingual transfer problem to develop a robust model for the French language, using only few training samples', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana tsarin masu tsaro na SemEV-2019 Tafiyar 1: Kass-language Semantic Parse with UCCA. Ga kõwace ƙẽtare ta kõma yana daga rabo biyu. Babu farkon yin parse na semanti da za'a yi amfani da tagger na sequence dõmin ya ƙaddara masu yiwuwa na nau'in UCCA. Sa'an nan kuma, za mu amfani da wata lissafa kodi wanda ke fassarar masu yiwuwa da za'a samar da node na grafyuta. An fara yin parse, za'a yi amfani da kafaffiyata ta farkon birane a kan maganar da za'a fitar da filinaikin na farko, sa'an nan kuma za mu yi amfani da misalinmu a kan kalmar da za'a yi amfani da haske-rufe, wanda yana mai ƙayyade gamuwa da suka gaba. @ action: button Ba mu zãɓi wani sigar neural na daidaita kuma tuna makini a kanzu masu yin parse da kuma a kan shige cikin linguin-sarari dõmin ya danne misãlai masu yin amfani da misãlai kaɗan kawai", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བུ་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་རིམ་ལ་དུས་མཚམས་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་ལ་ཨིན་Eval-2019 ལས་ཀ་ལྡན་༡：Cross-lingual Semantic Parsing with UCCA རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མེད་པའི་གྲལ་ཐེངས་རེ་རེའི་ཆ་ཤས་གཉིས་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་དང་པོ་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་ལ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རྟགས་ཤིག་རྟགས་ཀྱི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ། དེ་ནས་འུ་ཅག་གིས་བྱ་ཚིག་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་སྤྱོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་ཞིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Parsing is done recursively, we perform the first inference on the sentence to extract the main scenes and links and then we recursively apply our model on the sentence using a masking feature that reflects the decisions made in previous steps. ལས་སྦྱོར་ནི་མཐའ་སྣེ་མཐོང་གླེང་སྡེར་དུ་འབྲི་བར་མཚམས་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པ ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་ཆ་སྐྱེས་པའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཤིག་བྱང་ཞིག་གདམ'}
{'en': 'UC Davis at SemEval-2019 Task 1 : DAG Semantic Parsing with Attention-based Decoder', 'ar': 'جامعة كاليفورنيا في ديفيس في SemEval-2019 المهمة 1: التحليل الدلالي لـ DAG باستخدام وحدة فك التشفير القائمة على الانتباه', 'fr': "UC Davis au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 1\xa0: Analyse sémantique DAG avec un décodeur basé sur l'attention", 'pt': 'UC Davis em SemEval-2019 Tarefa 1: Análise semântica do DAG com decodificador baseado em atenção', 'es': 'UC Davis en Semeval-2019 Tarea 1: Análisis semántico de DAG con decodificador basado en la atención', 'ru': 'UC Davis на SemEval-2019 Задача 1: Семантический анализ DAG с помощью декодера, основанного на внимании', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 1 पर यूसी डेविस: ध्यान-आधारित डिकोडर के साथ DAG सिमेंटिक पार्सिंग', 'ja': 'UC Davis at SemEval -2019 Task 1: DAGセマンティック解析とアテンションベースのデコーダー', 'zh': '加州大学戴维斯分校在SemEval-2019务1:DAG语义解析与注意解码器', 'ga': 'UC Davis ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 1: Parsáil Shéimeantach DAG le Díchódóir Bunaithe ar Aird', 'ka': 'UC Davis SemEval-2019 დავალება 1: DAG Semantic Parsing with Attention-based Decoder', 'hu': 'UC Davis a SemEval-2019 1. feladat: DAG szemantikus értelmezés figyelem alapú dekódolóval', 'el': 'Καθήκον 1: Σημαντική ανάλυση με αποκωδικοποιητή βασισμένο στην προσοχή', 'it': "UC Davis a SemEval-2019 Task 1: Analisi semantica DAG con decoder basato sull'attenzione", 'kk': 'UC Davis at SemEval-2019 Task 1: DAG Semantic Parsing with Attention-based Decoder', 'lt': 'UC Davis SemEval-2019 1 užduotis: DAG Semantic Parsing with Attention-based Decoder', 'mk': 'УК Дејвис на SemEval-2019 задача 1: Семантично анализирање на DAG со декодер базиран на внимание', 'ms': 'UC Davis di SemEval-2019 Tugas 1: Pengesahan Semantic DAG dengan Pengesahan Berasas Perhatian', 'ml': 'UC Davis at SemEval-2019 Task 1: DAG Semantic Parsing with Attention-based Decoder', 'mt': 'UC Davis fis-SemEval-2019 Kompitu 1: DAG Semantic Parsing with Attention-based Decoder', 'mn': 'UC Davis at SemEval-2019 Task 1: DAG Semantic Parsing with Attention-based Decoder', 'no': 'UC Davis at semiEval-2019 Task 1: DAG Semantic Parsing with Attention-based Decoder', 'pl': 'UC Davis na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 1: Parsowanie semantyczne DAG z dekoderem opartym na uwadze', 'ro': 'UC Davis la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 1: Parsing semantic DAG cu decoder bazat pe atenție', 'sr': 'UC Davis na semiEval-2019 Task 1: DAG Semantičko analiziranje sa dekoderom na temelju pažnje', 'si': 'UC Davis at semeval-2019 Job 1: DAG semantic Parsing with Attension-based decoder', 'so': 'UC Davis at SemEval-2019 Task 1: DAG Semantic Parsing with Attention-based Decoder', 'sv': 'UC Davis på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 1: DAG Semantic Parsing med uppmärksamhetsbaserad avkodare', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணியில் UC டேவிஸ்', 'ur': 'UC Davis at SemEval-2019 Task 1: DAG Semantic Parsing with Attention-based Decoder', 'vi': 'U Davis tại SemEvl-thẩm 9 Task 1: DAG Semantic Parsing with Chú ý-based Decder', 'uz': 'Comment', 'bg': 'Задача 1: Семантичен анализ с декодер, базиран на вниманието', 'nl': 'UC Davis op SemEval-2019 Taak 1: DAG Semantic Parsing met Attention-based Decoder', 'da': 'UC Davis på SemEval-2019 Opgave 1: DAG Semantic Parsing med opmærksomhedsbaseret dekoder', 'hr': 'UC Davis na semiEval-2019 zadatku 1: DAG Semantička analiza s dekoderom na temelju pažnje', 'de': 'UC Davis auf der SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 1: DAG Semantic Parsing mit aufmerksamkeitsbasiertem Decoder', 'id': 'UC Davis di SemEval-2019 Tugas 1: DAG Semantic Parsing with Attention-based Decoder', 'fa': 'UC Davis at SemEval-2019 Task 1: DAG Semantic Parsing with Attention-based Decoder', 'ko': '캘리포니아 대학교 데이비스 분교SemEval-2019퀘스트1: 주의 기반 디코더를 사용하여DAG의 의미 해석', 'sw': 'UC Davis katika kazi ya SemEval-2019', 'tr': 'UC Davis at SemEval-2019 Task 1: DAG Semantic Parsing with Attention-based Decoder', 'af': 'UC Davis by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 1: DAG Semantic verwerking met aandag-gebaseerde dekoder', 'sq': 'UC Davis në SemEval-2019 Task 1: DAG Semantic Parsing with Attention-based Decoder', 'am': '1: DAG Semantic Parsing with Attention-based Decoder', 'az': 'UC Davis at SemEval-2019 Task 1: DAG Semantic Parsing with Attention-based Decoder', 'hy': 'UC-Դեյվիսը Սեմեվալ 2019-ի առաջին հանձնարարությունում. DAG', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের ইউসি ডেভিস ১: ডেজি সেম্যান্টিক পার্সিং আকর্ষণের ভিত্তিক ডেকোডার দিয়ে', 'bs': 'UC Davis na semiEval-2019 Task 1: DAG Semantičko analiziranje sa dekoderom na temelju pažnje', 'ca': 'UC Davis a SemEval-2019 Task 1: DAG Semantic Parsing with Attention-based Decoder', 'et': 'UC Davis SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 1: DAG semantiline parsing tähelepanu põhineva dekoodriga', 'cs': 'Úkol 1: Sémantické parsování DAG s dekodérem založeným na pozornosti', 'fi': 'UC Davis SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 1: DAG Semantic Parsing with Attention-based Decoder', 'jv': 'UT Dewiss at semebal-2011 task 1: DaG semanti Parasing with Attention-supported Dekoder', 'ha': '@ info: status', 'sk': 'UC Davis na SemEval-2019 naloga 1: DAG semantično razpravljanje z dekoderjem na osnovi pozornosti', 'he': 'UC דייויס ב SemEval-2019 משימה 1: DAG מעבדת סמנטית עם Decoder מבוסס על תשומת לב', 'bo': 'UC Davis at SemEval-2019 Task 1: DAG Semantic Parsing with Attention-based Decoder'}
{'en': 'We present an encoder-decoder model for semantic parsing with UCCA SemEval 2019 Task 1. The encoder is a Bi-LSTM and the decoder uses recursive self-attention. The proposed model alleviates challenges and feature engineering in traditional transition-based and graph-based parsers. The resulting parser is simple and proved to effective on the semantic parsing task.', 'ar': 'نقدم نموذج وحدة فك التشفير للتحليل الدلالي باستخدام مهمة UCCA SemEval 2019 1. المشفر عبارة عن Bi-LSTM ويستخدم مفكك الشفرة الانتباه الذاتي المتكرر. يخفف النموذج المقترح من التحديات وهندسة الميزات في المحللون التقليديون القائمون على التحول والقائم على الرسم البياني. المحلل اللغوي الناتج بسيط وثبت فعاليته في مهمة التحليل الدلالي.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un modèle encodeur-décodeur pour l'analyse sémantique avec UCCA SemEval 2019 Task 1. Le codeur est un Bi-LSTM et le décodeur utilise une auto-attention récursive. Le modèle proposé soulage les défis et l'ingénierie des fonctionnalités dans les analyseurs traditionnels basés sur des transitions et des graphes. L'analyseur qui en résulte est simple et s'est révélé efficace pour la tâche d'analyse sémantique.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos um modelo de codificador-decodificador para análise semântica com UCCA SemEval 2019 Tarefa 1. O codificador é um Bi-LSTM e o decodificador usa autoatenção recursiva. O modelo proposto alivia os desafios e a engenharia de recursos em analisadores tradicionais baseados em transição e baseados em grafos. O analisador resultante é simples e provou ser eficaz na tarefa de análise semântica.', 'es': 'Presentamos un modelo de codificador-decodificador para el análisis semántico con UCCA SemEval 2019 Task 1. El codificador es un Bi-LSTM y el decodificador utiliza la autoatención recursiva. El modelo propuesto alivia los desafíos y la ingeniería de características en los analizadores tradicionales basados en transiciones y gráficos. El analizador resultante es simple y ha demostrado ser eficaz en la tarea de análisis semántico.', 'ja': 'UCCA SemEval 2019 Task 1でセマンティック解析のためのエンコーダデコーダモデルを提示します。エンコーダはBi - LSTMであり、デコーダは再帰的自己注目を使用する。提案されたモデルは、従来のトランジションベースおよびグラフベースのパーサーにおける課題と機能エンジニアリングを緩和します。結果として得られる構文解析器は単純であり、セマンティック構文解析タスクに効果があることが証明されている。', 'zh': '建一编码器- 解码器,施于UCCA SemEval 20191之语义解析。 编码器为Bi-LSTM,解码器用递归自谨。 缓古基于转图之解析器。 生解析器简易,有效于语义解析。', 'ru': 'Представляем модель кодировщик-декодер для семантического синтаксического анализа с задачей 1 UCCA SemEval 2019. Кодер представляет собой Bi-LSTM, а декодер использует рекурсивное самовнимание. Предлагаемая модель облегчает задачи и проектирование элементов в традиционных парсерах, основанных на переходе и графиках. Полученный в результате синтаксический анализатор прост и доказал свою эффективность в решении задачи семантического синтаксического анализа.', 'hi': 'हम UCCA SemEval 2019 कार्य 1 के साथ शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग के लिए एक एन्कोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं। एन्कोडर एक Bi-LSTM है और विकोडक पुनरावर्ती आत्म-ध्यान का उपयोग करता है। प्रस्तावित मॉडल पारंपरिक संक्रमण-आधारित और ग्राफ-आधारित पार्सर में चुनौतियों और फीचर इंजीनियरिंग को कम करता है। परिणामी पार्सर सरल है और शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग कार्य पर प्रभावी साबित हुआ है।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid samhail ionchódóra-díchódóra i láthair le haghaidh parsáil shéimeantach le Tasc 1 UCCA SemEval 2019. Is Bi-LSTM an t-ionchódóir agus úsáideann an díchódóir féin-aird athfhillteach. Maolaíonn an tsamhail atá beartaithe na dúshláin agus na gnéithe innealtóireacht i bparsálaithe traidisiúnta tras-bhunaithe agus graf-bhunaithe. Tá an parsálaí mar thoradh air simplí agus bhí sé éifeachtach ar an tasc parsála shéimeantach.', 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy kódoló-dekódoló modellt a szemantikai elemzéshez az UCCA SemEval 2019 feladat 1. A kódoló Bi-LSTM és a dekóder rekurzív önfigyelmet használ. A javasolt modell enyhíti a kihívásokat és a funkciótervezést a hagyományos átmeneti és gráf alapú elemzőkben. A kapott elemző egyszerű és hatékonynak bizonyult a szemantikai elemzési feladatban.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენ კოდერის რეკოდერის მოდელს სენმანტიკური პარასუზაციისთვის UCCA SemEval 2019 დავალება 1. Encoder არის Bi- LSTM და დეკოდერი გამოყენებს რეკუტიური თავისუფლება. პროგრამის მოდელის გამოსახულება განსახულებების და განსახულებების ინზინერიციაში ტრადიციონალური განსახულებების და გრაფიკური განსახულებების განსახულებების წარმოიდგინეთ პანსერიზი უკეთესია და გამოწმებული იყო ეფექტიური სემონტიკური პანსერიზაციის დასაწყისაზე.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα μοντέλο κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή για σημασιολογική ανάλυση με εργασία 1. Ο κωδικοποιητής είναι Bi-LSTM και ο αποκωδικοποιητής χρησιμοποιεί αναδρομική αυτοπροσοχή. Το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο ανακουφίζει τις προκλήσεις και τη μηχανική χαρακτηριστικών σε παραδοσιακούς αναλυτές μετάβασης και γραφής. Ο αναλυτής που προκύπτει είναι απλός και αποδείχθηκε αποτελεσματικός στην εργασία σημασιολογικής ανάλυσης.', 'it': "Presentiamo un modello encoder-decoder per l'analisi semantica con UCCA SemEval 2019 Task 1. L'encoder è un Bi-LSTM e il decoder utilizza l'auto-attenzione ricorsiva. Il modello proposto allevia le sfide e l'ingegneria delle funzionalità nei parser tradizionali basati su transizione e grafici. Il parser risultante è semplice e si è dimostrato efficace nel compito di analisi semantica.", 'mk': 'Презентираме модел на кодер-декодер за семантично анализирање со УККА SemEval 2019 задача 1. The encoder is a Bi-LSTM and the decoder uses recursive self-attention.  Предложениот модел ги олеснува предизвиците и имплементира инженерството во традиционалните транзициски и графички анализатори. Резултатот на анализаторот е едноставен и се докажува дека е ефикасен на семантичната анализаторска задача.', 'kk': 'Біз UCCA SemEval 2019 тапсырмасы 1- мен semantic талдау үшін кодер- декодер үлгісін келтіреміз. Кодер - Bi- LSTM және декодер қайталанатын өзіңізді қолданады. Келтірілген үлгі транспортты және графикалық негіздеген талдаушылардың өзгерістерін және инженерліктерін өзгертеді. Семантикалық талдау тапсырмасына әсер етеді.', 'lt': 'Pateikiame semantinio analizavimo kodavimo model į su UCCA SemEval 2019 1 užduotimi. Kodatorius yra biLSTM, o dekoderis naudoja atkuriamą savarankišką dėmesį. Siūlomas modelis palengvina tradicinių pereinamojo laikotarpio ir grafinių analizatorių iššūkius ir ypatumus, susijusius su in žinerija. Gautas analizatorius yra paprastas ir įrodyta, kad jis veiksmingas atliekant semantinio analizavimo užduotį.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan model pengekod-penyahkod untuk penghuraian semantik dengan Tugas 1 UCCA SemEval 2019. Pengekod adalah Bi-LSTM dan penyekod menggunakan perhatian-diri rekursif. The proposed model alleviates challenges and feature engineering in traditional transition-based and graph-based parsers.  Penghurai hasilnya mudah dan terbukti berkesan pada tugas hurai semantik.', 'ml': 'യുസിക്കി സെമ്മെവാല്\u200d 2019 ടാസ്ക് 1 കൊണ്ട് സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനുള്ള ഒരു കോഡെര്\u200d ഡെക്കോഡേര്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d  ഈ കോഡെര്\u200d ബി-എല്\u200dസ്റ്റിം ആണ്. ഡെകോഡേര്\u200d റിസ്റ്റര്\u200dസിവ് ആത്മശ്രദ്ധ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d പാര്\u200dസറുകളില്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങളും പ്രത്യേക എഞ്ചിനീയറിങ്ങിനെയും ലഘൂകരിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ ഫലം സാധാരണ പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ജോലിയില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയാണ്.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw mudell ta’ kodifikatur-dekoder għall-analiżi semantika mal-UCCA SemEval 2019 Task 1. Il-kodifikatur huwa Bi-LSTM u d-dekoder juża awtonomija rikorrenti. Il-mudell propost itaffi l-isfidi u l-karatteristiċi tal-in ġinerija f’analizzaturi tradizzjonali bbażati fuq it-tranżizzjoni u fuq il-grafika. Il-analizzatur li jirriżulta huwa sempliċi u ppruvat li huwa effettiv fuq il-kompitu tal-analizzazzjoni semantika.', 'mn': 'Бид UCCA SemEval 2019 Task 1-тэй semantic parsing үед кодлогч-декодер загварын загварыг үзүүлсэн. Кодлогч нь Bi-LSTM ба кодлогч дахин анхаарлыг ашигладаг. Загвар өгсөн загвар нь уламжлалтын шилжилт, график суурилсан ажиллагчид сорилтуудыг багасгадаг. Үүний үр дүнтэй хуваагч нь энгийн бөгөөд семантик хуваагдах ажил дээр үр дүнтэй байдаг.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy model kodera-dekodera do parsowania semantycznego z UCCA SemEval 2019 Task 1. Koder jest Bi-LSTM, a dekoder wykorzystuje rekursywną uwagę na siebie. Proponowany model łagodzi wyzwania i funkcje inżynierii w tradycyjnych parserach opartych na przejściach i wykresach. Wynikowy parser jest prosty i okazał się skuteczny w zadaniu parsowania semantycznego.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm un model codificator-decodor pentru analizarea semantică cu UCCA SemEval 2019 Task 1. Encoder-ul este un Bi-LSTM, iar decodorul folosește auto-atenție recursivă. Modelul propus atenuează provocările și ingineria caracteristicilor în parserele tradiționale bazate pe tranziție și grafice. Parserul rezultat este simplu și s-a dovedit eficient în sarcina de parsare semantică.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo model kodera-dekodera za semantičku analizu sa UCCA SemEval 2019 Task 1. Koder je Bi-LSTM i dekoder koristi rekursivnu pažnju na sebe. Predloženi model smanjuje izazove i funkcionalne in ženjerstvo u tradicionalnim praznicima na transiciji i na grafu baziranim parserima. Rezultat analizatora je jednostavan i dokazan da je efikasan na semantičkom analizacijskom zadatku.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein kodingsmodell for semantisk tolking med UCCA semiEval 2019 oppgåve 1. Kodaren er ein Bi- LSTM og dekoderen brukar rekursiv selvmerking. Foreslått modellen reduserer utfordringar og funksjonsengineering i tradisjonelle overgangsbaserte og grafbaserte tolkarar. Det resulterte tolkaren er enkelt og viste at det er effektivt på det semantiske tolkaren.', 'si': 'අපි UCCA සෙම්වේල් 2019 වැඩක් 1 සමඟ සෙමාන්ටික විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා කොඩොර් ඩිකොඩර් මොඩේලයක් පෙනුම් කරනවා. එන්කෝඩර් එක Bi- LSTM කෙනෙක් වගේම ඩිකෝඩර් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ස්වයං අවධානය භාවිත කරනවා. ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරපු මෝඩල් අවශ්\u200dයය සහ අවශ්\u200dයය ඉංජිනේරියාව පරාමාන්\u200dය වාර්ථාව සහ ග්\u200dරාෆ් අධා ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂකය සාමාන්\u200dය සහ සාක්ෂිත විශ්වාස කරන වැඩේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන්.', 'so': 'Waxaan keenaynaa model koocoder-decoder oo ah baaritaanka semantic with UCCA SemEval 2019 Task 1. Qoraalku waa Bi-LSTM, qodkodku wuxuu isticmaalaa iskuul-celin. Tusaale la soo jeeday wuxuu hoos u fududeeyaa dhibaatooyin iyo injiilk gaar ah oo ku qoran baarlamayaasha ku saleysan iyo qoraalka. Arbarashada dhamaadku waa fudud, waxaana loo caddeeyaa inuu shaqeeyo shaqada baaritaanka semantika.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en encoder-avkodarmodell för semantisk tolkning med UCCA SemEval 2019 Uppgift 1. Kodaren är en Bi-LSTM och dekoden använder rekursiv självuppmärksamhet. Den föreslagna modellen lindrar utmaningar och funktionsteknik i traditionella övergångsbaserade och grafbaserade tolkare. Den resulterande tolkningen är enkel och bevisad effektiv på den semantiska tolkningsuppgiften.', 'ta': 'UCCA SemEval 2019 பணி 1 உடன் பாடலுக்கான குறியீட்டாளர் குறியீட்டாளர் மாதிரியை கொண்டு வருகிறோம். இந்த குறியீட்டு ஒரு பி- LSTM ஆகும் மற்றும் குறியீட்டாளர் திரும்ப செலுத்தும் தன்னை கவனத்தை பயன்படுத்து பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி சவால்களையும் குணங்களையும் பொறியியலையும் சுருக்கும் பொருள்களையும் பாரம்பரியம முடிவு பிரிப்பு எளிதானது மற்றும் அரைமான்டிக் பாசிங் பணியில் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டது.', 'ur': 'ہم نے UCCA SemEval 2019 ٹاکس ۱ کے ساتھ سیمنٹی پارسینگ کے لئے ایک کوڈر-ڈیکڈر موڈل پیش کیا ہے. Encoder is a Bi-LSTM and the decoder uses recursive self-attention. پیشنهاد کی موڈل آسانی کرتا ہے چلنے اور فکرت انجینریسی کو سنتی تغییر پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے اور گراف پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے پارس میں۔ نتیجہ پارچر ساده ہے اور سیمانٹی پارچینگ کام پر ثابت ہوتی ہے.', 'uz': 'Biz UCCA SemEval 2019 Vazifa 1 bilan semantik parsing uchun kodekoder modelini koʻrsatimiz. Kodlash usuli Bi- LSTM va kodlash usulini qaytarish uchun foydalanadi. Name Name', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình mã hóa cho việc phân tích theo ngữ nghĩa với UCCA Seml Evl 2009 Task 1. Bộ mã hóa là Bi-LSTM. Và bộ giải dùng tư liệu liệu. Kiểu mẫu đề nghị giải tỏa các thử thách và đặc trưng của kỹ thuật tiên liệu truyền thống. Vị cha xứ kết quả đơn giản và có hiệu quả với nhiệm vụ phân tích ngữ pháp.', 'bg': 'Представяме кодер-декодер модел за семантичен анализ със задача 1. Ендерът е Би-ЛСТМ, а декодерът използва рекурсивно самовнимание. Предложеният модел облекчава предизвикателствата и функционалното инженерство в традиционните преходни и графични анализатори. Полученият анализатор е прост и доказано ефективен при семантичната задача за анализ.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een encoder-decoder model voor semantische parsing met UCCA SemEval 2019 Taak 1. De encoder is een Bi-LSTM en de decoder maakt gebruik van recursieve zelfaandacht. Het voorgestelde model verlicht uitdagingen en feature engineering in traditionele transitie-gebaseerde en grafiekgebaseerde parsers. De resulterende parser is eenvoudig en bewezen effectief op de semantische parsing taak.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en encoder-dekoder model til semantisk parsing med UCCA SemEval 2019 Opgave 1. Encoder er en Bi-LSTM og dekoder bruger rekursiv selvopmærksomhed. Den foreslåede model afhjælper udfordringer og feature engineering i traditionelle overgangsbaserede og grafbaserede fortolkere. Den resulterende fortolker er enkel og bevist at være effektiv på den semantiske fortolkningsopgave.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren ein Encoder-Decoder-Modell für semantisches Parsen mit UCCA SemEval 2019 Task 1. Der Encoder ist ein Bi-LSTM und der Decoder verwendet rekursive Selbstaufmerksamkeit. Das vorgeschlagene Modell löst Herausforderungen und Feature Engineering in traditionellen transition-basierten und graph-basierten Parsern. Der resultierende Parser ist einfach und hat sich bei der semantischen Parsing-Aufgabe bewährt.', 'ko': 'UCCA SemEval 2019 Task 1을 이용하여 의미 분석을 위한 인코더 - 디코더 모델을 제시했습니다.인코더는 이중 LSTM으로, 인코더는 자기 주의를 귀속시키는 것을 사용한다.이 모델은 전통적인 전환 기반과 도형 기반의 해석기에서의 도전과 특징 공정을 완화시켰다.이로 인해 발생한 해석기는 간단하고 의미 분석 임무에서 효과적이라는 것이 증명되었다.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo model kodera-dekodera za semantičku analizu s UCCA SemEval 2019 zadatak 1. Koder je Bi-LSTM i dekoder koristi rekursivnu samopouzdanje. Predloženi model smanjuje izazove i funkcioniranje in ženjerstva u tradicionalnim razmatračima na transiciji i na grafu baziranim. Rezultatni analizator je jednostavan i dokazan je učinkovit na zadatku semantičkog analizanja.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan model pengekode untuk penganalisis semantis dengan UCCA SemEval 2019 Task 1. Pengenkodarnya adalah Bi-LSTM dan dekodarnya menggunakan perhatian diri rekursif. Model yang diusulkan mengurangi tantangan dan teknik fitur dalam parser tradisional berdasarkan transisi dan grafik. Penganalis hasilnya sederhana dan terbukti efektif pada tugas penganalis semantis.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kuweka mfano wa kodi kwa ajili ya kuimba wimbo wa kimapenzi na UCCA SemEval 2019 Kazi 1. Kodi hilo ni Bi-LSTM na kodi linatumia kujitegemea. Mfano huu unapendekezwa unapunguza changamoto na uhandisi wa kihandisi katika mabunge yenye asili ya mpito na maarufu. Uchambuzi wa matokeo ni rahisi na umethibitishwa kuwa na ufanisi katika kazi ya kujenga mabadiliko ya kimapenzi.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n enkoder- dekoder model vir semantiese verwerking met UCCA SemEval 2019 Taak 1. Die enkoder is 'n Bi- LSTM en die dekoder gebruik rekursief self- aandag. Die voorgestelde model maak uitdagings en funksie-in ženiering in tradisionele transisie-gebaseerde en graafgebaseerde verwerkers alleviaat. Die resulteerde ontleerder is eenvoudig en bevestig om effektief te wees op die semantiese ontleer taak.", 'fa': 'ما یک مدل رمزگذاری\u200cکننده\u200cی رمزگذاری\u200cکننده\u200cی رمزگذاری برای تجزیه\u200cهای semantic با ماموریت ۱ UCCA SemEval 2019 را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. Encoder is a Bi-LSTM and the decoder uses recursive self-attention. این مدل پیشنهاد چالش\u200cها و مهندسی\u200cهای مهندسی را کمتر می\u200cکند در پردازکنندگان بر اساس تغییرات سنتی و بر اساس گراف\u200cها. پاداش نتیجه\u200cای ساده است و ثابت می\u200cشود که بر روی کار تجزیه\u200cکننده\u200cی سنتی تاثیر می\u200cشود.', 'tr': 'Biz UCCA SemEval 2019 Ta첵gy 1 체챌in semantik parsasy 체챌in bir k철dleme-kode챌 modelini tan첵첵arys. K철dler bir Bi-LSTM we kod챌y 철z 체ns체ni ulan첵ar. G철rkezilen nusga 철r채n kyn챌ylyklary we 철r채n enjini첵et챌ilikleri d채pli g철챌체p bar첵ar. Sonu챌ta 챌철z체mler basit we semantik ay캇rma i힊inde etkinle힊endir.', 'am': 'በUCCA SemEval 2019 ስራ 1 ለሴሜኒካ ማዘጋጀት የኮድ-ዴኮድ ሞዴል እናቀርባታለን፡፡ የሆሄያት ኮድ ቢ-LSTM እና ቀዳዳሚ የራሳቸውን ትኩረት ይጠቅማል። የተዘጋጀው ሞዴል የባሕላዊ ክፍተት እና የግንኙነት ኢንጂንጂንተርን በተመሳሳይ እና በgraph-based ፓርስር ውስጥ የሚያሳልል ነው፡፡ የውጤቱ ምርጫው ቀላል ነው እናም በsemantic parsing አድራጊ ላይ አካባቢ ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një model kodues-dekoder për analizimin semantik me UCCA SemEval 2019 Task 1. Koduesi është një Bi-LSTM dhe dekoderi përdor vetë-vëmendjen rekursive. Modeli i propozuar lehtëson sfidat dhe përfaqëson inxhinierinë në analizuesit tradicionalë të bazuar në tranzicion dhe të bazuar në grafik. Analizatori që rezulton është i thjeshtë dhe është provuar të jetë efektiv në detyrën semantike të analizimit.', 'az': 'Biz UCCA SemEval 2019 Task 1 ilə semantik analizi üçün kodlayıcı-dekoder modelini göstəririk. Kodlayıcı bir Bi-LSTM idi və kodlayıcı yenidən öz-dikkatini istifadə edir. Önülləşdirilmiş modellər dəyişiklikləri və təhsil mühendisiyyətini nəticəli keçirmək və graf tabanlı ayırıcılardan azaldırır. Sonuç ayırıcısı çox asandır və semantik ayırış işində etkilidir.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք սեմանտիկ վերլուծության կոդավորման մոդել UCCA-ի 2019 թվականի "Սեմեվալ" 1-ի հետ: Կոդավորը երկու-LSMT է, և կոդավորը օգտագործում է կրկնօրինակ ինքնաուշադրություն: Առաջարկված մոդելը նվազեցնում է մարտահրավերները և հնարավորությունները ավանդական հաղորդակցման և գրաֆիկական վերլուծումների մեջ: Արդյունքում ստացված վերլուծումը պարզ է և ապացուցել է, որ արդյունավետ է սեմանտիկ վերլուծումը:', 'ca': "Presentam un model de codificador-decoder per l'analització semàntica amb la tasca 1 de la UCCA SemEval 2019. The encoder is a Bi-LSTM and the decoder uses recursive self-attention.  El model proposat alivia els reptes i característiques de l'enginyeria en analitzadors tradicionals basats en transició i gràfics. L'analitzador resultant és simple i ha demostrat que és eficaç en la tasca d'analització semàntica.", 'bn': 'আমরা ইউসিকিএ সেমইভাল ২০১৯ কাজের সাথে সেমেন্টিক পার্সিং এর জন্য একটি এনকোডার-ডেকোডার মডেল উপস্থাপন করি। এনকোডার একটি বি-এলস্টিএম এবং ডেকোডার পুনরায় আত্মমনোযোগ ব্যবহার করে। প্রস্তাবিত মডেল ঐতিহ্যবাহী পরিবর্তন ভিত্তিক এবং গ্রাফ ভিত্তিক পার্সারে চ্যালেঞ্জ এবং বৈশিষ্ট্যিক ইঞ্জিন ফলাফল পার্সিং কাজে কার্যকর করার জন্য সাধারণ এবং প্রমাণিত হয়েছে।', 'cs': 'Představujeme kodér-dekodér model pro sémantickou parsování s UCCA SemEval 2019 Task 1. Kodér je Bi-LSTM a dekodér využívá rekurzivní sebepozornost. Navržený model zmírňuje výzvy a funkce inženýrství v tradičních přechodových a grafových parserech. Výsledný parser je jednoduchý a prokázaný jako efektivní na sémantické parsování úlohy.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme kooderi-dekooderimallin semanttiseen jäsentämiseen UCCA SemEval 2019 -tehtävällä 1. Enkooderi on Bi-LSTM ja dekooderi käyttää rekursiivista itsehuomiota. Ehdotettu malli lievittää haasteita ja ominaisuuksien suunnittelua perinteisissä siirtymäpohjaisissa ja graafisissa parsereissa. Tuloksena oleva jäsentäjä on yksinkertainen ja osoittautunut tehokkaaksi semanttisessa jäsennystehtävässä.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo model kodera-dekodera za semantičku analizu sa UCCA SemEval 2019 Task 1. Koder je Bi-LSTM i dekoder koristi rekursivnu samopouzdanje. Predloženi model smanjuje izazove i funkcionalno in ženjerstvo u tradicionalnim razmatračima na transiciji i na grafu baziranim. Rezultatni analizator je jednostavan i dokazan da je učinkovit na zadatku semantičkog analizanja.', 'et': 'Esitleme kodeerija-dekooderi mudelit semantiliseks parsimiseks UCCA SemEval 2019 ülesandega 1. Kodeerija on Bi-LSTM ja dekooder kasutab rekursiivset enesetähelepanu. Kavandatud mudel leevendab väljakutseid ja funktsionaalsust traditsiooniliste üleminekupõhiste ja graafikapõhiste parserite puhul. Saadud parser on lihtne ja tõestatud efektiivne semantilise parsimise ülesandes.', 'jv': 'We present an koder-decoder model for semanti c PASSing with UKA seminval 2011 task 1. Ko_ngkoder bukane bi-SLT M lan dekojer bukane Peringatan pengguna nggawe Laptop" and "Desktop EMAIL', 'ha': 'Kana gabatar da wani motsi na kodkoder wa yin parse na semantic with UCCA SemEV 2019 Taimar 1. The encoder is a Bi-LSTM and the decoder uses recursive self-attention.  @ info: whatsthis Parallel na fassara mai sauƙi ne kuma an jarraba shi mai amfani ga aikin yin parse na semantic.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo model kodirnika-dekoderja za semantično razčlenjevanje z nalogo 1 UCCA SemEval 2019. Koder je Bi-LSTM in dekoder uporablja rekurzivno samopozornost. Predlagani model ublaži izzive in funkcijski inženiring v tradicionalnih prehodnih in grafskih razčlenjevalnikih. Nastali razčlenjevalnik je preprost in dokazano učinkovit pri semantičnem razčlenjevanju.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מודל קודד-מפענח עבור בדיקת סמנטית עם UCCA SemEval 2019 משימה 1. הקודן הוא BI-LSTM והמפענח משתמש בשימוש תשומת לב עצמית חוזרת. המודל המוצע מקל אתגרים ומכין הנדסה במעברים מסורתיים ומבוססים בגרף. המחקר הנוצא הוא פשוט והוכיח שהוא יעיל במשימת המחקר הסמנטית.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་UCCA SemEval 2019 ལས་ཀ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་མཁན་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་སྟངས། སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་འདི་Bi-LSTM་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་ལས་མཛེས་ཆས་ཀྱིས་ཡང་བསྐྱར་གསལ་བཞག་སྟངས་བེད་སྤྱོད། The proposed model alleviates challenges and feature engineering in traditional transition-based and graph-based parsers. དབྱངས་འབྲུའི་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་ནི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་བ་ཞིབ་ཏེ།'}
{'en': 'BrainEE at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Ensembling Linear Classifiers for Emotion Prediction', 'ar': 'BrainEE في SemEval-2019 Task 3: تجميع المصنفات الخطية للتنبؤ بالعاطفة', 'pt': 'BrainEE na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Combinando Classificadores Lineares para Previsão de Emoções', 'fr': 'BrainEE à SemEval-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Assembler des classificateurs linéaires pour la prédiction des émotions', 'es': 'BrainEE en la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2019: Ensamblar clasificadores lineales para la predicción de emociones', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のBrainEEタスク3 ：感情予測のための線形分類子の組み立て', 'zh': 'BrainEE 在 SemEval-2019 务 3:情测融合线性类器', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 3 पर BrainEE: भावना भविष्यवाणी के लिए रैखिक क्लासिफायर्स Ensembling', 'ru': 'BrainEE на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Объединение линейных классификаторов для прогнозирования эмоций', 'ga': 'BrainEE ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Aicmitheoirí Líneacha le haghaidh Tuar Mothúcháin', 'ka': 'BrainEE semiEval-2019 სამუშაო დავალება 3: რესიური კლასიფირების გამოყენება Emotion Prediction', 'hu': 'BrainEE a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: Lineáris besorolók összeállítása az érzelmek előrejelzésére', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Σύνθεση γραμμικών ταξινομητών για την πρόβλεψη συναισθημάτων', 'it': 'BrainEE a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Assemblare gli annunci lineari per la previsione delle emozioni', 'lt': '„BrainEE“ programos „SemEval-2019“ 3 užduotis: sukurti linijinius klasifikatorius emocijų prognozei', 'kk': 'BrainEE көңіл- 2019 3- тапсырмасында: көңіл алдындағы линиялық классификаторларды қолдану', 'mk': 'BrainEE на SemEval-2019 задача 3: Енсемплирање на линијарни класификатори за предвидување на емоции', 'ms': 'BrainEE di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Ensembling Linear Classifiers for Emotion Prediction', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3- ലെ ബ്രെയിന്\u200dEE: ഇമോട്ടോഷന്\u200d മുന്\u200dഗണന ന നിര്\u200dണ്ണയത്തിനുള്ള ലൈന്\u200d ക്ലാസിഫയര്\u200d', 'mt': 'BrainEE f’SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensembling Linear Classifiers for Emotion Prediction', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Тапсыг 3-р тархины хэлбэрээр тархины хэлбэрийг ашиглах', 'no': 'BrainEE på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3: Utvidar linjerklassifiseringar for førehandsvising av førehandsvising', 'pl': 'BrainEE na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Kompleksowanie klasyfikatorów liniowych do prognozowania emocji', 'ro': 'BrainEE la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Ansamblarea clasificatorilor liniari pentru predicția emoțiilor', 'sr': 'BrainEE na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: uključivanje linijskih klasifikatora za predviđanje emocija', 'si': 'බ්\u200dරේයින්EE සම්වේල්-2019 වැඩ 3: ලිනියර් ක්ලාසිෆර්ස් සඳහා භාවිතාව ප්\u200dරධාන', 'so': 'BrainEE-ka SemEval-2019 Shaqada 3: Heshiisiinta fasaxyada Linear-Classifiers for Emotion Prediction', 'sv': 'BrainEE på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Ensembla linjära annonsörer för känsloförutsägelse', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 3 இல் பிரைன்EE: உணர்வு முன்னுரிமைக்கான கோடு வகைப்பாளர்களை சேமிக்கும்', 'ur': 'BrainEE at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensembling Linear Classifiers for Emotion Prediction', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifa 3: Emotion Prediction uchun Linear Classifiers', 'vi': 'Đầu não tại nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 9 3: Kiểm tra mê tuyến giáp cho dự đoán cảm xúc', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Ансамбулиране на линейни класификатори за прогнозиране на емоциите', 'hr': 'BrainEE na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: uključenje linijskih klasifikatora za predviđanje emocija', 'da': 'BrainEE på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Ensembling af lineære husholdere til følelsesforudsigelse', 'nl': 'BrainEE op SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Het samenstellen van lineaire classificatoren voor emotionele voorspelling', 'id': 'BrainEE di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Ensembling Linear Classifiers for Emotion Prediction', 'fa': 'BrainEE at semiEval-2019 Task 3: Enabling Linear Classifiers for Emotion Prediction', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019의 BrainEE 퀘스트 3: 정서 예측을 위한 선형 분류기 통합', 'de': 'BrainEE auf der SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Zusammenstellung linearer Kleinanzeigen zur Emotionsvorhersage', 'tr': 'BrainEE at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensembling Linear Classifiers for Emotion Prediction', 'sw': 'BrainEE kwenye SemEval-2019 Task 3: Kuongeza Makisiano ya Linear kwa ajili ya Kuzuia Tamko', 'af': 'BrainEE by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 3: Uitbreiding Lineêre Klassifikasiers vir Emosie Voorskou', 'sq': 'BrainEE në SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensembling Linear Classifiers for Emotion Prediction', 'am': 'Eval-2019 ስራ 3: Ensembling Linear Classifiers for Emotion Prediction', 'hy': 'BrainEE at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensembling Linear Classifiers for Emotion Prediction', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৩-এ ব্রেইনইE: Emotion Prediction এর জন্য লিনার ক্লাসিফার ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'BrainEE na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: Uključenje linijskih klasifikatora za predviđanje emocija', 'ca': 'BrainEE a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensembling Linear Classifiers for Emotion Prediction', 'az': "BrainEE'nin semiEval-2019 Görevi 3: Emotion Prediction üçün Linear Klasifikləri", 'cs': 'BrainEE na SemEval-2019 Úkol 3: Sestavení lineárních klasifikátorů pro předpověď emocí', 'et': 'BrainEE SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 3: Lineaarsete klassifikaatorite ansambleerimine emotsioonide prognoosimiseks', 'fi': 'BrainEE SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 3: Lineaaristen luokitusten kokoaminen tunteiden ennustamiseen', 'sk': 'BrainEE na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Ensembliranje linearnih klasifikatorjev za napovedovanje čustev', 'jv': 'braille', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מוח EE ב SemEval-2019 משימה 3: Ensembling Linear Classifiers for Emotion Prediction', 'bo': 'BrainEE at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensembling Linear Classifiers for Emotion Prediction'}
{'en': 'The paper describes an ensemble of linear perceptrons trained for emotion classification as part of the SemEval-2019 shared-task 3. The model uses a matrix of probabilities to weight the activations of the base-classifiers and makes a final prediction using the sum rule. The base-classifiers are multi-class perceptrons utilizing character and word n-grams, part-of-speech tags and sentiment polarity scores. The results of our experiments indicate that the ensemble outperforms the base-classifiers, but only marginally. In the best scenario our model attains an F-Micro score of 0.672, whereas the base-classifiers attained scores ranging from 0.636 to 0.666.', 'ar': 'تصف الورقة مجموعة من المدركات الخطية المدربة على تصنيف المشاعر كجزء من المهمة المشتركة 3 في SemEval-2019. يستخدم النموذج مصفوفة من الاحتمالات لتقييم عمليات تنشيط المصنفات الأساسية وإجراء تنبؤ نهائي باستخدام قاعدة الجمع. المصنفات الأساسية عبارة عن مفاهيم متعددة الفئات تستخدم الأحرف والكلمات n-grams وعلامات جزء من الكلام ودرجات قطبية المشاعر. تشير نتائج تجاربنا إلى أن المجموعة تتفوق في الأداء على المصنفات الأساسية ، ولكن بشكل هامشي فقط. في أفضل سيناريو ، يحصل نموذجنا على درجة F-Micro تبلغ 0.672 ، بينما حققت المصنفات الأساسية درجات تتراوح من 0.636 إلى 0.666.', 'es': 'El artículo describe un conjunto de perceptrones lineales entrenados para la clasificación de emociones como parte de la tarea compartida 3 de SemEval-2019. El modelo utiliza una matriz de probabilidades para ponderar las activaciones de los clasificadores de base y realiza una predicción final mediante la regla de suma. Los clasificadores de base son perceptrones de múltiples clases que utilizan n-gramas de caracteres y palabras, etiquetas de parte del discurso y puntuaciones de polaridad de opinión. Los resultados de nuestros experimentos indican que el conjunto supera a los clasificadores de bases, pero solo marginalmente. En el mejor de los casos, nuestro modelo alcanza una puntuación de F-Micro de 0.672, mientras que los clasificadores de base alcanzaron puntuaciones que van de 0.636 a 0.666.', 'fr': "L'article décrit un ensemble de perceptrons linéaires formés pour la classification des émotions dans le cadre de la tâche partagée SemEVAL-2019 3. Le modèle utilise une matrice de probabilités pour pondérer les activations des classificateurs de base et effectue une prédiction finale à l'aide de la règle de somme. Les classificateurs de base sont des perceptrons multiclasses utilisant des n-grammes de caractères et de mots, des étiquettes de parties du discours et des scores de polarité de sentiment. Les résultats de nos expériences indiquent que l'ensemble surpasse les classificateurs de base, mais de façon marginale. Dans le meilleur scénario, notre modèle atteint un score F-Micro de 0,672, alors que les classificateurs de base ont atteint des scores allant de 0,636 à 0,666.", 'pt': 'O artigo descreve um conjunto de perceptrons lineares treinados para classificação de emoções como parte da tarefa compartilhada 3 do SemEval-2019. O modelo usa uma matriz de probabilidades para ponderar as ativações dos classificadores base e faz uma previsão final usando a regra da soma. Os classificadores de base são perceptrons multiclasse que utilizam n-gramas de caracteres e palavras, tags de parte da fala e pontuações de polaridade de sentimento. Os resultados de nossos experimentos indicam que o ensemble supera os classificadores de base, mas apenas marginalmente. No melhor cenário, nosso modelo atinge uma pontuação F-Micro de 0,672, enquanto os classificadores de base obtiveram pontuações que variam de 0,636 a 0,666.', 'ja': 'この論文では、SemEval -2019共有タスク3の一部として、感情分類のためにトレーニングされた線形パーセプトロンのアンサンブルについて説明しています。モデルは、確率の行列を使用して、基底分類子の活性化を重み付けし、和ルールを使用して最終的な予測を行います。基本分類子は、文字及び単語ｎグラム、発話部分タグ、及び感情極性スコアを利用したマルチクラスパーセプトロンである。我々の実験の結果は、アンサンブルがベース分類子よりも優れているが、わずかに優れていることを示している。最良のシナリオでは、モデルは0.672のF - Microスコアを達成し、ベースクラスファイアは0.636から0.666の範囲のスコアを達成します。', 'zh': '论叙组性感知器,训练情感器情类,为SemEval-2019共3之一体。 其用概率矩阵来加权基分器之激活,而用法终占。 大抵器是用字符、单词 n 元语法、词性标情极性分数多感知器。 吾实验结果表明,融合优于基分类器,然略优于基分类器。 以至善得 F-Micro 分为 0.672,而器得分为 0.636 至 0.666。', 'hi': 'पेपर SemEval-2019 साझा-कार्य 3 के हिस्से के रूप में भावना वर्गीकरण के लिए प्रशिक्षित रैखिक perceptrons के एक पहनावे का वर्णन करता है। मॉडल आधार-क्लासिफायरके सक्रियणों को वजन करने के लिए संभावनाओं के मैट्रिक्स का उपयोग करता है और योग नियम का उपयोग करके अंतिम भविष्यवाणी करता है। बेस-क्लासिफायर्स बहु-वर्ग के परसेप्ट्रॉन हैं जो चरित्र और शब्द एन-ग्राम, पार्ट-ऑफ-स्पीच टैग और भावना ध्रुवीयता स्कोर का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों के परिणामों से संकेत मिलता है कि पहनावा आधार-क्लासिफायरों को मात देता है, लेकिन केवल मामूली रूप से। सबसे अच्छे परिदृश्य में हमारा मॉडल 0.672 का एफ-माइक्रो स्कोर प्राप्त करता है, जबकि बेस-क्लासिफायरने 0.636 से 0.666 तक के स्कोर प्राप्त किए।', 'ru': 'В статье описан ансамбль линейных перцептронов, обученных для классификации эмоций в рамках разделяемой задачи 3 SemEval-2019. Модель использует матрицу вероятностей для взвешивания активаций базовых классификаторов и делает окончательный прогноз с помощью правила суммы. Базовые классификаторы представляют собой многоклассовые перцептроны, использующие n-граммы символов и слов, теги части речи и оценки полярности настроения. Результаты наших экспериментов показывают, что ансамбль превосходит базовые классификаторы, но лишь незначительно. В лучшем сценарии наша модель достигает балла F-Micro 0,672, тогда как базовые классификаторы достигли баллов в диапазоне от 0,636 до 0,666.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar cur síos ar ensemble de perceptrons líneacha oilte le haghaidh aicmiú mothúcháin mar chuid de thasc roinnte SemEval-2019 3. Úsáideann an tsamhail maitrís dóchúlachta chun gníomhachtú na mbonn-aicmitheoirí a ualú agus déanann sé réamh-mheastachán deiridh ag baint úsáide as riail na suime. Is iad na bunaicmitheoirí ná perceptrons ilranga a úsáideann carachtar agus focal n-gram, clibeanna cuid cainte agus scóir polaraíochta meon. Léiríonn torthaí ár dturgnaimh go sáraíonn an ensemble na bunaicmitheoirí, ach beagán beag. Sa chás is fearr gnóthaíonn ár múnla scór-F-Micri-F de 0.672, ach bhain na bonn-aicmitheoirí scóir ó 0.636 go 0.666 amach.', 'ka': 'დაახლოების განსაზღვრებულია, რომელიც ემოციონის კლასიფიკაციისთვის განსწავლებული ლინური აღმოჩენების ანსტემბელი, რომელიც SemEval-2019 გაყოფილი საქმედების ნაწილი. მოდელი გამოყენებს შესაძლებლობების მარტიკი, რომ ბაზის კლასიფიკაციების აკეთექტირებას გაზრუნოთ და დასაწყისი წინაწყისი გამოყენება. ბაზის კლასიფიკაციები არის მრავალ კლასის პერსპტრონი, რომელიც n-გრამის სიტყვის, სიტყვის ნაწილი და სენტიმენტის პოლარიტის მონაცემები. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტების შედეგები გვეჩვენებს, რომ ინსენბელი უფრო გავაკეთებს ბაზის კლასიფიკაციების, მაგრამ მხოლოდ მარტივი. საუკეთესო სინარიოში ჩვენი მოდელის მიღება 0,672-ის F-მიკრო წერტილი, მაგრამ ბაზის კლასიფიკაციები მიღებულია წერტილები 0,636-0,666-დან.', 'el': 'Η εργασία περιγράφει ένα σύνολο γραμμικών αντιληπτώνων εκπαιδευμένων για ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων ως μέρος της κοινής εργασίας 3. Το μοντέλο χρησιμοποιεί μια μήτρα πιθανοτήτων για να σταθμίσει τις ενεργοποίησες των βασικών ταξινομητών και κάνει μια τελική πρόβλεψη χρησιμοποιώντας τον κανόνα αθροίσματος. Οι βασικοί ταξινομητές είναι πολλαπλής κατηγορίας perceptrons που χρησιμοποιούν χαρακτήρες και λέξεις n-gramms, ετικέτες τμήματος ομιλίας και βαθμολογίες πολικότητας συναισθημάτων. Τα αποτελέσματα των πειραμάτων μας δείχνουν ότι το σύνολο ξεπερνά τους βασικούς ταξινομητές, αλλά μόνο οριακά. Στο καλύτερο σενάριο το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει βαθμολογία F-Micro 0.672, ενώ οι βασικοί ταξινομητές πέτυχαν βαθμολογίες που κυμαίνονται από 0.636 έως 0.666.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány az érzelmi osztályozásra kiképzett lineáris perceptronok együttesét ismerteti a SemEval-2019 osztott feladat 3 részeként. A modell a valószínűségek mátrixát használja az alap-osztályozók aktiválásának súlyozására, és végső előrejelzést készít az összegszabály használatával. Az alap-osztályozók több osztályú perceptronok, karakter és szó n-gramm, beszédrész címkék és érzelmi polaritási pontszámok felhasználásával. Kísérleteink eredményei azt mutatják, hogy az együttes felülmúlja az alap-osztályozókat, de csak marginálisan. A legjobb forgatókönyvben modellünk az F-Micro pontszámot 0,672, míg az alap-osztályozók 0,636 és 0,666 közötti pontszámot értek el.', 'it': "L'articolo descrive un insieme di percettroni lineari addestrati per la classificazione delle emozioni come parte del compito condiviso SemEval-2019 3. Il modello utilizza una matrice di probabilità per ponderare le attivazioni dei classificatori base e fa una previsione finale utilizzando la regola della somma. I classificatori base sono percettroni multi-classe che utilizzano caratteri e parole n-grammi, tag part-of-speech e punteggi di polarità sentimentale. I risultati dei nostri esperimenti indicano che l'insieme supera i classificatori base, ma solo marginalmente. Nel migliore scenario il nostro modello raggiunge un punteggio F-Micro di 0,672, mentre i classificatori base hanno ottenuto punteggi che vanno da 0,636 a 0,666.", 'lt': 'Dokumente apibūdinamas linijinių perceptronų, apmokytų emocijoms klasifikuoti, rinkinys kaip dalis dalijamosios užduoties SemEval-2019 3. Modelyje naudojama bazinių klasifikatorių aktyvavimo tikimybės matrica ir atliekama galutinė prognozė taikant sumos taisyklę. Pagrindiniai klasifikatoriai yra daugiakalassiai perceptronai, naudojantys simbolius ir žodžius n-gramai, kalbos dalis ir jautrumo poliarumo taškus. Mūsų eksperimentų rezultatai rodo, kad komplektas viršija bazinius klasifikatorius, bet tik ribotai. Geriausiame scenarijuje mūsų modelis pasiekia F-Micro tašką 0,672, o pagrindiniai klasifikatoriai pasiekė tašką nuo 0,636 iki 0,666.', 'mk': 'Во весникот се опишува ансембл на линијарни перцептрони обучени за емоционална класификација како дел од SemEval-2019 споделена задача 3. Моделот користи матрица на веројатности за тежина на активациите на базичките класификатори и прави конечно предвидување користејќи го правилото за сума. Базичните класификатори се повеќекласни перцептрони кои користат знак и збор n-грам, дел од говорот и поени на поларитет на чувствата. The results of our experiments indicate that the ensemble outperforms the base-classifiers, but only marginally.  Во најдобриот сценарио нашиот модел постигна оценка Ф-Микро од 0,672, додека основните класификатори постигнаа оценки од 0,636 до 0,666.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз эмоциялық түрлендіру үшін оқылған сызық түрлендірушілер 3- тапсырманың бөлігі ретінде оқылған сызық түрлендірушілердің символын анықтайды. Бұл үлгі негізгі классификациялардың белсенділігін көлемдеу үшін мүмкіндіктердің матриксін қолданады және қосымша ережелерді қолдану үшін соңғы таңдау керек Негізгі классификациялары көп класс түсініктері n- граммдар, сөздің бөлігі мен сезімдік полярдық нөмірлерін қолданады. Тәжірибелеріміздің нәтижелері қолданыстар негізгі классификацияларының, бірақ тек шегінен шығарылады деп белгілейді. Ең жақсы сценарий үлгісіміз 0,672 F-микро нөміріне жеткізеді, бірақ негізгі классификациялары 0,636- 0,666 нөмірінен жеткізді.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan kumpulan persepton linear dilatih untuk kelasukan emosi sebagai sebahagian dari SemEval-2019 berkongsi-tugas 3. Model menggunakan matriks kebarangkalian untuk berat aktivasi klasifikasi asas dan membuat ramalan akhir menggunakan peraturan jumlah. Pengklasifikasi asas adalah perseptron berkelas berbilang yang menggunakan aksara dan perkataan n-gram, sebahagian-dari-ucapan tag dan skor polariti sentimen. Hasil eksperimen kita menunjukkan bahawa ensemble melampaui kelas asas, tetapi hanya secara marginal. Dalam skenario terbaik model kita mencapai skor F-Micro 0.672, sementara pengukur asas mencapai skor dari 0.636 hingga 0.666.', 'ml': 'പേപ്പറിന്റെ പേപ്പറിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2019 പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്ന പണിയില്\u200d ഒരു ഭാഗമായി പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു  മോഡല്\u200d ഒരു മാറ്റ്രിക്സ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d തൂക്കുവാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള ഒരു മാറ്റിക്സ് ഉപയോഗിക അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലെ വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d പല-ക്ലാസ്സിലെ പ്രദര്\u200dശനങ്ങളാണ്. അക്ഷരസങ്ങളും വാക്ക് n-ഗ്രാമുകളും സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ടാഗുകളില്\u200d ഭാഗവും വ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d ബേസ്-ക്ലാസ്ഫിളുകള്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന് ഏറ്റവും നല്ല സിനേരിയില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d 0.672 ന്റെ F-മൈക്രോ സ്കോര്\u200d എത്തുന്നു. എന്നിട്ടും ബേസ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിള്\u200dമാര്\u200d 0.636 ല്\u200d നിന്നും 0.666 വരെ', 'mt': 'Id-dokument jiddeskrivi ensemble ta’ perċetturi lineari mħarrġa għall-klassifikazzjoni emozzjonali bħala parti mill-kompitu kondiviż SemEval-2019 3. Il-mudell juża matriċi ta’ probabilitajiet biex jikkunsidra l-attivazzjonijiet tal-klassifikaturi bażi u jagħmel previżjoni finali bl-użu tar-regola tas-somma. Il-klassifikaturi bażiċi huma perċetturi ta’ diversi klassijiet li jużaw il-karattru u l-kelma n-grammi, it-tikketti ta’ parti mid-diskors u l-punteġġi tal-polarità tas-sentiment. Ir-riżultati tal-esperimenti tagħna jindikaw li l-ensemble jaqbeż il-klassifikaturi bażi, iżda biss marġinalment. Fl-aħjar xenarju, il-mudell tagħna jilħaq punteġġ F-Micro ta’ 0.672, filwaqt li l-klassifikaturi bażi laħqu punteġġi li jvarjaw minn 0.636 sa 0.666.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano zespół perceptron liniowych przeszkolonych do klasyfikacji emocji w ramach wspólnego zadania SemEval-2019 3. Model wykorzystuje macierz prawdopodobieństw do ważenia aktywacji klasyfikatorów bazowych i dokonuje ostatecznej przewidywania przy użyciu reguły sumy. Podstawowe klasyfikatory to wieloklasjowe perceptrony wykorzystujące znaki i słowa n-gramy, tagi części mowy i wyniki polaryzacji sentymentów. Wyniki naszych eksperymentów wskazują, że zespół przewyższa klasyfikatory bazowe, ale tylko marginalnie. W najlepszym scenariuszu nasz model osiąga wynik F-Micro 0.672, natomiast klasyfikatory bazowe osiągały wyniki od 0.636 do 0.666.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea descrie un ansamblu de perceptrone liniare instruite pentru clasificarea emoțiilor ca parte a sarcinii comune SemEval-2019 3. Modelul folosește o matrice de probabilități pentru a pondera activările clasificatorilor de bază și face o predicție finală folosind regula sumei. Clasificatorii de bază sunt perceptronii multi-clasă care utilizează caractere și cuvânt n-grame, etichete part-of-speech și scoruri de polaritate sentiment. Rezultatele experimentelor noastre indică faptul că ansamblul depășește clasificatorii de bază, dar numai marginal. În cel mai bun scenariu modelul nostru obține un scor F-Micro de 0,672, în timp ce clasificatorii de bază au obținut scoruri variind de la 0,636 la 0,666.', 'no': 'Papiret beskriver ein ensembel av lineære oppfatningar som trengte for emosjonsklassifikasjon som del av semiEval-2019 delt oppgåve 3. Modellen brukar ein matris av sannsynlege måtar å vekta aktiveringa av baseklassifikatorane og gjera ein sluttforegåve med summregelen. Grunnklassifiseringane er fleire klassespørsmål som brukar teikn og ord n-gramer, del av taletaggar og sentimentpoleringspoeng. Resultatet av eksperimentene våre tyder på at ensemblen utfører baseklassifiseringane, men berre marginalt. I den beste scenarioen finn modellen vårt eit F-Micro-poeng med 0,672, mens baseklassifiseringane fikk poeng frå 0,636 til 0,666.', 'so': 'Qoraalka warqaddu wuxuu ku qoran yahay muusiko linear ah oo loo baray fasaxa emotion sida qayb ka mid ah SemEval-2019 shaqada 3. The model uses a matrix of probabilities to weight the activations of the base-classifiers and makes a final prediction using the sum rule.  Fasaxyada aasaasiga ah waa aragti badan oo isticmaalaya xaraf iyo hadal n-gram, qeyb ka mid ah alaabta hadalka iyo xisaabta. Imtixaanadeena dhamaadkeedu waxay muuqataa in dabeecadu ay ka muuqato fasalayaasha aasiga ah, laakiin waxay ka muuqataa si gaar ah. Tilmaamaha ugu fiican ee modellkayagu wuxuu gaadhaa koox F-Mikro oo ah 0.672, inta ay fasalayaasha aasaasiga ah gaadheen scoro oo ka tirsan 0.636 ilaa 0.666.', 'sr': 'U novinama opisuje kompleks linearnih perceptrona obučenih za klasifikaciju emocija kao deo podijeljenog zadatka 3. Model koristi matricu verovatnoće da teži aktivaciju baznih klasifikatora i napravi konačno predviđanje korištenjem pravila sume. Klasifikatori baze su višeklasični perceptroni koji koriste karakter i reč n-grame, deo govornih znakova i polarnost osjećaja. Rezultati naših eksperimenata ukazuju na to da ensemble iznosi bazne klasifikatore, ali samo marginalno. U najboljem scenariju naš model postiže F-mikro rezultat od 0,672, dok su bazni klasifikatori dobili rezultate od 0,636 do 0,666.', 'si': 'The papers are a ensEmble of linear senspectrons Trained for emotion classification as part of the semeval-2019 shared-job 3. මොඩේල් භාවිතා කරන්න පුළුවන්ගේ මැට්\u200dරික්ස් භාවිතා කරන්න බේස් ක්\u200dරියාසිකරුවන්ගේ සක්\u200dරියාත්මක වැඩ කරන්න සහ The base-classifiers are Multi-Classes sensorons that use character and word n-gram, part-of-language Tags and sension polability scores. Note this is a KRunner keyword;% 1 is a KRunner keyword;% 2 is a KRunner keyword;% 3 is a KRunner keyword;% 4 is a KRunner keyword අපේ පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ ඒ පරීක්ෂණයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරකයෝ විතරයි, ඒත් ප්\u200dරත අපේ මෝඩේල් එකේ හොඳම සිනේරියේ F-මයික්\u200dරෝ ස්කෝර් 0.672 වෙනුවෙන් ලැබෙනවා, ඒ වගේම මූලික විශේෂකයෝ 0.636 වල 0.666 වල ස්කෝර් ල', 'sv': 'Uppsatsen beskriver en ensemble linjära perceptroner utbildade för känsloklassificering som en del av SemEval-2019 delad-uppgift 3. Modellen använder en sannolikhetsmatris för att väga aktiveringarna av basklassificerarna och gör en slutlig förutsägelse med hjälp av summereglen. Basklassificerarna är flerklassperceptroner som använder tecken och ord n-gram, deltal taggar och sentimentpolaritetspoäng. Resultaten av våra experiment indikerar att ensemblen överträffar basklassificerarna, men bara marginellt. I det bästa scenariot uppnår vår modell en F-Micro poäng på 0,672, medan basklassificerarna uppnådde poäng från 0,636 till 0,666.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан нь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хуваалтын нэг хэсэг болгон SemEval-2019 оны хуваалтын 3 даалгаварын нэг хэсэг болгон сургалтын шугаман ойлголтыг тайлбарладаг. Загвар нь суурь хэлбэрийн активчлэлүүдийг жингээд нийт хэлбэрээр эцсийн таамаглалтыг ашигладаг. Үндсэн хэлбэрүүд нь олон ангийн ойлголтууд харьцаа, n-грамм, ярианы хэсэг, мэдрэмжтэй зайлшгүй тоонуудыг ашигладаг. Бидний туршилтын үр дүнүүд нь суурь хэлбэрүүдийг багасгаж чадахгүй гэдгийг харуулдаг. Хамгийн сайн хувилбарт бидний загвар 0.672-ийн F-микро оноо хүртэл байна. Гэхдээ суурь хувилбарууд 0.636-0.666 хүртэл оноо хүртэл хүртэл хүртэл хүртэл хүртэл хүртэл хүртэл хүртэл хүртэл хүртэл', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் உணர்வு வகைப்பாட்டிற்கு பயிற்சி செம்Eval-2019 பகிர்ந்த பணி 3 பகிர்ந்து செய்யப்பட்ட வரிசை பார்வைப்புகளின்  The model uses a matrix of probabilities to weigh the activations of the base- classifiers and make a final prediction using the sum rule. அடிப்படை வகுப்பாளர்கள் பல வகுப்பு பார்வைகள் எழுத்துகள் மற்றும் சொல்லு n- grams, பேச்சு ஒட்டுகளின் பகுதி மற்றும் உணர்வு தீவிரம் மதிப்பு எங்கள் சோதனைகளின் முடிவுகள் குறிப்பிடுகிறது அடிப்படை வகுப்பாளர்களை வெளியேற்றுகிறது, ஆனால் குறிப்பிடும். சிறந்த தோற்றத்தில் எங்கள் மாதிரி 0.672 க்கு F-மைக்ரோ மதிப்பெண்ணை பெறுகிறது, ஆனால் அடிப்படை வகுப்பாளர்கள் 0.636 வரை 0.666 வரை வரை 0.636 வரை பெற', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ایک سیم Eval-2019 shared-task 3 کی حصہ کے طور پر تعلیم کیے ہوئے احساسات کلاسیفون کے لئے لینیاری نظریات کا انتشار بیان کرتا ہے. موڈل ایک ماٹریکس کی امکانات کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ بنسٹ کلیسٹر کے فعالیت کا وزن کرے اور جمع قانون کے مطابق آخری پیش بینی کرے۔ بنسٹ کلاسپیر متعدد کلاس نظریات ہیں جو شخص اور کلام n-گرم کے استعمال کرتے ہیں، کلام کے ٹاگ اور احساسات مضبوط اسکور ہیں. ہمارے آزمائش کے نتیجے نشان دیتے ہیں کہ انٹامبل بنیاد کلاسیفوں سے زیادہ کامل ہوتا ہے لیکن صرف اندازے سے۔ بہترین سیناریو میں ہماری مدل 0.672 کی F-میکروک اسکور پہنچ رہی ہے، حالانکہ بنیاد کلاسیفوں نے 0.636 سے 0.666 تک اسکور پہنچ لیا ہے.', 'uz': "Qogʻoz SemEval-2019 bilan birlashtirilgan vazifaning 3 qismidan o'rganilgan bir necha linear perceptronning birinchi namunasi. Bu model asosiy klassiplarning amallarini uzish uchun matrix ishlatiladi va butun qoidadan foydalanishini bajaradi. Asosiy darajalar - belgi va soʻz n- gram, gapiruvchi belgining qismlari va hisobiy polariy qiymatlari bilan bir necha darajada ko'plab koʻruvchilar. Bizning tajribalarimizning natijalari aytganligini anglatadi, bu asosiy darajalarni bajaradi, lekin faqat oddiy narsa. Biz modelimiz eng yaxshi darajada 0.672 darajaga F-Micro scori topadi, ammo asosiy darajalar 0.636 dan 0.666 dan 0.666 dan foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Bài báo mô tả một kết hợp của đa ứng viên đường tuyến được đào tạo để phân loại cảm xúc như một phần của nhiệm vụ chia sẻ SemEvol 3. Mô hình sử dụng một ma trận về khả năng xác định kích hoạt của những người phân loại cơ bản và dự đoán cuối cùng dựa trên quy định tổng. The base-classificars are multi class perceptuns using character and Từ n-grams, part-of-Giọng n ói tags và đa thể cảm cực điểm. Kết quả thí nghiệm của chúng ta cho thấy dàn nhạc hoàn thiện các phân loại căn cứ, nhưng chỉ bề ngoài. Theo kịch bản tốt nhất, mẫu của chúng ta đạt được điểm F-Micro của 0.672, trong khi những người phân loại cơ bản đạt được điểm từ 0.666 đến 0.62.', 'bg': 'Статията описва ансамбъл от линейни възприятия, обучени за класификация на емоциите като част от споделената задача 3. Моделът използва матрица от вероятности за претегляне на активиранията на базовите класификатори и прави окончателно прогнозиране с помощта на правилото за сумата. Базовите класификатори са многокласни възприятия, използващи символи и думи n-грами, част от речта тагове и сентиментална полярност. Резултатите от нашите експерименти показват, че ансамбълът превъзхожда базовите класификатори, но само незначително. В най-добрия сценарий нашият модел постига резултат от 0.672, докато базовите класификатори постигат резултати от 0.636 до 0.666.', 'da': 'Artiklen beskriver et ensemble af lineære perceptroner uddannet til følelsesklassificering som en del af SemEval-2019 delt-opgave 3. Modellen bruger en matrix af sandsynligheder til at vægte aktiveringerne af basisklassificatorerne og laver en endelig forudsigelse ved hjælp af summereglen. Basisklassificatorerne er multi-klasse perceptroner, der bruger tegn og ord n-grams, del-of-speech tags og sentiment polarity scores. Resultaterne af vores eksperimenter indikerer, at ensemblet overgår basisklassificatorerne, men kun marginalt. I det bedste scenarie opnår vores model en F-Micro score på 0,672, mens basisklassificatorerne opnåede score fra 0,636 til 0,666.', 'nl': 'Het artikel beschrijft een ensemble van lineaire perceptronen getraind voor emotieclassificatie als onderdeel van de SemEval-2019 shared-task 3. Het model maakt gebruik van een matrix van waarschijnlijkheden om de activeringen van de basis-classificatoren te wegen en maakt een definitieve voorspelling met behulp van de som regel. De basis-classificatoren zijn multi-class perceptrons die gebruik maken van teken en woord n-grammen, part-of-speech tags en sentiment polariteit scores. De resultaten van onze experimenten wijzen erop dat het ensemble de basisclassificatoren overtreft, maar slechts marginaal. In het beste scenario bereikt ons model een F-Micro score van 0.672, terwijl de basis-classificatoren scores bereikten variërend van 0.636 tot 0.666.', 'de': 'Der Beitrag beschreibt ein Ensemble linearer Perzeptronen, die für die Emotionsklassifizierung im Rahmen der SemEval-2019 Shared-Task 3 trainiert wurden. Das Modell verwendet eine Matrix von Wahrscheinlichkeiten, um die Aktivierung der Basisklassifikatoren zu gewichten und macht eine abschließende Vorhersage anhand der Summenregel. Die Basis-Klassifikatoren sind mehrstufige Perzeptronen, die Zeichen- und Wort-n-Gramm, Sprachteil-Tags und Sentiment Polarity Scores verwenden. Die Ergebnisse unserer Experimente zeigen, dass das Ensemble die Basisklassifikatoren übertrifft, aber nur marginal. Im besten Szenario erreicht unser Modell einen F-Micro Score von 0.672, während die Basisklassifikatoren Werte von 0.636 bis 0.666 erreichten.', 'id': 'Kertas menggambarkan sebuah ensemble persepton linear dilatih untuk klasifikasi emosi sebagai bagian dari SemEval-2019 shared-task 3. The model uses a matrix of probabilities to weight the activations of the base-classifiers and makes a final prediction using the sum rule.  Klasifikasi dasar adalah persepton multi-kelas yang menggunakan karakter dan kata n-gram, bagian-dari-pidato tag dan skor polaritas sentimen. Hasil eksperimen kita menunjukkan bahwa ensemble melampaui klasifikasi dasar, tapi hanya sedikit. Dalam skenario terbaik model kita mencapai skor F-Micro 0,672, sementara klasifikasi dasar mencapai skor dari 0,636 hingga 0,666.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ تعریف می\u200cکند که شاخه\u200cای از مشاهده\u200cهای خط\u200cشناسی برای classification emotion آموزش داده شده\u200cاند به عنوان بخشی از کار تقسیم\u200cشده\u200cی نیم\u200cEval-2019 3. مدل از ماتریکس احتمالات استفاده می\u200cکند تا فعالیت\u200cهای پایه\u200cشناسیگران را وزن کند و یک پیش\u200cبینی نهایی را با استفاده از قانون جمع می\u200cکند. گرم\u200cهای پایه\u200cشناسی\u200cکننده\u200cها درجه\u200cهای زیادی هستند که با استفاده از شخصیت\u200cها و کلمه\u200cهای n-گرم، پاره\u200cای از نقاشی\u200cهای سخنرانی و نقاشی\u200cهای قطعیت احساسات استفاده می\u200cکنند. نتیجه آزمایشات ما نشان می دهد که انگلیسی از طریق پایه\u200cهای پایه\u200cها، ولی فقط به اندازه\u200cی اندازه\u200cای بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد. در بهترین سناریو مدل ما به یک امتیاز F-Micro از 0.672 رسیده است، در حالی که گروه\u200cهای پایه\u200cشناسیان امتیاز از 0.636 تا 0.666 رسیده اند.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-2019 공유 임무 3의 일부로서 감정 분류를 위해 훈련된 선형 감지기 집합을 묘사한다.이 모델은 확률 행렬을 사용하여 기본 분류기의 활성화를 가중시키고 구화 규칙을 사용하여 최종 예측을 한다.기본 분류기는 문자와 단어 n-gram, 어성 표기와 감정의 극성 득점을 이용한 여러 종류의 감지기다.우리의 실험 결과에 의하면 집적 분류기의 성능은 기본 분류기보다 우수하지만 기본 분류기보다 약간 높다.최적 상황에서 우리 모델의 F-Micro 점수는 0.672이고 기본 분류기의 점수는 0.636에서 0.666 사이이다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hilo linaelezea picha ya watazamaji wa mistari waliofundishwa kwa ajili ya kutangaza hisia kama sehemu ya kazi ya SemEval-2019 ilishiriki kazi 3. The model uses a matrix of probabilities to weight the activations of the base-classifiers and makes a final prediction using the sum rule.  Wasambaji wa msingi ni mtazamo wa aina mbalimbali wanaotumia tabia na maneno n-gram, sehemu ya alama za hotuba na vipimo vya uchaguzi. Matokeo ya majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa vifaa hivyo vinaonyesha wataalamu wa msingi, lakini kwa kiasi kikubwa tu. Katika hali nzuri zaidi mwelekeo wetu unafikia score ya F-Micro ya 0.672, wakati wataalamu wa msingi walipata vipimo vya 0.636 hadi 0.666.', 'sq': 'Gazeta përshkruan një komplet perceptonësh linear ë të trajnuar për klasifikimin e emocioneve si pjesë e detyrës së përbashkët SemEval-2019 3. Modeli përdor një matricë probabilitetesh për të peshuar aktivitetet e klasifikuesve bazë dhe bën një parashikim përfundimtar duke përdorur rregullin e shumës. Klasifikuesit bazë janë perceptorë shumë klasash duke përdorur karakterin dhe fjalën n-gram, pjesë-të-fjalës dhe rezultatet e polaritetit të ndjenjave. Rezultatet e eksperimenteve tona tregojnë se ansambli është më i mirë se klasifikuesit bazë, por vetëm në mënyrë marginale. Në skenarin më të mirë modeli ynë arrin një pikë F-Micro prej 0.672, ndërsa klasifikuesit bazë arritën pikë nga 0.636 në 0.666.', 'am': 'የጋዜጠው ጉዳዩ የሴmEval-2019 ክፍል-ስራ 3 ክፍል የተማረ የስብሰባ ክፍል የተማረ የመስመር ጽሑፎችን ምሳሌ ይናገራል፡፡ ሞዴላው የአባቢው ክፍተቶችን ለመመዝገብ የሚችል ማትሪክስ ይጠቅማል፡፡ መደበኛ ክፍተቶችን የፊደል እና ቃላት n-gram, ክፍል የንግግር ምልክቶች እና የስሜት ውጤት ነጥቦች ናቸው፡፡ የሞከራችንን ፍሬዎች መደምደሚያ መሆኑን ያሳያል፡፡ በመልካም ስናይነት ሞዴታችን 0.672 የሜክሮን ደረጃ አግኝቷል፤ ዳሩ ግን መሠረተኞቹ ከ0.636 ወደ 0.666 ደረጃዎች ደረሱ።', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է գծային ընկալման համակարգը, որը պատրաստված է զգացմունքների դասակարգման համար, որպես "ՍեմԵվալ 2019" կիսված խնդրի 3 մաս: Մոդելը օգտագործում է հավանականության մատրիքս հիմնական դասակարգողների ակտիվացման կշիռելու համար և վերջնական կանխատեսումը կատարում է օգտագործելով գումարի կանոնը: Հիմնական դասակարգողները բազմադասարանային ընկալողներն են, որոնք օգտագործում են n-գրամ բնորոշ և բառ, խոսքի մասեր և զգացմունքների բնակչության գնահատականներ: Մեր փորձարկումների արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ համակարգը գերազանցում է հիմնական դասակարգողներին, բայց միայն սահմանափակ: Լավագույն սցենարիայում մեր մոդելը հասնում է F-Միկրոգնահատականի 0,672, մինչդեռ հիմնական դասակարգողները հասնում են 0,636-ից մինչև 0,666 գնահատականների:', 'af': "Die papier beskrywe 'n ensemble van lineêre perceptrone wat opgelei word vir emosie klasifikasie as deel van die SemEval-2019 deel-taak 3. Die model gebruik 'n matriks van waarskynlikheite om die aktiwiteite van die basis-klassifiseerders te gewig en maak 'n eindelike voorskou deur die sum reël te gebruik. Die basis- klassifiseerders is multiklasse perceptrone wat karakter en woord n- grame gebruik word, deel- van- sprekking etikette en sentiment polariteit telling. Die resultate van ons eksperimente wys dat die ensemble die basis-klassifiseerders uitvoer, maar net marginaal. In die beste scenario kom ons model 'n F-Micro telling van 0.672, terwyl die basis-klassifiseerders bereik het aantal vanaf 0.636 tot 0.666.", 'hr': 'U novinama opisuje kompleks linearnih perceptrona obučenih za klasifikaciju emocija kao dio dijelnog zadatka 3. Model koristi matricu vjerojatnosti za težinu aktivacija baznih klasifikatora i čini konačno predviđanje koristeći pravilo sume. Klasifikatori baze su višeklasični perceptroni koji koriste karakter i riječ n-grame, dio govornih znakova i polarnost osjećaja. Rezultati naših eksperimenata ukazuju na to da ensemble nadmašuje bazne klasifikatore, ali samo marginalno. U najboljem scenariju naš model postiže F-mikro rezultat od 0,672, dok su bazni klasifikatori dobili rezultate od 0,636 do 0,666.', 'tr': 'Kagyzyň duýgular klasifikasy üçin bilim sistemasy çyzgyly düşünjelerini SemEval-2019-iň paylaşyk-zadyň 3-nji bölegi ýaly tassyklaýar. Model basit klasifikatörlerin aktiflerini a ğırlık etmek için bir matrisi kullanır ve toplam kurallarını kullanarak son bir tahmin edir. Basit klasifikatörler birnäçe-klas sanlary karakteri we sözleri n-gramlerni ullanýarlar, çykyş taglarynyň bir parçasynda we sentenci polaritet sanlarynda ullanýarlar. Synaglarymyzyň netijesi bolan ýagdaýyň esasy klasifikalaryň esasy üstünde döwürjegini görkezýär, ýöne diňe boýunça döwürjegini görkezýär. Iň gowy senaryýada biziň modelimiz 0.672-yň F-Micro अंतर barýar, we baz klasifikalaryň 0.636 we 0.666-dan berilýar.', 'az': "Kağıt, duygusal klasifikasyon üçün təhsil edilmiş linear perceptronların 3-ci paylaşılmış işin bir parças ı olaraq təhsil edir. Model baz klassifikatların aktivasiyonlarını a ğırlığına almaq üçün ehtimallıqların matrisini istifadə edir və toplam kurallarını istifadə edərək son tədbir edir. Basit klassifikatlar çoxlu sın ıf görüntüləridir ki, n-gramları, söz etiketlərinin bir parçası və duyguların polarisi nöqtələrini istifadə edir. Həyatlarımızın sonuçları belə göstərir ki, ensemble baz klasifikatorların, ancaq qədər qədər. Ən yaxşı scenariyada modellərimiz 0,672'in F-Micro nöqtəsinə çatdı, halbuki baz klasifikatorların 0,636-0,666 nöqtəsinə çatdılar.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল-২০১৯ শেয়ার কর্মসূচীর তিন অংশ হিসেবে প্রশিক্ষিত লাইনিয়ার প্রজ্ঞার একটি প্রতিবেদন বর্ণনা করেছে। মডেলের মাত্রিক্স ব্যবহার করে বেস-শ্রেণীদের কার্যকলাপ ওজনের জন্য এবং সামান্য নিয়ম ব্যবহার করে শেষ ভবিষ্যৎবাণী করে। বেস-শ্রেণীবিষয়গুলো হচ্ছে বহুশ্রেণীর দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি চরিত্র এবং শব্দ n-গ্রাম ব্যবহার করে, ভাষণের অংশ এবং অনুভূতির দূরীতির স্কোর আমাদের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল নির্দেশ করে যে বেস-ক্লাসিফারগুলোকে বের করে, কিন্তু শুধুমাত্র মাত্র মাধ্যমে। সবচেয়ে ভালো দৃশ্যে আমাদের মডেলটি 0.672 স্কোর পেয়েছে, যেখানে ভিত্তিক শ্রেণীরা 0.636 থেকে 0.666 পর্যন্ত স্কোর পেয়েছে।', 'bs': 'U novinama opisuje kompleks linearnih perceptrona obučenih za klasifikaciju emocija kao dio dijelnog zadatka 3. Model koristi matricu vjerojatnosti za težinu aktivacija baznih klasifikatora i čini konačno predviđanje koristeći pravilo sume. Klasifikatori baze su višeklasični perceptroni koji koriste karakter i riječ n-grame, dio govornih znakova i polarnost osjećaja. Rezultati naših eksperimenata ukazuju na to da ensemble iznosi bazne klasifikatore, ali samo marginalno. U najboljem scenariju naš model postiže F-Micro rezultat od 0,672, dok su bazni klasifikatori dobili rezultate od 0,636 do 0,666.', 'ca': "El paper descriu un conjunt de perceptors linears entrenats per a classificar emocions com part de la tasca compartida SemEval-2019 3. The model uses a matrix of probabilities to weight the activations of the base-classifiers and makes a final prediction using the sum rule.  Els classificadors bàsics són perceptrons de múltiples classes que utilitzen caràcter i paraula n-grams, etiquetes de part-of-speech i puntuacions de polaritat sentimental. Els resultats dels nostres experiments indican que l'ensemble supera els classificadors bàsics, però només marginalment. In the best scenario our model attains an F-Micro score of 0.672, whereas the base-classifiers attained scores ranging from 0.636 to 0.666.", 'et': 'Töös kirjeldatakse lineaarsete tajujate ansamblit, mis on koolitatud emotsioonide klassifitseerimiseks osana SemEval-2019 jagatud ülesandest 3. Mudel kasutab tõenäosuste maatriksi, et kaaluda baasklassifikaatorite aktiveerimist ja teeb lõpliku prognoosi, kasutades summareeglit. Põhiklassifikaatorid on mitmeklassilised tajujad, mis kasutavad märgi- ja sõna n-gramme, osa-kõne silte ja sentimentaalse polaarsuse skoore. Meie eksperimentide tulemused näitavad, et ansambl ületab baasklassifikaatoreid, kuid ainult marginaalselt. Parimal stsenaariumil saavutab meie mudel F-Micro skoori 0,672, samas kui baasklassifikaatorid saavutasid skoori vahemikus 0,636 kuni 0,666.', 'cs': 'Článek popisuje soubor lineárních perceptronů trénovaných pro klasifikaci emocí v rámci sdíleného úkolu SemEval-2019 3. Model používá matici pravděpodobností k vážení aktivací základních klasifikátorů a provede konečnou predikci pomocí pravidla součtu. Základní klasifikátory jsou vícetřídní perceptrony využívající znakové a slovní n-gramy, značky části řeči a skóre polarity sentimentu. Výsledky našich experimentů naznačují, že soubor překonává základní klasifikátory, avšak jen okrajově. V nejlepším scénáři náš model dosahuje F-Micro skóre 0.672, zatímco základní klasifikátory dosahovaly skóre od 0.636 do 0.666.', 'fi': 'Artikkeli kuvaa ryhmää lineaarisia havaintoja, jotka on koulutettu tunteiden luokitteluun osana SemEval-2019 jaettua tehtävää 3. Malli punnitsee perusluokittelijoiden aktivoitumista todennäköisyysmatriisin avulla ja tekee lopullisen ennusteen käyttämällä summasääntöä. Perusluokittelijat ovat monikerroksisia perceptroneja, jotka hyödyntävät merkki- ja sana-n-grammoja, osa-puheen tageja ja tunteiden polariteettitietoja. Kokeiden tulokset osoittavat, että kokonaisuus suoriutuu perusluokittelijoita paremmin, mutta vain marginaalisesti. Parhaassa skenaariossa mallimme saavuttaa F-Micro-pisteen 0,672, kun taas perusluokittelijoiden pisteet vaihtelivat 0,636–0,666.', 'jv': 'Awatasi punika rambarang akeh pancening langgar-akeh luwih dumaten kanggo kelas duwih karo seminval-2011 Open-task 3. Display routing politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Rejalaké ning ujaran anyar bukane mungkin ajeng-ujaran kanggo ngerasar kelas-kelas barang, njuk tenan. In the top of the pageStock label, navigation', 'ha': 'Kanarin na bayyana wani emboli na lissafa da aka sanar da wa classifori wa hisani kamar rabin aikin Semeval-2019 mai share-aikin 3. @ info: whatsthis Ana amfani da karatun na-gram, rabon tagogi na-mazaɓa da score-surori. Matarin jarrabayanmu ke nuna cewa misalin ta fara-danne-danganta, kuma amma yana da amfani kawai. Daga mafi kyaun kalma, misalinmu yana sami wani F-Micro na 0.642, kuma amma fasalarar-bincike sun sami score daga 0.636 zuwa 0.666.', 'sk': 'Prispevek opisuje ansambel linearnih perceptronov, usposobljenih za klasifikacijo čustev v okviru skupne naloge SemEval-2019 3. Model uporablja matriko verjetnosti za tehtanje aktivacij osnovnih klasifikatorjev in naredi končno napoved z uporabo pravila vsote. Osnovni klasifikatorji so večrazredni perceptroni, ki uporabljajo n-grame znakov in besed, oznake dela govora in ocene sentimentalne polarnosti. Rezultati naših eksperimentov kažejo, da ansambel presega osnovne klasifikatorje, vendar le marginalno. V najboljšem scenariju naš model doseže rezultat F-Micro 0,672, medtem ko so osnovni klasifikatorji dosegli rezultate od 0,636 do 0,666.', 'he': 'העיתון מתאר אסמפלטרונים לינריים מאומנים להקליזת רגשות כחלק מהמשימה המשותפת SemEval-2019 3. הדוגמנית משתמשת במטריקס של סבירות כדי לשקול את הפעילות של מסגרי הבסיס ולעשות חיזוי סופי באמצעות חוק הסכום. המסגרים הבסיסיים הם פספסטרונים רבים בכיתה שמשתמשים באופי ומילה n-גרם, חלק מהדיבורים ותוצאות קוטביות רגשות. התוצאות של הניסויים שלנו מצביעות שהאנסמבל מעליף את מסמכי הבסיס, אבל רק בצורה קטנה. בתרחיש הטוב ביותר המודל שלנו משיג נקודת F-Micro של 0.672, בזמן שהמסווגים הבסיסיים השיגו נקודות מגוונות 0.636 ל-0.666.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བུ་དེ་ནི་སེམས་ཚོར་གྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཨིན་རྟགས་ལ། The model uses a matrix of probabilities to weight the activations of the base-classifiers and makes a final prediction using the sum rule. The base-classifiers are multi-class perceptrons utilizing character and word n-grams, part-of-speech tags and sentiment polarity scores. ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་ནི་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱིས་གཞི་དབྱེ་བ་དེ་མངོན་གསལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། In the best scenario our model attains an F-Micro score of 0.672, whereas the base-classifiers attained scores ranging from 0.636 to 0.666.'}
{'en': 'CAiRE_HKUST at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Hierarchical Attention for Dialogue Emotion Classification', 'ar': 'CAiRE_HKUST في مهمة SemEval-2019 3: الاهتمام الهرمي لتصنيف المشاعر الحوارية', 'fr': 'CAIRE_HKUST à SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Attention hiérarchique pour la classification des émotions de dialogue', 'pt': 'CAiRE_HKUST na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Atenção Hierárquica para Classificação de Emoções de Diálogo', 'ja': 'CAiRE_HKUST at SemEval -2019 Task 3: Hierarchical Attention for Dialogue Emotion Classification', 'es': 'Caire_hkust en Semeval-2019 Tarea 3: Atención jerárquica para la clasificación de emociones de diálogo', 'zh': 'CAiRE_HKUSTåœ¨SemEval-2019åŠ¡3:æƒ…ç±»ä¹‹åˆ†ä¹Ÿ', 'ru': 'CAiRE_HKUST на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Иерархическое внимание для классификации эмоций диалога', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 3 पर CAiRE_HKUST: संवाद भावना वर्गीकरण के लिए पदानुक्रमित ध्यान', 'ga': 'CAiRE_HKUST ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Aird Ordlathach d’Aicmiú Mothúcháin Idirphlé', 'ka': 'CAiRE', 'el': 'Καθήκον 3: Ιεραρχική προσοχή για την ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων διαλόγου', 'hu': 'CAiRE_HKUST a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: Hierarchikus figyelem a párbeszéd érzelmeinek osztályozására', 'it': 'CAiRE_HKUST a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Attenzione gerarchica per il dialogo Classificazione delle emozioni', 'kk': 'CAiRE_ HKUST жарым- 2019 тапсырмасында 3: диалогтың көңіл көңіл көңіл классификациясы', 'mk': 'CAiRE_HKUST на SemEval-2019 задача 3: хиерархиска внимание за класификација на емоции во дијалогот', 'ms': 'CAiRE_HKUST di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Perhatian Hierarkik untuk Klasifikasi Emosi Dialog', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3: ഡയലോഗ് എമോട്ടിഷന്\u200d ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d വേണ്ടി ഹീരാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ', 'mt': 'CAiRE_HKUST f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 3: Attenzjoni Ħerarkika għall-Klassifikazzjoni ta’ Emożizzjoni tad-Djalogu', 'lt': 'CAiRE_HKUST 2010 m. puslapyje 3 užduotis: Hierarchinis dėmesys dialogo emocijų klasifikavimui', 'no': 'CAiRE_HKUST ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3: Hierarchical Attention for Dialog Emotion Classification', 'mn': 'CAiRE_HKUST at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Hierarchical Attention for Dialogue Emotion Classification', 'pl': 'CAiRE_HKUST na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Hierarchiczna uwaga na klasyfikację emocji dialogowych', 'ro': 'CAiRE_HKUST la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Atenție ierarhică pentru clasificarea emoțiilor dialogului', 'so': 'CAiRE_HKUST at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Hierarchical Attention for Dialog Emotion Classification', 'sr': 'CAiRE_HKUST na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: Hierarška pažnja za klasifikaciju emocija dijaloga', 'si': 'CAiRE_HKUST at semeval-2019 Job 3: Heirarchical Attension for dialog Emotion Classified', 'sv': 'CAiRE_HKUST på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Hierarkisk uppmärksamhet för dialog känsloklassificering', 'ta': 'CAiRE_HKUST at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Hierarchical Attention for Dialogue Emotion Classification', 'ur': 'CAiRE_HKUST at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Hierarchical Attention for Dialog Emotion Classification', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifa 3: Dialog Emotion Classification uchun Hierarchical Attention', 'vi': 'Đội bảo vệ cảm xúc của hội thẩm đoàn bảo vệ cảm xúc', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Йерархично внимание за класификация на емоциите на диалога', 'nl': 'CAiRE_HKUST op SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Hiërarchische aandacht voor Dialoog Emotie Classificatie', 'da': 'CAiRE_HKUST på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Hierarkisk opmærksomhed på dialog følelsesklassificering', 'de': 'CAiRE_HKUST bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Hierarchische Aufmerksamkeit für Dialogemotionsklassifikation', 'ko': 'CAiRE HKUST SemEval-19 퀘스트 3: 대화 감정 분류의 차원 주의', 'hr': 'CAiRE_HKUST na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 3: hijerarhička pažnja za klasifikaciju emocija dijaloga', 'fa': 'CAiRE_HKUST در تابع شماره ۲۰۱۹ تابع ۳: توجه حکومت حکومت برای کلاس احساسات محاوره', 'af': 'CAiRE_ HKUST by SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 3: Hierarchical Attention vir Dialoog Emotie Klassifikasie', 'sw': 'CAiRE_HKUST katika kazi ya SemEval-2019', 'tr': 'CAiRE_HKUST at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Hierarchical Attention for Dialogue Emotion Classification', 'id': 'CAiRE_HKUST di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Perhatian Hierarkis untuk Klasifikasi Emosi Dialog', 'sq': 'CAiRE_HKUST në SemEval-2019 Task 3: Hierarchical attention for Dialogue Emotion Classification', 'am': 'ስራ 3: Hierarchical Attention for Dialog Emotion Classification', 'az': 'CAiRE', 'hy': 'CAiER_HKOSTA-ը, 2019 թվականի կիսագնդի 3. հանձնարարություն. Հիերարխիկ ուշադրություն դասակարգման համար', 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৩-এ কায়েরি_এইচকুস্ট: ডায়ালগ ইমোটেশন ক্লাসেশনের জন্য প্রধান মনোযোগ', 'bs': 'CAiRE_HKUST na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: Hierarchical attention for Dialog Emotion Classification', 'ca': 'CAiRE_HKUST a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Hierarchical Attention for Dialogue Emotion Classification', 'cs': 'CAiRE_HKUST na SemEval-2019 Úkol 3: Hierarchická pozornost pro klasifikaci emocí dialogu', 'et': 'CAiRE_HKUST SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 3: Hierarhiline tähelepanu dialoogi emotsioonide klassifikatsioonile', 'fi': 'CAiRE_HKUST SemEval-2019 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 3: Hierarkinen huomio dialogi-tunteeseen Luokittelu', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'CaiVE_HKuRT at semi-inval-2011 task 3: Hijardical Attention for Dialog emutation', 'sk': 'CAiRE_HKUST na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Hierarhična pozornost za klasifikacijo dialognih čustev', 'bo': 'CAiRE_HKUST at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Hierarchical Attention for Dialogue Emotion Classification', 'he': 'CAiRE_HKUST ב SemEval-2019 משימה 3: תשומת לב הייררכית לקlassification רגשות דיאלוג'}
{'en': 'Detecting emotion from dialogue is a challenge that has not yet been extensively surveyed. One could consider the emotion of each dialogue turn to be independent, but in this paper, we introduce a hierarchical approach to classify emotion, hypothesizing that the current emotional state depends on previous latent emotions. We benchmark several feature-based classifiers using pre-trained word and emotion embeddings, state-of-the-art end-to-end neural network models, and Gaussian processes for automatic hyper-parameter search. In our experiments, hierarchical architectures consistently give significant improvements, and our best model achieves a 76.77 % F1-score on the test set.', 'ar': 'يعد اكتشاف المشاعر من الحوار تحديًا لم يتم مسحه على نطاق واسع حتى الآن. يمكن للمرء أن يعتبر أن مشاعر كل حوار مستقلة ، ولكن في هذه الورقة ، نقدم نهجًا هرميًا لتصنيف المشاعر ، بافتراض أن الحالة العاطفية الحالية تعتمد على المشاعر الكامنة السابقة. نحن نقيس العديد من المصنفات القائمة على الميزات باستخدام الزخارف المدربة مسبقًا على الكلمات والعاطفة ، ونماذج الشبكة العصبية المتطورة من طرف إلى طرف ، والعمليات الغاوسية للبحث التلقائي عن المعلمات الفائقة. في تجاربنا ، تقدم البنى الهرمية باستمرار تحسينات كبيرة ، ويحقق أفضل نموذج لدينا نسبة 76.77٪ F1 في مجموعة الاختبار.', 'pt': 'Detectar a emoção a partir do diálogo é um desafio que ainda não foi amplamente pesquisado. Pode-se considerar a emoção de cada diálogo como independente, mas neste artigo introduzimos uma abordagem hierárquica para classificar a emoção, hipotetizando que o estado emocional atual depende de emoções latentes anteriores. Nós comparamos vários classificadores baseados em recursos usando embeddings pré-treinados de palavras e emoções, modelos de rede neural de ponta a ponta de última geração e processos gaussianos para pesquisa automática de hiperparâmetros. Em nossos experimentos, as arquiteturas hierárquicas oferecem melhorias significativas consistentemente, e nosso melhor modelo atinge uma pontuação F1 de 76,77% no conjunto de testes.', 'fr': "La détection des émotions dans le dialogue est un défi qui n'a pas encore fait l'objet d'une étude approfondie. On pourrait considérer que l'émotion de chaque tour de dialogue est indépendante, mais dans cet article, nous introduisons une approche hiérarchique pour classer les émotions, en supposant que l'état émotionnel actuel dépend des émotions latentes précédentes. Nous comparons plusieurs classificateurs basés sur des caractéristiques à l'aide d'intégrations de mots et d'émotions préentraînées, de modèles de réseaux de neurones de bout en bout à la pointe de la technologie et de processus gaussiens pour la recherche automatique d'hyperparamètres. Dans nos expériences, les architectures hiérarchiques apportent régulièrement des améliorations significatives, et notre meilleur modèle obtient un score F1 de 76,77\xa0% sur l'ensemble de tests.", 'hi': 'संवाद से भावनाओं का पता लगाना एक चुनौती है जिसे अभी तक बड़े पैमाने पर सर्वेक्षण नहीं किया गया है। कोई भी प्रत्येक संवाद की भावना को स्वतंत्र होने पर विचार कर सकता है, लेकिन इस पेपर में, हम भावनाओं को वर्गीकृत करने के लिए एक पदानुक्रमित दृष्टिकोण पेश करते हैं, यह अनुमान लगाते हुए कि वर्तमान भावनात्मक स्थिति पिछले अव्यक्त भावनाओं पर निर्भर करती है। हम पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द और भावना एम्बेडिंग, अत्याधुनिक एंड-टू-एंड न्यूरल नेटवर्क मॉडल और स्वचालित हाइपर-पैरामीटर खोज के लिए गाऊसी प्रक्रियाओं का उपयोग करके कई फीचर-आधारित क्लासिफायरों को बेंचमार्क करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों में, पदानुक्रमित आर्किटेक्चर लगातार महत्वपूर्ण सुधार देते हैं, और हमारा सबसे अच्छा मॉडल परीक्षण सेट पर 76.77% एफ 1-स्कोर प्राप्त करता है।', 'zh': '以言检情,未得博勘。 人可谓每对情独立,而于本文中引一法以类情,假令情在前情。 先练之单词,情销最先进之端神经网络模形及自超参数搜索之际,基准测试于特征之分类器。 于我实验中,分架构终始,我之至试集上成76.77%F1分数。', 'ja': '対話から感情を検出することは、まだ広範囲に調査されていない課題です。それぞれの対話の感情は独立していると考えることができますが、本稿では感情を分類するための階層的アプローチを紹介し、現在の感情状態は以前の潜在的な感情に依存していると仮定します。私たちは、事前に訓練された単語と感情の埋め込み、最先端のエンドツーエンドのニューラルネットワークモデル、および自動ハイパーパラメータ検索のためのガウスプロセスを使用して、いくつかの機能ベースの分類子をベンチマークします。当社の実験では、階層的アーキテクチャは一貫して大幅な改善をもたらし、当社の最良のモデルはテストセットで76.77 ％のF 1スコアを達成します。', 'ga': "Is dúshlán é mothúcháin ón idirphlé a bhrath nach bhfuil suirbhé forleathan déanta go fóill. D'fhéadfaí a mheas go bhfuil mothúcháin gach idirphlé neamhspleách, ach sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid isteach cur chuige ordlathach chun mothúcháin a rangú, ag hipitéisiú go mbraitheann an staid mhothúchánach reatha ar mhothúcháin folaigh roimhe seo. Déanaimid tagarmharcáil ar roinnt aicmitheoirí gné-bhunaithe ag baint úsáide as leabaithe réamhoilte focal agus mothúcháin, samhlacha líonra néarúla ceann-go-deireadh den scoth, agus próisis Gaussacha le haghaidh cuardach uathoibríoch hipearpharaiméadair. Inár dturgnaimh, tugann ailtireachtaí ordlathacha feabhsuithe suntasacha go seasta, agus baineann ár múnla is fearr amach scór F1 76.77% ar an tacar tástála.", 'ru': 'Выявление эмоций в ходе диалога является проблемой, которая еще не была подробно изучена. Можно считать, что эмоции каждого диалога превращаются в самостоятельные, но в данной работе мы вводим иерархический подход к классификации эмоций, предполагая, что текущее эмоциональное состояние зависит от предыдущих скрытых эмоций. Мы сравниваем несколько классификаторов на основе признаков, используя предварительно обученные вложения слов и эмоций, современные сквозные модели нейронных сетей и процессы Гаусса для автоматического поиска гиперпараметров. В наших экспериментах иерархические архитектуры неизменно дают значительные улучшения, и наша лучшая модель достигает 76,77% F1-балла на тестовом наборе.', 'es': 'Detectar emociones a partir del diálogo es un desafío que aún no se ha estudiado exhaustivamente. Se podría considerar que la emoción de cada turno de diálogo es independiente, pero en este artículo introducimos un enfoque jerárquico para clasificar las emociones, planteando la hipótesis de que el estado emocional actual depende de emociones latentes previas. Comparamos varios clasificadores basados en características mediante incrustaciones de palabras y emociones previamente entrenadas, modelos de redes neuronales de punta a punta de última generación y procesos gaussianos para la búsqueda automática de hiperparámetros. En nuestros experimentos, las arquitecturas jerárquicas proporcionan constantemente mejoras significativas, y nuestro mejor modelo logra una puntuación F1 del 76,77% en el conjunto de pruebas.', 'el': 'Η ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων από τον διάλογο είναι μια πρόκληση που δεν έχει ακόμη μελετηθεί εκτενώς. Θα μπορούσε κανείς να θεωρήσει ότι το συναίσθημα κάθε διαλόγου είναι ανεξάρτητο, αλλά στην παρούσα εργασία, εισάγουμε μια ιεραρχική προσέγγιση για να ταξινομήσουμε το συναίσθημα, υποθέτοντας ότι η τρέχουσα συναισθηματική κατάσταση εξαρτάται από προηγούμενα λανθάνοντα συναισθήματα. Συγκρίνουμε διάφορους ταξινομητές βασισμένους σε χαρακτηριστικά χρησιμοποιώντας προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις λέξεων και συναισθημάτων, υπερσύγχρονα μοντέλα νευρωνικών δικτύων και διαδικασίες για αυτόματη αναζήτηση υπερπαραμέτρων. Στα πειράματά μας, οι ιεραρχικές αρχιτεκτονικές δίνουν σταθερά σημαντικές βελτιώσεις, και το καλύτερο μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει ένα 76,77% σκορ στο σετ δοκιμής.', 'hu': 'Az érzelmek felismerése a párbeszédből olyan kihívás, amelyet még nem vizsgáltak alaposan. Az egyes párbeszédek érzelmei önállónak tekinthetők, de ebben a tanulmányban egy hierarchikus megközelítést mutatunk be az érzelmek osztályozására, feltételezve, hogy a jelenlegi érzelmi állapot a korábbi látens érzelmektől függ. Számos funkcióalapú osztályozót összehasonlítunk előre képzett szó- és érzelmi beágyazásokkal, korszerű end-to-end neurális hálózati modellekkel és gauss folyamatokkal az automatikus hiperparaméter kereséshez. Kísérleteink során a hierarchikus architektúrák következetesen jelentős javulást eredményeznek, a legjobb modellünk pedig 76,77%-os F1 pontszámot ér el a tesztkészleten.', 'ka': 'დიალოგიდან ემოციების განსახულება არის განსახულება, რომელიც ახლა არ უფრო დიდი განსახულებულია. ერთი შეიძლება აღმოჩნოთ, რომ ყოველ დიალოგის ემოციას უცნობიერი იყოს, მაგრამ ამ კაურაში ჩვენ ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ ჰიერაქტიკური პროგორმა ემოციას კლასიფიკაციის შესახებ, ჰიპოტესტიზ ჩვენ უნდა დავწეროთ რამდენიმე ფუნქციების კლასიფიკაციები, რომლებიც წინასწარმოადგილებული სიტყვა და ემოციონის შემოწყვება, სახელსაწარმოადგილი ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელები და დაუსიანური პროცესები ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტებში იერაქტიკალური აქტიქტიკურები მნიშვნელოვანია გაუქმედება, და ჩვენი უკეთესი მოდელი დაიწყება 76,77% F1-სოფლიოს ტესტის სოფლიოში.', 'it': "Rilevare le emozioni dal dialogo è una sfida che non è stata ancora ampiamente esaminata. Si potrebbe considerare indipendente l'emozione di ogni dialogo, ma in questo articolo introduciamo un approccio gerarchico per classificare l'emozione, ipotizzando che lo stato emotivo attuale dipenda dalle emozioni latenti precedenti. Confrontiamo diversi classificatori basati su funzionalità utilizzando incorporazioni pre-addestrate di parole ed emozioni, modelli di rete neurale end-to-end all'avanguardia e processi gaussiani per la ricerca automatica di iper-parametri. Nei nostri esperimenti, le architetture gerarchiche forniscono costantemente miglioramenti significativi e il nostro modello migliore raggiunge un punteggio F1 del 76,77% sul set di test.", 'kk': 'Диалогтың эмоцияларын анықтау - бұл әлі көптеген мәселе. Әрбір диалогтың емоциялары тәуелсіз деп ойлай алады, бірақ бұл қағазда емоцияларды классификациялау үшін иерархиялық қасиетін таңдап, қазіргі емоциялық күйінің алдыңғы кеңейтілген емоцияларға Біз бірнеше мүмкіндіктерді негіздеген классификациялық сөздерді және эмоциялық ендіруді, невралдық желінің аяқтау үлгілерін және автоматты гиперпараметрлерді іздеу үшін Gaussian процестерін қолданамыз. Біздің тәжірибемдерімізде иерархиялық архитектуралар маңызды жақсартуларды береді, және ең жақсы моделіміз сынақтағы 76,77% F1 деңгейінде жеткізеді.', 'lt': 'Emocijų nustatymas iš dialogo yra iššūkis, kuris dar nebuvo išsamiai ištirtas. Kiekvieno dialogo emocijos gali būti nepriklausomos, bet šiame dokumente mes įvedame hierarchinį požiūrį į emocijų klasifikavimą, hipotezuojant, kad dabartinė emocinė būklė priklauso nuo ankstesnių latentinių emocijų. We benchmark several feature-based classifiers using pre-trained word and emotion embeddings, state-of-the-art end-to-end neural network models, and Gaussian processes for automatic hyper-parameter search.  Mūsų eksperimentuose hierarchinės architektūros nuolat daro reikšmingus patobulinimus ir mūsų geriausias modelis pasiekia 76,77 % F1 rezultatą bandymų rinkinyje.', 'ms': 'Mengesan emosi dari dialog adalah cabaran yang belum diperiksa secara luas. Seseorang boleh mempertimbangkan emosi setiap dialog menjadi independen, tetapi dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan pendekatan hierarkis untuk mengklasifikasikan emosi, hipotesis bahawa keadaan emosi semasa bergantung pada emosi tersembunyi sebelumnya. Kami benchmark beberapa klasifikasi berdasarkan ciri menggunakan penyembedding perkataan dan emosi terlatih-awal, model rangkaian saraf akhir-akhir, dan proses Gaussia untuk pencarian hiper-parameter automatik. Dalam eksperimen kita, arkitektur hierarkis secara konsisten memberikan peningkatan yang signifikan, dan model terbaik kita mencapai 76.77% skor F1 pada set ujian.', 'ml': 'ഡയലോഗില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് വിശാലമായി പരിശോധിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത ഒരു വ്യാല്\u200d ഓരോ ഡയലോഗിന്റെയും വികാരം സ്വാതന്ത്രമായിരിക്കുന്നു എന്ന് ഒരാള്\u200dക്ക് വിചാരിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും, പക്ഷെ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ വികാരങ്ങളെ ക്ലാസിപ്പിക്കാ മുമ്പ് പരിശീലന വാക്കും വികാരങ്ങളും ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്ന, സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് ആന്\u200dഡ് അവസാന ന ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറുയല്\u200d നെറുറല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് മോഡലുകളും ഗാസ്സിയന്\u200d  In our experiments, hierarchical architectures consistently give significant improvements, and our best model achieves a 76.77% F1-score on the test set.', 'mt': 'L-iskoperta tal-emozzjoni mid-djalogu hija sfida li għadha ma ġietx mistħarrġa b’mod estensiv. Wieħed jista’ jikkunsidra l-emozzjoni ta’ kull djalogu bħala indipendenti, iżda f’dan id-dokument, a ħna nintroduċu approċċ ġerarkiku biex nikklassifikaw l-emozzjoni, billi ninipotizzaw li l-istat emozzjonali attwali jiddependi fuq emozzjonijiet moħbija preċedenti. Aħna nagħmlu referenza għal diversi klassifikaturi bbażati fuq karatteristiċi bl-użu ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem u emozzjoni mħarrġa minn qabel, mudelli tan-netwerk newrali ta’ l-aktar avvanzati minn tarf sa tarf, u proċessi Gawsjani għat-tiftix awtomatiku ta’ parametri għoljin. Fl-esperimenti tagħna, l-arkitetturi ġerarkiċi b’mod konsistenti jagħtu titjib sinifikanti, u l-a ħjar mudell tagħna jikseb punteġġ F1 ta’ 76.77% fuq is-sett tat-test.', 'mk': 'Детектирањето на емоциите од дијалогот е предизвик кој сé уште не е екстремно испитан. Може да се смета дека емоцијата на секој дијалог се претвора во независност, но во овој весник, ние воведуваме хиерархички пристап за класификување на емоциите, хипотезирајќи дека сегашната емоционална состојба зависи од претходните лантни емоции. Ние ги споредуваме неколку класификатори базирани на карактеристики користејќи предобучени зборови и емоции вложувања, најсовремени модели на нервната мрежа од крај до крај, и гаусски процеси за автоматско пребарување на хиперпараметри. Во нашите експерименти, хиерархичните архитектури постојано даваат значителни подобрувања, а нашиот најдобар модел постигнува 76,77 отсто Ф1 оценка на тестот.', 'no': 'Oppdaging av emosjonar frå dialogen er eit utfordring som enno ikkje har blitt utforska. Ein kan konsidera at følelsen for kvar dialogvindauge er uavhengig, men i denne papiret introduserer vi ein hierarkisk tilnærming for å klassifisera følelser, og hypotiserer at den gjeldande emosjonale tilstand avhengig av førre latente emosjonar. Vi benchmarkerer fleire funksjonsbaserte klassifikatorar ved å bruka føretrainerte ord og emosjonsinnbygging, status-of-the-art end-to-end neuralnettverksmodeller og Gaussianske prosessar for automatisk hyper-parameter søk. I eksperimentene våre gjev hierarkiske arkitekturar konsistent signifikante forbedringar, og vårt beste modell gjev ei 76,77% F1- poeng på testsettet.', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie emocji z dialogu to wyzwanie, które nie zostało jeszcze szczegółowo zbadane. Można uznać emocję każdego dialogu za niezależną, ale w niniejszym artykule wprowadzamy hierarchiczne podejście do klasyfikacji emocji, hipotezując, że obecny stan emocjonalny zależy od poprzednich ukrytych emocji. Porównujemy kilka klasyfikatorów opartych na funkcjach przy użyciu wstępnie przeszkolonych osadzeń słów i emocji, najnowocześniejszych modeli sieci neuronowych oraz procesów Gaussa do automatycznego wyszukiwania hiperparametrów. W naszych eksperymentach architektura hierarchiczna konsekwentnie daje znaczące ulepszenia, a nasz najlepszy model osiąga 76,77% F1-wynik na zestawie testowym.', 'ro': 'Detectarea emoțiilor din dialog este o provocare care nu a fost încă examinată pe scară largă. Se poate considera că emoția fiecărui dialog devine independentă, dar în această lucrare introducem o abordare ierarhică de clasificare a emoțiilor, ipotezând că starea emoțională actuală depinde de emoțiile latente anterioare. Comparăm mai multe clasificatoare bazate pe caracteristici utilizând încorporări pre-instruite de cuvinte și emoții, modele de rețea neurală end-to-end de ultimă generație și procese gaussiane pentru căutarea automată a hiperparametrului. În experimentele noastre, arhitecturile ierarhice oferă în mod constant îmbunătățiri semnificative, iar cel mai bun model al nostru obține un scor F1 de 76,77% pe setul de teste.', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн яриагаас сэтгэл хөдлөлийг олох нь хэмжээний судалгааг олон судалгаагүй асуудал юм. Хүн бүр ярианы сэтгэл хөдлөл байдлын тухай тогтнолтой гэж бодож болно. Гэхдээ энэ цаасан дээр бид сэтгэл хөдлөл байдлыг ангилахын тулд, өнөөгийн сэтгэл хөдлөл байдал нь өмнөх сэтгэл хөдлөлийн тухай хамаара Бид өмнө сургалтын үг болон сэтгэл хөдлөлийн нэгдэл, урлагийн төгсгөл-төгсгөл мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загваруудыг ашиглан хэд хэдэн сонирхолтой ангилагчийг багтаж байна. Бидний туршилтуудын туршилтаар дүүрэн архитектурууд үнэхээр сайн сайжруулдаг. Бидний хамгийн сайн загвар шалгалтанд 76.77% F1 оноо гардаг.', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje emocija iz dijaloga je izazov koji još uvek nije bio široko istražen. Mogli bi razmotriti emocije svakog dijaloga da su nezavisni, ali u ovom papiru predstavljamo hijerarhički pristup klasifikaciji emocija, hipotezirajući da trenutno emocionalno stanje zavisi od prethodnih latentnih emocija. Skrenčamo nekoliko klasifikatora na osnovu funkcija koristeći predobučene riječi i emocije, modele neuralne mreže stanja umjetnosti do kraja, i Gausijske procese za automatsku pretragu hipera parametara. U našim eksperimentima, hijerarhijske arhitekture stalno daju značajne poboljšanje, a naš najbolji model postiže 76,77% rezultata F1 na testu.', 'so': 'Ku ogaashada fikrada dialogue waa dhibaato aan weli lagu baarayn. Qof baa ka fiirsan kara fikrada dialog walba inay xor u noqoto, laakiin warqadan waxaynu ku soo bandhigi karnaa qaab ay u fasaxaan xisaabta, waxaan ka fekeraynaa in dowladda hissiga la joogo ay ku xiran xisaabta ugu dambeysay. Waxaynu bannaanaynaa koorasyo badan oo gaar ah oo isticmaalaya hadal iyo emotion intaan horay wax baranayn, tusaalayaasha shabakadda-art-end-to-end neurada, iyo baaritaanka Gaussian oo aad u raadineyso dabiicadda hyper-parameter. Imtixaanadeena waxaa si joogto ah loo hagaajiyaa qalcadaha hierarkiisa, qaababkayaga ugu wanaagsan wuxuu gaadhaa kooxda imtixaanka ee 76.77% F1.', 'sv': 'Att upptäcka känslor från dialog är en utmaning som ännu inte har undersökts ingående. Man skulle kunna betrakta känslan i varje dialog som oberoende, men i denna uppsats introducerar vi ett hierarkiskt tillvägagångssätt för att klassificera känslor, hypoteser att det nuvarande känslotillståndet beror på tidigare latenta känslor. Vi jämför flera funktionsbaserade klassificerare med hjälp av förintränade ord- och känsloinbäddningar, toppmoderna end-to-end neurala nätverksmodeller och Gaussiska processer för automatisk hyperparametersökning. I våra experiment ger hierarkiska arkitekturer konsekvent betydande förbättringar, och vår bästa modell uppnår 76,77% F1-poäng på testuppsättningen.', 'si': 'සංවාදයෙන් හැඟීම හොයාගන්න තවමත් විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැහැ. පුළුවන් හැම සංවාදයේ හැම දැනැත්තම් ස්ථාවත් වෙන්න පුළුවන්, නමුත් මේ පත්තරයේ අපි හැම දැනැත්තම් විදියට පත්තරයක් පෙනුම් කරනව අපි බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ වචන සහ භාවිත සංවිධානයක් භාවිත කරනවා, state-of-the-art end-to-end neural network Models, සහ Gaussian process for automate hyper-Parametric search. අපේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, අයිරිකාෂික ස්ථානය සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරනවා, අපේ හොඳම මොඩේල් එක පරීක්ෂණයේ 76.77% F1-ස්කෝර් එකක්', 'ta': 'உரையாடலில் இருந்து உணர்வை கண்டுபிடிப்பது விரிவாக பரிசோதிக்கப்படாத சவால் ஒவ்வொரு உரையாடலின் உணர்வு சுதந்திரமாக இருக்கும் என்று யோசிக்கலாம், ஆனால் இந்த த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு முன்பு உணர்வு நிலையை வகைப்படுத்துவதற்கு ஒரு மு முன் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட வார்த்தைகள் மற்றும் உணர்வு உள்ளடக்கங்களை பயன்படுத்தி பல பண்புகளில் அடிப்படையான வகுப்பாடுகளை நாம் குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், நிலையில் முடிவு ப எங்கள் பரிசோதனைகளில், முன்னேற்றங்கள் முக்கியமான முன்னேற்றங்களை கொடுக்கும் மற்றும் எங்கள் சிறந்த மாதிரி முறைமை 76.77% F1- புள்ள', 'ur': 'ڈالیلوگ سے احساسات تلاش کرنے کا ایک چال ہے جو ابھی زیادہ تحقیق نہیں کیا گیا ہے. ایک شخص ہر ڈالیلوگ کا احساس بے نیاز ہو سکتا ہے، لیکن اس کاغذ میں ہم احساسات کا کلاس کرنے کے لئے ایک حکومت طریقہ پیش کریں گے، اس کی تصور کریں گے کہ موجود احساسات کی حالت پہلے کی لاٹینٹی احساسات پر اپنا اعتماد ہے. ہم نے چند فرصت کے بنیادی کلاسیفوں کو پیش ترسین کی لفظ اور احساسات انڈینگ کے مطابق بانچم کر دیا ہے، نئورل نیٹ ورک موڈل کے استعمال سے، اور گاوسی پرسس کو اٹوٹوٹ-پارامیٹ تلاش کے لئے۔ ہمارے آزمائش میں، حیراتریکی معماری معماری مزید اضافہ کرتی ہے، اور ہمارے بہترین مدل آزمائش سٹ پر 76.77% F1-اسکور پہنچتی ہے.', 'uz': "Dialogdan hisobni aniqlash imkoniyatini kengaytirilgan murakkab qilinadi. Kimdir har bir muloqat hisobining g g'oynasi o'xshash bo'lishi mumkin, lekin bu qogʻozda biz hissiyotni nashfiy qilish uchun hierarchik usulni anglatamiz. Joriy emotional holati oldingi hissiyotga bog'liq. Biz bir necha taʼminlovchi so'z va hissiyotning bir xil moslamalarini o'rganishdan oldin so'zlar va o'zgarishlar tarmoq modellaridan foydalanuvchimiz, va Gaussian jarayonlarini avtomatik hyper- parametr qidirish uchun foydalanamiz. Bizning tajribalarimizda, hierarchik arxituvlar davomida juda muhim yaxshi o'zgarishlar beradi, va eng yaxshi modelmiz sinov sohasida 76.77% F1 scorini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Việc phát hiện cảm xúc từ cuộc đối thoại là một thách thức chưa được quan sát kỹ lưỡng. Người ta có thể xem cảm xúc của mỗi cuộc đối thoại trở nên độc lập, nhưng trong tờ giấy này, ta sẽ áp dụng một phương pháp cấp bậc để phân loại cảm xúc, giả thuyết rằng trạng thái cảm xúc hiện thời phụ thuộc vào cảm xúc tiềm ẩn trước đó. Chúng tôi xem xét các phân loại dựa trên tính năng, sử dụng các từ và sự gắn kết cảm xúc được đào tạo trước, các mô hình thần kinh tối tân và kết thúc, và các tiến trình kiểu Gauss để tìm kiếm các siêu tham số tự động. Trong các thí nghiệm của chúng tôi, cấu trúc thứ hạng luôn có những cải tiến quan trọng, và kiểu mẫu tốt nhất đạt được điểm số F1 trên bộ thử nghiệm.', 'bg': 'Откриването на емоциите от диалога е предизвикателство, което все още не е обширно изследвано. Може да се приеме, че емоцията на всеки диалог се превръща в независима, но в тази статия въвеждаме йерархичен подход за класифициране на емоцията, като предполагаме, че настоящото емоционално състояние зависи от предишните латентни емоции. Ние сравняваме няколко функционално базирани класификатори, използвайки предварително обучени думи и емоции вграждания, най-съвременни модели от край до край невронни мрежи и гаусски процеси за автоматично търсене на хиперпараметри. В нашите експерименти йерархичните архитектури последователно дават значителни подобрения, а най-добрият ни модел постига 76,77% резултат на тестовия набор.', 'da': 'At opdage følelser fra dialog er en udfordring, som endnu ikke er blevet undersøgt grundigt. Man kunne betragte følelserne i hver dialog som uafhængig, men i denne artikel introducerer vi en hierarkisk tilgang til klassificering af følelser, idet vi antager, at den nuværende følelsestilstand afhænger af tidligere latente følelser. Vi benchmark flere funktionsbaserede klassificeringer ved hjælp af prætrænede ord- og følelsesindlejringer, state-of-the-art end-to-end neurale netværksmodeller og Gaussiske processer til automatisk hyperparameter søgning. I vores eksperimenter giver hierarkiske arkitekturer konsekvent betydelige forbedringer, og vores bedste model opnår 76,77% F1-score på testsættet.', 'nl': 'Emotie detecteren uit dialoog is een uitdaging die nog niet uitgebreid is onderzocht. Men zou kunnen beschouwen dat de emotie van elke dialoog onafhankelijk is, maar in dit artikel introduceren we een hiërarchische benadering om emotie te classificeren, waarbij we veronderstellen dat de huidige emotionele toestand afhangt van eerdere latente emoties. We benchmarken verschillende feature-based classificatoren met behulp van vooraf getrainde woord- en emotieinbeddingen, state-of-the-art end-to-end neurale netwerkmodellen en Gaussiaanse processen voor automatische hyper-parameter zoeken. In onze experimenten geven hiërarchische architecturen consequent significante verbeteringen, en ons beste model behaalt een 76,77% F1-score op de testset.', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje emocija iz dijaloga je izazov koji još nije bio široko istražen. Jedan bi mogao smatrati emocijama svakog dijaloga neovisnim, ali u ovom papiru predstavljamo hijerarhički pristup klasifikaciji emocija, pretpostavljajući da trenutno emocionalno stanje zavisi od prethodnih latentnih emocija. Skrenčamo nekoliko klasifikatora na osnovu funkcija koristeći predobučene riječi i emocije, modele neuralne mreže stanja umjetnosti do kraja, i Gausijske procese za automatsku pretragu hipera parametara. U našim eksperimentima, hijerarhijske arhitekture stalno daju značajne poboljšanje, a naš najbolji model postiže 76,77% rezultata F1 na testu.', 'de': 'Emotionen aus dem Dialog zu erkennen, ist eine Herausforderung, die bisher nicht umfassend untersucht wurde. Man könnte die Emotion jeder Dialogwende als unabhängig betrachten, aber in diesem Beitrag führen wir einen hierarchischen Ansatz ein, um Emotionen zu klassifizieren, wobei die Hypothese besteht, dass der aktuelle emotionale Zustand von früheren latenten Emotionen abhängt. Wir vergleichen mehrere funktionsbasierte Klassifikatoren mit vortrainierten Wort- und Emotionseinbettungen, modernsten End-to-End neuronalen Netzwerkmodellen und Gaußschen Prozessen für die automatische Hyper-Parametersuche. In unseren Experimenten liefern hierarchische Architekturen konsequent signifikante Verbesserungen, und unser bestes Modell erzielt einen 76,77% F1-Score auf dem Testset.', 'id': 'Deteksi emosi dari dialog adalah tantangan yang belum diperiksa secara ekstensif. Seseorang bisa mempertimbangkan emosi setiap dialog menjadi independen, tapi dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan pendekatan hierarkis untuk mengklasifikasi emosi, hipotesis bahwa keadaan emosi saat ini tergantung pada emosi yang tersembunyi sebelumnya. Kami benchmark beberapa klasifikasi berbasis fitur menggunakan kata dan emosi terlatih terlatih, model jaringan saraf akhir-akhir, dan proses Gaussia untuk pencarian hiper-parameter otomatis. Dalam eksperimen kami, arsitektur hierarkis secara konsisten memberikan peningkatan yang signifikan, dan model terbaik kami mencapai 76,77% skor F1 pada set tes.', 'fa': 'شناسایی احساسات از محاورش یک چالش است که هنوز عمده تحقیق نشده است. می\u200cتواند احساسات هر گفتگو را مستقل بگیرد، ولی در این کاغذ، ما یک روش طبیعی برای کلاس احساسات معرفی می\u200cکنیم، فرض می\u200cکنیم که وضعیت احساسات فعلی از احساسات قبلی بستگی دارد. ما با استفاده از کلمه\u200cهای پیش آموزش و احساسات، مدل\u200cهای شبکه عصبی به پایان رسیدن وضعیت هنری، و فرایندهای گاوسی برای جستجوی پارامتر\u200cهای خودکار، استفاده می\u200cکنیم. در آزمایشات ما، معماری های معماری معمولاً بهترین پیشرفت های بزرگی را می دهند، و بهترین مدل ما در مجموعه آزمایش 76.77 درصد امتحان می رسد.', 'ko': '대화에서 감정을 발견하는 것은 아직 광범위하게 조사되지 않은 도전이다.사람들은 모든 대화의 정서가 독립적이라고 생각할 수 있지만 본고에서 우리는 정서를 분류하는 층을 나누는 방법을 도입하여 현재의 정서 상태가 이전의 잠재적인 정서에 달려 있다고 가정한다.우리는 미리 훈련된 단어와 감정 삽입, 가장 선진적인 단말기부터 단말기까지 신경 네트워크 모델과 자동 초파라미터 검색의 고스 과정을 이용하여 특징을 바탕으로 하는 몇 가지 분류기를 기준 테스트했다.우리의 실험에서 층 체계 구조는 지속적으로 현저한 개선을 제공했고 우리의 가장 좋은 모델은 테스트 집합에서 76.77%의 F1 점수를 얻었다.', 'sw': 'Kugundua hisia kutoka katika mazungumzo ni changamoto ambayo bado haijachunguzwa kwa kiasi kikubwa. Mtu anaweza kutafakari hisia za kila mazungumzo yanageuka kuwa huru, lakini katika karatasi hii, tunaanzisha mbinu za kiutaratibu za kutangaza hisia, tunadhani kwamba hali ya hisia iliyopo sasa inategemea hisia za hivi karibuni. Tunawapandisha wataalamu kadhaa wenye msingi kwa kutumia maneno na hisia zilizofunzwa kabla, mifano ya mitandao ya mwisho ya sanaa, na mchakato wa Gaussia kwa ajili ya kutafuta kipimo cha upeperushi. Katika majaribio yetu, majengo ya kiuchumi yanatoa maendeleo makubwa zaidi, na mtindo wetu bora unaweza kufikia vipimo 76.77% F1 kwenye seti ya jaribio.', 'af': "Die ontdekking van emosie van dialoog is 'n uitdrukking wat nog nie uitbreidig ondersoek is nie. Een kan beskou dat die emosie van elke dialoog omdraai om onveilig te wees, maar in hierdie papier, ons introduseer 'n hierarkies toegang om emosie te klassifiseer, hipotesis dat die huidige emosie staat afhang van vorige latente emosies. Ons benchmarkeer verskeie funksie-gebaseerde klassifiseerders gebruik voor-oefen woord en emosie inbettings, state-of-the-art end-to-end neural netwerk modele en Gaussian prosesse vir outomatiese hyper-parameter soek. In ons eksperimente gee hierarkies-arkitekturke betekeurige verbeteringe, en ons beste model bereik 'n 76.77% F1-telling op die toets stel.", 'sq': 'Detektimi i emocioneve nga dialogu është një sfidë që ende nuk është shqyrtuar në mënyrë të gjerë. Mund të konsiderojmë emocionet e çdo dialogu të bëhen të pavarura, por në këtë letër, ne futim një qasje hierarkike për të klasifikuar emocionet, duke hipotezuar se gjendja emocionale aktuale varet nga emocionet e mëparshme të fshehta. Ne përcaktojmë disa klasifikues bazuar në funksione duke përdorur fjalë dhe emocione të paratrajnuara, modele të rrjetit nervor të fundit në fund dhe procese Gausi për kërkim automatik hiper-parametrash. In our experiments, hierarchical architectures consistently give significant improvements, and our best model achieves a 76.77% F1-score on the test set.', 'tr': 'Duýgulary диалогdan tapylmak entägem uly bir kynçylyk däldir. Biri her dialogyň duýgynyň ýüzüni seretsiz bolup pikir edip bilýär, ýöne bu kagyzda, duýgyny klasifika etmek üçin bir iýerarhiýa ýazşy tanyşdyryp bilýäris, häzirki duýgym durumynyň öňki ýakyn duýgymlara baglanýar diýip pikir edip Biz birnäçe özellikler tabanly klasifikatçylary ön-okuwçy söz we duýgular içerisinde, stat-of-the-art end-to-end neural network modelleri we Gaussian işlemleri otomatik hiper-parameterler araştyrması üçin ullanýarys. Biziň deneylerimizde, iýerarhiýa arhitektarlar hemişe möhüm gelişmeleri berer, we iň gowy nusgymyz testiň düzümlerinde 76.77% f1 nokat tapýar.', 'am': 'የመስኮት ስህተት ማጠቃለያ ገና ስፋት ያልተመረጠው ጥቃት ነው፡፡ አንድ ሰው የሁሉን መስኮት ነጻ እንዲሆን የሚችል ነው፣ ነገር ግን በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የአሁኑ ስብሰባዊ ሀብት የቀድሞውን አካባቢ ላይ እንዲጠጋ እናስባለን፡፡ We benchmark several feature-based classifiers using pre-trained word and emotion embeddings, state-of-the-art end-to-end neural network models, and Gaussian processes for automatic hyper-parameter search.  በተፈተናችን ውስጥ የሀይራርክ መሠረት መሠረቶች በተለየ ትልቅ ማድረግ ይሰጣሉ፤ የተሻለኛውም ሞዴል በሞከሩ ላይ 76.77 በመቶ F1 ነጥብ ያገኛል፡፡', 'hy': "Զգացմունքների հայտնաբերումը խոսակցության արդյունքում մի մարտահրավեր է, որը դեռևս լայնորեն չի ուսումնասիրել: One could consider the emotion of each dialogue turn to be independent, but in this paper, we introduce a hierarchical approach to classify emotion, hypothesizing that the current emotional state depends on previous latent emotions.  Մենք համեմատում ենք մի քանի հատկանիշներով հիմնված դասակարգիչներ' օգտագործելով նախապատրաստված բառերի և զգացմունքների ներգրավումներ, ամենահետաքրքիր վերջ-վերջ նյարդային ցանցի մոդելներ և գաուսական գործընթացներ ավտոմատիկ հիպեր-պարամետրերի որոնման համար: Մեր փորձարկումների ընթացքում հիերարխիկ ճարտարապետությունները մշտապես նշանակալի բարելավումներ են տալիս, և մեր լավագույն մոդելը ստանում է 76.77 տոկոս F1-ի գնահատականը թեստերի համակարգում:", 'az': 'Dialoqdan duyguları keşfetmək daha çox gözləməmiş bir çətinlikdir. Biri hər dialoğunun duygularını bağımsız olduğuna dair düşünə bilər, amma bu kağızda, duygularını sınıf etmək üçün hiyerarşik bir tərzdə təşkil edirik, həmin emosiyal durumun əvvəlki latent duygularına bağlıdır. Biz təhsil edilmiş sözlər və emosiyalar içərisində, sanatın sona-son nöral ağ modellərini və avtomatik hiper-parametru araması üçün Gaussiya işləri ilə müəyyən etdik. Bizim təcrübələrimizdə hiyerarşik arhitektarları mövcud düzəltmələri verir və ən yaxşı modellərimiz test setində 76,77% F1 dəqiqəsini tapır.', 'bn': 'ডায়ালগ থেকে অনুভূতি সনাক্ত করা হচ্ছে একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ যা এখনো বিস্তারিত তদন্ত করা হয়নি। কেউ প্রত্যেক ডায়ালগের অনুভূতি স্বাধীন হতে পারে, কিন্তু এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিশ্লেষণ করার জন্য একটি হিয়ারেক্যারেক্টিক উপায় তুলে ধরি, যেটি ধারণা করছি যে বর্তমা পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত শব্দ এবং অনুভূতি ব্যবহার করে বেশ কয়েকটি বৈশিষ্ট্যের ভিত্তিক শ্রেণীবিভাগের বিশেষ ব্যবহারকারীদের আমরা বেঞ্চার করে দেই, স্বয়ংক্রিয় হাইপার-প আমাদের পরীক্ষায় হিয়ারারাক্কিল আর্কিস্টারেক্টরা সবসময় গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নতি প্রদান করে এবং আমাদের সেরা মডেল পরীক্ষার সেটে ৭৬.', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje emocija iz dijaloga je izazov koji još nije bio široko istražen. Jedan bi mogao smatrati emocijama svakog dijaloga neovisnim, ali u ovom papiru predstavljamo hijerarhički pristup klasifikaciji emocija, hipotezirajući da trenutno emocionalno stanje zavisi od prethodnih latentnih emocija. Skrenčamo nekoliko klasifikatora na osnovu funkcija koristeći predobučene riječi i emocije, modele neuralne mreže stanja umjetnosti do kraja, i Gausijske procese za automatsku pretragu hipera parametara. U našim eksperimentima, hijerarhijske arhitekture stalno daju značajne poboljšanje, a naš najbolji model postiže 76,77% rezultata F1 na testu.', 'ca': "Detectar emocions del diàleg és un repte que encara no s'ha estudiat ampliament. Podríem considerar que l'emoció de cada diàleg es converteix en independent, però en aquest article introduïm un enfocament jeràrquic per classificar emocions, hipòtesiant que l'estat emocional actual depèn de les emocions latents anteriors. We benchmark several feature-based classifiers using pre-trained word and emotion embeddings, state-of-the-art end-to-end neural network models, and Gaussian processes for automatic hyper-parameter search.  En els nostres experiments, les arquitectures jeràrquiques donen millors significatives, i el nostre millor model aconsegueix un 76,77% de puntuació F1 en el conjunt d'exàmens.", 'cs': 'Rozpoznání emocí z dialogu je výzvou, která dosud nebyla podrobně zkoumána. Emoce každého dialogu lze považovat za nezávislé, ale v tomto článku představujeme hierarchický přístup k klasifikaci emocí s hypotézou, že současný emoční stav závisí na předchozích latentních emocích. Porovnáváme několik klasifikátorů založených na funkcích pomocí předškolených vložení slov a emocí, nejmodernějších end-to-end modelů neuronových sítí a Gaussovských procesů pro automatické vyhledávání hyperparametrů. V našich experimentech hierarchické architektury důsledně poskytují významné zlepšení a náš nejlepší model dosahuje 76,77% F1 skóre na testovací sadě.', 'et': 'Emotsioonide tuvastamine dialoogist on väljakutse, mida ei ole veel põhjalikult uuritud. Võiks pidada iga dialoogi emotsiooni sõltumatuks, kuid selles töös tutvustame hierarhilist lähenemisviisi emotsioonide klassifitseerimiseks, oletades, et praegune emotsionaalne seisund sõltub varasematest latentsetest emotsioonidest. Me võrdleme mitmeid funktsioonipõhiseid klassifikaatoreid, kasutades eelnevalt väljaõpetatud sõna- ja emotsioonipõhiseid manustamisi, tipptasemel end-to-end neurovõrgumudeleid ja Gaussi protsesse automaatseks hüperparameetrite otsinguks. Meie eksperimentides annavad hierarhilised arhitektuurid järjepidevalt märkimisväärseid parandusi ja meie parim mudel saavutab testikomplektis 76,77% F1-skoori.', 'fi': 'Tunteiden havaitseminen dialogista on haaste, jota ei ole vielä tutkittu laajasti. Jokaisen dialogin tunteita voitaisiin pitää itsenäisenä, mutta tässä työssä esittelemme hierarkkisen lähestymistavan tunteiden luokitteluun olettaen, että nykyinen emotionaalinen tila riippuu aikaisemmista piilevistä tunteista. Vertailemme useita ominaisuuspohjaisia luokittelijoita käyttäen ennalta koulutettuja sana- ja tunteiden upotuksia, viimeisimpiä end-to-end-neuroverkkomalleja ja gaussilaisia prosesseja automaattiseen hyperparametrihakuun. Kokeissamme hierarkkiset arkkitehtuurit antavat johdonmukaisesti merkittäviä parannuksia, ja paras mallimme saavuttaa 76,77% F1-pisteen testisarjassa.', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje čustev iz dialoga je izziv, ki še ni bil obsežno raziskan. Čustvo vsakega dialoga bi lahko obravnavali kot neodvisno, vendar v tem prispevku uvajamo hierarhični pristop k razvrščanju čustev, pri čemer hipotezo, da je trenutno čustveno stanje odvisno od prejšnjih latentnih čustev. Primerjamo več funkcijskih klasifikatorjev z uporabo vnaprej usposobljenih besednih in čustvenih vdelav, najsodobnejših modelov nevronskih omrežij od konca do konca ter gaussijskih procesov za avtomatsko iskanje hiperparametrov. V naših poskusih hierarhične arhitekture dosledno prinašajo pomembne izboljšave, naš najboljši model pa doseže 76,77-odstotno F1-rezultat na testnem naboru.', 'ha': "Ka gano hisãbi daga zauren akwatin zauren akwatin bayani yana da wata kima wanda ba a iya cire shi ba. Babu iya iya ƙayyade hisia'in duk zauren akwatin bayani ya zama ba da huru, kuma amma, cikin wannan takardan, muna fara wata hanyor ta wajen ta rarraba hisia'in da za'a yi fassar, ana yi zaton cewa halin hisia da ke kai yanzu yana dõgara ga hisia na farkon. Kana bangẽwa wasu fassarai masu basa da aka amfani da shiryoyin maganar da hisãbi da aka tsare ta gabã ɗaya, misãlai na-state-of-the-art-to-end-neural, da kuma masu aikin Gaussian da aka neman search na farat-up-parameter. In our experiments, hierarchical architectures consistently give significant improvements, and our best model achieves a 76.77% F1-score on the test set.", 'jv': 'Iwatahane duwa alamat kang dialog kuwi susah-susahe ora iso diandelak luwih apik. Awak dhéwé iso nggunakake duwé sing gak dialog kuwi tenan, nanguté karo paper iki, kéné gunakake tarjamahan karo kuwi tindakan duwé, ngcukasakno sapa perusahaan langgar-sistem sing gak omongaké gak dhéwé. We bench a number of character-supported kategories use advance-tracted word and nth embedding, state-of-the-Art end-to-end Neral network modes, and Gossian types for automatically caper-parameters Search. Nang dhéwé éntuk sing paling-alaman, akeh akeh-alaman sing sumelang liyane karo nggawe barang, lan model sing paling dhéwé kuwi sawetara 75.7% F1- sing paling-layang kanggo ujian sisan.', 'bo': 'སྒྲ་ཚུལ་ཐོག་གི་སེམས་ཚོར་རྟོགས་ན་དེ་དམིགས་གཏད་ལེན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མ་ཡོད་པ་ཞིག་རེད། སྒྲ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་སེམས་ཚོར་འདི་རང་དབང་ཡོད་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་ལས་ཤོག་བྱང་། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་དབུས་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་གྱི་ We benchmark several feature-based classifiers using pre-trained word and emotion embeddings, state-of-the-art end-to-end neural network models, and Gaussian processes for automatic hyper-parameter search. ང་ཚོའི་ས experiments་ནང་དུ་དབུས་གཞུང་གི་བཟོ་བརྩིས་ཡུལ་ནི་རྟག་པར་མཐོ་གཏོང་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བ་ཡིན།', 'he': 'לחקור רגשות מהדיאלוג הוא אתגר שעדיין לא הוחקר באופן רחב. One could consider the emotion of each dialogue turn to be independent, but in this paper, we introduce a hierarchical approach to classify emotion, hypothesizing that the current emotional state depends on previous latent emotions.  אנחנו מנתחים מספר קלאסיפורים מבוססים על תכונות באמצעות מילים מאומנות מראש ומערכות רגשות, מודלים של רשת עצבית מצוין בסוף לסוף, והתהליכים גאוסיים לחיפוש אוטומטי של היפר-פרמטרים. בניסויים שלנו, ארכיטקטורות היררכיות נותנות שיפורים משמעותיים באופן קבוע, והמודל הטוב ביותר שלנו משיג נקודת F1 של 76.77% בסט הבדיקות.'}
{'en': 'CLaC Lab at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Contextual Emotion Detection Using a Combination of Neural Networks and SVM', 'ar': 'CLaC Lab في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: الكشف عن المشاعر السياقية باستخدام مزيج من الشبكات العصبية و SVM', 'pt': 'CLaC Lab na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Detecção contextual de emoções usando uma combinação de redes neurais e SVM', 'fr': "Laboratoire CLac à SemEval-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Détection contextuelle des émotions à l'aide d'une combinaison de réseaux de neurones et de SVM", 'es': 'Laboratorio CLaC en SemEval-2019 Tarea 3: Detección de emociones contextuales mediante una combinación de redes neuronales y SVM', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のCLaCラボタスク3 ：ニューラルネットワークとSVMの組み合わせを使用したコンテキスト感情の検出', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 3 में CLaC लैब: तंत्रिका नेटवर्क और SVM के संयोजन का उपयोग करके प्रासंगिक भावना का पता लगाना', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019之CLaC实验室务3:检以神经网络SVM之上下文情', 'ru': 'Лаборатория CLaC в SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Контекстуальное обнаружение эмоций с использованием комбинации нейронных сетей и виртуальных машин защиты', 'ga': 'Saotharlann CLaC ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Brath Mothúcháin Chomhthéacsúla ag Úsáid Teaglaim de Líonraí Néaracha agus SBM', 'ka': 'CLaC ლაბორი SemEval-2019 სამუშაო დავალება 3: კონტექსტური ემიოციის განახლება გამოყენება ნეიროლური ქსელების და SVM', 'hu': 'CLaC Lab a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: Kontextuális érzelmek felismerése Neurális hálózatok és SVM kombinációjával', 'el': 'Εργαστήριο στο Εργασία 3: Ανίχνευση Συναισθηματικών Συγκλήψεων με Συνδυασμό Νευρικών Δικτύων και ΣΜΣ', 'it': 'CLaC Lab a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Rilevazione delle emozioni contestuali utilizzando una combinazione di reti neurali e SVM', 'lt': 'CLaC Lab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Contextal Emotion Detection Using the Combination of Neural Networks and SVM', 'mk': 'CLaC Lab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection Using a Combination of Neural Networks and SVM', 'mn': 'CLaC Lab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection Using a Combination of Neural Networks and SVM', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3- ലെ സിലാസി ലാബ്: നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റുവര്\u200dക്കുകളും SVM-ലെ കൂട്ടം ഉപയോഗിച്ചു', 'no': 'CLaC Lab at semiEval- 2019 Oppgåve 3: Kontekstoppdaging av følelser ved bruk av kombinasjon av neirale nettverk og SVM', 'mt': 'CLaC Lab f’SemEval-2019 Task 3: Detezzjoni ta’ Emozzjoni Kuntest bl-Użu ta’ Kombinazzjoni ta’ Netwerks Newrali u SVM', 'pl': 'CLaC Lab w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Kontekstowe wykrywanie emocji przy użyciu połączenia sieci neuronowych i SVM', 'sr': 'CLaC Lab na pola Evala-2019 Task 3: Kontekstalna detekcija emocija Koristeći kombinaciju neuronskih mreža i SVM', 'si': 'CLaC Lab at Halfeval-2019 Job 3: Contextal Emotion Detection Using a Combination of neural Netwarks and SVM', 'ms': 'Lab CLaC di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Pengesanan Emosi Konteksual Menggunakan Kombinasi Rangkaian Neural dan SVM', 'kk': 'CLaC лабораториясы жарым- 2019 тапсырмасының 3- тапсырмасы: Контексті көңіл көңіл тапсырмасы Нейрондық желілер мен SVM комбинациясын қолдану', 'sv': 'CLaC Lab på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Kontextuell känslodetektering med hjälp av en kombination av neurala nätverk och SVM', 'ur': 'CLaC Lab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection Using a Combination of Neural Networks and SVM', 'ta': 'Name', 'ro': 'Laboratorul CLaC la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Detectarea emoțiilor contextuale folosind o combinație de rețele neurale și SVM', 'so': 'CLaC Lab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection using a Combination of Neural Networks and SVM', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'kết hợp cảm xúc qua kết hợp các mạng thần kinh và SVM', 'nl': 'CLaC Lab bij SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Contextuele Emotiedetectie met behulp van een combinatie van Neurale Netwerken en SVM', 'hr': 'CLaC laboratorija na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 3: Kontekstno otkrivanje emocija Koristeći kombinaciju neuronskih mreža i SVM', 'da': 'CLaC Lab på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Kontekstuel følelsesdetektion ved hjælp af en kombination af neurale netværk og SVM', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Контекстуално откриване на емоции чрез комбинация от неврални мрежи и СВМ', 'de': 'CLaC Lab bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Kontextuelle Emotionserkennung durch Kombination von neuronalen Netzwerken und SVM', 'id': 'CLaC Lab di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Deteksi Emosi Konteksual Menggunakan Kombinasi Rangkaian Neural dan SVM', 'fa': 'Lab CLaC at semiEval-2019 Task 3: Detection of Emotions Contextual Using a Combination of Neural Networks and SVM', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019의 ClaC 실험실 임무 3: 신경 네트워크와 SVM의 조합을 이용하여 상하문 감정 검측을 실시한다.', 'tr': 'CLaC Lab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection Using a Combination of Neural Networks and SVM', 'sw': 'Lab ya CLaC katika SemEval-2019 Task 3: Utafiti wa Tambulio la Mawasiliano kwa kutumia Muungano wa mitandao ya kijamii na SVM', 'am': 'ስራ 3: Contextual Emotion Detection using a Combination of Neural Networks and SVM', 'hy': 'ԿլաԿ լաբորատորիան, որը գտնվում է "Halee2019"-ում 3. հանձնարարություն. կոնտեքստալ զգացմունքների հայտնաբերում Նյարդային ցանցերի և ԱՎՄ համադրման միջոցով', 'sq': 'CLaC Lab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection Using a Combination of Neural Networks and SVM', 'af': "CLaC Lab by SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 3: Konteksual Emotie Opdekking Gebruik ' n Kombineer van Neurale Netwerke en SVM", 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ টাস্ক ৩-এ সিলাসি ল্যাব: নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক এবং এসভিএম ব্যবহার করে বিদ্যমান দৃষ্টিভঙ্গির তথ্য', 'ca': 'CLaC Lab a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection Using a Combination of Neural Networks and SVM', 'bs': 'CLaC laboratorija na pola Evala-2019 Task 3: Kontekstalna detekcija emocija Koristeći kombinaciju neuronskih mreža i SVM', 'cs': 'CLaC Lab na SemEval-2019 Úkol 3: Kontextová detekce emocí pomocí kombinace neuronových sítí a SVM', 'et': 'CLaC Lab SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 3: Kontekstuaalne emotsioonide tuvastamine neurovõrkude ja SVM kombinatsiooni abil', 'fi': 'CLaC Lab SemEval-2019 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 3: Kontekstiaalinen tunteiden havaitseminen hermoverkkojen ja SVM:n yhdistelmän avulla', 'az': 'CLaC Lab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection Using a Combination of Neural Networks and SVM', 'sk': 'CLaC Lab na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Zaznavanje kontekstualnih čustev s kombinacijo živčnih omrežij in SVM', 'jv': 'CLaC Lab at semiinval-2011 task 3: context emutation detection Using a Kombintion of Neral networks and SVM', 'he': 'מעבדה CLaC ב SemEval-2019 משימה 3: גילוי רגשות קונטקסטיים באמצעות שילוב של רשתות נוירוליות ו SVM', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'CLaC Lab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection Using a Combination of Neural Networks and SVM'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our system at SemEval 2019, Task 3 (EmoContext), which focused on the contextual detection of emotions in a dataset of 3-round dialogues. For our final system, we used a neural network with pretrained ELMo word embeddings and POS tags as input, GRUs as hidden units, an attention mechanism to capture representations of the dialogues, and an SVM classifier which used the learned network representations to perform the task of multi-class classification. This system yielded a micro-averaged F1 score of 0.7072 for the three emotion classes, improving the baseline by approximately 12 %.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظامنا في SemEval 2019 ، المهمة 3 (EmoContext) ، والتي ركزت على الكشف السياقي للعواطف في مجموعة بيانات من الحوارات ثلاثية الجولات. بالنسبة إلى نظامنا النهائي ، استخدمنا شبكة عصبية مع تضمين كلمة ELMo مسبقة التدريب وعلامات POS كمدخلات ، ووحدات GRU كوحدات مخفية ، وآلية انتباه لالتقاط تمثيلات الحوارات ، ومصنف SVM الذي استخدم تمثيلات الشبكة المكتسبة لأداء المهمة من التصنيف متعدد الفئات: أسفر هذا النظام عن درجة F1 متوسطة الصغر تبلغ 0.7072 لفئات العاطفة الثلاثة ، مما أدى إلى تحسين خط الأساس بنحو 12٪.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre système au SemEval 2019, Task 3 (EmoContext), qui s'est concentré sur la détection contextuelle des émotions dans un ensemble de données de dialogues en 3 tours. Pour notre système final, nous avons utilisé un réseau de neurones avec des intégrations de mots ElMo préentraînées et des étiquettes POS en entrée, des GRU comme unités cachées, un mécanisme d'attention pour capturer les représentations des dialogues et un classificateur SVM qui utilisait les représentations de réseau apprises pour effectuer la tâche de multi-classes Ce système a donné un score F1 micro-moyen de 0,7072 pour les trois classes d'émotions, améliorant ainsi la base de référence d'environ 12\xa0%.", 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestro sistema en SemEval 2019, Tarea 3 (EmoContext), que se centró en la detección contextual de emociones en un conjunto de datos de diálogos de 3 rondas. Para nuestro sistema final, utilizamos una red neuronal con incrustaciones de palabras eLMO previamente entrenadas y etiquetas POS como entrada, GRUs como unidades ocultas, un mecanismo de atención para capturar representaciones de los diálogos y un clasificador SVM que utilizó las representaciones de red aprendidas para realizar la tarea de múltiples clases ClasificaciónEste sistema arrojó una puntuación F1 micropromediada de 0.7072 para las tres clases de emociones, mejorando la línea base en aproximadamente un 12%.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nosso sistema no SemEval 2019, Tarefa 3 (EmoContext), que se concentrou na detecção contextual de emoções em um conjunto de dados de diálogos de 3 rodadas. Para nosso sistema final, usamos uma rede neural com embeddings de palavras ELMo pré-treinados e tags POS como entrada, GRUs como unidades ocultas, um mecanismo de atenção para capturar representações dos diálogos e um classificador SVM que usou as representações de rede aprendidas para realizar a tarefa de classificação multiclasse. Esse sistema gerou uma pontuação F1 micromédia de 0,7072 para as três classes de emoção, melhorando a linha de base em aproximadamente 12%.', 'ja': '本稿では、3ラウンドの対話のデータセットにおける感情の文脈的検出に焦点を当てたSemEval 2019のタスク3 （ EmoContext ）のシステムについて説明します。最終的なシステムでは、事前に訓練されたELMoワード埋め込みとPOSタグを入力として持つニューラルネットワーク、非表示単位としてのGRU、対話の表現を取り込むための注意メカニズム、および学習されたネットワーク表現を使用してマルチクラス分類のタスクを実行するSVM分類子を使用しました。このシステムは、3つの感情クラスについて0.7072のマイクロ平均F 1スコアを得て、ベースラインを約12%改善しました。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval 2019, टास्क 3 (EmoContext) में हमारी प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है, जो 3-दौर के संवादों के डेटासेट में भावनाओं का प्रासंगिक पता लगाने पर केंद्रित था। हमारे अंतिम सिस्टम के लिए, हमने इनपुट के रूप में पूर्वप्रशिक्षित ELMo शब्द एम्बेडिंग और पीओएस टैग के साथ एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग किया, छिपी हुई इकाइयों के रूप में GRUs, संवादों के प्रतिनिधित्व को कैप्चर करने के लिए एक ध्यान तंत्र, और एक एसवीएम क्लासिफायर जो बहु-वर्ग वर्गीकरण के कार्य को करने के लिए सीखा नेटवर्क प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग करता था। इस प्रणाली ने तीन भावना वर्गों के लिए 0.7072 का एक माइक्रो-औसत F1 स्कोर प्राप्त किया, जिससे बेसलाइन में लगभग 12% की सुधार हुई।', 'zh': '本文述我等统于SemEval 2019,任3(EmoContext),专注于3轮对语数上下文检。 其于我之终统,吾用一神经网络,其预练者ELMo词嵌POS标签以为输,GRU为隐单元,意机以获对,及一SVM分类器,其用学者网络以行多类之任。 统为三情0.7072微观均F1分数,基线增约12%。', 'ru': 'В данной статье описывается наша система на SemEval 2019, Задача 3 (EmoContext), которая была сосредоточена на контекстном обнаружении эмоций в наборе данных из 3-х раундовых диалогов. Для нашей конечной системы мы использовали нейронную сеть с предварительно обученными вложениями слов ELMo и POS-метками в качестве входных данных, GRU в качестве скрытых единиц, механизм внимания для захвата представлений диалогов и классификатор SVM, который использовал изученные сетевые представления для выполнения задачи многоклассовой классификации. Эта система дала микроусредненный балл F1 0,7072 для трех классов эмоций, улучшив базовую линию приблизительно на 12%.', 'ga': "Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcóras ag SemEval 2019, Tasc 3 (EmoContext), a dhírigh ar bhrath comhthéacsúil mothúcháin i dtacar sonraí de chomhphlé 3-bhabhta. Maidir lenár gcóras deiridh, d’úsáideamar líonra néarúil le leabaithe focal ELMo réamhoilte agus clibeanna POS mar ionchur, GRUanna mar aonaid fholaithe, meicníocht aird chun léiriúcháin na gcomhphlé a ghabháil, agus aicmitheoir SVM a d’úsáid uiríll líonra foghlamtha chun an tasc a dhéanamh. Bhain an córas seo amach scór micrea-mheánmhéid F1 de 0.7072 do na trí aicme mothúcháin, rud a d'fheabhsaigh an bunlíne thart ar 12%.", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημά μας στο έργο 3 (το οποίο επικεντρώθηκε στη συνεκτική ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων σε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων τριών κυκλικών διαλόγων. Για το τελικό μας σύστημα, χρησιμοποιήσαμε ένα νευρωνικό δίκτυο με προκαθορισμένες ενσωματώσεις λέξεων και ετικέτες ως εισαγωγή, GRU ως κρυφές μονάδες, έναν μηχανισμό προσοχής για την καταγραφή αναπαραστάσεων των διαλόγων, και έναν ταξινομητή που χρησιμοποίησε τις διδαγμένες αναπαραστάσεις δικτύου για να εκτελέσει το έργο της ταξινόμησης πολλαπλών κλάσεων. Αυτό το σύστημα απέδωσε μια μικρομεσαία βαθμολογία F1 0,7072 για τις τρεις κατηγορίες συναισθημάτων, βελτιώνοντας τη βάση κατά περίπου 12%.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a rendszerünket a SemEval 2019, Task 3 (EmoContent) című programon, amely az érzelmek kontextuális felismerésére összpontosított 3 fordulós párbeszédek adathalmazában. A végső rendszerünkhöz neurális hálózatot használtunk előkészített ELMo szóbeágyazásokkal és POS címkékkel bemenetként, GRU-kat rejtett egységeket, figyelemmechanizmust a párbeszédek reprezentációinak rögzítésére, valamint SVM osztályozót, amely a tanult hálózati reprezentációkat használta a többosztályos osztályozás feladatának elvégzésére. Ez a rendszer 0,7072 mikroátlagos F1 pontszámot eredményezett a három érzelmi osztály esetében, ami körülbelül 12%-kal javította a kiindulási értéket.', 'it': 'Questo articolo descrive il nostro sistema a SemEval 2019, Task 3 (EmoContent), che si è concentrato sulla rilevazione contestuale delle emozioni in un dataset di dialoghi a 3 turni. Per il nostro sistema finale, abbiamo utilizzato una rete neurale con incorporazioni di parole ELMo pre-addestrate e tag POS come input, GRU come unità nascoste, un meccanismo di attenzione per catturare le rappresentazioni dei dialoghi e un classificatore SVM che ha utilizzato le rappresentazioni apprese della rete per eseguire il compito di classificazione multi-classe. Questo sistema ha prodotto un punteggio F1 micro-medio di 0,7072 per le tre classi emotive, migliorando il basale di circa il 12%.', 'mk': 'Овој документ го опишува нашиот систем на SemEval 2019, задача 3 (EmoContext), кој се фокусираше на контекстното детекција на емоциите во набор на податоци од 3-кругови дијалози. За нашиот последен систем, употребивме невролна мрежа со претренирани ELMo зборови вложување и POS ознаки како влог, GRUs како скриени единици, механизам на внимание за снимање на претставувања на дијалозите, и SVM класификатор кој ги употреби научените мрежни претставувања за извршување на задачата на мултикласификација Овој систем даде микро-просечна оценка на F1 од 0,7072 за трите емоционални класи, подобрувајќи го основното значење за околу 12 отсто.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2019 жылдың жарым- шегінде, 3- тапсырма (Эмоконтексті) жүйемізді таңдайды. Бұл 3- теңіздің деректер диалогтарындағы емоцияларды көздеген көздеген көздеген мәселелерді табу Біздің соңғы жүйеміз үшін ELMo сөздерді ендіру және POS тегтерін келтіру үшін невралды желі қолдандық, GRUs жасырылған бірліктер ретінде, диалогтардың түсініктерін алу механизмі және бірнеше класс классификациясының тапсырмаларын орындау үшін үйрен Бұл жүйе үш эмоциялық класс үшін микро орташа F1 нөмірі 0,7072 болды, негізгі жолды 12% деп жақсарту.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი ჩვენი სისტემის SemEval 2019-ში, სამუშაო სამუშაო მოქმედება (EmoContext), რომელიც სამუშაო დიალოგიების მონაცემების კონტექსტური განახლებაზე დააყენებულია. ჩვენი საბოლოო სისტემისთვის, ჩვენ გამოყენეთ ნეიროლური ქსელი, რომელიც ELMo სიტყვის დაყენებული სიტყვის და POS სიტყვის, როგორც ჩატვირთვა, GRUs როგორც დაკლეფილი ერთეულები, დიალოგების გამოსახულება, და SVM კლასიფიკაცია, რომე ეს სისტემა მიკრო განსაზღვრებული F1 წერტილი 0,7072 წერტილის სამი ემოციონის კლასებისთვის დაახლოებით, დაახლოებით 12%.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinama mūsų sistema „SemEval 2019“, 3 užduotis (EmoContext), kurioje daugiausia dėmesio skiriama emocijų kontekstiniam aptikimui trijų apskritų dialogų duomenų rinkinyje. Mūsų paskutinei sistemai mes naudojome nervinį tinklą su išankstinio mokymo ELMo žodžių įdėjimais ir POS ženklais kaip įvestis, GRU kaip paslėpti vienetai, dėmesio mechanizmą dialogų reprezentacijoms surinkti ir SVM klasifikatorių, kuris naudojo išmoktus tinklo reprezentacijas įvairių klasių klasifikavimui atlikti. Šioje sistemoje trijų emocijų klasių F1 rodiklis buvo 0,7072, o pradinis rodiklis pagerėjo maždaug 12 %.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem kita di SemEval 2019, Tugas 3 (EmoContext), yang fokus pada pengesan kontekstual emosi dalam set data dialog 3-pusingan. Untuk sistem terakhir kami, kami menggunakan rangkaian saraf dengan pelengkapan perkataan ELMo dan tag POS terlatih sebagai input, GRU sebagai unit tersembunyi, mekanisme perhatian untuk menangkap perwakilan dialog, dan pengklasifikasi SVM yang menggunakan perwakilan rangkaian belajar untuk melakukan tugas kelas berbilang. Sistem ini memberikan skor F1 berrata-rata mikro 0.7072 untuk tiga kelas emosi, meningkatkan dasar dengan kira-kira 12%.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തെ സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019-ല്\u200d വിവരിക്കുന്നു, ടാസ്ക് 3 (എമോക്സെക്സ്റ്റ്), വികാരങ്ങളുടെ നിലവിലുള്ള വികാരങ്ങള ഞങ്ങളുടെ അവസാനത്തെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിച്ചു. യെല്\u200dമോ വാക്ക് അകത്തുനിന്നും പോസ് ടാഗുകളും ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന് മൂന്നു വികാരങ്ങളുടെ ക്ലാസുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു മൈക്രോ സാധാരണ എഫ്1 സ്കോര്\u200d 0. 7072 സ്കോര്\u200d നല്\u200dകി. അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥ', 'mt': 'This paper describes our system at SemEval 2019, Task 3 (EmoContext), which focused on the contextual detection of emotions in a dataset of 3-round dialogues.  For our final system, we used a neural network with pretrained ELMo word embeddings and POS tags as input, GRUs as hidden units, an attention mechanism to capture representations of the dialogues, and an SVM classifier which used the learned network representations to perform the task of multi-class classification. This system yielded a micro-averaged F1 score of 0.7072 for the three emotion classes, improving the baseline by approximately 12%.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас 2019 оны SemEval-д бидний системийг 3 дахь ажил (EmoContext) дээр тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь 3 дахь диалогийн мэдээллийн санааг ойлгохын тулд төвлөрсөн. Эцсийн системийн хувьд бид мэдрэлийн сүлжээний хувьд ELMo үг нэвтрүүлэх болон POS тегтэй нэвтрүүлэх, GRUs нуугдмал нэгжүүд, диалогын үзүүлэлтийг барьж авах анхаарлын механизм, мөн олон ангийнхээ хувьд сургалтын сүлжээний үзүүлэлтийг ашигласан SVM классификатор Энэ систем 3 сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хичээл дээр жижиг дундаж F1-ийн 0.7072 хувь нь нэмэгдсэн. Газрын шугам нь ойролцоогоор 12%.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul nostru la SemEval 2019, Task 3 (EmoContent), care s-a axat pe detectarea contextuală a emoțiilor într-un set de date de dialoguri în 3 runde. Pentru sistemul nostru final, am folosit o rețea neurală cu încorporări de cuvinte ELMo pre-instruite și etichete POS ca intrare, GRU ca unități ascunse, un mecanism de atenție pentru a capta reprezentări ale dialogurilor și un clasificator SVM care a folosit reprezentările rețelei învățate pentru a îndeplini sarcina de clasificare multi-clasă. Acest sistem a obținut un scor F1 micro-mediu de 0,7072 pentru cele trei clase emoționale, îmbunătățind valoarea inițială cu aproximativ 12%.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem na semiEvalu 2019, zadatak 3 (EmoContext), koji je fokusirao na kontekstualno otkrivanje emocija u setu podataka 3 okružnih dijaloga. Za naš konačni sistem, koristili smo neuralnu mrežu sa pretreniranim uključivanjem riječi ELMo i oznakem POS kao ulaz, GRU kao skrivene jedinice, mehanizam pažnje za uhvativanje predstavljanja dijaloga, i SVM klasifikatorom koji je koristio učene mreže predstavljanja kako bi izvršili zadatak klasifikacije više klasa. Ovaj sistem je dobio mikro srednji rezultat F1 od 0,7072 za tri klase emocija, poboljšavajući početnu liniju za oko 12%.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz system na SemEval 2019, Zadanie 3 (EmoContext), który skupiał się na kontekstowym wykrywaniu emocji w zbiorze danych 3-okrągłych dialogów. Do naszego ostatecznego systemu użyliśmy sieci neuronowej z wstępnie przeszkolonymi osadzeniami słów ELMo i tagami POS jako wejściem, GRU jako ukrytymi jednostkami, mechanizmu uwagi do przechwytywania reprezentacji dialogów oraz klasyfikatora SVM, który wykorzystywał nauczone reprezentacje sieci do wykonywania zadania klasyfikacji wieloklasowej. System ten uzyskał mikrośredni wynik F1 0,7072 dla trzech klas emocji, poprawiając wyjście o około 12%.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ පද්ධතිය සම්වේල් 2019, වැඩක් 3 (EmoContexts) වල විස්තර කරනවා, ඒ වගේම සංවාදයක් 3-රුණු සංවාදයේ දැනුම් සැකසුම් වල ස අපේ අන්තිම පද්ධතියෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරතිරීක්ෂණ ELMo වචනය සහ POS ටැග් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිරීක්ෂණ ජාලය භාවිත කරලා තියෙන්නේ, GRUS වලින් හැංගුණු යුනිත් වලින්, සංවාද වල ප්\u200dර මේ පද්ධතියේ මයික්රෝම් අවුරුද්ධ F1 ප්\u200dරමාණයක් 0.7072 වෙනුවෙන් හැඟීමක් තුන්දෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙනවා, මුළු', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt system på SemEval 2019, Task 3 (EmoContent), som fokuserade på kontextuell detektering av känslor i en dataset med 3-rundiga dialoger. För vårt slutliga system använde vi ett neuralt nätverk med förkränade ELMo-ordinbäddningar och POS-taggar som indata, GRU:er som dolda enheter, en uppmärksamhetsmekanism för att fånga representationer av dialogerna, och en SVM-klassificerare som använde de lärda nätverksrepresentationerna för att utföra uppgiften med flerklassklassificering. Detta system gav en mikrogenomsnittlig F1-poäng på 0,7072 för de tre känsloklasserna, vilket förbättrade baslinjen med cirka 12%.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoraa nidaamkan SemEval 2019, shaqo 3 (EmoContext), kaas oo ku kalsoonaaday cadeynta fikrada joogtada ah oo ku qoran diyaar 3-wareegsan. Xilligaaga ugu dambeeya, waxaynu isticmaalnay shabakad neural ah oo ELMo word embeddings and POS tags as input, GRUs as units qarsoon, mechanism a an qabsanno representations of dialogues, iyo SVM fasax oo isticmaalay shabakadda wax bartay inay sameeyaan shaqada fasalka badan. nidaamkan wuxuu soo saaray koox fudud oo ah F1 oo qiyaastii 12%.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval 2019-ல் எங்கள் அமைப்பை விவரிக்கும், பணி 3 (EmoContext), அது 3 சுற்று உரையாடல் தகவல் அமைப்பில் உள்ள உணர்வுகளின் தற்போதைய கண்டறிதலில்  எங்கள் இறுதியாக அமைப்பிற்கு, நாங்கள் ELMo வார்த்தை உள்ளீடுகள் மற்றும் POS ஒட்டுகளை புதுப்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளோம் ஒரு புதிய பிணையத்தை பயன்படுத்தினோம், GRUs மறைந்துள்ள அலகுகளாக, உரையாடல் பிரதிந இந்த அமைப்பு மூன்று உணர்வு வகுப்புகளுக்கு ஒரு சிக்ரோ சராசரி F1 புள்ளி', 'ur': 'This paper describes our system at SemEval 2019, Task 3 (EmoContext), which focused on the contextual detection of emotions in a data set of 3-round dialogues. ہمارے آخری سیستم کے لئے ہم نے ایک نئورل نیٹورک استعمال کیا تھا جو پہلے ELMo کلام انڈینگ اور POS ٹاگ کے ساتھ استعمال کیا تھا، GRUs کو پوشیدہ یونیٹ کے طور پر، ایک ڈالگوں کی نمایش پکڑنے کے لئے، اور ایک SVM کلیسائر جس نے بہت کلاس کلاس کلیسائٹ کے کام کرنے کے لئے سکھایا تھا۔ یہ سیسٹم نے 0.7072 کی میکرومتوسط F1 سکوٹ کو تین احساسات کلاس کے لئے پہنچا دیا، اور بنیادی لین کو تقریباً 12%.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet vårt på semiEval 2019, oppgåve 3 (EmoContext), som fokuserte på kontekstoppdaginga av emosjonar i ein datasett av 3 runde dialogar. For det siste systemet vår brukte vi ein neuralnettverk med følgjande ELMo-ord-innbygging og POS-taggar som inndata, GRUs som skjulte einingar, ein oppmerksmekanisme for å henta representasjonar av dialogane, og ein SVM-klassifiserer som bruka lærte nettverksrepresentasjonar for å utføra oppgåva av fleire klassesklassifikasjonar. Denne systemet gjev eit mikrogjennomsnittleg F1-poeng med 0,7072 for dei tre emosjonsklassene, og forbedra baselinja med omtrent 12%.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz SemEval 2019da Vazifa 3 (EmoContext) tizimimizni anglatadi, bu 3 harfdagi muloqat oynalarda foydalanuvchi hissiyalarni aniqlash uchun foydalanadi. Biz oxirgi tizimmiz uchun biz ELMo soʻzlari va POS taglarini kiritish deb o'ylab turgan neyural tarmoqdan foydalanamiz, GRUs qarshi bir oynalar sifatida, muloqat oynalarning tashkilotlarini qabul qilish va SVM tafsilotlarini bajarish uchun o'rganish tarmoq taʼminlovchilarini bajarish uchun foydalanamiz. Bu tizim esa uchta hissiyotning sinflari uchun kichkina foydalanadigan F1 scori 0.7072 dan foydalanadi, asosiy satrni qiyaasti 12%bilanoshadi.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả hệ thống của chúng ta tại SemEvl 2009, Task 3 (EmoContact), tập trung vào việc phát hiện tình hình cảm trong một tập tin của ba vòng ca thoại. Với hệ thống cuối cùng, chúng tôi sử dụng một mạng lưới thần kinh với những dòng chữ nhúng trước và các thẻ bài đăng nhập hoặc hoặc hoặc hoặc hoặc hoặc như những đơn vị ẩn, một cơ chế tập trung để thu thập các biểu tượng của các bộ thoại, và một phân loại SVM đã sử dụng các biểu tượng mạng học để thực hiện nhiệm vụ phân loại đa hạng. Hệ thống này đã tạo ra một số lượng F1 thu thập vi tính 0.7072 cho ba lớp cảm xúc, cải thiện đường cơ sở khoảng 127.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sustav na semiEvalu 2019, zadatak 3 (EmoContext), koji je fokusirao na kontekstualno otkrivanje emocija u skupu podataka 3 okružnih dijaloga. Za naš konačni sustav, koristili smo neuralnu mrežu sa pretkinjenim uključivanjem riječi ELMo i oznakem POS kao ulaz, GRU kao skrivene jedinice, mehanizam pažnje za uhvativanje predstavljanja dijaloga, i SVM klasifikatorom koji je koristio učene zastupe mreže kako bi izvršili zadatak klasifikacije više klasa. Ovaj sustav je dobio mikroesrednji rezultat F1 od 0,7072 za tri klase emocija, poboljšavajući početnu liniju za približno 12%.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва нашата система на задача 3 (която се фокусира върху контекстното откриване на емоции в набор от данни от 3-кръгови диалози. За крайната ни система използвахме невронна мрежа с предварително тренирани вграждания на думи и ПОС тагове като вход, ГРУ като скрити единици, механизъм за внимание за улавяне на изображения на диалозите и класификатор, който използва научените мрежови изображения за изпълнение на задачата за многокласова класификация. Тази система дава микро-среден резултат от 0,7072 за трите емоционални класа, подобрявайки изходното ниво с приблизително 12%.', 'da': "Denne artikel beskriver vores system på SemEval 2019, Task 3 (EmoContent), som fokuserede på kontekstuel detektion af følelser i et datasæt af 3-runde dialoger. Til vores endelige system brugte vi et neuralt netværk med forudtrænede ELMo-ordindlejringer og POS tags som input, GRU'er som skjulte enheder, en opmærksomhedsmekanisme til at fange repræsentationer af dialogerne, og en SVM-klassifikation, der brugte de lærte netværksrepræsentationer til at udføre opgaven med multi-klasse klassificering. Dette system gav en mikrogennemsnitlig F1 score på 0,7072 for de tre følelsesklasser, hvilket forbedrede baseline med ca. 12%.", 'nl': "Deze paper beschrijft ons systeem bij SemEval 2019, Task 3 (EmoContext), dat zich richtte op de contextuele detectie van emoties in een dataset van 3-ronde dialogen. Voor ons uiteindelijke systeem gebruikten we een neuraal netwerk met vooraf getrainde ELMo-woordinsluitingen en POS-tags als input, GRU's als verborgen eenheden, een aandachtsmechanisme om representaties van de dialogen vast te leggen en een SVM-classificator die de geleerde netwerkrepresentaties gebruikte om de taak van multi-class classificatie uit te voeren. Dit systeem leverde een microgemiddelde F1 score op van 0,7072 voor de drie emotieklassen, waardoor de baseline met ongeveer 12%.", 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unser System bei SemEval 2019, Task 3 (EmoContext), welches sich auf die kontextuelle Erfassung von Emotionen in einem Datensatz von 3-runden Dialogen konzentrierte. Für unser endgültiges System verwendeten wir ein neuronales Netzwerk mit vortrainierten ELMo-Worteinbettungen und POS-Tags als Eingabe, GRUs als versteckte Einheiten, einen Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus zur Erfassung von Darstellungen der Dialoge und einen SVM-Klassifikator, der die erlernten Netzwerkrepräsentationen zur Ausführung der Aufgabe der Mehrklassenklassifizierung verwendete. Dieses System ergab einen mikrogemittelten F1-Score von 0,7072 für die drei Emotionsklassen und verbesserte die Baseline um etwa 12%.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem kita di SemEval 2019, Tugas 3 (EmoContext), yang fokus pada deteksi kontekstual emosi dalam set data dari dialog 3-putaran. Untuk sistem terakhir kami, kami menggunakan jaringan saraf dengan penerbangan kata ELMo dan tags POS terlatih sebagai input, GRU sebagai unit tersembunyi, mekanisme perhatian untuk menangkap represensi dari dialog, dan klasifikasi SVM yang menggunakan represensi jaringan belajar untuk melakukan tugas klasifikasi multikelas. Sistem ini memberikan skor F1 dengan rata-rata mikro 0,7072 untuk tiga kelas emosi, memperbaiki dasar dengan sekitar 12%.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval 2019의 임무3(EmoContext)에 있는 시스템을 묘사하는데 이 시스템은 3차례의 대화를 포함하는 데이터에서 정서를 집중적으로 상하문 검측하는 데 전념한다.우리의 최종 시스템에서 우리는 미리 훈련된 ELMo 단어 삽입과 POS 표시가 있는 신경 네트워크를 입력으로 사용하고 GRU는 숨겨진 단원으로 하며 주의 메커니즘이 대화의 표시를 포착하고 SVM 분류기를 사용했다. 이 분류기는 학습된 네트워크 표시를 사용하여 여러 종류의 분류 작업을 수행한다.이 시스템은 세 가지 정서 등급의 미시적 평균 F1 점수가 0.7072로 기준선을 약 12% 높였다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم ما را توصیف می\u200cکند در نیمه\u200cای ۲۰۱۹، کار ۳ (EmoContext) که روی شناسایی احساسات در مجموعه داده\u200cهای dijalogهای سه گرد تمرکز می\u200cکند. برای سیستم نهایی ما، از شبکه عصبی استفاده کردیم که کلمه\u200cهای مخفی ELMo و نقاشی POS به عنوان ورودی، GRUs به عنوان واحدهای مخفی، یک مکانیسم توجه برای گرفتن نمایش\u200cهای دیalog\u200cها، و یک کلیسای SVM که از نمایش\u200cهای شبکه یاد گرفته\u200cاند استفاده کرده\u200cاند تا کار گروه\u200cهای مخفی کلاس انجام دهند. این سیستم یک امتیاز F1 متوسط میکرومتوسط از 0.7072 برای سه کلاس احساسات به وجود آورد و تقریباً به حدود 12 درصد بهترین خط بنیادی به وجود آورد.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wetu katika SemEval 2019, Kazi 3 (EmoContext), ambalo linalenga kutambua hisia zinazoendelea katika seti ya mazungumzo ya takwimu ya mazungumzo matatu. Kwa mfumo wetu wa mwisho, tulitumia mtandao wa neura uliotumia maneno ya ELMo na viungo vya POS kama input, GRUs kama vifaa vilivyofichikana, mfumo wa kuchukua uwakilishi wa mazungumzo hayo, na mfanyakazi wa SVM uliotumia uwakilishi wa mitandao ya kujifunza kufanya kazi ya kutangaza darasa nyingi. Mfumo huu ulitoa vipimo vya F1 vya wastani kidogo vya 0.7072 kwa darasa tatu za hisia, kwa kuboresha mistari ya msingi kwa takriban asilimia 12.', 'tr': 'Bu käze biziň sistemimizi SemEval 2019-nji ýylda, Taýgy 3-nji (EmoContext) duýgyşlaryň özüni 3-rundaky dialoglaryň bardygyna üns berýär. Son sistemimize göre ELMo kelime içeri ve POS etiketleri dolu bir nöral a ğ kullandık, Bu sistem duýgym synplary üçin küçük ortalamasynda F1 sany 0,7072 sany aldy, baselini yaklaýyk 12 % diýip geliştirdi.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf ons stelsel by SemEval 2019, Opdrag 3 (EmoContext), wat fokus gefokus het op die kontekslike opskrif van emosies in 'n datastel van 3 ronde dialoog. Vir ons eindelike stelsel het ons 'n neurale netwerk gebruik met voorstrekte ELMo woord inbettings en POS etikette as invoer, GRUs as verborge eenhede, 'n aandag mekanisme om voorstellings van die dialoog te vang en 'n SVM klassifiseerder wat die geleerde netwerk voorstellings gebruik het om die taak van multiklasklassifikasie te uitvoer. Hierdie stelsel het 'n mikro-gemiddelde F1 telling van 0,7072 gegee vir die drie emosie klasse, die basislien verbeter by omtrent 12%.", 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր համակարգը 2019 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" 3-րդ խնդիրում (EmoConxt), որը կենտրոնացել է զգացմունքների կոնտեքստային հայտնաբերման վրա երեք շրջանակի պատմությունների տվյալների համակարգում: Մեր վերջնական համակարգի համար մենք օգտագործեցինք նյարդային ցանց, որտեղ նախապատրաստված են ELMo բառերի ներդրումներ և POS նշաններ են ներդրվում, GRUs-ներ՝ թաքնված միավորներ, ուշադրության մեխանիզմ, որպեսզի վերցնենք երկխուղերի ներկայացումները, և սվի Մ դասակարգիչ, որը օգտագործում էր սովոր ցանցի ներկայացումները բա This system yielded a micro-averaged F1 score of 0.7072 for the three emotion classes, improving the baseline by approximately 12%.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ስርዓታችንን በSemEval 2019፣ ስራ 3 (EmoContext) ይናገራል፡፡ ወደ መጨረሻው ስርዓታችን፣ የኤሌሞን ቃላት አካባቢዎች እና የፖএস መክፈቻዎች እንደ input፣ GRUs እንደ ተሸሸገው ክፍሎች፣ የDialogueን መልዕክቶች ለመያዝ እና የተማሩት መረብ ክፍተኝነት ለመፈጸም የሚጠይቅ የSVM ክፍተኝነት እና የብዙ ክፍለ ክፍል ትምህርት ትምህርት ማድረጊያ ተጠቃሚ ነበር፡፡ ይሄ ሲስተም የ.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan sistemin tonë në SemEval 2019, Task 3 (EmoContext), i cili u përqëndrua në zbulimin kontekstual të emocioneve në një grup të dhënash të dialogeve 3-raunde. Për sistemin tonë përfundimtar, përdorëm një rrjet nervor me përfshirje fjalësh ELMo dhe etiketa POS si input, GRU si njësi të fshehura, një mekanizëm vëmendjeje për të kapur përfaqësime të dialogut dhe një klasifikues SVM që përdori përfaqësimet e rrjetit të mësuar për të kryer detyrën e klasifikimit të shumëklasave. Ky sistem dha një pikë-mesatare F1 prej 0.7072 për tre klasat emocionale, duke përmirësuar bazën me rreth 12%.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা সেমইভাল ২০১৯-এ আমাদের সিস্টেমের ব্যাখ্যা করেছে কাজ ৩ (ইমোককন্টেক্স), যা তিন রাউন্ড ডায় ডায়ালগের ডাটাসেটে বিভিন্ন অনু আমাদের শেষ সিস্টেমের জন্য আমরা একটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করেছিলাম যেখানে ইনপুট এবং পোস ট্যাগ ব্যবহার করেছিলাম ইনপুট হিসেবে, গ্রাউজ গোপন ইউনিট হিসেবে, আলোচনার প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্ এই ব্যবস্থাটি প্রায় ১২ শতাংশের মাইক্রো গড়ে এফ১ স্কোর দিয়েছে।', 'ca': "This paper describes our system at SemEval 2019, Task 3 (EmoContext), which focused on the contextual detection of emotions in a dataset of 3-round dialogues.  Per al nostre sistema final, vam utilitzar una xarxa neural amb integracions de paraules ELMo i etiquetes POS pré-treinades com entrada, GRUs com unitats ocultes, un mecanisme d'atenció per capturar representacions dels diàlegs, i un classificador SVM que va utilitzar les representacions de xarxa aprengutes per a fer la tasca de classificació multiclasse. Aquest sistema va donar una puntuació F1 de 0,7072 per a les tres classes emocionals, millorant el valor basal d'aproximadament 12%.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem na semiEvalu 2019, zadatak 3 (EmoContext), koji je fokusirao na kontekstualno otkrivanje emocija u setu podataka 3 okružnih dijaloga. Za naš konačni sistem, koristili smo neuralnu mrežu sa pretkinutom uključivanjem riječi ELMo i oznakem POS-a kao ulaz, GRU kao skrivene jedinice, mehanizam pažnje za uhvativanje predstavljanja dijaloga, i SVM klasifikatora koji je koristio učene zastupe mreže kako bi izvršili zadatak klasifikacije multiklasa. Ovaj sistem je dobio mikroesrednji rezultat F1 od 0,7072 za tri klase emocija, poboljšavajući početnu liniju za približno 12%.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie süsteemi SemEval 2019 ülesandes 3 (EmoContext), mis keskendus emotsioonide konteksti tuvastamisele kolmevooruliste dialoogide andmekogumis. Lõpliku süsteemi jaoks kasutasime sisendina neurovõrku eeltreenitud ELMo sõnade manustamise ja POS siltidega, varjatud üksustena GRU-d, dialoogide esituste jäädvustamise tähelepanumehhanismi ja SVM-i klassifitseerijat, mis kasutas õppitud võrguesitusi mitmeklassilise klassifitseerimise ülesande täitmiseks. See süsteem andis kolme emotsiooniklassi mikrokeskmise F1 skoori 0,7072, parandades algväärtust ligikaudu 12%.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš systém na SemEval 2019, Task 3 (EmoContext), který se zaměřil na kontextovou detekci emocí v datové sadě 3kolových dialogů. Pro náš finální systém jsme použili neuronovou síť s předtrénovanými vloženími slov ELMo a POS tagy jako vstup, GRU jako skryté jednotky, mechanismus pozornosti pro zachycení reprezentací dialogů a klasifikátor SVM, který používal naučené reprezentace sítě k provedení úkolu klasifikace více tříd. Tento systém přinesl mikroprůměrné F1 skóre 0,7072 pro tři emoční třídy a zlepšil výchozí hodnotu přibližně o 12%.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan järjestelmäämme SemEval 2019 -tapahtumassa, Task 3 (EmoContext), jossa keskityttiin tunteiden kontekstuaaliseen havaitsemiseen kolminkertaisten dialogien aineistossa. Lopullisessa järjestelmässämme käytimme neuroverkkoa, jossa oli valmiiksi koulutettuja ELMo-sanaupotuksia ja POS-tunnisteita syötteenä, GRU-yksiköitä piilotettuina yksiköinä, huomiomekanismia dialogien esitysten tallentamiseen sekä SVM-luokitusta, joka käytti opittuja verkkoesityksiä moniluokkaisen luokittelutehtävän suorittamiseen. Tämä järjestelmä tuotti mikrokeskiarvon F1 pisteen 0,7072 kolmelle tunneluokalle, mikä paransi lähtötilannetta noin 12%.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt bizim sistemimizi 2019-ci SemEval-də, 3-cür məlumatların məlumatlarındakı duyguların müxtəlif keşfetməsinə odaklandırır. Bizim son sistemimiz üçün, ELMo sözləri və POS etiketləri içərisində, GRUs gizli ünvanlar kimi, dialogların temsillərini almaq üçün gözləmə mehanizmi və çoxlu sınıf klasifikasyonu etmək üçün öyrənmiş şəbəkə tərzlərini istifadə edən SVM klasifikatçısı istifadə etdik. Bu sistem üç emosyon sınıfları üçün mikro ortalamalı F1 nöqtəsi 0,7072 dərəcəsini verirdi, baseline 12%-dən artırdı.', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah iki rambarang sistem awakdhéwé ning semiinval 2011, task 3 Terus sistememu tuku, kita gambar sistem sing nyebute nggambar kelas telu nggambar, gambar nggo mobil Sistem iki lak ngaweh sistem sing wis rampungan kelas mikro-median F1 sing 0.2007 kuwi telu kelas sing duwé, njalukake kuwi basa sing wis 12%.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naš sistem na nalogi 3 SemEval 2019 (EmoContext), ki se je osredotočil na kontekstno zaznavanje čustev v podatkovnem naboru 3-krožnih dialogov. Za končni sistem smo uporabili nevronsko omrežje s predtreniranimi ELMo besednimi vdelavami in POS oznakami kot vhod, GRU kot skrite enote, mehanizem pozornosti za zajemanje predstavitev dialogov in SVM klasifikator, ki je uporabil učene predstavitve omrežja za opravljanje naloge večrazredne klasifikacije. Ta sistem je dosegel mikropovprečno oceno F1 0,7072 za tri čustvene razrede, kar je izboljšalo izhodiščno vrednost za približno 12%.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את המערכת שלנו ב-SemEval 2019, משימה 3 (EmoContext), שמוקדמת על גילוי הקונקסטוקלי של רגשות בתערכת נתונים של דיאלוגים שלוש סיבובים. למערכת הסופית שלנו, השתמשנו ברשת עצבית עם מילים ELMo מעורבות מראש ותגים POS כתוצאה, GRUs כיחידות חבויות, מנגנון תשומת לב כדי לתפוס מייצגים של הדיולוגים, וקlassifikatור SVM אשר השתמש בייצגים הרשת הלמודים כדי לבצע את המשימה של מסווג רב-מעמד. המערכת הזו הביאה נקודת F1 בממוצע של 0.7072 לשלושת שיעורי רגשות, משפר את המרכז בסביבות 12%.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na faɗa ɗa tsarin mu a SemEl 2019, Tafiyar 3 (EmoContContent), wanda ya yi zura kan gane wa hisãban da ke cikin wani tsarin zauren zauren akwatin bayani na 3-runa. Ga ƙarshen na'uranmu, mun yi amfani da wani shirin neural wanda ya fi zama na fassarar maganar ELMo da tagogi masu shiga, GRU kamar shirin tsari, GRU kamar shirin ɓõye, wani matsayi na kiyaye masu tsari ga zauren zauren akwatin bayanin, da wani mai fassarar SvM wanda ya yi amfani da wagon da aka sanar zuwa ya aikata aikin mai daraja mai yawa. Wannan na'ura ya bãyar da wani nau'i mai ƙaranci F1 na 0.7042 wa darafõfin hisãbi uku, kuma ya kyautata layin basin da taki 12%.", 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་ནི་ཨེ་Eval 2019ལ་ལས་གནས་སྟངས་གསུམ་ཀྱི་ནང་། For our final system, we used a neural network with pretrained ELMo word embeddings and POS tags as input, GRUs as hidden units, an attention mechanism to capture representations of the dialogues, and an SVM classifier which used the learned network representations to perform the task of multi-class classification. དེ་ནི་མ་ལག་གིས་སྒེར་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིགས་གསུམ་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཕྱོགས་ཚད་དཀོན་འགྱུར་བའི་ངོ་ཚིག་གི་ཨང་གྲངས་གཅིག་མཚུངས་ཡོད། དེ་ནི་རྨང'}
{'en': 'CLARK at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Exploring the Role of Context to Identify Emotion in a Short Conversation', 'ar': 'CLARK في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: استكشاف دور السياق لتحديد المشاعر في محادثة قصيرة', 'es': 'CLARK en SemEVAL-2019 Tarea 3: Explorando el papel del contexto para identificar las emociones en una conversación breve', 'pt': 'CLARK no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Explorando o papel do contexto para identificar emoções em uma breve conversa', 'fr': 'CLARK au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Explorer le rôle du contexte pour identifier les émotions dans une courte conversation', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019タスク3のクラーク：短い会話で感情を識別するためのコンテキストの役割の探求', 'ru': 'КЛАРК на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Изучение роли контекста для выявления эмоций в короткой беседе', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 3 में क्लार्क: एक छोटी बातचीत में भावनाओं की पहचान करने के लिए संदर्भ की भूमिका की खोज', 'zh': '克拉克在SemEval-20193:求情在简', 'ga': 'CLARK ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Iniúchadh ar Ról an Chomhthéacs chun Mothúchán a Aithint i gComhrá Gearr', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Εξερεύνηση του ρόλου του πλαισίου για τον προσδιορισμό των συναισθημάτων σε μια σύντομη συζήτηση', 'ka': 'CLARK semiEval-2019 სამუშაო დავალება 3: კონტექსტის პროლის განსხვავება ემოციონის კონტექსტის პარამეტრებში', 'hu': 'CLARK a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: A kontextus szerepének feltárása az érzelmek azonosításában egy rövid beszélgetésben', 'kk': 'CLARK жарым- 2019 тапсырмасының 3- тапсырмасы: Қысқа сөйлесуде көңіл күйін анықтау үшін контекстің рөлін зерттеу', 'lt': 'CLARK per 2019 m. pusmetį 3 užduotis: nagrinėti konteksto vaidmenį siekiant nustatyti emocijas trumpo pokalbio metu', 'ms': 'CLARK at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Exploring the Role of Context to Identify Emotion in a Short Conversation', 'it': 'CLARK a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Esplorare il ruolo del contesto per identificare le emozioni in una breve conversazione', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3- ല്\u200d സ്ലാര്\u200dക്ക്: ഒരു ചെറിയ സംസാരത്തില്\u200d എമോട്ടോഷന്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ റോള്\u200d പര', 'mn': 'CLARK at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Exploring the Role of Context to Identify Emotion in a Short Conversation', 'no': 'CLARK ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3: Utforskar rolen på kontekst for å identifisera emosjon i ein kort samtale', 'mt': 'CLARK at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Exploring the Role of Context to Identify Emotion in a Short Conversation', 'mk': 'КЛАРК на SemEval-2019 задача 3: Истражување на улогата на контекст за идентификување на емоциите во кратка разговор', 'sr': 'CLARK na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: istraživanje uloge konteksta za identifikaciju emocija u kratkom razgovoru', 'ro': 'CLARK la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Explorarea rolului contextului pentru identificarea emoției într-o conversație scurtă', 'si': 'CLARK at HalfEvel-2019 Job 3: Explorer the Role of ContextComment', 'so': 'CLARK at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Exploring the Role of Context to identify Emotion in a Short Conversation', 'sv': 'CLARK på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Att utforska sammanhangets roll för att identifiera känslor i en kort konversation', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணியில் CLARK: சிறிய பேச்சில் உணர்வு குறிப்பிட்ட உரையாடலில் தெரியும் உள்ளடக்கத்தின் விளையாட்டை வரையறு', 'ur': 'CLARK at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Exploring the Role of Context to Identify Emotion in a Short Conversation', 'pl': 'CLARK na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Badanie roli kontekstu w identyfikacji emocji w krótkiej rozmowie', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'CLAY nhận diện sự hiện diện trong phiên điều tra ngắn.', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Изследване на ролята на контекста за идентифициране на емоциите в кратък разговор', 'hr': 'CLARK na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: istraživanje uloge konteksta za identifikaciju emocija u kratkom razgovoru', 'nl': 'CLARK op SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Onderzoek naar de rol van context om emotie te identificeren in een kort gesprek', 'da': 'CLARK på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Udforske konteksens rolle for at identificere følelser i en kort samtale', 'ko': '클라크가SemEval-2019임무3: 언어 환경이 짧은 대화에서 정서를 식별하는 작용을 탐색한다', 'id': 'CLARK at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Exploring the Role of Context to Identify Emotion in a Short Conversation', 'de': 'CLARK auf der SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Erforschung der Rolle von Kontext zur Identifikation von Emotionen in einem kurzen Gespräch', 'af': "Klark by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 3: Ondersoek die rol van Konteks om Emotie in 'n Kort Gespraak te identifiseer", 'sw': 'paper size', 'fa': 'CLARK در کار ۳: تحقیق نقش محیط برای شناسایی احساسات در یک مکالمه کوتاه', 'tr': "CLARK at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Context's Role to Identify Emotion in a Short Conversation", 'sq': 'CLARK në SemEval-2019 Detyra 3: Shqyrtimi i rolit të kontekstit për të identifikuar emocionet në një bisedë të shkurtër', 'az': 'Qısqa söhbətdə Emotiyonu tanıtmaq üçün məlumatın rolünü keşfetmək üçün', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৩: সংক্ষিপ্ত আলোচনায় Emotion পরিচিত করার জন্য বিভিন্ন ভূমিকা বিশ্লেষণ করা হচ্ছে', 'am': 'ስራ 3:Exploring the Role of Context to Identify Emotion in a Short Conversation', 'hy': 'ՍԵՄԱԿ 2019-ի կիսագնդի 3. հանձնարարությունը. Կարճ հաղորդակցման ժամանակ զգացմունքների հայտնաբերելու համար կոնտեքստի դերի ուսումնասիրելը', 'cs': 'CLARK na SemEval-2019 Úkol 3: Zkoumání role kontextu pro identifikaci emocí v krátké konverzaci', 'et': 'CLARK SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 3: Konteksti rolli uurimine emotsioonide tuvastamisel lühikeses vestluses', 'bs': 'CLARK na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: istraživanje uloge konteksta za identifikaciju emocija u kratkom razgovoru', 'ca': "CLARK a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Explorar el paper del context per identificar l'emoció en una conversa curta", 'fi': 'CLARK SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 3: Kontekstin roolin tutkiminen tunteiden tunnistamiseksi lyhyessä keskustelussa', 'jv': 'CLARK at semiinval-2011 task 3: Isobah Ndoleh Ndoleh of contextual to ID Emaosion in a shortconversation', 'he': 'CLARK at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Exploring the Role of Context to Identify Emotion in a Short Conversation', 'sk': 'CLARK na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Raziskovanje vloge konteksta za prepoznavanje čustev v kratkem pogovoru', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'CLARK at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Exploring the Role of Context to Identify Emotion in a Short Conversation'}
{'en': 'With text lacking valuable information avail-able in other modalities, context may provide useful information to better detect emotions. In this paper, we do a systematic exploration of the role of context in recognizing emotion in a conversation. We use a Naive Bayes model to show that inferring the mood of the conversation before classifying individual utterances leads to better performance. Additionally, we find that using context while train-ing the model significantly decreases performance. Our approach has the additional bene-fit that its performance rivals a baseline LSTM model while requiring fewer resources.', 'fr': "Le texte ne contenant pas d'informations précieuses disponibles dans d'autres modalités, le contexte peut fournir des informations utiles pour mieux détecter les émotions. Dans cet article, nous explorons systématiquement le rôle du contexte dans la reconnaissance des émotions dans une conversation. Nous utilisons un modèle naïf bayésien pour montrer que le fait de déduire l'humeur de la conversation avant de classifier des énoncés individuels permet d'améliorer les performances. De plus, nous constatons que l'utilisation du contexte lors de l'entraînement du modèle réduit considérablement les performances. Notre approche présente l'avantage supplémentaire que ses performances rivalisent avec un modèle LSTM de base tout en nécessitant moins de ressources.", 'pt': 'Com o texto sem informações valiosas disponíveis em outras modalidades, o contexto pode fornecer informações úteis para detectar melhor as emoções. Neste artigo, fazemos uma exploração sistemática do papel do contexto no reconhecimento da emoção em uma conversa. Usamos um modelo Naive Bayes para mostrar que inferir o humor da conversa antes de classificar os enunciados individuais leva a um melhor desempenho. Além disso, descobrimos que usar contexto enquanto treinamos o modelo diminui significativamente o desempenho. Nossa abordagem tem o benefício adicional de que seu desempenho rivaliza com um modelo LSTM básico, exigindo menos recursos.', 'ar': 'مع افتقار النص إلى المعلومات القيمة المتوفرة في الأساليب الأخرى ، قد يوفر السياق معلومات مفيدة لاكتشاف المشاعر بشكل أفضل. في هذه الورقة ، نقوم باستكشاف منهجي لدور السياق في التعرف على المشاعر في المحادثة. نستخدم نموذج Naive Bayes لإظهار أن استنتاج الحالة المزاجية للمحادثة قبل تصنيف الكلام الفردي يؤدي إلى أداء أفضل. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، وجدنا أن استخدام السياق أثناء تدريب النموذج يقلل بشكل كبير من الأداء. يتمتع نهجنا بفائدة إضافية تتمثل في منافسة أدائه لنموذج LSTM الأساسي بينما يتطلب موارد أقل.', 'es': 'Dado que el texto carece de información valiosa disponible en otras modalidades, el contexto puede proporcionar información útil para detectar mejor las emociones. En este artículo, hacemos una exploración sistemática del papel del contexto en el reconocimiento de las emociones en una conversación. Utilizamos un modelo de Naive Bayes para demostrar que inferir el estado de ánimo de la conversación antes de clasificar los enunciados individuales conduce a un mejor rendimiento. Además, descubrimos que usar el contexto mientras se entrena el modelo reduce significativamente el rendimiento. Nuestro enfoque tiene el beneficio adicional de que su rendimiento compite con un modelo LSTM básico y, al mismo tiempo, requiere menos recursos.', 'ja': '他の方法で利用可能な貴重な情報が不足しているテキストでは、文脈は感情をよりよく検出するための有用な情報を提供し得る。本稿では、会話における感情を認識する上での文脈の役割について体系的に探求する。私たちは、ナイーブベイズモデルを使用して、個々の発話を分類する前に会話の気分を推測することがより良いパフォーマンスにつながることを示します。さらに、モデルのトレーニング中にコンテキストを使用すると、パフォーマンスが著しく低下することがわかります。当社のアプローチには、より少ないリソースを必要としながら、ベースラインLSTMモデルに匹敵するパフォーマンスを実現するベネフィットが追加されています。', 'zh': '文本乏他文,上下文信有用检。 本文者,语境识情之用也。 吾以素贝叶斯验之,推其情于单言之前。 此外,见练模用上下文会著降性能。 吾法有额外之美,其性与基线LSTM形相埒,兼须更少之资。', 'hi': 'अन्य तौर-तरीकों में मूल्यवान जानकारी की कमी वाले पाठ के साथ, संदर्भ भावनाओं का बेहतर पता लगाने के लिए उपयोगी जानकारी प्रदान कर सकता है। इस पेपर में, हम एक बातचीत में भावनाओं को पहचानने में संदर्भ की भूमिका की एक व्यवस्थित खोज करते हैं। हम यह दिखाने के लिए एक भोले बेयस मॉडल का उपयोग करते हैं कि व्यक्तिगत कथनों को वर्गीकृत करने से पहले बातचीत के मूड का अनुमान लगाने से बेहतर प्रदर्शन होता है। इसके अतिरिक्त, हम पाते हैं कि मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करते समय संदर्भ का उपयोग करने से प्रदर्शन काफी कम हो जाता है। हमारे दृष्टिकोण में अतिरिक्त लाभ-फिट है कि इसका प्रदर्शन कम संसाधनों की आवश्यकता के दौरान एक बेसलाइन एलएसटीएम मॉडल को प्रतिद्वंद्वी बनाता है।', 'ru': 'Поскольку в тексте отсутствует ценная информация, доступная в других формах, контекст может предоставить полезную информацию для лучшего обнаружения эмоций. В данной работе мы проводим систематическое исследование роли контекста в распознавании эмоций в разговоре. Мы используем наивную модель Байеса, чтобы показать, что вывод настроения разговора перед классификацией отдельных высказываний приводит к лучшей производительности. Кроме того, мы обнаруживаем, что использование контекста при обучении модели значительно снижает производительность. Наш подход имеет дополнительное преимущество, что его производительность конкурирует с базовой моделью LSTM, в то же время требуя меньше ресурсов.', 'ga': 'Ós rud é go bhfuil easpa eolais luachmhar ar fáil i rialacha mionsonraithe eile sa téacs, féadfaidh comhthéacs faisnéis úsáideach a sholáthar chun mothúcháin a bhrath ar bhealach níos fearr. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid iniúchadh córasach ar ról an chomhthéacs maidir le mothúcháin a aithint i gcomhrá. Bainimid úsáid as samhail Naive Bayes chun a thaispeáint go bhfuil feidhmíocht níos fearr mar thoradh ar ghiúmar an chomhrá a bhaint amach sula rangaítear cainteanna aonair. Ina theannta sin, feicimid go laghdaítear feidhmíocht go suntasach trí úsáid a bhaint as comhthéacs agus an tsamhail á oiliúint. Tá an buntáiste breise ag ár gcur chuige go bhfuil a fheidhmíocht in iomaíocht le samhail bonnlíne LSTM agus go dteastaíonn níos lú acmhainní de ag an am céanna.', 'ka': 'ტექსტის შესაძლებელია მნიშვნელოვანი ინფორმაცია, რომელიც სხვა მოდულებში გამოიყენებელია, კონტექსტი შეიძლება უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი ინფორმაცია იყო ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ კონტექსტურის პროლის სისტემატიკური განსხვავება ვოციონების განსხვავებაში. ჩვენ ვიყენებთ Naive Bayes მოდელის მონაცემი, რომ საუბარის მონაცემის მონაცემის შემდეგ კლასიფიკაცია ინდიველური სიტყვები უკეთესი გამოყენება. დამატებით, ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ კონტექსტის გამოყენება, როდესაც მოდელის მოწყენება მნიშვნელოვანად გამოკლება. ჩვენი პროგორმა აქვს დამატებული ბეჭდვის, რომელსაც მისი პროგორმაცია მუშაობა LSTM მოდელს, როცა მისი პროგორმაცია უფრო მცირე რესურსების მო', 'hu': 'Mivel a szöveg nem rendelkezik értékes információkkal, amelyek más módszerekben rendelkezésre állnak, a kontextus hasznos információkat nyújthat az érzelmek jobb felismeréséhez. Ebben a tanulmányban rendszeresen feltárjuk a kontextus szerepét az érzelmek felismerésében egy beszélgetésben. Naive Bayes modellt használunk annak megmutatására, hogy a beszélgetés hangulatának következtetése az egyes kijelentések osztályozása előtt jobb teljesítményt eredményez. Ezenkívül úgy találjuk, hogy a modell edzése közbeni kontextus használata jelentősen csökkenti a teljesítményt. Megközelítésünknek az a további előnye van, hogy teljesítménye versenyez az alapvető LSTM modellekkel, miközben kevesebb erőforrást igényel.', 'it': "Con testo privo di informazioni preziose disponibili in altre modalità, il contesto può fornire informazioni utili per rilevare meglio le emozioni. In questo articolo, facciamo un'esplorazione sistematica del ruolo del contesto nel riconoscere l'emozione in una conversazione. Usiamo un modello Naive Bayes per dimostrare che dedurre lo stato d'animo della conversazione prima di classificare le singole espressioni porta a migliori prestazioni. Inoltre, l'utilizzo del contesto durante l'addestramento del modello riduce significativamente le prestazioni. Il nostro approccio ha l'ulteriore vantaggio che le sue prestazioni rivaleggiano con un modello LSTM di base, pur richiedendo meno risorse.", 'el': 'Με κείμενο που λείπει πολύτιμες πληροφορίες διαθέσιμες σε άλλες μεθόδους, το πλαίσιο μπορεί να παρέχει χρήσιμες πληροφορίες για την καλύτερη ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, κάνουμε μια συστηματική διερεύνηση του ρόλου του πλαισίου στην αναγνώριση συναισθημάτων σε μια συζήτηση. Χρησιμοποιούμε ένα μοντέλο Naive Bayes για να δείξουμε ότι το συμπέρασμα της διάθεσης της συνομιλίας πριν από την ταξινόμηση των μεμονωμένων προφορών οδηγεί σε καλύτερη απόδοση. Επιπλέον, διαπιστώνουμε ότι η χρήση περιβάλλοντος κατά την εκπαίδευση του μοντέλου μειώνει σημαντικά την απόδοση. Η προσέγγισή μας έχει το πρόσθετο πλεονέκτημα ότι η απόδοσή της ανταγωνίζεται ένα βασικό μοντέλο ενώ απαιτεί λιγότερους πόρους.', 'lt': 'Kadangi tekstas neturi vertingos informacijos, kuri būtų prieinama kitomis sąlygomis, kontekstas gali suteikti naudingą informaciją, kad būtų galima geriau nustatyti emocijas. In this paper, we do a systematic exploration of the role of context in recognizing emotion in a conversation.  Naudojame Naive Bayes model į, kad parodytume, kad nustačius pokalbio nuotaiką prieš klasifikuojant atskiras išraiškas, bus pasiekta geresnių rezultatų. Be to, mes matome, kad naudojant kontekstą, mokant model į, gerokai sumažėja veiklos rezultatai. Mūsų požiūris turi papildomą naudą, kad jo veiklos rezultatai yra lygiaverčiai baziniam LSTM modeliui ir reikalauja mažiau išteklių.', 'kk': 'Басқа әдістерде мәтін жоқ мәліметі бар болса, контекст емоцияларды жақсы анықтау үшін пайдалы мәлімет бере алады. Бұл қағазда, біз сөйлесуде емоцияларды тану үшін контекстің рөлін жүйелік зерттеуді жасаймыз. Біз Naive Bayes үлгісін қолданамыз, бөлікті сөйлемелерді бағалау алдында, сөйлемелердің көңіл күйін жақсы жұмыс істеу үшін. Қосымша, үлгісін көмектесу кезінде контексті қолдану үшін әрекетті көмектеседі. Біздің тәсілімізде оның істеу үшін LSTM үлгісінің негізгі үлгісін бақылау үшін қосымша қосымша құқықтары бар.', 'mk': 'Со недостатокот на вредни информации достапни во други модели, контекстот може да обезбеди корисни информации за подобро детектирање на емоциите. Во овој весник, правиме систематично истражување на улогата на контекстот во препознавањето на емоциите во разговорот. Користиме модел на Најв Бејс за да покажеме дека заклучувањето на расположението на разговорот пред класификувањето на индивидуалните изрази води до подобра изведба. Покрај тоа, откриваме дека користењето на контекст додека се тренира моделот значително ја намалува перформансата. Нашиот пристап има дополнителна корист што неговата изведба се противи на основниот модел на ЛСТМ, истовремено барајќи помалку ресурси.', 'ml': 'മറ്റു രീതികളില്\u200d വിലപില്ലാത്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കാവുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d, വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടു ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സിസ്റ്റീമിക്ക് പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു സംസാരത്തില്\u200d വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതില വ്യക്തിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനു മുമ്പ് സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരത്തിന്റെ മോഡിയെ പ്രയോഗിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനാണ് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ന Additionally, we find that using context while train-ing the model significantly decreases performance.  നമ്മുടെ വഴിയില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രകടനം ഉണ്ട്. അതിന്റെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d കുറച്ച് വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ആവശ്യപ്പെ', 'no': 'Med tekst som manglar verdilege informasjon tilgjengeleg i andre måtar kan konteksten gi nyttig informasjon for å finna følelser. I denne papiren gjer vi eit systematisk utforsk av rollen på kontekst i å kjenne følelser i eit samtale. Vi bruker ein Naive Bayes-modell for å vise at å få opp måte på samtalen før å klassera individuelle uttrykk fører til bedre uttrykk. I tillegg finn vi at bruk av kontekst medan trening av modellen betydelig reduserer utviklinga. Tilnærminga vårt har den tilleggsinnstillingane som utviklinga sin rivalar ein baseline LSTM-modell mens det krev mindre ressursar.', 'mt': 'Billi t-test ma jkollux informazzjoni siewja disponibbli f’modalitajiet oħra, il-kuntest jista’ jipprovdi informazzjoni utli biex jinstabu emozzjonijiet aħjar. F’dan id-dokument, nagħmlu esplorazzjoni sistematika tar-rwol tal-kuntest fir-rikonoxximent tal-emozzjoni fi konverżjoni. We use a Naive Bayes model to show that inferring the mood of the conversation before classifying individual utterances leads to better performance.  Barra minn hekk, isibu li l-użu tal-kuntest waqt it-taħriġ tal-mudell inaqqas b’mod sinifikanti l-prestazzjoni. L-approċċ tagħna għandu l-benefiċċju addizzjonali li l-prestazzjoni tiegħu tikkorrispondi ma’ mudell LSTM ta’ linja bażi filwaqt li jeħtieġ inqas riżorsi.', 'mn': 'Өөр арга замын тулд үнэ цэнэтэй мэдээлэл алдагдахад, сэтгэл хөдлөлийг илүү ойлгохын тулд хэрэгтэй мэдээлэл хангаж болно. Энэ цаасан дээр бид сэтгэл хөдлөлийг ярилцлаганд хүлээн зөвшөөрөх нөлөөний систематикийн судалгааг хийдэг. Бид Naive Bayes загварын загварыг ашиглаж хэлэлцээний сэтгэл санааг илүү сайхан үйлдвэрлэлд хүргэхээс өмнө илүү сайхан хэлэлцээний сэтгэл санааг багасгаж байна. Мөн бид загварыг дасгал хөдөлгөөн хийх үед нөхцөл байдлыг ашиглаж байгааг олж мэднэ. Бидний арга хэмжээний үйлдвэрлэл нь бага нөөц боломж хэрэгтэй үед LSTM загвартай өрсөлдөг нэмэлт ашигтай.', 'pl': 'Z tekstem brakującym cennych informacji dostępnych w innych sposobach, kontekst może dostarczyć przydatnych informacji, aby lepiej wykryć emocje. W artykule dokonujemy systematycznej analizy roli kontekstu w rozpoznawaniu emocji w rozmowie. Wykorzystujemy model Naive Bayesa, aby pokazać, że wnioskowanie nastroju rozmowy przed klasyfikacją poszczególnych wypowiedzi prowadzi do lepszej wydajności. Dodatkowo zauważamy, że wykorzystanie kontekstu podczas treningu modelu znacznie zmniejsza wydajność. Nasze podejście ma dodatkową zaletę, że jego wydajność konkuruje z podstawowym modelem LSTM, jednocześnie wymaga mniejszej ilości zasobów.', 'ro': 'Cu textul lipsit de informații valoroase disponibile în alte modalități, contextul poate oferi informații utile pentru a detecta mai bine emoțiile. În această lucrare, facem o explorare sistematică a rolului contextului în recunoașterea emoțiilor într-o conversație. Folosim un model Naive Bayes pentru a arăta că deducerea stării de spirit a conversației înainte de clasificarea pronunțărilor individuale duce la o performanță mai bună. În plus, constatăm că utilizarea contextului în timpul antrenamentului modelului scade semnificativ performanța. Abordarea noastră are avantajul suplimentar că performanța sa rivalizează cu un model LSTM de bază, necesitând în același timp mai puține resurse.', 'sr': 'S tekstom koji nedostaje vrijedne informacije koje su dostupne u drugim modalima, kontekst može pružiti korisne informacije za bolje otkrivanje emocija. U ovom papiru radimo sistematsko istraživanje uloge konteksta u priznanju emocija u razgovoru. Koristimo model Naive Bayes da pokažemo da uvlaèenje raspoloženja razgovora pre klasifikacije individualnih govora vodi do boljih izvora. Osim toga, našli smo da korištenje konteksta dok treniranje modela značajno smanjuje učinkovitost. Naš pristup ima dodatnu dobrotvornu priliku da njegova izvodnja suprotstavlja osnovni LSTM model dok zahteva manje resursa.', 'so': 'Hadii ay ku jirto macluumaad qiimaan ah oo ku habboon noocyo kale oo faa’iido ah, waxaa laga yaabaa in laga helo macluumaad faa’iido leh si aad u hesho fikrada. Warqadan, waxaynu sameynaa baaritaan si systemic ah oo ku saabsan daboolka, si aan u aqoonsanno fikrada hadalka. We use a Naive Bayes model to show that inferring the mood of the conversation before classifying individual utterances leads to better performance.  Sidoo kale waxaynu helnaa in isticmaalka mukhtarka marka tababarka waxbarashadu uu si weyn u hoosaysiiyo tababarka. Dhaqdhaqaalahayaga waxaa ku haboon waxyaabaha dheer oo ay sameyn karto samool LSTM oo hoose ah, iyadoo ay u baahan tahay maal yar.', 'sv': 'Med text som saknar värdefull information tillgänglig på andra sätt kan sammanhang ge användbar information för att bättre upptäcka känslor. I denna uppsats gör vi en systematisk utforskning av kontextets roll i att känna igen känslor i ett samtal. Vi använder en Naive Bayes modell för att visa att dra slutsatsen av stämningen i konversationen innan klassificering av enskilda yttranden leder till bättre prestanda. Dessutom ser vi att användningen av kontext under träning av modellen minskar prestandan avsevärt. Vårt tillvägagångssätt har den extra fördelen att dess prestanda konkurrerar med en basmodell LSTM samtidigt som det kräver färre resurser.', 'si': 'විශේෂ තොරතුරු අවශ්\u200dය තොරතුරු අවශ්\u200dය විදිහට වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් පුළුවන් තොරතුරු සඳහා, සම්බන්ධය හ මේ පත්තරේ අපි කතාවක් වලට හැඟීමක් අඳුරගන්න සාමාන්\u200dය පරීක්ෂණයක් කරනවා. අපි නයිව් බේස් මොඩේල් එකක් භාවිතා කරනවා පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට කතා කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට කතා කරනවා කියලා. තවත්, අපි හොයාගන්නවා ඒක සංවේදනය පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරමාණය විදිහට ප්\u200dරමාණය ව අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය තියෙන්නේ අඩුම ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් තියෙන්නේ ඒකේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය පරීක්ෂණයක් LSTM මොඩේලයක් පරීක්ෂණය ක', 'ta': 'வேறு வகைகளில் மதிப்புள்ள தகவல் பயனுள்ள பயனுள்ள தகவல் இல்லாத உரையின் கொண்டு, சூழல் உணர்வுகளை சிறந்த கண்டறிதலுக்கு பயனு In this paper, we do a systematic exploration of the role of context in recognizing emotion in a conversation.  நாம் ஒரு நேவ் பேய் மாதிரி பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் அந்த பேச்சை வகைப்படுத்துவதற்கு முன்னால் பேச்சின் மனதை பாதிக்கும் என்ற கூடுதலாக, பயிற்சி மாதிரி முறைமையை குறைக்கும் போது நாம் இதை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். எங்கள் முறையில் கூடுதல் பென் பொருத்தம் உள்ளது அதன் செயல்பாடு LSTM மாதிரியில் குறைந்த வளங்கள் தேவைப்படும் போது ஒரு', 'ur': 'اور دوسری موڈلیٹوں میں مزید معلومات کے لائق نہیں ہوتے، کنٹنسٹ بہتر احساسات شناسایی کے لئے فائدہ معلومات دے سکتا ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک صحبت میں احساسات کی پہچان کرنے کے لئے سیستماتیک تحقیق کرتے ہیں. ہم ایک Naive Bayes موڈل کو استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ اس سے پہلے صحبت کی مہمانی کو دکھانے کے لئے ایک شخصی بات کا کلاس کرنا بہتر عمل کی طرف لے جاتا ہے۔ اور ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ موڈل کو ٹرین کرنے کے موقعیت کے مطابق کانٹ کرتا ہے۔ ہماری دستور میں اضافہ فائدہ ہے کہ اس کی عملکرد کم منبع کی ضرورت ہے اس کی بنیس لین LSTM موڈل سے مقابلہ کرتی ہے.', 'ms': 'Dengan teks yang kurang maklumat berharga yang boleh disediakan dalam modaliti lain, konteks boleh menyediakan maklumat berguna untuk mengesan emosi lebih baik. Dalam kertas ini, kita melakukan eksplorasi sistemik peran konteks dalam mengenali emosi dalam perbualan. Kami menggunakan model Naive Bayes untuk menunjukkan bahawa menyimpulkan mood perbualan sebelum mengklasifikasikan ucapan individu membawa kepada prestasi yang lebih baik. Selain itu, kami mendapati bahawa menggunakan konteks semasa melatih model menurunkan prestasi yang signifikan. pendekatan kita mempunyai keuntungan tambahan bahawa prestasinya bertentangan dengan model LSTM asas sementara memerlukan kurang sumber.', 'uz': "@ info Bu qogʻozda, biz ma'lumotga hissiyotni aniqlashni tasavvur qilamiz. Biz Naive Bayes modelidan foydalanamiz, har bir so'zlarni nashfiy qilishdan oldin suhbatning hayotini ko'rsatish mumkin. Bu gapirarni taqdim qilishdan oldin, yaxshi bajarishga ega bo'ladi. Additionally, we find that using context while train-ing the model significantly decreases performance.  Bizning fikrimimiz qo'shimcha balandligi, uning natijasi asosiy LSTM modelini rivojlanadi, va maktablarni kamaytirish kerak.", 'vi': 'Với văn bản thiếu thông tin đáng giá có thể có trong các phương thức khác, ngữ cảnh có thể cung cấp thông tin hữu ích để phát hiện cảm xúc tốt hơn. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi có một cuộc thám hiểm hệ thống về vai trò nhận biết cảm xúc trong cuộc đối thoại. Chúng tôi sử dụng mô hình Naive Bayes để cho thấy rằng ngụ ý của cuộc nói chuyện trước khi phân loại giọng cá nhân dẫn tới hiệu quả tốt hơn. Thêm nữa, chúng tôi thấy sử dụng ngữ cảnh trong khi huấn luyện mô hình sẽ giảm hiệu suất. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi có sự bổ sung sung sung sung sức mà năng lượng của nó đối địch với mô hình LSD cơ bản trong khi cần ít nguồn lực.', 'bg': 'Тъй като текстът липсва ценна информация, достъпна в други модификации, контекстът може да предостави полезна информация за по-добро откриване на емоциите. В настоящата статия правим систематично проучване на ролята на контекста при разпознаването на емоцията в разговор. Използваме модел на Наивен Байс, за да покажем, че извеждането на настроението на разговора преди класифицирането на отделните изказвания води до по-добро представяне. Освен това откриваме, че използването на контекст при обучението на модела значително намалява производителността. Нашият подход има допълнителното предимство, че представянето му съперничи на базовия модел, като същевременно изисква по-малко ресурси.', 'da': 'Tekst mangler værdifulde oplysninger, der er tilgængelige i andre modaliteter, kan kontekst give nyttige oplysninger til bedre at opdage følelser. I denne artikel gør vi en systematisk undersøgelse af kontekstens rolle i genkendelse af følelser i en samtale. Vi bruger en Naive Bayes model til at vise, at udlede stemningen i samtalen før klassificering af individuelle udtalelser fører til bedre ydeevne. Derudover finder vi ud af, at brugen af kontekst under træning af modellen reducerer ydeevnen markant. Vores tilgang har den ekstra fordel, at dens ydeevne konkurrerer med en baseline LSTM model, samtidig med at det kræver færre ressourcer.', 'nl': 'Aangezien tekst ontbreekt aan waardevolle informatie die beschikbaar is in andere modaliteiten, kan context nuttige informatie bieden om emoties beter te detecteren. In dit artikel onderzoeken we systematisch de rol van context bij het herkennen van emotie in een gesprek. We gebruiken een Naive Bayes model om aan te tonen dat het afleiden van de stemming van het gesprek alvorens individuele uitingen te classificeren leidt tot betere prestaties. Daarnaast merken we dat het gebruik van context tijdens het trainen van het model de prestaties aanzienlijk vermindert. Onze aanpak heeft het bijkomende voordeel dat de prestaties concurreren met een basismodel LSTM terwijl er minder middelen nodig zijn.', 'hr': 'S nedostatkom vrijednih informacija koje su dostupne u drugim načinama, kontekst može pružiti korisne informacije za bolje otkrivanje emocija. U ovom papiru radimo sistematsko istraživanje uloge konteksta u priznanju emocija u razgovoru. Koristimo model Naive Bayes kako bi pokazali da uvlačenje raspoloženja razgovora prije klasifikacije individualnih izraza vodi do boljih učinka. Osim toga, nalazimo se da korištenje konteksta dok treniranje modela značajno smanjuje učinkovitost. Naš pristup ima dodatnu dobrotvornu priliku da njegova učinka suprotstavlja osnovni LSTM model dok zahtijeva manje resursa.', 'de': 'Da Text keine wertvollen Informationen enthält, die in anderen Modalitäten verfügbar sind, kann der Kontext nützliche Informationen liefern, um Emotionen besser zu erkennen. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir systematisch die Rolle des Kontexts beim Erkennen von Emotionen in einem Gespräch. Wir verwenden ein Naive Bayes-Modell, um zu zeigen, dass das Ableiten der Stimmung des Gesprächs vor der Klassifizierung einzelner Äußerungen zu einer besseren Leistung führt. Darüber hinaus stellen wir fest, dass die Verwendung von Kontext während des Trainings des Modells die Leistung signifikant verringert. Unser Ansatz hat den zusätzlichen Vorteil, dass seine Leistung mit einem LSTM-Basismodell konkurriert und gleichzeitig weniger Ressourcen benötigt.', 'id': 'Dengan teks yang kurang informasi berharga yang tersedia dalam modalitas lain, konteks dapat memberikan informasi berguna untuk mendeteksi emosi lebih baik. In this paper, we do a systematic exploration of the role of context in recognizing emotion in a conversation.  Kami menggunakan model Naive Bayes untuk menunjukkan bahwa menyimpulkan suasana hati percakapan sebelum mengklasifikasi ucapan individu menyebabkan prestasi yang lebih baik. Selain itu, kami menemukan bahwa menggunakan konteks sementara melatih model secara signifikan mengurangi prestasi. Our approach has the additional bene-fit that its performance rivals a baseline LSTM model while requiring fewer resources.', 'fa': 'با متن کمی از اطلاعات ارزشمند در حالت های دیگر استفاده می\u200cکند، کنترل می\u200cتواند اطلاعات مفید را برای شناسایی احساسات بهتر بدهد. در این کاغذ، ما یک تحقیق سیستماتی از نقش محیط در تشخیص احساسات در یک مکالمه انجام می دهیم. ما از یک مدل Naive Bayes استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا نشان دهیم که قبل از اینکه کلاس\u200cگذاری سخنرانی\u200cهای فردی\u200cها به انجام بهتر رخ دهند، حالت صحبت را تحریک می\u200cکند. اضافه می\u200cکنیم که با استفاده از موقعیت در زمان آموزش مدل عملکرد بسیار کمتر می\u200cشود. دسترسی ما نیکوکاری اضافی دارد که عملکرد آن با یک مدل LSTM بنیادی رقابت می کند در حالی که نیاز به منابع کمتری دارد.', 'tr': 'Başga modlerde ýeterlik mykdarlar üçin metin ýok maglumat bilen, kontekst duýgyny gowy tanymak üçin peýdaly maglumat berer. Bu ýazgyda, duýgyny gürrüňde tanamak üçin kontekstyň rolyny sistematik bir gezek çykýarys. Biz Naive Beýs nusgasyny bir nusgasyny ulanýarys, indiki sözleri klasifikasynda özüniň keýpişligini gowurak etmäne ýok etmäne çevrilýändigini görkezmek üçin. Mundan soňra, nusgasyny ukyp etmek üçin kontekst ullanýarys we nusgasyny azaltýarys. Biziň ýaryşymyz ýene-de ýeterlik gabdalyklarynyň baseline LSTM nusgasyna düşmegi üçin ýeterlik gabdalyklarynyň bar.', 'sw': 'With text lacking valuable information avail-able in other modalities, context may provide useful information to better detect emotions.  Katika karatasi hii, tunafanya uchunguzi wa mfumo wa jukumu la muktadha katika kutambua hisia katika mazungumzo. Tunatumia mtindo wa Naive Bayes kuonyesha kwamba unaathiri mtazamo wa mazungumzo kabla ya kutangaza maneno binafsi yanapelekea utendaji mzuri. Kwa kuongezea, tunagundua kwamba kwa kutumia muktadha wakati mafunzo ya treni inapungua utendaji. Hatua yetu imekuwa na upendeleo mzuri kwamba utendaji wake unapinga mtindo wa LSTM wa msingi wakati unahitaji rasilimali chache.', 'sq': 'Me tekstin e mungesës së informacionit të vlefshëm të disponueshëm në modalitete të tjera, konteksti mund të ofrojë informacion të dobishëm për të zbuluar më mirë emocionet. Në këtë letër, ne bëjmë një eksplorim sistematik të rolit të kontekstit në njohjen e emocioneve në një bisedë. Ne përdorim një model Naive Bayes për të treguar se përfundimi i humorit të bisedës përpara klasifikimit të shprehjeve individuale çon në performancë më të mirë. Përveç kësaj, ne gjejmë se përdorimi i kontekstit ndërsa trajnimi i modelit zvogëlon ndjeshëm performancën. Our approach has the additional bene-fit that its performance rivals a baseline LSTM model while requiring fewer resources.', 'ko': '텍스트가 다른 모델에서 사용할 수 있는 가치 있는 정보가 부족하기 때문에 상하문은 감정을 더욱 잘 감지할 수 있는 유용한 정보를 제공할 수 있다.이 논문에서 우리는 언어 환경이 회화에서 감정을 식별하는 작용을 체계적으로 연구했다.소박한 대화 모델을 분류하기 전에 우리는 소박한 대화 모델을 더욱 잘 추측할 수 있다.그 밖에 훈련 모형을 사용할 때 상하문을 사용하면 성능이 현저히 떨어지는 것을 발견했다.우리의 방법은 또 하나의 추가 장점이 있다. 즉, 그것의 성능은 베이스라인 LSTM 모델과 비견할 수 있을 뿐만 아니라, 더욱 적은 자원을 필요로 한다.', 'hy': 'Քանի որ տեքստին չկա արժեքավոր տեղեկատվություն, որը կարելի է օգտագործել այլ միջոցներում, կոնտեքստը կարող է օգտակար տեղեկատվություն տալ զգացմունքների ավելի լավ հայտնաբերելու համար: In this paper, we do a systematic exploration of the role of context in recognizing emotion in a conversation.  Մենք օգտագործում ենք Նայվ Բեյզ մոդելը ցույց տալու համար, որ խոսակցության տրամադրության եզրակացությունը մինչև անհատական արտահայտությունների դասավորումը հանգեցնում է ավելի լավ ներկայացման: Ավելին, մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ օգտագործելով կոնտեքստը մոդելի ուսուցման ժամանակ նշանակալի նվազեցնում է արդյունքը: Մեր մոտեցումը ունի ավելին օգուտ, որ դրա արտադրողականությունը հակառակվում է LSMT-ի հիմնական մոդելի հետ, չնայած ավելի քիչ ռեսուրսներ պահանջելու:', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ መረጃ በመጠቀም በሌላ ዓይነት መጠቀም የሚጠቅመው የጽሑፍ መረጃ በመጠቀም፣ የሥርዓት መረጃ ለመጠቀም የሚጠቅመው እውቀትን ለማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ስብሰባውን በማወቅ ስህተት እናውቃለን፡፡ የነዌብ ባይስ ሞዴል እናስባለን የንግግር ቃላትን ከመለፍ በፊት የንግግርን አካሄድን እንዲያሳየው እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የሞዴል ማሳየት ሲሞከሩ የድምፅ ውጤት ሲያሳድስ እናገኛለን፡፡ የግንኙነታችን አካባቢ ጉዳይ አለበት፤ የድምፅ አካባቢ ሀብት ጥቂት ሲፈልግ የLSTM ሞዴል ነው፡፡', 'af': "Met teks ontbreek waardelik inligting wat in ander modaliteite beskikbaar is, kan konteks nuttige inligting verskaf om beter emosies te beskik. In hierdie papier doen ons 'n sistematiese uitsoek van die rol van konteks in die herken van emosie in 'n gesprek. Ons gebruik 'n Naive Bayes model om te wys dat die mood van die gesprek voordat individuele uitspraak klassifiseer, lei na beter uitspraak. In addition, we find that using context while train-ing the model significantly reduces performance. Ons toegang het die addisionele benepas wat sy prestasie teenstel 'n baselyn LSTM model terwyl minder hulpbronne benodig.", 'bn': 'অন্যান্য উপাদানে মূল্যবান তথ্য ব্যবহারের ক্ষেত্রে টেক্সটের অভাব রয়েছে, প্রেক্ষাপট অনুভূতি সনাক্ত করতে পারে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি ব্যবস্থায়িক গবেষণা করছি এক আলোচনায় অনুভূতিকে স্বীকার করার ভূমিকা। আমরা একটি নেভ বেয়েস মডেল ব্যবহার করি যেন দেখাতে পারি যে ব্যক্তিগত বক্তব্য বিভাষনের আগে কথোপকথনে আক্রান্ত করে তার মুখমন্ত্রণা এছাড়াও, আমরা এটা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে পরিসংখ্যান ব্যবহার করে ট্রেনিং মডেলের প্রদর্শনীর মাধ্যমে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কর্ আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা আরো বেনের প্রতিযোগিতা রয়েছে যে তার প্রদর্শনীর প্রতিযোগিতা এলস্টিএম মডেলের প্রতিরোধ করছে আর তাদ', 'az': 'Digər modüllərdə faydalanılabilir qiymətli məlumat yoxdur, məlumat daha yaxşı hissləri keşfetmək üçün faydalanır. Bu kağızda, bir söhbət içində duyguları tanıtmaq üçün sistematik məlumatın rolünü keşfetmək istəyirik. Biz Naive Bayes modelini istifadə edirik ki, individual sözləri dəyişdirməkdən əvvəl müzakirə etmək üçün daha xeyirli performans olar. Əksinə, modeli təhsil etmək üçün müxtəlif məlumatları istifadə edirik. Bizim yaxınlığımız daha az kaynaqlar lazım olduğu halda, işlətməsi LSTM modeli ilə istifadə edir.', 'bs': 'S tekstom koji nedostaje vrijedne informacije koje su dostupne u drugim modalima, kontekst može pružiti korisne informacije za bolje otkrivanje emocija. U ovom papiru radimo sistematsko istraživanje uloge konteksta u priznanju emocija u razgovoru. Koristimo model Naive Bayes kako bi pokazali da uvlačivanje raspoloženja razgovora prije klasifikacije individualnih izraza vodi do boljih izvora. Osim toga, našli smo da koristeći kontekst dok treniramo model značajno smanjuje učinkovitost. Naš pristup ima dodatnu dobrotvornu priliku da njegova izvodnja suprotstavlja osnovni LSTM model dok zahtijeva manje resursa.', 'fi': 'Koska tekstistä puuttuu arvokasta tietoa muissa muodoissa, konteksti voi tarjota hyödyllistä tietoa tunteiden havaitsemiseksi paremmin. Tässä artikkelissa tutkimme systemaattisesti kontekstin roolia tunteiden tunnistamisessa keskustelussa. Käytämme Naive Bayesin mallia osoittaaksemme, että keskustelun mielialan päättely ennen yksittäisten sanontojen luokittelua johtaa parempaan suorituskykyyn. Lisäksi havaitsemme, että kontekstin käyttäminen mallin harjoittelun aikana vähentää suorituskykyä merkittävästi. Lähestymistapamme hyötyy siitä, että sen suorituskyky kilpailee perusmallin LSTM-mallin kanssa, mutta vaatii vähemmän resursseja.', 'et': 'Kuna tekstist puudub väärtuslik teave, mida saab kasutada muude meetodite puhul, võib kontekst anda kasulikku teavet emotsioonide paremaks tuvastamiseks. Käesolevas töös uurime süstemaatiliselt konteksti rolli emotsioonide äratundmisel vestluses. Me kasutame Naive Bayesi mudelit, et näidata, et vestluse meeleolu järeldamine enne individuaalsete sõnade klassifitseerimist toob kaasa parema tulemuse. Lisaks leiame, et konteksti kasutamine mudeli treenimisel vähendab oluliselt jõudlust. Meie lähenemisviisil on täiendav eelis, et selle tulemuslikkus konkureerib algse LSTM mudeliga, nõudes samas vähem ressursse.', 'cs': 'Vzhledem k tomu, že text postrádá cenné informace dostupné v jiných modalitách, může kontext poskytnout užitečné informace pro lepší detekci emocí. V tomto článku se systematicky zabýváme rolí kontextu při rozpoznávání emocí v konverzaci. Používáme Naive Bayes model, abychom ukázali, že odvození nálady konverzace před klasifikací jednotlivých výroků vede k lepšímu výkonu. Navíc zjišťujeme, že použití kontextu při trénování modelu výrazně snižuje výkon. Náš přístup má další výhodu, že jeho výkon konkuruje základnímu LSTM modelu a zároveň vyžaduje méně zdrojů.', 'ca': 'Amb que el text no té informació valiosa disponible en altres modalitats, el context pot proporcionar informació útil per detectar millor les emocions. In this paper, we do a systematic exploration of the role of context in recognizing emotion in a conversation.  We use a Naive Bayes model to show that inferring the mood of the conversation before classifying individual utterances leads to better performance.  Additionally, we find that using context while train-ing the model significantly decreases performance.  Our approach has the additional bene-fit that its performance rivals a baseline LSTM model while requiring fewer resources.', 'jv': 'gambar Nang mapang iki, awak dhéwé ngerasakno sistematik ing nêmên ning sampeyan karo kesalahan. Awak dhéwé éntuk model Nave bayes nggawe bener iki bakal kelas kuwi nggawe ngubah kejahatan ning acara sing luwih apik dhéwé nggawe ngubah perusahaan bakal terus nggawe gerakan sing luwih apik. Mungkin, awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono kontèks seneng nggawe modèl kuwi nggawe barang pengguna kuwi tindakan. Ndheke sampeyan tambah bener-sampeyan nganggo kesempatan wong njaluk sing ngomong model sing paling nggawe KST, sane mebale kang angka sing wis ranjut.', 'he': 'עם טקסט חסר מידע ערך שיהיה זמין במונדיות אחרות, הקשר יכול לספק מידע שימושי כדי לגלות יותר רגשות. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו עושים חקירה מערכתית של תפקיד הקשר בזהות רגשות בשיחה. אנו משתמשים בדוגמא של נייב בייס כדי להראות כי המצאת מצב הרוח של השיחה לפני להקליף מילים בודדים מובילה להופעה טובה יותר. בנוסף, אנו מוצאים שהשימוש בקשר בזמן האימון של המודל מפחיד באופן משמעותי את ההופעה. הגישה שלנו יש תועלת נוספת שהביצועים שלה מתחרים מודל LSTM בסיסי בזמן שדורש פחות משאבים.', 'sk': 'Ker besedilo nima dragocenih informacij, ki so na voljo v drugih načinih, lahko kontekst zagotovi koristne informacije za boljše zaznavanje čustev. V prispevku sistematično raziskujemo vlogo konteksta pri prepoznavanju čustev v pogovoru. Z uporabo Naive Bayesovega modela pokažemo, da sklepanje razpoloženja pogovora pred klasifikacijo posameznih izgovorov vodi k boljši uspešnosti. Poleg tega ugotavljamo, da uporaba konteksta med treningom modela bistveno zmanjšuje zmogljivost. Naš pristop ima dodatno korist, da njegova uspešnost tekmuje z osnovnim modelom LSTM, medtem ko zahteva manj virov.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis In a cikin wannan takardan, Munã sami wani misalin na'ura a cikin muhimmada a gane hisia a cikin mazaɓa. Tuna amfani da wani misali na Naive Bayes dõmin Mu nuna cewa yana zartar da muhimmin mazaɓa a gabãnin a rarrabe magana guda, yana iya ƙaranci ga mazaɓa. Ina ƙara, za mu sãmu, idan ana yi amfani da mazaɓa, a lokacin da za'a ƙara muhimmin gyarani. Mataimakinmu yana da amfani mai ƙaranci cẽwa da aikin sa yana kamera da misalin LSSM a ƙarƙashin kwamfyuta, alhãli kuwa yana da mataimaki kaɗan.", 'bo': 'ཡི་གེ་ལ་རིན་ཐང་མེད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་བྱས་པར་སྤྱོད་རུང་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཞན་པས་ཁོང་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལ་ཕན་ཐོགས་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་སྐྱེ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འུ་ཚོས་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་Naive Bayes་གི་མ་གཟུགས་རིས་སྤྱད་ནས་གཏམ་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ནང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྒྲིག་མིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག འོན་ཀྱང་། མ་དབྱིབས་འདིར་སྟོན་པའི་ཁོར་ཡུག་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པ་དེ་ལས་རྐྱེན་སྟངས་ཆེས་ཉུང་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ལ་ཁྱད་པར་མཐའ་འཁོར་སྐྱོང་བ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'CoAStaL at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Affect Classification in Dialogue using Attentive BiLSTMs', 'es': 'CoAStal en SemEval-2019 Tarea 3: Clasificación de los efectos en el diálogo mediante BILSTM atentos', 'ar': 'CoAStaL في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: التأثير على التصنيف في الحوار باستخدام BiLSTMs اليقظة', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のCoAStaLタスク3 ：注意深いBiLSTMを使用した対話における影響分類', 'zh': 'CoAStaL在SemEval-2019务3:用细心者BiLSTMs言类也', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 3 पर CoAStaL: चौकस BiLSTMs का उपयोग करके संवाद में वर्गीकरण को प्रभावित करें', 'fr': "CoAStal à SemEval-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Affecter la classification dans le dialogue à l'aide de BILSTMS", 'ru': 'CoAStaL на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Влияние на классификацию в диалоге с использованием Внимательных BiLSTM', 'pt': 'CoAStaL no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Afetar a Classificação no Diálogo usando BiLSTMs Atenciosos', 'ga': 'CÓSTAIL ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Tionchar ar Aicmiú san Idirphlé ag úsáid BiLSTM Aireach', 'hu': 'CoAStaL a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: A besorolás befolyásolása a párbeszédben figyelmes BiLSTMs segítségével', 'ka': 'CoAStaL SemEval-2019 სამუშაო დავალება 3: დიალოგიში შესაძლებელი კლასიფიკაცია გამოყენებული ატენტიგური BiLSTMs', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Κατάταξη Επιπτώσεων στον Διάλογο με τη χρήση Προσεκτικών ΔιLSTMs', 'it': 'CoAStaL al SemEval-2019 Task 3: Affetta la classificazione nel dialogo utilizzando BiLSTMs attenti', 'kk': 'CoAStaL 3- тапсырмасында: Қатысушы BiLSTMs қолданатын диалогтың классификациясы', 'lt': 'CoAStaL at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Affect Classification in Dialogue using Attentive BiLSTMs', 'mk': 'CoAStaL на SemEval-2019 задача 3: Влијание на класификацијата во дијалогот користејќи Attentive BiLSTMs', 'mn': 'CoAStaL at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Effect Classification in Dialog using Attentive BiLSTMs', 'ms': 'CoAStaL pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Pengklasifikasi Affect dalam Dialog menggunakan BiLSTM Attentive', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3: അക്ഷരസഞ്ചരിക്കുന്ന ബില്\u200dസ്റ്റിമിസ് ഉപയോഗിച്ചു് ഡയലോഗില്\u200d ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d പ്രാധാന്യം ത', 'mt': 'CoAStaL f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 3: Klassifikazzjoni tal-Affetti fid-Djalogu bl-użu ta’ BiLSTMs Attentivi', 'pl': 'CoAStaL w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Klasyfikacja efektów w dialogu przy użyciu uważnych BiLSTMów', 'no': 'CoAStaL ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3: Effekt klassifikasjon i dialogvindauget ved bruk av merkelige BiLSTMs', 'ro': 'CoAStaL la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Clasificarea afectelor în dialog folosind BiLSTMs atentive', 'sr': 'CoAStaL na semiEval-2019 Task 3: Klasifikacija posledica u dijalogu koristeći pozorne BiLSTMs', 'si': 'CoAStaL at semeval-2019 Job 3: Attensive BiLSTMs', 'so': 'CoAStaL at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Affect Classification in Dialog using Attentive BiLSTMs', 'sv': 'CoAStaL på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Påverkan klassificering i dialog med uppmärksam BiLSTMs', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 3: Attentive BiLSTMs பயன்படுத்தி விளைவாக வகைப்படுத்தல் உரையாடலில் உள்ள கோAStaL', 'ur': 'CoAStaL at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Effect Classification in Dialog using Attentive BiLSTMs', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mã AStapl tại SemEvl-2009 Task 3: Classification of affect classification in Diaal using Attentive BiLSTM', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Класификация на въздействието в диалога с помощта на внимателни БиЛСТМ', 'da': 'CoAStaL på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Påvirke klassificering i dialog ved hjælp af opmærksomme BiLSTMs', 'nl': 'CoAStaL bij SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Effectclassificatie in dialoog met behulp van Attentieve BiLSTMs', 'hr': 'CoAStaL na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 3: klasifikacija utjecaja u dijalogu koristeći pozorne BiLSTMs', 'de': 'CoAStaL bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Affektklassifikation im Dialog mit aufmerksamen BiLSTMs', 'ko': 'SemEval-199년 해안회의 임무3: 집중적인 BILSTM을 사용하여 대화에 영향을 미치는 분류', 'id': 'CoAStaL di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Klasifikasi Affect dalam Dialog menggunakan BiLSTM Attentive', 'fa': 'CoAStaL در نیم Eval-2019 کار ۳: تأثیر برنامه\u200cبندی در محاورۀ محاورۀ با استفاده از بیLSTMs مواظب', 'sw': 'CoAStaL katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 3: Madhara ya Kuhusiana katika Dialog kwa kutumia Mheshimiwa BiLSTMs', 'sq': 'CoAStaL në SemEval-2019 Task 3: Affect Classification in Dialogue using Attentive BiLSTMs', 'tr': 'CoAStaL at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Affect Classification in Dialog using Attentive BiLSTMs', 'af': 'CoAStaL by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 3: Afvloek Klassifikasie in Dialoog gebruik Aangaande BiLSTMs', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'hy': 'CoAStaL at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Affect Classification in Dialogue using Attentive BiLSTMs', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৩: অ্যাটেন্টিভ বাইলস্টিম ব্যবহার করে ডায়ালগে ক্লাসিকেশন প্রভাবিত করুন', 'az': "CoAStaL'in SemEval-2019 G√∂z…ôl 3: Diyaloƒüunda Attentive BiLSTMs vasit…ôsil…ô m√ºxt…ôlif Klasifikasyon", 'bs': 'CoAStaL na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 3: klasifikacija utjecaja u dijalogu koristeći pozorne BiLSTMs', 'ca': 'CoAStaL a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Affect Classification in Dialogue using Attentive BiLSTMs', 'et': 'CoAStaL SemEval-2019 ülesanne 3: mõjutab klassifitseerimist dialoogis tähelepanelike BiLSTMde abil', 'cs': 'CoAStaL na SemEval-2019 Úkol 3: Klasifikace vlivu v dialogu pomocí pozorných BiLSTMů', 'fi': 'CoAStaL SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 3: Vaikutusten luokittelu vuoropuhelussa tarkkaavaisten BiLSTMs-menetelmien avulla', 'jv': 'CoASta L nang seminval-2011 task 3:', 'sk': 'CoAStaL na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Učinki klasifikacije v dialogu z uporabo pozornih BiLSTMs', 'he': 'CoAStaL ב SemEval-2019 משימה 3: שימוש משפיע בדיולוג בשימוש BiLSTMs Attentive', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'CoAStaL at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Affect Classification in Dialogue using Attentive BiLSTMs'}
{'en': 'This work describes the system presented by the CoAStaL Natural Language Processing group at University of Copenhagen. The main system we present uses the same attention mechanism presented in (Yang et al., 2016). Our overall model architecture is also inspired by their hierarchical classification model and adapted to deal with classification in dialogue by encoding information at the turn level. We use different encodings for each turn to create a more expressive representation of dialogue context which is then fed into our classifier. We also define a custom preprocessing step in order to deal with language commonly used in interactions across many social media outlets. Our proposed system achieves a micro F1 score of 0.7340 on the test set and shows significant gains in performance compared to a system using dialogue level encoding.', 'ar': 'يصف هذا العمل النظام الذي قدمته مجموعة معالجة اللغة الطبيعية CoAStaL في جامعة كوبنهاغن. يستخدم النظام الرئيسي الذي نقدمه نفس آلية الانتباه المقدمة في (Yang et al. ، 2016). إن بنية النموذج العام لدينا مستوحاة أيضًا من نموذج التصنيف الهرمي وتكييفها للتعامل مع التصنيف في الحوار من خلال ترميز المعلومات على مستوى المنعطفات. نحن نستخدم ترميزات مختلفة لكل منعطف لإنشاء تمثيل أكثر تعبيراً لسياق الحوار الذي يتم إدخاله بعد ذلك في المصنف الخاص بنا ، كما نحدد خطوة معالجة مسبقة مخصصة للتعامل مع اللغة المستخدمة بشكل شائع في التفاعلات عبر العديد من وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. يحقق نظامنا المقترح درجة micro F1 تبلغ 0.7340 في مجموعة الاختبار ويظهر مكاسب كبيرة في الأداء مقارنة بنظام يستخدم ترميز مستوى الحوار.', 'fr': "Ce travail décrit le système présenté par le groupe CoAStal Natural Language Processing de l'Université de Copenhague. Le système principal que nous présentons utilise le même mécanisme d'attention que celui présenté dans (Yang et al., 2016). L'architecture globale de notre modèle s'inspire également de leur modèle de classification hiérarchique et est adaptée pour traiter la classification dans le dialogue en codant les informations au niveau du virage. Nous utilisons différents encodages pour chaque tour afin de créer une représentation plus expressive du contexte de dialogue qui est ensuite introduite dans notre classificateur. Nous définissons également une étape de prétraitement personnalisée afin de traiter le langage couramment utilisé dans les interactions sur de nombreux médias sociaux. Le système que nous proposons obtient un score micro F1 de 0,7340 sur l'ensemble de test et montre des gains de performance significatifs par rapport à un système utilisant un codage de niveau dialogue.", 'ja': '本作では、コペンハーゲン大学のCoAStaL自然言語処理グループが提示したシステムについて説明する。我々が提示する主なシステムは、（ Yang et al., 2016 ）に提示されているのと同じ注意メカニズムを使用している。私たちの全体的なモデルアーキテクチャは、階層分類モデルからもインスピレーションを得ており、ターンレベルで情報をエンコードすることによって、ダイアログでの分類に対処するように適応されています。私たちは、ターンごとに異なるエンコーディングを使用して、ダイアログコンテキストのより表現力のある表現を作成し、それをクラシファイアにフィードバックします。また、多くのソーシャルメディアでのインタラクションで一般的に使用される言語に対処するために、カスタムの前処理ステップを定義します。提案されたシステムは、試験器で0.7340のマイクロF 1スコアを達成し、対話レベル符号化を使用したシステムと比較して、パフォーマンスの著しい向上を示します。', 'zh': '述哥本哈根大学CoAStaL自然语言小组统。 臣等所上主系统用与(Yang et al., 2016)中同者。 吾体架构亦为之开,因回合之级编码以应对言之分。 每合用异编码,以创更具表现力对上下文,然后输之分器中。 又定义一自定义预处理步驿,以处社交媒体媒体交之语。 臣等所建系统于试集上之micro F1分为0.7340,比于用编码之统,性能显著。', 'hi': 'यह काम कोपेनहेगन विश्वविद्यालय में CoAStaL प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण समूह द्वारा प्रस्तुत प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है। मुख्य प्रणाली जो हम प्रस्तुत करते हैं वह एक ही ध्यान तंत्र का उपयोग करती है जो (यांग एट अल। हमारा समग्र मॉडल आर्किटेक्चर भी उनके पदानुक्रमित वर्गीकरण मॉडल से प्रेरित है और बारी स्तर पर जानकारी को एन्कोडिंग करके संवाद में वर्गीकरण से निपटने के लिए अनुकूलित है। हम संवाद संदर्भ का अधिक अभिव्यंजक प्रतिनिधित्व बनाने के लिए प्रत्येक मोड़ के लिए अलग-अलग एन्कोडिंग का उपयोग करते हैं जो तब हमारे क्लासिफायर में खिलाया जाता है। हम कई सोशल मीडिया आउटलेट्स में आमतौर पर इंटरैक्शन में उपयोग की जाने वाली भाषा से निपटने के लिए एक कस्टम प्रीप्रोसेसिंग चरण को भी परिभाषित करते हैं। हमारी प्रस्तावित प्रणाली परीक्षण सेट पर 0.7340 का एक माइक्रो एफ 1 स्कोर प्राप्त करती है और संवाद स्तर एन्कोडिंग का उपयोग करके सिस्टम की तुलना में प्रदर्शन में महत्वपूर्ण लाभ दिखाती है।', 'ru': 'Эта работа описывает систему, представленную группой CoAStaL Natural Language Processing в Копенгагенском университете. Основная система, которую мы представляем, использует тот же механизм внимания, который представлен в (Yang et al., 2016). Наша общая модельная архитектура также вдохновлена их иерархической классификационной моделью и адаптирована к работе с классификацией в диалоге путем кодирования информации на уровне поворота. Мы используем различные кодировки для каждого поворота, чтобы создать более выразительное представление контекста диалога, который затем подается в наш классификатор. Мы также определяем пользовательский этап предварительной обработки, чтобы иметь дело с языком, обычно используемым во взаимодействии во многих социальных сетях. Предлагаемая нами система достигает показателя микро F1 0,7340 на тестовом наборе и демонстрирует значительное повышение производительности по сравнению с системой, использующей кодирование на уровне диалога.', 'es': 'Este trabajo describe el sistema presentado por el grupo CoAStal Natural Language Processing de la Universidad de Copenhague. El sistema principal que presentamos utiliza el mismo mecanismo de atención presentado en (Yang et al., 2016). Nuestra arquitectura de modelo general también se inspira en su modelo de clasificación jerárquica y se adapta para tratar la clasificación en diálogo mediante la codificación de la información a nivel de turno. Utilizamos diferentes codificaciones para cada turno para crear una representación más expresiva del contexto del diálogo que luego se introduce en nuestro clasificador. También definimos un paso de preprocesamiento personalizado para tratar con el lenguaje comúnmente utilizado en las interacciones en muchos medios sociales. Nuestro sistema propuesto logra una puntuación micro F1 de 0.7340 en el conjunto de pruebas y muestra ganancias significativas en el rendimiento en comparación con un sistema que utiliza codificación a nivel de diálogo.', 'ga': 'Déanann an obair seo cur síos ar an gcóras a chuir an grúpa Próiseála Teanga Nádúrtha CoAStaL in Ollscoil Chóbanhávan i láthair. Úsáideann an príomhchóras a chuirimid i láthair an mheicníocht aird chéanna a chuirtear i láthair in (Yang et al., 2016). Tá ár n-ailtireacht eiseamláireach foriomlán spreagtha freisin ag a múnla rangaithe ordlathach agus oiriúnaithe chun déileáil le haicmiú in idirphlé trí fhaisnéis a ionchódú ag an leibhéal casaidh. Bainimid úsáid as ionchóduithe difriúla do gach cas chun léiriú níos sainráiteach a chruthú ar chomhthéacs an chomhphlé a chuirtear isteach inár n-aicmitheoir ansin. Sainímid freisin céim réamhphróiseála saincheaptha chun déileáil leis an teanga a úsáidtear go coitianta in idirghníomhaíochtaí thar go leor asraonta meán sóisialta. Baineann ár gcóras atá beartaithe scór micrea F1 de 0.7340 amach ar an tacar tástála agus léiríonn sé gnóthachain shuntasacha feidhmíochta i gcomparáid le córas a úsáideann ionchódú leibhéal idirphlé.', 'pt': 'Este trabalho descreve o sistema apresentado pelo grupo CoAStaL Natural Language Processing da Universidade de Copenhagen. O sistema principal que apresentamos utiliza o mesmo mecanismo de atenção apresentado em (Yang et al., 2016). Nossa arquitetura de modelo geral também é inspirada em seu modelo de classificação hierárquica e adaptada para lidar com a classificação em diálogo, codificando informações no nível do turno. Usamos codificações diferentes para cada turno para criar uma representação mais expressiva do contexto de diálogo que é então alimentado em nosso classificador. Também definimos uma etapa de pré-processamento personalizada para lidar com a linguagem comumente usada em interações em muitos meios de comunicação social. Nosso sistema proposto atinge uma pontuação micro F1 de 0,7340 no conjunto de teste e mostra ganhos significativos no desempenho em comparação com um sistema que usa codificação de nível de diálogo.', 'hu': 'Ez a munka bemutatja a Koppenhágai Egyetem CoAStaL Natural Language Processing csoportja által bemutatott rendszert. Az általunk bemutatott fő rendszer ugyanazt a figyelemmechanizmust használja (Yang et al., 2016). Általános modellarchitektúránkat a hierarchikus osztályozási modelljük inspirálja, és az információk fordulószintű kódolásával párbeszédben történő besoroláshoz igazítottuk. Minden fordulóhoz különböző kódolásokat használunk, hogy a párbeszéd kontextusának kifejezőbb ábrázolását hozzuk létre, amelyet aztán az osztályozónkba táplálunk. Meghatározunk egy egyéni előfeldolgozási lépést is annak érdekében, hogy kezeljük a számos közösségi média közötti interakcióban gyakran használt nyelvet. Javasolt rendszerünk 0,7340 mikro F1 pontszámot ér el a tesztkészleten, és jelentős teljesítménynövekedést mutat egy párbeszédszintű kódolást használó rendszerhez képest.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα που παρουσιάστηκε από την ομάδα επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας CoAStaL στο Πανεπιστήμιο της Κοπεγχάγης. Το κύριο σύστημα που παρουσιάζουμε χρησιμοποιεί τον ίδιο μηχανισμό προσοχής που παρουσιάζεται στο (κ.α., 2016). Η συνολική αρχιτεκτονική μοντέλων μας εμπνέεται επίσης από το ιεραρχικό μοντέλο ταξινόμησης τους και προσαρμόζεται ώστε να αντιμετωπίζει την ταξινόμηση σε διάλογο κωδικοποιώντας πληροφορίες σε επίπεδο στροφής. Χρησιμοποιούμε διαφορετικές κωδικοποιήσεις για κάθε στροφή για να δημιουργήσουμε μια πιο εκφραστική αναπαράσταση του πλαισίου διαλόγου που στη συνέχεια τροφοδοτείται στον ταξινομητή μας. Καθορίζουμε επίσης ένα προσαρμοσμένο βήμα προεπεξεργασίας προκειμένου να ασχοληθούμε με τη γλώσσα που χρησιμοποιείται συνήθως σε αλληλεπιδράσεις σε πολλά μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Το προτεινόμενο σύστημα επιτυγχάνει μια βαθμολογία μικρο F1 0.7340 στο σετ δοκιμής και παρουσιάζει σημαντικά κέρδη στην απόδοση σε σύγκριση με ένα σύστημα που χρησιμοποιεί κωδικοποίηση επιπέδου διαλόγου.', 'ka': 'ეს სამუშაო შეტყობინებს სისტემა, რომელიც CoAStaL ნახევალური ენის პროცესების ჯგუფი კოპენჰეგენის университетში. ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ვიყენებთ იგივე დაახლოების მექანსიმა, რომელიც ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩ ჩვენი ყველაფერი მოდელური არქტიქტიკური იქნება ისინი იერაქტიკალური კლასიფიკაციის მოდელზე და აეპტიფიკაცია დიალოგიში კლასიფიკაციის შესახებ ინფორმაციის შესახებ შემდეგ ჩვენ გამოყენებთ განსხვავებული კონტექსტის კონტექსტის გამოყენება, რომელიც შემდეგ ჩვენი კლასიფიკაციაში ჩვენი კონტექსტირებულია. ჩვენ ასევე განსაზღვრებით განსაზღვრებული წინაპროცესების კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც მსოციალური მედიაში გამოყენებული ენათების შესახებ. ჩვენი საზოგადომი სისტემა 0,7340 წერტილის მიკრო F1 წერტილი იქნება ტესტის კონფიგურაციაში და ჩვენი სისტემას გამოყენებული დიალოგურაციის კონფიგურაციის გამოყენება', 'it': "Questo lavoro descrive il sistema presentato dal gruppo CoAStaL Natural Language Processing presso l'Università di Copenaghen. Il sistema principale che presentiamo utilizza lo stesso meccanismo di attenzione presentato in (Yang et al., 2016). La nostra architettura complessiva del modello si ispira anche al loro modello gerarchico di classificazione e si adatta per affrontare la classificazione in dialogo codificando le informazioni a livello di turno. Usiamo diverse codifiche per ogni turno per creare una rappresentazione più espressiva del contesto di dialogo che viene poi alimentato nel nostro classificatore. Definiamo anche un passaggio di pre-elaborazione personalizzato per affrontare il linguaggio comunemente utilizzato nelle interazioni tra molti social media. Il nostro sistema proposto raggiunge un punteggio micro F1 di 0,7340 sul set di test e mostra significativi miglioramenti nelle prestazioni rispetto a un sistema che utilizza la codifica a livello di dialogo.", 'lt': 'Šis darbas aprašo Kopenhagos universitete CoAStaL gamtos kalbų apdorojimo grupės pateiktą sistemą. Pagrindinė sistema, kurią pristatome, naudoja tą patį dėmesio mechanizmą, pateiktą (Yang et al., 2016 m.). Our overall model architecture is also inspired by their hierarchical classification model and adapted to deal with classification in dialogue by encoding information at the turn level.  We use different encodings for each turn to create a more expressive representation of dialogue context which is then fed into our classifier. Taip pat apibrėžiame įprastą pasirengimo procesui žingsnį, kad būtų sprendžiama kalba, kuri dažnai naudojama įvairiose social in ės žiniasklaidos įstaigose. Mūsų siūloma sistema turi 0,7340 mikro F1 rezultato bandymų rinkinyje ir turi reikšmingą veiksmingumo padidėjimą, palyginti su sistema, naudojančia dialogo lygmens kodavimą.', 'kk': 'Бұл жұмыс Копенхаген университетінде CoAStaL Natural Language Processing Group көрсетілген жүйені анықтайды. Келтіріп тұрған негізгі жүйеңіз бір қарау механизмін (Yang et al., 2016). Біздің жалпы үлгі архитектурамыз сондай-ақ олардың иерархиялық классификациялық үлгілерінен түсіндірілген және диалогындағы классификациялық үлгілерімен кодтамасы мәл Біз әрбір айналысу үшін айырмашылық кодтамасын қолданып диалог контексті көрсету үшін, содан кейін классификаторымізге енгізіледі. Сонымен қатар, көпшілікті социалдық медиаға қатынас арқылы қолданылатын тілдерді өзгерту үшін өзгерту қадамын анықтаймыз. Біздің қолданыстағы жүйеміз сынақтағы микро F1 деңгейі 0,7340 деңгейін жеткізеді. Жүйеңіз диалог деңгейінің кодтамасын қолдану үшін жұмыс істеу үшін маңызды жеткіз', 'ms': 'Kerja ini menggambarkan sistem yang dipaparkan oleh kumpulan Proses Bahasa Alami CoAStaL di Universiti Kopenhagen. Sistem utama yang kita persembahkan menggunakan mekanisme perhatian yang sama yang dipaparkan di (Yang et al., 2016). Arkitektur model keseluruhan kita juga diinspirasi oleh model kelasukan hierarkis mereka dan disesuaikan untuk menangani kelasukan dalam dialog dengan mengekodkan maklumat pada tahap giliran. Kami menggunakan pengekodan yang berbeza untuk setiap giliran untuk mencipta perwakilan yang lebih ekspresif bagi konteks dialog yang kemudian dimasukkan ke dalam pengklasifikasi kami. We also define a custom preprocessing step in order to deal with language commonly used in interactions across many social media outlets.  Sistem kami yang diusulkan mencapai skor F1 mikro 0.7340 pada set ujian dan menunjukkan keuntungan yang signifikan dalam prestasi dibandingkan dengan sistem menggunakan pengekodan aras dialog.', 'mk': 'This work describes the system presented by the CoAStaL Natural Language Processing group at University of Copenhagen.  Главниот систем кој го претставуваме го користи истиот механизам на внимание претставен во (Јанг и ал., 2016). Нашата целокупна архитектура на моделот, исто така, е инспирирана од нивниот хиерархички модел на класификација и адаптирана за да се справи со класификацијата во дијалогот со кодирање на информациите на вртено ниво. Користиме различни кодирања за секој сврт за да создадеме поекспресни претставувања на дијалогот контекст кој потоа е внесен во нашиот класификатор. Ние, исто така, дефинираме сопствен чекор на препроцес со цел да се справи со јазикот кој е често употребен во интеракциите во многу социјални медиуми. Нашиот предложен систем постигнува микро-Ф1 оценка од 0,7340 на тестот и покажува значителни зголемувања во перформансата во споредба со системот кој користи кодирање на нивото на дијалог.', 'ml': 'ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത് കോപെന്\u200dഹാഗന്\u200d യൂണിവേഴ്സിറ്റിയിലെ കോവാസ്റ്റല്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഇപ്പോള്\u200d വരുന്ന പ്രധാന സിസ്റ്റം ഒരേ ശ്രദ്ധ മെനിസ്റ്റം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു (യാങ്ങ് et al., 2016). നമ്മുടെ മൊത്തം മോഡല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്ടിക്കറ്റിക്കേറ്റര്\u200d അവരുടെ ഹിയെരാര്\u200dക്കിക് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d പ്രൊത്തിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അവയു നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത കോഡിങുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഓരോ തിരിച്ചുവരവും സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സംസാരത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സ്വകാര്യ മുന്\u200dപ് പ്രോസിക്കുന്ന പടിയും നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നു. ഒരുപാട് സോഷ്യല്\u200d മെഡിയാ പ്രവർത്തകങ നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സിസ്റ്റം പരീക്ഷണസെറ്റില്\u200d 0. 7340 മൈക്രോ F1 സ്കോര്\u200d എത്തുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഡയലോഗ് നില കോഡിങ് ഉപയോ', 'mt': "This work describes the system presented by the CoAStaL Natural Language Processing group at University of Copenhagen.  Is-sistema ewlenija li nippreżentaw tuża l-istess mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni ppreżentat f’ (Yang et al., 2016). L-arkitettura ġenerali tal-mudell tagħna hija ispirata wkoll mill-mudell ta’ klassifikazzjoni ġerarkika tagħhom u adattata biex tittratta l-klassifikazzjoni fid-djalogu billi tikkodifika l-informazzjoni fil-livell tad-dawra. Aħna nużaw kodiċijiet differenti għal kull dawra biex noħolqu rappreżentazzjoni aktar espressiva tal-kuntest tad-djalogu li mbagħad jiġi integrat fil-klassifikatur tagħna. Aħna niddefinixxu wkoll pass ta' preproċess personalizzat sabiex nindirizzaw il-lingwa użata b'mod komuni fl-interazzjonijiet f'ħafna mezzi tax-xandir soċjali. Is-sistema proposta tagħna tikseb punteġġ mikro F1 ta’ 0.7340 fuq is-sett tat-test u turi kisbiet sinifikanti fil-prestazzjoni meta mqabbla ma’ sistema li tuża l-kodifikazzjoni tal-livell tad-djalogu.", 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul prezentat de grupul CoAStaL Natural Language Processing de la Universitatea din Copenhaga. Sistemul principal pe care îl prezentăm folosește același mecanism de atenție prezentat în (Yang et al., 2016). Arhitectura noastră generală a modelului este, de asemenea, inspirată de modelul lor ierarhic de clasificare și adaptată pentru a face față clasificării în dialog prin codificarea informațiilor la nivelul turnului. Folosim codări diferite pentru fiecare viraj pentru a crea o reprezentare mai expresivă a contextului de dialog, care este apoi alimentată în clasificatorul nostru. De asemenea, definim un pas personalizat de pre-procesare pentru a face față limbajului utilizat în mod obișnuit în interacțiunile dintre multe rețele de socializare. Sistemul nostru propus obține un scor micro F1 de 0,7340 pe setul de test și prezintă câștiguri semnificative în performanță comparativ cu un sistem care utilizează codarea la nivel de dialog.', 'no': 'Dette arbeidet beskriver systemet som er presentert av CoAStaL-naturspråk-behandlingsgruppa i Universiteten av Copenhagen. Hovudssystemet vi presenterer bruker den same oppmerksmekanismen som er presentert i (Yang et al., 2016). Den generelle modellen vårt arkitektur er også inspirert av sine hierarkiske klassifikasjonsmodul og tilpassa til å handtera klassifikasjonen i dialogen ved å koda informasjon på turnnivået. Vi brukar ulike kodingar for kvar snu for å laga eit meir uttrykk representasjon av dialogkontekst som så vert fede inn i vårt klassifisering. Vi definerer også ein sjølvvald forhandteringssteg for å handtera språk som ofte brukar i samarbeid over mange sosiale media-omrisset. Vårt foreslått systemet oppnår eit mikro F1- poeng med 0,7340 på testinnstillingane og viser signifikante forståking i utviklinga samanlikna med eit systemet med dialognivåkoding.', 'mn': 'Энэ ажил Копенгагийн Их Сургуулийн CoAStaL Байгалийн хэл Процесс бүлгийн системийг тайлбарладаг. Бидний одоогийн гол систем нь нэгэн анхаарлын механизмийг ашиглаж байна (Yang et al., 2016). Бидний ерөнхий загварын архитектур мөн түүний төвшин хуваарилалтын загвараас урам зориулагдсан ба диалогт хуваарилалтын хуваарилалтын тулд мөн түвшинд кодлох мэдээллийг ашиглаж зохиц Бид бүр өөр өөр кодлог ашиглаж, диалогын тухай илүү илүү илүү илүү илэрхийлэлтэй харуулах боломжтой. Бид мөн олон нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглээний харилцаанд хэрэглэгддэг хэл дээр ажиллах боломжтой арга хэмжээний өмнө ажиллах алхам тодорхойлдог. Бидний санал өгсөн систем шалгалтанд 0,7340 жижиг F1 оноо гарч, диалог хэмжээний кодлогыг ашиглан системтэй харьцуулахад чухал ашиг гарч ирдэг.', 'pl': 'W pracy opisano system prezentowany przez grupę CoAStaL Natural Language Processing na Uniwersytecie w Kopenhadze. Prezentowany przez nas system główny wykorzystuje ten sam mechanizm uwagi przedstawiony w (Yang et al., 2016). Nasza ogólna architektura modelu jest również inspirowana ich hierarchicznym modelem klasyfikacji i dostosowana do radzenia sobie z klasyfikacją w dialogu poprzez kodowanie informacji na poziomie turu. Używamy różnych kodowań dla każdego zakrętu, aby stworzyć bardziej wyrazistą reprezentację kontekstu dialogu, który jest następnie wprowadzany do naszego klasyfikatora. Definiujemy również niestandardowy etap przetwarzania wstępnego w celu poradzenia sobie z językiem powszechnie używanym w interakcjach w wielu portalach społecznościowych. Proponowany przez nas system osiąga wynik mikroF1 0,7340 na zestawie testowym i wykazuje znaczący wzrost wydajności w porównaniu z systemem wykorzystującym kodowanie poziomu dialogowego.', 'sr': 'Ovaj rad opisuje sistem koji je predstavljao grupa prirodnog procesa jezika CoAStaL na Univerzitetu Kopenhagen. Glavni sistem koji predstavljamo koristi isti mehanizam pažnje predstavljen u (Yang et al., 2016). Naša ukupna modelna arhitektura je takođe inspirisana njihovim hijerarhičkim modelom klasifikacije i prilagođena da se nosi sa klasifikacijom u dijalogu kodiranjem informacija na nivou okretanja. Koristimo različite kodiranje za svaki okret da bi stvorili ekspresivniji predstavljanje konteksta dijaloga koji se onda hrani u naš klasifikator. Takođe definišemo korak predobrađivanja po običaju kako bi se suočili sa jezikom koji se često koristi u interakciji u mnogim društvenim medijima. Naš predloženi sistem postiže mikro F1 rezultat od 0,7340 na testu i pokazuje značajne dobitke u usporedbi sa sistemom koristeći kodiranje nivoa dijaloga.', 'so': "Shuqulkaas wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka kooxda shaqeynta afka asalka ah ee CoAStaL ee jaamacadda Copenhagen. nidaamka asalka ah ee aynu joogno wuxuu isticmaalaa qaab isku mid ah oo loo soo jeedo (Yang et al., 2016). Arkitista modellkayaga oo dhan waxaa sidoo kale lagu waxyoodaa tusaale ahaan fasalka hierarkiisa, waxaana loo bedelay in la kala takhasho fasalka dialogue si uu u qoro macluumaadka kooban heerka. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa kaalmooyin kala duduwan si aan u sameyno qaab ka muuqasho badan oo ka muuqata xaalada dialogue, taas oo markaas loo qeybeeyo fasaxeenna. Sidoo kale waxaynu qoraynaa tallaabo ka baaraandegista caadi ah si aan ula macaamiloono luuqada sida caadiga ah oo lagu isticmaalo macluumaadyo kala duduwan weerarka bulshada. Sirkayada la soo jeeday wuxuu gaadhaa koox fudud F1 oo ku qoran tijaabada 0.7340, wuxuuna muujiyaa faa'iido badan oo la barbaranayo nidaamka isticmaalaya heerka kooxda dialogka.", 'si': 'මේ වැඩේ කෝපෙන්හැගෙන් විශ්වාසිත්තාවේ CoAStaL ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරකාශ කණ්ඩායමේ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200d අපි ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතිය පාවිච්චි කරනවා එකම අවධාන පද්ධතිය (Yang et al., 2016). අපේ සම්පූර්ණ මෝඩල් ස්ථාපනය තියෙන්නේ ඔවුන්ගේ අයිරිකාෂික විශේෂණ මෝඩල් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරලා සං අපි වෙනස් සංවාදයක් භාවිත කරන්න හැම වෙනස් සංවාදයක්ම සම්බන්ධයක්ම සිද්ධ කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිකෘතියක් සඳහා අපේ  අපි සමහරවිට සාමාජික මිඩියාව ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට භාෂාව සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් ක්\u200dරමයක් විශ්වාස කර අපේ පරීක්ෂණය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් පද්ධතිය 0.7340 විශාල F1 ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලැබෙනවා ඒ වගේම පද්ධතිය සඳහා සංවාද ස්ථානය සඳහා', 'sv': 'Detta arbete beskriver det system som presenteras av CoAStaL Natural Language Processing group vid Köpenhamns universitet. Huvudsystemet vi presenterar använder samma uppmärksamhetsmekanism som presenteras i (Yang et al., 2016). Vår övergripande modellarkitektur är också inspirerad av deras hierarkiska klassificeringsmodell och anpassad för att hantera klassificering i dialog genom att koda information på turn nivå. Vi använder olika kodningar för varje vändning för att skapa en mer uttrycksfull representation av dialogsammanhang som sedan matas in i vår klassificerare. Vi definierar också ett anpassat förbehandlingssteg för att hantera språk som ofta används i interaktioner mellan många sociala medier. Vårt föreslagna system uppnår en mikro F1 poäng på 0,7340 på testuppsättningen och visar betydande prestationsvinster jämfört med ett system som använder dialognivå kodning.', 'ur': 'یہ کام کاپنھاگن یونیوریسٹ کے کائسٹال کی طبیعی زبان پرسس گروپ کے ذریعہ پیش کیے ہوئے سیستم کی تعریف کرتا ہے. ہم نے وہاں پیش کیا ہے ایک ہی اظہار مکانیسم کا استعمال کرتا ہے (Yang et al., 2016). ہمارے سارے موڈل معماری بھی ان کے حیراتیکل کلاسیک موڈل سے الهام کیا گیا ہے اور ان کے سارے اندازے کے ذریعے ڈالیلوگ میں کلاسیک کے ساتھ تدبیر کیا گیا ہے ہم ہر ٹکڑے کے لئے مختلف اکنوڈینگ استعمال کرتے ہیں تاکہ ان سے زیادہ واضح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طر ہم نے بھی ایک طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح ہماری پیشنهاد سیسٹم نے 0.7340 کی میکروٹ F1 اسکور کو پہنچایا ہے اور ایک سیسٹم کے مقابلہ میں ضروری فائدہ دکھاتا ہے جو دیالوگ سطح کا اکنوڈینگ استعمال کرتا ہے.', 'ta': 'இந்த வேலை கோபென்ஹேகன் கல்வியூரிக்கத்தில் கோAStaL இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாடு குழுவை வரையறுக்கிறது. நாம் தற்போது இருக்கும் முக்கிய அமைப்பு அதே கவனம் முறைமையை பயன்படுத்துகிறது (யாங் et al., 2016). எங்கள் மொத்த மாதிரி உருவாக்கம் அவர்களுடைய மின்னஞ்சல் வகுப்பு மாதிரி மூலம் தெரியப்படுகிறது மற்றும் முறை நிலையில் தகவல் குறியீட்டு  நாம் ஒவ்வொரு முறையிலும் வேறு குறியீடுகளை பயன்படுத்தி உரையாடல் சூழலின் மேலும் வெளிப்படையான பிரிவினை உருவாக We also define a custom preprocessing step in order to deal with language commonly used in interactions across many social media outlets.  எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பு 0. 7340 புள்ளியின் 0. 7340 பெறுகிறது சோதனை அமைப்பில் செயல்பாட்டில் முக்கியமான விளைவுகளை காட்', 'uz': "Bu ishni CoAStaL universitetdagi tabiiy tillar jarayon guruhini anglatadi. Joriy hozir tizimi bir xizmatni ishlatadi (Yang et al., 2016). Bizning umumiy modelimiz arxituvchi modeli esa ularning hierarchik classification modeli yordamida ishlatadi va dialogidagi darajasini boshqarish imkoniyatini boshqarish imkoniyatini boshqarish mumkin. Biz har bir xil kodlash usulidan foydalanamiz, muloqat xizmatlarining ko'proq xususiyatlarini yaratish uchun va keyin ularning tabiifsiyatlarimizga ega bo'ladi. Biz ko'pchilik shaxsiy jamiyatlar tarkibida ishlatadigan tillarni boshqarish uchun foydalanuvchi darajani aniqlashimiz mumkin. Bizning taʼminlovchi tizimimiz sinov sohasida 0.7340 qismi 0.7340 qismini topadi va dialog darajasi kodlash usuli bilan tizimga murakkab muvaffaqiyatli muvaffaqiyatlarni koʻrsatish.", 'vi': 'Việc này mô tả hệ thống được tổ chức bởi nhóm xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên CoAStahl tại Đại học Copenhagen. Hệ thống chính mà chúng tôi giới thiệu sử dụng cùng một cơ chế chú ý được trình bày trong (Yang et al., bây giờ). Cách cấu trúc mô hình chung của chúng tôi cũng được tạo cảm hứng từ mô hình phân loại theo thứ tự của chúng và thích nghi với phân loại trong hội thoại bằng cách mã hóa thông tin tại vòng quay. Chúng tôi sử dụng các mã số khác nhau cho mỗi lần để tạo ra một đại diện diễn tả mô tả ngữ cảnh thoại mà sau đó được đưa vào người phân loại của chúng tôi. Chúng tôi cũng xác định một bước xử lý riêng để đối phó với ngôn ngữ thường dùng trong giao tiếp qua nhiều phương tiện truyền thông xã hội. Hệ thống đã đề nghị đạt được một vi F1 số 0.7340 trên mục tiêu thử nghiệm và thấy được lợi nhuận quan trọng trong khả năng so với một hệ thống được mã hóa cấp tiến trình.', 'bg': 'Тази работа описва системата, представена от групата за обработка на естествения език към Университета в Копенхаген. Основната система, която представяме, използва същия механизъм на внимание, представен в (Янг и др., 2016). Нашата цялостна архитектура на модела също е вдъхновена от техния йерархичен модел на класификация и адаптирана за справяне с класификацията в диалог чрез кодиране на информация на ниво завой. Използваме различни кодировки за всеки завой, за да създадем по-изразително представяне на диалоговия контекст, което след това се подава в нашия класификатор. Ние също така дефинираме персонализирана стъпка за предварителна обработка, за да се справим с езика, който често се използва в взаимодействията в много социални медии. Нашата предложена система постига микро оценка от 0,7340 на тестовия комплект и показва значителни печалби в производителността в сравнение със система, използваща кодиране на ниво диалог.', 'nl': 'Dit werk beschrijft het systeem gepresenteerd door de CoAStaL Natural Language Processing groep aan de Universiteit van Kopenhagen. Het hoofdsysteem dat we presenteren maakt gebruik van hetzelfde aandachtsmechanisme gepresenteerd in (Yang et al., 2016). Onze algehele modelarchitectuur is ook geïnspireerd op hun hiërarchische classificatiemodel en aangepast om classificatie in dialoog te behandelen door informatie op turnniveau te coderen. We gebruiken verschillende coderingen voor elke beurt om een expressievere weergave van dialoogcontext te creëren die vervolgens wordt ingevoerd in onze classifier. We definiëren ook een aangepaste preprocessing stap om te gaan met taal die vaak wordt gebruikt in interacties op veel sociale media kanalen. Ons voorgestelde systeem bereikt een micro F1 score van 0.7340 op de testset en toont significante verbeteringen in prestaties vergeleken met een systeem dat dialogniveau codering gebruikt.', 'da': 'Dette arbejde beskriver systemet præsenteret af CoAStaL Natural Language Processing group på Københavns Universitet. Det primære system, vi præsenterer, bruger den samme opmærksomhedsmekanisme præsenteret i (Yang et al., 2016). Vores overordnede modelarkitektur er også inspireret af deres hierarkiske klassifikationsmodel og tilpasset til at håndtere klassifikation i dialog ved at kode information på turn niveau. Vi bruger forskellige kodninger for hver tur til at skabe en mere udtryksfuld repræsentation af dialogkontekst, som derefter føres ind i vores klassificering. Vi definerer også et brugerdefineret forbearbejdningstrin for at håndtere sprog, der ofte anvendes i interaktioner på tværs af mange sociale medier. Vores foreslåede system opnår en mikro F1 score på 0,7340 på testsættet og viser betydelige gevinster i ydeevne sammenlignet med et system, der bruger dialogniveau kodning.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt das von der CoAStaL Natural Language Processing Gruppe an der Universität Kopenhagen vorgestellte System. Das Hauptsystem, das wir präsentieren, verwendet den gleichen Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus, der in (Yang et al., 2016) vorgestellt wird. Unsere gesamte Modellarchitektur ist ebenfalls von ihrem hierarchischen Klassifizierungsmodell inspiriert und angepasst, um Klassifikationen im Dialog durch Codierung von Informationen auf Turnebene zu behandeln. Wir verwenden unterschiedliche Codierungen für jede Runde, um eine ausdrucksvollere Darstellung des Dialogkontexts zu schaffen, der dann in unseren Klassifikator eingespeist wird. Wir definieren auch einen benutzerdefinierten Vorverarbeitungsschritt, um mit Sprache umzugehen, die häufig in Interaktionen in vielen sozialen Medien verwendet wird. Unser vorgeschlagenes System erreicht einen Micro F1 Score von 0,7340 auf dem Testset und zeigt signifikante Leistungssteigerungen im Vergleich zu einem System, das Dialoglevel Kodierung verwendet.', 'hr': 'Ovaj rad opisuje sustav koji je predstavljala grupa za procesiranje prirodnog jezika CoAStaL na Univerzitetu Kopenhagena. Glavni sustav koji predstavljamo koristi isti mehanizam pažnje predstavljen u (Yang et al., 2016). Naša ukupna modelna arhitektura također je inspirisana njihovim hijerarhičkim modelom klasifikacije i prilagođena za rješavanje klasifikacije u dijalogu kodiranjem informacija na nivou okretanja. Koristimo različite kodiranje za svaki okret kako bi stvorili izraženiji predstavljanje konteksta dijaloga koji se onda hrani u naš klasifikator. Također definiramo korak pripreme kako bi se riješili jezik koji se često koristi u interakciji u mnogim društvenim medijima. Naš predloženi sustav postiže mikro F1 rezultat od 0,7340 na testu i pokazuje značajne dobitke učinkovitosti u usporedbi s sustavom koristeći kodiranje nivoa dijaloga.', 'ko': '이 작업은 코펜하겐 대학 해안 자연 언어 처리팀이 제시한 시스템을 묘사했다.우리가 소개한 주요 시스템은 (Yang 등, 2016)에서 소개한 것과 같은 주의 메커니즘을 사용했다.우리의 전체 모델 구조도 그들의 층별 분류 모델의 계발을 받았고 라운드 단계에서 인코딩 정보를 통해 대화의 분류를 처리했다.우리는 매 라운드마다 다른 인코딩을 사용하여 더욱 표현력 있는 대화 상하문 표시를 만들고 분류기에 입력합니다.우리는 또한 여러 개의 소셜 미디어의 상호작용에서 자주 사용하는 언어를 처리하기 위해 맞춤형 예처리 절차를 정의했다.우리가 제시한 시스템은 테스트 집합에서 0.7340의 마이크로F1 점수를 얻었고 대화급 인코딩을 사용하는 시스템에 비해 성능이 현저히 향상되었다.', 'sw': 'Kazi hii inaelezea mfumo uliotolewa na kundi la mchakato wa lugha ya asili ya CoAStaL katika Chuo Kikuu cha Copenhagen. Mfumo mkuu tunaoendelea hutumia mfumo huo huo unaofanywa (Yang et al., 2016). Ujengo wetu wa modeli kwa ujumla pia unahamasishwa na muundo wao wa usambazaji wa mipango na unaorodheshwa kukabiliana na usafi katika mazungumzo kwa kuandika taarifa katika kiwango cha upande mwingine. We use different encodings for each turn to create a more expressive representation of dialogue context which is then fed into our classifier. Pia tunaelezea hatua ya utaratibu ili kupambana na lugha ambazo mara nyingi hutumika katika mitandao mbalimbali ya kijamii. Mfumo wetu unapendekezwa unaweza kufikia score ndogo ya F1 yenye 0.7340 kwenye seti ya jaribio na kuonyesha mafanikio makubwa katika utendaji ukilinganisha na mfumo unaotumia kodi ya mazungumzo.', 'tr': 'Bu işi Kopenhagen Uniwersitetisinde CoAStaL Tebiýal dil işlemegi toparynyň suratlandyrylýar. Biziň häzirki esasy sistemimiz şol bir üns meýdançasyny ulanýar (Yang et al., 2016). Biziň ähli nusgamyz arhitektura hem olaryň iýerarhiýa klasifikasyýa nusgasyndan esinlendirilýär we dialogda klasifikasyýa bilen bu derejede kodlemek bilen üýtgedilýär. Biz her çelik üçin farklı ködlemeleri dialogyň bir tansiýetini oluşturmak üçin ullanýarys. Sonra bu şekilde klasifikatymyza süýtgeli. Biz hem soňra sosyal medýä taýýarlaşyklarynda adatça ulanylan diller bilen täsirleşmek üçin bir täze taýýarlama adımy belirleýäris. Biziň teklip eden sistemimiz diýýan düzümlerde mikro F1 अ 0,7340 netijesini ýetip bilýär we sistemiň üstünlik ködlemeleri ulanan düzümler bilen has möhüm gazanlygyny görkez.', 'id': 'Pekerjaan ini menggambarkan sistem yang diperkenalkan oleh grup Proses Bahasa Alami CoAStaL di Universitas Kopenhagen. Sistem utama yang kita persembahkan menggunakan mekanisme perhatian yang sama yang dipaparkan di (Yang et al., 2016). Model arsitektur umum kita juga terinspirasi oleh model klasifikasi hierarkis mereka dan disesuaikan untuk berurusan dengan klasifikasi dalam dialog dengan mengekodikan informasi pada tingkat giliran. Kami menggunakan kode yang berbeda untuk setiap giliran untuk menciptakan representation yang lebih ekspresif dari konteks dialog yang kemudian dimasukkan ke dalam klasifikasi kami. Kami juga mendefinisikan langkah persiapan sendiri untuk berurusan dengan bahasa yang biasanya digunakan dalam interaksi di banyak media sosial. Sistem kami yang diusulkan mencapai skor F1 mikro 0,7340 pada set tes dan menunjukkan keuntungan signifikan dalam prestasi dibandingkan dengan sistem menggunakan pengekodan tingkat dialog.', 'fa': 'این کار سیستم را توسط گروه پردازش زبان طبیعی CoAStaL در دانشگاه کوپنهاگن توصیف می\u200cکند. سیستم اصلی که ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم از یک مکانیسم توجه استفاده می\u200cکند (Yang et al., 2016). معماری کل مدل ما همچنین توسط مدل مختصات قانونی آنها الهام داده می شود و برای درگیری با مختصات در محاوره با اطلاعات رمزبندی در سطح تبدیل شده است. ما از رمز\u200cبندی\u200cهای مختلف برای هر گردش استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا یک نمایش\u200cبندی بیشتر از محیط محیط گفتگو را ایجاد کنیم که بعدش به محیط\u200cکننده\u200cی ما غذا داده می\u200cشود. ما همچنین یک قدم پیش\u200cپردازش شخصی را تعریف می\u200cکنیم تا با زبانی که معمولاً در تعامل\u200cهای بسیاری از بین\u200cهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی استفاده می\u200cشود درگیر کند. سیستم پیشنهاد ما یک امتیاز میکرو F1 از 0.7340 در مجموعه آزمایش رسیده و به مقایسه با یک سیستم با استفاده از رمزبندی سطح محاورۀ صفحه نشان می دهد.', 'af': "Hierdie werk beskryf die stelsel wat deur die CoAStaL Natuurlike Taal Prosessering groep voorgestel is by Universiteit van Copenhagen. Die hoofstelsel wat ons voorsien, gebruik dieselfde aandagmekanisme wat in (Yang et al., 2016) voorsien is. Ons algemene model arkitektuur is ook inspireer deur hul hierarkiese klasifikasie model en aanpas om met klasifikasie in dialoog te behandel deur enkodering inligting op die draai vlak. Ons gebruik verskillende enkoderinge vir elke skakel om 'n meer uitdrukking voorsien van dialoog konteks te skep wat dan in ons klassifiseerder gevoer word. Ons definieer ook 'n pasmaak voorprosessering stap om te behandel met taal gewoonlik gebruik in interaksies oor baie sosiale media uitlegte. Ons voorgestelde stelsel bereik 'n mikro F1 telling van 0.7340 op die toets stel en wys betekende verskaffings in prestasie vergelyk met 'n stelsel gebruik dialoog vlak kodering.", 'sq': 'Ky punë përshkruan sistemin e paraqitur nga grupi i procesit të gjuhës natyrore CoAStaL në Universitetin e Kopenhagenit. Sistemi kryesor që prezantojmë përdor të njëjtin mekanizëm vëmendjeje të paraqitur në (Yang et al., 2016). Arkitektura jonë e përgjithshme e modelit është frymëzuar gjithashtu nga modeli i klasifikimit të tyre hierarkik dhe e përshtatur për të trajtuar klasifikimin në dialog duke koduar informacionin në nivelin e kthesës. Ne përdorim kodifikime të ndryshme për çdo kthesë për të krijuar një përfaqësim më shprehës të kontekstit të dialogut që pastaj futet në klasifikuesin tonë. We also define a custom preprocessing step in order to deal with language commonly used in interactions across many social media outlets.  Sistemi ynë i propozuar arrin një pikë mikro F1 prej 0.7340 në grupin e testit dhe tregon fitime të rëndësishme në performancë krahasuar me një sistem duke përdorur kodimin e nivelit të dialogut.', 'am': 'ይህ ሥራ ከኮፒህጋን ዩንቨርስቲ የኮኤስታሌል የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ፕሮግራም ጉባኤ የተገኘውን ድምፅ ይናገራል፡፡ የአሁኑን የዋነኛው ስርዓት አንድ የጥያቄ አካባቢ እየተገኘ ነው፡፡ የሙሉ ሞዴል መሠረት አካባቢነታችን ደግሞ በሐይራርስክሪክ ክፍል ሞዴል አዳራሽ ነው፡፡ ለሁሉም የፊደል አካባቢዎችን እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ በብዙ ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ አውታር በተለየ ቋንቋዎች ላይ በተለየ ቋንቋዎችን ለመቀበል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ስርዓታችን የሞከረው መስመር ላይ 0.7340 ሚክሮፕ F1 score ያገኛል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը նկարագրում է համակարգը, որը Կոպենհագենի համալսարանում ներկայացրել է ԿոASտալ բնական լեզվի մշակույթի խումբը: Հիմնական համակարգը, որը մենք ներկայացնում ենք, օգտագործում է նույն ուշադրության մեխանիզմը, որը ներկայացվել է (Յանգ և այլն., 2016 թվականին): Մեր ընդհանուր մոդելի ճարտարապետությունը նաև ոգեշնչվում է նրանց հիերարխիկ դասակարգման մոդելի միջոցով և հարմարեցվում է դասակարգման հետ խմբում, կոդավորելով տեղեկատվությունը շրջանակի մակարդակում: Մենք յուրաքանչյուր հատվածի համար տարբեր կոդավորումներ ենք օգտագործում, որպեսզի ստեղծենք ավելի արտահայտված ներկայացում խոսակցության կոնտեքստին, որը հետո ներառվում է մեր դասակարգչի մեջ: Մենք նաև սահմանում ենք սովորական առաջընթացքային քայլ, որպեսզի վերաբերվենք լեզուն, որը սովորաբար օգտագործվում է սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների շփման մեջ: Մեր նախագծված համակարգը ստանում է 0.7340 միկրո F1 գնահատականը փորձարկումների համակարգում և ցույց է տալիս նշանակալի արդյունավետության բարձրացում համեմատած համակարգին, որը օգտագործում է երկխոսային մակարդակի կոդավորումը', 'az': 'Bu işlər Kopenhagen Universitetində CoAStaL təbiətli dil işləmə qrupu ilə göstərilən sistemi tanımlıdır. Gördüyümüz ana sistem aynı gözləmə mehanizmini istifadə edir (Yang et al., 2016). Bizim bütün modellərimiz də hiyerarşik klasifikasiya modeli ilə ilham alındı və bu səviyyədə kodlama məlumatları ilə dəyişdirilmək üçün dəyişdirilmişdir. Biz hər dönüş üçün fərqli kodlamalar istifadə edirik ki, daha çox ifadə edilən dijalog məlumatını yaratmaq üçün, sonra da bizim klasifikatorumuza verilir. Biz də çoxlu sosyal media yayınlarında istifadə edilən dil ilə müxtəlif tərzdə işləmə adını belə təyin edirik. Bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz sistemimiz sınama qutusında mikro F1 dərəcəsi 0,7340 ola bilər və sistemi dijalog seviyyəti kodlaması ilə müqayisədə möhkəm qazanışları göstərər.', 'bn': 'কোপেনহাগেন বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের কোয়াস্তালের ন্যাশনাল ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার গ্রুপ প্রক্রিয়া ব্যবস্থাটি বর্ণন আমরা উপস্থিত প্রধান ব্যবস্থা একই মনোযোগ মেকানিস্তান ব্যবহার করেছি (ইয়াঙ্গ এবং আল, ২০১৬)। আমাদের সাধারণ মডেল স্থাপত্য তাদের হিয়েরার্কিল ক্লাস্ফিকেশন মডেল দ্বারা অনুপ্রেরণা প্রদান করা হয়েছে এবং পর্যায়ে তথ্য এনকোডিং এর মা আমরা প্রত্যেক পর্যন্ত বিভিন্ন এনকোডিং ব্যবহার করি যাতে ডায়ালগের প্রতিনিধিত্ব তৈরি করা যায়, যা আমাদের বিভিন্ন বিভিন অনেক সামাজিক মিডিয়া আউটলেটে ব্যবহৃত ভাষার সাথে সাধারণত ভাষার সাথে ব্যবহৃত একটি স্বাধীন প্রক্রিয়ার পদক্ষে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত ব্যবস্থা পরীক্ষার সেটে ০. ৭৩৪০ এর মাইক্রো এফ১ স্কোর অর্জন করে এবং ডায়ালগ স্তরের এনকোডিং ব্যবহার করে একটি সিস্টেমের তু', 'cs': 'Tato práce popisuje systém prezentovaný skupinou CoAStaL Natural Language Processing na univerzitě v Kodani. Hlavní systém, který prezentujeme, využívá stejný mechanismus pozornosti uvedený v (Yang et al., 2016). Naše celková architektura modelu je také inspirována jejich hierarchickým klasifikačním modelem a přizpůsobena tak, aby se zabývala klasifikací v dialogu kódováním informací na úrovni tahu. Pro každý tah používáme různé kódování, abychom vytvořili expresivnější reprezentaci dialogového kontextu, který je pak vložen do našeho klasifikátoru. Také definujeme vlastní krok předzpracování, abychom se vypořádali s jazykem běžně používaným v interakcích napříč mnoha sociálními médii. Náš navržený systém dosahuje mikro F1 skóre 0,7340 na testovací sadě a vykazuje významné zvýšení výkonu ve srovnání se systémem používajícím kódování úrovně dialogu.', 'ca': "Aquesta feina descriu el sistema presentat pel grup de processament de llenguatges naturals CoAStaL a la Universitat de Copenhague. El sistema principal que presentem utilitza el mateix mecanisme d'atenció que presentem (Yang et al., 2016). La nostra arquitectura del model general també està inspirada pel seu model de classificació jeràrquica i adaptada per abordar la classificació en el diàleg codificant la informació a nivell de gir. We use different encodings for each turn to create a more expressive representation of dialogue context which is then fed into our classifier. També definim un pas de preprocessió personalitzat per tractar el llenguatge comument utilitzat en interaccions entre molts mitjans socials. El nostre sistema proposat aconsegueix una puntuació micro F1 de 0,7340 en el conjunt de proves i mostra avanços significatius en el rendiment comparat amb un sistema que utilitza codificació del nivell de diàleg.", 'bs': 'Ovaj rad opisuje sistem predstavljen grupom prirodnog procesa jezika CoAStaL na Univerzitetu Kopenhagen. Glavni sistem koji predstavljamo koristi isti mehanizam pažnje predstavljen u (Yang et al., 2016). Naša ukupna modelna arhitektura je također inspirisana njihovim hijerarhičkim modelom klasifikacije i prilagođena za rješavanje klasifikacije u dijalogu kodiranjem informacija na nivou okretanja. Koristimo različite kodiranje za svaki okret da bi stvorili ekspresivniji predstavljanje konteksta dijaloga koji se onda hrani u naš klasifikator. Također definišemo korak predobrazovanja po običaju kako bi se riješili jezik koji se često koristi u interakciji u mnogim medijima. Naš predloženi sistem postigne mikro F1 rezultat od 0,7340 na testu i pokazuje značajne dobitke učinkovitosti u usporedbi sa sistemom koristeći kodiranje nivoa dijaloga.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös kirjeldatakse Kopenhaageni Ülikooli CoAStaL looduskeele töötlemise rühma esitatud süsteemi. Põhisüsteem, mida me esitame, kasutab sama tähelepanumehhanismi, mida on esitatud (Yang et al., 2016). Meie üldine mudeli arhitektuur on inspireeritud ka nende hierarhilisest klassifikatsioonimudelist ja kohandatud klassifikatsiooniga dialoogis tegelemiseks, kodeerides teavet pöörde tasandil. Me kasutame iga pöörde jaoks erinevaid kodeeringuid, et luua dialoogi konteksti väljenduslikum esindus, mis seejärel toimetatakse meie klassifitseerijasse. Samuti määratleme kohandatud eeltöötluse etapi, et tegeleda keelega, mida sageli kasutatakse suhtlemisel paljudes sotsiaalmeediakanalites. Meie pakutud süsteem saavutab mikro F1 skoori 0,7340 testikomplektis ja näitab märkimisväärset jõudluse kasvu võrreldes süsteemiga, mis kasutab dialoogi tasemel kodeerimist.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä kuvataan Kööpenhaminan yliopiston CoAStaL Natural Language Processing -ryhmän esittämää järjestelmää. Esittämämme pääjärjestelmä käyttää samaa huomiomekanismia kuin raportissa (Yang et al., 2016). Kokonaismalliarkkitehtuurimme inspiroi myös hierarkkista luokittelumallia ja sovitettiin käsittelemään luokittelua dialogissa koodaamalla tietoa vuorotasolla. Käytämme eri koodauksia jokaisella käännöksellä luodaksemme ilmaisuvoimaisemman esityksen dialogin kontekstista, joka syötetään sitten luokittelijaamme. Määritämme myös räätälöidyn esikäsittelyvaiheen, jotta voimme käsitellä kieltä, jota käytetään yleisesti vuorovaikutuksessa monissa sosiaalisen median kanavissa. Ehdotettu järjestelmä saavuttaa mikro F1 -pisteen 0,7340 testisarjassa ja osoittaa merkittäviä parannuksia suorituskykyyn verrattuna järjestelmään, joka käyttää dialogitason koodausta.', 'jv': 'Olèhku iné rambaran sistem sing nyelaraké ning kelompok Sak Jagat Dohak CoASTaL ning Universite di Copensen. Sistem sing preiane awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem sing beraksi kanggo nyenengaké nggawe nang (Jang et al, 2011). Awak dhéwé kabèh akeh architecture model sing luwih akeh dumadhiné ning model iklaseki winih lan tau aduso karo kelas karo kesemplikasi ning dialog kanggo kelas informasi ingkang kelas Awak dhéwé nggawe koding yang dipunangé kanggo saben nggawe tarjamahan kelompok dialog sing nyimpen winih Awak dhéwé éngari perusahaan nganggo-perusahaan pawartos kanggo nggawe nguasai dilané sing tutané karo interaksi akèh akeh online, sing susahe Sistem sing dipoleh nggawe barang mikro F1 dumateng 0,7-warni kanggo ngerasah barang nggawe barang nggawe barang seneng pisan karo sistem sing bisa gek nggawe barang seneng pisan dialoog', 'sk': 'V tem delu je opisan sistem, ki ga je predstavila skupina za obdelavo naravnega jezika CoAStaL na Univerzi v Kopenhagnu. Glavni sistem, ki ga predstavljamo, uporablja enak mehanizem pozornosti, predstavljen v (Yang et al., 2016). Naša celotna arhitektura modela je navdihnjena tudi iz hierarhičnega modela klasifikacije in je prilagojena tako, da se ukvarja s klasifikacijo v dialogu s kodiranjem informacij na ravni zavoja. Za vsak zavoj uporabljamo različne kodiranje, da ustvarimo bolj izrazito predstavitev dialogskega konteksta, ki se nato vnese v naš klasifikator. Določimo tudi korak predobdelave po meri, da se ukvarjamo z jezikom, ki se običajno uporablja v interakcijah v številnih družbenih omrežjih. Naš predlagani sistem doseže mikro rezultat F1 0,7340 na testnem kompletu in kaže znatno povečanje zmogljivosti v primerjavi s sistemom, ki uporablja kodiranje na ravni dialoga.', 'ha': "Wannan aikin yana bayyana na tsarin da aka bãyar da jama'a na CoasttaL na Harshen Taural da Kiritarki a University of CoPenhagen. Maɓallin system da Muke halatar da shi, yana amfani da aminci guda da aka bãyar da cikin (Yang et al., 2016). Babbar tsarin misalin ayuka da aka yi wahayi zuwa wani misalin mai daraja na taƙaitaccen su kuma an adamanta su yi dangani ga fasalin cikin zauren akwatin bayanin. Munã yi amfani da kodi-daban kodi ko da za'a ƙiƙiro wani mai bayani na mazaɓa na zauren akwatin zauren akwatin bayani, da kuma an fĩfa shi zuwa darafyutan mu. Tuna ƙayyade wata matsayi mai amfani da ɗabi'a dõmin ka yi aiki da harshe wanda ake amfani da su a cikin interaction masu yawa na mitandai masu jamii. Our proposed system achieves a micro F1 score of 0.7340 on the test set and shows significant gains in performance compared to a system using dialogue level encoding.", 'bo': 'འདིས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་འདིས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་སྐད་ཆ་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་ཚོགས་ཁག་གིས་CoAStaL རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་སྐད་ཆ་ ང་ཚོས་དུ་འདོད་པའི་རྩ་བའི་མ་ལག་གིས་ལ་གནད་སྤེལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཅིག་པ་སྤྱོད་ཡོད། Our overall model architecture is also inspired by their hierarchical classification model and adapted to deal with classification in dialog by encoding information at the turn level. ང་ཚོས་རེ་རེའི་ནང་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་མིན་གསལ་བཀོད་པ་ཞིག་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཚད་མ་འདྲ་བ་ཞིག་གསར་འཛུགས་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་བཟོས་བའི་སྔོན་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་གྲོང་རིམ་ཞིག་དམིགས་འཛུགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས། ང་ཚོའི་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་ལག་གིས་བརྟག', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מתארת את המערכת המוצגת על ידי קבוצת מעבדת השפה הטבעית CoAStaL באוניברסיטת קופנגן. The main system we present uses the same attention mechanism presented in (Yang et al., 2016).  Our overall model architecture is also inspired by their hierarchical classification model and adapted to deal with classification in dialogue by encoding information at the turn level.  אנו משתמשים בקודים שונים לכל תור ליצור מייצג מבטא יותר של הקשר לדיולוגי אשר מאוכל לאחר מכן לתוך הקליסדר שלנו. We also define a custom preprocessing step in order to deal with language commonly used in interactions across many social media outlets.  Our proposed system achieves a micro F1 score of 0.7340 on the test set and shows significant gains in performance compared to a system using dialogue level encoding.'}
{'en': 'CX-ST-RNM at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Fusion of Recurrent Neural Networks Based on Contextualized and Static Word Representations for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'ar': 'CX-ST-RNM في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: اندماج الشبكات العصبية المتكررة بناءً على تمثيلات الكلمات السياقية والثابتة للكشف عن المشاعر السياقية', 'fr': 'CX-ST-RNM au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Fusion de réseaux de neurones récurrents basés sur des représentations textuelles contextualisées et statiques pour la détection contextuelle des émotions', 'es': 'CX-ST-RNM en SemEval-2019 Tarea 3: Fusión de redes neuronales recurrentes basadas en representaciones de palabras contextualizadas y estáticas para la detección de emociones contextualizadas', 'pt': 'CX-ST-RNM na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Fusão de redes neurais recorrentes com base em representações de palavras contextualizadas e estáticas para detecção contextual de emoções', 'ja': 'CX - ST - RNM at SemEval -2019 Task 3: Fusion of Recurrent Neural Networks based on Contextualized and Static Word Representations for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'zh': 'CX-ST-RNM at SemEval-2019 务3:盖上下文静之递归神经网络融,以上下文情检也', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 3 पर CX-ST-RNM: प्रासंगिक भावना का पता लगाने के लिए संदर्भित और स्थैतिक शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व के आधार पर आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का संलयन', 'ru': 'CX-ST-RNM на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Слияние рекуррентных нейронных сетей на основе контекстуализированных и статических представлений слов для контекстного обнаружения эмоций', 'ga': 'CX-ST-RNM ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Comhleá Líonraí Néaracha Athfhillteacha Bunaithe ar Léirithe Focal Comhthéacsúla agus Statach chun Mothúchán Comhthéacsúil a Bhrath', 'ka': 'CX-ST-RNM semiEval-2019 სამუშაო დავალება 3: შემდეგ ნეიროლური ქსელების გამოყენება, რომელიც კონტექსტუალურად და სტატიკურად სიტყვების გამოყენება კონტექსტური ემოციონის განახლებ', 'hu': 'CX-ST-RNM a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: Ismétlődő neurális hálózatok fúziója kontextualizált és statikus szóreprezentációkon alapuló kontextuális érzelmek detektálásához', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Συγχώνευση επαναλαμβανόμενων νευρωνικών δικτύων βασισμένων σε περιεκτικοποιημένες και στατικές αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων για την ανίχνευση συγκλονιστικών συναισθημάτων', 'it': 'CX-ST-RNM a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Fusione di reti neurali ricorrenti basate su rappresentazioni testuali contestualizzate e statiche per il rilevamento delle emozioni contestuali', 'kk': 'CX- ST- RNM жарым- 2019 тапсырмасында 3: Қайталану нейралық желілердің қайталануы, контекстуалды және статистикалық сөздерді таңдау үшін', 'lt': 'CX-ST-RNM pusevalio 2019 m. 3 užduotis: Kartotinių neurologinių tinklų jungimas remiantis kontekstinėmis ir statinėmis žodžių atstovybėmis kontekstinės emocijos nustatymui', 'mk': 'CX-ST-RNM на SemEval-2019 задача 3: Фузија на рекурентни неурални мрежи базирани на контекстуални и статички претставувања на зборови за детекција на контекстуални емоции', 'ms': 'CX-ST-RNM pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Fusi Rangkaian Neural Terulang Berdasarkan Perwakilan Kata Konteksual dan Statik untuk Pengesanan Emosi Konteksual', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3- ല്\u200d സിഎക്സ്- എസ്റ്റ്- RNM: വികസിതമാക്കപ്പെടുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d നെറുവല്\u200d വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. വാക്ക്', 'mt': 'CX-ST-RNM f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 3: Fużjoni ta’ Netwerks Newrali Rikorrenti bbażati fuq Rappreżentazzjonijiet Kuntest u Statiċi tal-Kliem għad-Detezzjoni ta’ Emożizzjoni Kuntest', 'mn': 'CX-ST-RNM at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Recurrent Neural Networks Based on Contextualized and Static Word Representations for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'no': 'CX-ST-RNM på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3: Fusion of Recurrent Neural Networks Based on Contextualized and Static Word Representations for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'sr': 'CX-ST-RNM na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: Fuzija ponovnih neuronskih mreža temeljena na kontekstualizaciji i statističkim predstavljanjima reči za konstrukciju kontekstualnih emocija', 'pl': 'CX-ST-RNM w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Połączenie powtarzających się sieci neuronowych opartych na kontekstualizowanych i statycznych reprezentacjach słowa do kontekstowego wykrywania emocji', 'ro': 'CX-ST-RNM la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: fuziunea rețelelor neurale recurente bazate pe reprezentări de cuvinte contextualizate și statice pentru detectarea emoțiilor contextuale', 'so': 'CX-ST-RNM at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Fusion of Recurrent Neural Networks Based on Contextualised and Static Word Representations for Context Emotion Detection', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணியில் CX- ST- RNM: தற்போதைய நெயுரல் வலைப்பின்னல் முடிவு', 'sv': 'CX-ST-RNM på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Fusion av återkommande neurala nätverk baserade på kontextualiserade och statiska ordrepresentationer för kontextuell känslodetektering', 'si': 'CX-ST-RNM at Halfeval-2019 Job 3: Fussion of recurrent neural Netwarks', 'ur': 'CX-ST-RNM at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Fusion of Recurrent Neural Networks Based on Contextualized and Static Word Representations for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'uz': 'CX-ST-RNM at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Fusion of Recurrent Neural Networks Based on Contextualized and Static Word Representations for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'vi': 'CX-ST-RNM tại SemEvl-209 Task 3: Fusion of Recurent Neural Networks Dựa trên chịch xã hội và tĩnh mạch từ ở bộ phát hiện tương ứng.', 'hr': 'CX-ST-RNM na pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 3: Fuzija ponovnih neuronskih mreža temeljena na kontekstualiziranim i statističkim predstavljanjima riječi za otkrivanje kontekstualnih emocija', 'da': 'CX-ST-RNM på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Fusion af tilbagevendende neurale netværk baseret på kontekstualiserede og statiske ordrepræsentationer til kontekstuel følelsesdetektion', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Сливане на повтарящи се неврални мрежи въз основа на контекстуализирани и статични думи за откриване на контекстуални емоции', 'nl': 'CX-ST-RNM bij SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Fusion van Recurrent Neural Networks Gebaseerd op Gecontextualiseerde en Statische Woordrepresentaties voor Contextuele Emotiedetectie', 'de': 'CX-ST-RNM bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Fusion von wiederkehrenden neuronalen Netzwerken basierend auf kontextualisierten und statischen Wortdarstellungen zur kontextuellen Emotionserkennung', 'id': 'CX-ST-RNM di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Fusi Rangkaian Neural Rekorden Berdasarkan Perwakilan Kata Konteksual dan Statik untuk Deteksi Emosi Konteksual', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019에서의 CX-ST-RNM 퀘스트 3: 상하 문화와 정태어 표시를 바탕으로 하는 귀속 신경 네트워크 융합으로 상하문 감정 검측에 사용', 'tr': 'CX-ST-RNM at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Fusion of Recurrent Neural Networks Based on Contextualized and Static Word Representations for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'sw': 'paper size', 'af': 'CX- ST- RNM by SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 3: Fusion of Recurrent Neural Netwerke Based on Contextualized and Static Word Representations for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'fa': 'CX-ST-RNM در پایگاه ۲۰۱۹ تابع ۳: فشار شبکه\u200cهای عصبی دوباره بر اساس نمایش\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای متوسط و آمریکایی برای شناسایی احساسات متوسط', 'sq': 'CX-ST-RNM në SemEval-2019 Task 3: Fusion of Recurrent Neural Networks Based on Contextualized and Static Word Representations for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'hy': 'CX-STA-ARN-ը, 2019-ի կիսագնդի 3. հանձնարարությունը. Կարգավոր նյարդային ցանցերի ֆուզիան, հիմնված կոնտեքստալիզացված և կայուն բառերի ներկայացումների վրա կոնտեքստալ զգացմունքների հայտնաբերման համար', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৩-এ সিএক্স-ST-RNM: বিদ্যমান Emotion Detection জন্য প্রতিনিধিত্ব এবং স্টেটিক শব্দের প্রতিনিধি', 'bs': 'CX-ST-RNM na pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 3: Fuzija ponovnih neuronskih mreža temeljena na kontekstualiziranim i statističkim predstavljanjima riječi za konstrukciju kontekstualnih emocija', 'ca': 'CX-ST-RNM a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Fusion of Recurrent Neural Networks Based on Contextualized and Static Word Representations for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'az': 'CX-ST-RNM at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Contextualized and Static Word Representations for Contextual Emotion Detection Based on Contextualized and Static Word', 'cs': 'Úkol 3: Fúze recidivních neuronových sítí založených na kontextualizovaných a statických reprezentacích slov pro kontextovou detekci emocí', 'fi': 'CX-ST-RNM SemEval-2019 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 3: Toistuvien hermoverkkojen fuusio kontekstualisoituihin ja staattisiin sanaesityksiin perustuen kontekstuaalisten tunteiden havaitsemiseen', 'et': 'CX-ST-RNM SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 3: Korduvate neurovõrkude ühinemine kontekstualiseeritud ja staatiliste sõnade esituste alusel kontekstuaalse emotsiooni tuvastamiseks', 'jv': 'paper size', 'sk': 'CX-ST-RNM na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Združitev ponavljajočih se živčnih omrežij na podlagi kontekstualiziranih in statičnih predstavitev besed za zaznavanje kontekstualnih čustev', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'CX-ST-RNM ב SemEval-2019 משימה 3: מיזון של רשתות נוירוליות מתחזרות מבוססת על מייצגים מילים קונטקסטיים', 'bo': 'CX-ST-RNM at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Fusion of Recurrent Neural Networks Based on Contextualized and Static Word Representations for Contextual Emotion Detection'}
{'en': 'In this paper, I describe a fusion model combining contextualized and static word representations for approaching the EmoContext task in the SemEval 2019 competition. The model is based on two Recurrent Neural Networks, the first one is fed with a state-of-the-art ELMo deep contextualized word representation and the second one is fed with a static Word2Vec embedding augmented with 10-dimensional affective word feature vector. The proposed model is compared with two baseline models based on a static word representation and a contextualized word representation, separately. My approach achieved officially 0.7278 microaveraged F1 score on the test dataset, ranking 47th out of 165 participants.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، أصف نموذجًا اندماجًا يجمع بين تمثيلات الكلمات السياقية والثابتة للتعامل مع مهمة EmoContext في مسابقة SemEval 2019. يعتمد النموذج على شبكتين عصبيتين متكررتين ، الأولى يتم تغذيتها بأحدث تمثيل للكلمات السياقية العميقة ELMo والثانية يتم تغذيتها بتضمين Word2Vec ثابت مدعومًا بميزة الكلمات العاطفية ذات 10 أبعاد. تتم مقارنة النموذج المقترح بنموذجين أساسيين يعتمدان على تمثيل الكلمة الثابتة وتمثيل الكلمات السياقية ، بشكل منفصل. حقق نهجي رسمياً 0.7278 درجة F1 ذات بيانات دقيقة على مجموعة بيانات الاختبار ، لتحتل المرتبة 47 من أصل 165 مشاركًا.', 'es': 'En este artículo, describo un modelo de fusión que combina representaciones de palabras contextualizadas y estáticas para abordar la tarea EmoContext en la competencia SemEval 2019. El modelo se basa en dos redes neuronales recurrentes, la primera se alimenta con una representación de palabras contextualizada profunda eLMO de última generación y la segunda se alimenta con una incrustación estática de Word2Vec aumentada con un vector de características de palabras afectivas de 10 dimensiones. El modelo propuesto se compara con dos modelos de referencia basados en una representación de palabras estática y una representación de palabras contextualizada, por separado. Mi enfoque logró oficialmente una puntuación F1 micropromediada de 0.7278 en el conjunto de datos de la prueba, ocupando el puesto 47 de 165 participantes.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, je décris un modèle de fusion combinant des représentations textuelles contextualisées et statiques pour aborder la tâche EmoContext dans le cadre du concours SemEval 2019. Le modèle est basé sur deux réseaux de neurones récurrents, le premier est alimenté par une représentation de mots contextualisée profonde ElMo de pointe et le second est alimenté par une intégration statique Word2Vec augmentée d'un vecteur de caractéristique de mot affectif en 10 dimensions. Le modèle proposé est comparé à deux modèles de base basés sur une représentation textuelle statique et une représentation textuelle contextualisée, séparément. Mon approche a obtenu officiellement un score F1 micro-moyen de 0,7278 sur l'ensemble de données de test, se classant au 47e rang sur 165 participants.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, descrevo um modelo de fusão combinando representações de palavras contextualizadas e estáticas para abordar a tarefa EmoContext na competição SemEval 2019. O modelo é baseado em duas Redes Neurais Recorrentes, a primeira é alimentada com uma representação de palavras contextualizada profunda ELMo de última geração e a segunda é alimentada com uma incorporação estática Word2Vec aumentada com um vetor de características de palavras afetivas de 10 dimensões. O modelo proposto é comparado com dois modelos de linha de base baseados em uma representação de palavra estática e uma representação de palavra contextualizada, separadamente. Minha abordagem alcançou oficialmente 0,7278 micromédia de pontuação F1 no conjunto de dados de teste, ocupando o 47º lugar entre 165 participantes.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2019コンペティションでEmoContextタスクにアプローチするための文脈化された単語表現と静的単語表現を組み合わせた融合モデルについて説明する。このモデルは、2つのリカレントニューラルネットワークに基づいています。1つ目は、最先端のELMoディープコンテキスト化された単語表現をフィードバックし、2つ目は、10次元の情感的な単語特徴ベクトルで拡張された静的なWord 2 Vec埋め込みをフィードバックします。提案されたモデルは、静的な単語表現と文脈化された単語表現に基づく2つのベースラインモデルと個別に比較される。私のアプローチは、テストデータセットで公式に0.7278のマイクロ平均F 1スコアを達成し、165人の参加者のうち47位でした。', 'zh': '吾述融合之体,合上下之文静单词,施于SemEval 2019竞近EmoContext务。 二递归神经网络者,一神经网络先进ELMo上下文单词,二静Word2Vec入,增10维情感词向量。 以二静单词上下文单词基线比也。 余法于测试数据集上正得0.7278微弧F1分,排名第47位于165名参与者中。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, मैं सेमइवल 2019 प्रतियोगिता में EmoContext कार्य तक पहुंचने के लिए प्रासंगिक और स्थिर शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व के संयोजन वाले एक संलयन मॉडल का वर्णन करता हूं। मॉडल दो आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क पर आधारित है, पहले एक अत्याधुनिक ELMo गहरी contextualized शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व के साथ खिलाया जाता है और दूसरे एक एक स्थिर Word2Vec एम्बेडिंग 10 आयामी भावात्मक शब्द सुविधा वेक्टर के साथ संवर्धित के साथ खिलाया जाता है। प्रस्तावित मॉडल की तुलना एक स्थिर शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व और एक प्रासंगिक शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व के आधार पर दो बेसलाइन मॉडल के साथ की जाती है, अलग-अलग। मेरे दृष्टिकोण ने आधिकारिक तौर पर परीक्षण डेटासेट पर 0.7278 माइक्रोएवेरेज्ड एफ 1 स्कोर हासिल किया, जो 165 प्रतिभागियों में से 47 वें स्थान पर है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье я описываю модель слияния, объединяющую контекстуализированные и статические представления слов для подхода к задаче EmoContext в конкурсе SemEval 2019. Модель основана на двух рекуррентных нейронных сетях, первая из которых снабжена современным представлением глубоко контекстуализированного слова ELMo, а вторая снабжена статическим вложением Word2Vec, дополненным 10-мерным вектором признаков аффективного слова. Предлагаемая модель сравнивается с двумя базовыми моделями, основанными на статическом представлении слова и контекстуализированном представлении слова, отдельно. Мой подход достиг официально 0,7278 микросреднего балла F1 в тестовом наборе данных, заняв 47-е место из 165 участников.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, déanaim cur síos ar shamhail chomhleá a chomhcheanglaíonn uiríll comhthéacsaithe agus statacha focal chun tabhairt faoin tasc EmoContext i gcomórtas SemEval 2019. Tá an tsamhail bunaithe ar dhá Líonra Néaracha Athfhillteacha, cothaítear an chéad cheann le léiriú focal domhain comhthéacsaithe ELMo úrscothach agus cothaítear an dara ceann le neadú Word2Vec statach méadaithe le veicteoir gné focal affective 10-toiseach. Cuirtear an tsamhail atá beartaithe i gcomparáid le dhá mhúnla bhonnlíne bunaithe ar léiriú focal seasta agus léiriú focal comhthéacsaithe, ar leithligh. Bhain mo chur chuige amach go hoifigiúil 0.7278 scór micrea-mheánmhéide F1 ar an tacar sonraí tástála, ag rangú 47ú as 165 rannpháirtí.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში, მე აღწერ ფუზიციის მოდელს, რომელიც კონტექსტუალურად და სტატიკურად სიტყვების გამოსახულება, რომელიც ემოკონტექსტის სამუშაოდ 2019 წლის კონტექ მოდელი ორი განვითარებული ნეიროლური ქსელების დაბაზეულია, პირველი იქნება განვითარებული ELMo სიტყვების მდგომარეობით, და მეორე იქნება სტატიკური Word2Vec-ის დამატებით, რომელიც 10-განზომილებული სიტყვების განსაკუთრებულობით აღმოჩ პროგრამეტული მოდელის შემდგენება ორი ფესტური მოდელისთვის სტატიკური სიტყვების გამოსახულებაზე და კონტექსტურალური სიტყვების გამოსახულებაზე. ჩემი პროგორმა უფლებად დასრულებულია 0,7278 მიკროცემები F1 მონაცემების მონაცემების შესახებ, რომელიც 165 მონაცემების 47მე მონაცემების შესახებ.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban egy kontextuális és statikus szóreprezentációt ötvöző fúziós modellt írok le az EmoContent feladat megközelítésére a SemEval 2019 versenyen. A modell két ismétlődő neurális hálózaton alapul, az elsőt egy korszerű ELMo kontextuális szóábrázolással táplálják, a másodikat pedig egy statikus Word2Vec beágyazással táplálják, amelyet 10 dimenziós affektív szófunkció vektorral bővítenek. A javasolt modellt két alapvető modellel hasonlítják össze, amelyek statikus szóábrázoláson és kontextuális szóábrázoláson alapulnak, külön-külön. Megközelítésem hivatalosan 0,7278 mikroátlagos F1 pontszámot ért el a tesztadatokban, 165 résztvevőből 47. helyen.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, περιγράφω ένα μοντέλο σύντηξης που συνδυάζει περιεκτικοποιημένες και στατικές αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων για την προσέγγιση της εργασίας στο διαγωνισμό SemEval 2019. Το μοντέλο βασίζεται σε δύο Επαναλαμβανόμενα Νευρικά Δίκτυα, το πρώτο τροφοδοτείται με μια υπερσύγχρονη βαθιά πλαισιωμένη απεικόνιση λέξεων και το δεύτερο τροφοδοτείται με μια στατική ενσωμάτωση εμπλουτισμένη με 10-διάστατο συναισθηματικό διάνυσμα χαρακτηριστικών λέξεων. Το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο συγκρίνεται με δύο μοντέλα βάσης βασισμένα σε μια στατική αναπαράσταση λέξεων και μια αναπαράσταση λέξεων, ξεχωριστά. Η προσέγγισή μου πέτυχε επίσημα 0.7278 μικρομέση βαθμολογία F1 στο σύνολο δεδομένων δοκιμών, με την 47η θέση των 165 συμμετεχόντων.', 'it': "In questo articolo, descrivo un modello fusion che combina rappresentazioni testuali contestualizzate e statiche per affrontare il compito EmoContent nel concorso SemEval 2019. Il modello si basa su due Reti Neurali Ricorrenti, la prima è alimentata con una rappresentazione testuale contestualizzata ELMo all'avanguardia e la seconda è alimentata con un embedding statico Word2Vec aumentato con vettore affettivo delle parole 10-dimensionali. Il modello proposto è confrontato con due modelli di base basati su una rappresentazione statica delle parole e una rappresentazione contestualizzata delle parole, separatamente. Il mio approccio ha ottenuto ufficialmente un punteggio F1 micromedio di 0,7278 sul set di dati del test, classificandosi 47esimo su 165 partecipanti.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinu branduolių sintezės model į, jungiantį kontekstinius ir statinius žodžių atstovavimus, kad būtų galima pristatyti EmoContext užduotį 2019 m. SemEval konkurse. Modelis grindžiamas dviem pasikartojančiais neuraliniais tinklais, pirmuoju grindžiamas naujausia ELMo giliu kontekstiniu žodžio atvaizdavimu ir antruoju grindžiamas statiniu Word2Vec įdėjimu, papildytu 10 matmenų įtakingu žodžio požymiu vektoriumi. The proposed model is compared with two baseline models based on a static word representation and a contextualized word representation, separately.  Mano metodas oficialiai pasiekė 0,7278 mikrovidutinio F1 rezultato bandymų duomenų rinkinyje, kuriame 47-asis iš 165 dalyvių.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, опишувам фузионски модел кој комбинира контекстуални и статички претставувања на зборови за пристапување до задачата Емоконтекст во натпреварот SemEval 2019. Моделот е базиран на две рекурентни неврални мрежи, првата се храни со најновиот дел од ELMo длабоко контекстуално претставување на зборовите, а втората се храни со статичко вградување Word2Vec додадено со 10-димензионален вектор на afective зборови. Предложениот модел се споредува со два основни модели базирани на статичко претставување на зборовите и контекстуално претставување на зборовите, одделно. Мојот пристап официјално постигна 0,7278 микросекрани оценки Ф1 на тестовите податоци, рангирајќи се на 47-тото место од 165 учесници.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഞാന്\u200d ഒരു ഫ്യൂഷന്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d വിവരിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. സെമോക്ടെക്സ്റ്റ് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. എമോക്സ്റ്റ്  The model is based on two Recurrent Neural Networks, the first one is fed with a state-of-the-art ELMo deep contextualized word representation and the second one is fed with a static Word2Vec embedding augmented with 10-dimensional affective word feature vector.  പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു സ്റ്റാറ്റിക്ക് വാക്ക് പ്രതിനിധിയും വാക്ക് പ്രതിനിധിയും വേര്\u200dഡ് പ്രതിനിധിയും അടിസ്ഥാ എന്\u200dറെ സമ്പാദം ഓഫിക്കല്\u200d 0. 7278 മൈക്രോവേര്\u200dവെര്\u200dജേജ് എഫ്\u200c1 സ്കോര്\u200d എത്തി. 165 ല്\u200d പങ്കുകാരില്\u200d നിന്ന് 47th റാങ്ങ് ചെയ്തു.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, saya menggambarkan model fusi yang menggabungkan perwakilan perkataan kontekstual dan statik untuk mendekati tugas EmoContext dalam pertandingan SemEval 2019. Model ini berdasarkan dua Rangkaian Neural Terulang, yang pertama diberi makan dengan perkembangan perkataan ELMo yang terkontekstualisasi dalam dan yang kedua diberi makan dengan penyembedding Word2Vec statik ditambah dengan vektor ciri perkataan afektif 10-dimensi. Model yang diusulkan dibandingkan dengan dua model asas berdasarkan perwakilan perkataan statik dan perwakilan perkataan kontekstualisasi, secara terpisah. Pendekatan saya secara rasmi mencapai skor F1 0.7278 mikrorata pada set data ujian, peringkat 47 daripada 165 peserta.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, niddeskrivi mudell ta’ fużjoni li jgħaqqad rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kliem kuntestwalizzati u statiċi biex jiġi approċċ il-kompitu EmoContext fil-kompetizzjoni SemEval 2019. Il-mudell huwa bbażat fuq żewġ Netwerks Newrali Rikorrenti, l-ewwel wieħed jiġi alimentat b’rappreżentazzjoni tal-kliem kuntestwalizzata profonda tal-ELMo l-aktar avvanzata u t-tieni wieħed jiġi alimentat b’inkorporazzjoni Word2Vec statika miżjuda b’vettur tal-karatteristiċi tal-kliem affettivi 10-dimensjonali. Il-mudell propost jitqabbel ma’ żewġ mudelli ta’ linja bażi bbażati fuq rappreżentazzjoni statika tal-kelma u rappreżentazzjoni kuntestwalizzata tal-kelma, separatament. L-approċċ tiegħi laħaq uffiċjalment 0.7278 punteġġ F1 b’mikromedja fuq is-sett tad-dejta tat-testijiet, li kklassifika l-47 minn 165 parteċipant.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр би 2019 оны SemEval өрсөлдөөнд EmoContext-ын ажлыг ойртохын тулд орчин үеийн төлөөлөлт болон тодорхойлолтой хэмжээний нэгдэл загварыг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ загвар нь хоёр дахин дахин дахин сэтгэл мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд суурилсан. Эхний нь 10-хэмжээст нөлөөлдөг үгний вектор дээр нэмэгдсэн хэмжээст Word2Vec-тай хооллогддог. Хоёр суурь шугам загвартай харьцуулагддаг. Статикийн үг илэрхийлэлтэй, орчин үг илэрхийлэлтэй. Миний арга хэмжээнд 0.7278 бичил дундаж F1 оноо шалгалтын өгөгдлийн санд гарч ирсэн. 165 оролцогчдын 47дундаж байна.', 'no': 'I denne papiret beskriver eg ein fusjonsmodul som kombinerer kontekstualiserte og statiske ordrepresentasjonar for å nærme EmoContext-oppgåva i semiEval 2019. Modellen er basert på to gjentakelige neuralnettverk, den første vert fed med ein dyp kontekstualisert ordrepresentasjon av ELMo- tilstanden, og den andre vert fed med ein statisk Word2Vec- innbygging augmentert med 10- dimensjonal effektiv ordfunksjonsvektor. Det foreslåde modellen er samanlikna med to baseline modeller basert på eit statisk ordrepresentasjon og ein kontekstualisert ordrepresentasjon, separe. Min tilnærming oppnådd offisielt 0,7278 mikrogjennomsnitt F1-poeng på testdatasettet, som rangerer 47de av 165 deltakarar.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, 2019 жылдың semiEval конкурсында EmoContext тапсырмасына көмектесу үшін контекстуалды және статикалық сөздерді біріктіру үшін біріктіру үлгісін таңдадым. Бұл үлгі екі қайталанатын невралдық желіне негізделген, біріншісі ELMo күйінде тәртіпсіздік сөздерді көрсетеді, екіншісі 10- деңгейіндегі сөз функциялық векторымен ендірілген стандартты Word2Vec- ге ендірілген. Келтірілген үлгі статикалық сөздерді көрсетуге негізгі екі жол үлгілерімен салыстырылады және контекстік сөздерді көрсетуге арналған. Менің тәсілім официально 0,7278 микроорташа F1 нүктесін тексеру деректер жинағында жеткізді. 47- ші 165 қатысушылардан.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisuję model fuzji łączący kontekstualizowane i statyczne reprezentacje słów dla podejścia do zadania EmoContext w konkursie SemEval 2019. Model oparty jest na dwóch sieciach powtarzających się neuronów, pierwsza jest zasilana najnowocześniejszą ELMo głęboko kontekstualizowaną reprezentacją słów, a druga jest zasilana statycznym osadzeniem Word2Vec, rozszerzonym o 10-wymiarowy wektor efektywnych cech słowa. Proponowany model porównuje się z dwoma modelami bazowymi opartymi na statycznej reprezentacji słowa i kontekstualizowanej reprezentacji słowa, oddzielnie. Moje podejście osiągnęło oficjalnie 0.7278 mikrośrednią ocenę F1 w zestawie danych testowych, która pozyskała 47th spośród 165 uczestników.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, descriu un model de fuziune care combină reprezentări de cuvinte contextualizate și statice pentru abordarea sarcinii EmoContent în cadrul concursului SemEval 2019. Modelul se bazează pe două Rețele Neurale Recurente, prima este alimentată cu o reprezentare de cuvânt contextualizată ELMo de ultimă generație, iar cea de-a doua este alimentată cu o încorporare statică Word2Vec amplificată cu vector afectiv 10-dimensional. Modelul propus este comparat cu două modele de bază bazate pe o reprezentare statică a cuvintelor și o reprezentare contextualizată a cuvintelor, separat. Abordarea mea a obținut oficial 0,7278 scor F1 micromediu pe setul de date al testului, clasându-se pe locul 47 din 165 de participanți.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru opisujem model fuzije koji kombinuje kontekstualizirane i statične reči zastupanja za približavanje zadatka EmoContext u natjecanju u semiEvalu 2019. godine. Model se temelji na dva ponovna neuronska mreža, prva se hrani dubokom kontekstualizovanom rečima ELMo-a, a druga se hrani statičnim Word2Vec-om, povećanom sa 10-dimenzionalnim uticajnim vektorom reči. Predloženi model se uspoređuje sa dva osnovna model a na temelju zastupanja statičnih reèi i kontekstualizacije reèi, odvojeno. Moj pristup je službeno postigao 0,7278 mikrosrednji rezultat F1 na testnom setu podataka, èinjeći 47ti od 165 sudionika.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ මම සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාස කරනවා සම්බන්ධ විදියට සහ ස්ථිර වචන ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා 2019 සම්බන්ධ විදියට The Model is based on both recurrent neural Netwarks, the first one is fed with a state-of-the-art ELMo depth Contextuolized word presentation and the first one is fed with a static Word2Vec integrating grew with 10-size affective word character vettor. ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු මොඩල් දෙකට පරිස්සම් කරනවා ස්ථිර වචන ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ පරිස්සම් වචන ප්\u200dරයෝජනය, වෙනස් විතරක මගේ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් 0.7278 මයික්රෝවර්ගයෙන් F1 ස්කෝර් එක පරීක්ෂණ දත්ත සූදානයෙන් ලැබුණා, සාමාණ', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaan ku qorayaa model fusion ah oo ku soo bandhigaya qaybaha warqada oo la soo bandhigay si uu u soo dhowaado qasabka EmoContext ee SemEval 2019. Tusaale wuxuu ku saleysan yahay laba Internetka Neural ee soo socday, kii ugu horreeyey wuxuu ku quudiyaa wadan-art ELMo oo aad u deegaan word representation, kii labaadna waxaa lagu quudiyey qoraal 2Vec oo ku qoran 10-dimensional word feature vector. Tusaale la soo jeedo waxaa la barbaran karaa laba model oo ku saleysan qoraal static ah iyo mid ka mid ah hadal la soo jeedo si gaar ah. Dhaqdhaqaalahaygu waxay si rasmi ah u gaadhay 0.7278 microaveraged F1 score oo ku qoran taariikhda imtixaanka, waxayna ka mid noqotay 165 qayb-ka 47aad.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats beskriver jag en fusionsmodell som kombinerar kontextualiserade och statiska ordrepresentationer för att närma sig EmoContent-uppgiften i tävlingen SemEval 2019. Modellen är baserad på två återkommande neurala nätverk, den första matas med en state-of-the-art ELMo djup kontextualiserad ordrepresentation och den andra matas med en statisk Word2Vec inbäddning förstärkt med 10-dimensionell affektiv ordfunktion vektor. Den föreslagna modellen jämförs med två basmodeller baserade på en statisk ordrepresentation och en kontextualiserad ordrepresentation, separat. Mitt tillvägagångssätt uppnådde officiellt 0,7278 mikromedelvärde F1 poäng på testdatasetet, vilket rankade 47:e av 165 deltagare.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நான் ஒரு குளிர்ச்சி மாதிரி விவரிக்கிறேன் செம்வால் 2019 போட்டியில் EmoContext பணியை நெருங்குவதற்கான முன்னிருப்ப The model is based on two Recurrent Neural Networks, the first one is fed with a state- of-the-art ELMo deep contextualized word representation and the second one is fed with a static Word2Vec embedding with a 10- dimensional effects word feature vector. முந்திருக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி ஒரு நிலையான வார்த்தை குறிப்பிடுதல் அடிப்படையில் இரண்டு அடிப்படைக்கோடு மாதிரிகளுடன் ஒப் என் நெறிமுறையில் தேர்வு தரவுத்தளத்தில் 0.7278 மைக்ராவெர்வர் அடைந்தது, 165 ல் 47வது வரிசையில் இருந்து பங்குகிறவர்கள்.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں میں ایک فوسین موڈل کی توصیف کرتا ہوں جس میں سماول 2019 کی مسابقه میں EmoContext کے پاس حاضر ہونے کے لئے متوسط اور استٹیکل لفظ کی توصیف کرتا ہے. Model is based on two Recurrent Neural Networks, the first one is fed with a state-of-the-art ELMo deep contextualized word representation and the second one is fed with a static Word2Vec embedding increased with 10-dimensional word feature vector. پیشنهاد کی موڈل دو بنیس لین موڈل کے مطابق مقابلہ کی جاتی ہے ایک ایسی لفظ نمایش پر اور ایک متوسط لفظ نمایش کے مطابق۔ میری تقریبا رسمی طور پر 0.7278 میکروفوں نے آزمائش ڈیٹ سٹ پر F1 اسکور کو متوسط کیا تھا، اور 165 مشرکوں میں سے 47th رقم تھا۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda men SemEval 2019 davomida EmoContext вазифасига яқинлашишимга тахминланган ва static so'zlarni birlashtirilgan fusion modelini aytaman. Name Name Mening fikrim 165 participlardan 47inchi qismini boshlagan F1 qismiga erishildi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, tôi mô tả một mô hình ghép kết hợp các biểu tượng từ ngữ định hình và tĩnh để tiếp cận nhiệm vụ EmoContact trong cuộc thi SemEvl dùm dùm dùm dùm dùm dùm dùm dùm dùm dùm một. The model is based on two Recurent Neural Networks, the first one is fed with a state-of-the-art-the-love ElMo deep contTắt được Từ representation, and the other one is fed with a tĩnh Word2Vec embedding additioned with 10-dimensional affive word featipal. Mô hình đề xuất được so sánh với hai mô hình cơ bản dựa trên mô tả từ tĩnh và mô tả từ ngữ định, riêng biệt. Cách tiếp cận của tôi đã chính thức 0.727 con số F1 trên tập tin thử nghiệm, xếp hạng 47th khỏi 165.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel beschrijf ik een fusiemodel dat contextuele en statische woordrepresentaties combineert voor het benaderen van de EmoContext taak in de SemEval 2019 competitie. Het model is gebaseerd op twee Recurrent Neural Networks, het eerste is gevoed met een state-of-the-art ELMo diepe contextualiseerde woordrepresentatie en het tweede wordt gevoed met een statische Word2Vec embedded uitgebreid met 10-dimensionale affectieve woordkenmerkvector. Het voorgestelde model wordt vergeleken met twee basismodellen gebaseerd op een statische woordweergave en een contextualiseerde woordweergave, afzonderlijk. Mijn aanpak behaalde officieel 0.7278 microgemiddelde F1 score op de testdataset, met een 47e van 165 deelnemers.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru opisujem model fuzije koji kombinira kontekstualizirane i statične riječi za približavanje zadatka EmoContext u natjecanju u polovini 2019. godine. Model se temelji na dva ponovna neuronska mreža, prva se hrani dubokom kontekstualizacijom riječi ELMo-a, a druga se hrani statičnim Word2Vec-om, povećanom s 10-dimenzionalnim utjecajnim vektorom riječi. Predloženi model se uspoređuje s dvije osnovne modele na temelju zastupanja statičnih riječi i kontekstualizacije riječi, odvojeno. Moj pristup je službeno postigao 0,7278 mikrosrednji rezultat F1 na testovoj seti podataka, čineći 47ti od 165 učesnika.', 'da': 'I denne artikel beskriver jeg en fusionsmodel, der kombinerer kontekstualiserede og statiske ordrepræsentationer for at nærme sig EmoContent-opgaven i SemEval 2019 konkurrencen. Modellen er baseret på to tilbagevendende neurale netværk, den første er fodret med en state-of-the-art ELMo dyb kontekstualiseret ordrepræsentation og den anden er fodret med en statisk Word2Vec indlejring forstærket med 10-dimensional affektiv ordfunktion vektor. Den foreslåede model sammenlignes med to oprindelige modeller baseret på en statisk ordrepræsentation og en kontekstualiseret ordrepræsentation separat. Min tilgang opnåede officielt 0,7278 mikrogennemsnit F1 score på testdatasættet og rangerede 47. ud af 165 deltagere.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия описвам модел на синтез, съчетаващ контекстуализирани и статични думи за подхождане на задачата Емоконтекс в конкурса СемЕвал 2019. Моделът се основава на две повтарящи се неврални мрежи, първата е захранвана с най-съвременно ЕЛМО дълбоко контекстуализирано слово представяне, а втората е захранвана със статично вграждане, увеличено с 10-измерен афективен вектор на словото. Предложеният модел се сравнява с два базови модела, базирани на статично представяне на думи и контекстуализирано представяне на думи, поотделно. Моят подход постигна официално 0.7278 микросредна оценка на теста, класирайки се на 47-о място от 165 участници.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag beschreibe ich ein Fusionsmodell, das kontextualisierte und statische Wortdarstellungen kombiniert, um die EmoContext-Aufgabe im SemEval 2019-Wettbewerb anzugehen. Das Modell basiert auf zwei wiederkehrenden neuronalen Netzwerken, das erste wird mit einer hochmodernen ELMo-tiefen kontextualisierten Wortdarstellung gespeist und das zweite wird mit einer statischen Word2Vec-Einbettung gespeist, die mit 10-dimensionalen affektiven Wortmerkmalvektoren erweitert wird. Das vorgeschlagene Modell wird mit zwei Basismodellen verglichen, die auf einer statischen Wortdarstellung und einer kontextualisierten Wortdarstellung basieren. Mein Ansatz erzielte offiziell 0.7278 mikrogemittelte F1-Punktzahl im Testdatensatz und rangierte auf dem 47sten von 165 Teilnehmern.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, saya menggambarkan model fusi yang menggabungkan persembahan kata kontekstualisasi dan statis untuk mendekati tugas EmoContext dalam kompetisi SemEval 2019. Model ini berdasarkan dua Jaringan Neural Sekali-kali, yang pertama diberi makan dengan represisi kata yang terkini dalam kontekstualisasi ELMo dan yang kedua diberi makan dengan pembangunan Word2Vec statis ditambah dengan vektor kata afektif 10-dimensi. Model yang diusulkan dibandingkan dengan dua model dasar berdasarkan representation kata statis dan representation kata kontekstualisasi, secara terpisah. Pendekatanku secara resmi mencapai skor F1 0,7278 mikrorata pada set data tes, tingkat 47 dari 165 peserta.', 'ko': '본고에서 저는 어경화와 정적 단어 표현을 결합시켜 Sem Eval 2019 경연에서 EmoContext 임무를 처리하는 융합 모델을 묘사했습니다.이 모델은 두 개의 귀속 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 첫 번째 신경 네트워크는 가장 선진적인 ELMo 심층 언어 환경화 단어로 표시하고 두 번째 신경 네트워크는 정적 Word2Vec 삽입에 10차원 감정 단어 특징 벡터를 더한다.이 모델은 정태어 표시와 어경화어 표시를 바탕으로 하는 두 가지 기선 모델과 비교했다.나의 방법은 테스트 데이터 집합에서 정식으로 0.7278의 F1 미평균 점수를 얻어 165명의 참여자 중 47위에 올랐다.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, ninaelezea muundo wa uchochezi unaoanganisha uwakilishi wa maneno yaliyotokana na kutangaza kwa ajili ya kukaribia kazi ya EmoContext katika mashindano ya SemEval 2019. Mradi huu una msingi wa mitandao ya Neurali mbili yanayoendelea, kwanza inaruzukiwa na serikali ya sanaa ya ELMo yenye uwakilishaji wa maneno ya kina yanayotajwa sana na pili inaruhusiwa na ukurasa wa Word2Vec unaoandaliwa na vector inayoathirika kwa maneno 10. Mfano huu unapendekezwa unalinganishwa na mifano miwili ya msingi inayohusiana na uwakilishi wa neno la static na uwakilishi wa neno linalochanganyika, tofauti. Hatua yangu ilifanikiwa rasmi ya vifaa vya ndege 0.7278 vya F1 kwenye seti ya taarifa za jaribio, yenye rangi ya 47 kati ya washiriki 165.', 'tr': "Bu kağıt içinde, semEval 2019 yarışmasında EmoContext görevini yaklaştırmak için bir birleşme modelini tasvir ediyorum. Bu model ikisini tekrarlanan Neural Networks'e dayanan, ilkinji olanı 10-boyutlu etkileşimli kelime vektöre fedildi. Önerlenen nusga statik söz temizlenmesine we bölümlenen söz temizlenmesine dayanýar. Meniň ýazam resmi ýagdaýda 0.7278 synaglaryň barlygy barlygy bardyr, 165-nji çykyşçylardan 47nji sany derejesi bardyr.", 'af': "In hierdie papier beskrywe ek 'n fusion model wat samenfoeg konteksualiseerde en statiese woord voorstellings vir die EmoContext-taak in die semiEval 2019-samenfoeking. Die model is gebaseer op twee Herhaalde Neurale Netwerke, die eerste een is verskaf met 'n state- of- the- art ELMo diep contextualiseerde woord voorstelling en die tweede een is verskaf met 'n statiese Word2Vec inbêding wat met 10- dimensionale afvloekte woord funksie vektor verskaf word. Die voorgestelde model is vergelyk met twee basisline modele gebaseer op 'n statiese woord voorstelling en 'n contextualiseerde woord voorstelling, indien. My toegang het offisieel 0,7278 mikrogemiddelde F1 skaal op die toets datastel bereik, ranking 47de van 165 deelnaders.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, përshkruaj një model fuzioni që kombinon përfaqësime të fjalëve kontekstuale dhe statike për afrimin e detyrës EmoContext në konkurrimin SemEval 2019. Modeli është bazuar në dy rrjete neurale të përsëritura, e para është ushqyer me një përfaqësim të thellë kontekstualizuar ELMo dhe e dyta është ushqyer me një përfshirje statike Word2Vec të shtuar me vektor 10-dimensional afektiv të fjalës. Modeli i propozuar krahasohet me dy modele bazë bazuar në një përfaqësim statik fjalësh dhe një përfaqësim kontekstual fjalësh, veçanërisht. Përqasja ime arriti zyrtarisht 0.7278 pikë F1 me mikromesatare në grupin e të dhënave të testit, duke renditur të 47-in nga 165 pjesëmarrës.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ ውስጥ በSemEval 2019 ተቃውሞ የEmoContext አድራጊውን ለመቅረብ በተቃራኒ እና የstatic ቃላት መልዕክቶች ለመቀላቀል የፎስሽን ሞዴል እገልጻለሁ፡፡ ሞዴል በሁለት መደጋገሚያ ኔural Network ላይ ነው፤ አንደኛው በELMo-የ-የ-የ-አርእስት-state-of-the-art word representation እና ሁለተኛውም በ10-dimensional በሚያሳየው ቃላት የፊደል መክፈት vector ነው፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሞዴል በተለየ የstatic ቃላት መልዕክት እና የቃላት መልዕክት በተለየ ሁለት ባቢሎን ምሳሌዎች ይተካከላል፡፡ My approach achieved officially 0.7278 microaveraged F1 score on the test dataset, ranking 47th out of 165 participants.', 'az': 'Bu kağıtda, 2019-ci SemEval yarışmasında EmoContext işin ə yaxınlaşmaq üçün müxtəlif və statik sözləri birləşdirilən fusion modelini tanımadım. Model iki yenidən Nöral Netiklərə dayanılır, ilk birini 10-ölçülük təsirli söz vektörü ilə art ırılmış nöral şəklində ELMo-in derin təsirli söz təsiri ilə beslənir. Önülləşdirilmiş modellər statik söz göstəricisi və müxtəlif söz göstəricisi ilə müəyyən edilir. Mənim tərzim resmi olaraq 0,7278 mikroortalıq F1 dərəcəsini sınamaq verilən qutusunda, 165-ci dərəcələrdən 47-ci dərəcəsinə nail oldu.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ ես նկարագրում եմ ֆունկցիոն մոդելը, որը համադրում է կոնտեքստիալ և կայուն բառերի ներկայացումներ, որպեսզի մոտենանք EmoConxt-ի առաջադրանքին 2019 թվականի կիսագնդի մրցակցության ժամանակ: Մոդելը հիմնված է երկու կրկնօրինակ նյարդային ցանցերի վրա, առաջինը կերակրվում է ELMo խորը կոնտեքստիալ բառերի արտահայտությամբ, իսկ երկրորդը կերակրվում է Word2vec-ի կայուն ներդրումով, որը ավելացված է 10-չափ ազդեցիկ բառի հատկության վեկտորով: Առաջարկված մոդելը համեմատում է երկու հիմնական մոդելների հետ, որոնք հիմնված են բառերի կայուն ներկայացման և բառերի կոնտեքստիալ ներկայացման վրա: Իմ մոտեցումը պաշտոնապես հասավ 0.7278 միկրոմիջին F1 գնահատականի թեստի տվյալների համակարգի վրա, որն 165 մասնակիցներից 47-րդ գնահատականն էր:', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমি একটি ফ্যাশন মডেল বর্ণনা করি যেটা প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতা এবং স্টেটিক শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে সেমইভাল এই মডেলটি পুনরায় দুটি নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্কের উপর ভিত্তি করেছে, প্রথমটি একটি রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প-এলমো গভীরভাবে প্রতিনিধিত্বিত শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্ব দিয়ে খাওয়া হয়েছে এবং দ্বিতীয় শব্দে প্রস্তাবিত মডেলের তুলনায় দুই বেস্টিক শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্ব এবং একটি প্রতিনিধিত্বিত শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বের উপর ভিত্ত আমার প্রতিযোগিতা আনুষ্ঠানিকভাবে ০. 7278 মাইক্রোভারেজের ফেসবুকে পরীক্ষা ডাটাসেটে পৌঁছেছে, যা ১৬৫ টি অংশগ্রহণকারী', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، من یک مدل فشار را توصیف می\u200cکنم که با نمایش\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای متوسط و ثابت برای نزدیک به کار EmoContext در مسابقه\u200cی نیم\u200cEval 2019 متصل می\u200cشود. این مدل بر روی دو شبکه عصبی دوباره متصل شده است، اولین بار با یک نمایش کلمه عمیق ELMo در حالت هنر تغذیه می\u200cشود و دومین بار با یک نمایش کلمه ثابت Word2Vec تغذیه می\u200cشود که با ویکتور کلمه ۱۰ بعدی تاثیر می\u200cدهد. این مدل پیشنهاد با دو مدل بنیادی بر اساس یک نمایش کلمه ثابت و یک نمایش کلمه متوسط جدا مقایسه می\u200cشود. دستور من به طور رسمی 0.7278 میکرومتوسط در مجموعه داده\u200cهای آزمایش اف 1 را رسید و 47مین از 165 شرکت کنندگان را درجه می\u200cگیرد.', 'ca': "En aquest article, descric un model de fusió que combina representacions de paraules contextualitzades i estatiques per aproximar-se a la tasca EmoContext de la competició SemEval 2019. El model està basat en dues xarxes neurals recurrents, la primera està alimentada d'una representació de paraules contextualitzades profundament ELMo i la segona està alimentada d'un Word2Vec estàtic incrementat amb un vector de característiques afectives de paraules de 10 dimensions. El model proposat es compara amb dos models de base basats en una representació estàtica de paraules i una representació contextualitzada de paraules, per separat. El meu enfocament va aconseguir oficialment 0,7278 puntuacions F1 de micromitjana en el conjunt de dades de prova, classificant-se en 47è de 165 participants.", 'bs': 'U ovom papiru opisujem model fuzije koji kombinuje kontekstualizirane i statične riječi za pristupanje zadatka EmoContext-a u natjecanju u semiEvalu 2019. Model se temelji na dva ponovna neuronska mreža, prva se hrani dubokom kontekstualizacijom riječi ELMo-a, a druga se hrani statičnim Word2Vec-om, povećanom sa 10-dimenzionalnim uticajnim vektorom riječi. Predloženi model se uspoređuje sa dvije osnovne modele na temelju zastupanja statičnih riječi i kontekstualizacije riječi, odvojeno. Moj pristup je službeno postigao 0,7278 mikrosrednji rezultat F1 na testnom setu podataka, u kojoj je 47ti od 165 učesnika.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku popisuji fúzní model kombinující kontextualizované a statické reprezentace slov pro přístup k úkolu EmoContext v soutěži SemEval 2019. Model je založen na dvou recidivních neuronových sítích, první je napájen nejmodernější ELMo hlubokou kontextualizovanou reprezentací slov a druhá je napájena statickým vložením Word2Vec rozšířeným 10dimenzionálním afektivním vektorem slovních prvků. Navržený model je porovnáván se dvěma základními modely založenými na statické reprezentaci slova a kontextualizované reprezentaci slova, odděleně. Můj přístup dosáhl oficiálně 0.7278 mikroprůměrného skóre F1 v testovacím datovém souboru, který pořadí 47tou z 165 účastníků.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvailen fuusiomallia, joka yhdistää kontekstualisoituja ja staattisia sanaesityksiä EmoContext-tehtävän lähestymiseksi SemEval 2019 -kilpailussa. Malli perustuu kahteen Toistuviin hermoverkkoihin, joista ensimmäiseen syötetään uusinta tekniikkaa edustava ELMo-syväkontekstualisoitu sanaesitys ja toiseen syötetään staattinen Word2Vec-upotus, jota täydennetään 10-ulotteisella affektiivisellä sanafunktiovektorilla. Ehdotettua mallia verrataan kahteen perusmalliin, jotka perustuvat staattiseen sanaesitykseen ja kontekstualisoituun sanaesitykseen erikseen. Lähestymistapamme saavutti virallisesti 0,7278 mikrokeskiarvon F1-pisteen testiaineistossa, sijoittuen 47. sijalle 165 osallistujasta.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös kirjeldan kontekstilisi ja staatilisi sõnaesitusi kombineerivat fusioonimudelit EmoContext ülesandele lähenemiseks SemEval 2019 konkursil. Mudel põhineb kahel korduval närvivõrgul, esimesel on kaasaegne ELMo sügav kontekstualiseeritud sõna esitus ja teisel on staatiline Word2Vec põimitud 10-dimensioonilise afektiivse sõna funktsiooni vektor. Kavandatud mudelit võrreldakse kahe baasmudeliga, mis põhinevad staatilisel sõnaesitusel ja kontekstilisel sõnaesitusel eraldi. Minu lähenemine saavutas ametlikult 0,7278 mikrokeskmise F1 skoori testi andmekogumis, olles 165 osalejast 47. kohal.', 'jv': 'Nang pepulan iki, aku sumelan akeh model kanggo ngilangno contextual lan kelas statik gawe nguasai nggawe task emuo context kanggo ngilangno atik-atik semebal 2011. The model is basate on Two recurent Neral networks, the first one is charged with a state-of-the-arts ETMo deep contextual word representation and the second one is charged with a Statc Word 2vec embedding agemented with 10-Dimensial affect word character vector. Laptop" and "Desktop Ndheke sampeyan wis rampunika dipoleh barang 0.7 pitik, dadi F1 kuwi nggawe dataset tentang, sampeyan nganggo mbéggo-mbéggo warni 480 sing sampeyan karo 16.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אני מתאר מודל פיזוזיה שמשולב מייצגות מילים קונטוקטואליזציות וסטטיות כדי להתקרב למשימה EmoContext בתחרות SemEval 2019. הדוגמא מבוססת על שני רשתות נוירוליות חוזרות, הראשונה מאוכלת עם מייצג מילים עמוק קונטוקטואליזציה של ELMo במצב מוקדם, והשנייה מאוכלת עם מייצג Word2Vec סטטי מוגדל עם ווקטור מילים חיובי 10 מימדי. The proposed model is compared with two baseline models based on a static word representation and a contextualized word representation, separately.  הגישה שלי השיגה באופן רשמי 0.7278 נקודת F1 בממוצע של 0.7278 על קבוצת הנתונים הבדיקות, מדרגה 47 מתוך 165 משתתפים.', 'sk': 'V prispevku opisujem fuzijski model, ki združuje kontekstualizirane in statične besedne predstavitve za pristop k nalogi EmoContext na tekmovanju SemEval 2019. Model temelji na dveh ponavljajočih se živčnih omrežjih, prvo je podprto z najsodobnejšo ELMo globoko kontekstualizirano besedno reprezentacijo, drugo pa s statično vgradnjo Word2Vec, povečano z 10-dimenzionalnim afektivnim besednim vektorjem značilnosti. Predlagani model primerjamo z dvema osnovnima modeloma, ki temeljijo na statičnem predstavitvi besed in kontekstualiziranem predstavitvi besed, ločeno. Moj pristop je uradno dosegel 0,7278 mikropovprečnega rezultata F1 na testnem naboru podatkov in uvrstil 47. mesto od 165 udeležencev.', 'ha': 'A cikin wannan takardan, na bayyana wani misalin fusion mai haɗa wanda ya haɗa konstanta da static maganar macalli dõmin ya kusantar da aikin EmoContContent a cikin shirin Semeval 2019. @ info: status Ana sami da shirin da aka sake shi a sami da misãlai biyu masu basketa, a kan wani mai halartawa na static, da wani mai wakilishi na maganar a haɗe da shi, separately. Mikawarata ya isa matsayin F1 na zartar da rasmi 0.1778 a kan matsayin jarraba, ranning 47th daga 165 mãsu shirin karatun.', 'bo': 'ངས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བཏུབ་པའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་གི་མཉམ་སྒྲིག The model is based on two Recurrent Neural Networks, the first one is fed with a state-of-the-art ELMo deep contextualized word representation and the second one is fed with a static Word2Vec embedding augmented with 10-dimensional affective word feature vector. དམིགས་འཛུགས་པའི་མ་གཟུགས་འདི་ནི་རྨང་གཞིའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གཉིས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་བ་ཡོད་པ། ངའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ནི་རྩ་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དེ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་ཚད་རྒྱ་ནག་ནང་གི་ཚད་གཞི་ཚོགས་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྟར་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་ཚད་ལྟར་འགྲོ་'}
{'en': 'E-LSTM at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Semantic and Sentimental Features Retention for Emotion Detection in Text', 'ar': 'E-LSTM في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: الاحتفاظ بالميزات الدلالية والعاطفية للكشف عن المشاعر في النص', 'pt': 'E-LSTM na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Retenção de Recursos Semânticos e Sentimentais para Detecção de Emoções em Texto', 'es': 'E-LSTM en SemeVal-2019 Tarea 3: Retención de características semánticas y sentimentales para la detección de emociones en el texto', 'fr': 'E-LSTM au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Rétention des caractéristiques sémantiques et sentimentales pour la détection des émotions dans le texte', 'ja': 'E - LSTM at SemEval -2019 Task 3: Semantic and Sentimental Features Retention for Emotion Detection in Text', 'zh': 'E-LSTM在SemEval-2019务3:情检语义情存焉', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 3 पर E-LSTM: पाठ में भावना का पता लगाने के लिए शब्दार्थ और भावनात्मक विशेषताएं प्रतिधारण', 'ru': 'E-LSTM на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Удержание семантических и сентиментальных особенностей для обнаружения эмоций в тексте', 'ga': 'E-LSTM ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Gnéithe Séimeantacha agus Mothúchánacha a Choinneáil chun Mothúchán a Bhrath sa Téacs', 'ka': 'E-LSTM semiEval-2019 დავალება 3: სენტიკური და სენტიმენტალური ფუტურებები ტექსტიში ემოციონის განახლებისთვის დაეყენება', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Διατήρηση σημασιολογικών και συναισθηματικών χαρακτηριστικών για την ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων στο κείμενο', 'hu': 'E-LSTM a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: Szemantikus és érzelmi jellemzők megőrzése az érzelmek felismeréséhez a szövegben', 'it': 'E-LSTM a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Conservazione delle caratteristiche semantiche e sentimentali per la rilevazione delle emozioni nel testo', 'kk': 'E- LSTM жарым- 2019 тапсырмасында 3: мәтінде көңіл тапсырмалар үшін семантикалық және сентиметалдық қасиеттері', 'mk': 'E-LSTM at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Semantic and Sentimental Features Retention for Emotion Detection in Text', 'ms': 'E-LSTM pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Kekalkan Features Semantic and Sentimental untuk Pengesanan Emotion dalam Teks', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3: എംഎംഎസ്റ്റിയോണ്\u200d ഡിറ്റീഷനിനുള്ള വിശേഷതകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിശേഷതകള്\u200d', 'lt': 'E-LSTM at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Semantic and Sentimental Features Retention for Emotion Detection in Text', 'mn': 'E-LSTM at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Semantic and Sentimental Features Retention for Emotion Detection in Text', 'mt': 'E-LSTM f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 3: Żamma ta’ Karatteristiċi Semantiċi u Sentimentali għad-Detezzjoni ta’ Emożizzjonijiet fit-Test', 'no': 'E-LSTM ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3: Semantiske og sentimentale funksjonar retning for følelsesoppdaging i tekst', 'pl': 'E-LSTM w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Zachowanie cech semantycznych i sentymentalnych dla wykrywania emocji w tekście', 'sr': 'E-LSTM na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: Semantičke i sentimentalne funkcije zadržavanje za detekciju emocija u tekstu', 'ro': 'E-LSTM la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Păstrarea caracteristicilor semantice și sentimentale pentru detectarea emoțiilor în text', 'si': 'E-LSTM at Half-2019 Label 3: semantic and Sentimental Featuries Keeping for Emotion Detection in Text', 'so': 'E-LSTM at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Semantic and Sentimental Features Retention for Emotion in text', 'sv': 'E-LSTM på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Behåll semantiska och känslomässiga funktioner för känslodetektering i text', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணியில் E- LSTM: உரையில் உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான உணர்வு மற்றும் உணர்வு குணங்கள்', 'ur': 'سیم ایویل-2019 ٹاکس 3 میں E-LSTM: سیمنٹی اور سنٹیمنٹی فوکتریاں ٹاکس میں احساسات شناسایی کے لئے حفاظت کریں', 'vi': 'E-LSTM tại Semkhai-thẩm 9 Task 3: Trung tâm và cảm xúc nạp về phần mềm để phát hiện cảm xúc trong văn bản', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifani 3: Emotion aniqlash uchun Semantic va Sentimental moslamalari', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Задържане на семантични и сантиментални характеристики за откриване на емоции в текста', 'nl': 'E-LSTM op SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Retentie van semantische en sentimentele kenmerken voor emotionele detectie in tekst', 'da': 'E-LSTM på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Tilbageholdelse af semantiske og følelsesmæssige funktioner til opdagelse af følelser i tekst', 'hr': 'E-LSTM na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 3: Semantičke i sentimentne funkcije zadržavanja za otkrivanje emocija u tekstu', 'de': 'E-LSTM bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Retention von semantischen und sentimentalen Merkmalen zur Emotionserkennung im Text', 'sw': 'E-LSTM katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 3: Tamko za Semantic and Sentimental Retention for Detection of Emotions in Text', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019의 E-LSTM 퀘스트 3: 텍스트에서 감정 검측의 의미와 감정 특징 보존', 'fa': 'E-LSTM at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Semantic and Sentimental Features Retention for Emotion Detection in Text', 'af': 'E-LSTM by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 3: Semantiese en Sentimentale eienskappe onthou vir Emosie Opdekking in Teks', 'tr': 'E-LSTM at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Semantic and Sentimental Features Retention for Emotion Detection in Text', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'sq': 'E-LSTM në SemEval-2019 Task 3: Semantic and Sentimental Features Retention for Emotion Detection in Text', 'hy': 'E-LSTM at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Semantic and Sentimental Features Retention for Emotion Detection in Text', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Gözəl 3: Metində Emotion Detection üçün Semantic and Sentimental Features Preservation for Emotion Detection at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Semantic and Sentimental Features', 'bn': 'E-LSTM at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Semantic and Sentimental Features Retention for Emotion Detection in Text', 'id': 'E-LSTM di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Semantik dan Sentimental Features Retention for Emotion Detection in Text', 'cs': 'Úkol 3: Zachování sémantických a sentimentálních vlastností pro detekci emocí v textu', 'bs': 'E-LSTM na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: Semantičke i sentimentne funkcije zadržavanja za detekciju emocija u tekstu', 'et': 'E-LSTM SemEval-2019 ülesanne 3: semantiliste ja sentimentaalsete omaduste säilitamine emotsioonide tuvastamiseks tekstis', 'fi': 'E-LSTM SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 3: Semanttisten ja sentimentaalisten ominaisuuksien säilyttäminen tunteiden havaitsemiseksi tekstissä', 'ca': 'E-LSTM a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Semantic and Sentimental Features Retention for Emotion Detection in Text', 'jv': 'E', 'ha': 'Email-LStam at SemEl-2019 Tafiyar 3: Semantic and SeTimntal Features retaining for Emotment in Text', 'sk': 'E-LSTM na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: ohranjanje semantičnih in sentimentalnih značilnosti za zaznavanje čustev v besedilu', 'bo': 'E-LSTM at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Semantic and Sentimental Features Retention for Emotion Detection in Text', 'he': 'E-LSTM ב SemEval-2019 משימה 3: תמונות סמנטיות וסימנטיות שמירה עבור גילוי רגשות בטקסט'}
{'en': 'This paper discusses the solution to the problem statement of the SemEval19 : EmoContext competition which is Contextual Emotion Detection in Texts. The paper includes the explanation of an architecture that I created by exploiting the embedding layers of Word2Vec and GloVe using LSTMs as memory unit cells which detects approximate emotion of chats between two people in the English language provided in the textual form. The set of emotions on which the model was trained was Happy, Sad, Angry and Others. The paper also includes an analysis of different conventional machine learning algorithms in comparison to E-LSTM.', 'ar': 'تناقش هذه الورقة الحل لمشكلة بيان SemEval19: مسابقة EmoContext وهي "اكتشاف المشاعر السياقية في النصوص". تتضمن الورقة شرحًا للبنية التي قمت بإنشائها من خلال استغلال طبقات التضمين لـ Word2Vec و GloVe باستخدام LSTMs كخلايا وحدة ذاكرة والتي تكتشف المشاعر التقريبية للمحادثات بين شخصين في اللغة الإنجليزية المقدمة في شكل نصي. مجموعة المشاعر التي تم تدريب النموذج عليها كانت سعيدة ، حزينة ، غاضبة وآخرين. تتضمن الورقة أيضًا تحليلًا لمختلف خوارزميات التعلم الآلي التقليدية مقارنةً بـ E-LSTM.', 'es': 'Este artículo discute la solución al planteamiento del problema de la competencia SemEval19: EmoContext que es «Detección de emociones contextuales en textos». El artículo incluye la explicación de una arquitectura que creé explotando las capas incrustadas de Word2Vec y GloVe usando LSTM como celdas de unidad de memoria que detectan la emoción aproximada de las conversaciones entre dos personas en el idioma inglés proporcionado en forma textual. El conjunto de emociones en las que se entrenó a la modelo fue Feliz, Triste, Enojado y Otros. El documento también incluye un análisis de diferentes algoritmos de aprendizaje automático convencionales en comparación con el E-LSTM.', 'pt': 'Este artigo discute a solução para a formulação do problema da competição SemEval19: EmoContext que é ”Contextual Emotion Detection in Texts”. O artigo inclui a explicação de uma arquitetura que criei explorando as camadas de incorporação de Word2Vec e GloVe usando LSTMs como células de unidade de memória que detectam emoções aproximadas de bate-papos entre duas pessoas no idioma inglês fornecido na forma textual. O conjunto de emoções em que o modelo foi treinado foi Feliz, Triste, Irritado e Outros. O artigo também inclui uma análise de diferentes algoritmos convencionais de aprendizado de máquina em comparação com o E-LSTM.', 'fr': "Cet article traite de la solution à l'énoncé de problème du concours SeMeVal19\xa0: EmoContext qui est «\xa0Détection contextuelle des émotions dans les textes\xa0». L'article inclut l'explication d'une architecture que j'ai créée en exploitant les couches d'intégration de Word2Vec et Glove en utilisant des LSTM comme cellules d'unité de mémoire qui détectent l'émotion approximative des conversations entre deux personnes dans la langue anglaise fournie sous forme textuelle. L'ensemble d'émotions sur lequel le modèle a été formé était Happy, Sad, Angry and Others. L'article comprend également une analyse de différents algorithmes d'apprentissage automatique conventionnels par rapport à E-LSTM.", 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 19: EmoContextコンペティションの問題文「テキストにおける文脈的感情の検出」に対する解決策について述べる。LSTMをメモリ単位セルとして利用したWord 2 VecとGloVeの埋め込みレイヤーを活用して作成したアーキテクチャの説明を含み、テキスト形式で提供される英語の2人のチャットのおおよその感情を検出します。モデルが訓練された感情のセットは、Happy、Sad、Angry、Othersでした。E - LSTMと比較した従来の機械学習アルゴリズムの分析も含まれている。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval19 की समस्या कथन के समाधान पर चर्चा करता है: EmoContext प्रतियोगिता जो "ग्रंथों में प्रासंगिक भावना का पता लगाना" है। पेपर में एक आर्किटेक्चर का स्पष्टीकरण शामिल है जिसे मैंने मेमोरी यूनिट कोशिकाओं के रूप में एलएसटीएम का उपयोग करके वर्ड 2वेक और ग्लोवे की एम्बेडिंग परतों का शोषण करके बनाया है जो पाठ्य रूप में प्रदान की गई अंग्रेजी भाषा में दो लोगों के बीच चैट की अनुमानित भावना का पता लगाता है। भावनाओं का वह सेट जिस पर मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित किया गया था, वह खुश, उदास, गुस्सा और अन्य था। पेपर में ई-एलएसटीएम की तुलना में विभिन्न पारंपरिक मशीन लर्निंग एल्गोरिदम का विश्लेषण भी शामिल है।', 'zh': '本文议SemEval19:EmoContext竞赛陈解决方案,即"文本上下文情检"也。 此论包余以LSTM为内存单元单元,以Word2VecGloVe嵌创架构之说,当单元单元以文本供者英语检两人之间聊天近情。 习模之情为乐,悲,怒,怒。 本文兼与E-LSTM异传机器学算法之分。', 'ru': 'В этой статье обсуждается решение постановки задачи конкурса SemEval19: EmoContext, который называется «Обнаружение эмоций контекста в текстах». Статья включает в себя объяснение архитектуры, которую я создал, используя встраиваемые слои Word2Vec и GloVe, используя LSTMs в качестве ячеек памяти, которые обнаруживают приблизительные эмоции чатов между двумя людьми на английском языке, предоставленные в текстовой форме. Набор эмоций, на которых была обучена модель, был счастливым, грустным, сердитым и другими. В работу также включен анализ различных традиционных алгоритмов машинного обучения по сравнению с E-LSTM.', 'ga': 'Pléann an páipéar seo an réiteach ar ráiteas faidhbe an chomórtais SemEval19: EmoContext arb é atá ann “Comhthéacs a Bhrath Mothúchán i dtéacsanna”. Cuimsíonn an páipéar míniú ar ailtireacht a chruthaigh mé trí shaothrú a dhéanamh ar na sraitheanna leabaithe de Word2Vec agus GloVe ag baint úsáide as LSTManna mar chealla aonad cuimhne a aimsíonn gar-mhothúchán comhráite idir bheirt sa Bhéarla a sholáthraítear san fhoirm théacsúil. Ba é Shona, Brónach, Feargach agus Daoine Eile an tsraith mothúcháin ar a ndearnadh oiliúint ar an tsamhail. Áiríonn an páipéar freisin anailís ar ghnáth-halgartaim meaisínfhoghlama éagsúla i gcomparáid le E-LSTM.', 'ka': "This paper discusses the solution to the problem statement of the SemEval19: EmoContext competition which is 'Contextual Emotion Detection in Texts'. დაახლოების შესახებ არქტიქტურის განახსნა, რომელიც მე შექმნა Word2Vec და Glove-ის შესახებ LSTMs-ის გამოყენებით, რომელიც ტექსტულ ფორმაში იყოს ორი ადამიანის შორის ემოციონის ემოციონი. ამოცოციების ნაწილი, რომელიც მოდელის შესწავლობა, იყო ღაცხალი, ზედნიერი და სხვა. ასევე დაახლოებით განსხვავებული კონტრანციონალური მაქანის სწავლების ალგორიტემის ანალიზი E-LSTM-თან შედგენით.", 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmány a SemEval19: EmoContent verseny problémamegoldásának megoldását tárgyalja, amely "Kontextuális érzelmek felismerése a szövegekben". A tanulmány magyarázatát tartalmazza egy olyan architektúráról, amelyet a Word2Vec és GloVe beágyazó rétegeinek kihasználásával hoztam létre LSTMs memóriaegységként, amely két ember közötti beszélgetés hozzávetőleges érzelmeit érzékeli a szöveges formában megadott angol nyelven. Az érzelmek sorozata, amelyekre a modellt képezték, boldog, szomorú, dühös és mások voltak. A tanulmány az E-LSTM-hez képest különböző hagyományos gépi tanulási algoritmusok elemzését is tartalmazza.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз SemEval19 деген мәселе мәселесінің шешімін жасайды: Мәтіндерде контексті көңіл көңіл байқау деген көңіл конкурс. Бұл қағаз Word2Vec және Glove құрылған архитектураның түсініктемесін қолдану үшін LSTMs дегенді жады бірлігі үшін қолданатын адамдардың екі ағылшын тілдегі ағылшын тілдегі сөйлесу эмоциясын анықтайды. Бұл үлгі оқылған емоциялардың жиыны бақытты, қатты, қатты және басқалары. Қағаз басқа E-LSTM- мен салыстыратын әдеттегі машиналық оқыту алгоритмдерінің анализациясы бар.', 'it': "Questo articolo discute la soluzione all'affermazione del problema del concorso SemEval19: EmoContest che è 'Contextual Emotion Detection in Texts'. L'articolo include la spiegazione di un'architettura che ho creato sfruttando i livelli embedding di Word2Vec e GloVe utilizzando LSTMs come celle di unità di memoria che rileva l'emozione approssimativa delle conversazioni tra due persone nella lingua inglese fornita nella forma testuale. L'insieme di emozioni su cui il modello è stato addestrato era Happy, Sad, Angry and Others. L'articolo include anche un'analisi di diversi algoritmi di machine learning convenzionali rispetto a E-LSTM.", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία συζητά τη λύση της προβληματικής δήλωσης του διαγωνισμού που είναι "Ανίχνευση Συναισθημάτων σε Κείμενα". Η εργασία περιλαμβάνει την εξήγηση μιας αρχιτεκτονικής που δημιούργησα αξιοποιώντας τα στρώματα ενσωμάτωσης των Word2Vec και GloVe χρησιμοποιώντας ως κύτταρα μονάδας μνήμης τα οποία ανιχνεύουν κατά προσέγγιση συναισθήματα των συνομιλιών μεταξύ δύο ανθρώπων στην αγγλική γλώσσα που παρέχεται στην γραπτή μορφή. Το σύνολο των συναισθημάτων στα οποία εκπαιδεύτηκε το μοντέλο ήταν χαρούμενο, λυπηρό, θυμωμένο και άλλα. Η εργασία περιλαμβάνει επίσης μια ανάλυση διαφορετικών συμβατικών αλγορίθμων μηχανικής μάθησης σε σύγκριση με το Ε-LSTM.', 'mk': "This paper discusses the solution to the problem statement of the SemEval19: EmoContext competition which is 'Contextual Emotion Detection in Texts'.  Документот го вклучува објаснувањето на архитектурата што ја создадов со искористување на вградените слоеви на Word2Vec и GloVe користејќи ги LSTMs како клетки на мемориска единица кои детектираат околу емоциите на разговорите помеѓу двајца луѓе на англискиот јазик обезбедени во текстуална форма. Сетот на емоции на кои моделот беше трениран беше Среќен, тажен, лут и други. Документот, исто така, вклучува анализа на различни конвенционални алгоритми за машинско учење во споредба со E-LSTM.", 'lt': "This paper discusses the solution to the problem statement of the SemEval19: EmoContext competition which is 'Contextual Emotion Detection in Texts'.  The paper includes the explanation of an architecture that I created by exploiting the embedding layers of Word2Vec and GloVe using LSTMs as memory unit cells which detects approximate emotion of chats between two people in the English language provided in the textual form.  The set of emotions on which the model was trained was Happy, Sad, Angry and Others.  The paper also includes an analysis of different conventional machine learning algorithms in comparison to E-LSTM.", 'ms': "Kertas ini membahas penyelesaian untuk pernyataan masalah SemEval19: Persaingan EmoContext yang merupakan 'Pengesanan Emosi Konteksual dalam Teks'. Kertas ini termasuk penjelasan arkitektur yang saya cipta dengan mengeksploitasi lapisan penyembedding Word2Vec dan GloVe menggunakan LSTM sebagai sel unit ingatan yang mengesan emosi kira-kira bagi sembang antara dua orang dalam bahasa Inggeris disediakan dalam bentuk teks. Seting emosi yang model dilatih adalah Happy, Sad, Angry dan Lain-lain. Kertas juga mengandungi analisis algoritma pembelajaran mesin konvensional berbeza dibandingkan dengan E-LSTM.", 'mt': "This paper discusses the solution to the problem statement of the SemEval19: EmoContext competition which is 'Contextual Emotion Detection in Texts'.  Il-karta tinkludi l-ispjegazzjoni ta’ arkitettura li nħolqot billi sfruttajt is-saffi ta’ inkorporazzjoni ta’ Word2Vec u GloVe bl-użu ta’ LSTMs bħala ċelloli tal-unit à tal-memorja li jidentifikaw emozzjoni approssimattiva ta’ chats bejn żewġ persuni fil-lingwa Ingliża pprovduta fil-forma testwali. Is-sett ta’ emozzjonijiet li fuqhom il-mudell ġie mħarreġ kien Happy, Sad, Angry u Oħrajn. Id-dokument jinkludi wkoll analiżi ta’ algoritmi tat-tagħlim tal-magni konvenzjonali differenti meta mqabbel ma’ E-LSTM.", 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d19-ന്റെ പ്രശ്നത്തിന്റെ പ്രശ്നം പരിഹരിക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നു. എമോക്ടെക്സ്റ്റ് പ് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞാന്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിച്ച ഒരു ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിക്കറ്റിന്റെ വിശദീകരിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ലെസ്റ്റിഎസ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ലെക്സ്റ്റിഎസ് മെമ്മറി യൂണിറ്റ് സെല്ലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട വികാരങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d സന്തോഷം, ദുഃഖം, കോപം, മറ്റുള്ളവരും. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഒരു വ്യത്യസ്തമായ മെഷീന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകളുടെ അന്വേഷണം ഉണ്ടായിരിക്കുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас SemEval19-ын асуудлын шийдлийн шийдлийг хэлэхдээ "Текст дотор орчин үеийн мэдрэмжтэй мэдрэмжтэй мэдрэмжтэй мэдрэмжтэй мэдрэмжтэй байдал" гэдэг. Энэ цаасан дээр би Word2Vec болон Glove-ын нэвтрүүлэх хэлбэрийг ашиглаж бүтээсэн архитектурын тодорхойлолт нь LSTMs-г санамжийн нэгж эсүүд болгон ашиглаж, англи хэл дээрх хоёр хүн хоорондын ярианы сэтгэл хөдлөлийг мэддэг. Загварын сургалтын төлөвлөгөө нь аз жаргалтай, гунигтай, бусдын төлөвлөгөө байсан. Энэ цаас нь E-LSTM-тай харьцуулахад өөр олон хувилбар машин суралцах алгоритмын шинжилгээг агуулдаг.', 'no': 'Denne papiret diskuterer løysinga til problemuttalen av semiEval19: EmoContext-konkurransen som er «Kontekstoppdaging av følelser i tekstar». Papiret inneheld forklaringa av ein arkitektur som eg laga ved å bruka innbyggende lag av Word2Vec og Glove med LSTMs som minneeiningsceller som oppdager omtrent emosjon av prat mellom to menneske i engelsk språk som er tilgjengeleg i tekstskjema. Oppsettet av følelser som modellen er trent på var Happy, Sad, Angry og andre. Papiret inneheld også ein analyse av ulike konvensjonelle maskinelæringsalgoritmer i sammenligning med E-LSTM.', 'pl': 'W artykule omówiono rozwiązanie problemowego stwierdzenia konkursu SemEval19: EmoContext, czyli "Kontekstowe wykrywanie emocji w tekstach". Artykuł zawiera wyjaśnienie architektury, którą stworzyłem poprzez wykorzystanie osadzonych warstw Word2Vec i GloVe przy użyciu LSTMów jako komórek jednostki pamięci, które wykrywają przybliżone emocje rozmów między dwoma osobami w języku angielskim dostarczonym w formie tekstowej. Zestaw emocji, na których model był trenowany był Szczęśliwy, Smutny, Wściekły i Inni. Artykuł zawiera również analizę różnych konwencjonalnych algorytmów uczenia maszynowego w porównaniu do E-LSTM.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir razgovara o rešenju problemskog izjava SemEval19: konkurencija EmoContexta koja je "Kontekstualno otkrivanje emocija u tekstima". U novinama se uključuje objašnjenje arhitekture koju sam stvorio iskorištavajući ugrađene slojeve Word2Vec i Glove koristeći LSTMs kao ćelije sjećanja jedinica koja otkriva približnu emociju razgovora između dvoje ljudi na engleskom jeziku koji su predstavljeni u tekstualnom obliku. Zemlja emocija na kojima je model obučen bio sretan, tužan, besan i drugi. U novinama takođe uključuje analizu različitih konvencionalnih algoritma učenja mašine u usporedbi s E-LSTM.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare discută soluția la situația problemei concursului SemEval19: EmoContent, care este "Detectarea emoțiilor contextuale în texte". Lucrarea include explicația unei arhitecturi pe care am creat-o exploatând straturile de încorporare ale Word2Vec și GloVe folosind LSTMs ca celule unitare de memorie care detectează emoția aproximativă a discuțiilor dintre două persoane în limba engleză furnizată în forma textuală. Setul de emoții pe care modelul a fost antrenat a fost fericit, trist, furios și alții. Lucrarea include, de asemenea, o analiză a diferiților algoritmi convenționali de machine learning în comparație cu E-LSTM.', 'so': "Qoraalkan ayaa ka sheekaynaya xalalka ku saabsan warqada dhibaatada ee SemEval19: tartanka EmoContext oo ah 'Fiirinta xasuusta ku jirta Texts'. Qoraalka waxaa ku qoran fasirka aan ku abuuray xarunta qoraalka Word2Vec iyo GloVe oo lagu isticmaalayo LSTMs sida qalabka xusuusta oo ay ka muuqato fikradda ku dhow labada qof oo afka Ingiriiska ku qoran. Fiemooyinka lagu tababariyey waxaa la jiray faraxsan, Sadan, Cadho iyo qaar kale. Warqadda waxaa sidoo kale ku jira baaritaanka qoraalka barashada maskaxda ee caadiga ah oo u barbarta E-LSTM.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats diskuterar lösningen på problemformuleringen i tävlingen SemEval19: EmoContent som är "Contextual Emotion Detection in Texts". Uppsatsen innehåller förklaringen till en arkitektur som jag skapat genom att utnyttja de inbäddade lagren i Word2Vec och GloVe med hjälp av LSTMs som minnesenhetsceller som detekterar ungefärliga känslor av chattar mellan två personer på engelska som tillhandahålls i textformen. Den uppsättning känslor som modellen tränades på var Happy, Sad, Angry m.fl. Uppsatsen innehåller också en analys av olika konventionella maskininlärningsalgoritmer jämfört med E-LSTM.', 'ta': "SemEval19-ன் பிரச்சினையின் தீர்வு தீர்வை இந்த தாள் விவாதம் செய்கிறது: EmoContext competition which is 'Context Emotion Detection in Text'. The paper includes the explanation of an architecture that I created by exploiting the embedding layers of Word2Vec and GloVe using LSTMs as memory unit cells which detects approximate emotion of chats between two people in the English language provided in the textual form.  மாதிரி பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட உணர்வுகளின் அமைப்பு மகிழ்ச்சி, துக்கம், கோபம் மற்றும் மற்றவர்கள். இந்த காகிதத்தில் E-LSTM யை ஒப்பிட்டு வேறு வழக்கமான இயந்திரத்தில் கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் படிப்பினை ஒரு ஆய்வு சேர்த", 'ur': "This paper discusses the solution to the problem statement of the SemEval19: EmoContext competition which is 'Contextual Emotion Detection in Texts'. The paper includes the explanation of an architecture that I created by exploiting the embedding layers of Word2Vec and Glove using LSTMs as memory unit cells which detects approximate emotion of chats between two people in the English language provided in the textual form. جن پر مدل کی تعلیم دی گئی تھی وہ خوشی، غصہ، غصہ اور دوسری احساسات تھے. اس کاغذ میں بھی E-LSTM کے مقابلہ میں مختلف معمولی ماشین یادگیری الگوریتم کا تحلیل ہے.", 'si': "මේ පත්තුව සෙම්වේල් 19 ගේ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න විස්තරයේ විවේදනය කතා කරනවා: EmoContextContextක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ඒක 'පාළු The papers comprise the Explosion of an Architect that I have set by exploding the Embding layer of Word2Vec and Glove use LSTMs as brain unit cells. This is the approach of chats මොඩල් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන හැඟීමක් තියෙන හැඟීමක් තියෙන්නේ හැපියි, සැඩ්, කණගාටුයි, අනිත් අ E-LSTM සමඟ වෙනස් සාමාන්\u200dය මැෂින් ඉගෙන ගන්න අල්ගෝරිතම් වල විශ්ලේෂණයක් තියෙනවා.", 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz SemEval19 muammolar davomida xabar qiladi: EmoContext rivojlanishi - Tekslarda 'Kontsessor Emotionary Detection'. Qogʻozga qoʻllanilgan muammolarning o'rganish uchun Word2Vec va GloVe qatlamlarini xotira bir kataklarga ishlatish mumkin. Ularning ikkita insonlar orasidagi ingliz tildagi ikkita insonlarning fikrlarini o'zgartiradi. Modelni o'rganishga o'rganishga o'xshash, Sadaq, Angry va boshqa hisoblar bo'lgan. Qogʻozda E-LSTM kabi o'rganish algoritlarga boshqa oddiy mashina o'rganishni analyzer bor.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này giải quyết vấn đề phát biểu của SemEvul19: cuộc thi cảm xúc ngữ mà là "Việc phát hiện cảm xúc kép in Texts". Tờ giấy bao gồm sự giải thích về một kiến trúc do tôi tạo ra nhờ khai thác các lớp ghép của Word2Vek và GloVe sử dụng LSD như các tế bào đơn vị bộ nhớ, phát hiện cảm xúc xấp xỉ của chat giữa hai người ở ngôn ngữ Anh được cung cấp trong hình dáng kết cấu. Những cảm xúc mà mô hình được huấn luyện là niềm vui, buồn bã, giận dữ và những thứ khác. The paper also includes a analysis of different connormallor Machine educational assignims so with E-LSTM.', 'da': "Denne artikel diskuterer løsningen på problemformuleringen i konkurrencen SemEval19: EmoContent, som er 'Contextual Emotion Detection in Texts'. Artiklen indeholder en forklaring på en arkitektur, som jeg skabte ved at udnytte de indlejrede lag af Word2Vec og GloVe ved hjælp af LSTMs som hukommelsesenhedsceller, der registrerer omtrentlige følelser af chats mellem to personer på det engelske sprog leveret i tekstform. Det sæt af følelser, som modellen blev trænet på, var lykkelig, trist, vred og andre. Opgaven indeholder også en analyse af forskellige konventionelle maskinlæringsalgoritmer sammenlignet med E-LSTM.", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия разглежда решението на проблемното изявление на конкурса "Контекстуално откриване на емоции в текстове". Статията включва обяснение на една архитектура, която създадох, използвайки вграждащите слоеве на Използвайки ЛТМ като клетки от памет, която открива приблизителна емоция от чатове между двама души на английски език, предоставен в текстова форма. Наборът от емоции, върху които моделът е обучен, беше Щастлив, Тъжен, Ядосан и др. Статията включва и анализ на различни конвенционални алгоритми за машинно обучение в сравнение с Е-ЛСТМ.', 'nl': "Dit artikel bespreekt de oplossing voor de probleemstelling van de SemEval19: EmoContext competitie 'Contextual Emotion Detection in Texts'. Het artikel bevat de uitleg van een architectuur die ik creëerde door gebruik te maken van de insluitingslagen van Word2Vec en GloVe met behulp van LSTMs als geheugeneenheden cellen die bij benadering emotie detecteren van chats tussen twee mensen in de Engelse taal verstrekt in de tekstvorm. De reeks emoties waarop het model werd getraind was Happy, Sad, Boos en Anderen. Het artikel bevat ook een analyse van verschillende conventionele machine learning algoritmes in vergelijking met E-LSTM.", 'hr': "Ovaj novinar razgovara o rješenju problemskog izjava SemEval19: natjecanje EmoContexta koja se zove 'Kontekstualno otkrivanje emocija u tekstima'. U novinama se uključuje objašnjenje arhitekture koju sam stvorio iskorištavajući ugrađene slojeve Word2Vec i Glove koristeći LSTMs kao ćelije sjećanja jedinica koja otkriva približnu emociju razgovora između dva osoba na engleskom jeziku predstavljenu u tekstualnom obliku. Zemlja emocija na kojima je model obučen bio sretan, tužan, bijesan i drugi. U novinama se uključuje i analiza različitih konvencionalnih algoritma učenja stroja u usporedbi s E-LSTM.", 'id': "Kertas ini mendiskusikan solusi untuk pernyataan masalah dari SemEval19: Konkursi EmoContext yang merupakan 'Deteksi Emosi Konteksual dalam Teks'. Kertas ini termasuk penjelasan arsitektur yang saya ciptakan dengan mengeksploitasi lapisan embedding Word2Vec dan GloVe menggunakan LSTM sebagai sel unit memori yang mendeteksi emosi sekitar percakapan antara dua orang dalam bahasa Inggris disediakan dalam bentuk teks. The set of emotions on which the model was trained was Happy, Sad, Angry and Others.  The paper also includes an analysis of different conventional machine learning algorithms in comparison to E-LSTM.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ در مورد راه حل برای توضیح مشکل سامیاول ۱۹ صحبت می\u200cکند: مسابقه\u200cی EmoContext که «آشنایی احساسات متوسط در متن» است. این کاغذ شامل توضیح یک معماری که من با استفاده از لایه\u200cهای وارد کردن Word2Vec و Glove با استفاده از LSTMs به عنوان سلول\u200cهای واحد حافظه می\u200cباشد که احساسات سخنرانی بین دو نفر در زبان انگلیسی به عنوان فرم متن را شناسایی می\u200cکند. مجموعه احساسات که مدل آموزش داده شده، خوشبخت، غصه و بقیه بود. این کاغذ همچنین یک تحلیل از الگوریتم یادگیری ماشین معمولی مختلف در مقایسه با E-LSTM است.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag wird die Lösung der Problemstellung des SemEval19: EmoContext-Wettbewerbs "Contextual Emotion Detection in Texts" diskutiert. Das Papier enthält die Erläuterung einer Architektur, die ich erstellt habe, indem ich die Einbettungsschichten von Word2Vec und GloVe unter Verwendung von LSTMs als Speicherzellen nutzte, die ungefähre Emotionen von Chats zwischen zwei Personen in der englischen Sprache detektieren, die in der Textform bereitgestellt wird. Die Reihe von Emotionen, auf denen das Modell trainiert wurde, war glücklich, traurig, wütend und andere. Der Beitrag beinhaltet auch eine Analyse verschiedener herkömmlicher Machine Learning Algorithmen im Vergleich zu E-LSTM.', 'ko': "본고는SemEval19 문제 진술의 해결 방안인 EmoContext 경연, 즉'텍스트에서의 언어 환경 정서 검측'을 논의했다.텍스트 언어의 두 층 구조, 즉 텍스트 언어와 텍스트 언어를 이용하여 텍스트 언어와 텍스트 언어 사이에 텍스트 언어를 삽입한다.모형 훈련의 정서집은 즐거움, 슬픔, 분노와 다른 정서를 포함한다.본고는 E-LSTM과 비교되는 서로 다른 전통적인 기계 학습 알고리즘도 분석했다.", 'sw': "Gazeti hili linajadili suluhisho la tamko la tatizo la SemEval19: mashindano ya EmoContext ambayo ni 'Kugundua Uchunguzi wa Matukio ya Kimataifa katika Maandishi'.'. Gazeti hilo linajumuisha maelezo ya majengo niliyotengeneza kwa kutumia vipande vya viwanja vya Word2Vec na GloVe kwa kutumia LSTMs kama vifaa vya kumbukumbu ambavyo vinagundua hisia za mazungumzo ya watu wawili katika lugha ya Kiingereza yaliyotolewa katika mfumo wa maandishi. Sehemu ya hisia ambazo mifano ilifundishwa ilikuwa ni furaha, masikitiko, hasira na wengine. Gazeti hilo pia linajumuisha uchambuzi wa mashine tofauti ya kujifunza kwa kawaida ukilinganisha na E-LSTM.", 'af': "Hierdie papier bespreek die oplossing van die probleem verklaring van die SemEval19: EmoContext samekoms wat is 'Kontekslike Emotie Opdekking in Teks'. Die papier inkluit die uitduidelikheid van 'n arkitektuur wat ek geskep het deur die ingesluiting laagte van Word2Vec en Glove te gebruik LSTMs as geheue eenheid selle wat beskrywe omtrent emosie van gesprekke tussen twee mense in die Engels taal wat in die tekstuele vorm verskaf is. Die stel van emosies waarop die model opgelei is is gelukkig, Sad, Angry en ander. Die papier inkluit ook 'n analiseer van verskillende konvensionele masjien leer algoritme in vergelyking met E-LSTM.", 'tr': "Bu kağıt SemEval19'un sorun açıklamasının çözümünü tartışýar: EmoContext yarışması 'Tekst içinde Konteksual Emotion Detection' yani. Bu kagyz meniň Word2Vec we GloVe içeri girişik taýýarlaryny ulanyp eden arhitekturyň düşündirişi ýagdaý birimi häsiýetleri ýagdaýa hasaplaýan iki adam iňlis dilinde gürrüňi belli edýär. Modeliň okuwa edilen duýgulary bagtly, gamgyn, gaharlyk we başga zatlar bolupdyr. Bu kagyz hem E-LSTM bilen karşılaşykda dürli maşyny öwrenmek algoritmalarynyň analizi bar.", 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը քննարկում է "ՍեմԵվալ" խնդիրների լուծումը 19. էմոկոնտեքստի մրցակցությունը, որը "Տեքստում գտնվող կոնտեքստային զգացմունքների հայտնաբերումն է": The paper includes the explanation of an architecture that I created by exploiting the embedding layers of Word2Vec and GloVe using LSTMs as memory unit cells which detects approximate emotion of chats between two people in the English language provided in the textual form.  Այն զգացմունքները, որոնց վրա մոդելը վարժեցվել է, երջանիկ, տխուր, զայրացած և այլն էին: Այս թղթին ներառում է նաև տարբեր ավանդական մեքենային ուսումնասիրության ալգորիթմների վերլուծությունը E-LSMT-ի հետ համեմատած:', 'sq': "Ky dokument diskuton zgjidhjen e deklaratës së problemit të SemEval19: Konkurrenca EmoContext që është 'Detektimi i Emocioneve Konteksuale në Tekst'. Gazeta përfshin shpjegimin e një arkitekture që krijova duke shfrytëzuar shtresa të përfshira të Word2Vec dhe GloVe duke përdorur LSTMs si qeliza të njësisë së kujtesës që zbulon emocione të afërt të bisedimeve midis dy njerëzve në gjuhën angleze të ofruar në form ën tekstuale. The set of emotions on which the model was trained was Happy, Sad, Angry and Others.  Gazeta përfshin gjithashtu një analizë të algoritmeve të ndryshme konvencionale të mësimit të makinave në krahasim me E-LSTM.", 'az': 'Bu kağıt SemEval19 problemlərinin çətinliklərini mübahisə edir: EmoContext müharibəsi "Metlərdə Kontekst Emotion Detection" deyir. Bu kağıt, Word2Vec və Glove\'nin içərisində oluşan arhitektura təfsilatı ilə LSTMs vasitəsilə yazılmış məlumat birinci hücresi olaraq yaratdığım bir arhitektura bənzəyir ki, məlumatlarda olan iki İngilizə dilində görünən məlumatlar arasındakı məlumatların məlumatlarını tanıyır. Modelin təhsil edildiyi hisslərin qurulması Happy, Sad, Kızgın və Digərləri idi. Kağıt da E-LSTM ilə qarşılaşdığında, müxtəlif müxtəlif maşın öyrənmə algoritminin analizi daxil edir.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የSemEval19 የችግሩን ትርጉም ማቀናጃ ላይ ይነግራል፤ የEmoContext ተቃውሞ ‹የጽሑፍ ውይይት መግለጫ›› ማለት ነው፡፡ የፕሬዝቡ ውስጥ የሁለት ሰዎች መካከል በንግግሪክ ቋንቋ በተሰጠው የኢንተርኔት ቋንቋ የሚኖረውን የአስታሪ ክፍሎች በመጠቀም የWord2Vec እና GloVe ደረጃዎችን በመጠቀም የደረግሁትን የአርክስቴት ክፍሎች የሚተርጉት ነው፡፡ ምሳሌ የተጠመቀበት የዓይነቶች ብዛት ደስታ፣ Sad፣ ተቆጣ እና ሌሎችም ናቸው፡፡ ደብዳቤውም ከE-LSTM ጋር በማስተካከል የተለየ ልዩ ልዩ የኮንቨርሲካዊ መሳሪያን የሚያስተምር ትምህርት ነው፡፡', 'bn': "এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল১৯-এর সমস্যার বিবৃতির সমাধান নিয়ে আলোচনা করেছে: এমোকেন্ট প্রতিযোগিতার সমাধান যা টেক্সটের 'বৈশিষ্ট্যা এই পত্রিকার ব্যাখ্যা আছে যা আমি সৃষ্টি করেছি তার ব্যাখ্যা হচ্ছে যা আমি তৈরি করেছি লেখক ফর্মে প্রদান করা যাচ্ছে ইংরেজী ভাষায় দুজন লোকের মধ্যে আচরণের প্রায় দুই জনের মধ্যে কথা বল যেখানে মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছিল তার অনুভূতি ছিল শুভ, দুঃখ, রাগ এবং অন্যান্য। The paper also includes an analysis of different conventional machine learning algorithms in comparison to E-LSTM.", 'ca': 'Aquest paper discute la solució a la declaració de problema del SemEval19: Concursió EmoContext que és "Detecció d\'emocions Contextuals en Texts". El paper inclou l\'explicació d\'una arquitectura que vaig crear explotant les capes incorporades de Word2Vec i GloVe utilitzant LSTMs com cèl·lules unit àries de memòria que detecten emocions aproximades de converses entre dues persones en el llenguatge anglès proporcionades en forma textual. The set of emotions on which the model was trained was Happy, Sad, Angry and Others.  El paper també inclou una an àlisi de diferents algoritmes convencionals d\'aprenentatge automàtic en comparació amb E-LSTM.', 'cs': 'Tento článek pojednává o řešení problémového vyjádření soutěže SemEval19: EmoKontext, která je "Kontextová detekce emocí v textech". Příspěvek obsahuje vysvětlení architektury, kterou jsem vytvořil využitím vložených vrstev Word2Vec a GloVe pomocí LSTMs jako buňky paměťové jednotky, které detekují přibližné emoce chatů mezi dvěma lidmi v anglickém jazyce poskytnutém v textové podobě. Soubor emocí, na kterých byl model trénován, byl Šťastný, Smutný, Naštvaný a další. Součástí článku je také analýza různých konvenčních algoritmů strojového učení ve srovnání s E-LSTM.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir razgovara o rješenju problemskog izjava SemEval19: natjecanje EmoContexta, što je "Kontekstualno otkrivanje emocija u tekstima". U novinama se uključuje objašnjenje arhitekture koju sam stvorio iskorištavajući ugrađene slojeve Word2Vec i Glove koristeći LSTMs kao ćelije sjećanja jedinica koja otkriva približnu emociju razgovora između dvoje ljudi na engleskom jeziku predstavljenu u tekstualnom obliku. Zemlja emocija na kojima je model obučen bio je sretan, tužan, besan i drugi. U novinama se uključuje i analiza različitih konvencionalnih algoritma učenja mašine u usporedbi s E-LSTM.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis käsitletakse SemEval19: EmoContext konkursi probleemi lahendust, mis on "Kontekstuaalne emotsioonide tuvastamine tekstides". Töö sisaldab selgitust arhitektuurist, mille ma loosin, kasutades ära Word2Vec ja GloVe manustamiskihti, kasutades LSTMsid mäluühiku rakkudena, mis tuvastab kahe inimese vaheliste vestluste ligikaudset emotsiooni inglise keeles tekstikujul. Emotsioonide komplekt, millel mudel treeniti, oli Õnnelik, Kurb, Vihane jt. Töös analüüsitakse ka erinevaid tavapäraseid masinõppe algoritme võrreldes E-LSTM-iga.', 'fi': "Tässä artikkelissa käsitellään ratkaisua SemEval19: EmoContext kilpailun ongelmalauseeseen, joka on 'Contextual Emotion Detection in Texts'. Artikkeli sisältää selityksen arkkitehtuurista, jonka loin hyödyntämällä Word2Vecin ja GloVen sulautuskerroksia käyttäen LSTMs-muistiyksikkösoluja, joka havaitsee kahden ihmisen välisten keskustelujen likimääräisen tunteen tekstimuodossa annetulla englanninkielisellä kielellä. Mallin tunteet olivat Onnellinen, Surullinen, Vihainen ja Muut. Työssä analysoidaan myös perinteisiä koneoppimisalgoritmeja verrattuna E-LSTM:ään.", 'ha': "Wannan takardar da ke jãyayya masu solar bayani ga matabbata na Semevaal19: competitin EmoContContent which is 'Cikakken Email in Texts'.'... Kayan takardan na ƙunsa da fassarar an gina shi da kuma na yi amfani da duffai mai embedded na word2V da GoV da amfani da LSS kamar jerin kumbar tsakanin da ke gane hisani'in da za'a samar da mazaɓa biyu cikin harshen Ingiriya wanda aka azurta shi cikin tsarin littãfi. Tsarin hisoyi da aka sanar da misalin shi na yi farin ciki, Saduki, da Wasu. Kanarin na ƙunsa da wani anayya wa masu karatun algoritori masu shirya da kuma a sami da ELSM.", 'sk': "V prispevku je obravnavana rešitev problematične izjave tekmovanja SemEval19: EmoContext, ki je 'Kontekstualno zaznavanje čustev v besedilih'. Prispevek vključuje razlago arhitekture, ki sem jo ustvaril z izkoriščanjem vgradnih plasti Word2Vec in GloVe z uporabo LSTMs kot celic spominske enote, ki zaznava približno čustva klepetov med dvema osebama v angleškem jeziku v besedilni obliki. Sklop čustev, na katerih je bil model treniran, je bil Srečen, Žalosten, Jezen in Drugi. Prispevek vključuje tudi analizo različnih konvencionalnih algoritmov strojnega učenja v primerjavi z E-LSTM.", 'jv': "Gambar iki bakal ngrungko perusahaan bakal nggawe geraksi urip kanggo kelas perusahaan kanggo kelas usul ning semebal19: emudcontext seng kelas 'context emumation detection in texts'. Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh perusahaan akeh akeh nggawe lan ijol-ijolan sing nggawe layar sing katêpakan karo Word 2vec lan Global nggambar nggambar barang SLT M nganggo dolanan sing katêpakan karo perusahaan sing paling dumadhi sing sampek duwé karo perusahaan langkung sampek awak dhéwé kuwi ingkang dipunanggé. Setunggal omongaké awak dhéwé model sing dikarepaké Mesih, Sad, Angri lan mangkat. Gambar nganggo akeh basa sing paling nggambar karo Algorithm sing sampeyan karo E-LTT.", 'he': 'העבודה הזו מדברת על הפתרון להצהרת הבעיה של הסמיוול 19: תחרות קונטקסט אמו שהוא "גילוי רגשות קונטקסטיים בטקסטים". העיתון כולל ההסבר של ארכיטקטורה שנצרתי על ידי ניצלון שכבות ההכניסה של Word2Vec וגלוב באמצעות LSTMs בתאים יחידת זיכרון שמגלים רגשות מקרובים של צ\'אטים בין שני אנשים בשפה האנגלית שנספקו בצורה טקסטלית. הקבוצה של רגשות שהדוגמנית היתה מאושרת, עצובה, כועסת ואחרים. The paper also includes an analysis of different conventional machine learning algorithms in comparison to E-LSTM.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་SemEval19 ཡི་གེ་དཀའ་ངལ་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ཤེས་དེ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། The paper includes the explanation of an architecture that I created by exploiting the embedding layers of Word2Vec and Glove using LSTMs as memory unit cells which detects approximate emotion of chats between two people in the English language provided in the textual form. སྔོན་འཛིན་གྱིས་འཛིན་བྱས་པའི་སེམས་སྟངས་ལ་དགའ་བ་སྐྱིད་དང་། སྐྱིད་དགའ་བ་སྐྱེས་པ་དང་གཞན་པས་རེད། ཤོག'}
{'en': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Snapshot Ensemble of Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'ar': 'ELiRF-UPV في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: لقطة مجموعة من الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية الهرمية للكشف عن المشاعر السياقية', 'fr': "eLIRF-UPV au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Ensemble d'instantanés de réseaux neuronaux convolutifs hiérarchiques pour la détection contextuelle des émotions", 'es': 'EliRF-UPV en SemeVal-2019 Tarea 3: Conjunto de instantáneas de redes neuronales convolucionales jerárquicas para la detección de emociones contextuales', 'pt': 'ELiRF-UPV na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Conjunto de instantâneos de redes neurais convolucionais hierárquicas para detecção de emoções contextuais', 'ja': 'ELiRF - UPV at SemEval -2019 Task 3: Snapshot Ensemble of Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'zh': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2019 务 3:上下文情检卷积神经网络之快照集', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 3 पर ELiRF-UPV: प्रासंगिक भावना का पता लगाने के लिए पदानुक्रमित Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का स्नैपशॉट Ensemble', 'ru': 'ELiRF-UPV на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Ансамбль снимков иерархических сверточных нейронных сетей для контекстного обнаружения эмоций', 'ga': 'ELiRF-UPV ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Grúpa Gabhála de Líonraí Néaracha Comhthionólacha Ordlathacha chun Mothúchán Comhthéacsúil a Bhrath', 'hu': 'Az ELiRF-UPV a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: Hierarchikus Konvolúciós Neurális Hálózatok Kapcsolategyüttese a kontextuális érzelmek felismerésére', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Συγκρότημα Συγκλήψεων Ιεραρχικών Νευρικών Δικτύων για την Ανίχνευση Συναισθηματικών Συναισθημάτων στο πλαίσιο', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'ELiRF-UPV a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Snapshot Ensemble di Reti Neurali Convoluzionali Gerarchiche per la Rilevazione delle Emozioni Contestuali', 'kk': 'ELiRF- UPV жарым- 2019 тапсырмасының 3- тапсырмасы: Иерархикалық қатынасыз нейрондық желілерді көңіл көңіл анықтау үшін Snapshot Ensemble of Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'lt': 'ELiRF-UPV pusevalyje 2019 m. 3 užduotis: Hierarchinių konvolucinių neurologinių tinklų, skirtų kontekstinei emocijai nustatyti, fotografija', 'mk': 'ЕЛИРФ-УПВ на SemEval-2019 задача 3: Сембл на снимка на хиерархични конволуционални неурални мрежи за детекција на контекстни емоции', 'ms': 'ELiRF-UPV di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Snapshot Ensemble of Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3-ല്\u200d ELiRF- UPV: എയരാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റുവര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള സ്നാപ്പ് ഷോട്ട് എണ്\u200dസ്പോള്\u200d', 'mn': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Snapshot Ensemble of Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'pl': 'ELIRF-UPV w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Zespół Snapshot Hierarchicznych Konwolucyjnych Sieci Neuralnych do Kontekstowego Wykrywania Emocji', 'no': 'ELiRF-UPV på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3: Snapshot Ensemble av hierarkiske konvolusjonelle neiralnettverk for kontekstære følelser', 'ro': 'ELiRF-UPV la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Ansamblul de relatii de relatii de retele neurale convelutionale ierarhice pentru detectarea emotiilor contextuale', 'mt': 'ELiRF-UPV f’SemEval-2019 Task 3: Snapshot Ensemble of Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'sr': 'ELiRF-UPV na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: snimkovni primer hijerarhijskih konvolucionalnih neuronskih mreža za kontekstualne detekcije emocija', 'si': 'ELiRF-UPV at semeval-2019 Job 3: Snap shot Ensemble of hirarchical ConVoltive neural Netwarks for Contextal Emotion Detection', 'so': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Snapshot Ensemble of Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks for Context Emotion Detection', 'sv': 'ELiRF-UPV på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Snapshot Ensemble av hierarkiska konvulutionella neurala nätverk för kontextuell känslodetektering', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி', 'ur': 'ELiRF-UPV SemEval-2019 Task 3: Snapshot Ensemble of Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô hình thần kinh có liên hệ với bộ phát hiện cảm xúc liên tiếp', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Ансамбъл за връзки от йерархични конволюционни неврални мрежи за откриване на контекстуални емоции', 'nl': 'ELIRF-UPV bij SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Snapshot Ensemble van Hierarchische Convolutionele Neurale Netwerken voor Contextuele Emotiedetectie', 'hr': 'ELiRF-UPV na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 3: snimkovni primjer hijerarskih konvolucionalnih nervnih mreža za kontekstualno otkrivanje emocija', 'da': 'ELiRF-UPV på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Snapshot Ensemble af Hierarkiske Konvulutionelle Neurale Netværk til kontekstuel følelsesdetektion', 'de': 'ELIRF-UPV bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Snapshot Ensemble von Hierarchischen Convolutionalen Neuronalen Netzwerken zur kontextuellen Emotionserkennung', 'id': 'ELiRF-UPV di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Snapshot Ensemble of Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'ko': 'EliRF UPV가SemEval-2019 작업 3: 상황 정서 검측에 사용되는 층권적 신경 네트워크 스냅샷 통합', 'fa': 'ELiRF', 'sw': 'ELiRF-UPV katika kazi ya SemEval-2019', 'tr': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Snapshot Ensemble of Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'af': 'ELiRF-UPV by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 3: Snapshot Ensemble van Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Netwerke vir Konteksual Emotion Deteksie', 'sq': 'ELiRF-UPV në SemEval-2019 Task 3: Snapshot Ensemble of Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'hy': 'ELiRF-UPV-ը ՍեմԷվալ-2019-ի 3. հանձնարարությունը. Հիերարքիկական հակառակցող նեյրոնային ցանցերի ձայնագրությունը կոնտեքստալ զգացմունքների հայտնաբերելու համար', 'am': 'ስራ 3: Snapshot Ensemble of Hierarchical Convolution Neural Network for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Gözəl 3: Hiyerarşik Konvolucional Nöral Ağlarının Snapshot Ensemble of Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৯ টাস্ক ৩-এ ELiRF-UPV: বিদ্যমান Emotion Detection for Hierarchic Convolution Neural Network', 'bs': 'ELiRF-UPV na semiEval-2019. zadatak 3: snimanje okupljanja hijerarskih konvolucionalnih neuronskih mreža za kontekstualno detekcije emocija', 'ca': 'ELiRF-UPV a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Snapshot Ensemble of Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'et': 'ELiRF-UPV SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 3: Hierarhiliste konvolutsiooniliste neurovõrkude suhtekomplekt kontekstuaalsete emotsioonide tuvastamiseks', 'cs': 'Úkol 3: Snímkový soubor hierarchických konvelučních neuronových sítí pro kontextovou detekci emocí', 'fi': 'ELiRF-UPV SemEval-2019 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 3: Hierarkisten konvolutionaalisten hermoverkostojen Snapshot Ensemble for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'jv': 'eliRF-UNV at semiinval-2011 task 3: Smapshot Insemble of Hiaracual convolution Neral networks for context emutation detection', 'he': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Snapshot Ensemble of Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'sk': 'ELiRF-UPV na sejmu SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Komplet za pričeske hierarhičnih konvolucijskih živčnih omrežij za zaznavanje kontekstualnih čustev', 'ha': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Snapshot Ensemble of Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'bo': 'ELiRF-UPV at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Snapshot Ensemble of Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks for Contextual Emotion Detection'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the approach developed by the ELiRF-UPV team at SemEval 2019 Task 3 : Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. We have developed a Snapshot Ensemble of 1D Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks to extract features from 3-turn conversations in order to perform contextual emotion detection in text. This Snapshot Ensemble is obtained by averaging the models selected by a Genetic Algorithm that optimizes the evaluation measure. The proposed ensemble obtains better results than a single model and it obtains competitive and promising results on Contextual Emotion Detection in Text.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة النهج الذي طوره فريق ELiRF-UPV في SemEval 2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. لقد قمنا بتطوير مجموعة Snapshot من الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية الهرمية أحادية الأبعاد لاستخراج ميزات من المحادثات ثلاثية الأدوار من أجل إجراء اكتشاف المشاعر السياقية في النص. يتم الحصول على مجموعة اللقطات هذه عن طريق حساب متوسط النماذج المختارة بواسطة خوارزمية جينية تعمل على تحسين مقياس التقييم. تحصل المجموعة المقترحة على نتائج أفضل من نموذج واحد وتحصل على نتائج تنافسية وواعدة في اكتشاف المشاعر السياقية في النص.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve a abordagem desenvolvida pela equipe ELiRF-UPV no SemEval 2019 Tarefa 3: Detecção contextual de emoções em texto. Desenvolvemos um Snapshot Ensemble de Redes Neurais Convolucionais Hierárquicas 1D para extrair recursos de conversas de 3 turnos para realizar a detecção contextual de emoções no texto. Este Snapshot Ensemble é obtido pela média dos modelos selecionados por um Algoritmo Genético que otimiza a medida de avaliação. O ensemble proposto obtém melhores resultados do que um único modelo e obtém resultados competitivos e promissores na Detecção de Emoções Contextuais em Texto.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit l'approche développée par l'équipe eLIRF-UPV lors de SemEval 2019 Task 3\xa0: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. Nous avons développé un ensemble d'instantanés de réseaux neuronaux convolutifs hiérarchiques 1D pour extraire des caractéristiques de conversations à trois tours afin d'effectuer une détection contextuelle des émotions dans le texte. Cet ensemble de clichés est obtenu en faisant la moyenne des modèles sélectionnés par un algorithme génétique qui optimise la mesure d'évaluation. L'ensemble proposé obtient de meilleurs résultats qu'un modèle unique et il obtient des résultats compétitifs et prometteurs sur la détection contextuelle des émotions dans le texte.", 'es': 'Este artículo describe el enfoque desarrollado por el equipo de ELIRF-UPV en la Tarea 3 de SemEval 2019: Detección de emociones contextuales en el texto. Hemos desarrollado un conjunto de instantáneas de redes neuronales convolucionales jerárquicas 1D para extraer características de conversaciones de 3 turnos con el fin de realizar la detección de emociones contextuales en el texto. Este conjunto de instantáneas se obtiene promediando los modelos seleccionados por un algoritmo genético que optimiza la medida de evaluación. El conjunto propuesto obtiene mejores resultados que un solo modelo y obtiene resultados competitivos y prometedores en la detección de emociones contextuales en el texto.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval 2019 टास्क 3 में ELiRF-UPV टीम द्वारा विकसित दृष्टिकोण का वर्णन करता है: पाठ में प्रासंगिक भावना का पता लगाना। हमने पाठ में प्रासंगिक भावना का पता लगाने के लिए 3-टर्न वार्तालापों से सुविधाओं को निकालने के लिए 1 डी पदानुक्रमित कनवल्शनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क का एक स्नैपशॉट पहनावा विकसित किया है। यह स्नैपशॉट Ensemble मूल्यांकन उपाय को अनुकूलित करता है कि एक आनुवंशिक एल्गोरिथ्म द्वारा चयनित मॉडल औसत द्वारा प्राप्त किया जाता है। प्रस्तावित पहनावा एक मॉडल की तुलना में बेहतर परिणाम प्राप्त करता है और यह पाठ में प्रासंगिक भावना का पता लगाने पर प्रतिस्पर्धी और आशाजनक परिणाम प्राप्त करता है।', 'zh': '本文述ELiRF-UPV团队在SemEval 2019务3:文本上下文情检中开发之法。 开一 1D 卷积神经网络之快照融,取诸 3 轮,以上下文情检。 此快照融合者,优化量之遗法也。 所求融合,胜于模形,而上下文情检竞争性望于文本。', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection in TextにおいてELiRF - UPVチームが開発したアプローチについて説明する。1 D階層畳み込みニューラルネットワークのスナップショットアンサンブルを開発し、3ターンの会話から機能を抽出して、テキストでコンテキスト感情の検出を実行します。このスナップショットアンサンブルは、評価尺度を最適化する遺伝的アルゴリズムによって選択されたモデルの平均化によって得られます。提案されたアンサンブルは、単一のモデルよりも優れた結果を得て、テキストでのコンテキスト感情検出で競争的で有望な結果を得ます。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается подход, разработанный командой ELiRF-UPV на задаче 3 SemEval 2019: контекстуальное обнаружение эмоций в тексте. Мы разработали Ансамбль моментальных снимков 1D-иерархических сверточных нейронных сетей для извлечения признаков из 3-поворотных разговоров с целью выполнения контекстного обнаружения эмоций в тексте. Этот ансамбль снимков получается путем усреднения моделей, выбранных генетическим алгоритмом, который оптимизирует оценку. Предложенный ансамбль получает лучшие результаты, чем одна модель, и конкурентоспособные и многообещающие результаты по контекстуальному обнаружению эмоций в тексте.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcur chuige a d’fhorbair foireann ELiRF-UPV ag SemEval 2019 Tasc 3: Brath Mothúchán Comhthéacsúla sa Téacs. D’fhorbraíomar Ensemble Gabhála de Líonraí Néaracha Comhráiteacha Ordlathacha 1D chun gnéithe a bhaint as comhráite 3 chasáin chun mothúcháin comhthéacsúla a bhrath i dtéacs. Faightear an Ensemble Seat seo trí mheán na múnlaí a roghnaíodh le Algartam Géiniteach a uasmhéadaíonn an beart meastóireachta. Faigheann an ensemble molta torthaí níos fearr ná samhail aonair agus faigheann sé torthaí iomaíocha agus tuar dóchais inti ar Bhrath Mothúchán Comhthéacsúil sa Téacs.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტის აღწერა ELiRF-UPV ჯგუფის განვითარებული პროგრამა SemEval 2019 სამუშაო სამუშაო დავალება: ტექსტის კონტექსტური ემოციონის განვითარება. ჩვენ განვითარეთ 1D hiერარქიური კონტუალური ნეიროლური ქსელების Snapshot Ensemble-ს, რომელიც ტექსტში კონტექსტურული ემოციონის განვითარება სამუშაობის განსახულებებიდან გამოყენება. ეს სურაფტის სურაფტის სურაფტი იქნება, რომელიც გენეტიკური ალგორიტიმზე მონიშნული მოდელების განსაზღვრებით, რომელიც აპტიმიზებს განსაზღვრებას. ოპველჲზვნთწრ თნჟვმბლძრ ოჲლსფაგა ოჲ-ეჲბპთ პვჱსლრართ ჲრ ვეთნ მჲევლ თ ოჲლსფაგა კჲნკპვრვნრთგნთ თ ჲბვღაღთ პვჱსლრართ ნა კჲნრვკჟრსლნთ ვ', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει την προσέγγιση που αναπτύχθηκε από την ομάδα της στο έργο 3: Ανίχνευση Συναισθημάτων στο Κείμενο. Έχουμε αναπτύξει ένα σύνολο στιγμιότυπων 1Ιεραρχικών Νευρικών Δικτύων για την εξαγωγή χαρακτηριστικών από συζητήσεις 3-στροφής, προκειμένου να εκτελέσουμε την ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων στο κείμενο. Αυτό το σύνολο στιγμιότυπων λαμβάνεται με τον μέσο όρο των μοντέλων που επιλέγονται από έναν γενετικό αλγόριθμο που βελτιστοποιεί το μέτρο αξιολόγησης. Το προτεινόμενο σύνολο επιτυγχάνει καλύτερα αποτελέσματα από ένα μόνο μοντέλο και επιτυγχάνει ανταγωνιστικά και ελπιδοφόρα αποτελέσματα στην Ανίχνευση Συναισθημάτων στο Κείμενο.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az ELiRF-UPV csapata által a SemEval 2019 feladat 3: Kontextuális érzelmek felismerése szövegben kidolgozott megközelítést. Kifejlesztettük az 1D Hierarchikus Konvoluációs Neurális Hálózatokból álló Pillanatkép együttesét, hogy a 3 fordulós beszélgetésekből kivonjuk a funkciókat annak érdekében, hogy kontextuális érzelmek felismerését végezzük a szövegben. Ez a pillanatkép együttes az értékelési mértéket optimalizáló genetikai algoritmussal kiválasztott modellek átlagával érhető el. A javasolt együttes jobb eredményeket ér el, mint egyetlen modell, és versenyképes és ígéretes eredményeket ér el a kontextuális érzelmek felismerése a szövegben.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive l'approccio sviluppato dal team ELiRF-UPV a SemEval 2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. Abbiamo sviluppato un Snapshot Ensemble di 1D Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks per estrarre funzionalità da conversazioni a 3 turni al fine di eseguire il rilevamento contestuale delle emozioni nel testo. Questo Snapshot Ensemble è ottenuto calcolando la media dei modelli selezionati da un algoritmo genetico che ottimizza la misura di valutazione. L'ensemble proposto ottiene risultati migliori di un singolo modello e ottiene risultati competitivi e promettenti sulla Contextual Emotion Detection in Text.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašomas ELiRF-UPV grupės 2019 m. SemEval 3 užduotis „Kontekstinės emocijos nustatymas tekste“. Mes sukūrėme 1D Hierarchinių konvoliucinių nervinių tinklų vaizdo įrašą, kad ištrauktume požymius iš 3 posūkių pokalbių, siekiant atlikti kontekstinės emocijos nustatymą tekste. Šis fotografijos Ensemble gaunamas vidutiniškai naudojant genetiniu algoritmu pasirinktus modelius, kurie optimizuoja vertinimo priemonę. The proposed ensemble obtains better results than a single model and it obtains competitive and promising results on Contextual Emotion Detection in Text.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз ELiRF- UPV тобы 2019 жылдың SemEval 2019 тапсырмасының 3- тапсырмасы: Мәтінде контексті көңіл көңіл анықтау арқылы жасалды. Мәтінде контексті емоцияларды анықтау үшін, біз 1D hiерархиялық конверсиялық невралдық желілердің сценарын жасадық. Бұл сценартты сценарттау үлгілерін бағалау өлшемін оптимизациялау үшін таңдалған генетикалық алгоритм алгоритмінен орташа алады. Бұл таңдалған ұсыныс бір моделден жақсы нәтижелерді алады. Бұл мәтіндегі контексті көңіл көңіл табуларының көңіл мәтіндегі жағдайда жақсы және әлемді нәти', 'mk': 'Овој документ го опишува пристапот развиен од страна на тимот ЕЛИРФ-УПВ на SemEval 2019 задача 3: Детектирање на контекстни емоции во текст. Развивме сембол за снимки од 1Д хиерархички конволуционални нервни мрежи за да извлечеме карактеристики од 3-обратни разговори со цел да извршиме контекстуално детекција на емоции во текстот. Овој ансембл за снимка се добива со просечно проценување на моделите избрани од генетски алгоритм кој ја оптимизира мерката на проценка. Предложениот ансембл добива подобри резултати од еден модел и добива конкурентни и ветувачки резултати за детекција на контекстни емоции во текст.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan pendekatan yang dikembangkan oleh pasukan ELiRF-UPV di SemEval 2019 Tugas 3: Pengesanan Emosi Konteksual dalam Teks. Kami telah mengembangkan Snapshot Ensemble 1D Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks untuk mengekstrak ciri-ciri dari perbualan 3 pusingan untuk melakukan pengesan emosi kontekstual dalam teks. Ensemble Snapshot ini diperoleh dengan mewarnakan model yang dipilih oleh Algoritma Genetik yang optimize ukuran penilaian. Ensemble yang diusulkan mendapatkan keputusan yang lebih baik daripada satu model dan ia mendapat keputusan kompetitif dan menjanjikan pada Pengesanan Emosi Konteksual dalam Teks.', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3: പദാവലിയിലെ കോണ്\u200dട്ടെക്സ്റ്റല്\u200d എംഎംഎഫ്-യുപിവി ടീമില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയെ ഈ പത്രി വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും മൂന്ന് തിരിയുന്ന സംസാരത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന സ്നാപ്പ് ഷോട്ട് നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സ്നേപ് ഈ സ്നാപ്പോട്ട് എസ്മെയില്\u200d ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു. മൂല്ല്യം മൂല്യം മാറ്റുന്ന ജെനിറ്റിക് അല്\u200dഗോരിതം കൊണ്ട് തെരഞ്ഞെട പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു മോഡലിനെക്കാള്\u200d ഉത്തമമായ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭിക്കുന്നു. ടെക്സ്റ്റിലുള്ള കോണ്\u200dട്ടെക്സ്റ്റല്\u200d എമോട്ട', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-approċċ żviluppat mit-tim ELiRF-UPV f’SemEval 2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. Żviluppajna Ensemble ta’ Snapshot ta’ Netwerks Newrali Konveoluzzjonali Iераrkiċi 1D biex neħħew karatteristiċi minn konverżjonijiet bi tliet dawriet sabiex iwettqu detezzjoni ta’ emozzjonijiet kuntestwali fit-test. Dan l-Ensemble ta’ Snapshot jinkiseb permezz tal-medja tal-mudelli magħżula minn Algoritmu Ġenetiku li jtejjeb il-miżura ta’ evalwazzjoni. L-ensemble propost jikseb riżultati a ħjar minn mudell wieħed u jikseb riżultati kompetittivi u promettenti dwar id-Detezzjoni tal-Emożizzjoni Kuntest fit-Test.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас SemEval 2019 оны ЕлиRF-UPV багийн хөгжсөн арга замыг тайлбарлаж байна. 3-р ажил: Текст дээр орчин үеийн мэдрэмжтэй мэдрэмжтэй мэдрэмж олж байна. Бид 1D Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks-ийн Snapshot Ensemble-ийг хөгжүүлсэн бөгөөд харьцааны сэтгэл хөдлөлийн мэдрэмжүүдийг текст дээр мэдрэмжүүдийн мэдрэмжүүдийг хийх үед 3-р ярилцлагаас гаргах чадварыг гаргасан. Энэ зураг зураг нь генетик алгоритм дээр сонгогдсон загваруудыг дундаж авдаг. Шинэ санал дэвшүүлэгт нэг загвараас илүү сайн үр дүнг гаргадаг. Энэ нь Contextual Emotion Detection in Text-д өрсөлдөөн, амлалтай үр дүнг гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver tilnærminga utvikla av ELiRF-UPV-gruppa på semiEval 2019 Oppgåve 3: Kontekstoppdaging av følelser i tekst. Vi har utvikla eit skjermbilete av 1D hierarkisk konvolusjonell neiralnettverk for å pakka ut funksjonar frå 3- omsetjingar for å utføra kontekstisk oppdaging av emosjonar i tekst. Denne biletmenyen blir henta ved å gjennomsnitt modellen valde av ein generelt algoritme som optimaliserer evalueringsmålet. Den foreslåde ensemblen får bedre resultat enn ein enkelt modell, og det får konkurrentiv og promiserende resultat på kontekstoppdaging av følelser i tekst.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano podejście opracowane przez zespół ELIRF-UPV w SemEval 2019 Zadanie 3: Kontekstowe wykrywanie emocji w tekście. Stworzyliśmy zespół Snapshot z hierarchicznych sieci konwolucyjnych 1D, aby wyodrębnić funkcje z rozmów trzykrotnych w celu wykonywania kontekstowego wykrywania emocji w tekście. Ten zespół Snapshot uzyskuje się poprzez uśrednienie modeli wybranych przez algorytm genetyczny optymalizujący miarę oceny. Proponowany zespół uzyskuje lepsze wyniki niż pojedynczy model oraz uzyskuje konkurencyjne i obiecujące wyniki w zakresie kontekstowego wykrywania emocji w tekście.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie abordarea dezvoltată de echipa ELiRF-UPV la SemEval 2019 Task 3: Detectarea emoțiilor contextuale în text. Am dezvoltat un ansamblu de instantanee de rețele neurale conveluționale ierarhice 1D pentru a extrage caracteristici din conversații în 3 rânduri pentru a efectua detectarea emoțiilor contextuale în text. Acest ansamblu de instantanee este obținut prin media modelelor selectate de un algoritm genetic care optimizează măsura de evaluare. Ansamblul propus obține rezultate mai bune decât un singur model și obține rezultate competitive și promițătoare privind detectarea emoțiilor contextuale în text.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje pristup koji je razvila tim ELiRF-UPV-a na semiEvalu 2019. zadatak 3: Kontekstualno otkrivanje emocija u tekstu. Razvili smo Snapshot Ensemble od 1D hijerarških konvolucionalnih neuronskih mreža kako bi izvukli karakteristike iz 3-okrenutih razgovora kako bi izvršili kontekstualno otkrivanje emocija u tekstu. Ovaj proizvod snimka dobija je prosječavanjem modela odabranih genetskim algoritmom koji optimizira mjeru procjene. Predloženi ensembl dobija bolji rezultat od jednog model a i dobija konkurentne i obećavajuće rezultate o konstrukciji kontekstualnih emocija u tekstu.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුවේ ELiRF-UPV කණ්ඩායමේ සෙම්වෙල් 2019 වැඩේ 3: පාළුවේ සම්බන්ධ Emotion හොයාගන්න. අපි ස්නැප්ෂෝට් එකක් විස්තර කරලා තියෙන්නේ 1D හියාර්චිකල් සම්පූර්ණ න්\u200dයුවෝල් ජාලයේ සැකසුම්පත් විස්තර කරලා තියෙන්න මේ ස්නැප්ෂෝට් සංස්කරණය සංස්කරණය ලැබෙනවා ජීනිතික ඇල්ගෝරිත්මයෙන් තෝරාගෙන තියෙන මොඩේල් අනුමාණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් එක්ක මොඩල් එකක් වඩා හොඳ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරත', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaa ku qoran qaabka ay ka soo hormariyeen kooxda ELiRF-UPV ee SemEval 2019 Task 3: Digta xasuusta ku qoran text. Waxan horumarinnay Snapshot Ensemle of 1D Hierarchical Convolution Neural Network in aan ka soo bixino xog ah 3-jeer conversations, si aan u sameynno xisaabta xilliga ah. This Snapshot Ensemble is obtained by averaging the models selected by a Genetic Algorithm that optimizes the evaluation measure.  Dalka la soo jeeday waxay heli karaan midho ka wanaagsan tusaale keliya, waxayna heli karaan resulto ku saabsan iskutar iyo ballan ku saabsan ku saabsan heshiiska xasuusta qoraalka.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver det tillvägagångssätt som utvecklats av ELiRF-UPV-teamet vid SemEval 2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. Vi har utvecklat en Snapshot Ensemble av 1D Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks för att extrahera funktioner från 3-svängs konversationer för att utföra kontextuell känslodetektering i text. Denna Snapshot Ensemble erhålls genom att beräkna de modeller som valts av en genetisk algoritm som optimerar utvärderingsmåttet. Den föreslagna ensemblen får bättre resultat än en enda modell och den får konkurrenskraftiga och lovande resultat på Contextual Emotion Detection in Text.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval 2019 பணியில் ELiRF- UPV அணி உருவாக்கப்பட்ட செயல் 3: உரையில் உள்ள சூழல் உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பு. மூன்று திரும்ப உரையில் உள்ள உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான குணங்களை வெளியேற்றுவதற்காக 1D உயர்ந்த த தொகுதி நெருக்கல் வலைப்பின்னல் ஒரு சினாப் இந்த ஸ்னாப்புட் காணப்படும் சராசரியான தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளை சராசரியாக கிடைக்கும் ஒரு ஜெனடிக் அல்கோரித் ஒரே மாதிரியை விட சிறந்த முடிவுகள் கிடைக்கும் மற்றும் உரையில் உள்ள சூழல் உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பதில் போட்டியாளர் மற்றும் வாக்க', 'ur': 'This paper describes the approach developed by the ELiRF-UPV team at SemEval 2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. ہم نے 1D ہیرارشیکل کنورل نیورل نیورل نیٹورک کی ایک اسنپشٹ انسمبل پیدا کی ہے تاکہ تین تبر کی گفتگو سے فائدے اٹھائیں تاکہ متوسط احساسات شناسایی کریں. This Snapshot Ensemble is obtained by averaging the models selected by a genetic Algorithm that optimizes the evaluation measure. پیغمبر کی پیغمبر ایک نمڈل سے بہتر نتیجے حاصل کرتا ہے اور اس کے پاس متوسط احساسات پیدا کرنا اور وعدہ کا نتیجہ حاصل کرتا ہے.', 'uz': 'Name Biz matnni bir xil hisobni aniqlash uchun 3dan bir xil muloqatlarni olib tashlash uchun 1D Hierarchik neyrolik tarmoqlarini yaratdik. @ info: whatsthis Name', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả phương pháp được phát triển bởi đội viễn RF-UPV tại SemEvl 209 Task 3: Kiểm tra cảm xúc kép trong văn bản. Chúng tôi đã phát triển một đỉnh cao hình ảnh thần kinh đa dạng dạng dạng dạng dạng dạng định dạng dạng dạng dạng. để trích các tính năng từ các cuộc đối thoại tua 3-Turn để thực hiện tỉ mỉ cảm xúc phát hiện trong văn bản. This Snapshot Ensemble được lấy bằng cách trung bình các mô hình được chọn bởi một Algoritm Gien để tăng tối đa biện pháp đánh giá. Một kết hợp có kết quả tốt hơn một mô hình duy nhất và đạt được kết quả cạnh tranh và hứa hẹn về việc phát hiện cảm xúc trong Văn bản.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва подхода, разработен от екипа на Задача 3: Контекстуално откриване на емоции в текста. Разработихме ансамбъл за снимки от 1Йерархични конволюционни неврални мрежи, за да извлечем функции от разговори в 3 завоя, за да извършим контекстуално откриване на емоции в текста. Този ансамбъл за снимки се получава чрез усредняване на моделите, избрани от генетичен алгоритъм, който оптимизира мярката за оценка. Предложеният ансамбъл постига по-добри резултати от един модел и постига конкурентни и обещаващи резултати по откриването на контекстуални емоции в текста.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver den tilgang, ELiRF-UPV-teamet har udviklet på SemEval 2019 Opgave 3: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. Vi har udviklet et Snapshot Ensemble af 1D Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks til at udtrække funktioner fra 3-turns samtaler for at udføre kontekstuel følelse detektering i tekst. Dette Snapshot Ensemble opnås ved at gennemsnitliggøre de modeller, der er valgt af en genetisk algoritme, der optimerer evalueringsmålingen. Det foreslåede ensemble opnår bedre resultater end en enkelt model og opnår konkurrencedygtige og lovende resultater på Contextual Emotion Detection in Text.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje pristup koji je razvijen tim ELiRF-UPV-a na zadatku 3. na semiEvalu 2019. Razvili smo pregled snimka od 1D hijerarskih konvolucionalnih neuronskih mreža kako bi izvukli karakteristike iz razgovora od 3 okretanja kako bi izvršili kontekstualno otkrivanje emocija u tekstu. Ovaj proučavač snimka dobiva prosječavanjem modela odabranih genetskim algoritmom koji optimizira mjeru procjene. Predloženi ensembl dobija bolji rezultat od jednog model a i dobija konkurentne i obećavajuće rezultate o konstrukciji kontekstnih emocija u tekstu.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft de aanpak die is ontwikkeld door het ELIRF-UPV team van SemEval 2019 Taak 3: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. We hebben een Snapshot Ensemble ontwikkeld van 1D Hierarchische Convolutional Neural Networks om functies uit 3-turn gesprekken te extraheren om contextuele emotie detectie in tekst uit te voeren. Dit Snapshot Ensemble wordt verkregen door het gemiddeld van de modellen geselecteerd door een Genetisch Algoritme dat de evaluatiemaat optimaliseert. Het voorgestelde ensemble behaalt betere resultaten dan een enkel model en het behaalt concurrerende en veelbelovende resultaten op het gebied van Contextual Emotion Detection in Text.', 'ko': '본고는 EliRF UPV 팀이 SemEval 2019 임무 3: 텍스트의 상하문 감정 검측에서 개발한 방법을 기술한다.우리는 텍스트에서 상하문 감정 검측을 수행하기 위해 1차원 권적 신경 네트워크의 스냅샷 집적을 개발하여 3라운드 대화에서 특징을 추출했다.이 스냅숏 집합은 도량을 최적화하여 평가하는 유전 알고리즘 선택 모델을 평균적으로 통해 얻어진 것이다.단일 모델에 비해 본고가 제시한 통합 모델은 더욱 좋은 결과를 얻었고 텍스트의 상하문 감정 검측에서도 경쟁력과 희망적인 결과를 얻었다.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt den Ansatz, den das ELIRF-UPV-Team bei SemEval 2019 Task 3: Kontextuelle Emotionserkennung im Text entwickelt hat. Wir haben ein Snapshot Ensemble von 1D Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks entwickelt, um Funktionen aus 3-Turn-Gesprächen zu extrahieren, um kontextuelle Emotionserkennung im Text durchzuführen. Dieses Snapshot Ensemble wird durch Mittelung der von einem genetischen Algorithmus ausgewählten Modelle erhalten, der die Auswertungsmaßnahme optimiert. Das vorgeschlagene Ensemble erzielt bessere Ergebnisse als ein einzelnes Modell und erzielt wettbewerbsfähige und vielversprechende Ergebnisse zur kontextuellen Emotionserkennung in Text.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ روش توسط تیم ELiRF-UPV توسط تیم ELiRF-UPV توسط کار ۳: شناسایی Emotions Contextual در متن توصیف می\u200cکند. ما یک انفجار Snapshot از شبکه\u200cهای عصبی\u200cهای معمولی 1D را توسعه کرده\u200cایم تا ویژه\u200cها را از گفتگوهای سه تبدیل کنیم تا در متن آزمایش احساسات متوسط را انجام دهیم. این انفجار انفجار از طریق متوسط مدل انتخاب شده توسط الگوریتم ژنتیکی که اندازه ارزیابی را بهترین می\u200cکند، دریافت می\u200cشود. اين پيشنهاد به عنوان نتايج بهتري از يک مدل پيدا ميکنه و نتايج مسابقه و قول ميده در مورد پيدا کردن احساسات متوسط در متن.', 'id': 'This paper describes the approach developed by the ELiRF-UPV team at SemEval 2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text.  Kami telah mengembangkan Ensemble Snapshot dari 1D Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks untuk mengekstrak fitur dari 3-putar percakapan untuk melakukan deteksi emosi kontekstual dalam teks. Ensemble Snapshot ini diperoleh dengan memperrata-rata model yang dipilih oleh Algoritma Genetik yang optimisasi ukuran evaluasi. Ensemble yang diusulkan mendapatkan hasil yang lebih baik dari model tunggal dan mendapatkan hasil kompetitif dan berjanji pada Deteksi Emosi Konteksual dalam Teks.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mbinu zilizotengenezwa na timu ya ELiRF-UPV kwenye Task 3 ya SemEval 2019: Utafiti wa Matukio ya Kimataifa katika Maandishi. Tumeunda Sehemu ya Kuzungumzia Mtandao wa Tamko za Ujadala wa 1D kwa ajili ya kuondoa vipengele vya mazungumzo ya mara 3 ili kufanya uchunguzi wa hisia za sasa kwa ujumbe wa maandishi. This Snapshot Ensemble is obtained by averaging the models selected by a Genetic Algorithm that optimizes the evaluation measure.  Mpango huu unapendekezwa unapata matokeo bora kuliko mfano mmoja na unapata matokeo ya ushindani na yanayoahidi kupata matukio ya Kugundua Ujasusi Mkuu katika Maandishi ya Matambo.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die toegang wat deur die ELiRF-UPV-span ontwikkeld is by SemEval 2019 Opdrag 3: Kontekslike Emotie Opdekking in Teks. Ons het 'n Snapshot Ensemble van 1D Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Netwerke ontwikkel om funksies van 3- draai omskakels uit te trek om contextual emosie beskrywing in teks te doen. Hierdie Snapshot Ensemble word ontvang deur die gemiddelde van die modele gekose deur 'n geneetiese Algoritme wat die evaluasie maat optimaliseer. Die voorgestelde ensemble kry beter resultate as 'n enkele model en dit kry mededingste en beloftende resultate op Kontekslike Emotie Opdekking in Teks.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz ELiRF-UPV toparyň SemEval 2019 Taýýasy 3: Kontekstual Emotion Detection in Text tarapyndan gelinýän ýazşyny tassyýar. Biz 1D Hiyerarşik Jewir Taýramy Çykarmak üçin 3 çerä çykyşymdan çykmak üçin duýdury tespit etmek üçin düzümlendik. Bu Snapshot Çykyşyrymy genetik bir Algoritm tarapyndan saýlanan hatlary umytlaýan edip kabul edildi. Mazmunlar üçin ýeke nusgadan has gowy netijeleri gazanýar we bu nusgadan Metin Kötürmeklerinden söz berýän we söz berýän netijeleri aldy.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan qasjen e zhvilluar nga ekipi ELiRF-UPV në SemEval 2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. Kemi zhvilluar një Snapshot Ensemble të Rrjeteve Neurale 1D Hierarkike Konveolutive për të nxjerrë karakteristika nga bisedimet tre-kthese me qëllim që të kryejnë zbulimin e emocioneve kontekstuale në tekst. Ky Ensemble Snapshot merret duke mesatar modelet e zgjedhur nga një algoritëm gjenetik që optimizon masën e vlerësimit. Ensambli i propozuar fiton rezultate më të mira se një model i vetëm dhe fiton rezultate konkurruese dhe premtuese mbi zbulimin e emocioneve kontekstuale në tekst.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የSemEval 2019 ስራ 3: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. በጽሑፍ ውስጥ የአሁኑን እውቀት ማግኘት ከ3-ተመለስ ንግግር ለመውጣት የ1D ሐራርክቲካዊ ኮንፕሎጂካዊ ነዌር መረብ አካባቢ ነው፡፡ አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር በተዘጋጀው ምሳሌ አንዲት ሞዴል የበለጠ ፍሬዎችን ያገኛል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է ELiRF-UPV թիմի զարգացած մոտեցումը, որը 2019 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" 3-րդ հանձնարարում է. տեքստում գտնվող կոնտեքստային զգացմունքների հայտնաբերումը: Մենք զարգացրել ենք 1D Հիերարխիկ հակառակցող նյարդային ցանցերի լուսանկարներ, որպեսզի առանձնահատկություններ դուրս բերենք 3-անկյունից զրույցներից, որպեսզի տեքստում կատարենք կոնտեքստային զգացմունքների հայտնաբերումը Այս լուսանկարի էնսեմպը ստացվում է միջինում գենետիկ ալգորիթմի կողմից ընտրված մոդելները, որոնք օպտիմացնում են գնահատման չափումը: Առաջարկված համակարգը ավելի լավ արդյունքներ է ստանում, քան մեկ մոդելը, և ստանում է մրցակցության և խոստացնող արդյունքներ տեքստում գտնվող կոնտեքստային զգացմունքների հայտնաբերման համար:', 'az': "Bu kağıt 2019-in SemEval'da ELiRF-UPV ekibi təhsil etdiyi metodları 3. Gözəl: Mətndə müxtəlif Emotion Detection təhsil edir. Biz 1D Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks'in bir Snapshot Ensemble yaratdıq ki, məktubla müxtəlif duyguları keşfetmək üçün 3 dönüş müzakirələrdən fəaliyyətləri çıxartmaq üçün. Bu Snapshot Ensemble, değerlendirmə ölçüsünü optimizləndirən genetik Algoritim vasitəsilə seçilmiş modelləri ortalamaqla alır. Tək modellərdən daha yaxşı sonuçlar alır və məlumatın Contextual Emotion Detection nəticəsi barəsində mübahisə və söz verici sonuçlar alır.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল ২০১৯ টাস্ক ৩: টেক্সটে ইলিআরএফ-উপিভি দলের ELiRF-UPV টিমের দ্বারা উন্নয়নের পদ্ধতি বর্ণনা করেছে। আমরা ১ ডি হিরার্কিয়ার্কিয়াল কনভোলেশন নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্কের একটি স্ন্যাপশট স্নেমবেল উন্নয়ন করেছি যাতে প্রাক্তন অনুভূতি সনাক্ত করতে পারে। জেনেটিক অ্যালগরিদমের মাধ্যমে নির্বাচিত মডেলগুলোর গড়ে এই স্ন্যাপশটের প্রতিষ্ঠান পাওয়া যায় যা মূল্যায়নের মাধ্ প্রস্তাবিত একটি মডেলের চেয়ে ভাল ফলাফল পেয়ে যায় এবং টেক্সটে প্রতিযোগিতা ও প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল ফলাফল পায়।', 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu l'enfocament desenvolupat per l'equip ELiRF-UPV a SemEval 2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. Hem desenvolupat un Snapshot Ensemble de Redes Neurals Convolucionals Hierarquiques 1D per extrair característiques de converses de tres girs per a fer detectar emocions contextuals en text. Aquest Ensemble es obté mitjançant els models seleccionats per un algoritme genètic que optimitza la mesura d'evaluació. L'ensemble proposat obté millors resultats que un únic model i obté resultats competitius i prometedors en la detecció de l'emoció contextual al text.", 'et': "Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse ELiRF-UPV meeskonna poolt SemEval 2019. aasta ülesandel 3: kontekstuaalne emotsioonide tuvastamine tekstis välja töötatud lähenemisviisi. Oleme välja töötanud 1D hierarhiliste konvolutsioonivõrkude Snapshot Ensemble'i, et ekstraheerida funktsioone kolmekordsetest vestlustest, et teostada kontekstuaalset emotsioonide tuvastamist tekstis. See Snapshot Ensemble saadakse hindamismeetmeid optimeeriva geneetilise algoritmi abil valitud mudelite keskmiselt. Kavandatud ansambel on paremad tulemused kui üks mudel ning konkurentsivõimelised ja paljutõotavad tulemused kontekstuaalse emotsioonide tuvastamisel tekstis.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje pristup koji je razvila tim ELiRF-UPV-a na semiEvalu 2019. zadatak 3: Kontekstualno otkrivanje emocija u tekstu. Razvili smo pregled snimka od 1D hijerarskih konvolucionalnih neuronskih mreža kako bi izvukli karakteristike iz 3-okrenutih razgovora kako bi izvršili kontekstualno otkrivanje emocija u tekstu. Ovaj proizvod snimka dobija je prosječavanjem modela odabranih genetskim algoritmom koji optimizira mjeru procjene. Predloženi ensembl dobija bolji rezultat od jednog model a i dobija konkurentne i obećavajuće rezultate o konstrukciji kontekstualnih emocija u tekstu.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje přístup vyvinutý týmem ELIRF-UPV na SemEval 2019 Task 3: Kontextová detekce emocí v textu. Vyvinuli jsme snímkový soubor 1D hierarchických konvelučních neuronových sítí, který extrahuje funkce z tříotočných konverzací za účelem provedení kontextové detekce emocí v textu. Tento snímek je získán průměrem modelů vybraných genetickým algoritmem, který optimalizuje hodnotící míru. Navržený soubor dosahuje lepších výsledků než jediný model a získává konkurenční a slibné výsledky na kontextové detekci emocí v textu.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan ELiRF-UPV:n tiimin kehittämää lähestymistapaa SemEval 2019 Task 3: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text -tapahtumassa. Olemme kehittäneet 1D-hierarkisten konvolutionaalisten hermoverkkojen Snapshot Ensemblen poimimaan ominaisuuksia 3-vuoroisista keskusteluista ja suorittamaan kontekstuaalisen tunteentunnistuksen tekstissä. Tämä Snapshot Ensemble saadaan laskemalla keskiarvot, jotka valitaan geneettisellä algoritmilla, joka optimoi arviointitoimenpiteen. Ehdotettu kokonaisuus tuottaa parempia tuloksia kuin yksittäinen malli ja tuottaa kilpailukykyisiä ja lupaavia tuloksia kontekstuaalisen tunteentunnistuksen tekstissä.', 'ha': "Wannan takardar na describe the direction developed by the ELiRF-UPV team at Semevaal 2019 Task 3: Content Emission Finding in Text. We have developed a Snapshot Ensemble of 1D Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks to extract features from 3-turn conversations in order to perform contextual emotion detection in text.  @ action: button An buƙata shirin ayuka, yana da mafiya alhẽri ga matsala daga misãlai guda kuma yana sãmu fassarar da yin competiti da mai yi wa'adi a kan Tafiyar da Cikaktan Tafiyar da Ƙara cikin Mataimakin.", 'he': 'הנייר הזה מתאר את הגישה שהופכת על ידי צוות ELiRF-UPV ב SemEval 2019 משימה 3: גילוי רגשות קונטקסטיים בטקסט. פיתחנו תצוגת צילום של רשתות נוירוליות משתנות הייררכיות 1D כדי לחלץ תכונות משיחות בשלושה פעמים כדי לבצע זיהוי רגשות קונטקסטיים בטקסט. האנגלית צילומים הזו מושגת על ידי הממוצע של הדוגמנים שנבחרו על ידי אלגוריתם גנטי שמאופטימיזם את מדידת הערכה. האנסמל המוצע מקבל תוצאות טובות יותר ממודל אחד והוא מקבל תוצאות תחרותיות ומבטיחות על גילוי רגשות קונטקסטיים בטקסט.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan pristop, ki ga je razvila ekipa ELiRF-UPV v okviru naloge 3 SemEval 2019: Kontekstualno zaznavanje čustev v besedilu. Razvili smo ansambel za posnetke 1D hierarhičnih konvolucijskih živčnih omrežij, da bi izvlekli značilnosti iz 3-obratnih pogovorov in tako izvedli kontekstualno zaznavanje čustev v besedilu. Ta ansambl posnetkov je pridobljen z izračunom povprečja modelov, izbranih z genetskim algoritmom, ki optimizira merilo ocenjevanja. Predlagani ansambel dosega boljše rezultate kot en sam model in konkurenčne in obetavne rezultate na področju zaznavanja kontekstualnih čustev v besedilu.', 'jv': 'Ngetong iki rambarang panjenengan kelas nggawe barang kelas telu nggawe barang SEiRF-UNV nang seminval 2011 task 3: contextual emuation detection in Text. Awakdhéwé wis nggunakake Ketoken S-Nsemble kanggo 1D Hiurahkal Konvolution Neral Network nggawe nyimpen cara-cara sing wis ana 3-conversations kanggo nggawe cara-cara emphasi sing nggunakake contextual detection nang teks. Link Sugeng dipolehasno hukum sing luwih ditambah akeh luwih apik ning model sing berarti banjur iki dadi sing ngwalih luwih apik lan kelompok barang seneng pisan kelas kontinual', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ELiRF-UPV མིའི་གནད་དོན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་1D Hierarchical Convolutional Neural Networks(Snapshot Ensemble)ཡི་སྒྲིག འཕགས་རིས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་གི་སྐྱེས་སྟངས་འདིས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་བཟོ་རྣམ་པ་ཡིན་པས། གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་ཡོད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་གཅིག་ལས་མཐོ་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལེགས་ཕལ་ཐོབ་པ་དང་གསར་བརྗོད་པའི་ཐོག'}
{'en': 'EPITA-ADAPT at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Detecting emotions in textual conversations using deep learning models combination', 'pt': 'EPITA-ADAPT no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Detectando emoções em conversas textuais usando combinação de modelos de aprendizado profundo', 'es': 'EPITA-ADAPT en SemEval-2019 Tarea 3: Detectar emociones en conversaciones textuales mediante la combinación de modelos de aprendizaje profundo', 'ar': 'EPITA-ADAPT في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: اكتشاف المشاعر في المحادثات النصية باستخدام مجموعة نماذج التعلم العميق', 'fr': "EPITA-ADAPT au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Détecter les émotions dans les conversations textuelles à l'aide de modèles d'apprentissage", 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のEPITA - ADAPTタスク3 ：ディープラーニングモデルの組み合わせを使用したテキスト会話における感情の検出', 'hi': 'Epita-Adapt पर SemEval-2019 कार्य 3: गहरी सीखने के मॉडल संयोजन का उपयोग करके पाठ्य वार्तालापों में भावनाओं का पता लगाना', 'zh': 'EPITA-ADAPT at SemEval-2019 务3:以深学模检文本对语之情', 'ru': 'EPITA-ADAPT на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Обнаружение эмоций в текстовых разговорах с использованием комбинации моделей глубокого обучения', 'ga': 'EPITA-ADAPT ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Mothúcháin a bhrath i gcomhráite téacsúla ag baint úsáide as teaglaim de shamhlacha domhainfhoghlama', 'ka': 'EPITA', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων σε συζητήσεις κειμένου χρησιμοποιώντας συνδυασμό μοντέλων βαθιάς μάθησης', 'hu': 'EPITA-ADAPT a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: Érzelmek felismerése szöveges beszélgetésekben mélytanulási modellek kombinációjával', 'it': 'EPITA-ADAPT a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Rilevare le emozioni nelle conversazioni testuali utilizzando la combinazione di modelli di deep learning', 'lt': 'EPITA-ADAPT SemEval-2019 3 užduotis: emocijų aptikimas tekstiniuose pokalbiuose naudojant gilaus mokymosi modelių derinį', 'kk': 'EPITA-ADAPT жалпы оқыту үлгілерін біріктіру үлгілерін қолдану 3- тапсырмасында', 'mk': 'ЕПИТА-АДАПТ на SemEval-2019 задача 3: Детектирање емоции во текстуалните разговори користејќи комбинација на модели за длабоко учење', 'ms': 'EPITA-ADAPT di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Mengesan emosi dalam perbualan teks menggunakan kombinasi model belajar dalam', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3-ല്\u200d EPITA-ADAPT: ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d കൂട്ടം ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ടെക്സ്ചുള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന', 'mn': 'EPITA-ADAPT at SemEval-2019 Task 3: textual conversations using deep learning models combination', 'no': 'EPITA-ADAPT på semiEval-2019 Oppgåve 3: Oppdaging av emosjonar i tekstsamtaler med dyp læringsmodeller', 'mt': 'EPITA-ADAPT f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 3: L-iskoperta ta’ emozzjonijiet fi konverżjonijiet testwali bl-użu ta’ kombinazzjoni ta’ mudelli ta’ tagħlim profond', 'pl': 'EPITA-ADAPT w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Wykrywanie emocji w rozmowach tekstowych za pomocą kombinacji modeli głębokiego uczenia', 'ro': 'EPITA-ADAPT la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Detectarea emoțiilor în conversațiile textuale folosind combinația modelelor de învățare profundă', 'sr': 'EPITA-ADAPT na semiEval-2019 Task 3: Otkrivanje emocija u tekstualnim razgovorima koristeći kombinaciju dubokih modela učenja', 'si': 'EPITA', 'so': 'Shaqada 3:', 'sv': 'EPITA-ADAPT på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Att upptäcka känslor i textsamtal med hjälp av en kombination av djupinlärningsmodeller', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 3: நிரல் உரையாடலில் உணர்வுகளை கண்டுபிடி', 'ur': 'EPITA-ADAPT SemEval-2019 ٹاکس 3 میں: عمیق تعلیم نمڈلوں کی ترکیب کے مطابق تفسیر میں احساسات تلاش کرنا', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifa 3: Matn talabatlarida hissiyalarni aniqlash', 'vi': 'Diễn viên EPITA-ADAP tại SemEvl-209 Task 3: phát hiện cảm xúc trong kết cấu kết nối kết hợp các mô hình học sâu.', 'da': 'EPITA-ADAPT på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Opdagelse af følelser i tekstsamtaler ved hjælp af kombination af deep learning modeller', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Откриване на емоции в текстови разговори с помощта на комбинация от модели за дълбоко обучение', 'id': 'EPITA-ADAPT di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Detektif emosi dalam percakapan tekstual menggunakan kombinasi model belajar dalam', 'de': 'EPITA-ADAPT bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabenstellung 3: Emotionen in textuellen Gesprächen mittels Deep Learning Modellkombination erkennen', 'fa': 'EPITA-ADAPT در ماموریت ۳: شناسایی احساسات در مکالمات متن با استفاده از ترکیب مدل یادگیری عمیق', 'nl': 'EPITA-ADAPT op SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Emotiones detecteren in tekstuele gesprekken met behulp van deep learning modellen combinatie', 'hr': 'EPITA-ADAPT na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: otkrivanje emocija u tekstualnim razgovorima koristeći kombinaciju dubokih modela učenja', 'ko': 'EPITA-ADAPT가SemEval-19 작업3: 딥러닝 모델 조합을 사용하여 텍스트 대화의 정서 측정', 'sw': 'EPITA-ADAPT katika Task 3 ya SemEval-2019: Kugundua hisia katika mazungumzo ya msingi kwa kutumia muunganiko wa vifaa vya kujifunza kina', 'af': 'EPITA-ADAPT by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 3: Opdekking emosies in tekstuele gesprekke deur diep leer modele kombinasie te gebruik', 'tr': 'EPITA-ADAPT at SemEval-2019 Task 3: emotions in textual conversations using deep learning models combination', 'sq': 'EPITA-ADAPT në SemEval-2019 Task 3: Detektimi i emocioneve në bisedimet tekstuale duke përdorur kombinimin e modeleve të mësimit të thellë', 'am': 'ስራ 3:', 'hy': 'EpITA-ADAPT-ը ՍեմԷվալ-2019-ի 3. հանձնարարությունը. զգացմունքների հայտնաբերումը տեքստալ զրույցներում օգտագործելով խորը սովորելու մոդելների համակցությունը', 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৯ টাস্ক ৩-এ EPITA-ADAPT: গভীর শিক্ষা মডেল সংযোগ ব্যবহার করে টেক্সচুয়াল আলোচনায় অনুভূতি সনাক্ত করা হচ্ছে', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Task 3: Öyrənmək modelləri birləşdirilməsi ilə textual conversations içində duyguları keşfetmək üçün EPITA-ADAPT', 'ca': "EPITA-ADAPT a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Detectar emocions en converses textuals utilitzant una combinació de models d'aprenentatge profund", 'cs': 'Úkol 3: Detekce emocí v textových konverzacích pomocí kombinace modelů hlubokého učení', 'et': 'EPITA-ADAPT SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 3: Emotsioonide tuvastamine tekstivestlustes sügavõppe mudelite kombinatsiooni abil', 'bs': 'EPITA-ADAPT na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: Otkrivanje emocija u tekstualnim razgovorima koristeći kombinaciju dubokih modela učenja', 'fi': 'EPITA-ADAPT SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 3: Tunteiden tunnistaminen tekstikeskusteluissa syväoppimismallien yhdistelmän avulla', 'sk': 'EPITA-ADAPT na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Zaznavanje čustev v besedilnih pogovorih s kombinacijo modelov globokega učenja', 'jv': 'PPIBA-DEPAT at semi-2011 task 3: detecting emphasis in textual conversations use deep Learn modes combining', 'he': 'EPITA-ADAPT ב SemEval-2019 משימה 3: גילוי רגשות בשיחות טקסטיות בשימוש שילוב מודלים למידה עמוקה', 'ha': 'EPTIA-ADPAT at SemEV-2019 Tafiyar 3: Yana gane hisoyi cikin mazaɓa na rubutu, ana yi amfani da koma da misãlai masu ƙari da karantawa', 'bo': 'EPITA-ADAPT at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Detecting emotions in textual conversations using deep learning models combination'}
{'en': 'Messaging platforms like WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger and Twitter have gained recently much popularity owing to their ability in connecting users in real-time. The content of these textual messages can be a useful resource for text mining to discover and unhide various aspects, including emotions. In this paper we present our submission for SemEval 2019 task ‘EmoContext’. The task consists of classifying a given textual dialogue into one of four emotion classes : Angry, Happy, Sad and Others. Our proposed system is based on the combination of different deep neural networks techniques. In particular, we use Recurrent Neural Networks (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) and Transfer Learning (TL) methodes. Our final system, achieves an F1 score of 74.51 % on the subtask evaluation dataset.', 'ar': 'اكتسبت منصات المراسلة مثل WhatsApp و Facebook Messenger و Twitter شعبية كبيرة مؤخرًا نظرًا لقدرتها على توصيل المستخدمين في الوقت الفعلي. يمكن أن يكون محتوى هذه الرسائل النصية مصدرًا مفيدًا للتنقيب عن النص لاكتشاف وإخفاء الجوانب المختلفة ، بما في ذلك العواطف. في هذا البحث نقدم تقديمنا لمهمة SemEval 2019 "EmoContext". تتكون المهمة من تصنيف حوار نصي معين في واحدة من أربع فئات للعاطفة: غاضب وسعيد وحزين وآخرون. يعتمد نظامنا المقترح على مزيج من تقنيات الشبكات العصبية العميقة المختلفة. على وجه الخصوص ، نستخدم أساليب الشبكات العصبية المتكررة (LSTM و B-LSTM و GRU و B-GRU) والشبكة العصبية التلافيفية (CNN) وطرق التعلم (TL). حقق نظامنا النهائي درجة F1 بنسبة 74.51٪ في مجموعة بيانات تقييم المهام الفرعية.', 'pt': "Plataformas de mensagens como WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger e Twitter ganharam recentemente muita popularidade devido à sua capacidade de conectar usuários em tempo real. O conteúdo dessas mensagens textuais pode ser um recurso útil para mineração de texto para descobrir e reexibir vários aspectos, incluindo emoções. Neste artigo apresentamos nossa submissão para a tarefa do SemEval 2019 `EmoContext'. A tarefa consiste em classificar um determinado diálogo textual em uma das quatro classes de emoção: Irritado, Feliz, Triste e Outros. Nosso sistema proposto é baseado na combinação de diferentes técnicas de redes neurais profundas. Em particular, usamos os métodos de Redes Neurais Recorrentes (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Rede Neural Convolucional (CNN) e Aprendizado de Transferência (TL). Nosso sistema final alcança uma pontuação F1 de 74,51% no conjunto de dados de avaliação de subtarefas.", 'fr': "Les plateformes de messagerie comme WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger et Twitter ont récemment gagné en popularité en raison de leur capacité à connecter les utilisateurs en temps réel. Le contenu de ces messages textuels peut être une ressource utile pour l'exploration de texte afin de découvrir et de révéler divers aspects, y compris les émotions. Dans cet article, nous présentons notre soumission pour la tâche SemEval 2019 «\xa0EmoContext\xa0». La tâche consiste à classer un dialogue textuel donné dans l'une des quatre classes d'émotions\xa0: Angry, Happy, Sad et Others. Le système que nous proposons est basé sur la combinaison de différentes techniques de réseaux neuronaux profonds. En particulier, nous utilisons les méthodes des réseaux de neurones récurrents (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), des réseaux de neurones convolutifs (CNN) et des méthodes d'apprentissage par transfert (TL). Notre système final obtient un score F1 de 74,51\xa0% sur le jeu de données d'évaluation des sous-tâches.", 'es': 'Las plataformas de mensajería como WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger y Twitter han ganado mucha popularidad recientemente debido a su capacidad para conectar a los usuarios en tiempo real. El contenido de estos mensajes de texto puede ser un recurso útil para la minería de textos para descubrir y mostrar varios aspectos, incluidas las emociones. En este artículo presentamos nuestra presentación para la tarea «EmoContext» de SemEval 2019. La tarea consiste en clasificar un diálogo textual determinado en una de las cuatro clases de emociones: enojado, feliz, triste y otros. Nuestro sistema propuesto se basa en la combinación de diferentes técnicas de redes neuronales profundas. En particular, utilizamos los métodos de redes neuronales recurrentes (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), redes neuronales convolucionales (CNN) y aprendizaje por transferencia (TL). Nuestro sistema final logra una puntuación F1 del 74,51% en el conjunto de datos de evaluación de subtareas.', 'ja': 'WhatsApp、Facebook Messenger、Twitterなどのメッセージングプラットフォームは、リアルタイムでユーザーを接続できるため、最近多くの人気を得ています。これらのテキストメッセージの内容は、感情を含む様々な態様を発見および非表示にするためのテキストマイニングの有用なリソースとなり得る。この論文では、SemEval 2019タスク「EmoContext」の提出物を紹介します。タスクは、与えられたテキストの対話を、怒り、幸せ、悲しい、その他の4つの感情クラスのいずれかに分類することで構成されています。提案されたシステムは、異なる深層ニューラルネットワーク技術の組み合わせに基づいています。特に、再帰ニューラルネットワーク（ LSTM、B - LSTM、GRU、B - GRU ）、畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ CNN ）、転送学習（ TL ）方法を使用しています。最終的なシステムは、サブタスク評価データセットで74.51 ％のF 1スコアを達成します。', 'zh': 'WhatsApp,Facebook Messenger与Twitter等消息传递平台,近以实时接用户之力广受欢迎。 此文本消息,可为文本发掘有用之资,以见和解藏各得其情。 本文中,我们介绍了我们为SemEval 2019务EmoContext提交的文件。 文本给定分为四情:怒,乐,悲。 吾言系统,盖不同深度神经网络术之组也。 特用递归神经网络(LSTM,B-LSTM,GRU,B-GRU),卷积神经网络(CNN)迁学(TL)法。 终于子务评数集上遂成 74.51% F1 之分。', 'hi': "व्हाट्सएप, फेसबुक मैसेंजर और ट्विटर जैसे मैसेजिंग प्लेटफार्मों ने हाल ही में वास्तविक समय में उपयोगकर्ताओं को जोड़ने की उनकी क्षमता के कारण बहुत लोकप्रियता हासिल की है। इन पाठ्य संदेशों की सामग्री पाठ खनन के लिए भावनाओं सहित विभिन्न पहलुओं को खोजने और अनहाइड करने के लिए एक उपयोगी संसाधन हो सकती है। इस पेपर में हम SemEval 2019 कार्य 'EmoContext' के लिए अपना सबमिशन प्रस्तुत करते हैं। कार्य में एक दिए गए पाठ्य संवाद को चार भावना वर्गों में से एक में वर्गीकृत करना शामिल है: गुस्सा, खुश, उदास और अन्य। हमारी प्रस्तावित प्रणाली विभिन्न गहरे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क तकनीकों के संयोजन पर आधारित है। विशेष रूप से, हम आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) और Transfer Learning (TL) विधियों का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारी अंतिम प्रणाली, सबटास्क मूल्यांकन डेटासेट पर 74.51% का एफ 1 स्कोर प्राप्त करती है।", 'ru': 'Платформы обмена сообщениями, такие как WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger и Twitter, в последнее время приобрели большую популярность благодаря своей способности подключать пользователей в режиме реального времени. Содержание этих текстовых сообщений может быть полезным ресурсом для изучения текста, чтобы обнаружить и скрыть различные аспекты, включая эмоции. В этой статье мы представляем нашу заявку на выполнение задачи SemEval 2019 «EmoContext». Задача состоит в классификации данного текстового диалога на один из четырех классов эмоций: Angry, Happy, Sad и Others. Предлагаемая нами система основана на сочетании различных методов глубоких нейронных сетей. В частности, мы используем методы рекуррентных нейронных сетей (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), сверточной нейронной сети (CNN) и обучения передаче (TL). Наша финальная система достигает F1 балла 74,51% на наборе данных оценки подзадачи.', 'ga': "Tháinig an-tóir ar ardáin teachtaireachtaí cosúil le WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger agus Twitter le déanaí mar gheall ar a gcumas úsáideoirí a nascadh i bhfíor-am. Is féidir le hábhar na dteachtaireachtaí téacs seo a bheith ina acmhainn úsáideach chun téacs a mhianadóireacht chun gnéithe éagsúla a aimsiú agus a cheilt, lena n-áirítear mothúcháin. Sa pháipéar seo cuirimid ár n-aighneacht do thasc SemEval 2019 i láthair `EmoContext'. Is éard atá sa tasc ná dialóg téacsúil tugtha a rangú i gceann de cheithre rang mothúcháin: Feargach, Sásta, Brónach agus Eile. Tá an córas atá beartaithe againn bunaithe ar theicnící éagsúla líonraí néaracha doimhne a chomhcheangal. Go háirithe, bainimid úsáid as Líonraí Néaracha Athfhillteacha (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Líonra Neural Convolutional (CNN) agus modhanna Aistrithe Foghlama (TL). Baineann ár gcóras deiridh amach scór F1 de 74.51% ar an tacar sonraí meastóireachta fothasc.", 'el': 'Οι πλατφόρμες μηνυμάτων όπως το και το έχουν κερδίσει πρόσφατα μεγάλη δημοτικότητα λόγω της δυνατότητάς τους να συνδέουν τους χρήστες σε πραγματικό χρόνο. Το περιεχόμενο αυτών των κειμένων μπορεί να είναι ένας χρήσιμος πόρος για την εξόρυξη κειμένου για να ανακαλύψει και να αποκαλύψει διάφορες πτυχές, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των συναισθημάτων. Σε αυτή την εργασία παρουσιάζουμε την υποβολή μας για την εργασία "EmoContext". Το έργο συνίσταται στην ταξινόμηση ενός συγκεκριμένου κειμένου διαλόγου σε μία από τις τέσσερις κατηγορίες συναισθημάτων: Θυμωμένος, Ευτυχισμένος, Λυπημένος και άλλοι. Το προτεινόμενο σύστημα βασίζεται στο συνδυασμό διαφορετικών τεχνικών βαθέων νευρωνικών δικτύων. Ειδικότερα, χρησιμοποιούμε τις μεθόδους Επαναλαμβανόμενων Νευρικών Δικτύων (ΚΝΝ) και Μεταφοράς Μάθησης (ΤΛ). Το τελικό μας σύστημα, επιτυγχάνει μια βαθμολογία F1 74,51% στο σύνολο δεδομένων αξιολόγησης δευτερεύουσας εργασίας.', 'ka': 'შეტყობინებების პლატატურები, როგორც WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger და Twitter, ახლა მხოლოდ მნიშვნელოვანია, რადგან ისინი შესაძლებლობად მომხმარებელი რეალურ დროში დაკავშირება. ამ ტექსტულური შეტყობინებების შესახებ შეიძლება იყოს ტექსტულური მინდომის გამოსახულებელი რესურსი, რომელიც აღმოჩენა და არაკეთება განსხვავებული არსებულ ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენ ჩვენი წარმოიდგინეთ SemEval 2019 დავალებისთვის "EmoContext". პარამეტრები იქნება კლასიფიკაციის განახლებული ტექსტულ დიალოგის ერთი ემოციონის კლასიში: ბედნიერი, ღედნიერი, ზედნიერი და სხვები. ჩვენი საზოგადომი სისტემა განსხვავებული ნეიროლური ქსელის ტექნექციების კომბიზაციაზე ბაზიან. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ გამოყენებთ განსაკუთრებული ნეიროლური ქსელები (LSTM, B- LSTM, GRU, B- GRU), კონველური ნეიროლური ქსელი (CNN) და გასწავლების (TL) მეტოდეები. ჩვენი საკუთარი სისტემა, F1 წერტილი 74,51% იქნება საკუთარი განსაზღვრებული მონაცემების შესახებ.', 'hu': "Az olyan üzenetküldő platformok, mint a WhatsApp, a Facebook Messenger és a Twitter, az utóbbi időben nagy népszerűségre tettek szert, mivel képesek valós idejű kapcsolatba lépni a felhasználókkal. Ezeknek a szöveges üzeneteknek a tartalma hasznos erőforrás lehet a szövegbányászathoz, hogy felfedezze és felfedje különböző aspektusokat, beleértve az érzelmeket is. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a SemEval 2019 feladatra való beadványunkat `EmoContent'. A feladat az, hogy egy adott szöveges párbeszédet a négy érzelmi osztály egyikébe soroljuk: Dühös, Boldog, Szomorú és Társai. Javasolt rendszerünk különböző mélyneurális hálózati technikák kombinációján alapul. Különösen ismétlődő neurális hálózatokat (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), konvolúciós neurális hálózatokat (CNN) és transzfer tanulás (TL) módszereket alkalmazunk. Végső rendszerünk 74,51%-os F1 pontszámot ér el a részfeladat értékelési adatkészleten.", 'it': "Piattaforme di messaggistica come WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger e Twitter hanno recentemente guadagnato molta popolarità grazie alla loro capacità di collegare gli utenti in tempo reale. Il contenuto di questi messaggi testuali può essere una risorsa utile per il text mining per scoprire e svelare vari aspetti, comprese le emozioni. In questo articolo presentiamo la nostra presentazione per SemEval 2019 task `EmoContent'. Il compito consiste nel classificare un dato dialogo testuale in una delle quattro classi emotive: Angry, Happy, Sad e Others. Il nostro sistema proposto si basa sulla combinazione di diverse tecniche di reti neurali profonde. In particolare, utilizziamo i metodi Recurrent Neural Networks (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) e Transfer Learning (TL). Il nostro sistema finale, raggiunge un punteggio F1 del 74,51% sul set di dati di valutazione subtask.", 'kk': 'WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger және Twitter секілді хабарлау платформалары өзінің шын уақытта пайдаланушыларды қосылу мүмкіндігіне көп мәліметті алды. Бұл мәтін хаттардың мазмұны мәтін құрылғысын табу мен жасыру үшін әртүрлі қасиеттерді, мәтін құрылғысының мазмұнына пайдалы ресурс болады. Бұл қағазда 2019 жылдың semiEval тапсырмасына "EmoContext" деген тапсырманы таңдаймыз. Тапсырма төрт емоциялық сыныптардың біріне келтірілген мәтін диалогын сыныптау: Қызық, бақытты, қауіпсіз және басқалар. Біздің қолданылатын жүйеміз түрлі түрлі невралдық желі техникалардың жинақтауына негізделген. Әрине біз қайталанатын нейралық желі (LSTM, B- LSTM, GRU, B- GRU), қайталанатын нейралық желі (CNN) және трансфер оқыту (TL) методтерін қолданамыз. Біздің соңғы жүйеміз, F1 нәтижесін төменгі сұраныс деректер жиынында 74,51% деп жеткізеді.', 'lt': 'Pranešimo platformos, pavyzdžiui, WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger ir Twitter, neseniai pasiekė daug populiarumo dėl jų gebėjimo sujungti naudotojus realiuoju laiku. Šių tekstinių pranešimų turinys gali būti naudingas tekstų kasybos išteklius įvairiems aspektams, įskaitant emocijas, aptikti ir atskleisti. Šiame dokumente pristatome savo pasiūlymą dėl 2019 m. SemEval užduoties „EmoContext“. Užduotis – klasifikuoti tam tikrą tekstinį dialogą į vieną iš keturių emocijų klasių: pyktis, laimingas, liūdnas ir kt. Mūsų siūloma sistema grindžiama įvairių giliųjų nervų tinklų metodų deriniu. Visų pirma naudojame pasikartojančių neurologinių tinklų (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), konvoliucinio neurologinio tinklo (CNN) ir perdavimo mokymosi (TL) metodus. Mūsų galutinė sistema pasiekia 74,51 proc. F1 tašką pagal paklausos vertinimo duomenų rinkinį.', 'mk': 'Платформи за пораки како WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger и Twitter неодамна добија многу популарност поради нивната способност да ги поврзат корисниците во реално време. Содржината на овие текстуални пораки може да биде корисен ресурс за рудање текст за откривање и откривање на различни аспекти, вклучително и емоции. Во овој документ го претставуваме нашето поднесување за SemEval 2019 задачата „EmoContext“. Оваа задача се состои од класификување на даден текстуален дијалог во една од четирите часови на емоции: лута, среќна, тажна и други. Нашиот предложен систем е базиран на комбинацијата на различни техники на длабоките нервни мрежи. In particular, we use Recurrent Neural Networks (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) and Transfer Learning (TL) methodes.  Our final system, achieves an F1 score of 74.51% on the subtask evaluation dataset.', 'ms': "Platform mesej seperti WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger dan Twitter telah mendapat banyak popularitas akhir-akhir ini kerana kemampuan mereka dalam menyambung pengguna dalam masa nyata. Kandungan mesej teks ini boleh menjadi sumber berguna untuk penambangan teks untuk menemukan dan nyahsembunyikan berbagai aspek, termasuk emosi. Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan penghantaran kami untuk SemEval 2019 tugas `EmoContext'. Name Tugas ini terdiri daripada mengklasifikasikan dialog teks yang diberikan kepada salah satu dari empat kelas emosi: Marah, Bergembira, Sad dan Lain-lain. Sistem yang kami cadangkan berdasarkan kombinasi teknik rangkaian saraf dalam berbeza. Secara khususnya, kami menggunakan Rangkaian Neural Sekali-kali (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Rangkaian Neural Konveolutional (CNN) dan metod Belajar Pemindahan (TL). Our final system, achieves an F1 score of 74.51% on the subtask evaluation dataset.", 'ml': "വോട്ട്എപ്പ്, ഫെസ്റ്റ് സന്ദേശവും ടൂട്ടറും പോലുള്ള പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോര്\u200dമ്മുകള്\u200d യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ സമയത്ത് ഉപയോക്താക്കളെ ബന്ധിപ്പിക്ക ഈ ടെക്സ്ചുള്\u200d സന്ദേശങ്ങളുടെ ഉള്ളടക്കം വികാരങ്ങളും പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി കണ്ടെത്തുകയും ഒളിപ്പിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യാന്\u200d പദാവലിയുടെ  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന്\u200dറെ 'എമോക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്' എന്ന പ്രവൃത്തിയുടെ അടുത്ത് ക കൊടുത്ത ടെക്സ്ചുള്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് നാല് വികാരങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒന്നിലേക്ക് ക്ലാസ്സ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്റെ ജോലിയില്\u200d ക്ലാസ്സ് ചെയ്യു നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സിസ്റ്റം വ്യത്യസ്ത പ്രവർത്തകങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിലാണ്. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റുവര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു (LSTM, B- LSTM, GRU, B- GRU), കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റോര്\u200dവര്\u200d നമ്മുടെ അവസാനത്തെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d 74.51% സ്കോര്\u200d പ്രാപിക്കുന്നുണ്ട്, സബ്ജോസ് വിലാസപ്രകാരം ഡാറ്റാസറ", 'mn': 'WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger болон Twitter шиг хаягдал хэрэглэгчийг жинхэнэ хугацаанд холбогдох чадварын тулд саяхан их нэр хүндрэлтэй болсон. Эдгээр текстур захиагуудын маань сэтгэл хөдлөл, сэтгэл хөдлөлийг нээх, нуугдахын тулд хэрэгтэй нөөц байж болно. Энэ цаасан дээр бид 2019 оны SemEval-ын "EmoContext" ажлын төлөөлөлт өгсөн. Энэ үйл ажил нь дөрвөн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хичээлийн нэг хэсэгт өгөгдсөн бичил яриаг ангилах болно: уур, аз жаргалтай, гунигтай, бусад хүмүүс. Бидний санал өгсөн систем өөр гүн гүнзгий мэдрэлийн сүлжээний техник дээр суурилсан. Ялангуяа бид дахин шинэ мэдрэлийн сүлжээг ашиглаж байна (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), хөгжлийн мэдрэлийн сүлжээг (CNN) болон Transfer Learning (TL) методуудыг ашиглаж байна. Бидний сүүлийн систем, F1 оноо нь доогуур асуулт өгөгдлийн сангийн 74.51% байдаг.', 'mt': 'Pjattaformi ta’ messaġġi bħal WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger u Twitter reċentement kisbu ħafna popolarità minħabba l-kapaċità tagħhom li jgħaqqdu lill-utenti f’ħin reali. Il-kontenut ta’ dawn il-messaġġi testwali jista’ jkun riżorsa utli għall-minjieri tat-testi biex jiġu skoperti u miftuħa diversi aspetti, inklużi l-emozzjonijiet. F’dan id-dokument nippreżentaw is-sottomissjoni tagħna għal SemEval 2019 kompitu “EmoContext”. Il-kompitu jikkonsisti fil-klassifikazzjoni ta’ djalogu testwali partikolari f’waħda minn erba’ klassijiet emozzjonali: Angry, Happy, Sad u Oħrajn. Is-sistema proposta tagħna hija bbażata fuq it-taħlita ta’ tekniki differenti tan-netwerks newrali profondi. B’mod partikolari, aħna nużaw metodi ta’ Netwerks Newrali Rikorrenti (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Netwerk Newrali Konveoluzzjonali (CNN) u Tagħlim ta’ Trasferiment (TL). Our final system, achieves an F1 score of 74.51% on the subtask evaluation dataset.', 'pl': "Platformy wiadomości takie jak WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger i Twitter zyskały ostatnio dużą popularność ze względu na ich zdolność do łączenia użytkowników w czasie rzeczywistym. Treść tych wiadomości tekstowych może być użytecznym źródłem eksploracji tekstu, aby odkryć i ujawnić różne aspekty, w tym emocje. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy naszą zgłoszenie do zadania SemEval 2019 `EmoContext'. Zadanie polega na sklasyfikowaniu danego dialogu tekstowego na jedną z czterech klas emocji: Wściekły, Szczęśliwy, Smutny i Inne. Proponowany przez nas system opiera się na połączeniu różnych technik głębokich sieci neuronowych. W szczególności stosujemy metody Recurrent Neuroral Networks (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Convolutional Neuroral Network (CNN) oraz Transfer Learning (TL). Nasz ostateczny system, osiąga wynik F1 74,51% na zbiorze danych oceny podzadania.", 'sr': 'Platforme za poruku poput WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger i Twitter nedavno su dobili mnogo popularnosti zbog sposobnosti povezivanja korisnika u realno vreme. Sadržaj ove tekstualne poruke može biti korisni resurs za rudarstvo teksta da otkrije i otkrije različite aspekte, uključujući emocije. U ovom papiru predstavljamo podatke za posao "EmoContext" za semiEval 2019. Taj zadatak se sastoji od klasifikacije određenog tekstualnog dijaloga u jednom od četiri razreda emocija: ljut, sretan, tužan i drugih. Naš predloženi sistem je zasnovan na kombinaciji različitih tehnika dubokih neuralnih mreža. Posebno koristimo ponovne neurone mreže (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), konvolucionalne neurone mreže (CNN) i metode učenja prijenosa (TL). Naš konačni sistem postiže rezultat F1 od 74,51% na setu podpitanja procjene podataka.', 'ro': "Platformele de mesaje precum WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger și Twitter au câștigat recent multă popularitate datorită capacității lor de a conecta utilizatorii în timp real. Conținutul acestor mesaje textuale poate fi o resursă utilă pentru textul mining pentru a descoperi și dezvălui diferite aspecte, inclusiv emoții. În această lucrare prezentăm depunerea noastră pentru sarcina SemEval 2019 `EmoContent'. Sarcina constă în clasificarea unui dialog textual dat într-una din cele patru clase emoționale: furios, fericit, trist și alții. Sistemul nostru propus se bazează pe combinația diferitelor tehnici de rețele neuronale profunde. În special, utilizăm metode Recurent Neural Networks (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) și Transfer Learning (TL). Sistemul nostru final, obține un scor F1 de 74,51% pe setul de date de evaluare a subactivităților.", 'no': 'Meldingsplattar som WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger og Twitter har nyleg fått mykje popularitet på grunn av at dei kan kopla til brukarar i verkeleg tid. Innhaldet av desse tekstmeldingane kan vera eit nyttig ressurs for tekstminering for å oppdaga og gøyma ulike aspektar, inkludert følelser. I denne papiret viser vi søket vårt for semiEval 2019-oppgåve «EmoContext». Oppgåva består av å klassifisera ein gitt tekstdialog i ein av fire emosjonsklassar: Angry, Happy, Sad og andre. Vårt foreslått systemet er basert på kombinasjonen av ulike dype neuralnettverk-teknikk. I særskilt bruker vi gjentakelige neiralnettverk (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), konvolusjonelle neiralnettverk (CNN) og metodar for læring av overføringar (TL). Det siste systemet vår oppnår eit F1- poeng med 74,51% på underspørjingsdata.', 'sv': "Meddelandeplattformar som WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger och Twitter har nyligen vunnit mycket popularitet på grund av deras förmåga att ansluta användare i realtid. Innehållet i dessa textmeddelanden kan vara en användbar resurs för textmining för att upptäcka och visa olika aspekter, inklusive känslor. I denna uppsats presenterar vi vårt bidrag till SemEval 2019 uppgift `EmoContent'. Uppgiften består i att klassificera en given textdialog i en av fyra känsloklasser: Angry, Happy, Sad m.fl. Vårt föreslagna system bygger på en kombination av olika tekniker för djupa neurala nätverk. I synnerhet använder vi återkommande neurala nätverk (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), konvulutionella neurala nätverk (CNN) och överföringsinlärningsmetoder (TL). Vårt slutliga system uppnår en F1-poäng på 74,51% på datauppsättningen för utvärdering av subaktivitet.", 'si': "WhatsAp, Facebook මැසෙන්සර් සහ ට්විටර් වගේ පණිවිඩය ප්ලේටෆෝට්මින්ස් වලින් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලැබුනා ඇත්ත කාලයේ ප්\u200dර මේ පණිවිඩයේ සමාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් පණිවිඩය ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විව මේ පත්තරේ අපි 2019 සෙම්වෙල් වැඩ 'EmoContextComment' වෙනුවෙන් අපේ පිළිබඳින් පෙන්වනවා. මේ වැඩේ තමයි දෙන්න පැත්තක් සංවාදයක් පාලනය කරන්නේ හැඟීම් විදියට හැඟීම් විදියට හැඟීම් හතරක් වලින් එක්ක අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය අධාරිත විවිධ න්\u200dයූරල් ජාතික විදිහට පත්තියි. විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරතිශේෂයෙන් න්\u200dයුරාල ජාලය (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), සම්පූර්ණයෙන් න්\u200dයුරාල ජාලය (CNN) සහ ප්\u200dරතිශේෂණය (TL) විදි අපේ අන්තිම පද්ධතිය, F1 ප්\u200dරමාණයක් 74.51% වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙනවා.", 'so': 'Messaging platformes such as WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger iyo Twitter waxay ugu dhowaad u heleen popular, sababtoo ah awoodii ay ku xiriiraan isticmaalayaasha waqti halis ah. Waxyaabaha ku jira wargeeyinkan qoraalka ah waxay noqon karaan hanti faa’iido leh oo ku qoran kirada qoraalka si aad u ogaato oo aad u qariso dhinacyo kala duduwan, kuwaas oo ka mid ah fikrada. Warqadan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaa warqaddayada SemEval 2019 shaqo “EmoContext”. Shaqadu wuxuu ka mid yahay mid ka mid ah afarta fasalka hissiga: Cadho, faraxsan, Sadar iyo qaar kale. nidaamkayaga la soo jeeday waxay ku saleysan yihiin isku xiriirka shabakada naxaadka ee mool dheer. Si gaar ah, waxaynu isticmaalnaa hababka barbaarinta Neural (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), shabakadda qasabka ah ee Neural (CNN) iyo hababka bedelka (TL). nidaamka ugu dambeeya wuxuu gaadhaa koox F1 oo ka mid ah 74.51 boqolkiiba kaartaynta shabakadda.', 'ta': "Messaging platforms like WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger and Twitter have gained recently much popularity owing to their ability in connecting users in real-time.  இந்த உரை செய்திகளின் உள்ளடக்கம் உணர்வுகளைச் சேர்த்துக் கொண்டுள்ள உரை கடைசிக்கு பயனுள்ள மூலமாக இருக்கலாம். இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் SemEval 2019 செயல் 'EmoContext' க்கு எங்கள் அனுப்பப்படுகிறோம். கொடுக்கப்பட்ட உரையாடல் ஒரு நான்கு உணர்வு வகுப்பில் வகுப்பில் உள்ளது. கோபம், மகிழ்ச்சி, துக்கம் மற்றவர்கள். எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பு வேறு ஆழமான புதுபாதுகார வலைப்பின்னல் தொழில்நுட்பங்களை இணைப் குறிப்பிட்டு, நிகழ்ந்த நெயுரல் வலைப்பின்னல் எங்கள் இறுதியாக அமைப்பு, துணை பணி மதிப்பு தகவல் அமைப்பில் 74.51% F1 புள்ளியை பெறுகிறது.", 'ur': "WhatsApp، Facebook Messenger اور Twitter جیسے پیغام پیغام پیغام پیغام پہنچانے کی وجہ سے ان کے قابلیت کے سبب حقیقی وقت میں کارساز کو اتصال کرنے کے لئے بہت زیادہ شگفت حاصل کیا گیا ہے. ان پیغامات کی منصوبت ایک فائدہ منصوبہ ہے کہ پیغامات کے ذریعے مختلف منصوبات کو آشکار اور مخفی منصوبات کے ساتھ چھپا سکے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم نے SemEval 2019 کاغذ 'EmoContext' کے لئے اپنا تسلیم پیش کیا ہے۔ یہ کام چار احساسات کلاس میں سے ایک متعلق صحیح گفتگو کا کلاس کرنا ہے: غصہ، خوشی، غصہ اور دوسرے. ہماری پیشنهاد سیستم مختلف نیورال نیٹ ورک تکنیک کی ترکیب پر بنیاد ہے۔ مخصوصا، ہم دوبارہ نیورال نیٹورک (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU) استعمال کرتے ہیں، کنویروشن نیورال نیٹورک (CNN) اور ترنسفر سیکھنے (TL) methododes. ہماری آخری سیسٹم، سپٹ پریس ڈیٹ سٹٹ پر 74.51% کی F1 اسکور پہنچتی ہے.", 'uz': 'Name @ info: whatsthis Bu hujjatda SemEval 2019 "EmoContext" vazifasini yetarmoqchimiz. Name Tashqi qilingan tizimmiz boshqa neyrol tarmoqni birlashtirish uchun asosida. @ info: whatsthis Bizning oxirgi tizimmiz shu vazifa qiymati haqida 74.51% F1 qiymatini topadi.', 'vi': 'Những sân ga nhắn tin như WhatisApp, Facebook Messenger và Twitter đã gần đây được phổ biến nhiều nhờ khả năng kết nối người dùng trong thời gian thực. Nội dung của các thông điệp văn bản này có thể là một tài nguyên hữu ích cho việc khai thác văn bản để khám phá và không bị ảnh hưởng bởi nhiều khía cạnh, kể cả cảm xúc. Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi xin giới thiệu tác phẩm của chúng tôi cho nhiệm vụ SemEvl 2009: "EmoContact". Nhiệm vụ là phân loại một cuộc đối thoại văn bản vào một trong bốn lớp cảm xúc: giận dữ, hạnh phúc, buồn và những thứ khác. Hệ thống chúng tôi đề xuất dựa trên sự kết hợp của các kỹ thuật mạng thần kinh sâu khác nhau. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi sử dụng các mạng thần kinh liên tục (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) và truyền dịch Learning (TLS) methods. Hệ thống cuối cùng của chúng ta đạt được một số F1 của 74.51=. trong tập tin đánh giá phụ đề.', 'nl': "Messaging platforms zoals WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger en Twitter hebben de laatste tijd veel populariteit gewonnen vanwege hun mogelijkheid om gebruikers in real-time te verbinden. De inhoud van deze tekstberichten kan een nuttige bron zijn voor text mining om verschillende aspecten, waaronder emoties, te ontdekken en weer te geven. In dit artikel presenteren we onze inzending voor SemEval 2019 taak `EmoContext'. De taak bestaat uit het classificeren van een gegeven tekstuele dialoog in een van de vier emotieklassen: boos, gelukkig, verdrietig en anderen. Ons voorgestelde systeem is gebaseerd op de combinatie van verschillende diepe neurale netwerken technieken. We gebruiken met name Recurrent Neural Networks (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) en Transfer Learning (TL) methodes. Ons uiteindelijke systeem, bereikt een F1 score van 74,51% op de subtask evaluatie dataset.", 'hr': 'Platforme za poruke poput WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger i Twitter nedavno su dobili mnogo popularnosti zbog sposobnosti povezivanja korisnika u realno vrijeme. Sadržaj tih tekstualnih poruka može biti korisni resurs za rudarstvo teksta kako bi otkrio i otkrio različite aspekte, uključujući emocije. U ovom papiru predstavljamo podatke za zadatak "EmoContext" za semiEval 2019. Taj zadatak se sastoji od klasifikacije određenog tekstualnog dijaloga u jedan od četiri razreda emocija: ljut, sretan, tužan i drugih. Naš predloženi sustav je zasnovan na kombinaciji različitih dubokih tehnika neuronskih mreža. Posebno koristimo ponovne neurone mreže (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), konvolucionalne neurone mreže (CNN) i metode učenja prijenosa (TL). Naš konačni sustav postiže rezultat F1 od 74,51% na kompletu podpitanja za procjenu podataka.', 'bg': 'Платформата за съобщения като Наскоро придобиха голяма популярност поради способността си да свързват потребителите в реално време. Съдържанието на тези текстови съобщения може да бъде полезен ресурс за извличане на текст за откриване и разкриване на различни аспекти, включително емоции. В тази статия представяме нашето предложение за задача "Емоконтекс". Задачата се състои в класифициране на даден текстов диалог в един от четирите емоционални класа: Ядосан, Щастлив, Тъжен и др. Нашата предложена система се основава на комбинацията от различни техники на дълбоки невронни мрежи. По-специално, ние използваме методи за повтарящи се неврални мрежи (ЛСТМ, Б-ЛСТМ, GRU, Б-ГРУ), конвелуционална неврална мрежа (CNN) и трансферно обучение (ТЛ). Нашата крайна система, постига оценка от 74.51% на базата данни за оценка на подзадачите.', 'da': "Meddelelsesplatforme som WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger og Twitter har for nylig vundet meget popularitet på grund af deres evne til at forbinde brugere i realtid. Indholdet af disse tekstbeskeder kan være en nyttig ressource til tekstmining for at opdage og vise forskellige aspekter, herunder følelser. I denne artikel præsenterer vi vores indsendelse til SemEval 2019 opgave `EmoContent'. Opgaven består i at klassificere en given tekstdialog i en af fire følelsesklasser: Angry, Happy, Sad m.fl. Vores foreslåede system er baseret på en kombination af forskellige dybe neurale netværk teknikker. Især anvender vi metoder til recurrent neural netværk (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) og Transfer Learning (TL). Vores endelige system opnår en F1 score på 74,51% på undersættelsesdatasættet.", 'de': "Messaging-Plattformen wie WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger und Twitter haben in letzter Zeit aufgrund ihrer Fähigkeit, Benutzer in Echtzeit zu verbinden, viel Popularität gewonnen. Der Inhalt dieser Textnachrichten kann eine nützliche Ressource für Text Mining sein, um verschiedene Aspekte, einschließlich Emotionen, zu entdecken und zu enthüllen. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir unsere Einreichung für SemEval 2019 Aufgabe `EmoContext' vor. Die Aufgabe besteht darin, einen gegebenen Textdialog in eine von vier Emotionsklassen einzuordnen: Wütend, Glücklich, Traurig und Andere. Unser vorgeschlagenes System basiert auf der Kombination verschiedener Techniken der tiefen neuronalen Netze. Insbesondere setzen wir Methoden von Recurrent Neural Networks (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) und Transfer Learning (TL) ein. Unser letztes System erreicht eine F1-Punktzahl von 74,51% auf dem Subtask-Auswertungsdatensatz.", 'id': "Platform pesan seperti WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger dan Twitter baru-baru ini mendapatkan banyak popularitas karena kemampuan mereka untuk menghubungkan pengguna dalam waktu nyata. Konten pesan teks ini dapat menjadi sumber daya berguna untuk penambangan teks untuk menemukan dan membuka berbagai aspek, termasuk emosi. Dalam kertas ini kami mempersembahkan pengiriman kami untuk SemEval 2019 tugas `EmoContext'. Tugas ini terdiri dari mengklasifikasi dialog teks yang diberikan ke salah satu dari empat kelas emosi: Angry, Happy, Sad and Others. Sistem yang diusulkan kita berdasarkan kombinasi dari teknik jaringan saraf dalam yang berbeda. Terutama, kami menggunakan metode Networks Neural Recurrent (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) dan Transfer Learning (TL). Sistem terakhir kita, mencapai skor F1 74,51% pada set data evaluasi subtask.", 'ko': "왓츠앱, 페이스북 메신저, 트위터 등 메시징 플랫폼은 최근 사용자를 실시간으로 연결하는 능력으로 인기를 끌고 있다.이러한 텍스트 메시지의 내용은 텍스트 발굴의 유용한 자원이 되어 정서를 포함한 여러 방면을 발견하고 숨길 수 있다.본문에서 우리는 SemEval 2019 퀘스트'이모콘텍스트'에 대한 신청을 제출했다.이 임무는 주어진 텍스트 대화를 분노, 기쁨, 슬픔, 그리고 네 가지로 나누는 것을 포함한다.우리가 제시한 시스템은 서로 다른 심도 신경 네트워크 기술의 조합을 바탕으로 한다.특히 역귀신경망(LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), 볼륨신경망(CNN)과 전이학습(TL) 방법을 사용했다.우리의 최종 시스템은 하위 임무 평가 데이터 집합에서 74.51%의 F1 점수를 얻었다.", 'fa': 'پیغام پیغام مانند WhatsApp، پیغام فیسبوک و توئیتر اخیرا به دلیل توانایی خود در ارتباط کاربران در زمان واقعی زیادی پیدا کردند. محتوای این پیام\u200cهای متن می\u200cتواند یک منابع مفید برای خرید کردن متن برای کشف و مخفی کردن نقطه\u200cهای مختلف، شامل احساسات باشد. در این کاغذ ما تسلیم کردن خود را برای کار «EmoContext» در سال ۲۰۱۹ نشان می دهیم. این وظیفه از تعریف یک گفتگو متن داده شده در یکی از چهار کلاس احساسات است: خشم، خوشبخت، غمگین و بقیه. سیستم پیشنهاد ما بر اساس ترکیب تکنیک های عصبی مختلف متفاوت است. در خصوص، ما از شبکه\u200cهای عصبی دوباره استفاده می\u200cکنیم (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), شبکه عصبی (CNN) و روش\u200cهای یادگیری انتقال (TL) استفاده می\u200cکنیم. سیستم نهایی ما، یک امتیاز F1 از 74.51 درصد در مجموعه داده\u200cهای ارزیابی زیر سوال می\u200cرسد.', 'sw': 'Jukwaa la ujumbe kama vile WhatsApp, Mtume wa Facebook na Twita hivi karibuni zimepata umaarufu mkubwa kwa sababu ya uwezo wao wa kuwaunganisha watumiaji kwa muda halisi. Maudhui ya jumbe hizi za maandishi yanaweza kuwa rasilimali yenye manufaa kwa ajili ya madini ya madini ili kutambua na kujificha mambo mbalimbali, ikiwa ni pamoja na hisia. Katika karatasi hii tunawasilisha ujumbe wetu wa SemEval 2019 “EmoContext”. Kazi hiyo ni pamoja na kuandika mazungumzo yaliyopewa kwa ujumbe katika moja ya darasa nne la hisia: Hasira, Heri, Sadha na Wengine. Mfumo wetu unapendekezwa unajikita na muunganiko wa teknolojia tofauti za kijinsia. Kwa hakika, tunatumia mitandao ya Neural inayoendelea (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Mtandao wa Neurali wa kujitolea (CNN) na Ufunzi wa Uhamiaji (TL). Mfumo wetu wa mwisho, unafikia score ya F1 ya asilimia 74.51 kwenye seti ya taarifa za uchunguzi wa kazi.', 'tr': "WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger we Twitter ýaly hat platformlary ullanýarlar, ullançylaryny gerçek wagtda baglaşdyrmak üçin köp popularlyk gazanýarlar. Şu metin mesajlaryň mazmunlary metin ahyrlamak üçin ullanýan we çykarmak üçin ullanýan bir çeşit nusgasy bolup biler. Bu kagyzda 2019-nji ýyldan bäsleşimizi `EmoContext' täblisasyna görkezilýäris. Bu zady dört duýgyş synplarynda berilen tekst dialogyny a ýlaşdyrmak bolýar: gaharlyk, Gulkylyk we Başgalar. Biziň teklifimiz üýtgedilen nuýral aňlaryň birleşmesine daýanýar. Eger häzirki, biz tekrarly netijeler (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Ewir netijeler (CNN) we Transfer Learning (TL) metodlaryny ulanýarys Biziň soňky sistemimiz, altsoragy deňlenme datasynda F1 depri 74,51%-de ýetip barýar.", 'af': "Boodskapplatforme soos WhatsApp, Facebook-boodskapper en Twitter het onlangs baie populariteit ontvang vanweë hulle moontlikheid in die verbinding van gebruikers in reël-tyd. Die inhoud van hierdie teks-boodskappe kan 'n nuttige hulpbron wees vir teks-minning om verskillende aspekte te ontdek en onversteek, insluitend emosies. In hierdie papier voorsien ons ondersteuning vir SemEval 2019 taak `EmoContext'. Die taak bestaan van 'n gegewe tekstuele dialoog in een van vier emosie klasse: Angry, Gelukkig, Sad en ander. Ons voorgestelde stelsel is gebaseer op die kombinasie van verskillende diep neuralnetwerk teknike. In spesifieke gebruik ons herhaalde neurale netwerke (LSTM, B- LSTM, GRU, B- GRU), Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerk (CNN) en Oordrag Leer (TL) metodes. Ons eindelike stelsel, bereik 'n F1 punt van 74.51% op die onderstraag evaluering datastel.", 'sq': "Platforma mesazhe si WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger dhe Twitter kanë fituar kohët e fundit shumë popullaritet për shkak të aftësisë së tyre në lidhjen e përdoruesve në kohë reale. Përmbajtja e këtyre mesazheve tekstuale mund të jetë një burim i dobishëm për minierën e teksteve për të zbuluar dhe zbuluar aspekte të ndryshme, duke përfshirë emocionet. Në këtë letër ne paraqesim paraqitjen tonë për detyrën SemEval 2019 `EmoContext'. Detyra përbëhet nga klasifikimi i një dialog tekstual të caktuar në një nga katër klasat e emocioneve: të zemëruar, të lumtur, të trishtuar dhe të tjerë. Our proposed system is based on the combination of different deep neural networks techniques.  Ne veçanërisht, ne përdorim metodat e rrjeteve neurale të përsëritura (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), rrjetit neural konvolutiv (CNN) dhe mësimit të transferimit (TL). Sistemi ynë përfundimtar, arrin një rezultat F1 prej 74.51% në kompletin e të dhënave të vlerësimit të nënpyetjeve.", 'am': "እንደ WhatsApp፣ የፌስቡክ መልእክተኛ እና ትዊተር በመጠቀም በተጠቃሚዎች ላይ በመጠቀም ስልጣን በመጠቀም ምክንያት እጅግ ብዙ ሰዎች አግኝተዋል፡፡ የጽሑፍ መልዕክቶች ውስጥ የተጠቃሚ የጽሑፍ ማቀናጃ እና አስተያየት እና መደበቅ የሚችል የጽሑፍ ማቀናጃ ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡ In this paper we present our submission for SemEval 2019 task `EmoContext'.  ስራው የተሰጠ የጽሑፍ ማኅበረሰብ በአራቱ እውቀት ክፍሎች ላይ መክፈት ነው፤ ቁጣ፣ ደስታ፣ Sad እና ሌሎችም፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ስርዓታችን የተለየ ጥልቅ የደዌብ መረብ ቴክኖችንን በመጠቀም ላይ ነው፡፡ በተለየ ጊዜ የኔural Network (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Convolution Neural Network (CNN) እና Transfer Learning (TL) methods. የመጨረሻው ስርዓታችን የስራ አካል ዳታዎችን ላይ 74.51 በመቶ F1 ደረጃ ያገኛል፡፡", 'hy': 'Օրինակ, whatsApp-ը, Facebook-ը և Twitter-ը վերջերս շատ հայտնի են դարձել հաղորդագրությունների պլատֆորմերի շնորհիվ նրանց կարողությունը կապել օգտագործողներին իրական ժամանակում: Այս տեքստային հաղորդագրությունների պարունակությունը կարող է օգտակար ռեսուրս լինել տեքստի հանքարարության համար, որպեսզի բացահայտեն և բացահայտեն տարբեր ասպեկտներ, ներառյալ զգացմունքները: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեր ներկայացումը "EmoConxt" 2019 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" խնդրի համար: Այս խնդիրը կազմված է դասակարգում տվյալ տեքստային հաղորդակցությունը չորս զգացմունքներից մեկի մեջ՝ զայրացած, երջանիկ, տխուր և այլն: Մեր առաջարկված համակարգը հիմնված է տարբեր խորը նյարդային ցանցերի մեթոդների համադրման վրա: Մենք հատկապես օգտագործում ենք Կարգավոր Նյարդային ցանցեր (LSMT, B-LSMT, GRU, B-GRU), Կարգավորական Նյարդային ցանց (CNN) և Կարգավոր Նյարդային Հիմացության (TL) մեթոդներ: Մեր վերջնական համակարգը հասնում է F1-ի 74.51 տոկոսի գնահատման տվյալների համակարգի վրա:', 'bn': "হুয়াটঅ্যাপ, ফেসবুক প্রেসিডেন্ট এবং টুইটারের মত মেসেজিং প্ল্যাটফর্ম বাস্তবায়িক সময়ে ব্যবহারকারীদের সংযোগের কারণে তাদের এই টেক্সচুয়াল বার্তার বিষয়বস্তু অনুভূতিসহ অনুভূতিগুলো আবিষ্কার এবং আড়াল করার জন্য টেক্সট খনির জন্য একটি ব্যবহারের উৎস এই পত্রিকায় আমরা সেমইভাল ২০১৯ সালের জন্য আমাদের প্রতিবেদন উপস্থাপন করছি 'EmoContext' কাজের জন্য। কাজের মধ্যে একটি প্রদত্ত টেক্চুয়াল ডায়ালগ চারটি অনুভূতির মধ্যে একটি ক্লাসে বিশ্লেষণ করা হচ্ছে: ক্ষোভ, শুভ, দুঃখ এবং অন্যা আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত সিস্টেম বিভিন্ন গভীর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কৌশলের সংযোগের উপর ভিত্তিক। বিশেষ করে আমরা পুনরায় নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করি (এলসিএম, বি-এলসিএম, GRU, B-GRU), কনভোলেশনাল নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক (সিএনএন) এবং ট্রান্সফারেন্স শিক্ষ আমাদের শেষ সিস্টেম, সাবকাজের মুল্যায়নের ডাটাসেটে ৭৪.৫১% ফি১ স্কোর অর্জন করে।", 'bs': 'Platforme za poruku poput WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger i Twitter nedavno su dobili mnogo popularnosti zbog sposobnosti povezivanja korisnika u realno vrijeme. Sadržaj tih tekstualnih poruka može biti korisni resurs za rudarstvo teksta kako bi otkrio i otkrio različite aspekte, uključujući emocije. U ovom papiru predstavljamo podatke za zadatak "EmoContext" za semiEval 2019. Taj zadatak se sastoji od klasifikacije određenog tekstualnog dijaloga u jednu od četiri razreda emocija: ljut, sretan, tužan i drugih. Naš predloženi sistem je baziran na kombinaciji različitih tehnika dubokih neuronskih mreža. Posebno koristimo ponovne neurone mreže (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), konvolucionalne neurone mreže (CNN) i metode učenja prijenosa (TL). Naš konačni sistem postiže rezultat F1 od 74,51% na setu podpitanja ocjene podataka.', 'cs': 'Platformy zpráv jako WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger a Twitter získaly v poslední době velkou popularitu díky jejich schopnosti připojovat uživatele v reálném čase. Obsah těchto textových zpráv může být užitečným zdrojem pro vytěžování textu k objevování a zobrazení různých aspektů, včetně emocí. V tomto článku představujeme náš příspěvek na SemEval 2019 úlohu EmoContext. Úkol spočívá v klasifikaci daného textového dialogu do jedné ze čtyř emočních tříd: Naštvaný, Šťastný, Smutný a další. Náš navržený systém je založen na kombinaci různých technik hlubokých neuronových sítí. Používáme zejména metody Recurrent Neural Networks (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Convolucionální Neural Network (CNN) a Transfer Learning (TL). Náš konečný systém dosahuje F1 skóre 74,51% na souboru hodnocení dílčích úkolů.', 'az': 'WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger və Twitter kimi mesajlaşma platformları həqiqət zamanda istifadəçiləri bağlamaq üçün çox məşğul oldular. Bu məktub ismarışlarının məlumatı məktub maddiyinin məlumatlarını keşfetmək və hisslərin də dahil olmaq üçün faydalı bir resurs olar. Bu kağızda 2019-ci SemEval işinin "EmoContext" təklifimizi göstəririk. Bu işin dört hiss sınıfından birinə bəxş edilən mətn dialogını seçməkdir: Kızgın, Mutlu, Şəfqətli və Digərləri. Bizim təklif etdiyimiz sistemimiz fərqli nürol ağlarının tekniklərinin birləşdirilməsinə dayanan. Özellikle, biz yenidən nöral ağları (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) və Transfer Learning (TL) metodlarını kullanırıq. Bizim son sistemimiz, alt-soruşma verilənlərin qurğusunda 74,51%-i F1 nöqtəsinə yetirir.', 'ca': 'Les plataformes de missatge com WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger i Twitter han guanyat recentment molta popularitat degut a la seva habilitat de connectar els usuaris en temps real. El contingut d\'aquests missatges textuals pot ser un recurso útil per a la mineria de textos per descobrir i descobrir diversos aspectes, incloent les emocions. En aquest paper presentem la nostra presentació per la tasca SemEval 2019 "EmoContext". La tasca consisteix en classificar un diàleg textual en una de les quatre classes emocionals: Angry, Happy, Sad and Others. El nostre sistema proposat està basat en la combinació de diferents tècniques de xarxes neuronales profundes. En particular, utilitzem els mètodes d\'aprenentatge neuronal recurrent (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) i Transfer Learning (TL). Our final system, achieves an F1 score of 74.51% on the subtask evaluation dataset.', 'et': "Sõnumiplatvormid nagu WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger ja Twitter on viimasel ajal saanud palju populaarsust tänu oma võimele ühendada kasutajaid reaalajas. Nende tekstisõnumite sisu võib olla kasulik ressurss tekstikaevandamisel, et avastada ja levitada erinevaid aspekte, sealhulgas emotsioone. Käesolevas töös tutvustame meie ettepanekut SemEval 2019 ülesande `EmoContext' jaoks. Ülesanne seisneb antud tekstidialoogi liigitamises üheks neljast emotsiooniklassist: Vihane, Õnnelik, Kurb jt. Meie kavandatud süsteem põhineb erinevate sügavate närvivõrkude tehnikate kombinatsioonil. Eelkõige kasutame korduvaid neurovõrke (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), konvolutsioonilisi neurovõrke (CNN) ja siirdeõppe (TL) meetodeid. Meie lõplik süsteem saavutab F1 skoori 74,51% alaülesannete hindamise andmekogumil.", 'fi': "Viestialustat, kuten WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger ja Twitter, ovat viime aikoina saaneet paljon suosiota, koska ne pystyvät yhdistämään käyttäjiä reaaliajassa. Näiden tekstiviestien sisältö voi olla hyödyllinen resurssi tekstin louhintaan, jotta voidaan löytää ja tuoda esiin erilaisia näkökohtia, mukaan lukien tunteita. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme ehdotuksemme SemEval 2019 -tehtävään `EmoContext'. Tehtävänä on luokitella tietty tekstidialogi yhdeksi neljästä tunneluokasta: Vihainen, Onnellinen, Surullinen ja Muut. Ehdotettu järjestelmä perustuu erilaisten syvähermoverkkojen tekniikoiden yhdistelmään. Käytämme erityisesti toistuvia hermoverkkoja (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), konvolutional neural Network (CNN) ja siirtooppimista (TL) menetelmiä. Lopullisen järjestelmämme F1-pisteet ovat 74,51% alatehtävän arviointiaineistosta.", 'jv': "Google TalkYahoo! Ndukuni uwong-uwong sing gambar textual iki iso nggawe barang pengguna nggawe metin kanggo nggawe karo nggawe ngubah apa-apa sing sampek, karo iCalendar Nang pepul iki, kita nganggo tresnani kanggo tek gawe lan mulai semebal 2011 'emuo context'. Mampur sing ngetokake kelas sing dibakno textual ning sampeyan panjenengan wong liyane karo kless omosi: Angra, Halika, Sad lan cetane. Awak dhéwé ngerasakno sistem sing dibutungan ning teknik alat maning box Sistem barêng-barêng, sing wis rampungan F1 sing mengko perusahaan karo 75.31% sing dadi nggunakake tarjamahan.", 'ha': "Messaging platforms such as What atsApp, Facebook sender da Twitter have gota mafiya popular yanzu a yanzu, sabõda abincin su haɗi masu amfani da wagon gaskiyar. Aminci na wannan message na rubutun za'a iya zama wani amfani na wa matsayin da za'a gane da kuma a ɓõye wasu masu buƙata, kamar shirin ayuka. Ga wannan takardan da Muke halatar da uzuri zuwa aikin SemEV 2019 `EmoContent'. Kayan aikin na ƙunsa da ku rarraba zauren akwatin littafi cikin ɗayan darafõfi huɗu: Tayi, Bayi Bayi, da Saduki da Wasu. Ga'ananmu da aka buɗa shi, yana kan komai da zanayen zane-zane-zanen neura dabam-dabar. @ item Spelling dictionary Gani'iyarmu na ƙarshen, yana sãmun F1'ar wata nau'i na 74.51 a kan danne-muhalli na bincike.", 'sk': "Platforme za sporočanje, kot so WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger in Twitter, so v zadnjem času pridobile veliko priljubljenosti zaradi svoje sposobnosti povezovanja uporabnikov v realnem času. Vsebina teh besedilnih sporočil je lahko uporaben vir za iskanje besedila za odkrivanje in razkrivanje različnih vidikov, vključno s čustvi. V tem prispevku predstavljamo našo predstavitev za nalogo SemEval 2019 `EmoContext'. Naloga je razvrstitev določenega besedilnega dialoga v enega od štirih čustvenih razredov: Jezni, Srečni, Žalostni in drugi. Naš predlagani sistem temelji na kombinaciji različnih tehnik globokih nevronskih omrežij. Zlasti uporabljamo metode ponavljajočih se živčnih omrežij (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), konvolucionalnih živčnih omrežij (CNN) in prenosnega učenja (TL). Naš končni sistem dosega rezultat F1 74,51% na naboru podopravil.", 'bo': 'WhatsApp、Facebook Messenger་དང་ཌིས་ཌིར་ལྟ་བུ་ཡིན་པའི་འཕྲིན་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ནང་དུ་ཉེ་ཆར་རང་ཉིད་ལ་སྐད་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཐུབ་ཡིན་པ་ལས་སྤྱོད་མཁན ཡི་གེའི་འཕྲིན་དོན་འདི་ཚོར་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དོན་དག་གི་ཡིག་གེ་ཅིག་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པར་སྟོན་པའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་སེམས་ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ང་ཚོས་2019ལོའི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཞིབ་པ་‘EmoContext’ལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་འཇུག་སྣོད། བྱ་ཚིག་གིས་སྤྱིར་བཏང་ཡོད་པའི་ཚིག་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་རྒྱུ་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་དྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་ལག་གིས་འདྲ་བའི་ཟབ་གཞུང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་མ་འདྲ་ཞིག་དང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་སྤྱོད་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་མ་ལག་གི་སྡོམ་ཚད་ལྟར་མཇུག་བསྡུ་ཡོད་པའི་ཨང་ཀི74.51%', 'he': 'פלטפורמות מסרים כמו WhatsApp, Facebook Messenger וטוויטר הרוויחו לאחרונה הרבה פופולריות בגלל היכולת שלהם לחבר משתמשים בזמן אמיתי. התוכן של ההודעות הטקסטאליות האלה יכול להיות משאב שימושי למכרת טקסטים כדי לגלות ולפתור היבטים שונים, כולל רגשות. בעיתון הזה אנו מציגים את ההעברה שלנו למשימה SemEval 2019 "EmoContext". המשימה היא להקליף דיאלוג טקסטלי מסוים לאחד מארבע שיעורי רגשות: כועס, שמח, עצוב ואחרים. המערכת המוצעת שלנו מבוססת על שילוב של טכניקות רשתות עצביות עמוקות שונות. במיוחד, אנו משתמשים בשיטות של רשתות נוירוליות חוזרות (LSTM, B-LSTM, GRU, B-GRU), רשת נוירולית קונבנולציונית (CNN) ושיטות לימוד העברה (TL). Our final system, achieves an F1 score of 74.51% on the subtask evaluation dataset.'}
{'en': 'Figure Eight at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Ensemble of Transfer Learning Methods for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'ar': 'الشكل الثامن في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: مجموعة طرق نقل التعلم للكشف عن المشاعر السياقية', 'es': 'Figura ocho en la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2019: Conjunto de métodos de aprendizaje de transferencia para la detección de emociones contextuales', 'fr': "Figure Huit à SemEVAL-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Ensemble de méthodes d'apprentissage par transfert pour la détection contextuelle des émotions", 'ja': '図8 SemEval -2019タスク3 ：文脈感情検出のための転送学習方法のアンサンブル', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 3 पर चित्रा आठ: प्रासंगिक भावना का पता लगाने के लिए स्थानांतरण सीखने के तरीकों की टुकड़ी', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019务3图八:上下文情检之会也', 'pt': 'Figura Oito no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Conjunto de Métodos de Aprendizagem por Transferência para Detecção de Emoções Contextuais', 'ga': 'Fíor a hOcht ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Ensemble de Mhodhanna Foghlama Aistrithe chun Mothúchán Comhthéacsúil a Bhrath', 'ru': 'Рисунок Восьмой на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Ансамбль методов обучения передаче для контекстного обнаружения эмоций', 'el': 'Σχήμα Οκτώ στο έργο 3: Σύνολο μεθόδων μάθησης μεταφοράς για την ανίχνευση συγκλονιστικών συναισθημάτων', 'ka': 'Figure Eight at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble of Transfer Learning Methods for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'hu': 'Nyolcadik ábra a SemEval-2019 3. feladatában: Transzfer tanulási módszerek együttese a kontextuális érzelmek felismeréséhez', 'it': 'Figura otto al SemEval-2019 Task 3: Insieme di metodi di apprendimento del trasferimento per il rilevamento delle emozioni contestuali', 'kk': 'Тапсырма 3-нің шегінші тапсырмасы: Контексті көңіл көңіл анықтау үшін тапсырмалар оқыту әдістерін қолдану', 'mk': 'Фигура осум на SemEval-2019 задача 3: Енсембл на методи за префрлање на учење за детективирање на контекстни емоции', 'lt': '8 pav. Vidurio vertinimo–2019 m. 3 užduotis: perkėlimo mokymosi metodų, skirtų kontekstinei emocijai nustatyti, rinkinys', 'ml': 'SemEval- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3- ല്\u200d എട്ടു് ഫിഗ്രീ എട്ടു്: കൂട്ടുകേന്ദ്രത്തിനുള്ള കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള മാറ്റം പഠിക്കുന്', 'ms': 'Figure Eight at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble of Transfer Learning Methods for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'mt': 'Figura Tmien f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 3: Ensemble of Transfer Learning Methods for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'mn': 'Тайлбар найм нь SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble of Transfer Learning Methods for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'no': 'Figur åtte på halvEval-2019 oppgåve 3: Ensemble av overføringsmetodar for kontekstlege følelser', 'ro': 'Figura opt la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Ansamblul de metode de învățare a transferului pentru detectarea emoțiilor contextuale', 'pl': 'Rysunek ósmy na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Zespół metod uczenia się transferowego do kontekstowego wykrywania emocji', 'sr': 'Osam slike na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 3: Uključenje metoda učenja prijenosa za konstrukciju kontekstualnih emocija', 'si': 'figure Eight at HalfEvel-2019 Job 3: Ensemble of Transfer Training Metodos for Contextal Emotion Detection', 'so': 'Shaqada 3: Ensemable of learning of transfer', 'sv': 'Figur 책tta p책 SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Ensemble av 철verf철ringsinl채rningsmetoder f철r kontextuell k채nslodetektering', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணியில் எட்டு எண்ணிக்கை', 'ur': 'آٹھی تصویر آٹھ ٹاکس 3 میں: متوسط احساسات شناسی کے لئے ترنسفور سیکھنے کی طریقے کا انتشار', 'uz': 'Eval- 2019 Vazifani 3: Avto- aniqlash', 'vi': 'Hình thứ tám tại nhiệm vụ SemEvl-209 3: Ôm phần mềm truyền tập để phát hiện cảm xúc liên tiếp', 'hr': 'Osam slike na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 3: Uhvaćenje metoda učenja prijenosa za pronalaženje kontekstnih emocija', 'nl': 'Figuur Acht bij SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Ensemble van Transferleermethoden voor Contextuele Emotiedetectie', 'da': 'Figur 8 på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Ensemble af Transfer Learning Methods til kontekstuel følelsesdetektion', 'de': 'Abbildung Acht bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Ensemble von Transferlernmethoden zur kontextuellen Emotionserkennung', 'bg': 'Фигура осем в Задача 3: Ансамбъл от методи за трансферно обучение за откриване на контекстуални емоции', 'fa': 'Figure 8 at semiEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble of Transfer Learning Methods for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'id': 'Figure Eight at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble of Transfer Learning Methods for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'ko': '그림8 SemEval-2019 퀘스트 3: 상황 정서 검측의 이동 학습 방법 통합', 'sw': 'Figuru nane kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 3: Utafiti wa Njia za Kujifunza Uhamiaji kwa ajili ya Kugundua Uchunguzi wa Kihusika', 'af': 'Figure Agt by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 3: Ensemble of Transfer Learning Methods for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'tr': 'Figure Eight at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble of Transfer Learning Methods for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'sq': 'Figura 8 në SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble of Transfer Learning Methods for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'am': 'Eval-2019 ስራ 3: Ensemble of Transfer Learn methods for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'hy': 'Երրորդ հանձնարարությունը՝ Կենտեքստալ զգացմունքների հայտնաբերման փոխանցման մեթոդներ', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2019 কাজ ৩-এ আট ফিগার: বিদ্যমান ইমোটিয়েশন সনাক্ত করার জন্য ট্রান্সফারের শিক্ষা শিক্ষার পদ্ধতির প্রতিষ্ঠান', 'az': 'Figure 8 at semiEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble of Transfer Learning Methods for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'ca': 'Figura vuit a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble of Transfer Learning Methods for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'cs': 'Obrázek osm na SemEval-2019 Úkol 3: Soubor metod transferového učení pro kontextovou detekci emocí', 'et': 'Joonis 8 SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 3: Ülesanne siirdeõppe meetodite ansambel kontekstuaalsete emotsioonide tuvastamiseks', 'bs': 'Figura 8 na poluvolji 2019. zadatak 3: Uhvaćenje metoda učenja prijenosa za pronalaženje kontekstualnih emocija', 'fi': 'Kuvio kahdeksan SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 3: Siirtymäoppimisen menetelmät kontekstuaalisen tunteentunnistuksen määrittämiseksi', 'jv': 'iruure 8 at semiinval-2011 task 3: ENsemble of transfer Learning Methods for contextual emutation detection', 'he': 'Figure Eight at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble of Transfer Learning Methods for Contextual Emotion Detection', 'ha': 'Waccan Figure 8', 'sk': 'Osma slika na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Ensembel metod prenosnega učenja za zaznavanje kontekstualnih čustev', 'bo': 'Figure Eight at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble of Transfer Learning Methods for Contextual Emotion Detection'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our transfer learning-based approach to contextual emotion detection as part of SemEval-2019 Task 3. We experiment with transfer learning using pre-trained language models (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT, and BERT) and fine-tune them on this task. We also train a deep learning model from scratch using pre-trained word embeddings and BiLSTM architecture with attention mechanism. The ensembled model achieves competitive result, ranking ninth out of 165 teams. The result reveals that ULMFiT performs best due to its superior fine-tuning techniques. We propose improvements for future work.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nossa abordagem baseada em aprendizado de transferência para detecção de emoções contextuais como parte da Tarefa 3 do SemEval-2019. Experimentamos o aprendizado de transferência usando modelos de linguagem pré-treinados (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT e BERT) e os ajustamos nesta tarefa . Também treinamos um modelo de aprendizado profundo do zero usando incorporações de palavras pré-treinadas e arquitetura BiLSTM com mecanismo de atenção. O modelo ensemble alcança resultado competitivo, ficando em nono lugar entre 165 equipes. O resultado revela que o ULMFiT tem o melhor desempenho devido às suas técnicas superiores de ajuste fino. Propomos melhorias para trabalhos futuros.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نهجنا القائم على التعلم في الكشف عن المشاعر السياقية كجزء من مهمة SemEval-2019 3. نحن نجرب نقل التعلم باستخدام نماذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا (ULMFiT و OpenAI GPT و BERT) وقمنا بضبطها في هذه المهمة . نقوم أيضًا بتدريب نموذج التعلم العميق من نقطة الصفر باستخدام حفلات الزفاف المدربة مسبقًا وهندسة BiLSTM مع آلية الانتباه. يحقق النموذج المجمع نتيجة تنافسية ، حيث يحتل المرتبة التاسعة من بين 165 فريقًا. تظهر النتيجة أن ULMFiT يعمل بشكل أفضل بسبب تقنيات الضبط الفائقة. نقترح تحسينات للعمل في المستقبل.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestro enfoque basado en el aprendizaje de transferencia para la detección de emociones contextuales como parte de la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2019. Experimentamos con el aprendizaje por transferencia utilizando modelos lingüísticos previamente entrenados (ULMFit, OpenAI GPT y BERT) y los ajustamos en esta tarea. También entrenamos un modelo de aprendizaje profundo desde cero utilizando incrustaciones de palabras previamente entrenadas y arquitectura BilsTM con mecanismo de atención. El modelo ensamblado logra un resultado competitivo, ocupando el noveno lugar de 165 equipos. El resultado revela que ULMFit funciona mejor debido a sus técnicas superiores de ajuste fino. Proponemos mejoras para el trabajo futuro.', 'ja': '本論文では、SemEval -2019タスク3の一部として、文脈的感情検出への転移学習ベースのアプローチについて説明する。事前に訓練された言語モデル（ ULMFiT、OpenAI GPT、およびBERT ）を使用して転送学習を実験し、このタスクで微調整します。また、事前にトレーニングされた単語埋め込みと注意メカニズムを備えたBiLSTMアーキテクチャを使用して、ディープラーニングモデルを一からトレーニングします。アンサンブルモデルは、165チーム中9位の競争結果を達成します。その結果、優れた微調整技術により、ULMFiTが最も優れたパフォーマンスを発揮することが明らかになりました。今後の作業の改善を提案します。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наш подход к контекстуальному обнаружению эмоций на основе обучения передаче в рамках задачи 3 SemEval-2019. Мы экспериментируем с трансферным обучением с использованием предварительно обученных языковых моделей (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT и BERT) и тонко настраиваем их для выполнения этой задачи. Мы также обучаем модель глубокого обучения с нуля с использованием предварительно обученных вложений слов и архитектуры BiLSTM с механизмом внимания. Ансамблевая модель достигает конкурентного результата, занимая девятое место из 165 команд. Результат показывает, что ULMFiT работает лучше благодаря своим превосходным методам тонкой настройки. Мы предлагаем усовершенствования для будущей работы.', 'zh': '本文述我迁学之情,以为SemEval-2019务3之一体。 吾以豫训之语(ULMFiT,OpenAI GPT与BERT)迁学之实验,而微调之。 又用预练之词嵌、注意机者 BiLSTM 架构从头始教习模样。 集成模得竞争力,165团队第九。 结果表明,ULMFiT以卓异为最。 臣等请改进后事。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2019 टास्क 3 के हिस्से के रूप में प्रासंगिक भावनाओं का पता लगाने के लिए हमारे स्थानांतरण सीखने-आधारित दृष्टिकोण का वर्णन करता है। हम पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT, और BERT) का उपयोग करके स्थानांतरण सीखने के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं और उन्हें इस कार्य पर ठीक करते हैं। हम ध्यान तंत्र के साथ पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेडिंग और BiLSTM वास्तुकला का उपयोग करके खरोंच से एक गहरी सीखने के मॉडल को भी प्रशिक्षित करते हैं। ensembled मॉडल प्रतिस्पर्धी परिणाम प्राप्त करता है, 165 टीमों में से नौवें स्थान पर है। परिणाम से पता चलता है कि ULMFiT अपनी बेहतर ठीक ट्यूनिंग तकनीकों के कारण सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन करता है। हम भविष्य के काम के लिए सुधार का प्रस्ताव करते हैं।', 'ga': "Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcur chuige atá bunaithe ar fhoghlaim aistrithe maidir le mothúcháin comhthéacsúla a bhrath mar chuid de Thasc 3 SemEval-2019. Déanaimid tástáil ar fhoghlaim aistrithe ag baint úsáide as samhlacha teanga réamhoilte (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT, agus BERT) agus mionchoigeartú a dhéanamh orthu ar an tasc seo. . Cuirimid oiliúint freisin ar mhúnla domhain foghlama ón tús ag baint úsáide as leabaithe focal réamhoilte agus ailtireacht BiLSTM le meicníocht aird. Baineann an tsamhail ensembled amach toradh iomaíoch, sa naoú háit as 165 fhoireann. Léiríonn an toradh gur fearr a fheidhmíonn ULMFiT mar gheall ar a theicnící mionchoigeartaithe is fearr. Molaimid feabhsuithe d'obair amach anseo.", 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre approche basée sur l'apprentissage par transfert pour la détection contextuelle des émotions dans le cadre de la tâche 3 SEMEVAL-2019. Nous expérimentons l'apprentissage par transfert à l'aide de modèles linguistiques pré-entraînés (ULMfit, OpenAI GPT et BERT) et nous les affinons sur cette tâche. Nous entraînons également un modèle d'apprentissage profond à partir de zéro à l'aide d'intégrations de mots préentraînées et d'une architecture BilsTM avec mécanisme d'attention. Le modèle assemblé atteint un résultat compétitif, se classant neuvième sur 165 équipes. Le résultat révèle que ULMfit est plus performant grâce à ses techniques de réglage fin supérieures. Nous proposons des améliorations pour les travaux futurs.", 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a kontextuális érzelmek detektálásának transzfertanuláson alapuló megközelítését a SemEval-2019 feladat 3 részeként. Kísérletezünk transzfertanulással előre képzett nyelvi modellek (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT és BERT) segítségével, és finomhangoljuk őket erre a feladatra. Továbbá a semmiből képzett mélytanulási modellt képzünk előre képzett szóbeágyazásokkal és figyelemmechanizmussal ellátott BiLSTM architektúrával. Az együttes modell versenyeredményt ér el, 165 csapat közül kilencedik helyen. Az eredmény azt mutatja, hogy az ULMFiT kiváló finomhangolási technikáinak köszönhetően teljesít a legjobban. Javasoljuk a jövőbeli munka javítását.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტის შესახებ ჩვენი ტრანსპერტისტური სწავლების მიხედვით კონტექსტური ემოციონის განახლებისთვის SemEval-2019 სამუშაო 3-ის ნაწილი. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტირებით ტრანსპერიმენტის სწავლების გამოყენებით წინასწავლებული ენის მოდელები (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT, და BERT) და ამ პარამეტრებით დავაკეთებთ. ჩვენ ასევე უფრო ძალიან სწავლის მოდელს შევსწავლით, რომელიც საკუთარი სწავლილი სიტყვების გამოყენება და აქტიქტურა BiLSTM აქტიქტურა აფრიქტურის მექ ჩვენი მოდელეში კონპექტიური შედეგები მოხდება, რომლებიც 165 ჯგუფიდან მე-9-იან. პვჱსლრარა ჲრკპთგა, ფვ ULMFiT ოპაგთ ნაი-ეჲბპვ ჱაპაეთ ჟგჲთრვ ნაი-ეჲბპთ რვჳნჲდთთ. ჩვენ მომავალეთ სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო შესაძლებელება.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει την προσέγγιση που βασίζεται στη μάθηση μεταφοράς στην ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων στο πλαίσιο της εργασίας 3. Πειραματιζόμαστε με την εκμάθηση μεταφοράς χρησιμοποιώντας προ-εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα γλωσσών (και τα προσαρμόζουμε σε αυτό το έργο. Εκπαιδεύουμε επίσης ένα μοντέλο βαθιάς μάθησης από το μηδέν χρησιμοποιώντας προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις λέξεων και αρχιτεκτονική με μηχανισμό προσοχής. Το σύνολο του μοντέλου επιτυγχάνει ανταγωνιστικό αποτέλεσμα, με την ένατη θέση στις 165 ομάδες. Το αποτέλεσμα αποκαλύπτει ότι αποδίδει καλύτερα χάρη στις ανώτερες τεχνικές συντονισμού. Προτείνουμε βελτιώσεις για μελλοντικές εργασίες.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il nostro approccio basato sull'apprendimento del trasferimento al rilevamento contestuale delle emozioni come parte del Task 3 SemEval-2019. Sperimentiamo l'apprendimento di trasferimento utilizzando modelli linguistici pre-formati (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT e BERT) e li perfezioniamo su questo compito. Inoltre addestriamo un modello di deep learning partendo da zero utilizzando incorporazioni di parole pre-addestrate e architettura BiLSTM con meccanismo di attenzione. Il modello ensembled raggiunge un risultato competitivo, classificandosi nono su 165 squadre. Il risultato rivela che ULMFiT funziona meglio grazie alle sue tecniche di messa a punto superiori. Proponiamo miglioramenti per i lavori futuri.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinamas mūsų mokymosi metodas, grindžiamas perėjimu prie kontekstinės emocijos nustatymo, kaip dalis „SemEval-2019“ 3 užduoties. Eksperimentuojame mokymosi perdavimu naudojant iš anksto parengtus kalbų modelius (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT ir BERT) ir juos patobuliname šioje užduotyje. Taip pat iš pradžių mokome gilaus mokymosi model į naudojant iš anksto apmokytus žodžių įdėjimus ir BiLSTM architektūrą su dėmesio mechanizmu. Sujungtas modelis pasiekia konkurencinį rezultatą, 9-ąjį iš 165 komandų. The result reveals that ULMFiT performs best due to its superior fine-tuning techniques.  Siūlome patobulinti būsimą darbą.', 'mk': 'Овој документ го опишува нашиот пристап базиран на трансфер на учење контекстуално детекција на емоции како дел од SemEval-2019 задача 3. We experiment with transfer learning using pre-trained language models (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT, and BERT) and fine-tune them on this task.  Ние, исто така, обучуваме длабоко учење модел од нула користејќи предобучени зборови вградени и БиLSTM архитектура со механизам на внимание. Собраниот модел постигнува конкурентни резултати, рангирајќи се на деветтиот од 165 тимови. Резултатот открива дека УЛМФИТ е најдобар поради своите супериорни техники на финетирање. Предложуваме подобрувања за идната работа.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 3- тапсырманың бөлігі ретінде контекстік емоцияларды табуға негізделген оқыту тәсілімізді таңдайды. Біз алдын- ала оқылған тіл үлгілерін (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT және BERT) көмектесіп, оларды осы тапсырманы баптау үшін аударып тұрамыз. Мұндай-ақ біз алдындағы сөздерді ендіру мен BiLSTM архитектурасының механизмімен түсіндіру үлгісін қолданатын. Бұл үлгі конкурс нәтижесін жеткізеді, 165 топтың 9-інші ретінде. Нәтижесі ULMFiT өзінің жоғары жақсы баптау технологиясының жақсы жұмыс істейтінін көрсетеді. Біз келесі жұмыс үшін жақсартуларды ұсынамыз.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan pendekatan pemindahan kita berdasarkan belajar untuk pengesan emosi kontekstual sebagai sebahagian dari SemEval-2019 Tugas 3. Kami eksperimen dengan pembelajaran pemindahan menggunakan model bahasa terlatih (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT, dan BERT) dan memperbaikinya dalam tugas ini. Kami juga melatih model belajar dalam dari awal menggunakan penyambungan perkataan terlatih awal dan arkitektur BiLSTM dengan mekanisme perhatian. Model kumpulan mencapai keputusan kompetitif, meningkat ke-9 daripada 165 pasukan. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahawa ULMFiT berfungsi terbaik kerana teknik penyesuaiannya yang lebih tinggi. Kami cadangkan peningkatan untuk kerja masa depan.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-approċċ tagħna bbażat fuq it-tagħlim tat-trasferiment għad-detezzjoni tal-emozzjonijiet kuntestwali bħala parti mis-SemEval-2019 Task 3. We experiment with transfer learning using pre-trained language models (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT, and BERT) and fine-tune them on this task.  Aħna nħarrġu wkoll mudell ta’ tagħlim profond mill-bidu bl-użu ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ kliem imħarrġa minn qabel u arkitettura BiLSTM b’mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni. Il-mudell miġbur flimkien jikseb riżultat kompetittiv, li jikklassifika d-disa’ minn 165 tim. Ir-riżultat juri li l-ULMFiT tagħmel l-aħjar minħabba t-tekniki ta’ rfinar superjuri tiegħu. Aħna nipproponu titjib għal xogħol futur.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള വികാരത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന പ്രായോഗ്യം സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2019 ടാസ്ക് 3-ന്റ മുമ്പ് പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നമ്മള്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു മുന്\u200dപരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകളും ബില്\u200dഎസ്റ്റിംസ് ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിയും ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഒരു ആഴത്തെ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന മോഡലിനും  ആന്\u200dസ്മെയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള മോഡല്\u200d മത്സരത്തിലുള്ള ഫലം എത്തുന്നു. 165 ടീമില്\u200d നിന്ന് ഒമ്പതാം റാങ്ങിങ്ങ്  അതിന്റെ മികച്ച നല്ല മികച്ച ടെക്നിങ്കിന് കാരണം ULMFiT പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഫലം വെളിപ്പെടു നമ്മള്\u200d ഭാവിയുടെ ജോലിക്ക് മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний суралцах сургалтын үндсэн арга замыг SemEval-2019-ийн 3 даалгаварын нэг хэсэг болгон ойлгохын тулд тайлбарладаг. Бид өмнө сургалтын суралцах сургалтыг ашиглан (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT, BERT) туршилт хийж, үүнийг энэ ажлын тухай сайжруулах хэрэгтэй. Мөн бид анхаарлын механизм болон BiLSTM архитектурыг ашиглан гүн гүнзгий суралцах загварын загварыг суралцах хэрэгтэй. Сонгосон загвар нь өрсөлдөөний үр дүн гарч ирнэ. 165 багтаас 9-р багтай. Үүний үр дүн нь ULMFiT-ын сайн сайн дүгнэлтийн техникуудын шалтгаан хамгийн сайн ажилладаг. Бид ирээдүйн ажлын сайжруулалтыг санал болгож байна.', 'no': 'Denne papiret skildrar vår tilnærming på læringsbasert på omsetjingsbasert til kontekst-oppdaging av emosjonar som del av semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3. Vi eksperimenterer med læring av overføring med føretrainerte språk- modeller (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT og BERT) og finn oppsettet på denne oppgåva. Vi treng også ein dyp læringsmodell frå å å rulla med føretrainerte ordinnbygging og BiLSTM-arkitektur med oppmerksmekanisme. Det aktive modellet når det gjelder konkurrentivt resultat, rangerer ni av 165 grupper. Resultatet viser at ULMFiT utfører best på grunn av sine øvre finnstillingsteknikke. Vi foreslår forbedringar for framtidige arbeid.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasze podejście oparte na transferowym uczeniu się do kontekstowego wykrywania emocji w ramach SemEval-2019 Task 3. Eksperymentujemy z nauką transferową za pomocą wstępnie przeszkolonych modeli językowych (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT i BERT) i dostosowujemy je do tego zadania. Szkolimy również model głębokiego uczenia od podstaw przy użyciu wstępnie przeszkolonych osadzeń słów i architektury BiLSTM z mechanizmem uwagi. Model zespołowy osiąga konkurencyjny wynik, dziewiąty z 165 drużyn. Wynik pokazuje, że ULMFiT sprawdza się najlepiej dzięki doskonałym technikom dostrajania. Proponujemy ulepszenia dla przyszłych prac.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie abordarea noastră bazată pe transferul de învățare a detectării emoțiilor contextuale ca parte a Sarcinii SemEval-2019 3. Experimentăm învățarea transferului folosind modele lingvistice pre-instruite (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT și BERT) și le reglăm fin pe această sarcină. De asemenea, instruim un model de învățare profundă de la zero folosind încorporări de cuvinte pre-instruite și arhitectura BiLSTM cu mecanism de atenție. Modelul ansamblu obține rezultate competitive, clasându-se pe locul 9 din 165 de echipe. Rezultatul dezvăluie că ULMFiT performează cel mai bine datorită tehnicilor sale superioare de reglare fină. Propunem îmbunătățiri pentru activitățile viitoare.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš pristup premeštaju na osnovu učenja kontekstualnog otkrivanja emocija kao deo zadatka 3. Mi eksperimentiramo sa učenjem prijenosa koristeći predobučene jezičke modele (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT i BERT) i ispravljamo ih na ovom zadatku. Takoðe treniramo model dubokog učenja iz ogrebotine koristeći predobučene reèi ugraðenje i arhitekturu BiLSTM sa pažnjom mehanizma. Oslobođeni model postiže konkurentni rezultat, u redovima devetog od 165 tima. Rezultat pokazuje da ULMFiT najbolje izvodi zbog svojih nadređenih tehnika. Predlažemo poboljšanje za budući posao.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය අධාරිත ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්ප්\u200dරවේශනය හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්ප්\u200dරවේශනයේ ක අපි පරීක්ෂණය කලින් ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණිත භාෂා මොඩල් භාවිතාවක් භාවිත කරන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා (USMFiT, OpenAI GPT, BERT) සහ අපි ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු වචනය සහ BiLSTM ස්ථාපනය සඳහා ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. සම්පූර්ණ විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිශාල විදිහට පටන් ගන්න පුළුවන්, කණ්ඩායම් 165 කින් නවත්වෙනි ප්\u200dරත ඒ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරකාශයක් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා විශේෂ විධාන විධානය නිසා උපරාධ විධානය කරන්න හොඳම වැ අපි අනාගතය වැඩේ වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා.', 'so': 'This paper describes our transfer learning-based approach to contextual emotion detection as part of SemEval-2019 Task 3.  Waxaannu ku tijaabinaynaa waxbarashada iskuulka horumarinta ah (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT, iyo BERT) waxaana ku habboonaynaa shaqadan. Sidoo kale waxaynu ku tababarinnaa model aad u dheer oo waxbarasho ah, si aan u isticmaalno hadal horay loo tababariyey iyo dhismaha BiLSTM oo aad u taxadar karto. Tusaalada la xiriiray wuxuu sameyn karaa resultada iskutallaabta, wuxuuna ka sameyn karaa sagaalaad oo ka mid ah 165 koox. ULMFiT wuxuu muujiyaa in uu sameeyo qalabka caadiga ah ee ugu wanaagsan. Waxaynu horumarinaynaa shaqada mustaqbalka ah.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver v책rt 철verf철ringsinl채rningsbaserade tillv채gag책ngss채tt f철r kontextuell k채nslodetektering som en del av SemEval-2019 Task 3. Vi experimenterar med transferinl채rning med hj채lp av f철rberedda spr책kmodeller (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT och BERT) och finjusterar dem p책 denna uppgift. Vi tr채nar ocks책 en djupinl채rningsmodell fr책n grunden med hj채lp av f철rkl채dda ord inb채ddningar och BiLSTM-arkitektur med uppm채rksamhetsmekanism. Den ensemblerade modellen uppn책r t채vlingsresultat och rankar nionde av 165 lag. Resultatet visar att ULMFiT presterar b채st tack vare sina 철verl채gsna finjusteringstekniker. Vi f철resl책r f철rb채ttringar f철r framtida arbete.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் செம்Eval-2019 பணியின் 3 பகுதியாக எங்கள் கற்றுக்கு அடிப்படையான முறையை மாற்றுகிறது. முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்தி மாற்றி கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் போது நாம் பரிசோதிக்கிறோம் (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT,  நாம் முன் பயிற்சி முன் பயிற்சி சொல்லின் உள்ளடக்கம் மற்றும் பில்எஸ்டிஎம் கட்டுப்பாட்டு முறைமையை கவனத்துடன் பயிற்சி  ஒருங்கிணைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி தோல்வியான முடிவை அடைகிறது, 165 குழுக்களில் ஒன்பது வரிசையில் உள்ளது. முடிவு நாம் எதிர்கால வேலைக்கான முன்னேற்றங்களை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம்.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ہماری ترنسیٹ سیکھنے کی بنیادی طریقے کی توضیح کرتا ہے کہ سیم Eval-2019 ٹاکس 3 کی حصہ کے ذریعے ہماری ترنسیٹ سیکھنے کی طریقہ ہے. ہم پہلے تدریس کی زبان موڈل (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT اور BERT) کے مطابق تدریس کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ آزمائش کرتے ہیں اور ان کو اس کام پر خوب تنظیم کرتے ہیں۔ ہم نے بھی ایک عمیق سیکھنے کے موڈل کی تعلیم دی ہے جو پہلے تدریس کی کلمات ابڈینگ اور BiLSTM معماری مکانیسم کے مطابق ہے۔ مضبوط موڈل مضبوط نتیجہ حاصل کرتا ہے، 165 ٹیموں میں نو نسبت رقم کرتا ہے۔ نتیجہ ظاہر کرتا ہے کہ ULMFIT اپنے اوپر نیک تنظیم تکنیک کے سبب بہترین عمل کرتا ہے. ہم مستقبل کاروں کے لئے صلاحیت پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz esa SemEval-2019 Vazifa 3 qismidan bir qismga o'rganish o'rganish asosida o'rganishning asosiy o'zgarishni anglatadi. Biz o'rganishdan oldin tilning modellari (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT va BERT) bilan o'rganishni o'rganishni o'rganamiz va ularni shu vazifanda yaxshi ko'paytirish mumkin. Biz o'rganish modelini o'rganamiz, bir o'rganishdan oldin so'zlar ichida o'rganadi va BiLSTM maktablari maktablari va taqdim mekanisme bilan o'rganamiz. Name @ info: status Biz kelajak ishni yaxshi ko'rib chiqaramiz.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả phương pháp truyền tải dựa trên việc tìm kiếm cảm xúc ngữ cảnh của chúng ta trong Nhiệm vụ hoàn hảo 31. Chúng tôi thử nghiệm với việc học chuyển nhượng sử dụng các mô hình ngôn ngữ đã được huấn luyện trước (USMF, OpenAI GPT, và BERT) và chỉnh sửa chúng trong nhiệm vụ này. Chúng tôi cũng đào tạo một mô hình học sâu từ vết tích bằng những từ ngữ được huấn luyện trước và kiến trúc BiLSD với cơ chế tập trung. Kiểu chung đạt được kết quả cạnh tranh, thứ chín ở đội 165. Kết quả tiết lộ rằng trường hợp của trường sẽ hoàn thiện tốt nhất nhờ các kỹ thuật tinh chỉnh tốt. Chúng tôi đề nghị cải tiến công việc tương lai.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва нашия подход, базиран на трансферно обучение, за откриване на контекстуални емоции като част от Задача 3. Експериментираме с трансферно обучение, използвайки предварително обучени езикови модели (и прецизно ги настройваме по тази задача. Също така обучаваме модел на дълбоко обучение от нулата, използвайки предварително обучени вграждания на думи и архитектура с механизъм за внимание. Ансамблераният модел постига конкурентен резултат, класирайки се на деветото място от 165 отбора. Резултатът показва, че се представя най-добре благодарение на превъзходните си техники за фина настройка. Предлагаме подобрения за бъдещата работа.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores overførsel læringsbaserede tilgang til kontekstuel følelsesdetektion som en del af SemEval-2019 Opgave 3. Vi eksperimenterer med transfer learning ved hjælp af forududdannede sprogmodeller (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT og BERT) og finjusterer dem på denne opgave. Vi træner også en dyb læringsmodel fra bunden ved hjælp af forududdannede ordindlejringer og BiLSTM arkitektur med opmærksomhedsmekanisme. Den sammensatte model opnår konkurrencedygtige resultater og rangerer niende ud af 165 hold. Resultatet afslører, at ULMFiT præsterer bedst på grund af sine overlegne finjusteringsteknikker. Vi foreslår forbedringer for det fremtidige arbejde.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš pristup na osnovu učenja prema kontekstualnom otkrivanju emocija kao dio zadatka 3. poluvrijeđenja 2019. Eksperimentiramo s učenjem prijenosa koristeći predobučene jezičke modele (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT i BERT) i ispravljamo ih na ovom zadatku. Također treniramo model dubokog učenja iz ogrebotine koristeći predobučene riječi ugrađenje i arhitekturu BiLSTM sa mehanizam pažnje. Oslobođeni model postiže konkurentni rezultat, u kojem se čini deveti od 165 timova. Rezultat pokazuje da ULMFiT najbolje izvodi zbog nadmoćnih tehnika ispravljanja. Predlažemo poboljšanje za budući rad.', 'nl': 'Deze paper beschrijft onze transfer learning-gebaseerde benadering van contextuele emotie detectie als onderdeel van SemEval-2019 Taak 3. We experimenteren met transferleren met vooraf getrainde taalmodellen (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT en BERT) en verfijnen deze op deze taak. We trainen ook een deep learning model vanaf nul met behulp van vooraf getrainde woord embeddings en BiLSTM architectuur met aandachtsmechanisme. Het ensembled model behaalt competitief resultaat, op de negende plaats van 165 teams. Het resultaat laat zien dat ULMFiT het beste presteert dankzij zijn superieure fine-tuning technieken. Wij stellen verbeteringen voor voor toekomstige werkzaamheden.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unseren transferlernbasierten Ansatz zur kontextuellen Emotionserkennung im Rahmen der SemEval-2019 Task 3. Wir experimentieren mit Transferlernen mit vortrainierten Sprachmodellen (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT und BERT) und verfeinern diese auf diese Aufgabe. Wir trainieren auch ein Deep Learning Modell von Grund auf mit vorgetrainierten Wort Einbettungen und BiLSTM Architektur mit Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus. Das Ensemble-Modell erzielt konkurrenzfähiges Ergebnis und belegt neun von 165 Teams. Das Ergebnis zeigt, dass ULMFiT aufgrund seiner überlegenen Feinabstimmung-Techniken am besten abschneidet. Wir schlagen Verbesserungen für die künftige Arbeit vor.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ روش تحویل یادگیری ما را به کشف احساسات محیط به عنوان بخشی از وظیفه ۳ نیم Eval-2019 توصیف می\u200cکند. ما با استفاده از مدل\u200cهای پیش آموزش زبانی (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT, و BERT) تجربه می\u200cکنیم و آنها را در این وظیفه خوب تنظیم می\u200cکنیم. ما همچنین یک مدل یادگیری عمیق از خراب استفاده از ابتدایی کلمات پیش آموزش می کنیم و معماری BiLSTM با مکانیسم توجه. این مدل مشخص شده به نتیجه رقابت رسیده است، در حالی که نومین از ۱۹۵ تیم است. نتیجه نشان می\u200cدهد که ULMFiT بهترین عمل را به خاطر تکنیک\u200cهای اصلاح\u200cکننده\u200cاش انجام می\u200cدهد. ما پیشنهاد بهترین کارهای آینده می کنیم.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan pendekatan transfer kita berdasarkan belajar untuk deteksi emosi kontekstual sebagai bagian dari SemEval-2019 Tugas 3. Kami eksperimen dengan belajar transfer menggunakan model bahasa terlatih (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT, dan BERT) dan memperbaikinya dalam tugas ini. Kami juga melatih model belajar mendalam dari nol menggunakan penerbangan kata-kata yang terlatih-terlatih dan arsitektur BiLSTM dengan mekanisme perhatian. Model ensembled mencapai hasil kompetitif, peringkat sembilan dari 165 tim. Hasilnya mengungkapkan bahwa ULMFiT melakukan yang terbaik karena teknik penyesuaiannya. Kami mengusulkan peningkatan untuk pekerjaan masa depan.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-2019 임무의 3부분으로서 이동 학습을 바탕으로 하는 상황 정서 검측 방법을 묘사하였다.우리는 미리 훈련된 언어 모델(ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT, BERT)을 사용하여 이동 학습 실험을 하고 이 임무에서 그것들을 미세하게 조정한다.우리는 또한 미리 훈련된 단어 삽입과 주의 메커니즘을 가진 BilSTM 구조를 사용하여 처음부터 깊이 있는 학습 모델을 훈련한다.그룹 모델은 경쟁적인 결과를 얻어 165개 구단 중 9위에 올랐다.그 결과 ULMFiT는 뛰어난 마이크로스피커 기술로 가장 좋은 모습을 보였다.우리는 미래의 일을 위해 개선 건의를 제기한다.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan metodën tonë të transferimit të mësimit për zbulimin e emocioneve kontekstuale si pjesë e SemEval-2019 Task 3. Ne eksperimentojmë me mësimin e transferimit duke përdorur modele gjuhësh të trajnuar para (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT, dhe BERT) dhe i rregullojmë ato në këtë detyrë. Ne gjithashtu trajnojmë një model mësimi të thellë nga zero duke përdorur përmbajtje të paratrajnuara fjalësh dhe arkitekturë BiLSTM me mekanizëm vëmendje. Modeli i mbledhur arrin rezultat konkurrues, duke renditur të nëntën nga 165 ekipe. Rezultati zbulon se ULMFiT performon më mirë për shkak të teknikave superiore të rregullimit. Ne propozojmë përmirësime për punën e ardhshme.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mbinu yetu ya kuhamisha kujifunza kwa msingi wa kutambua hisia za kisasa kama sehemu ya kazi 3 ya SemEval-2019. Tunajaribu kwa kuhamisha kujifunza kwa kutumia mifano ya lugha zilizofunzwa kabla (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT, na BERT) na kuwapa vizuri katika kazi hii. Pia tunamfundisha modeli ya kujifunza kwa kina kutoka kwenye vifaa vinavyotumia maneno yaliyofunzwa kabla na majengo ya BiLSTM kwa mfumo wa makini. Mfano huo unaweza kupata matokeo ya ushindani, yenye rangi ya tisa kati ya timu 165. Matokeo yake yanaonyesha kuwa ULMFiT inafanya vizuri zaidi kwa sababu ya mbinu zake za mafunzo bora. Tunapendekeza maboresho kwa kazi za baadaye.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጾች የስሜምEval-2019 ስራ 3 ክፍል ሆኖ የተመሳሰለውን ትምህርታችንን ለመቀናቀል ይናገራል፡፡ ከቀድሞ ተማሪ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT እና BERT) በመጠቀም በመለወጥ እና በዚህ ስራ ላይ በመጠቀም እናደርጋቸዋለን፡፡ በጥልቅ ትምህርት ሞዴል እና የፊተኛ ትምህርት እና የቢልSTM መሠረት ምክረትን በመጠቀም እናስተምራለን፡፡ የተጠቃሚው ሞዴል የተዋጋውን ፍሬት አግኝቷል፤ ከ165 ጭፍሮች ዘጠኝቱን ይነካል፡፡ ፍጥረቱም ULMFiT ከዋነኛው ጥሩ ስልጣናዎች ምክንያት የተሻለ መሆኑን ያስታውቃል፡፡ ለኋለኛይቱ ሥራ ማሻሻሻል እናስጀራለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր փոխանցման ուսումնասիրության հիմնված մոտեցումը կոնտեքստալ զգացմունքների հայտնաբերման համար որպես "ՍեմԷվալ-2019" 3-ի մաս: Մենք փորձում ենք փոխանցման ուսումնասիրություն օգտագործելով նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելներ (ՕԼՄՖԻՏ, OpenAI GPT և BERT) և բարձրացնելով դրանք այս խնդրի վրա: Մենք նաև խորը սովորելու մոդել ենք պատրաստում զրոյից օգտագործելով նախապատրաստված բառերի ներգրավումներ և ԲիLSԹՄ ճարտարապետություն ուշադրության մեխանիզմի հետ: Անսեմբելյալ մոդելը ստանում է մրցակցության արդյունք, որն 165 թիմերից իններորդ դասավորում է: Արդյունքը բացահայտում է, որ UPMPiT-ը լավագույն արդյունք ունի իր լավագույն բարձրացման տեխնիկայի պատճառով: Մենք առաջարկում ենք բարելավումներ ապագա աշխատանքի համար:', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz çykyşymyzy öwrenmek üçin daýanýan ýaryşymyzy SemEval-2019 Görevi 3-nji tarapynda tassyklaýar. Biz öwrenmegi öwrenmegi ön bilim sistemasynda (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT we BERT) synanyşýarys we olary bu işe üstlenýäris. Biz hem özümiz öwrenmek nusgasyny çyzygyndan öwrenmek nusgasyny örän öwrenmek üçin bilim sistemasy bilen BiLSTM arhitektegi ullanýarys. Bu nusga 165 topardan 9-nji derejä çykýar. Netijäni UlMFITiň üst-täk taýýarlama teknikleriniñ üçin has gowy işleýändigini görkezýär. Biz gelejekki işe gelişmeleri teklip edýäris.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf ons oordrag onderwerp-gebaseerde toegang tot contextual emosie-opdekking as deel van SemEval-2019 Opdrag 3. Ons eksperimenteer met oordrag leer deur te gebruik voor- opgelei taal modele (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT en BERT) en fin- tune hulle op hierdie taak. Ons moet ook 'n diep leer model treen van skrap deur voor-onderwerp woord inbettings en BiLSTM-arkitektuur met aandag mekanisme. Die gemeenskap model bereik mededingsresultaat, ranking negende van 165 teams. Die resultaat vertoon dat ULMFiT die beste uitvoer vanweë sy superior fin-tuning teknike. Ons voorstel verbeteringe vir toekomstige werk.", 'az': "Bu kağıt bizim öyrənməyimizə dayanan öyrənmə metodumuzu, müxtəlif emosiyalar keşfetməsi üçüncü Task 3'nin bir parças ı olaraq xəbər verir. Biz əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş dil modelləri (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT və BERT) ilə transfer öyrənməyi təcrübə edirik və bu işdə onları təmizləyirik. Biz də əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş sözləri və BiLSTM arhitektüsünü gözləmə mehanizması ilə dərin öyrənmək modelini təhsil edirik. Bu modellər 165 dəstədən doqquz dəstədir. Növbəti olaraq ULMFiT'nin üst-üst düzəltmə tekniklərinə görə ən yaxşı işlədiyini göstərir. Biz gələcək işin yaxşılıqlarını təklif edirik.", 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu el nostre enfocament basat en l'aprenentatge de transfer ència a la detecció de les emocions contextuals com part de la tasca 3 de SemEval-2019. We experiment with transfer learning using pre-trained language models (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT, and BERT) and fine-tune them on this task.  També entrenem un model d'aprenentatge profund des de zero utilitzant integració de paraules pré-entrenada i arquitectura BiLSTM amb mecanisme d'atenció. El model combinat aconsegueix resultats competitius, classificant-se en nou d'entre 165 equips. El resultat revela que ULMFiT té el millor resultat degut a les seves tècniques superiors d'ajustament. Proposem millores per a la feina futura.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš pristup na osnovu učenja prema kontekstualnom otkrivanju emocija kao deo zadatka 3. polovine Evala-2019. Mi eksperimentiramo sa učenjem prijenosa koristeći predobučene jezičke modele (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT i BERT) i ispravljamo ih na ovom zadatku. Također treniramo model dubokog učenja iz ogrebotine koristeći predobučene riječi ugrađenje i arhitekturu BiLSTM sa mehanizam pažnje. Oslobođeni model postiže konkurentni rezultat, u kojem se čini deveti od 165 timova. Rezultat pokazuje da ULMFiT najbolje izvodi zbog svojih nadređenih tehnika za finaliziranje. Predlažemo poboljšanje za budući rad.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি আমাদের সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের ৩ অংশ হিসেবে বিভিন্ন অনুভূতি আবিষ্কারের প্রতি শিক্ষা ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতির পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেল (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT এবং BERT) ব্যবহার করে আমরা পরীক্ষা করি এবং এই কাজে তাদের ভালো সুন্দর করে দেই। পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত শব্দ ব্যবহার করে আমরা একটি গভীর শিক্ষা মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ দেই এবং বিএলস্টিমের কাঠামো দিয়ে মনোযোগ প্রদান করি। The ensembled model achieves competitive result, ranking ninth out of 165 teams.  ফলাফল প্রকাশ করে যে ইউএলএমফিটি তার সুন্দর ভালো টিনিং কৌশলের কারণে সবচেয়ে ভালো কাজ করে। আমরা ভবিষ্যতের কাজের জন্য উন্নতি প্রস্তাব করি।', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš přístup k detekci kontextových emocí založený na transferovém učení v rámci SemEval-2019 Task 3. Experimentujeme s transferovým učením pomocí předškolených jazykových modelů (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT a BERT) a doladíme je na tomto úkolu. Také trénujeme model hlubokého učení od začátku pomocí předškolených vložení slov a architektury BiLSTM s mechanismem pozornosti. Souborový model dosahuje konkurenčního výsledku a umístění devátého z 165 týmů. Výsledek ukazuje, že ULMFiT funguje nejlépe díky svým vynikajícím technikám jemného ladění. Navrhujeme zlepšení pro budoucí práci.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan siirtooppimiseen perustuvaa lähestymistapaamme kontekstuaaliseen tunteiden havaitsemiseen osana SemEval-2019 tehtävää 3. Kokeilemme siirtooppimista käyttäen ennalta koulutettuja kielimalleja (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT ja BERT) ja hienosäädämme niitä tässä tehtävässä. Harjoittelemme myös syväoppimismallia alusta alkaen käyttäen esikoulutettuja sanaupotuksia ja BiLSTM-arkkitehtuuria huomiomekanismilla. Yhdistetty malli saavuttaa kilpailullisen tuloksen ja sijoittuu yhdeksänneksi 165 joukkueesta. Tulos paljastaa, että ULMFiT suoriutuu parhaiten erinomaisten hienosäätötekniikoidensa ansiosta. Ehdotamme parannuksia tulevaa työtä varten.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie siirdeõppepõhist lähenemisviisi kontekstilisele emotsioonide tuvastamisele osana SemEval-2019 ülesandest 3. Me eksperimenteerime siirdeõppega eelnevalt koolitatud keelemudelite (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT ja BERT) abil ja täpsustame neid selles ülesandes. Samuti koolitame sügavõppe mudelit nullist, kasutades eelnevalt koolitatud sõnade manustamist ja tähelepanumehhanismiga BiLSTM arhitektuuri. Komplekteeritud mudel saavutab konkurentsivõimelise tulemuse, olles 165 meeskonnast üheksandal kohal. Tulemus näitab, et ULMFiT on parim tänu oma parimatele peenhäälestustehnikatele. Me pakume edasiseks tööks parandusi.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את הגישה המבוססת על ההעברה שלנו לגילוי רגשות קונטקסטיים כחלק מהמשימה שלישית SemEval-2019. אנו מנסים עם לימוד העברה באמצעות דוגמנים לשפה מאומנים מראש (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT, וברט) ולהגדיר אותם על המשימה הזאת. אנחנו גם מאמן דוגמנית למידה עמוקה מאפס בשימוש בתכנית מילים מאומנת מראש וארכיטקטורה BiLSTM עם מנגנון תשומת לב. המודל המוצג משיג תוצאה תחרותית, מדרגה תשעית מתוך 165 קבוצות. התוצאה מראה שהULMFiT מבצע הכי טוב בגלל טכניקות התאמה העליונות שלה. אנחנו מציעים שיפורים לעבודה עתידית.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naš pristop, ki temelji na prenosu učenja, do kontekstualnega zaznavanja čustev kot del naloge 3 SemEval-2019. Preizkušamo transferno učenje z uporabo vnaprej usposobljenih jezikovnih modelov (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT in BERT) in jih natančno prilagodimo pri tej nalogi. Izobražujemo tudi model globokega učenja iz nič z uporabo vnaprej usposobljenih besednih vdelav in arhitekture BiLSTM z mehanizmom pozornosti. Kompletni model dosega konkurenčni rezultat in se uvršča deveto od 165 ekip. Rezultat razkriva, da ULMFiT deluje najbolje zaradi svojih vrhunskih tehnik finega uravnavanja. Predlagamo izboljšave za prihodnje delo.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki rambarang nggawe Ndukung-nglanggar aturan kuwi nggawe gerasu contextual Anyone Awakdhéwé nganggo sistem saking nggambar luwih dumateng seneng nggawe ngulinggo gambar aturan tapi tarjamahan lan akeh BiLTT M karo mekaniyen nggawe model sing wis rampunggo bukane wis rampunggo akeh sing wis rampunggo, ditambah sing katêpakan ning limo-limo hamak lan hamak-limo. Pametuné bukane ngerti, UlMFT iso nggawe barang nggawe teknik sing luwih apik dadi. Awak dhéwé ngéwé ngertuakaké kanggo nggawe gerakan.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We experiment with transfer learning using pre-trained language models (ULMFiT, OpenAI GPT, and BERT) and fine-tune them on this task. We also train a deep learning model from scratch using pre-trained word embeddings and BiLSTM architecture with attention mechanism. འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རྣམས་མཐོང་ཐུབ་པའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འབྲི་བཞིན་པའི་ཚད་ལྡན་165 མི་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ དབྱངས་འབྲས་ནི་ULMFiT དེ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་མགོ་མིག་གི་བཟོ་རྒྱུས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་དགའ་ཤོས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་མ་འོངས་པའི་ལས་ཀ་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་པར་སྔོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana hanyoyinMu a kan shige da aka sanar da shi zuwa gunyar hisãbi wanda ya zama rabo na SemEal-2019 Taimar 3. Za jarraba su da motsi da aka iya shige da su a kan wannan aikin (ULMFiT, Open AI GPT, da BERT). Tuna kõre wani misali mai da aka sanar da zura daga karatun, don ka yi amfani da saurin da aka yi wa zaman-wa'anar da bakarar da BiLStM da masu saurãre. @ info: whatsthis Babu al'amar ta bayyana cewa ULMFiT na aikata mafi kyaun kwamfyutan mafiya kyauta. Munã gabatar da improve wa aikin nan gaba."}
{'en': 'LIRMM-Advanse at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Attentive Conversation Modeling for Emotion Detection and Classification', 'fr': 'LIRMM-Advanse au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Modélisation attentive des conversations pour la détection et la classification des émotions', 'pt': 'LIRMM-Advanse na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Modelagem de Conversa Atenta para Detecção e Classificação de Emoções', 'ar': 'LIRMM-Advanse في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: نمذجة المحادثة اليقظة للكشف عن المشاعر وتصنيفها', 'es': 'LIRMM-Advanse en Semeval-2019 Tarea 3: Modelado de conversación atento para la detección y clasificación de emociones', 'hi': 'LiRMM-Advanse पर SemEval-2019 कार्य 3: भावना का पता लगाने और वर्गीकरण के लिए चौकस वार्तालाप मॉडलिंग', 'ja': 'LIRMM - Advanse at SemEval -2019タスク3 ：感情の検出と分類のための注意深い会話モデリング', 'zh': 'LIRMM-Advanse在SemEval-2019务3:以情检类对建模', 'ru': 'LIRMM-Advanse на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Внимательное моделирование разговора для обнаружения и классификации эмоций', 'ga': 'LIRMM-Advanse ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Samhaltú Comhrá Aireach chun Mothúchán a Bhrath agus a Aicmiú', 'hu': 'LIRMM-Advanse a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: Figyelmes beszélgetési modellezés az érzelmek felismeréséhez és osztályozásához', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Προσεκτική μοντελοποίηση συνομιλίας για την ανίχνευση και ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων', 'kk': 'LIRMM- Advanse at semiEval- 2019 Task 3: Attentive Conversation Modeling for Emotion Detection and Classification', 'it': 'LIRMM-Advanse a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Modellazione di conversazione attenta per il rilevamento e la classificazione delle emozioni', 'lt': 'LIRMM-Advanced at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Attentive Conversation Modelling for Emotion Detection and Classification', 'ka': 'LIRMM-Advanse at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Attentive Conversation Modeling for Emotion Detection and Classification', 'mk': 'LIRMM-AdvanceComment', 'ml': 'LIRMM-Advanse at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Attentive Conversation Modeling for Emotion Detection and Classification', 'ms': 'LIRMM-Advanse pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Modeling Perbualan Menarik untuk Pengesanan dan Klasifikasi Emosi', 'mt': 'LIRMM-Advance f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 3: Mudellar Attenziv ta’ Konverżjoni għad-Detezzjoni u l-Klassifikazzjoni ta’ Emożjonijiet', 'mn': 'LIRMM-Advanse at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Attentive Conversation Modeling for Emotion Detection and Classification', 'pl': 'LIRMM-Advanse na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Uważne modelowanie rozmów dla wykrywania i klasyfikacji emocji', 'no': 'LIRMM-Advanse at semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3: Attentive Conversation Modelling for Emotion Detection and Classification', 'ro': 'LIRMM-Advanse la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Modelarea atentă a conversației pentru detectarea și clasificarea emoțiilor', 'sv': 'LIRMM-Advanse på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Uppmärksam konversationsmodellering för känslodetektering och klassificering', 'so': 'LIRMM-Advanse at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Attentive conversation Modeling for Detection and Classification', 'si': 'LIRMM-Avaanse at Half-2019 Job 3: Attensive Conversation Modeling for Emotion Detection and Classication', 'sr': 'LIRMM-Advanse na semiEval-2019 Task 3: Modeliranje pozornog razgovora za detekciju i klasifikaciju emocija', 'ur': 'LIRMM-Advanse at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Attentive Conversation Modeling for Emotion Detection and Classification', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணியில் LIRMM- Advance at SemEval- 2019 Task 3: Emotion Detection and Classification for Attentive Conversation Modeling', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'LRMM-advgậy tại SemEvl-2009 Task 3: Chế độ thoại bổ trợ cho việc phát hiện và phân tích cảm xúc.', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Внимателно моделиране на разговори за откриване и класификация на емоциите', 'nl': 'LIRMM-Advanse bij SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Attentieve Gespreksmodellering voor Emotiedetectie en Classificatie', 'da': 'LIRMM-Advanse på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Opmærksom samtalemodellering til detektering og klassificering af følelser', 'de': 'LIRMM-Advanse bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Aufmerksame Gesprächsmodelle zur Emotionserkennung und -klassifikation', 'hr': 'LIRMM-Advanse na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 3: Modeliranje pozornog razgovora za otkrivanje i klasifikaciju emocija', 'id': 'LIRMM-Advanse di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Modeling Percentive Conversation for Emotion Detection and Classification', 'ko': 'LIRMM이SemEval-2019에서의 진전 임무 3: 정서 검측과 분류에 사용되는 집중 대화 모델링', 'fa': 'LIRMM-Advanse at semiEval-2019 Task 3: Attentive Conversation Modeling for Emotion Detection and Classification', 'sw': 'LIRMM-Advanse katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 3: Mpango wa mazungumzo ya mvuto kwa ajili ya Kugundua Uchunguzi na Kutangaza', 'tr': 'LIRMM-Advanse at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Attentive Conversation Modeling for Emotion Detection and Classification', 'af': 'LIRMM-Advanse by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 3: Aangaande Gespraak Modelering vir Emotiese Opdekking en Klassifikasie', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'hy': 'ԼիՄՄՄ-Ավանդանսը ՍեմԵվալ 2019 թվականին 3. հանձնարարություն. զգացմունքների հայտնաբերման և դասակարգման համար փորձարկվող հաղորդակցման մոդելներ', 'sq': 'LIRMM-Advance në SemEval-2019 Task 3: Attentive Conversation Modeling for Emotion Detection and Classification', 'az': 'Qısqa-2019 Gözəl 3: Emotiyon keşfetməsi və Klasifikasyon üçün gözəl söhbət Modeli', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৩: Emotion Detection and Classication for Attentiove Conversation Module', 'bs': 'LIRMM-Advanse na semiEval-2019 Task 3: Modeliranje pozornog razgovora za otkrivanje i klasifikaciju emocija', 'et': 'LIRMM-Advanse SemEval-2019 ülesanne 3: tähelepanelik vestlusmodelleerimine emotsioonide tuvastamiseks ja klassifitseerimiseks', 'ca': 'LIRMM-Advance a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Attentive Conversation Modelling for Emotion Detection and Classification', 'cs': 'Úkol 3: Pozorné modelování konverzace pro detekci a klasifikaci emocí', 'fi': 'LIRMM-Advanse SemEval-2019 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 3: Tarkka keskustelumallinnus tunteiden tunnistamiseen ja luokitteluun', 'jv': 'LIRRM-Advanse at seminval-2011 task 3: Attentive conversation model for emuation detection and CLSSification', 'sk': 'LIRMM-Advanse na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Pozorno modeliranje pogovorov za zaznavanje in klasifikacijo čustev', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'LIRMM-AdvanceComment', 'bo': 'LIRMM-Advanse at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Attentive Conversation Modeling for Emotion Detection and Classification'}
{'en': 'This paper addresses the problem of modeling textual conversations and detecting emotions. Our proposed model makes use of 1) deep transfer learning rather than the classical shallow methods of word embedding ; 2) self-attention mechanisms to focus on the most important parts of the texts and 3) turn-based conversational modeling for classifying the emotions. The approach does not rely on any hand-crafted features or lexicons. Our model was evaluated on the data provided by the SemEval-2019 shared task on contextual emotion detection in text. The model shows very competitive results.', 'pt': 'Este artigo aborda o problema de modelagem de conversas textuais e detecção de emoções. Nosso modelo proposto faz uso de 1) aprendizado de transferência profunda em vez dos métodos clássicos superficiais de incorporação de palavras; 2) mecanismos de autoatenção para focar nas partes mais importantes dos textos e 3) modelagem conversacional baseada em turnos para classificar as emoções. A abordagem não depende de nenhum recurso ou léxico artesanal. Nosso modelo foi avaliado com base nos dados fornecidos pela tarefa compartilhada SemEval-2019 sobre detecção contextual de emoções em texto. O modelo mostra resultados muito competitivos.', 'ar': 'تتناول هذه الورقة مشكلة نمذجة المحادثات النصية واكتشاف العواطف. يستخدم نموذجنا المقترح 1) التعلم العميق للنقل بدلاً من الأساليب التقليدية الضحلة لتضمين الكلمات ؛ 2) آليات الانتباه الذاتي للتركيز على أهم أجزاء النصوص و 3) نمذجة المحادثة القائمة على الدور لتصنيف المشاعر. لا يعتمد النهج على أي ميزات أو معاجم مصنوعة يدويًا. تم تقييم نموذجنا بناءً على البيانات المقدمة بواسطة مهمة SemEval-2019 المشتركة حول اكتشاف المشاعر السياقية في النص. يظهر النموذج نتائج تنافسية للغاية.', 'fr': "Cet article aborde le problème de la modélisation des conversations textuelles et de la détection des émotions. Le modèle que nous proposons utilise 1) l'apprentissage par transfert profond plutôt que les méthodes classiques superficielles d'intégration de mots\xa0; 2) des mécanismes d'attention personnelle pour se concentrer sur les parties les plus importantes des textes et 3) une modélisation conversationnelle au tour par tour pour classer les émotions. L'approche ne repose pas sur des fonctionnalités ou des lexiques fabriqués à la main. Notre modèle a été évalué sur la base des données fournies par la tâche partagée SemeVal-2019 sur la détection contextuelle des émotions dans le texte. Le modèle montre des résultats très compétitifs.", 'es': 'Este artículo aborda el problema de modelar conversaciones textuales y detectar emociones. Nuestro modelo propuesto utiliza 1) el aprendizaje de transferencia profunda en lugar de los métodos superficiales clásicos de incrustación de palabras; 2) mecanismos de autoatención para centrarse en las partes más importantes de los textos y 3) el modelado conversacional por turnos para clasificar las emociones. El enfoque no se basa en ninguna característica o léxico hecho a mano. Nuestro modelo se evaluó a partir de los datos proporcionados por la tarea compartida SemeVal-2019 sobre detección de emociones contextuales en el texto. El modelo muestra resultados muy competitivos.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर पाठ्य वार्तालापों को मॉडलिंग करने और भावनाओं का पता लगाने की समस्या को संबोधित करता है। हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल 1) शब्द एम्बेडिंग के शास्त्रीय उथले तरीकों के बजाय गहरे हस्तांतरण सीखने का उपयोग करता है; 2) ग्रंथों के सबसे महत्वपूर्ण हिस्सों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने के लिए आत्म-ध्यान तंत्र और 3) भावनाओं को वर्गीकृत करने के लिए बारी-आधारित संवादी मॉडलिंग। दृष्टिकोण किसी भी हाथ से तैयार सुविधाओं या शब्दकोशों पर भरोसा नहीं करता है। हमारे मॉडल का मूल्यांकन पाठ में प्रासंगिक भावनाओं का पता लगाने पर SemEval-2019 साझा कार्य द्वारा प्रदान किए गए डेटा पर किया गया था। मॉडल बहुत प्रतिस्पर्धी परिणाम दिखाता है।', 'ja': '本稿では、テキスト会話のモデリングと感情の検出の問題について述べる。私たちの提案されたモデルは、1 ）単語埋め込みの古典的な浅い方法ではなく、深い転移学習を利用する。2 ）テキストの最も重要な部分に焦点を当てるための自己注目メカニズム、および3 ）感情を分類するためのターンベースの会話モデリングを利用する。このアプローチは、手作りの機能や辞書に依存していません。私たちのモデルは、SemEval -2019共有タスクが提供するテキスト内の文脈的感情検出に関するデータに基づいて評価されました。このモデルは非常に競争力のある結果を示しています。', 'zh': '本文解文本对建模检测情性。 臣等规模因1)深徙学,非经典浅层词嵌法也。 2)自注机制,专注文本之要,3)回合之对建模,施于情类。 其法不依一切工夫功能或词典。 臣等依SemEval-2019共享文本上下文情检之数。 其形甚竞争力。', 'ru': 'В данной работе рассматривается проблема моделирования текстовых разговоров и выявления эмоций. Наша предлагаемая модель использует 1) глубокое трансферное обучение, а не классические неглубокие методы встраивания слов; 2) механизмы самовнимания, чтобы сосредоточиться на наиболее важных частях текстов и 3) пошаговое моделирование разговора для классификации эмоций. Подход не зависит от каких-либо ручных функций или лексиконов. Нашу модель оценивали на основании данных, предоставленных совместной задачей SemEval-2019 по контекстному обнаружению эмоций в тексте. Модель показывает очень конкурентные результаты.', 'ga': 'Tugann an páipéar seo aghaidh ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le comhráite téacs a shamhaltú agus mothúcháin a bhrath. Baineann ár múnla molta úsáid as 1) foghlaim aistrithe domhain seachas modhanna clasaiceacha éadomhain le leabú focal; 2) meicníochtaí féin-aird chun díriú ar na codanna is tábhachtaí de na téacsanna agus 3) samhaltú comhrá bunaithe ar sheal chun na mothúcháin a rangú. Níl an cur chuige ag brath ar aon ghnéithe lámhdhéanta nó foclóir. Rinneadh ár múnla a mheas ar na sonraí a chuir tasc comhroinnte SemEval-2019 ar fáil maidir le mothúcháin comhthéacsúla a bhrath i dtéacs. Léiríonn an tsamhail torthaí an-iomaíoch.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány a szöveges beszélgetések modellezésének és az érzelmek felismerésének problémájával foglalkozik. Javasolt modellünk a szóbeágyazás klasszikus sekély módszerei helyett 1) deep transfer tanulást használ; 2) önfigyelemmel kísérő mechanizmusok a szövegek legfontosabb részeire és 3) fordulóalapú beszélgetési modellezés az érzelmek osztályozására. A megközelítés nem támaszkodik semmilyen kézzel készített funkcióra vagy lexikonra. Modellünket a SemEval-2019 közös feladat által szolgáltatott adatok alapján értékeltük a kontextuális érzelmek felismerésére szövegben. A modell nagyon versenyképes eredményeket mutat.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία ασχολείται με το πρόβλημα της μοντελοποίησης κειμένων συνομιλιών και της ανίχνευσης συναισθημάτων. Το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο χρησιμοποιεί την εκμάθηση βαθιάς μεταφοράς και όχι τις κλασικές ρηχές μεθόδους ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων. 2) μηχανισμοί αυτοπροσοχής για να εστιάσουν στα σημαντικότερα μέρη των κειμένων και 3) μοντελοποίηση συνομιλίας με βάση τη σειρά για την ταξινόμηση των συναισθημάτων. Η προσέγγιση δεν βασίζεται σε χειροποίητα χαρακτηριστικά ή λεξικά. Το μοντέλο μας αξιολογήθηκε με βάση τα δεδομένα που παρείχε η κοινή εργασία σχετικά με την ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων στο κείμενο. Το μοντέλο δείχνει πολύ ανταγωνιστικά αποτελέσματα.', 'ka': 'ეს დაახლობა ტექსტულ პარამეტრების მოდელეციის პრობლემა და ემოციების განახლების მისაღება. ჩვენი მოდელმა გამოყენება 1) ძალიან ძალიან ტრანსტრენსის სწავლებას, ვიდრე კლასიკური ძალიან კონფიკური სიტყვების შესაბამისი მეტისების 2) თავიდან აღმოჩენებული მექანიზებები ტექსტის უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი ნაწილად და 3) აღმოჩენებული კონტაქციო მოდელეციების კლასიფიკაციისთვის კონტუკურება. პროგრამა არ იყენებს პროგრამის შექმნილი ფუნქციები ან ლექსიკონები. ჩვენი მოდელი ტექსტის კონტექსტურალური ემოციების განსახულებაში SemEval-2019-ის გაყოფილი მონაცემების განსახულებაში იყო. მოდელეში ძალიან კონკენტებური შედეგები ჩვენებს.', 'it': "Questo articolo affronta il problema della modellazione delle conversazioni testuali e del rilevamento delle emozioni. Il nostro modello proposto fa uso di 1) deep transfer learning piuttosto che dei classici metodi superficiali di word embedding; 2) meccanismi di auto-attenzione per concentrarsi sulle parti più importanti dei testi e 3) modelli conversazionali a turni per classificare le emozioni. L'approccio non si basa su caratteristiche artigianali o lessici. Il nostro modello è stato valutato sulla base dei dati forniti dal compito condiviso SemEval-2019 sul rilevamento contestuale delle emozioni nel testo. Il modello mostra risultati molto competitivi.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente nagrinėjama tekstinių pokalbių modeliavimo ir emocijų aptikimo problema. Mūsų pasiūlytame modelyje naudojami 1) giliai perduodami mokymosi metodai, o ne klasikiniai paviršiniai žodžių įterpimo metodai; 2) savarankiško dėmesio mechanizmai, skirti daugiausia dėmesio svarbiausioms tekstų dalims ir 3) pokalbio modeliavimas, grindžiamas emocijų klasifikavimu. Metodas nepriklauso nuo jokių rankinių savybių ar leksikonų. Mūsų modelis buvo įvertintas remiantis duomenimis, kuriuos pateikė „SemEval-2019“ bendra užduotis dėl kontekstinių emocijų aptikimo tekste. The model shows very competitive results.', 'mk': 'Оваа вест го решава проблемот со моделирање на текстуалните разговори и детектирање на емоции. Нашиот предложен модел користи 1) длабоко трансферентно учење наместо класични плошки методи на вградување на зборови; 2) механизмите за самото внимание за фокусирање на најважните делови од текстовите и 3) обратно-базирано моделирање на разговорите за класификација на емоциите. Пристапот не се зависи од никакви рачно направени карактеристики или лексикони. Нашиот модел беше проценет на податоците обезбедени од SemEval-2019 заедничката задача за контекстуално детекција на емоции во текстот. The model shows very competitive results.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз мәтіндік сөйлесуді моделдеу және емоцияларды анықтау мәселесін шешу. Біздің келтірілген үлгіміз сөздерді ендіру әдістерін орнына 1) терең аудару үйренімізді қолданады. 2) мәтіннің ең маңызды бөлшектеріне назар аудару механизмтері және 3) емоцияларды классификациялау үшін аудару модельдеріне негізделген аудару модельдері. Бұл жағдай қол құрылған мүмкіндіктеріне не лексикандықтан тұрмайды. Біздің үлгіміз мәтіндегі емоцияларды анықтау үшін SemEval-2019 жалпы тапсырмасының берілген деректеріне бағалады. Бұл үлгі өте жақсы нәтижелерді көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini mengatasi masalah modeling perbualan teks dan mengesan emosi. Model kami yang diusulkan menggunakan 1) pembelajaran pemindahan yang dalam daripada kaedah klasik yang rendah untuk memasukkan perkataan; 2) mekanisme perhatian diri untuk fokus pada bahagian-bahagian yang paling penting teks dan 3) model perbualan berdasarkan pusingan untuk mengklasifikasi emosi. The approach does not rely on any hand-crafted features or lexicons.  Model kami telah diuji pada data yang diberikan oleh tugas berkongsi SemEval-2019 mengenai pengesan emosi kontekstual dalam teks. Model ini menunjukkan hasil yang sangat kompetitif.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ടെക്സ്ചൂള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രശ്നത്തെയും വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനെയും  നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് 1) ക്ലാസിക്കല്\u200d ശൂന്യമായ വാക്കുകളുടെ മാര്\u200dഗ്ഗങ്ങള്\u200dക് 2) എഴുത്തുകളിലെ ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഭാഗങ്ങളിലേക്ക് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കാനുള്ള സ്വയം ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന മെയിനിസ്റ്റുകള്\u200d, വികാ കൈകൊണ്ടുള്ള സ്വഭാവങ്ങളിലോ ലെക്സിക്സിനെയോ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നില്ല. ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തിയിരുന്നു. സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2019 വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പങ്കെടുത്ത ജോലിയില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dത്തിരിക മോഡല്\u200d വളരെ മത്സരമുള്ള ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jindirizza l-problema tal-immudellar ta’ konversazzjonijiet testwali u l-identifikazzjoni ta’ emozzjonijiet. Il-mudell propost tagħna jagħmel użu minn 1) tagħlim ta’ trasferiment profond minflok metodi klassiċi baxxi ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem; 2) mekkaniżmi ta’ awtonomija li jiffokaw fuq il-partijiet l-aktar importanti tat-testi u 3) mudell ta’ konverżjoni bbażat fuq id-dawra għall-klassifikazzjoni tal-emozzjonijiet. L-approċċ ma jiddependix fuq karatteristiċi jew lexicons maħduma bl-idejn. Il-mudell tagħna ġie evalwat fuq id-dejta pprovduta mis-SemEval-2019 kompitu kondiviż dwar id-detezzjoni tal-emozzjonijiet kuntestwali fit-test. Il-mudell juri riżultati kompetittivi ħafna.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь текст ярилцлагын загвар, сэтгэл хөдлөлийг олох асуудлыг харуулдаг. Бидний санал өгсөн загвар нь 1) гүн гүнзгий шилжүүлэлтийн суралцах суралцах үйл ажиллагааг хэлбэрээр ашигладаг. 2) сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хамгийн чухал хэсэг дээр анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлэх өөртөө анхаарлаа хандуулах механизм болон 3) сэтгэл хөдлөлийг анхаарлаа бий болгох ярилцлагын модель. Энэ арга барилгын бүтээгдэхүүн эсвэл лексиконууд дээр хамаагүй. Бидний загвар нь SemEval-2019 оны мэдээллийн тухай текст дэх сэтгэл хөдлөлийн мэдээллийн тухай хуваалцагдсан ажил юм. Загвар нь маш өрсөлдөг үр дүнг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Denne papiret adresserer problemet med modellering av tekstsamtaler og oppdaging av følelser. Vårt foreslått modell gjer bruk av 1) dype overføringslar i staden for klassiske sålmodighetene for ordinnbygging. 2) selvmerkingsmekanismar for å fokusera på dei viktigste delene av teksten og 3) omvendte konversjonsbaserte modeller for å klassifisera følelsene. Tilnærminga er ikkje tilbakekalla på nokon handsamla funksjonar eller leksikon. Modellen vårt vart evaluert på data som er gitt av den delte oppgåva for semiEval-2019 om kontekstære emosjonsoppdaging i teksten. Modellen viser svært konkurrentiv resultat.', 'pl': 'Artykuł porusza problem modelowania rozmów tekstowych i wykrywania emocji. Proponowany przez nas model wykorzystuje 1) głębokie uczenie się transferowe zamiast klasycznych płytkich metod osadzania słów; 2) mechanizmy własnej uwagi skupiające się na najważniejszych częściach tekstów oraz 3) turowe modelowanie konwersacyjne do klasyfikacji emocji. Podejście to nie opiera się na żadnych ręcznie wykonanych funkcjach ani leksykonach. Nasz model został oceniony na podstawie danych dostarczonych przez wspólne zadanie SemEval-2019 dotyczące kontekstowego wykrywania emocji w tekście. Model pokazuje bardzo konkurencyjne wyniki.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare abordează problema modelării conversațiilor textuale și detectării emoțiilor. Modelul nostru propus utilizează 1) învățarea profundă a transferului mai degrabă decât metodele clasice superficiale de încorporare a cuvintelor; 2) mecanisme de auto-atenție pentru a se concentra asupra celor mai importante părți ale textelor și 3) modelare conversațională turn-based pentru clasificarea emoțiilor. Abordarea nu se bazează pe caracteristici sau lexicoane realizate manual. Modelul nostru a fost evaluat pe baza datelor furnizate de sarcina comună SemEval-2019 privind detectarea emoțiilor contextuale în text. Modelul arată rezultate foarte competitive.', 'so': 'Warqadan wuxuu ku qoraa dhibaatada sameynta hadallada qoraalka iyo garashada fikrada. Tusaale la soo jeeday ayaa isticmaalaya 1) waxbarashada aad u dheer ee ka badala qaababka kaliga ah ee hadalka ku qoran; 2) meymisyo iskuulka ah oo ku kalsoonaan karta qaybaha ugu muhiimsan ee qoraalka iyo 3) tusaale u dhigashada qaabilaada si loo fasaxo fikrada. The approach does not rely on any hand-crafted features or lexicons.  Tusaale ahaan waxaa lagu qiimeeyay macluumaadka ay soo saaray SemEval-2019 shaqo la qaybsaday oo ku saabsan aqoonsashada fikrada joogtada ah. Tusaale ahaan waxaa laga muujiyaa matooyin aad u adag.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir rješava problem modeliranja tekstualnih razgovora i otkrivanja emocija. Naš predloženi model koristi 1) duboko učenje transfera umjesto klasične plitke metode uključenja reči; 2) mehanizami samopouzdanja da se fokusiraju na najvažnijim dijelovima teksta i 3) razgovorno modeliranje na okretu za klasifikaciju emocija. Pristup se ne oslanja na nikakve karakteristike ili leksikone. Naš model je procijenjen podacima podataka podataka podijeljenih od strane semiEval-2019 zajedničkog zadatka o kontekstualnom otkrivanju emocija u tekstu. Model pokazuje vrlo konkurentne rezultate.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats behandlar problemet med att modellera textkonversationer och upptäcka känslor. Vår föreslagna modell använder sig av 1) deep transfer learning snarare än de klassiska ytliga metoderna för ordbäddning; 2) självuppmärksamhetsmekanismer för att fokusera på de viktigaste delarna av texterna och 3) vändbaserad konversationsmodellering för att klassificera känslorna. Metoden bygger inte på några handgjorda funktioner eller lexikon. Vår modell utvärderades utifrån data från SemEval-2019 delade uppgift om kontextuell känslodetektering i text. Modellen visar mycket konkurrenskraftiga resultat.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ පැත්තක් පැත්තක් කතා කරන්න සහ හ හැඟීම් හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙනවා. අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු මොඩල් එක පාවිච්චි කරන්නේ 1) ගොඩක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විදිය 2) ස්වයංග්\u200dරහය අවධාන පද්ධතියක් ලිපිත වලින් වැදගත් කොටස් වලින් අවධානය කරන්න සඳහා ස්වයංග්\u200dරහය සඳහා වාර්තාව අත්තර හොයාගත්ත හැකියාවක් හැකියාවක් හැකියාවක් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ නැහැ. අපේ මොඩේල් විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ සෙම්වෙල්-2019 වල සාමාන්\u200dය භාවිතාවක් හොයාගන්න පැත්තේ තියෙන දත්තේ ග මොඩල් එක පෙන්වන්නේ ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතිකාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක්.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ٹیکسٹل کی باتوں اور احساساتوں کی آزمائش کے مسئلہ سے دریافت کرتا ہے۔ ہمارے مقرر کردہ مدل 1) عمیق ترنسفور کی تعلیم کو استعمال کرتا ہے کلاسیک گلے طریقے کے بغیر، 2) اپنا اظہار مکانیسم ٹیکسٹ کے سب اہم حصوں پر تمرکز کرنے کے لئے اور 3) احساسات کو کلاس دینے کے لئے پھیر لینے کے لئے بغیر بوسیدہ گفتگو کی موڈلینگ۔ یہ طریقہ کسی ہاتھ کے پیدا کئے ہوئے شخصیت یا لکسیون پر اعتماد نہیں کرتا۔ ہمارا موڈل ٹیکسٹیل-2019 کے ذریعے سیم Eval-2019 کے ذریعے تفصیل احساسات شناسایی کے ذریعے مطابق دیئے گئے ہیں. موڈل بہت مساوی نتائج دکھاتا ہے.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் மாதிரி உரை உரையாடல் மற்றும் உணர்வுகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் பிரச்சனையை குறிக்கிறது. எங்கள் முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி 1 பயன்படுத்துகிறது, கிளாசிக்கான முழுமையான வார்த்தை உள்ளிடும் முறைமைகளை  2) self-attention mechanisms to focus on the most important parts of the texts and 3) turn-based conversational modeling for classifying the emotions.  இந்த நெருக்கம் எந்த கையால் செய்யப்பட்ட பண்புகளையும் அல்லது குழப்பமையும் சார்ந்ததில்லை. SemEval-2019 வழங்கப்பட்ட தரவுகள் மாதிரி மதிப்பிடப்பட்டது உரையில் உள்ள நிலையான உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பில் பகிர்ந்த பணி மாதிரி மிகவும் competitive முடிவுகளை காட்டுகிறது.', 'uz': "Ushbu qogʻoz matn muloqatlarni modellash va hissiyalarni aniqlash muammolarini tanlang. Mavzulik modelimiz 1- dan yuqori o'rganishni o'rganishdan o'rganishga o'rganish mumkin. 2) Matnning eng muhim qismlariga o'zgartirish o'zimni o'zgartirish uchun o'zimni o'zgartirish mechanislari. Bu usulni qo'llab qo'llangan xususiyatlarni amalga oshmaydi. Bizning modelimizni matnning qidirish uchun SemEval-2019 bilan bir xil hissiyotni aniqlashga qayta ishni qiymat qildi. Model juda rivojlanish natijalarini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đề cập đến vấn đề phát hiện kết cấu và phát hiện cảm xúc. Người mẫu chúng tôi đã đề nghị sử dụng 1) học sâu để chuyển nhượng hơn là những phương pháp nhào lộn cổ điển để khắc chữ. 2) cơ chế tự chú ý tập trung vào những phần quan trọng nhất trong các văn bản và 3) thiết kế cuộc đối thoại dựa trên để phân loại cảm xúc. Phương pháp này không dựa trên tính chất hay ngôn ngữ. Mẫu của chúng tôi đã được đánh giá dựa trên dữ liệu được cung cấp bởi nhiệm vụ chung của Semkhai-thẩm 9 về việc phát hiện cảm xúc ngữ cảnh trong văn bản. Mô hình này cho thấy kết quả rất cạnh tranh.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия разглежда проблема с моделирането на текстови разговори и откриването на емоции. Предлаганият ни модел използва 1) дълбоко трансферно обучение, а не класическите плитки методи за вграждане на думи; 2) механизми за самовнимание, за да се фокусира върху най-важните части от текстовете и 3) базирано на смени разговорно моделиране за класифициране на емоциите. Подходът не разчита на ръчно изработени функции или лексикони. Нашият модел беше оценен въз основа на данните, предоставени от споделената задача за откриване на контекстуални емоции в текст. Моделът показва много конкурентни резултати.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir rješava problem modeliranja tekstualnih razgovora i otkrivanja emocija. Naš predloženi model koristi 1) duboko učenje prijenosa umjesto klasične plitke metode prijenosa riječi; 2) mehanizami samopouzdanja da se fokusiraju na najvažnijim dijelovima teksta i 3) razgovorno modeliranje na okretu za klasifikaciju emocija. Pristup se ne oslanja na nikakve karakteristike ili leksikone koje su napravljene rukama. Naš model je procijenjen podacima podataka podijeljenih od strane podijeljenog zadatka SemEval-2019 o kontekstualnom otkrivanju emocija u tekstu. Model pokazuje vrlo konkurentne rezultate.', 'da': 'Denne artikel omhandler problemet med at modellere tekstsamtaler og detektere følelser. Vores foreslåede model gør brug af 1) dyb overførsel læring snarere end de klassiske overfladiske metoder til ordindlejring; 2) selvopmærksomhedsmekanismer til at fokusere på de vigtigste dele af teksterne og 3) turn-baseret samtalemodellering til klassificering af følelser. Tilgangen er ikke afhængig af nogen håndlavede funktioner eller leksikoner. Vores model blev evalueret ud fra data fra SemEval-2019 delte opgave om kontekstuel følelsesdetektering i tekst. Modellen viser meget konkurrencedygtige resultater.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel behandelt het probleem van het modelleren van tekstuele gesprekken en het detecteren van emoties. Ons voorgestelde model maakt gebruik van 1) deep transfer learning in plaats van de klassieke ondiepe methoden van woord embedding; 2) zelfaandachtsmechanismen om te focussen op de belangrijkste delen van de teksten en 3) turn-based conversational modellering voor het classificeren van de emoties. De aanpak is niet afhankelijk van handgemaakte functies of lexicons. Ons model werd geëvalueerd op de gegevens die door de SemEval-2019 gedeelde taak over contextuele emotie detectie in tekst werden verstrekt. Het model laat zeer concurrerende resultaten zien.', 'ko': '본고는 텍스트 대화 모델링과 감정 검측 문제를 토론하였다.우리가 제시한 모델은 1) 고전적인 얕은 단어 삽입 방법이 아닌 깊이 있는 이동 학습을 이용했다.2) 자기주의 메커니즘은 텍스트의 가장 중요한 부분을 주목하는 데 사용되고, 3) 화륜을 바탕으로 하는 대화 모델링은 정서를 분류하는 데 사용된다.그 방법은 수동으로 만든 기능이나 어휘에 의존하지 않는다.우리의 모델은SemEval-2019 텍스트 언어 환경 정서 검측 공유 임무가 제공한 데이터에 근거하여 평가한 것이다.이 모델은 매우 경쟁력 있는 결과를 보여 준다.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag befasst sich mit dem Problem der Modellierung von Textgesprächen und der Erkennung von Emotionen. Unser vorgeschlagenes Modell verwendet 1) Deep Transfer Learning anstatt die klassischen flachen Methoden der Worteinbettung; 2) Selbstaufmerksamkeitsmechanismen zur Fokussierung auf die wichtigsten Textteile und 3) rundenbasierte Konversationsmodellierung zur Klassifizierung der Emotionen. Der Ansatz beruht nicht auf handgefertigten Merkmalen oder Lexikonen. Unser Modell wurde anhand der Daten der gemeinsamen SemEval-2019 Aufgabe zur kontextuellen Emotionserkennung im Text ausgewertet. Das Modell zeigt sehr wettbewerbsfähige Ergebnisse.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mengatasi masalah model percakapan tekstual dan mendeteksi emosi. Model kami yang diusulkan menggunakan 1) pengajaran transfer dalam daripada metode klasik rendah untuk memasukkan kata; 2) mekanisme perhatian diri untuk fokus pada bagian-bagian yang paling penting dari teks dan 3) model konversasi berbasis untuk mengklasifikasi emosi. pendekatan tidak bergantung pada fitur atau leksikon yang dibuat tangan. Our model was evaluated on the data provided by the SemEval-2019 shared task on contextual emotion detection in text.  Modelnya menunjukkan hasil yang sangat kompetitif.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ مشکل مدل\u200cسازی مکالمات متن و کشف احساسات را دریافت می\u200cکند. مدل پیشنهاد ما از یادگیری عمیق ۱) استفاده می\u200cکند به جای روش\u200cهای کوچک کلاسیکی از جمع کلاسیک کلاسیک. 2) مکانیسم خودتوجه برای تمرکز روی مهمترین بخش\u200cهای متن\u200cها و ۳) مدل\u200cسازی مکانیسم\u200cسازی بر روی کلاس\u200cسازی احساسات است. این دستور بر هیچ ویژه\u200cای یا لکیسون\u200cهای دستی استفاده نمی\u200cکند. مدل ما بر روی داده\u200cهایی که توسط کارهای نیم Eval-2019 در مورد شناسایی احساسات در متن قرار داده\u200cاند ارزش داده شده است. مدل نتایج بسیار رقابتی را نشان می دهد.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linahusu tatizo la kutengeneza mazungumzo ya kimasa na kutambua hisia. Mradi wetu unapendekezwa unatumia 1) kuhamisha kujifunza kwa kina zaidi ya njia za kawaida za maneno yanayoingia; 2) Mifumo ya kujitegemea kujikita kwenye sehemu muhimu zaidi ya maandishi na 3) inayogeuza mifano ya mazungumzo kwa ajili ya kutangaza hisia hizo. Hatua hiyo haitegemea vipengele vyote vilivyomo mikononi mwa mikono wala sumu. Mradi wetu ulitathmiriwa juu ya taarifa zilizotolewa na SemEval-2019 ilishirikishwa na kazi ya kutambua hisia za sasa kwa ujumbe wa maandishi. Mfano unaonyesha matokeo makubwa ya ushindani.', 'tr': 'Bu häzir metin söhbetlerini modelleýän we duýgyny tanap meselesini çözýär. Biziň teklip eden nusgamyz 1) gaty gabdalyk öwrenişini klasik gabdalyk yöntemlerden ýerine ullanýar; 2) Senedlerin iň wajyp bölegine üns bermek üçin özüne üns berme mekanizmalary we 3) duýgyny klasifikasyň üçin yzyna taýýarlanan taryşma modelleri. Bu ýagdaý elimden saýlanan hatlary ýa-da leksiklere ynanmaýar. Biziñ modelimiz SemEval-2019 tarapyndan berilen hatlaryň bardygyna çykyldy. Bu nusga örän ýaryşykly netijeleri görkezýär.', 'af': 'Hierdie papier adreseer die probleem van modellering van tekstuele gesprekke en besluit emosies. Ons voorgestelde model maak gebruik van 1) diep oordrag leer in plaas van die klassieke skaal metodes van woord inbêring; 2) self-aandag mekanisme om op die mees belangrikste dele van die tekste te fokus en 3) draai-gebaseerde konversasionale modeling vir die emosies klassifiseer. Die toegang vertrou nie op enige hand-gebreekte funksies of leksies nie. Ons model is geevalueer op die data verskaf deur die SemEval-2019 gedeelde taak op contextual emosie-beskrywing in teks. Die model vertoon baie mededingsresultate.', 'am': 'This paper addresses the problem of modeling textual conversations and detecting emotions.  የተዘጋጀው ሞዴሌያችን 1) ከክላሲካዊ የቃላት ጠንካራ ስርዓት ይልቅ ጥልቅ ትምህርትን ለመለወጥ ይጠቅማል፡ 2) የራሳቸውን ማስታወቂያ የጽሑፎች እና የ3 አስፈላጊዎቹ ክፍሎች ላይ ለመጠየቅ እና የአሳብቃዊ ምሳሌ ለመዘርጋት ነው፡፡ ይዞታዊው በእጁ በተመዘጋጀ ባሕሮች ወይም ስክሲ ላይ አይደገፍም፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን በጽሑፍ የተሰኘውን የSemEval-2019 የሥርዓት ስብሰባ ማግኘት ላይ ተካክሎአል፡፡ ሞዴል በጣም ተቃዋሚ ፍሬዎችን ያሳየዋል።', 'sq': "Kjo letër trajton problemin e modelimit të bisedimeve tekstuale dhe zbulimit të emocioneve. Modeli ynë i propozuar përdorë 1) mësimin e transferit të thellë në vend të metodave klasike të sipërfaqe të përfshirjes së fjalëve; 2) mekanizmat e vetë-vëmendjes për t'u përqëndruar në pjesët më të rëndësishme të teksteve dhe 3) modelim bisedimesh me bazë të kthesës për klasifikimin e emocioneve. Përqafimi nuk mbështetet në asnjë karakteristikë apo leksikon të ndërtuar me dorë. Modeli ynë u vlerësua mbi të dhënat e dhëna nga detyra e përbashkët SemEval-2019 mbi zbulimin e emocioneve kontekstuale në tekst. Modeli tregon rezultate shumë konkurruese.", 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը լուծում է տեքստային հաղորդակցությունների մոդելավորման և զգացմունքների հայտնաբերման խնդիրը: Մեր առաջարկած մոդելը օգտագործում է 1) խորը փոխանցման ուսումնասիրությունը, ոչ թե բառերի ներգրավման դասական մակերեսային մեթոդները: 2) ինքնաուշադրության մեխանիզմներ, որոնք կենտրոնանան տեքստների ամենակարևոր մասերին և 3) շրջանակի հաղորդակցման մոդելներ զգացմունքների դասավորման համար: Մոտեցումը կախված չէ ոչ մի ձեռքով ստեղծված հատկանիշներից կամ լեքսիկոններից: Մեր մոդելը գնահատվել է այն տվյալների վրա, որոնք տրամադրվել են տեքստում գտնվող "ՍեմԷվալ 2019" համագործակցած հանձնարարության մեջ կոնտեքստային զգացմունքների հայտնաբերման մասին: Մոդելը ցույց է տալիս շատ մրցակցության արդյունքներ:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা মডেলিং টেক্সুয়াল আলোচনা এবং অনুভূতি সনাক্ত করার সমস্যা তুলে ধরেছে। আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল ১ ব্যবহার করেছে) ক্লাসিক্যাল শালী পদ্ধতির চেয়ে গভীর পরিবর্তে শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করেছে; ২) আত্মমনোযোগ ব্যবস্থা এই অনুভূতিকে বিশ্লেষণের জন্য প্রধান অংশ এবং তিনের প্রতি মনোযোগ আকর্ষণ করার জন্য। এই পদক্ষেপ কোন হাতে কাজ করা বা লেক্সিক্সিনের উপর নির্ভর করে না। আমাদের মডেল লেখায় সেমইভাল-২০১৯ প্রদান করা তথ্যের উপর মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে। The model shows very competitive results.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt məlumatları modelləşdirmək və duyguları keşfetmək problemlərini çəkir. Bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz modellərimiz 1) yüksək transfer öyrənməsini klasik küçük sözlərin istifadəsindən istifadə edir. 2) textlərin ən vacib parçalarına və 3) emosiyalarını dəyişdirmək üçün özünün təhlükəsizlik mehanizmiləri. Yaxınlıq elə bir əl yaratdığı xüsusiyyətlərə və elçilərə təvəkkül etmirdi. Bizim modelimiz SemEval-2019 ilə mətndə məlumatlar barəsində müxtəlif emosiyalar keşfetməsi haqqında paylaşdığı məlumatlar haqqında değerlendirildi. Model çox münafiq sonuçlarını göstərir.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir rješava problem modeliranja tekstualnih razgovora i otkrivanja emocija. Naš predloženi model koristi 1) duboko učenje transfera umjesto klasične plitke metode uključenja riječi; 2) mehanizami samopouzdanja da se fokusiraju na najvažnijim dijelovima teksta i 3) razgovorno modeliranje na okretu za klasifikaciju emocija. Pristup se ne oslanja na nikakve osobine ili leksikone koje su napravljene rukama. Naš model je procijenjen podacima podataka podijeljenih od strane podijeljenog zadatka SemEval-2019 o kontekstualnom otkrivanju emocija u tekstu. Model pokazuje vrlo konkurentne rezultate.', 'ca': "Aquest article aborda el problema de modelar converses textuals i detectar emocions. El nostre model proposat utilitza 1) aprenentatge profund de transfer ència en comptes dels mètodes clàssics baixos d'incorporació de paraules; 2) mecanismes d'autoatenció per centrar-se en les parts més importants dels textos i 3) modelar conversacions basades en girs per classificar les emocions. L'enfocament no es basa en cap característica manual ni en cap lexicó. El nostre model va ser avaluat sobre les dades proporcionades per la tasca compartida SemEval-2019 sobre la detecció de les emocions contextuals en text. El model mostra resultats molt competitius.", 'cs': 'Tento článek se zabývá problematikou modelování textových konverzací a detekcí emocí. Náš navržený model využívá 1) hluboké transferové učení spíše než klasické mělké metody vkládání slov; 2) mechanismy sebepozornosti pro zaměření se na nejdůležitější části textů a 3) tahové modelování konverzace pro klasifikaci emocí. Tento přístup nespoléhá na žádné ručně vytvořené funkce nebo slovníky. Náš model byl vyhodnocen na základě dat poskytnutých sdíleným úkolem SemEval-2019 o kontextové detekci emocí v textu. Model ukazuje velmi konkurenční výsledky.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa käsitellään tekstikeskustelujen mallintamista ja tunteiden havaitsemista koskevaa ongelmaa. Ehdotetussa mallissa hyödynnetään 1) syvänsiirtooppimista pikemminkin kuin klassisia matalia sanaupotusmenetelmiä. 2) itsepalvelumekanismit, joilla keskitytään tekstien tärkeimpiin osiin ja 3) vuoropohjainen keskustelumallinnus tunteiden luokitteluun. Lähestymistapa ei perustu käsintehtyihin ominaisuuksiin tai sanastoihin. Malliamme arvioitiin SemEval-2019 -jaetun tehtävän tuottaman aineiston pohjalta kontekstuaalisesta tunteentunnistuksesta tekstissä. Malli osoittaa erittäin kilpailukykyisiä tuloksia.', 'et': 'Käesolev töö käsitleb tekstivestluste modelleerimise ja emotsioonide tuvastamise probleemi. Meie kavandatud mudel kasutab 1) sügavülekandeõpet, mitte klassikalisi madalaid sõna manustamise meetodeid; 2) enesetähelepanu mehhanismid keskenduda tekstide olulisematele osadele ja 3) pöördepõhine vestlusmodelleerimine emotsioonide klassifitseerimiseks. Lähenemine ei tugine käsitsi valmistatud funktsioonidele ega leksikonidele. Meie mudelit hinnati SemEval-2019 jagatud ülesande andmete põhjal kontekstuaalse emotsioonide tuvastamise kohta tekstis. Mudel näitab väga konkurentsivõimelisi tulemusi.', 'sk': 'Prispevek obravnava problem modeliranja besedilnih pogovorov in odkrivanja čustev. Naš predlagani model uporablja 1) globoko prenosno učenje namesto klasičnih plitvih metod vključevanja besed; 2) mehanizmi samopozornosti za osredotočanje na najpomembnejše dele besedil in 3) obratno modeliranje pogovora za klasifikacijo čustev. Pristop se ne opira na ročno izdelane funkcije ali leksikone. Naš model smo ocenili na podlagi podatkov, ki jih je predložila skupna naloga SemEval-2019 o kontekstualnem zaznavanju čustev v besedilu. Model kaže zelo konkurenčne rezultate.', 'ha': "@ info Ana amfani da misalinmu wanda aka buƙata da shi yana da amfani da 1) mai shifo-shifo mai girma ko kuma da hanyõyin cire-na-nau'i na cikin kalma; 2) Shiryati masu kammala masu muhimma zuwa masu muhimmin matsayin littattafai da 3) da misalin mazaɓa da muhimman da aka danne shi ga fasalin ayukan ayuka. Bã ya dõgara ga wata cũta, kuma bã a cũtarwa. An ƙaddara shirinmu a kan data da aka ba da SemEl-2019 mai shirin aikin da aka nuna wa hisãbin da ke cikin littãfi. The model shows very competitive results.", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתייחס לבעיה של הדוגמה לשיחות טקסטיות ולגלות רגשות. המודל המוצע שלנו משתמש 1) למידת העברה עמוקה במקום השיטות השטחיות הקלאסיות של קישום מילים; 2) מנגנוני תשומת לב עצמית כדי להתמקד בחלקים החשובים ביותר של הטקסטים ו הגישה לא תלויה בשום תכונות או לקסיקונים שנעשו ידיים. המודל שלנו הוערך על הנתונים שנוספים על ידי המשימה המשותפת של SemEval-2019 על גילוי רגשות קונטקסטיים בטקסט. המודל מראה תוצאות תחרותיות מאוד.', 'jv': 'Gambar iki diputara perkarahan kanggo nggambar obaraning nggambar textual lan ngêngguna emphasi. Awak dhéwé Perintah sing beraksi yang nguasai 1) Ndolet kuwi nggawe barang kelas kuwi tindang nggawe barang kelas kuwi padha. 2) Ngawe Perintah sing beraksi kanggo ingkang nggawe barang langgar sing luwih ingkang nggambar textil lan 3) Ngawe Modelan sing basa gambar aturan kanggo ngerasakno sing dirampakan. Ndoleh kuwi ora bisa mlebu, ditambah apat kanggo sabanjuré manut karo leksi. model kita dipatensi nggambar data sing nyenggawe diuntingi podho semebal-2011 nggawe task mengko contextual emphasis detection in text. Model kuwi sawetara dadi sing paling apik.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་མ་དབྱིབས་ཡི་གེ་གཏམ་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་དང་སེམས་ཚོར་རྟོགས་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་གཏོང་བ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཟབ་པ་(1)སྤྲོད་ལམ་ལུགས་རྒྱུན་གྱི་ལམ་ལུགས 2) རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་སྤྱད་ནས་ཡི་གེའི་གལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་ཤས་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏོང་ཐབས་ལམ། འདི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་བ་ཡིན་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་དང་གཟུགས་རིས་གང་ཡང་རུང་མེད་པས། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཞིབ་བྱས་ན་SemEval-2019་གིས་ཡིག་གེ་ནང་གི་སྐྱེལ་རིམ་གནས་ཚུལ་རྟོགས་བཤེར་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ མ་དབུགས་འདིས་སྐྱེས་བ་སྐྱེས་པའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'MoonGrad at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Ensemble BiRNNs for Contextual Emotion Detection in Dialogues', 'es': 'MoonGrad en la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2019: Conjunto de BIRNNs para la detección de emociones contextuales en diálogos', 'ar': 'MoonGrad في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: فرقة BiRNNs للكشف عن المشاعر السياقية في الحوارات', 'pt': 'MoonGrad no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Combine BiRNNs para Detecção de Emoções Contextuais em Diálogos', 'fr': 'MoonGrad au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Ensemble BirNNS pour la détection contextuelle des émotions dans les dialogues', 'ja': 'MoonGrad at SemEval -2019 Task 3: Ensemble BiRNNs for Contextual Emotion Detection in Dialogues', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 टास्क 3 पर MoonGrad: संवादों में प्रासंगिक भावना का पता लगाने के लिए Ensemble BiRNNs', 'ru': 'MoonGrad на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Ансамбль BiRNN для контекстного обнаружения эмоций в диалогах', 'zh': 'MoonGrad at SemEval-2019 д»»3:дёЉдё‹ж–‡жѓ…жЈЂBIRNN', 'ga': 'MoonGrad ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Ensemble BiRNNs chun Mothúchán Comhthéacsúil a Bhrath in Idirphlé', 'ka': 'MoonGrad at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble BiRNN for Contextual Emotion Detection in Dialogs', 'hu': 'MoonGrad a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: BiRNN együttes a kontextuális érzelmek felismerésére a párbeszédekben', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Σύνολο για την ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων στο πλαίσιο των διαλόγων', 'it': 'MoonGrad a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble BiRNN per la rilevazione delle emozioni contestuali nei dialoghi', 'kk': 'Ай көңіл- 2019 3- тапсырмасындағы 3- тапсырма: Контексті көңіл көңіл анықтау үшін Диалогтардың көңіл- көңіл анықтау үшін қолданылатын BiRNN', 'lt': 'MoonGrad at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble BiRNNs for Contextal Emotion Detection in Dialogues', 'mk': 'MoonGrad на SemEval-2019 задача 3: Ensemble BiRNNs за детекција на контекстни емоции во дијалози', 'ms': 'MoonGrade at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble BiRNN for Contextual Emotion Detection in Dialogues', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ജോലിയിലെ ചന്ദ്രന്ഗ്രാഡ്', 'mt': 'MoonGrad f’SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble BiRNNs for Contextual Emotion Detection in Dialogues', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble BiRNN for Contextual Emotion Detection in Dialogues', 'no': 'MoonGrad at semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3: Ensemble BiRNN for kontekstlege følelser i dialogvindauge', 'pl': 'MoonGrad w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Zespół BiRNN do kontekstowego wykrywania emocji w dialogach', 'ro': 'MoonGrad la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: BiRNN-uri de ansamblu pentru detectarea emoțiilor contextuale în dialoguri', 'sr': 'MoonGrad na semiEval-2019 Task 3: Uhvatljivi BiRNN za konstrukciju kontekstalnih emocija u dijalogima', 'si': 'MoonGrad at Half-2019 Job 3: Ensemble BiRNN for Contextal Emotion Detection in Conversations', 'so': 'MoonGrad at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble BiRNs for Contextual Emotion Detection in Dialog', 'sv': 'MoonGrad på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Ensemble BiRNN för kontextuell känslodetektering i dialoger', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 3: உள்ளமைந்த உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான சந்திரக் குறிப்பு', 'ur': 'سیم اول-2019 ٹاکس 3 میں چاند گرڈ: سیم اول-2019 ٹاکس: سیم اول-۲۰۱۹ ٹاکس کے لئے سیم ایموٹیون شناسایے کے لئے بین آرن', 'vi': 'MoonGrad ở SemEvl-2009 Task 3: Ensemble BiRNNs for Contextual Emotion trinh thám trong Dialogo', 'uz': 'Vazifani 3: SemEval- 2019 Task 3: Ensemble BiRNs for Contextual Emotion Detection in Dialogs', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Ансамбъл за откриване на контекстуални емоции в диалозите', 'nl': "MoonGrad bij SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Ensemble BiRNN's voor Contextuele Emotiedetectie in Dialogen", 'da': "MoonGrad på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Ensemble BiRNN'er til kontekstuel følelsesdetektion i dialoger", 'hr': 'MjeseGrad na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 3: Uhvatljivi BiRNN za otkrivanje kontekstalnih emocija u dijalogima', 'de': 'MoonGrad an der SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Ensemble BiRNNs zur kontextuellen Emotionserkennung im Dialog', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019의 MoonGrad 퀘스트 3: 대화 중 상하문 감정 검측의 통합 BIRN', 'id': 'MoonGrade di SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble BiRNN for Contextual Emotion Detection in Dialogues', 'fa': 'MoonGrad at semiEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble BiRNN for Contextual Emotion Detection in Dialogues', 'sw': 'Mwezi Grad katika SemEval-2019 Task 3: Utafiti wa BiRNS kwa ajili ya Kuchunguza Tambulio la Kihusika katika Dialoga', 'tr': 'MoonGrad at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble BiRNNs for Contextual Emotion Detection in Dialogues', 'af': 'MoonGrad by SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 3: Ensemble BiRNN vir Kontekslike Emotie Opdekking in Dialoog', 'sq': 'MoonGrad në SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble BiRNNs for Contextual Emotion Detection in Dialogues', 'am': 'ጨረቃGrad at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble BiRNs for Contextual Emotion Detection in Dialog', 'hy': 'Դադար', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2019 কাজ ৩-এ চাঁদের গ্রাড: ডায়ালগে কন্ট্রেক্সটুয়াল ইমোটেশন ডিটেক্টরের জন্য বায়ার্নামেল বার্এনএন', 'az': 'Ay-Grad at semiEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble BiRNN for Contextual Emotion Detection in Dialogs', 'ca': 'MoonGrad a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble BiRNNs for Contextual Emotion Detection in Dialogues', 'et': 'MoonGrad SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 3: Ensemble BiRNN kontekstuaalsete emotsioonide tuvastamiseks dialoogides', 'fi': 'MoonGrad SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 3: BiRNN-yhtye kontekstuaalisten tunteiden havaitsemiseksi dialogeissa', 'cs': 'MoonGrad na SemEval-2019 Úkol 3: Soubor BiRNN pro kontextovou detekci emocí v dialogu', 'bs': 'MjeseGrad na pola Evala-2019 Task 3: Uhvatljivi BiRNN za otkrivanje kontekstalnih emocija u dijalogima', 'ha': 'Label', 'sk': 'MoonGrad na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Ensemble BiRNN za zaznavanje kontekstualnih čustev v dialogih', 'jv': 'MunnGrad at semiinval-2011 task 3: ENsemble BiDNNs for contextual emuation detection in Dialogs', 'bo': 'MoonGrad at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble BiRNNs for Contextual Emotion Detection in Dialogues', 'he': 'MoonGrad at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Ensemble BiRNNs for Contextual Emotion Detection in Dialogues'}
{'en': 'When reading I do n’t want to talk to you any more, we might interpret this as either an angry or a sad emotion in the absence of context. Often, the utterances are shorter, and given a short utterance like Me too !, it is difficult to interpret the emotion without context. The lack of prosodic or visual information makes it a challenging problem to detect such emotions only with text. However, using contextual information in the dialogue is gaining importance to provide a context-aware recognition of linguistic features such as emotion, dialogue act, sentiment etc. The SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext competition provides a dataset of three-turn dialogues labeled with the three emotion classes, i.e. Happy, Sad and Angry, and in addition with Others as none of the aforementioned emotion classes. We develop an ensemble of the recurrent neural model with character- and word-level features as an input to solve this problem. The system performs quite well, achieving a microaveraged F1 score (F1) of 0.7212 for the three emotion classes.', 'es': 'Al leer «No quiero hablar más contigo», podemos interpretar esto como una emoción de enfado o triste en ausencia de contexto. A menudo, los enunciados son más cortos y se les da un enunciado corto como «¡Yo también!» , es difícil interpretar la emoción sin contexto. La falta de información prosódica o visual hace que sea un problema difícil detectar tales emociones solo con texto. Sin embargo, el uso de información contextual en el diálogo está ganando importancia para proporcionar un reconocimiento sensible al contexto de las características lingüísticas como la emoción, el acto de diálogo, el sentimiento, etc. La competencia EmoContext de la Tarea 3 de SemEval 2019 proporciona un conjunto de datos de diálogos de tres turnos etiquetados con las tres clases de emociones. Es decir, Feliz, Triste y Enojado, y además con Otros como ninguna de las clases de emociones antes mencionadas. Desarrollamos un conjunto del modelo neuronal recurrente con características a nivel de caracteres y palabras como insumo para resolver este problema. El sistema funciona bastante bien, logrando una puntuación F1 micropromediada (F1μ) de 0.7212 para las tres clases de emociones.', 'ar': 'عند قراءة "لا أريد أن أتحدث إليكم بعد الآن" ، قد نفسر هذا على أنه إما مشاعر غاضبة أو حزينة في غياب السياق. غالبًا ما تكون الأقوال أقصر ، ومن الصعب تفسير المشاعر بدون سياق نظرًا لفظًا قصيرًا مثل "أنا أيضًا!" إن نقص المعلومات المرئية أو النثرية يجعل من الصعب اكتشاف مثل هذه المشاعر بالنص فقط. ومع ذلك ، فإن استخدام المعلومات السياقية في الحوار يكتسب أهمية لتوفير التعرف الواعي للسياق على السمات اللغوية مثل العاطفة ، وعمل الحوار ، والمشاعر وما إلى ذلك. فصول العاطفة ، مثل سعيد ، حزين وغاضب ، بالإضافة إلى الآخرين ليسوا من فئات المشاعر المذكورة أعلاه. نقوم بتطوير مجموعة من النموذج العصبي المتكرر بميزات على مستوى الحرف والكلمة كمدخل لحل هذه المشكلة. يعمل النظام بشكل جيد للغاية ، حيث حقق درجة F1 متدرجة (F1μ) تبلغ 0.7212 لفئات العاطفة الثلاثة.', 'fr': "Lorsque nous lisons «\xa0Je ne veux plus te parler\xa0», nous pouvons interpréter cela comme une émotion de colère ou de tristesse en l'absence de contexte. Souvent, les énoncés sont plus courts et reçoivent un énoncé court comme «\xa0Moi aussi\xa0!\xa0» , il est difficile d'interpréter l'émotion sans contexte. Le manque d'informations prosodiques ou visuelles rend difficile la détection de telles émotions uniquement avec du texte. Cependant, l'utilisation d'informations contextuelles dans le dialogue gagne en importance pour fournir une reconnaissance contextuelle des caractéristiques linguistiques telles que l'émotion, le dialogue, l'acte, le sentiment, etc. Le concours SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext fournit un ensemble de données de dialogues à trois tours étiquetés avec les trois classes d'émotions, C'est-à-dire Happy, Sad and Angry, et en plus avec les Autres comme aucune des classes d'émotions susmentionnées. Nous développons un ensemble du modèle neuronal récurrent avec des caractéristiques au niveau des caractères et des mots comme entrée pour résoudre ce problème. Le système fonctionne assez bien, atteignant un score F1 micromoyenné (F1μ) de 0,7212 pour les trois classes d'émotions.", 'pt': 'Ao ler “não quero mais falar com você”, podemos interpretar isso como uma emoção de raiva ou tristeza na ausência de contexto. Muitas vezes, os enunciados são mais curtos e, dado um enunciado curto como “Eu também!”, é difícil interpretar a emoção sem contexto. A falta de informações prosódicas ou visuais torna um problema desafiador detectar tais emoções apenas com texto. No entanto, o uso de informações contextuais no diálogo está ganhando importância para fornecer um reconhecimento sensível ao contexto de características linguísticas, como emoção, ato de diálogo, sentimento etc. classes de emoção, ou seja, Feliz, Triste e Irritado, e além disso com Outros como nenhuma das classes de emoção acima mencionadas. Desenvolvemos um conjunto do modelo neural recorrente com recursos de nível de caractere e palavra como entrada para resolver esse problema. O sistema funciona muito bem, alcançando uma pontuação F1 micromédia (F1μ) de 0,7212 para as três classes de emoção.', 'ja': '「もうあなたとは話したくない」と読むとき、私たちはこれを文脈がない場合の怒りまたは悲しい感情のいずれかと解釈するかもしれません。 多くの場合、発話は短く、「私も！」のような短い発話を考えると、文脈なしで感情を解釈することは難しい。 プロソディックまたは視覚的情報の欠如は、テキストのみでそのような感情を検出することを困難な問題としている。 しかし、対話における文脈情報の使用は、感情、対話行為、感情などの言語的特徴の文脈認識を提供するために重要性を増している。 SemEval 2019タスク3 EmoContextコンテストでは、3つの感情クラス、すなわちHappy、Sad、Angryとラベル付けされた3ターンのダイアログのデータセットを提供します。また、上記の感情クラスのいずれでもありません。 この問題を解決するための入力として、文字レベルとワードレベルの特徴を持つ再帰ニューラルモデルのアンサンブルを開発します。 このシステムはかなり良好に機能し、３つの感情クラスのマイクロ平均Ｆ１スコア（ Ｆ１ μ ） ０ ． ７ ２ １ ２を達成する。', 'zh': '当读至"吾不欲复与汝言",当以无上下文解为怒悲也。 凡语短,且给定如"我亦!此语,难以无上下文解情。 少韵视息,使文本检为一挑战性。 然而用之于言上下文信之于言(情,行之于言,情之)者上下文知之益重。 SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext竞供一三轮对数集,此标有三情之类,即乐,悲怒,此外别有他人,无此情类。 开一循环神经模样,其字符单词特徵输。 其统颇善,三情之微弧形F1得分(F1μ)为0.7212。', 'hi': 'जब "मैं आपसे और अधिक बात नहीं करना चाहता" पढ़ता हूं, तो हम इसे संदर्भ की अनुपस्थिति में एक नाराज या दुखद भावना के रूप में व्याख्या कर सकते हैं। अक्सर, कथन छोटे होते हैं, और "मैं भी!" जैसे एक छोटे से उच्चारण को देखते हुए, संदर्भ के बिना भावनाओं की व्याख्या करना मुश्किल है। प्रोसोडिक या दृश्य जानकारी की कमी केवल पाठ के साथ ऐसी भावनाओं का पता लगाने के लिए एक चुनौतीपूर्ण समस्या बनाती है। हालांकि, संवाद में प्रासंगिक जानकारी का उपयोग भाषाई विशेषताओं जैसे कि भावना, संवाद अधिनियम, भावना आदि की संदर्भ-जागरूक मान्यता प्रदान करने के लिए महत्व प्राप्त कर रहा है। SemEval 2019 टास्क 3 EmoContext प्रतियोगिता तीन भावना वर्गों के साथ लेबल किए गए तीन-बारी के संवादों का एक डेटासेट प्रदान करती है, यानी हैप्पी, सैड और एंग्री, और इसके अलावा अन्य लोगों के साथ उपर्युक्त भावना वर्गों में से कोई भी नहीं है। हम इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए एक इनपुट के रूप में चरित्र- और शब्द-स्तर की विशेषताओं के साथ आवर्तक तंत्रिका मॉडल का एक पहनावा विकसित करते हैं। सिस्टम काफी अच्छी तरह से प्रदर्शन करता है, तीन भावना वर्गों के लिए 0.7212 के एक माइक्रोएवरेज्ड एफ 1 स्कोर (एफ 1μ) को प्राप्त करता है।', 'ga': 'Agus “Ní theastaíonn uaim labhairt leat a thuilleadh”, d’fhéadfaimis é seo a léirmhíniú mar mhothú feargach nó brónach in éagmais comhthéacs. Go minic, bíonn na cainteanna níos giorra, agus má thugtar focal gairid cosúil le “Mise freisin!”, is deacair an mothúchán a léirmhíniú gan comhthéacs. Is fadhb dhúshlánach é mothúcháin den sórt sin a bhrath trí théacs amháin mar gheall ar an easpa faisnéise prósóideach nó amhairc. Mar sin féin, tá tábhacht ag baint le húsáid faisnéise comhthéacsúla san idirphlé le haitheantas atá feasach ar an gcomhthéacs a sholáthar do ghnéithe teangeolaíocha mar mhothúchán, gníomh idirphlé, meon srl. ranganna mothúcháin, i.e. Sásta, Brónach agus Feargach, agus ina theannta sin le Daoine Eile mar nach bhfuil aon cheann de na ranganna mothúcháin thuasluaite. Forbróimid ensemble den mhúnla néarach athfhillteach le gnéithe ar leibhéal na gcarachtar agus na bhfocal mar ionchur chun an fhadhb seo a réiteach. Feidhmíonn an córas go measartha maith, ag baint amach scór F1 micrea-mheánach (F1μ) de 0.7212 do na trí rang mothúchán.', 'ru': 'Читая «Я больше не хочу с вами разговаривать», мы могли бы интерпретировать это как злую или грустную эмоцию в отсутствие контекста. Часто высказывания короче, и, учитывая короткое высказывание типа «Я тоже!», трудно интерпретировать эмоции без контекста. Отсутствие просодической или визуальной информации делает сложной проблему обнаружения таких эмоций только с текстом. Однако использование контекстуальной информации в диалоге приобретает все большее значение для обеспечения контекстуального распознавания лингвистических особенностей, таких как эмоции, диалог, чувства и т. д. Конкурс EmoContext Задачи 3 от SemEval 2019 предоставляет набор данных из трех витков диалогов, помеченных тремя классами эмоций, т.е. Счастливым, Грустным и Злым, и в дополнение к Другим, как ни один из вышеупомянутых классов эмоций. В качестве входных данных для решения этой задачи мы разрабатываем ансамбль рекуррентной нейронной модели с характеристиками на уровне символов и слов. Система функционирует достаточно хорошо, достигая микроусредненного балла F1 (F1μ) 0,7212 для трех классов эмоций.', 'el': 'Όταν διαβάζουμε "Δεν θέλω να σου μιλήσω πια", μπορεί να το ερμηνεύσουμε είτε ως θυμωμένο είτε θλιβερό συναίσθημα ελλείψει πλαισίου. Συχνά, οι ομιλίες είναι μικρότερες, και δίνονται μια σύντομη ομιλία όπως "Κι εγώ!", Είναι δύσκολο να ερμηνευθεί το συναίσθημα χωρίς πλαίσιο. Η έλλειψη προσωδικών ή οπτικών πληροφοριών καθιστά ένα δύσκολο πρόβλημα να εντοπιστούν τέτοια συναισθήματα μόνο με κείμενο. Ωστόσο, η χρήση πληροφοριών περιβάλλοντος στο διάλογο αποκτά σημασία για την παροχή μιας συνειδητής αναγνώρισης γλωσσικών χαρακτηριστικών όπως το συναίσθημα, η πράξη διαλόγου, το συναίσθημα κ.λπ. Ο διαγωνισμός παρέχει ένα σύνολο δεδομένων από διαλόγους τριών στροφών που επισημαίνονται με τις τρεις κατηγορίες συναισθημάτων, δηλ. Ευτυχισμένος, λυπημένος και θυμωμένος, και επιπλέον με τους άλλους ως καμία από τις προαναφερθείσες τάξεις συναισθημάτων. Αναπτύσσουμε ένα σύνολο του επαναλαμβανόμενου νευρικού μοντέλου με χαρακτηριστικά σε επίπεδο χαρακτήρων και λέξεων ως εισαγωγή για την επίλυση αυτού του προβλήματος. Το σύστημα αποδίδει αρκετά καλά, επιτυγχάνοντας μια μικρομέση βαθμολογία F1 (F1 σε 0.7212 για τις τρεις κατηγορίες συναισθημάτων.', 'hu': 'Amikor azt olvassuk, hogy "Nem akarok többé beszélni veled", lehet, hogy ezt vagy dühös vagy szomorú érzelemként értelmezzük kontextus hiányában. Gyakran a kifejezések rövidebbek, és rövidebbek, mint például "Én is!", Nehéz értelmezni az érzelmet kontextus nélkül. A prozódikus vagy vizuális információk hiánya miatt kihívást jelent az ilyen érzelmek csak szöveggel történő felismerése. Azonban a kontextuális információk felhasználása a párbeszédben egyre fontosabb annak érdekében, hogy kontextustudatos felismerést biztosítson a nyelvi jellemzők, mint az érzelem, a párbeszéd aktus, az érzelem stb. A SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContent verseny három fordulatos párbeszédek adatkészletét biztosítja a három érzelmi osztály, azaz Boldog, Szomorú és Dühös, és továbbá Másokkal, mint a fent említett érzelmi osztályok egyike sem. A visszatérő neurális modell együttesét fejlesztjük ki karakter- és szószintű jellemzőkkel a probléma megoldásához. A rendszer elég jól teljesít, elérve a három érzelmi osztályban 0,7212 mikroátlagos F1 pontszámot (F1).', 'ka': "როდესაც კითხვა 'მე არ მინდა გასაუბროთ მეტი' შეგვიძლია ამას გარგებთ როგორც წესია ან ცოტა ემოცია, კონტექსტის არსებობაში. მხოლოდ, სიტყვები უფრო კიდევ კიდევ კიდევ კიდევ სიტყვები, როგორც 'მე ასევე!' ეს ძალიან რთულია ემოციონის კონტექსტის გარეშე. პროცემიური ან ვიზუალური ინფორმაციის არსებობა იქნება საშუალოდ პრობლემა, რომელიც ამ ემოციების განახლება მხოლოდ ტექსტით. მაგრამ, კონტექსტური ინფორმაციის გამოყენება დიალოგიში იქნება მნიშვნელობა, რომ ინფორმაციის ინფორმაცია, როგორც ემოცია, დიალოგიური ქექტი, სენტიმენტი და ა.შ. SemEval 2019 მოქმედება 3 ემოკონტექსტური კონტექტი ემოკონტექსტური ინფორმაცია სამი და დამატებით სხვებით, როგორც არაფერი ემოციონის კლასში. ჩვენ განვითარებთ რეკურენტური ნეიროლური მოდელის სიტყვების და სიტყვების განსაზღვრებით, როგორც მონაცემა ამ პრობლემას გადაუწყვება. სისტემა ძალიან კარგი გავამუშავება, მიკროცემეტური F1 წერტილი (F1) 0,7212-ის სამი ემოციონის კლასებისთვის.", 'it': 'Quando leggiamo "Non voglio più parlarti", potremmo interpretarlo come un\'emozione arrabbiata o triste in assenza di contesto. Spesso, le espressioni sono più brevi, e date una breve pronuncia come \'Anch\'io!\', è difficile interpretare l\'emozione senza contesto. La mancanza di informazioni prosodiche o visive rende difficile rilevare tali emozioni solo con il testo. Tuttavia, l\'utilizzo di informazioni contestuali nel dialogo sta acquisendo importanza per fornire un riconoscimento contestuale di caratteristiche linguistiche come emozione, atto di dialogo, sentimento, ecc. Il concorso EmoContest SemEval 2019 Task 3 fornisce un set di dati di dialoghi a tre turni etichettati con le tre classi di emozioni, vale a dire Happy, Sad e Angry, e in aggiunta con gli Altri come nessuna delle classi emotive di cui sopra. Sviluppiamo un insieme del modello neurale ricorrente con caratteristiche a livello di carattere e parola come input per risolvere questo problema. Il sistema funziona abbastanza bene, raggiungendo un punteggio F1 micromedio (F1) di 0,7212 per le tre classi di emozioni.', 'kk': 'Оқу үшін "мен сіздермен бірнеше сөйлесуді қаламаймын" деп ойлаймыз, біз бұл мәліметті көңіл немесе көңіл көңіл көңіл көңіл емес деп ойлаймыз. Көпшілік сөйлемелер қысқартылып, \'Мен де\' деген қысқарт сөйлемелерді береді. мәселесіз емоцияларды түсіндіру қиын. Просодикалық немесе визуалдық мәліметтер жоқ бұл емоцияларды тек мәтіннен анықтау үшін қиын мәселелер болады. Бірақ диалогтың контексті мәліметін қолдану - емоциялық, диалог әрекеттері, сезім және т. б. секілді мәліметтерді көзгерту үшін мәлімет диалогтарының деректер жинағын көрсетеді. 2019 жыл бөлімінің 3. тапсырмасы Эмоциялық класс деген үш түрлі диалогтар, т Басқалармен қосымша, өзгертілген емоциялық класының бір-бірі болмайды. Біз бұл мәселеді шешу үшін қайталанатын невралдық үлгісін таңбалар мен сөз деңгейіндегі мүмкіндіктері ретінде құрамыз. Жүйе өте жақсы жұмыс істейді, үш емоциялық класс үшін микроорташа F1 нүктесін (F1) жеткізу үшін 0,7212.', 'mk': 'Кога ќе читаме "повеќе не сакам да зборувам со вас", можеме да го интерпретираме ова како лута или тажна емоција во отсуството на контекст. Често, изразите се пократки, и дадени кратки изрази како "И јас!". it is difficult to interpret the emotion without context.  Недостатокот на прозодични или визуелни информации го прави предизвикувачкиот проблем да се детектираат вакви емоции само со текст. Сепак, употребата на контекстни информации во дијалогот добива важност за обезбедување на контекстно-свесно признавање на јазичните карактеристики како емоции, дијалог акт, чувства итн. Конкурсијата за Емоконтекст на задачата SemEval 2019 3 обезбедува набор на податоци од триобратни дијалози означени со трите класи на емоции, т.е. Сре И покрај другите како никој од наведените часови на емоции. Развиваме ансембл на рецидентниот нервен модел со карактеристички и зборни карактеристики како влог за решавање на овој проблем. The system performs quite well, achieving a microaveraged F1 score (F1 ) of 0.7212 for the three emotion classes.', 'ml': "'ഞാന്\u200d ഇനി നിങ്ങളോട് സംസാരിക്കാന്\u200d ആഗ്രഹിക്കുന്നില്ല എന്ന് വായിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d നമുക്കിത് വിശദീകരിക്കാം, കോപ്പില്\u200d  എപ്പോഴും വാക്കുകള്\u200d കുറഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്നു. എന്നെപ്പോലെയുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d ചുരുക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടാണ്. പ്രോസോഡിക്ക് അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d കാഴ്ച വിവരങ്ങളുടെ കുറവാണെങ്കില്\u200d അത് വാക്കുകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് വാക്കു എന്നാലും ഡയലോഗിലെ നിലവിലുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d, വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d, ഡയലോഗ് കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d എന്നിവയ്ക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. സെമ്മെവാല്\u200d 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3 എമോക്ടെക്സ്റ് പിന്നെ മറ്റുള്ളവരോടൊപ്പം മുമ്പ് വികാരങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒന്നുമില്ലാത്ത മറ്റുള്ളവര്\u200dക്കും. We develop an ensemble of the recurrent neural model with character- and word-level features as an input to solve this problem.  സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d വളരെ നന്നായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു, മൈക്രോവേര്\u200dവേര്\u200dഡ് എഫ്\u200c1 സ്കോര്\u200d പ്രാപിക്കുന്നു. എഫ്\u200c1) 0. 7212-ല്\u200d", 'ms': 'Apabila membaca \'Saya tidak mahu bercakap dengan anda lagi\', kita mungkin menerangkan ini sebagai sama ada emosi marah atau sedih dalam ketiadaan konteks. Biasanya perkataan-perkataan itu lebih pendek, dan dikatakan dengan perkataan yang singkat seperti "Aku juga". ia sukar untuk menerangkan emosi tanpa konteks. Kekurangan maklumat prosodik atau visual menjadikannya masalah mencabar untuk mengesan emosi seperti ini hanya dengan teks. Namun, menggunakan maklumat kontekstual dalam dialog semakin penting untuk menyediakan pengenalan konteks-sedar ciri-ciri bahasa seperti emosi, tindakan dialog, perasaan dll. Persaingan SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext menyediakan set data dialog tiga pusingan yang ditabel dengan tiga kelas emosi, iaitu bahagia, sedih dan marah,  and in addition with Others as none of the aforementioned emotion classes.  Kami mengembangkan kumpulan model saraf berulang dengan ciri-ciri dan aras perkataan sebagai input untuk menyelesaikan masalah ini. Sistem berjalan dengan baik, mencapai skor F1 (F1) bernilai 0.7212 untuk tiga kelas emosi.', 'lt': 'Skaitydami "Aš nebenoriu su jumis kalbėti", galėtume tai aiškinti kaip pykstančią ar liūdną emociją, jei nėra konteksto. Dažnai žodžiai trumpesni ir trumpas žodis kaip "Aš taip pat!". sunku suprasti emocijas be konteksto. The lack of prosodic or visual information makes it a challenging problem to detect such emotions only with text.  Tačiau dialogo kontekstinės informacijos naudojimas tampa vis svarbesnis siekiant užtikrinti sąmoningą kalbinių savybių, pavyzdžiui, emocijų, dialogo akto, jausmų ir t. t., pripažinimą kontekste. - ir kartu su kitais kaip nė viena iš pirmiau minėtų emocijų klasių. Kad išspręstume šią problem ą, mes sukuriame pasikartojančio nervinio modelio kompleksą su charakteristikų ir žodžių lygio savybėmis. Sistema veikia gana gerai ir trijų emocijų klasių F1 balas (F1) yra 0,7212.', 'no': 'Når eg lesar « eg vil ikkje snakke med deg lenger », kan vi tolka dette som enten ein sink eller ein trist følelse i utrykken av kontekst. Ofte er uttalene kortere, og gitt ein kort uttale som "Eg også!" er det vanskeleg å tolka følelsen utan kontekst. Manglansen av prosodiske eller visuelle informasjon gjer det ein vanskeleg problem å finna slike følelser berre med tekst. Med å bruka kontekstinformasjon i dialogvindauget kan imidlertid gå viktig for å gjera e in kontekst-merke gjenkjenning av lingviske funksjonar som emosjon, dialoghandling, sentiment osv. På semiEval 2019-oppgåva 3 EmoContext-konkurransen gjer ein dataset med tre omvendte dialogar med dei tre emosjonsklassene, dvs. Happy, Sad and Angry, I tillegg til andre som ingen av dei førehandsviste emosjonsklassene. Vi utviklar eit ensembel av den gjentaande neuralmodellen med teikn- og ord- nivå- funksjonar som inndata for å løysa dette problemet. Systemet utfører ganske godt, og fører til ein mikrogjennomsnittleg F1- poeng (F1) av 0,7212 for de tre emosjonsklassene.', 'pl': 'Czytając "Nie chcę już z tobą rozmawiać", możemy interpretować to jako złe lub smutne uczucie w braku kontekstu. Często wypowiedzi są krótsze i dają krótkie wypowiedzi, takie jak "Ja też!", Trudno interpretować emocje bez kontekstu. Brak informacji prozodycznych czy wizualnych sprawia, że trudnym problemem jest wykrywanie takich emocji tylko za pomocą tekstu. Jednak wykorzystanie informacji kontekstowych w dialogu zyskuje znaczenie dla zapewnienia kontekstowego rozpoznawania cech językowych, takich jak emocje, akt dialogu, sentyment itp. Konkurs SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext zapewnia zbiór danych trzykrotnych dialogów oznaczonych trzema klasami emocji, tj. Szczęśliwym, Smutnym i Wściekłym, i dodatkowo z Innymi jako żadna z wyżej wymienionych klas emocji. Opracowujemy zespół powtarzającego się modelu neuronowego z cechami na poziomie znaków i słów jako wejście do rozwiązania tego problemu. System działa dość dobrze, osiągając mikrośredni wynik F1 (F1 przewaga 0,7212 dla trzech klas emocji.', 'sr': "Kada čitamo 'ne želim više razgovarati sa vama', mogli bismo ovo interpretirati kao ljut ili tužna emocija u odsustvu konteksta. Često su reči kraći, i dali su kratke reči poput mene. teško je interpretirati emocije bez konteksta. Nedostatak prosodijskih ili vizualnih informacija čini izazovnim problemom otkrivanja takvih emocija samo tekstom. Međutim, korištenje kontekstualnih informacija u dijalogu dobija je važnost da bi omogućilo prepoznavanje jezičkih karakteristika kao što su emocije, dijalogski akt, sentiment itd. Konkurencija EmoContext 3. zadatak u polovici 2019. pružala je kompleks podataka o trookrenim dijalogima označenim tri klase emocija, tj. srećna, tužna i ljutna, Osim toga, sa drugima kao nijedna od predviđenih klasa emocija. Razvijemo kompleks rekonstruiranog neuralnog modela sa karakterskim i rečnim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakter Sistem obavlja prilično dobro, postižeći mikropredan rezultat F1 od 0,7212 za tri klase emocija.", 'mn': '"Би чамд илүү ярихыг хүсэхгүй байна" гэдгийг унших үед бид үүнийг санаагүй, эсвэл гунигтай сэтгэл хөдлөл гэж илэрхийлж болно. Ихэнхдээ хэлэлцээг бага болж "Би ч мөн" гэсэн богино хэлэлцээтэй. сэтгэл хөдлөлийг нөхцөл байдлаар ойлгох нь хэцүү. Харин сэтгэл хөдлөлийг зөвхөн текстэй олж мэдэх нь хэцүү асуудал болгодог. Гэвч диалогт орчин үеийн мэдээллийг ашиглах нь хэлний сэтгэл хөдлөл, диалог үйл ажиллагаа, сэтгэл хөдлөл, сэтгэл хөдлөл гэх мэт сэтгэл хөдлөл, мэдрэмж гэх мэт сэтгэл хөдлөл ойлгохын тулд үнэ цэнэтэй болдог. Өмнөх сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хичээлийн хэсэг гэж бусдын хамт. Бид энэ асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд дахин дахин дахин сэтгэл зүйн загварын загварыг харьцаа, үг хэмжээтэй харьцаа болгон хөгжүүлдэг. Энэ систем маш сайн үйлдэл хийдэг. Энэ 3 сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хичээл дээр 0.7212-ын бичил дундаж F1 оноо (F1) хүртэл.', 'si': "'මට තවත් ඔයාට කතා කරන්න ඕනේ නෑ කියලා කියලා කියලා' අපිට පුළුවන් මේක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති විදිහට කියන්න පුළුවන් කියල සමහර වෙලාවට, කියන්නේ වචනය වඩා කොටස් වෙනවා, ඒ වගේම 'මාත් කියලා' වගේම කොටස් වචනයක් දෙනවා! ඒක අමාරුයි සංවේදනයක් නැති හැඟීමක් තේරුම් ගන්න. ප්\u200dරොසොඩික් නැත්තම් දිහා තොරතුරු නැත්තම් ඒක ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි පාළුවන් විතරයි. නමුත්, සංවාදයේ සංවාදයේ සම්බන්ධ තොරතුරු භාෂාවික විශේෂතාවක් වගේ සංවාදය සඳහා සංවාදය, සංවාදය, ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂතාවක් සඳහා සංවාදය සඳහා සංවාදය සඳහා තුන්වෙ ඒ වගේම අනිත් අනිත් අනිත් අනිත් අනිත් අනිත් අවශ්\u200dයාත්මක විදියට කිසිම දේවල් වලින් නැහැ. අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් අක්ෂර- සහ වචන- තත්වය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්ත පද්ධතිය හොඳට කරනවා, මයික්\u200dරෝමාන්\u200dයය F1 ස්කෝර් (F1) වල 0.7212 වලින් හැඟීමක් තුනක් විදියට ලැබෙනවා.", 'ro': 'Când citim "Nu vreau să mai vorbesc cu tine", am putea interpreta acest lucru fie ca o emoție furioasă, fie ca o emoție tristă în absența contextului. Adesea, cuvintele sunt mai scurte, și date o cuvintă scurtă precum "Și eu!", E greu să interpretezi emoţia fără context. Lipsa informațiilor prosodice sau vizuale face ca aceste emoții să fie detectate doar cu text să fie o problemă dificilă. Cu toate acestea, utilizarea informațiilor contextuale în dialog câștigă importanță pentru a oferi o recunoaștere conștientă de context a caracteristicilor lingvistice precum emoția, actul de dialog, sentimentul etc. Concursul SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext oferă un set de date de dialoguri în trei rânduri etichetate cu cele trei clase emoționale, adică fericit, trist și furios, și în plus cu Alții ca niciuna dintre clasele emoționale menționate mai sus. Dezvoltăm un ansamblu al modelului neural recurent cu caracteristici de nivel de caracter și cuvânt ca o intrare pentru a rezolva această problemă. Sistemul funcționează destul de bine, obținând un scor F1 micromediat (F1) de 0,7212 pentru cele trei clase emoționale.', 'so': "Marka a an akhrinayo 'Dooni maayo inaan mar dambe kugula hadlo', waxan waxaannu u fasiri karnaa inay tahay mid cadhaysan ama fikrada caloolxumo la'aan marka aan xaalad la'aan. Hadalkuna waa soo gaaban yihiin sidaydaan ahay. waa adag tahay in la turjumo fikrada iyadoon la'aan. Lagaadiga macluumaadka hore ama aragga ayaa dhibaato adag in la ogaado fikradaas oo kaliya qoraal. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, isticmaalka macluumaadka joogtada ah e e dialogka waxaa ka faa’iido ah in la siiyo aqoonsiga luuqadda, sida emotion, dialogue, xisaabta, etc. Qasabka SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext wuxuu bixiyaa koox kamid ah samooyin saddex jeer ah oo la qoray saddexda fasalka emotion, tusaale ahaan faraxsan, Sadax iyo Angry, iyo qaar kale oo kale sida aan midkoodna fasalka hore u sheegin. Waxaynu korinnaa tusaale neurada ah oo soo socda oo ay leedahay xaraf- iyo heer hadal si ay u xalliyaan dhibaatadan. Tirku wuxuu si wanaagsan u shaqeeyaa, wuxuuna gaadhaa koorasyada isqabashada F1 (F1) ee 0.7212.", 'mt': 'When reading \'I don\'t want to talk to you any more\', we might interpret this as either an angry or a sad emotion in the absence of context.  Ħafna drabi, il-frażijiet huma iqsar, u mogħtija frażi qasira bħal "Me ukoll!". huwa diffiċli li tiġi interpretata l-emozzjoni mingħajr kuntest. In-nuqqas ta’ informazzjoni prosodika jew viżwali jagħmilha problem a ta’ sfida li jiġu identifikati emozzjonijiet bħal dawn biss bit-test. Madankollu, l-użu ta’ informazzjoni kuntestwali fid-djalogu qed jikseb importanza biex jiġi pprovdut rikonoxximent konxju mill-kuntest ta’ karatteristiċi lingwistiċi bħall-emozzjoni, l-att ta’ djalogu, is-sentiment e ċċ. Il-kompetizzjoni SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext tipprovdi sett ta’ dejta ta’ djalogi bi tliet dawriet ittikkettati mat-tliet klassijiet ta’ emozzjonijiet, jiġifieri Happy, Sad and Angry, ) u flimkien ma’ Oħrajn bħala l-ebda waħda mill-klassijiet emozzjonali msemmija hawn fuq. Aħna niżviluppaw ensemble tal-mudell newrali rikorrenti b’karatteristiċi fil-livell tal-karattru u l-kelma bħala input biex issolvi din il-problema. Is-sistema tagħmel tajjeb ħafna, billi tikseb punteġġ F1 mikromedjat (F1 ) ta’ 0.7212 għat-tliet klassijiet emozzjonali.', 'sv': 'När vi läser "Jag vill inte prata med dig längre" kan vi tolka detta som antingen en arg eller en sorglig känsla i avsaknad av sammanhang. Ofta är yttrandena kortare och ges ett kort yttrande som "Jag också!", Det är svårt att tolka känslorna utan sammanhang. Bristen på prosodisk eller visuell information gör det till ett utmanande problem att upptäcka sådana känslor endast med text. Men att använda kontextuell information i dialogen blir allt viktigare för att ge ett kontextmedvetet erkännande av språkliga drag som känslor, dialogakt, sentiment etc. SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContent-tävlingen ger en dataset av tre-svängsdialoger märkta med de tre känsloklasserna, dvs Happy, Sad och Angry, och dessutom med Andra som ingen av de ovannämnda känsloklasserna. Vi utvecklar en ensemble av den återkommande neurala modellen med tecken- och ordnivåfunktioner som input för att lösa detta problem. Systemet presterar ganska bra och uppnår en mikrogenomsnittlig F1 poäng (F1) på 0,7212 för de tre känsloklasserna.', 'ur': 'جب پڑھنے لگے کہ میں آپ سے کچھ بھی بات نہ کرنا چاہتا ہوں تو ہم اس کا تعبیر کرسکتے ہیں یا غصہ یا غصہ کا احساس حاصل ہونے کے بعد. اور بہت ہی کم باتیں ہیں اور بہت ہی تھوڑی باتیں کہیں گے جیسے مجھے بھی احساسات کو بغیر متصلہ تعبیر کرنے کا مشکل ہے. پیروسوڈیک یا تصویز معلومات کی ناکامی یہ ایک مشکل ہے کہ یہ احساسات صرف متن کے ساتھ پہچان سکیں۔ لیکن، سیم اول 2019 ٹاکس ۳ ایمو کنٹکسٹ مسابقه تین حوادث کالسوں کے ساتھ لکھے ہوئے تین حوادث کے دائٹ سٹے کا ذریعہ حاصل کرتا ہے، اور دوسروں کے ساتھ اس طرح جو پہلے سے گزر چکی ہے احساس کلاس میں سے کوئی نہیں ہے۔ ہم نے اس مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کے لئے دوبارہ تکرار نائرول موڈل کا ایک انٹامبل پیدا کیا ہے۔ سیسٹم بہت اچھی طرح عمل کرتا ہے، ایک میکرومتوسط F1 اسکور (F1) کو پہنچاتا ہے جو 0.7212 کی تین احساس کلاس کے لئے ہے۔', 'ta': '\'நான் இன்னும் உங்களுடன் பேச விரும்பவில்லை\' படிக்கும் போது, நாம் இதை ஒரு கோபமாக அல்லது ஒரு துக்கமான உணர்வு இல்லை என்று பொருட "என்னைப் போன்ற ஒரு வார்த்தையும் மிகவும் குறைவானதாகும். உணர்வு சூழல் இல்லாமல் விளக்கம் செய்வது கடினமானது. The lack of prosodic or visual information makes it a challenging problem to detect such emotions only with text.  ஆனால், உரையாடலில் உள்ள தற்போதைய தகவல்களை பயன்படுத்தி மூன்று உணர்வு, உரையாடல் செயல், உணர்வு மற்றும் உணர்வு போன்ற மொழிக்குறிப்பின் உணர்வு, உணர்வு மற்றும் உணர்வு போன்ற மொழிக்குறிப்பை கொடுக்க முக்கியமானது. செ மற்றும் மற்றவர்களுடன் முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட உணர்வு வகுப்புகளில் எதுவும் இல்லை இந்த பிரச்சனையை தீர்க்க ஒரு உள்ளீட்டாக நாம் மீண்டும் நிகழும் புதிய மாதிரியை உருவாக்குகிறோம். மூன்று உணர்வு வகுப்பு', 'uz': '"Men sizга бошқа гаплашни хоҳламайман" деганда, биз буни мос ёки хавфсирчи ҳис этиб тушунмоғимиз мумкин. Шу боисдан Пайғамбаримиз (с. а. в.) қуйидагиларни айтадилар: «Шаҳидлик омонатдан бошқа нарса эмас. hissiyotni o\'rganish qiyin edi. Proodik yoki ko\'rinishi haqida maʼlumot yoʻq bu hissiyotni faqat matn bilan aniqlash muammolari qiladi. However, using contextual information in the dialogue is gaining importance to provide a context-aware recognition of linguistic features such as emotion, dialogue act, sentiment etc. The SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext competition provides a dataset of three-turn dialogues labeled with the three emotion classes, i.e. Happy, Sad and Angry, Va boshqa bir xil sinfning o\'zida hech qanday ma\'lum. @ info: whatsthis Name', 'vi': 'Khi đọc\'Tôi không muốn nói chuyện với các bạn nữa\', chúng ta có thể coi đây là một cảm xúc t ức giận hay buồn trong khi không có bối cảnh. Thông thường, những lời nói ngắn hơn, và có một lời ngắn như: "Tôi cũng vậy." Thật khó để diễn tả cảm xúc không có ngữ cảnh. Sự thiếu thông tin văn bản hay thị giác làm cho việc phát hiện cảm xúc đó chỉ bằng văn bản là một vấn đề khó khăn. Tuy nhiên, sử dụng các thông tin ngữ cảnh trong cuộc đối thoại ngày càng quan trọng để mang lại sự nhận biết ngữ cảnh về các yếu tố ngôn ngữ như cảm xúc, hành động đối thoại, cảm xúc, v.v. Tập tin cảm xúc Phân tích của SemEvol 3. Nó cung cấp dữ liệu cho ba phương thoại với ba lớp cảm xúc, ghi là Happy, Sad và Angry, và thêm với những người khác như không có lớp cảm xúc đã đề cập. Chúng tôi phát triển một kết hợp của mô hình thần kinh liên tục với các tính năng của nhân vật và từ như một nội dung để giải quyết vấn đề này. Hệ thống hoạt động khá tốt, đạt được một số F1 thu nhỏ (F1) của 0.7202 cho ba lớp cảm xúc.', 'bg': 'Когато четем "Не искам да говоря с вас повече", можем да тълкуваме това като ядосана или тъжна емоция при липса на контекст. Често изказванията са по-кратки и се дава кратко изказване като "Аз също!", Трудно е да се интерпретира емоцията без контекст. Липсата на прозодна или визуална информация прави трудно откриването на такива емоции само с текст. Въпреки това използването на контекстуална информация в диалога придобива все по-голямо значение, за да се осигури осъзнаване на контекста на езиковите особености като емоция, диалогов акт, сантименталност и т.н. и в допълнение с Други като никой от гореспоменатите емоционални класове. Разработваме ансамбъл от повтарящия се невронен модел с характеристики на ниво символ и дума като вход за решаване на този проблем. Системата се представя доста добре, постигайки микросреден резултат от 0,7212 за трите емоционални класа.', 'nl': "Wanneer we 'Ik wil niet meer met je praten' lezen, kunnen we dit interpreteren als een boze of een trieste emotie bij gebrek aan context. Vaak zijn de uitspraken korter, en krijgen ze een korte uitspraak zoals 'Ik ook!', Het is moeilijk om de emotie zonder context te interpreteren. Het ontbreken van prosodische of visuele informatie maakt het een uitdagend probleem om dergelijke emoties alleen met tekst te detecteren. Het gebruik van contextuele informatie in de dialoog wordt echter steeds belangrijker om een contextbewuste herkenning te bieden van taalkundige kenmerken zoals emotie, dialooghandeling, sentiment enz. De SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext competitie biedt een dataset van drie-turn dialogen gelabeld met de drie emotieklassen, namelijk Happy, Sad en Angry, en bovendien met Anderen als geen van de bovengenoemde emotieklassen. We ontwikkelen een ensemble van het terugkerende neurale model met karakter- en woordeigenschappen als input om dit probleem op te lossen. Het systeem presteert vrij goed, het behalen van een microgemiddelde F1 score (F1 begin van 0.7212 voor de drie emotieklassen.", 'hr': "Kad čitamo 'ne želim više razgovarati s vama', mogli bismo ovo interpretirati kao ljut ili tužni emocija u odsustvu konteksta. Često su riječi kraći i kraći govor poput mene. teško je interpretirati emocije bez konteksta. Nedostatak prosodijskih ili vizualnih informacija čini izazovnim problemom otkrivanja takvih emocija samo tekstom. Međutim, korištenje kontekstskih informacija u dijalogu dobija važnost za pružanje kontekstski svjesnog priznanja jezičkih karakteristika poput emocija, dijaloga, osjećaja itd. Konkurencija EmoContext 3. zadatka iz polovice 2019. pruža kompleks podataka o tri okretanja dijaloga označenom tri klase emocija, tj. Srećna, tužna i ljutna, Pored ostalih kao nijedan od navedenih klasa emocija. Mi razvijemo ensemble rekonstruiranog neuralnog modela sa karakterskim i rečnim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim Sistem provodi prilično dobro, postižeći mikropredan rezultat F1 (F1) od 0,7212 za tri klase emocija.", 'da': 'Når vi læser "Jeg vil ikke tale med dig mere", kan vi fortolke dette som enten en vred eller en trist følelse uden kontekst. Ofte er udtalelserne kortere, og givet en kort udtalelse som \'Mig også!\', Det er svært at fortolke følelsen uden kontekst. Manglen på prosodisk eller visuel information gør det til et udfordrende problem at opdage sådanne følelser kun med tekst. Men brugen af kontekstuel information i dialogen får større betydning for at give en kontekstbevidst anerkendelse af sproglige træk som følelser, dialog handling, sentiment osv. SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContent konkurrencen giver et datasæt af tre-turns dialoger mærket med de tre følelsesklasser, dvs. Happy, Sad og Angry, og i tillæg med Andre som ingen af de førnævnte følelsesklasser. Vi udvikler et ensemble af den tilbagevendende neurale model med karakter- og ordniveau funktioner som input til at løse dette problem. Systemet klarer sig ret godt og opnår en mikrogennemsnitlig F1 score (F1) på 0,7212 for de tre følelsesklasser.', 'ko': "'나는 더 이상 너와 이야기하고 싶지 않다'는 말을 읽을 때 우리는 위아래 문장이 없는 상황에서 그것을 분노나 슬픔의 정서로 이해할 수 있다.통상적으로 이런 말들은 비교적 짧다. 예를 들어'나도!'만약 언어 환경이 없다면, 이런 정서를 이해하기 매우 어렵다.운율이나 시각적 정보가 부족하기 때문에 텍스트를 통해서만 이런 정서를 측정하는 것은 도전적인 문제이다.그러나 대화에서 언어 환경 정보를 사용하는 것은 언어 특징(예를 들어 정서, 대화 행위, 정서 등)에 대한 언어 환경 감지 식별을 제공하기 위해 점점 중요해지고 있다. SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext 경연은 세 가지 정서 유형, 즉 즐거움, 슬픔과 분노를 표시하는 3라운드 대화의 데이터 집합을 제공한다.이 밖에 다른 사람과 마찬가지로 상술한 감정 과정은 없다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 문자와 단어급 특징을 입력으로 하는 귀속 신경 모델 집적을 개발했다.이 시스템은 세 정서류의 F1 성적(F1) 평균치가 0.7212로 상당히 뛰어나다.", 'de': 'Wenn wir "Ich will nicht mehr mit dir reden" lesen, könnten wir dies entweder als wütende oder traurige Emotion interpretieren, wenn kein Kontext vorhanden ist. Oft sind die Äußerungen kürzer und erhalten eine kurze Äußerung wie \'Ich auch!\', Es ist schwierig, die Emotion ohne Kontext zu interpretieren. Der Mangel an prosodischen oder visuellen Informationen macht es schwierig, solche Emotionen nur mit Text zu erkennen. Die Verwendung von Kontextinformationen im Dialog gewinnt jedoch an Bedeutung, um eine kontextbewusste Erkennung sprachlicher Merkmale wie Emotion, Dialogakt, Sentiment etc. zu ermöglichen. Der SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext Wettbewerb bietet einen Datensatz von dreistufigen Dialogen, die mit den drei Emotionsklassen Happy, Sad und Angry gekennzeichnet sind. und zusätzlich mit Anderen als keine der oben genannten Emotionsklassen. Wir entwickeln ein Ensemble des rezidivierenden neuronalen Modells mit Zeichen- und Worteigenschaften als Input, um dieses Problem zu lösen. Das System schneidet recht gut ab und erzielt eine mikrogemittelte F1-Punktzahl (F1-Launge von 0.7212 für die drei Emotionsklassen).', 'id': "Ketika membaca 'Saya tidak ingin berbicara lagi dengan Anda', kita mungkin menerangkan ini sebagai baik marah atau emosi sedih dalam ketidakhadiran konteks. Often, the utterances are shorter, and given a short utterance like 'Me too!',  sulit untuk menerangkan emosi tanpa konteks. The lack of prosodic or visual information makes it a challenging problem to detect such emotions only with text.  Namun, menggunakan informasi kontekstual dalam dialog semakin penting untuk menyediakan pengenalan konteks-sadar ciri-ciri bahasa seperti emosi, tindakan dialog, sentimen dll. Kompetisi SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext menyediakan set data dari dialog tiga pusingan yang ditabel dengan tiga kelas emosi, i.e. Happy, Sad and Angry, Dan tambahan dengan yang lainnya sebagai salah satu kelas emosi sebelumnya. We develop an ensemble of the recurrent neural model with character- and word-level features as an input to solve this problem.  Sistem berjalan cukup baik, mencapai skor F1 (F1) mikrorata 0,7212 untuk tiga kelas emosi.", 'fa': 'وقتی بخونم "دیگه نمیخوام باهات حرف بزنم" ممکنه این را به عنوان یک عصبانی یا یک احساس ناراحتی در غیر محیط تعبیر کنیم. اغلب سخن کوتاه\u200cتر است و سخن کوتاه\u200cتر مانند من است\u200c احساسات بدون محیط تعبیر کردن سخت است. ناتوانی اطلاعات prosodic یا visual باعث می شود که این احساسات را فقط با متن شناسایی کند یک مشکل سخت کننده است. با این حال، استفاده از اطلاعات متوسط در محاورۀ محاورۀ این محاورۀ به عنوان یک شناسایی متوسط آگاهی از ویژه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی مثل احساسات، محاورۀ محاورۀ، احساسات و غیر از آن است. مسابقهٔ مسابقهٔ نیمه ۲۰۱۹ مسابقهٔ مسابقهٔ ۲۰۱۹، مجموعه داده\u200cهای مجموع و در اضافه با بقیه به عنوان هیچ یک از کلاس احساسات پیش از این نیست. ما یک انجمن از مدل عصبی بازگشت را با ویژگی های شخصیت و سطح کلمه به عنوان ورودی برای حل این مشکل توسعه می کنیم. سیستم کاملا خوب انجام می\u200cدهد، با رسیدن یک امتیاز میکرومتوسط F1 (F1) از 0.7212 برای سه کلاس احساسات.', 'sw': 'Wakati kusoma “Sitaki kuongea na we we tena”, tunaweza kutafsiri hili kama hasira au hisia za huzuni kutokuwepo kwa muktadha. Mara nyingi maneno yake ni fupi, na maneno kama "Mimi pia!" ni vigumu kutafsiri hisia bila muktadha. Ukosefu wa taarifa za kimapenzi au za kuona inafanya kuwa tatizo la kutambua hisia hizo pekee kwa kutumia ujumbe. Hata hivyo, kutumia taarifa za kawaida katika mazungumzo inazidi kuwa na umuhimu wa kutoa tamko la kutambuliwa kwa lugha kama vile hisia, mazungumzo, hisia etc. na kuongezea na wengine kama hakuna moja ya darasa la hisia zilizotajwa kabla. We develop an ensemble of the recurrent neural model with character- and word-level features as an input to solve this problem.  Mfumo unafanya kazi vizuri sana, kutekeleza vipindi vidogo vya F1 (F1) vya 0.7212 kwa darasa tatu za hisia.', 'sq': 'Kur lexojmë "Nuk dua t ë flas më me ju", mund t a interpretojmë këtë si një emocion të zemëruar ose të trishtuar në mungesën e kontekstit. Shpesh fjalët janë më të shkurtra dhe fjalët më të shkurtra janë si unë. është e vështirë të interpretohet emocioni pa kontekst. Mungesa e informacionit prosodik apo vizual e bën një problem sfidues për të zbuluar emocione të tilla vetëm me tekst. However, using contextual information in the dialogue is gaining importance to provide a context-aware recognition of linguistic features such as emotion, dialogue act, sentiment etc. The SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext competition provides a dataset of three-turn dialogues labeled with the three emotion classes, i.e. Happy, Sad and Angry, Dhe përveç të tjerëve si asnjë nga klasat e emocioneve të mëparshme. Ne zhvillojmë një komplet të modelit neural të përsëritur me karaktere dhe karaktere të nivelit të fjalëve si një hyrje për të zgjidhur këtë problem. The system performs quite well, achieving a microaveraged F1 score (F1 ) of 0.7212 for the three emotion classes.', 'tr': '"Men seniň bilen gaýdyp gürleşmek islemeýän däldiginde, biz muny gaharlyk ýa-da gaharlyk duýgyş ýaly ýaly düşündirip bileris. Köplenç, sözler gysga, we \'Meniň too\' ýaly gysga söz berilýär. duýgyny kontekstsiz terjime etmek kyn. Prosodik ýa görsel maglumatyň eksik bolmagy diňe metin bilen duýgularyny tanymak kynçylyk bilen mejbur edýär. Ýöne, dialogda duýgular we duýgular ýaly duýgular, duýgular we hatlary ýaly duýgular bilen tanyş etmek üçin wagt gazanýar. Başgalar bilen hem öňünden geçen duýgym klaslarynyň hiçbiri däldir. Bu meseleyi çözmek için tekrarlı nöral modelinin bir köşesini geliştirdik. Sistem gowy dowam edýär, mikro ortalamasynda F1 अ (F1 ) üçin 0,7212 duýgym synplary üçin ýetýär.', 'hy': 'Երբ կարդում ենք «Ես այլևս չեմ ուզում խոսել ձեզ հետ», մենք կարող ենք սա մեկնաբանել որպես զայրացած կամ տխուր զգացմունք կոնտեքստի բացակայության դեպքում: Հաճախ արտահայտությունները կարճ են, և կարճ արտահայտություններ են տալիս, ինչպես "Ես նույնպես": it is difficult to interpret the emotion without context.  Պրոսոդիկ կամ տեսողական ինֆորմացիայի բացակայությունը դժվար խնդիր է դարձնում այս զգացմունքները բացահայտել միայն տեքստի միջոցով: However, using contextual information in the dialogue is gaining importance to provide a context-aware recognition of linguistic features such as emotion, dialogue act, sentiment etc. The SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext competition provides a dataset of three-turn dialogues labeled with the three emotion classes, i.e. Happy, Sad and Angry,  and in addition with Others as none of the aforementioned emotion classes.  Մենք զարգանում ենք կրկնօրինակ նյարդային մոդելի համակարգը, որն ունի բնույթների և բառերի մակարդակի առանձնահատկություններ որպես ներմուծք այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար: The system performs quite well, achieving a microaveraged F1 score (F1 ) of 0.7212 for the three emotion classes.', 'az': '"Sizinlə daha çox danışmaq istəmirəm" oxunduğu zaman, bunu ya qəzəbləndiyimiz, ya da qəzəbləndiyimiz bir hissi olaraq yoxdur. Sözlər çox qısa və mənim kimi qısa söz deyirlər . Duyguların məlumatı olmadan təfsil etmək zordur. Prosodik və vizual məlumat yoxdur, bu duyguları yalnız metinlə tanıtmaq üçün çətin bir problemdir. Lakin, dialogda müxtəlif məlumatlar istifadə etmək, emosiyalar, dialoglar, hisslər və ya da məsələlər kimi məlumatlar təsdiqlənmək üçün məlumatı artırmaq üçün mövcuddur. Üç emosiyal sınıfları ilə etiketlənmiş üç dönüş məlumatların məlumatı verir, məsələn, xoşbəxt və qəzəblənir. Başqalarına da əvvəlki hiss dəstələrindən heç bir şey deyildir. Biz bu problemi çəkmək üçün tekrarlı nöral modelinin səbəbi və söz səbəbi özellikləri ilə istifadə edirik. Sistem çox yaxşı işlər edir, bu üç hiss səviyyəsinə görə, 0,7212 min mikro ortalamalı F1 nöqtəsini (F1) çatdırdı.', 'af': 'Wanneer ek lees "Ek wil nie meer met jou praat nie," kan ons dit as \'n toorn of \'n treurige emosie interpreteer in die absence van konteks. Often, die woorde is korter, en gegee \'n kort woord soos "Ek ook!" is dit moeilik om die emosie sonder konteks te interpreteer. Die ontbreek van prosodiese of visuele inligting maak dit \'n pragtige probleem om sodanige emosies slegs met teks te ontdek. Maar die gebruik van contextual inligting in die dialoog is belangrikheid om \'n konteks-bekende herkening van lingwisiese funksies soos emosie, dialoog aksie, sentiment ensfh. Die semiEval 2019 Opdrag 3 EmoContext-sameswerking verskaf \'n datastel van drie-draai dialoog wat met die drie emosie klasse gemerk is, bv. gelukkig, bedroef en Angry, en in addition with Others as none of the aforementioned emotion classes. Ons ontwikkel \'n ensemble van die herhaalde neural model met karakter- en woord- vlak funksies as \'n invoer om hierdie probleem te los. Die stelsel uitvoer heeltemal goed, tot \'n mikro gemiddelde F1-punt (F1 ) van 0.7212 vir die drie emosie klasse.', 'am': "'ከእንግዲህ ወዲህ ልነጋገር አልፈልግም' በማንበብ ጊዜ፣ ይህ የተቆጣ ወይም ኀዘን ስሜት ባይኖር እናስተርጋለን፡፡ Often, the utterances are shorter, and given a short utterance like 'Me too!',  እውቀቱን ያለ አስተያየት መተረጉም አስቸጋሪ ነው:: የፕሮሮጀድክ ወይም የዓይነት መረጃ ጉዳይ በጽሑፍ ብቻ እንዲታወቅ የሚችል ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ በመስኮቱ ውስጥ ጥያቄ መረጃ በመጠቀም የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎችን ማስታወቂያ፣ emotion፣ dialog እውቀት፣ አስተያየት እና ማድረግ ግንኙነት አግኝቷል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የቀድሞው ተሳታፊ ክፍል ማንም እንደሌሎች ነው፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመፈጸም የባሕር እና የቃላት-ደረጃ ምርጫዎች የደጋሚ የደዌብ ሞዴል ምሳሌ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ሲስተምሩ ለሦስቱ እውቀት ደረጃዎች የ.", 'bn': "যখন 'আমি আর তোমার সাথে কথা বলতে চাই না', আমরা এটা ব্যাখ্যা করতে পারি ক্রোধ অথবা প্রেক্ষাপটের অনুপস্থিতির অভাবে। Often, the utterances are shorter, and given a short utterance like 'Me too!',  অনুভূতি ব্যাখ্যা করা কঠিন। প্রোসোডিক বা দৃশ্যমান তথ্যের অভাব শুধুমাত্র লেখার মাধ্যমে এই ধরনের অনুভূতি সনাক্ত করার সমস্যা হয়েছে। তবে ডায়ালগের মধ্যে প্রাক্তন তথ্য ব্যবহার করে ভাষাগত বৈশিষ্ট্যের স্বীকৃতি প্রদান করার জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, যেমন অনুভূতি, ডায়ালগের আচরণ, অনুভূতি ইত্যাদি প্রদান করা যাচ্ছে। সেমভাল ২০১৯ টাস্ক ৩ ইমোকন্টেক্স এবং অন্যান্যদের সাথে পূর্বে উল্লেখিত অনুভূতি ক্লাস হিসেবে কেউ নেই। We develop an ensemble of the recurrent neural model with character- and word-level features as an input to solve this problem.  এই সিস্টেম খুব ভালো কাজ করে, এই তিন আবেগের ক্লাসের জন্য একটি মাইক্রোভারেজ এফ১ স্কোর (এফ১) পৌঁছাতে পারে।", 'bs': "Kada čitamo 'ne želim više razgovarati s vama', mogli bismo ovo interpretirati kao ljut ili tužni emocija u odsustvu konteksta. Često su reči kraći i kraći govor poput mene. teško je interpretirati emocije bez konteksta. Nedostatak prosodijskih ili vizualnih informacija čini izazovnim problemom otkrivanja takvih emocija samo tekstom. Međutim, korištenje kontekstualnih informacija u dijalogu dobija važnost da bi se omogućilo prepoznavanje jezičkih karakteristika kao što su emocije, dijalogski akt, osjećaj itd. Konkurencija EmoContext 3. zadatka iz polovice 2019. pružala je kompleks podataka o trookrenim dijalogima označenom sa tri klase emocija, tj. srećna, tužna i ljutna, Pored ostalih kao nijedan od predviđenih klasa emocija. Razvijemo kompleks rekonstruiranog neuralnog modela sa karakterskim i rečnim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakterskim karakter Sistem provodi prilično dobro, postižeći mikropredan rezultat F1 od 0,7212 za tri klase emocija.", 'cs': 'Když si přečtete "Už s vámi nechci mluvit", můžeme to interpretovat buď jako rozzlobený nebo smutný pocit bez kontextu. Často jsou výroky kratší a dány jim krátké výroky jako "Já také!", Je obtížné interpretovat emoce bez kontextu. Nedostatek prozodických nebo vizuálních informací činí náročný problém detekovat takové emoce pouze textem. Využití kontextových informací v dialogu však získává význam pro kontextové rozpoznání jazykových rysů, jako jsou emoce, dialogový akt, sentiment atd. Soutěž SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext poskytuje datovou sadu tříotočných dialogů označených třemi emočními třídami, tj. Šťastným, smutným a naštvaným, a navíc s ostatními jako žádná z výše uvedených emočních tříd. Vyvíjíme soubor rekurentního neuronového modelu s vlastnostmi na úrovni znaků a slov jako vstup k řešení tohoto problému. Systém funguje poměrně dobře, dosahuje mikroprůměrného skóre F1 (F1 příchod 0,7212 pro tři emoční třídy.', 'ca': 'Quan llegeixo "ja no vull parlar amb vosaltres", podríem interpretar això com una emoció enfadada o trista en ausencia de context. Sovint, les expressions són més curtes i donades una breu expressió com "Jo també!". és difícil interpretar l\'emoció sense context. La falta d\'informació prosòdica o visual fa que sigui un problem a difícil detectar aquestes emocions només amb text. No obstant això, utilitzar informació contextual en el diàleg està guanyant importància per proporcionar un reconeixement conscient del context de característiques lingüístices com emoció, act e de diàleg, sentiment, etc. La competició SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext proporciona un conjunt de dades de diàlegs de tres voltants etiquetats amb les tres classes emocionals, és a dir, feliç, trist i enfadat, I a més d\'altres com cap de les classes emocionals anteriors. Desenvolvem un conjunt del model neural recurrent amb caracteres i caracteres de nivell de paraules com una entrada per resoldre aquest problema. El sistema funciona bastant bé, aconseguint una puntuació F1 (F1) de 0,7212 per a les tres classes emocionals.', 'et': 'Lugedes "Ma ei taha teiega enam rääkida", võime tõlgendada seda kas vihasena või kurvana emotsioonina konteksti puudumisel. Sageli on sõnad lühemad ja antakse lühike sõna nagu "Mina ka!", emotsiooni on raske tõlgendada ilma kontekstita. Prosoodilise või visuaalse informatsiooni puudumine muudab selliste emotsioonide tuvastamise keeruliseks probleemiks ainult teksti abil. Kontekstiteabe kasutamine dialoogis muutub siiski oluliseks, et tagada kontekstiteadlik äratundmine sellistele keelelistele omadustele nagu emotsioon, dialoogiakt, tunded jne. SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext konkurss pakub kolmekordsete dialoogide andmekogumit, mis on märgistatud kolme emotsiooniklassiga, st Õnnelik, Kurb ja Vihane, ja lisaks Teised kui ükski eelnimetatud emotsiooniklass. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks töötame välja korduva närvimudeli ansambli koos märgi- ja sõnatasemel funktsioonidega. Süsteem toimib üsna hästi, saavutades mikrokeskmise F1 skoori (F1) 0,7212 kolme emotsiooniklassi.', 'fi': 'Lukiessamme "En halua puhua sinulle enää", voimme tulkita tämän joko vihaiseksi tai surulliseksi tunteeksi kontekstin puuttuessa. Usein lausumat ovat lyhyempiä, ja niille annetaan lyhyt lausuma, kuten "Minäkin!", Tunteita on vaikea tulkita ilman kontekstia. Prosodistisen tai visuaalisen tiedon puute tekee tällaisten tunteiden havaitsemisesta haastavan ongelman vain tekstillä. Kontekstitiedon käyttäminen vuoropuhelussa on kuitenkin yhä tärkeämpää, jotta voidaan tunnistaa kontekstitietoisesti kielelliset piirteet, kuten tunne, dialogi-teko, tunne jne. SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext -kilpailu tarjoaa aineiston kolmesta vuorosta dialogista, jotka on merkitty kolmelle tunneluokalle eli Onnellinen, Surullinen ja Vihainen, ja sen lisäksi Muut eivät missään edellä mainituista tunneluokista. Kehitämme toistuvan neuromallin kokonaisuuden merkki- ja sanatason ominaisuuksineen tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi. Järjestelmä suoriutuu melko hyvin, saavuttaen mikrokeskiarvon F1 pisteen (F1) 0,7212 kolmelle tunneluokalle.', 'jv': "Nung basa 'Aku or a pingin ingkang sampeyan luwih' tapi, awake dhewe mangan tanggal iki ngono acara rasanjure yo sampeyan apik o sampeyan triyang nang ora iso ngusik kontèke. Sapa ora, kuwi kesalahan luwih mbut, lan uwis aku mungkin 'Aku tho !' Kasalié nggunakaké ngerngertuakake duwé nang kontèke. Ora ana dipunangé prosok obang-obang sing ngene kuwi nggawe kesempatan kanggo ngilangno langgar sampeyan karo teks. Nanging, nggunakake informasi contextual ning dialog kuwi nggawe inputi kanggo nyebute nggunakake karo kelas telu nggunakake sing dirakno, dialog maneh, nggihlanga, senjati itlo. Sampeyan mbégal semi-2011 task 3 emu Punika-Punika sing dumadhi karo ngono sing wis ana luwih dumadhi kuwi. Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sistem sing nêrung perintal nêrung kuwi karo caratar- lan kelas-rang pengguna kuwi nggawe sisalahan kanggo nambah iki ning arah sing bisa dumadhi. Sistem sing ngewehi luwih dumateng, iso ngsampek sekondi F1 (F1) sing 0.2412 kanggo telu kalih dumateng.", 'ha': "When reading 'I don't want to talk to you any more', we might interpret this as either an angry or a sad emotion in the absence of context.  Bã zã su iya magana ba daga gare Ni. ma'abũcin yin fassarawa Maɓancin information na mazaɓa ko gane, yana sanya ta wata la'ana mai zartar da gane wa'anar wannan hisãbi kawai da matsayin. Amma, amfani da takardar lãbãri na guda cikin zauren akwatin bayanin, yana da amfani da muhimmi ga ya bãyar da wani gane na masu tsari na cikin harshen masu tsari kamar hisãbi, aikin zauren akwatin bayani, da shiryi na zauren akwatin bayani, da kuma shirin Sakamata 3 EmoContcontext, yana da danna danna zauren akwatin bayani uku-turu da aka sanar da darafõfi uku na hisabi, misali, Bayi, Sad a da Na yi baƙin ciki, Kuma da waɗansu dabam kamar bãbu wani da aka ambaci na farko. Tuna buɗe wani emboli na misãlin neural wanda aka dace yana da haske- da-zane-zane kamar wata inputi don ya solar da wannan mataimaki. Ana tafiyar da shi mai kyau, kuma ya sami wani nau'i mai haɗi F1 (F1) wa 0.4212 na danna hison uku.", 'sk': 'Ko beremo "Nočem več govoriti z vami", lahko to razlagamo kot jezno ali žalostno čustvo brez konteksta. Pogosto so izgovori krajši in imajo kratek izgovor, kot je "Tudi jaz!" Čustva je težko razlagati brez konteksta. Zaradi pomanjkanja prosodičnih ali vizualnih informacij je takšna čustva zaznavanje le z besedilom zahtevna težava. Vendar pa je uporaba kontekstnih informacij v dialogu vse pomembnejša za zagotavljanje kontekstnega prepoznavanja jezikovnih značilnosti, kot so čustva, dialog akt, sentimenta itd. Tekmovanje SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext ponuja nabor podatkov treh dialogov, označenih s tremi razredi čustva, tj. Srečno, Žalostno in Jezno, in poleg drugih kot noben od omenjenih čustvenih razredov. Za reševanje tega problema razvijamo ansambel ponavljajočega se nevronskega modela z značilnimi in besednimi funkcijami. Sistem deluje precej dobro, doseže mikropovprečno F1 rezultat (F1) 0,7212 za tri čustvene razrede.', 'he': 'When reading \'I don\'t want to talk to you any more\', we might interpret this as either an angry or a sad emotion in the absence of context.  Often, the utterances are shorter, and given a short utterance like \'Me too!\',  קשה לפרש את הרגשות ללא הקשר. חוסר מידע פרוסודי או ויזואלי גורם לזה בעיה מאתגרת לגלות רגשות כאלה רק עם טקסט. עם זאת, השימוש במידע קונטקסטי בדיולוג מקבל חשיבות כדי לספק זיהוי קונטקסטי מודע למונעים שפתיים כמו רגשות, פעולה דיאלוג, רגשות וכו"כ. תחרות האמוקונטקסט של המשימה SemEval 2019 3 מספקת קבוצת נתונים של דיאלוגים שלוש פנים שמתווים עם שלושת שיעורי רגשות, כלומר שמחים, עצובים וכעסים, ובנוסף לאחרים כאף אחד מהשיעורי רגשות הקודמים. אנחנו מפתחים אסמבל של מודל העצבי המחוזר עם תכונות רמת אופי ומילים כתוצאה לפתור את הבעיה הזאת. The system performs quite well, achieving a microaveraged F1 score (F1 ) of 0.7212 for the three emotion classes.', 'bo': "'ངས་ཁྱེད་ཚོར་དུ་གཏོང་ནི་མི་འདུག་' ཡིན་པ་དང་། སྤྱིར་བཏང་དུ། ཐ་སྙད་འདི་ཆུང་ཆུང་ལྷག་མེད་པར། སྒྲ་སྐད་ཐུང་ཆུང་ཐུང་ཅིག་བྱིན་ཡོད། སེམས་ཚོར་མེད་པར་ཐག་རིང་གི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། རྒུལ་སྒྲིག་དང་མཐོང་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་ལ་མཚོན་ན་ཡིག་གི་འཇུག་རིས་འདི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེན་ཡོད་པ་རེད། However, using contextual information in the dialog is gaining importance to provide a context-aware recognition of linguistic features such as emotion, dialog act, sentiment etc. The SemEval 2019 Task 3 EmoContext competition provides a dataset of three-turn dialogues labeled with the three emotion classes, i.e. Happy, Sad and Angry, འོན་ཀྱང་། སྔོན་སྒེར་གྱི་སེམས་ཚོར་གྱི་གྲྭར་གང་ཡང་མེད་པ་ལས་གཞན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡད་ཡོད། We develop an ensemble of the recurrent neural model with character- and word-level features as an input to solve this problem. མ་ལག་གིས་སྟབས་བདེ་འཇགས་པ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པའི་སྒུལ་གྱི་ཚད་གཞི་ཚོགས་ལྟར་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་(F1)རིམ།"}
{'en': 'NELEC at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Think Twice Before Going Deep', 'ar': 'NELEC في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: فكر مرتين قبل التعمق', 'es': 'NELEC en la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2019: Piénselo dos veces antes de profundizar', 'pt': 'NELEC na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Pense duas vezes antes de ir fundo', 'fr': "NELEC au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Réfléchissez deux fois avant d'aller en profondeur", 'ja': 'SEMEval -2019のNELECタスク3 ：詳細に入る前に2回考える', 'zh': 'NELEC在SemEval-2019务3:深入之前三思而后行', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 3 में NELEC: गहरी जाने से पहले दो बार सोचें', 'ru': 'NELEC на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Подумайте дважды, прежде чем углубляться', 'ga': 'NELEC ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Smaoinigh faoi dhó Roimh Amach Doimhneacht', 'ka': 'NELEC SemEval-2019 სამუშაო დავალება 3: ფიქრობთ ორჯერ სამუშაოდ', 'hu': 'NELEC a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: Gondolkozz kétszer, mielőtt mélyre mész', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Σκεφτείτε δύο φορές πριν πάτε βαθιά', 'it': 'NELEC al SemEval-2019 Task 3: Pensaci due volte prima di andare in profondità', 'kk': 'NELEC 3- тапсырма шегінде: Қанықтың алдында екі рет ойлаңыз', 'lt': 'NELEC 2010 m. puslapyje 3 užduotis: dvigubai pagalvokite prieš pradėdami giliau', 'mk': 'NELEC на SemEval-2019 задача 3: Размисли двапати пред да одиш длабоко', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ജോലി 3: ആഴത്തിലേക്ക് പോകുന്നതിനു മുമ്പ് രണ്ടുതവണ ആലോചിക്കുക', 'mn': 'NELEC at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Going Deep Before Two Think', 'ms': 'NELEC di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Fikirkan dua kali sebelum pergi dalam', 'mt': 'NELEC f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 3: Aħseb darbtejn qabel ma tmur fil-fond', 'no': 'NELEC ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3: Tenk to gong før går dyppa', 'pl': 'NELEC na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Pomyśl dwa razy zanim wejdziesz głęboko', 'ro': 'NELEC la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Gândiți-vă de două ori înainte de a merge adânc', 'sr': 'NELEC na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3:', 'so': 'NELEC at SemEval-2019 Shaqada 3: Fikir laba jeer Kahor Going Deep', 'si': 'NELEC සම්වේල්-2019 වැඩ 3: දුරට යන්න කලින් දෙපාරක් හිතන්න', 'sv': 'NELEC på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Tänk två gånger innan du går djupt', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 செயல் 3: ஆழம் செல்வதற்கு முன் இருமுறை சிந்திக்கவும்', 'ur': 'نیل سیم ایول-2019 ٹاکس ۳ میں نیل سی: عمیق جانے سے پہلے دوبارہ سوچ کرو', 'uz': "3 Vazifani SemEval- 2019- yildagi NELEC: Deep oʻtishdan oldin ikki marta o'ylang", 'vi': 'Hãy nghĩ hai lần trước khi chìm sâu', 'bg': 'НЕЛЕК на Задача 3: Помислете два пъти, преди да отидете дълбоко', 'hr': 'NELEC na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: razmišljaj dva puta prije odlaska dubokosti', 'da': 'NELEC på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Tænk to gange før du går dybt', 'nl': 'NELEC op SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Denk twee keer na voordat je diep gaat', 'de': 'NELEC auf der SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Zweimal denken, bevor man tief geht', 'fa': 'NELEC در نیم Eval-2019 کار ۳: دو بار قبل از رفتن عمیق فکر کنید', 'id': 'NELEC di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Pikirkan Dua kali Sebelum Pergi Dalam', 'sw': 'NELEC katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 3: Fikiria mara mbili kabla ya kwenda kina', 'tr': 'NELEC at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Think twice Before Going Deep', 'ko': 'NELEC가SemEval-2019에서의 임무3: 깊이 연구하기 전에 심사숙고한 다음에 행동한다', 'af': 'NELEC by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 3: Dink twee keer voor te gaan Deep', 'sq': 'NELEC në SemEval-2019 Detyra 3: Mendo dy herë përpara se të shkosh thellë', 'hy': 'ՆԵԼԵԿ-ը 2019 թվականի կիսագնդի 3. հանձնարարությունը. մտածեք երկու անգամ մինչև խորը գնալը', 'am': 'ስራ 3: ጥልቅ ሳይሄድ ሁለት ጊዜ አስቡ', 'az': 'NELEC-in SemEval-2019 Gözəl 3: İki dərin çəkilməmişdən əvvəl iki dəfə düşünün', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯-এর কাজ ৩: গভীরে যাওয়ার আগে দুইবার চিন্তা করুন', 'bs': 'NELEC na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3:', 'ca': "NELEC a SemEval-2019 tasca 3: Penseu dos cops abans d'anar profundament", 'cs': 'NELEC na SemEval-2019 Úkol 3: Přemýšlejte dvakrát, než zajdete hluboko', 'et': 'NELEC SemEval-2019 ülesanne 3: mõtle kaks korda enne sügavale minekut', 'fi': 'NELEC SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 3: Ajattele kahdesti ennen syvälle menemistä', 'jv': 'NeLeC nang seminval-2011 task 3: Mind Two ices before Going deep', 'sk': 'NELEC na SemEval-2019 naloga 3: dvakrat premisli, preden greš globoko', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'he': 'משימה 3: תחשוב פעמיים לפני ללכת עמוק', 'bo': 'NELEC at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Think Twice Before Going Deep'}
{'en': 'Existing Machine Learning techniques yield close to human performance on text-based classification tasks. However, the presence of multi-modal noise in chat data such as emoticons, slang, spelling mistakes, code-mixed data, etc. makes existing deep-learning solutions perform poorly. The inability of deep-learning systems to robustly capture these covariates puts a cap on their performance. We propose NELEC : Neural and Lexical Combiner, a system which elegantly combines textual and deep-learning based methods for sentiment classification. We evaluate our system as part of the third task of ‘Contextual Emotion Detection in Text’ as part of SemEval-2019. Our system performs significantly better than the baseline, as well as our deep-learning model benchmarks. It achieved a micro-averaged F1 score of 0.7765, ranking 3rd on the test-set leader-board. Our code is available at https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'ar': 'تقترب تقنيات التعلم الآلي الحالية من أداء الإنسان في مهام التصنيف المستندة إلى النص. ومع ذلك ، فإن وجود ضوضاء متعددة الوسائط في بيانات الدردشة مثل الرموز التعبيرية واللغة العامية والأخطاء الإملائية والبيانات المختلطة بالشفرات وما إلى ذلك يجعل حلول التعلم العميق الحالية تعمل بشكل ضعيف. إن عدم قدرة أنظمة التعلم العميق على التقاط هذه المتغيرات بقوة يضع حدًا لأدائها. نقترح NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combiner ، وهو نظام يجمع بأناقة بين الأساليب القائمة على النصوص والتعلم العميق لتصنيف المشاعر. نقوم بتقييم نظامنا كجزء من المهمة الثالثة "الكشف عن المشاعر السياقية في النص" كجزء من SemEval-2019. يعمل نظامنا بشكل أفضل بكثير من الأداء الأساسي ، بالإضافة إلى معايير نموذج التعلم العميق الخاصة بنا. لقد حققت درجة F1 متوسطة الصغر تبلغ 0.7765 ، لتحتل المرتبة الثالثة على لوحة المتصدرين المختارين. الكود الخاص بنا متاح على https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'fr': "Les techniques d'apprentissage automatique existantes génèrent des performances proches de celles de l'homme pour les tâches de classification basées sur du texte. Cependant, la présence de bruits multimodaux dans les données de chat tels que les émoticônes, l'argot, les fautes d'orthographe, les données mixtes de code, etc. rend les solutions d'apprentissage profond existantes peu performantes. L'incapacité des systèmes d'apprentissage profond à capturer de manière robuste ces covariables limite leurs performances. Nous proposons NELEC\xa0: Neural and Lexical Combiner, un système qui combine élégamment des méthodes textuelles et basées sur l'apprentissage profond pour la classification des sentiments. Nous évaluons notre système dans le cadre de la troisième tâche de «\xa0Détection contextuelle des émotions dans le texte\xa0» dans le cadre de SemEval-2019. Notre système fonctionne bien mieux que la base de référence, ainsi que les points de référence de notre modèle d'apprentissage profond. Il a obtenu un score F1 micro-moyen de 0,7765, se classant 3e dans le classement des tests. Notre code est disponible sur https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'pt': "As técnicas de aprendizado de máquina existentes rendem um desempenho próximo ao humano em tarefas de classificação baseadas em texto. No entanto, a presença de ruído multimodal em dados de bate-papo, como emoticons, gírias, erros de ortografia, dados mistos de código etc., faz com que as soluções de aprendizado profundo existentes tenham um desempenho insatisfatório. A incapacidade dos sistemas de aprendizado profundo de capturar essas covariáveis de forma robusta limita seu desempenho. Propomos o NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combiner, um sistema que combina elegantemente métodos baseados em aprendizado textual e profundo para classificação de sentimentos. Avaliamos nosso sistema como parte da terceira tarefa de 'Detecção de Emoções Contextuais em Texto' como parte do SemEval-2019. Nosso sistema tem um desempenho significativamente melhor do que a linha de base, bem como nossos benchmarks de modelo de aprendizado profundo. Ele alcançou uma pontuação F1 micro-média de 0,7765, ocupando o 3º lugar no quadro de líderes do conjunto de testes. Nosso código está disponível em https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'es': 'Las técnicas de aprendizaje automático existentes producen un rendimiento cercano al humano en las tareas de clasificación basadas en texto. Sin embargo, la presencia de ruido multimodal en los datos de chat, como emoticonos, jerga, errores ortográficos, datos de código mixto, etc., hace que las soluciones de aprendizaje profundo existentes tengan un rendimiento deficiente. La incapacidad de los sistemas de aprendizaje profundo para capturar de manera sólida estas covariables pone un límite a su rendimiento. Proponemos NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combiner, un sistema que combina de manera elegante métodos basados en el aprendizaje profundo y textual para la clasificación de sentimientos. Evaluamos nuestro sistema como parte de la tercera tarea de «Detección de emociones contextuales en el texto» como parte de SemEval-2019. Nuestro sistema funciona significativamente mejor que la línea de base, así como nuestros puntos de referencia del modelo de aprendizaje profundo. Logró una puntuación de F1 micropromediada de 0.7765, ocupando el tercer lugar en la tabla de posiciones del set de pruebas. Nuestro código está disponible en https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'ja': '既存の機械学習技術は、テキストベースの分類タスクにおける人間のパフォーマンスに近い結果をもたらす。しかし、絵文字、スラング、スペルミス、コードミックスされたデータなどのチャットデータにマルチモーダルノイズが存在すると、既存のディープラーニングソリューションのパフォーマンスが低下します。ディープラーニングシステムがこれらの共変量を堅牢にキャプチャすることができないため、パフォーマンスに上限があります。感情分類のためのテキストベースの方法とディープラーニングベースの方法をエレガントに組み合わせるシステム、NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combinerを提案します。私たちは、SemEval -2019の一部として、「テキストにおける文脈的感情の検出」の3つ目のタスクの一部としてシステムを評価します。当社のシステムは、ベースラインと深層学習モデルのベンチマークよりも著しく優れています。マイクロ平均F 1スコア0.7765を達成し、テストセットのリーダーボードで3位となった。コードはhttps://github.com/iamgroot42/nelecから入手できます。', 'zh': '今机器学术,生于文本之类。 然聊天数据多有模噪声,如表情符号、俚语、拼写错误、代码混合数等,使见学解决方案不佳。 深学系统不可恃协变量,此限其性能也。 发NELEC:Neural and Lexical Combiner者,雅合文本,情类之统也。 为SemEval-2019之分,以吾统为"文本上下文情检"之第三项。 吾统性显优基线及吾深学模则。 其成0.7765F1微平均值,于试集排行榜上第三。 吾代码可 https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'hi': "मौजूदा मशीन लर्निंग तकनीक पाठ-आधारित वर्गीकरण कार्यों पर मानव प्रदर्शन के करीब उपज। हालांकि, चैट डेटा जैसे इमोटिकॉन्स, स्लैंग, वर्तनी गलतियों, कोड-मिश्रित डेटा, आदि में बहु-मोडल शोर की उपस्थिति मौजूदा डीप-लर्निंग समाधानों को खराब प्रदर्शन करती है। इन कोवरिएट्स को मजबूत रूप से कैप्चर करने के लिए डीप-लर्निंग सिस्टम की अक्षमता उनके प्रदर्शन पर एक टोपी डालती है। हम NELEC का प्रस्ताव: तंत्रिका और लेक्सिकल कंबाइनर, एक प्रणाली जो सुरुचिपूर्ण रूप से भावना वर्गीकरण के लिए पाठ्य और गहरी-सीखने आधारित विधियों को जोड़ती है। हम SemEval-2019 के हिस्से के रूप में 'पाठ में प्रासंगिक भावना का पता लगाने' के तीसरे कार्य के हिस्से के रूप में हमारे सिस्टम का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हमारा सिस्टम बेसलाइन की तुलना में काफी बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है, साथ ही साथ हमारे गहरे सीखने वाले मॉडल बेंचमार्क भी। इसने 0.7765 का एक माइक्रो-औसत F1 स्कोर हासिल किया, जो टेस्ट-सेट लीडर-बोर्ड पर तीसरे स्थान पर रहा। हमारा कोड https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec पर उपलब्ध है", 'ru': 'Существующие методы машинного обучения дают результаты, близкие к человеческим результатам при выполнении задач классификации на основе текста. Однако наличие мультимодального шума в данных чата, таких как смайлики, сленг, орфографические ошибки, смешанные с кодом данные и т. д., делает существующие решения для глубокого обучения неэффективными. Неспособность систем глубокого обучения надежно фиксировать эти ковариаты ограничивает их эффективность. Мы предлагаем NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combiner, систему, которая элегантно сочетает текстовые и основанные на глубоком обучении методы классификации чувств. Мы оцениваем нашу систему в рамках третьей задачи «Обнаружение эмоций в тексте» в рамках SemEval-2019. Наша система работает значительно лучше, чем базовая, а также наши контрольные показатели модели глубокого обучения. Она достигла микросреднего балла F1 0,7765, заняв 3-е место на лидирующей доске тестового набора. Наш код доступен по адресу https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'ga': "Tá teacht gar d’fheidhmíocht dhaonna ar thascanna aicmithe bunaithe ar théacs ó theicnící Foghlama Meaisín atá ann cheana féin. Mar sin féin, toisc go bhfuil torann ilmhódach i sonraí comhrá cosúil le straoiseoga, slang, botúin litrithe, sonraí cód-mheasctha, etc. ní éiríonn go maith le réitigh domhainfhoghlama atá ann cheana féin. Cuireann neamhábaltacht na gcóras domhainfhoghlama na comhathraitheanna seo teorainn lena bhfeidhmíocht. Molaimid NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combiner, córas a chomhcheanglaíonn go galánta modhanna téacsúla agus domhainfhoghlama chun meon a rangú. Déanaimid measúnú ar ár gcóras mar chuid den tríú tasc de `Contextual Mothúchán a Bhrath i Téacs' mar chuid de SemEval-2019. Feidhmíonn ár gcóras i bhfad níos fearr ná an bonnlíne, chomh maith lenár tagarmharcanna samhail domhainfhoghlama. Bhain sé scór micrea-mheánmhéid F1 de 0.7765 amach, ag rangú 3ú ar an gclár ceannaire tacair tástála. Tá ár gcód ar fáil ag https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'hu': 'A meglévő gépi tanulási technikák közel állnak az emberi teljesítményhez a szövegalapú osztályozási feladatok során. Azonban a multimodális zaj jelenléte a csevegési adatokban, például hangulatjelekben, szlengben, helyesírási hibákban, kódokkal kevert adatokban stb., miatt a meglévő mélytanulási megoldások rosszul teljesítenek. A mélytanulási rendszerek képtelensége, hogy robusztus módon rögzítsék ezeket a kovariánsokat, korlátozza teljesítményüket. A NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combiner rendszert javasoljuk, amely elegánsan ötvözi a szöveges és mélytanulási alapú módszereket az érzelmek osztályozására. Rendszerünket a SemEval-2019 keretében a "Kontextuális érzelmek felismerése szövegben" harmadik feladatának részeként értékeljük. Rendszerünk jelentősen jobb teljesítményt nyújt, mint az alapképzés, valamint a mélytanulási modell referenciaértékeink. Az F1-es mikroátlagos pontszámot 0,7765-re érte el, a harmadik helyen állva a tesztkészlet vezetőtábláján. A kódunk elérhető a következő címen: https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'el': 'Οι υπάρχουσες τεχνικές μηχανικής μάθησης αποδίδουν κοντά στην ανθρώπινη απόδοση σε εργασίες ταξινόμησης βάσει κειμένου. Ωστόσο, η παρουσία πολυμορφικού θορύβου σε δεδομένα συνομιλίας, όπως μηνύματα, ορθογραφικά λάθη, δεδομένα μικτού κώδικα κ.λπ., κάνει τις υπάρχουσες λύσεις βαθιάς μάθησης να αποδίδουν άσχημα. Η αδυναμία των συστημάτων βαθιάς μάθησης να συλλάβουν ισχυρά αυτές τις συμπαραγωγικές μεταβλητές θέτει ένα όριο στην απόδοσή τους. Προτείνουμε ένα σύστημα που συνδυάζει κομψά μεθόδους για την ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων με βάση την υφή και τη βαθιά μάθηση. Αξιολογούμε το σύστημά μας ως μέρος του τρίτου έργου της "Ανίχνευσης Συναισθηματιών στο Κείμενο" στο πλαίσιο του προγράμματος. Το σύστημά μας αποδίδει σημαντικά καλύτερα από τη βασική βάση, καθώς και από τους δείκτες αναφοράς μοντέλων βαθιάς μάθησης. Επιτύχησε μια μικρομεσαία βαθμολογία F1 0.7765, με την τρίτη θέση στην κατάταξη του σετ δοκιμών. Ο κωδικός μας είναι διαθέσιμος στο https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'ka': "მხოლოდ მაქსინის სწავლების ტექნექციები ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის მომუშაობაში ადამიანის მუშაობაზე გახდება. მაგრამ, მრავალური მოდიალური ბუნის მონაცემებში, როგორც ემოტიკონები, სიტყვანის შეცდომარები, კოდის შეცდომარებული მონაცემები და განმავლობაში. მსგავსი დიბოლო სწავლების გარეშე ძალიან სწავლებელი სისტემების შესაძლებლობა, რომ ამ კოგარიატებს ძალიან გადატანოთ, მათი მუშაობის შესაძლებლობაზე დაკავშირება. ჩვენ მინდა NELEC: ნეიროლური და ლექსიკალური კომბინერი, სისტემა, რომელიც ელეგენტურად ტექსტური და ძალიან სწავლების გადავიწყება სენტიმენტების კლასიფიკაციაში. ჩვენ ჩვენი სისტემის სამუშაო სამუშაო დავამუშავებთ `კონტექსტური ემოციონის განახლება ტექსტში' სამუშაო 2019 წლის ნაწილი. ჩვენი სისტემა მნიშვნელოვანია უფრო მეტი, როგორც ჩვენი დიდი სწავლების მოდელის ბენქმარი. მან მიკრო განსაზღვრებული F1 წერტილი 0,7765-ის, რომელიც მესამე წერტილია ტესტის წერტილის წერტილი. ჩვენი კოდის შესაძლებელია https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'it': "Le tecniche di Machine Learning esistenti offrono prestazioni simili a quelle umane nelle attività di classificazione basate sul testo. Tuttavia, la presenza di rumore multimodale nei dati di chat come emoticon, slang, errori di ortografia, dati misti di codice, ecc. rende le soluzioni di deep learning esistenti prestazioni scarse. L'incapacità dei sistemi di deep learning di catturare in modo solido queste covariate pone un limite alle loro prestazioni. Proponiamo NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combiner, un sistema che combina elegantemente metodi testuali e deep learning per la classificazione dei sentiment. Valutiamo il nostro sistema come parte del terzo compito di `Contextual Emotion Detection in Text' come parte di SemEval-2019. Il nostro sistema offre prestazioni significativamente migliori rispetto alla base di riferimento, così come i nostri modelli di deep learning benchmark. Ha ottenuto un punteggio F1 micro-medio di 0,7765, posizionandosi al terzo posto nella classifica dei test set. Il nostro codice è disponibile all'indirizzo https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'kk': 'Мәтін негіздеген классификациялық тапсырмалардың адамның істеу техникаларына жақын болады. Бірақ, көңіл күй белгілер, мәліметтер, емлер қатесі, код араластырылған деректер және т. б. секілді көп модалдық дыбыс болуы мүмкін емес. Бұл ковариаттарды қатты түсіру үшін терең оқыту жүйелерінің мүмкіндігі болмайды. Біз NELEC: Нейрондық және лексикалық комбинациясы, мәтіндік және терең оқыту тәсілдерін сезімдер классификациясының негізінде біріктіретін жүйесін ұсынамыз. Біз жүйемізді "Мәтінде контексті көңіл таңдау" деген үшінші тапсырманың бөлігі ретінде бағалаймыз. Біздің жүйеміз негізгі жолдан да, қалыпты оқыту үлгілеріміздің белгілеріміздің үлгілеріміздің жақсы жасайды. Бұл микро орташа F1 деңгейі 0,7765 деңгейіне жетті, сынақтар бағытталған басшылардың 3-ші ретінде. Біздің кодмыз бар https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'lt': 'Esami mašinų mokymosi metodai rodo, kad tekstu grindžiamos klasifikacijos užduotys yra panašios į žmogaus veiklos rezultatus. Tačiau dėl daugelio būdų triukšmo pokalbio duomenise, pavyzdžiui, emotikonuose, slangose, rašybos klaidose, kodų mišriuose duomenise ir t. t., esami giliavandenio mokymosi sprendimai veikia blogai. Išsamaus mokymosi sistemų nesugebėjimas tvirtai sugauti šių kovariatų riboja jų veiklos rezultatus. Mes siūlome NELEC: Neuralinis ir leksinis derinys, sistema, kuri elegantiškai derina tekstinius ir gilaus mokymosi metodus jautrumo klasifikacijai. Mes vertiname savo sistemą kaip trečiosios užduoties dalį „Kontekstinės emocijos aptikimas tekste“ kaip dalį „SemEval-2019“. Mūsų sistema veikia gerokai geriau nei pradinis rodiklis, taip pat mūsų gilaus mokymosi modelio lyginamieji rodikliai. Ji pasiekė mikrovidutinį F1 tašką 0,7765, trečią lygį bandymų rinkinio lyderio valdyboje. Mūsų kodas pateikiamas https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'mk': 'Постојаните техники на машинско учење се блиски до човечката резултат на задачите за класификација базирани на текст. Сепак, присуството на мултимодална бучава во податоците за разговарање како што се емотиконите, слангот, грешките во правописот, мешаните податоци итн. ги прави постоечките решенија за длабоко учење лошо да функционираат. Неспособноста на системите за длабоко учење да ги фатат овие коваријати става крај на нивната изведба. Ние предложуваме НЕЛЕЦ: неврален и лексикален комбинер, систем кој елегантно комбинира текстуални и длабоко учење базирани методи за класификација на чувствата. Го проценуваме нашиот систем како дел од третата задача на "Детектирање на контекстни емоции во текст" како дел од SemEval-2019. Нашиот систем има значително подобри резултати од базата, како и нашите споредби за моделот на длабоко учење. Истиот постигна микро-просечна оценка на F1 од 0,7765, рангирајќи се на третото место на водачот на тестот. Нашиот код е достапен на https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'ms': "Teknik Pembelajaran Mesin yang wujud mendekati prestasi manusia pada tugas klasifikasi berdasarkan teks. Namun, kehadiran bunyi berbilang-modal dalam data sembang seperti emotikon, slang, kesilapan ejaan, data-campuran kod, dll. membuat penyelesaian pembelajaran dalam wujud berjalan buruk. Kegagalan sistem belajar dalam untuk menangkap kuat-kuat kovarian ini meletakkan topi pada prestasi mereka. Kami melamar NELEC: Kombiner Neural dan Lexical, sistem yang menggabungkan secara elegan kaedah tekstual dan pembelajaran mendalam untuk klasifikasi perasaan. Kami menilai sistem kami sebagai sebahagian dari tugas ketiga 'Pengesanan Emosi Konteksual dalam Teks' sebagai sebahagian dari SemEval-2019. Sistem kita berfungsi jauh lebih baik daripada dasar dasar, serta benchmarks model belajar dalam kita. Ia mencapai skor F1 berrata-rata mikro 0.7765, peringkat ke-3 pada papan pemimpin-set ujian. Kod kita tersedia di https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'ml': 'നിലവിലുള്ള മെഷീന്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d പദാവലിയിലുള്ള വ്യവസ്ഥകളില്\u200d മനുഷ്യരുടെ പ്രകടന എന്നാലും നിലവിലുള്ള ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന പരിഹാരങ്ങള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ അസാധ്യതയില്ല ഈ കോവേറിയറ്റുകള്\u200d പിടികൂടുന്നതിന് അവരുടെ പ്രകടനത്ത നമ്മള്\u200d നെയില്\u200dസി: നെയുറലും ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d കോമ്ബൈനര്\u200d, ഒരു സിസ്റ്റമാണ് വികാരം കൂടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത്, വാക്കുകള്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം മൂന്നാമത്തെ ജോലിയായി വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2019-ന്റെ ഭാഗമായിരിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റം ബെസ്ലൈനെക്കാള്\u200d നല്ലതാണ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത്, നമ്മുടെ ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d ബ അത് എഫ്1 സ്കോര്\u200d 0. 7765 ന്റെ മൈക്രോ ശരാശരിയായ ഒരു എഫ്\u200c1 സ്കോര്\u200d എത്തി. ടെസ്റ്റ് സെറ്റ് നേതാവിന്റെ മൂന്നാമത്തെ റാങ നമ്മുടെ കോഡ് ലഭ്യമാണ് https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'mn': "Ингээд байгаа Машин суралцах технологи нь хүн төрөлхтний үйл ажиллагааны тухай бий болдог. Гэвч, сэтгэл хөдлөл, шүлгээний алдаа, кодын цуглуулсан өгөгдлөө, т.д. олон моделийн дуу байдал нь суралцаж байгаа гүнзгий суралцах шийдэл буруу байдаг. Гүн гүнзгий суралцах системийн чадвар эдгээр ковариатуудыг хүчээр барьж авч чадахгүй байх нь тэдний үйл ажиллагаанд давхар тавьдаг. Бид NELEC: сэтгэл хөдлөл болон сэтгэл хөдлөл төлөвлөгөөний шинжлэх ухааны үндсэн арга замыг нэгтгэдэг систем юм. Бид системийг SemEval-2019 оны нэг хэсэг болгон `Contextual Emotion Detection in Text'-ын 3 дахь ажлын нэг хэсэг гэж үнэлдэг. Бидний систем суурь шугам, гүнзгий суралцах загвараас илүү сайн ажилладаг. Энэ нь жижиг дундаж F1 тоо 0.7765, шалгалтын удирдагч дээр 3-р хэмжээнд хүрсэн. Бидний код нь https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'no': 'Det eksisterande maskinelæringsteknikkar gjer nær menneskelige utviklingar på tekstbaserte klassifikasjonar. Det finst imidlertid fleire modal støy i pratedata, som emotikon, slang, stavefeil, kodefeil data osv. gjer dei eksisterande dyblæringsløysingane dårlig utføra. Ugyldigheten av dypt læringssystemet for å kraftig henta desse kovariatane legg ein cap på utviklinga sine. Vi foreslår NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combiner, eit system som elegantt kombinerer tekst- og dypt- læringsbaserte metodar for sentimentklassifikasjon. Vi evaluerer systemet vårt som del av den tredje oppgåva av «Kontekstoppdaging av følelser i tekst» som del av semiEval-2019. Sistemet vårt utfører betydelig bedre enn baselinja, og våre dypslæringsmodeller. Det oppnådd eit mikro gjennomsnittt F1- poeng med 0,7765, som rankerer tredje på testinnstillingsbordet. Koden vårt er tilgjengeleg på https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'pl': 'Istniejące techniki uczenia maszynowego przynoszą bliskie ludzkiej wydajności w zakresie klasyfikacji tekstowej. Jednak obecność szumów multimodalnych w danych czatu, takich jak emotikony, slang, błędy pisowni, dane mieszane z kodem itp., sprawia, że istniejące rozwiązania głębokiego uczenia działają źle. Niezdolność systemów głębokiego uczenia do solidnego uchwycenia tych współzmiennych ogranicza ich wydajność. Proponujemy NELEC: Neurol and Lexical Combiner, system, który elegancko łączy metody klasyfikacji sentymentów oparte na teksturze i głębokim uczeniu. Oceniamy nasz system jako część trzeciego zadania "Kontekstowego Wykrywania Emocji w Tekście" w ramach SemEval-2019. Nasz system działa znacznie lepiej niż podstawowy, jak również nasze referencje modeli głębokiego uczenia. Osiągnął mikrośredni wynik F1 0.7765, zajmując trzecie miejsce w klasyfikacji zestawu testowego. Nasz kod jest dostępny pod adresem: https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'ro': 'Tehnicile existente de Machine Learning oferă performanțe apropiate de performanța umană în ceea ce privește sarcinile de clasificare bazate pe text. Cu toate acestea, prezența zgomotului multimodal în datele de chat, cum ar fi emoticoanele, slangul, greșelile de ortografie, datele amestecate de coduri etc., face ca soluțiile existente de învățare profundă să funcționeze slab. Incapacitatea sistemelor de învățare profundă de a capta în mod robust aceste covariate pune un plafon pe performanța lor. Propunem NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combiner, un sistem care combină elegant metodele textuale și de învățare profundă pentru clasificarea sentimentelor. Evaluăm sistemul nostru ca parte a celei de-a treia sarcini a "Detectarea emoțiilor contextuale în text" ca parte a SemEval-2019. Sistemul nostru are performanțe semnificativ mai bune decât cele de referință ale modelului de învățare profundă. A obținut un scor F1 micro-mediu de 0,7765, clasându-se pe locul 3 în clasamentul de test-set. Codul nostru este disponibil la https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'sr': 'Postoje tehnike za učenje mašine pružaju blizu ljudskog učenja na zadatkima klasifikacije na tekstu. Međutim, prisustvo višemodalne buke u podacima razgovora kao što su emotike, slang, greške pisanja, podaci mešani kod itd. čini postojeće rešenje dubokog učenja loše izvršavaju. Nesposobnost dubokog učenja da robno uhvate ove kovarijate stavlja kapu na njihovu izvedbu. Predlažemo NELEC: Neuralni i leksički kombiner, sistem koji elegantno kombinira tekstualne i duboko učenje bazirane metode za klasifikaciju sentiment a. Procjenjujemo naš sistem kao deo trećeg zadatka "Kontekstualne detekcije emocija u tekstu" kao deo polEvala-2019. Naš sistem izvodi značajno bolje od početne linije, kao i naše standarde model dubokog učenja. To je postigao mikro-srednji rezultat F1 od 0,7765, koji je treći red na testovom odboru. Naš kod je dostupan na https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'so': "Teqooyinka waxbarashada ee Midowga ah waxay soo bandhigaan sameynta dadka ku dhow shaqooyinka fasaxa qoraalka ku saleysan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee codka kala duduwan oo ku jira macluumaadka chatka, sida emoticons, jimicsiga, khaladda ku qoran, macluumaadka kooxaha isku xiran, etc. wuxuu sameeyaa xalalka waxbarashada oo aad u baahan. Isticmaalka waxbarashada mool-dheer si ay u qabsadaan, waxay daboolaan tababarka. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa NELEC: Combiner neural iyo Leksikal, taas oo si elegant ah u soo wada ururista qaababka iskuulka hoose-hoos-u-barashada farsamada. Waxaan nidaamka u qiimeynaynaa qayb ka mid ah shaqada saddexaad ee `Digta xasuusta ku qoran taariikhda' sida qayb ka mid ah SemEval-2019. nidaamkayagu wuxuu si aad u fiican u sameeyaa qoraalka hoose, sidoo kale qaababkayaga hoose waxbarashada. Waxay gaadhay koox fudud oo fudud F1 oo 0,7765 ah, wuxuuna ka dhigay darajad 3aad oo ku qoran hogaamiyaha imtixaanka. Aqoontayada waxaa laga helaa https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'mt': "It-tekniki eżistenti ta’ Tagħlim bil-Magni jagħtu rendiment qrib il-prestazzjoni tal-bniedem fuq kompiti ta’ klassifikazzjoni bbażati fuq it-test. Madankollu, il-preżenza ta’ storbju multimodali fid-dejta taċ-chat bħal emotikoni, slang, żbalji fl-ortografija, dejta mħallta bil-kodiċi, eċċ. tagħmel is-soluzzjonijiet eżistenti ta’ tagħlim fil-fond jaħdmu ħażin. L-inabbiltà tas-sistemi ta’ tagħlim profond li jaqbdu b’mod robust dawn il-kovarjanti tpoġġi limitu fuq il-prestazzjoni tagħhom. We propose NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combiner, a system which elegantly combines textual and deep-learning based methods for sentiment classification.  Aħna jevalwaw is-sistema tagħna bħala parti mit-tielet kompitu ta' 'Detezzjoni ta' Emożizzjoni Kuntest fit-Test' bħala parti mis-SemEval-2019. Is-sistema tagħna tagħmel prestazzjoni sinifikanti aħjar mil-linja bażi, kif ukoll il-punti ta’ riferiment tal-mudell tagħna ta’ tagħlim profond. Kiseb punteġġ F1 b’medja mikro ta’ 0.7765, li kellu t-tielet grad fuq il-mexxej-bord tas-sett tat-test. Il-kodiċi tagħna huwa disponibbli fuq https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'si': "ඉතින් මැෂින් ඉගෙන ඉගෙන ඉගෙනීම් තාක්ෂණාවල් මිනිස්සුන්ගේ වැඩසටහන් ලඟ පිළිබඳ විශේෂණ නමුත්, කතාව දත්තේ වඩා මොඩාල් මොඩාල් ශබ්දයේ තියෙන්නේ, සලකුණු වැරැද්ද, කෝඩ් මික්ස් දත්ත, ඉතින්. තියෙන්නේ ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගන ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න බැරි පද්ධතියට මේ කෝවාරියාන්ට අල්ලගන්න බැරි විදියට ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරධානයට කප්පියක අපි NELEC ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා: න්\u200dයූරාල් හා ලෙක්සිකාල් කොම්බින්ර්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් පද්ධතිය සහ ගොඩක් ඉගෙන අපි අපේ පද්ධතිය සෙම්වේල්-2019 ගේ කොටසක් විදියට 'සම්බන්ධ භාවිතාව හොයාගන්න' තුන්වෙනි වැඩේ කොටසක් විදියට අග අපේ පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතියට වඩා වැඩිය හොඳයි, අපේ ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් වගේ ඒක 0.7765 වලින් මයික්රෝස් අනුමාණය F1 ස්කෝර් එකක් ලැබුණා, පරීක්ෂණ සෙට් නිලධාරිය බෝර්ඩ් එකේ තුන්වෙ අපේ කෝඩ් එක පුළුවන් https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'sv': 'Befintliga maskininlﾃ､rningstekniker ger nﾃ､ra mﾃ､nsklig prestanda i textbaserade klassificeringsuppgifter. Fﾃｶrekomsten av multimodalt brus i chattdata som uttryckssymboler, slang, stavfel, kodblandade data osv gﾃｶr att befintliga djupinlﾃ､rningslﾃｶsningar presterar dﾃ･ligt. Fﾃｶrmﾃ･gan hos djupinlﾃ､rningssystem att pﾃ･ ett robust sﾃ､tt fﾃ･nga dessa kovariater sﾃ､tter ett tak pﾃ･ deras prestanda. Vi fﾃｶreslﾃ･r NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combiner, ett system som elegant kombinerar text- och djupinlﾃ､rningsbaserade metoder fﾃｶr sentimentklassificering. Vi utvﾃ､rderar vﾃ･rt system som en del av den tredje uppgiften "Contextual Emotion Detection in Text" som en del av SemEval-2019. Vﾃ･rt system presterar betydligt bﾃ､ttre ﾃ､n baslinjen, liksom vﾃ･ra riktmﾃ､rken fﾃｶr djupinlﾃ､rningsmodeller. Den uppnﾃ･dde en mikrogenomsnittlig F1-poﾃ､ng pﾃ･ 0,7765 och rankade 3:e pﾃ･ testsetets ledartavla. Vﾃ･r kod finns tillgﾃ､nglig pﾃ･ https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'ta': "தற்போதைய இயந்திரம் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் தொழில்நுட்பம் உரைப்படியான வகைப்பாட்டு பணிகளில் மனித செயல்பாட்டிற்கு  However, the presence of multi-modal noise in chat data such as emoticons, slang, spelling mistakes, code-mixed data, etc. makes existing deep-learning solutions perform poorly.  ஆழமான கற்றல் அமைப்புகளின் இயல்பானது இந்த கோவாரிட்டுகளை தானாகவே பிடிக்க இயலாது அவர்கள் செயல்பாட்டின் மீது ஒரு தொ நாம் நெலிசி: நெருக்கல் மற்றும் லெக்சிக்சியல் கூட்டிணைப்பு, ஒரு அமைப்பு, அது வெளிப்படையாக நிரல் மற்றும் ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளு 'உரையில் உள்ளடக்கமான உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பதின் மூன்றாவது செம்Eval-2019ல் பகுதியாக எங்கள் கணினியை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். எங்கள் அமைப்பு அடிப்படைக்கோட்டை விட மிகவும் மேலானதாக செயல்படுகிறது, மற்றும் எங்கள் ஆழமான கற்றல் மாதிரி குறிப் அது 0. 7765 க்கு ஒரு சிக்ரோ சராசரி F1 புள்ளியை அடைந்தது, சோதனைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட தலைப்பு பலகையில் மூன்றாவது நிறம். எங்கள் குறியீடு கிடைக்கும் https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'ur': 'موجود موجود ماشین سیکھنے کی ٹیکنیک ٹیکنیک ٹیکنیک ٹیکنیک ٹیکسٹ بنیاد پر انسان کی عملکرد کے قریب ہے۔ لیکن، چاٹ ڈیٹوں میں بہت سی موڈال غږ کی موجود ہے جیسے احساسات، اسلانگ، اسپلینگ کی خطائیں، کوڈ میکس ڈیٹا، اور اس کے بعد، موجود عمیق سیکھنے کے حل کو برا انجام دیتا ہے. درجے کی تعلیم سیستموں کی غیرقابلیت ان کے کامیابی پر ایک کاپ رکھتی ہے۔ ہم NELEC کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں: Neural and Lexical Combiner، ایک سیسٹم جسے اچھی طریقے سے متصل کرتا ہے، اور سیسٹم جسے سیسٹل اور عمیق سیکھنے کی بنیاد کی طریقے سے محسوس کرتا ہے. ہم نے اپنے سیسٹم کو نصف Eval-2019 کی ایک حصہ کے طور پر تیسرے کام کے طور پر مقرر کیا ہے۔ ہمارا سیستم بنسٹ لین سے بہتر عمل کرتا ہے، اور ہماری عمیق سیکھنے کی موڈل بنچمبارک بھی۔ اس نے 0.7765 کی ایک میکرومتوسط F1 اسکور پہنچ گیا، جو تست-سٹ لیڈر-بورد پر تیسرا رقم تھا. ہمارا کوڈ اس میں موجود ہے https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'uz': "Name Lekin, emoticonslar, slang, imkoniyatlarning xatosi, kodqat mixed maʼlumoti va huddi muloqalar tovushlarida mavjud boʻlgan soʻzlar muvaffaqiyatli bajaradi. Ushbu kovariatlarni o'rganish tizimlarini o'zgartirib boʻlmaydi ularning amalni bajarishiga qopchiq. Biz NELEC: Neural va Leksikal kombinar, bu tizim hissiyotning tabiiy va o'rganish asosida texnologiya o'rganish usullarini birlashtiradi. SemEval-2019ning birinchi qiymatimiz. Bizning tizimmiz asosiy satrindan ham juda yaxshi bajaradi, va eng o'rganish modelimizning modellarimizni moslash. U 0.7765ning kichik darajaga 0.7765ning kichkina F1 scorini topadi, sinab tugatilgan boshqaruvchi 3- chi darajada. Kodlash usuli https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'vi': 'Những kỹ thuật nắm giữ máy móc có lợi thế gần với con người trong các công việc phân loại văn bản. Tuy nhiên, sự hiện diện của tiếng ồn đa phương trong dữ liệu chat như biểu tượng, nghiêng, sai chính tả, mã trộn dữ liệu, v.v. làm cho những giải pháp ngầm hiện tại không tốt lắm. Sự thiếu khả năng của các hệ thống hiểu biết sâu để chiếm vững sự ảnh hưởng của họ. Chúng tôi đề nghị NELEC: Kết hợp thần kinh và ngôn ngữ dược, một hệ thống kết hợp kết hợp kết cấu kết hợp các phương pháp kết hợp cảm xúc. Chúng tôi đánh giá hệ thống như một phần của nhiệm vụ "trinh sát cảm xúc kép trong văn bản" trong thành phần của Semkhai-thẩm 9. Hệ thống của chúng ta hoạt động tốt hơn so với cơ sở cơ bản, cũng như những tiêu chuẩn mẫu nghiên cứu sâu. Nó đạt được vi tính số F1 thu thập vi số 0.765, thứ thứ hạng thứ ba trên bảng lãnh đạo. Mật mã của chúng tôi có sẵn ở https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'bg': 'Съществуващите техники за машинно обучение дават резултати близо до човешкото представяне при задачи за класификация въз основа на текст. Въпреки това, наличието на мултимодален шум в чат данни като емотикони, жаргон, правописни грешки, смесени с кодове данни и т.н., прави съществуващите решения за дълбоко обучение да се представят лошо. Неспособността на системите за дълбоко обучение да улавят надеждно тези ковариати поставя таван на тяхната ефективност. Предлагаме система, която елегантно съчетава текстови и дълбоко обучение базирани методи за класификация на сентимента. Ние оценяваме нашата система като част от третата задача на "Контекстуално откриване на емоции в текста" като част от СемЕвал-2019. Системата ни се представя значително по-добре от базовата база, както и референтните показатели за модела на дълбоко обучение. Той постига микро-среден резултат от 0,7765, класирайки се на трето място в класацията на теста. Нашият код е достъпен на адрес: https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'nl': "Bestaande Machine Learning technieken leveren bijna menselijke prestaties op op tekst gebaseerde classificatietaken. Echter, de aanwezigheid van multimodale ruis in chatgegevens zoals emoticons, slang, spelfouten, code-gemengde gegevens, enz. zorgt ervoor dat bestaande deep learning oplossingen slecht presteren. Het onvermogen van deep-learning systemen om deze covariaten robuust te vangen zet een limiet op hun prestaties. Wij stellen NELEC voor: Neural and Lexical Combiner, een systeem dat op elegante wijze tekstuele en deep-learning gebaseerde methoden combineert voor sentimentclassificatie. We evalueren ons systeem als onderdeel van de derde taak van 'Contextual Emotion Detection in Text' als onderdeel van SemEval-2019. Ons systeem presteert aanzienlijk beter dan de basislijn, evenals onze deep-learning model benchmarks. Het behaalde een micro-gemiddelde F1 score van 0.7765, die op de 3e plaats stond in het klassement van de testset. Onze code is beschikbaar op https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'da': "Eksisterende maskinlæringsteknikker giver tæt på menneskelig ydeevne på tekstbaserede klassificeringsopgaver. Men tilstedeværelsen af multimodal støj i chatdata som humørikoner, slang, stavefejl, kodeblandede data osv. gør eksisterende deep learning-løsninger til at fungere dårligt. Deep-learning systemers manglende evne til at fange disse kovariater robust sætter et loft på deres ydeevne. Vi foreslår NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combiner, et system, der elegant kombinerer tekst- og dyblæringsbaserede metoder til sentiment klassificering. Vi evaluerer vores system som en del af den tredje opgave med `Contextual Emotion Detection in Text' som en del af SemEval-2019. Vores system fungerer betydeligt bedre end baseline, såvel som vores benchmarks for deep learning model. Den opnåede en mikrogennemsnitlig F1 score på 0,7765 og rangerede 3. på testsættets leaderboard. Vores kode er tilgængelig på https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'hr': 'Postoje tehnike učenja strojeva pružaju blizu ljudskog učenja na zadatkima klasifikacije na tekstu. Međutim, prisutnost višemodalnih buka u podacima razgovora kao što su emotike, slang, pogreške pisanja, podaci mješane kod itd. čini postojeće duboko učenje rješenja loše izvršavaju. Nesposobnost sustava dubokog učenja da robotno uhvate ove kovariate stavlja kap na njihovu izvedbu. Predlažemo NELEC: Neuralna i leksička kombinacija, sustav koji elegantno kombinira tekstualne i duboko učenje bazirane metode za klasifikaciju osjećaja. Procjenjujemo naš sustav kao dio trećeg zadatka „Kontekstualno otkrivanje emocija u tekstu” u sklopu polEvala-2019. Naš sustav izvršava značajno bolje od početne linije, kao i naše kriterije modela dubokog učenja. Došlo je do mikro-srednje rezultate F1 od 0,7765, na trećem redosljedu vođe test a. Naš kod je dostupan na https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'de': "Bestehende maschinelle Lerntechniken liefern nahezu menschliche Leistungen bei textbasierten Klassifizierungsaufgaben. Das Vorhandensein von multimodalen Rauschen in Chat-Daten wie Emoticons, Slang, Rechtschreibfehlern, Code-Mixed-Daten usw. führt jedoch dazu, dass bestehende Deep-Learning-Lösungen schlecht funktionieren. Die Unfähigkeit von Deep-Learning-Systemen, diese Kovariaten robust zu erfassen, schränkt ihre Leistung ein. Wir schlagen NELEC vor: Neural and Lexical Combiner, ein System, das textuelle und Deep-Learning-basierte Methoden zur Stimmungsklassifizierung elegant kombiniert. Wir evaluieren unser System im Rahmen der dritten Aufgabe von `Contextual Emotion Detection in Text' im Rahmen von SemEval-2019. Unser System schneidet deutlich besser ab als die Basislinie und unsere Deep-Learning-Modell-Benchmarks. Es erreichte eine mikrogemittelte F1-Punktzahl von 0.7765 und rangierte auf dem dritten Platz in der Testset-Bestenliste. Unser Code ist verfügbar unter https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'id': "Teknik pembelajaran mesin yang ada mendekati prestasi manusia pada tugas klasifikasi berdasarkan teks. Namun, kehadiran kebisingan multi modal dalam data percakapan seperti emotikon, slang, kesalahan ejaan, kode-campuran data, dll membuat solusi belajar dalam yang ada berjalan buruk. Kegagalan sistem belajar dalam untuk menangkap kovarian-kovarian ini meletakkan topi pada prestasi mereka. We propose NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combiner, a system which elegantly combines textual and deep-learning based methods for sentiment classification.  Kami mengevaluasi sistem kami sebagai bagian dari tugas ketiga dari 'Deteksi Emosi Konteksual dalam Teks' sebagai bagian dari SemEval-2019. Sistem kita berfungsi jauh lebih baik dari dasar dasar, serta benchmarks model belajar dalam kita. Ini mencapai skor F1 yang berrata-rata mikro 0,7765, peringkat ketiga di papan pemimpin set tes. Kode kita tersedia di https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'fa': 'تکنیک یادگیری ماشین موجود نزدیک به عملکرد انسان روی کار\u200cهای مختصات متن می\u200cباشد. با این حال، حضور صدای متعدد مدال در داده های صحبت مانند احساسات، تغییر کردن، اشتباهی نوشتن، داده های متعدد کد و غیر از آن، راه حل های عمیق یادگیری وجود دارد بد انجام می دهد. غیرقابلیت سیستم\u200cهای یادگیری عمیق برای دقت گرفتن این کاواریات\u200cها یک کلاه بر عملکرد آنها قرار می\u200cدهد. ما به NELEC پیشنهاد می کنیم: ترکیب عصبی و لکسیکی، یک سیستم که به صورت طبیعی روش\u200cهای متن و یادگیری عمیق برای ترکیب احساسات را ترکیب می\u200cکند. ما سیستم خود را به عنوان بخشی از وظیفه سوم «آشنایی Emotions Contextual in Text» به عنوان بخشی از نیم Eval-2019 ارزیابی می کنیم. سیستم ما خیلی بهتر از خط پایین انجام می دهد، همچنین مدل یادگیری عمیق ما را انجام می دهد. آن به یک امتیاز F1 متوسط میکرومتوسط از 0.7765 رسید که درجه سوم در صفحه رهبر تست آموزش شد. کد ما در دسترس است https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'sw': 'Teknolojia za Kujifunza Mashine zinaleta karibu na utendaji wa binadamu kwenye kazi za usambazaji wa maandishi. Hata hivyo, kuwepo kwa sauti mbalimbali katika takwimu za mazungumzo kama vile hisia za hisia, wimbo, makosa ya kuandika, data tofauti za kodi, etc. inafanya ufumbuzi wa kujifunza vibaya. Uwezekano wa mifumo ya kujifunza ya kina kushikilia mabadiliko haya yanaweka vifuniko juu ya utendaji wao. Tunapendekeza NELEC: Kambini wa Kifaransa na Kilexico, mfumo ambao unaunganisha kwa kiasi kikubwa na njia za kujifunza za msingi kwa ajili ya kutangaza hisia. Tunatathmini mfumo wetu kama sehemu ya jukumu la tatu la “Kutambua Uchunguzi wa Mambo ya Nchini ya Maandishi” kama sehemu ya SemEval-2019. Mfumo wetu unafanya vizuri zaidi ya msingi, pamoja na misingi yetu ya kujifunza ya kina. Ilipata kiwango cha wastani kidogo cha F1 cha 0.7765, kilichokuwa na rangi ya tatu kwenye kiongozi aliyetengenezwa. Utawala wetu unapatikana katika https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'tr': "Öň bar Makine öwrenmek teknikleri, metin daýanýan klasifikasynda adamlaryň eserini ýakyn edýär. Ýöne, köp modal gürrüň bolmagy ýaly cäreler, gaýşartmak, ymlanyň ýalňyşynyň, ködlemeler karmaşgalan maglumatlary we bölekler. Öň bar derin öwrenmek çözümlerini ýalňyş edip bilýär. Gowy öwrenme sistemalarynyň bu kowariýatlaryny güýçli tutmak üçin başaryşlaryny ukyplaryna goýýar. NELEC:Nöral ve Leksik Kombiner,duyguları klasifikasyon için teknoloji ve derin öğrenme tabanlı yöntemleri birleştiren bir sistem teklif ediyoruz. Biz sistemimizi SemEval-2019'in üçüncü görevinin bir parças ı olarak değerlendiriyoruz. Biziň sistemamyz üýtgeşik çyzygymyzdan we çuňk öwrenmek nusgalarymyzdan has gowy işleýär. Bu ýerler mikro ortalamaly 0,7765 sany diýip atlandyrylýar, testler toparynda 3-nji derejä geldi. Biziň kodymyz bar https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'sq': "Teknikët ekzistuese të mësimit të makinave japin afër performancës njerëzore në detyrat e klasifikimit me bazë teksti. Megjithatë, prania e zhurmës multimodale në të dhënat e bisedimeve të tilla si emotikone, slang, gabime ortografike, të dhëna të përziera me kod, etj. bën që zgjidhjet ekzistuese të mësimit të thellë të funksionojnë keq. The inability of deep-learning systems to robustly capture these covariates puts a cap on their performance.  Ne propozojmë NELEC: Kombinues neuronal dhe leksikal, një sistem që kombinon elegant metodat tekstuale dhe të mësimit të thellë për klasifikimin e ndjenjave. Ne vlerësojmë sistemin tonë si pjesë e detyrës së tretë të 'Detektimit të Emocioneve Konteksuale në Tekst' si pjesë e SemEval-2019. Sistemi ynë funksionon më mirë se baza, si dhe standartet tona të modelit të mësimit të thellë. Ajo arriti një pikë F1 me një mesatare mikro-të 0.7765, renditje e tretë në bordin kryesor të grupit të testit. Kodi ynë është në dispozicion në https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'af': "Bestaande Masjien Leer Teknike gee naby na menslike prestasie op teksbaseerde klasifikasie taak. Maar die teenwoordigheid van multimodale geluid in geselselsdata soos emotikies, slang, speletjies foute, kode gemengde data, ens. maak bestaande diep- leer oplossings sleg uitvoer. Die onmoontlikheid van diep-leersystemee om hierdie koaariete in kragtig te vang, stel 'n kap op hulle prestasie. Ons voorstel NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combiner, 'n stelsel wat elegant teks en diep-leer gebaseerde metodes kombinieer vir sentiment klasifikasie. Ons evalueer ons stelsel as deel van die derde taak van 'Konteksual Emotie Deteksie in Teks' as deel van SemEval-2019. Ons stelsel uitvoer beter as die basislien en ons diep-leer model benchmarke. Dit het 'n mikro-gemiddelde F1 telling van 0,7765 bereik, ranking 3de op die toets-stel leier-bord. Ons kode is beskikbaar by https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'am': 'የመኪን ማስተማር ስልጣኖች የጽሑፍ ክፍል አድራጊ ስራዎችን ለመቅረብ የሚቀርቡ ናቸው፡፡ ነገር ግን የአካባቢው ድምፅ፣ emoticons፣ ስህተት፣ የድምፅ ስህተት፣ የኮድ-የተለየ ዳታ እና የጥልቅ ትምህርት መፍትሕርት ጉዳይ ይችላል፡፡ The inability of deep-learning systems to robustly capture these covariates puts a cap on their performance.  የኔሌክሲ እና የሊክሲካል ኮምፒዩተር፣ የጽሑፍ እና የጥልቅ ትምህርት ሥርዓት ለስሜት መግለጫ የሚጠቅመውን ስርዓት እናስጠጋለን፡፡ ሲምEval-2019 የጽሑፍ ግንኙነት ማሳየት በሦስተኛው ስራ ክፍል ነው፡፡ የድምፅ ስርዓታችን ከመጀመሪያው ደረጃዎች የበለጠ እና የጥልቅ ትምህርት ሞዴል መክፈቻችንን ያሳያል፡፡ የ. የፊደል ቅርጽ https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'hy': 'Գոյություն ունեցող մեքենային ուսումնասիրության մեթոդները մոտ են մարդկային արտադրողություններին տեքստի հիմնված դասակարգման խնդիրների վրա: Այնուամենայնիվ, բազմամոդալ աղմուկի գոյությունը խոսակցության տվյալներում, ինչպիսիք են զգացմունքները, սլենգը, ուղղագրության սխալները, կոդի խառնված տվյալները և այլն, ստիպում է գոյություն ունեցող խորը սովորելու լուծումները Խաղր ուսումնասիրության համակարգերի անկարողությունը ուժեղ բռնել այս կովարիանտները ծածկում է նրանց արտադրությունը: Մենք առաջարկում ենք ՆԵԼԵՔ-ը՝ նյարդային և լեքսիկական համախմբիչը, մի համակարգ, որը էլեգանտապես համախմբում է զգացմունքների դասակարգման տեքստալ և խորը ուսումնասիրություն հիմնված մեթոդներ: Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր համակարգը որպես "Կոնտեքստալ զգացմունքների հայտնաբերման տեքստում" երրորդ հանձնարարության մաս, որպես "ՍեմԵվալ-2019" մաս: Our system performs significantly better than the baseline, as well as our deep-learning model benchmarks.  Այն հասավ 0.7765-ի միկրոմիջին F1 գնահատականի, որը երրորդ գնահատականն էր թեստի կազմակերպման առաջնորդում: Մեր կոդը հասանելի է https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'az': 'Əvvəlki Makina Öyrənmə Tehnikləri, məktub tabanlı klasifikasiya işlərində insan performansına yaxınlaşır. Ancaq, emotikon, slang, spelling errors, code-mixed data etc. kimi çoxlu modal səslərin varlığı dərin öyrənmə çətinliklərini zəif işlədir. Bu covariatları çox qüvvətli tutmaq üçün derin öyrənmə sistemlərinin imkansızlığı onların performans üstünə çəkir. Biz NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combiner təklif edirik, sentiment klasifikasyonu üçün textual and deep learning based methods combined. Biz sistemimizi "Metin\'in Kontekst Emotion Detection" üçüncü görevinin bir parças ı olaraq qədər değerlendiririk. Sistemimiz temel çətinlikdən daha yaxşı işlər edir, həmçinin derin öyrənmə modeli benchmarklarımız. Bu mikro ortalamalı F1 nöqtəsi 0,7765 dərəcəsinin 3. dərəcəsini sınağa qurulmuşdur. Bizim kodumuz https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'bn': 'বিদ্যমান মেশিন শিক্ষা প্রযুক্তি লেখা ভিত্তিক ক্লাসাফিকেশন কাজের উপর মানুষের প্রদর্শনের কাছে কাছাকাছি প তবে আড্ডাটাতে অনেক মডিমোডাল আওয়াজের উপস্থিতি যেমন emoticon, slang, বানান ভুল, কোড মিশ্রিত তথ্য ইত্যাদি বিদ্যমান গভীর শিক্ষার সমাধান খুব খারা গভীর শিক্ষা ব্যবস্থাগুলোকে তাদের প্রদর্শনের উপর একটি ক্যাপ দিয়েছে। We propose NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combiner, a system which elegantly combines textual and deep-learning based methods for sentiment classification.  আমরা আমাদের সিস্টেমের তৃতীয় কাজ হিসেবে মূল্যায়ন করি সেমইভাল-২০১৯ এর অংশ হিসেবে। আমাদের সিস্টেম বেসেলাইনের চেয়ে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভালো কাজ করে, আর আমাদের গভীর শিক্ষার মডেল বেনমার্ক। এটি একটি মাইক্রো গড়ে এফ১ স্কোর অর্জন করেছে ০. ৭৭৬৫, পরীক্ষা সেট নেতা বোর্ডে তৃতীয় রেঙ্গার। আমাদের কোড পাওয়া যাচ্ছে https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'bs': 'Postoje tehnike učenja mašine pružaju blizu ljudskog učenja na zadatkima klasifikacije na tekstu. Međutim, prisustvo višemodalne buke u podacima razgovora kao što su emotike, slang, greške pisanja, podaci mešani kod itd. čini postojeće rešenje dubokog učenja loše izvršavaju. Nesposobnost sustava dubokog učenja da robotno uhvate ove kovarijate stavlja kap na njihovu izvedbu. Predlažemo NELEC: Neuralna i leksička kombinacija, sistem koji elegantno kombinira tekstualne i duboko učenje bazirane metode za klasifikaciju osjećaja. Procjenjujemo naš sistem kao dio trećeg zadatka „Kontekstualno otkrivanje emocija u tekstu” kao dio polEvala-2019. Naš sistem izvodi značajno bolje od početne linije, kao i naše kriterije model dubokog učenja. Došlo je do mikro-srednje F1 rezultate od 0,7765, na trećem redosljedu vođe test a. Naš kod je dostupan na https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'ko': "기존의 기계 학습 기술은 텍스트를 바탕으로 하는 분류 임무에서의 표현이 인류에 가깝다.그러나 채팅 데이터에서 다중모드적 소음의 존재, 예를 들어 이모티콘, 비속어, 맞춤법 오류, 코드 혼합 데이터 등은 기존의 심도 있는 학습 해결 방안이 좋지 않다.심도 있는 학습 시스템은 이런 협동 변수를 유력하게 포착할 수 없기 때문에 그것들의 표현을 제한한다.우리는 NELEC: 신경과 어휘 조합기를 제시했는데 이것은 텍스트와 깊이 있는 학습을 바탕으로 하는 감정 분류 방법을 우아하게 결합시키는 시스템이다.SemEval-2019의 세 번째 임무인'텍스트 중의 언어 환경 정서 검측'의 일부로서 우리는 우리 시스템에 대해 평가를 실시했다.우리의 시스템은 기준보다 뚜렷하게 우수하고 우리의 깊이 있는 학습 모델 기준보다 우수하다.그것은 0.7765의 F1 미평균 점수를 얻어 테스트 세트 랭킹 3위에 올랐다.우리 코드는https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'ca': 'Les tècniques d\'aprenentatge màquinari existents s\'apropen al rendiment humà en tasques de classificació basades en text. Tanmateix, la presença de soroll multi modal en dades de conversa com emoticons, slang, errors d\'ortografia, dades combinades amb codi, etc. fa que les solucions d\'aprenentatge profund existents funcionen malament. La incapacitat dels sistemes d\'aprenentatge profund de capturar aquests covariats posa un cap al seu rendiment. Proposem NELEC: Combinador Neural i Lèxic, un sistema que combina elegantment mètodes basats en l\'aprenentatge profund i textual per la classificació del sentiment. Evaluam el nostre sistema com part de la tercera tasca de "Detecció d\'emocions contextuals en text" com part de SemEval-2019. Our system performs significantly better than the baseline, as well as our deep-learning model benchmarks.  Va aconseguir una puntuació F1 de 0,7765 amb una mitjana de 0,7765, en tercer lloc a la junta de líders. El nostre codi està disponible en https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'cs': 'Stávající techniky strojového učení přinášejí téměř lidský výkon při klasifikačních úkolech založených na textu. Nicméně přítomnost multimodálního šumu v chatových datech, jako jsou emotikony, slang, pravopisné chyby, data smíšená kódem atd., způsobuje špatné fungování stávajících řešení hlubokého učení. Neschopnost systémů hlubokého učení robustně zachytit tyto kovariaty omezuje jejich výkon. Navrhujeme NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combiner, systém, který elegantně kombinuje metody založené na textuálním a hlubokém učení pro klasifikaci sentimentů. Náš systém hodnotíme jako součást třetího úkolu "Kontextová detekce emocí v textu" v rámci SemEval-2019. Náš systém funguje výrazně lepší než základní hodnota, stejně jako naše referenční hodnoty modelů hlubokého učení. Dosáhla mikroprůměrného F1 skóre 0,7765 a třetího místa v žebříčku testovacího setu. Náš kód je k dispozici na adrese https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'fi': "Nykyiset koneoppimistekniikat tuottavat lähes ihmisen suorituskykyä tekstipohjaisissa luokittelutehtävissä. Kuitenkin multimodaalisen kohinan esiintyminen chattitiedoissa, kuten hymiöissä, slangissa, oikeinkirjoitusvirheissä, koodisekoitetuissa tiedoissa jne., tekee olemassa olevista syväoppimisratkaisuista huonon suorituskyvyn. Syväoppimisjärjestelmien kyvyttömyys siepata näitä kovariaatteja vakaasti rajoittaa niiden suorituskykyä. Ehdotamme NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combiner -järjestelmää, joka yhdistää tyylikkäästi tekstiin ja syväoppimiseen perustuvia menetelmiä tunteiden luokitteluun. Arvioimme järjestelmäämme osana SemEval-2019:n kolmannesta tehtävästä `Contextual Emotion Detection in Text'. Järjestelmämme suoriutuu huomattavasti paremmin kuin perusmalli ja syväoppimisen mallivertailuarvot. Se saavutti mikrokeskiarvon F1-pisteen 0,7765 ja sijoittui kolmanneksi testisarjan johtoryhmässä. Koodimme on saatavilla osoitteessa https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'et': 'Olemasolevad masin천ppe tehnikad annavad tekstip천histe klassifitseerimis체lesannete puhul inimese j천udlusele l채hedase. Mitmeliigilise m체ra olemasolu vestlusandmetes, nagu emotikonid, sl채ng, 천igekirjavead, koodisega andmed jne, muudab olemasolevad s체gav천ppe lahendused halvaks. S체gav천ppe s체steemide suutmatus neid kaasmuutujaid kindlalt tabada seab nende j천udluse piiri. Pakume v채lja NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combiner, s체steem, mis 체hendab elegantselt teksti- ja s체gav천ppep천hiseid meetodeid sentimentaalse klassifitseerimise jaoks. Hindame oma s체steemi osana kolmandast 체lesandest "Kontekstuaalne emotsioonide tuvastamine tekstis" SemEval-2019 raames. Meie s체steem toimib oluliselt paremini kui l채htetase, samuti meie s체gav천ppe mudeli v천rdlusn채itajad. Ta saavutas mikro-keskmise F1 skoori 0,7765, kohal kolmandal kohal testikomplekti juhtlaual. Meie kood on k채ttesaadav aadressil https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'jv': '" politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Aja nguasai sistem sing didalah-didalah kanggo ngerasai layang-layang iki koyo ngono nggawe barang kanggo tukang tarjamahan. Awak dhéwé nggunakake NeLAC: Neral lan Leksial Kombiner, sistem sing elegantis ngregani gambar textual lan deep-Learn method kanggo kelas Sensitif. Awak dhéwé éntukno sistememuk dikarol ning terus nggawe ning \'context emutation detection in Text\' dikarol ning semiinval-2011. Sistem dhéwé éntuk sing luwih apik sing luwih apik sing luwih dumateng, ngono awak dhéwé kuwi model kuwi ngregani. text-box-mode Awake kode sing dibutuhke ing https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'ha': "@ action: button Kayya, ko da sau masu yawa na sauri cikin data masu yin mazaɓa kamar masu motsi, kiyaye, kuskure, kuskure da aka rubũta, da data da kodi-Mixed, yana sanya masu buƙata masu yin aiki daidai. An kasa tsarin da aka sanar da masu ƙari da za'a kãma waɗannan kovariattu, sai ya sanya wani rufe a kan karatunsu. Tuna goyyar da NELEC: Combiner na Neural da Leksika, wata na'ura wanda ke haɗa matsayin da matsayin da masu sanar da matsayi masu ƙari. Mu ƙaddara kanmu kamar rabon aikin na uku na `Sura na Email in Text' kamar rabon SemEV-2019. Systeminmu yana da mafiya alhẽri daga bakin salon, da misalin misalinmu masu ƙari. Tana sami wani nau'in F1 mai ƙidãya na 0.7765, mai randin rubuci na rubutu a kan shirin-mai-jarraba. QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'he': 'טכניקות לימוד מכונות קיימות נותנות קרובות לביצוע אנושי על משימות מסווגים מבוססים בטקסט. עם זאת, הנוכחות של רעש רב-מודיאלי בנתונים של צ\'אט כמו רגשיות, סלנג, טעויות באיתוי, נתונים מעורבים קוד וכו"כ גורמת לפתרונות למידה עמוקה קיימות להתבצע רע. היכולת של מערכות למידה עמוקה לתפוס באופן חזק את הקובריאנטים האלה מכניסה כובע על ההופעה שלהם. אנחנו מציעים שילוב נוירולי ולקסיקלי, מערכת שמשולבת באופן אלגנטי שיטות טקסטוליות ומבוססות למידה עמוקה לסימון רגשות. אנו מעריכים את המערכת שלנו כחלק מהמשימה השלישית של "גילוי רגשות קונטקסטיים בטקסט" כחלק ממערכת חצי-2019. המערכת שלנו מבצעת טוב יותר משמעותית, כמו גם נקודות הדרך שלנו למידה עמוקה. הוא השיג נקודת F1 בממוצע של 0.7765, המדרגות השלישית על לוח המנהיגים. הקוד שלנו זמין ב https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec', 'sk': "Obstoječe tehnike strojnega učenja pri opravilih klasifikacije na podlagi besedila prinašajo blizu človeške zmogljivosti. Vendar pa obstoječe rešitve globokega učenja slabo delujejo zaradi prisotnosti multimodalnega hrupa v klepetalnih podatkih, kot so emotikoni, sleng, črkovalne napake, podatki z mešanimi kodami itd. Nezmožnost sistemov globokega učenja, da bi zanesljivo zajeli te kovariate, postavlja omejitev njihove zmogljivosti. Predlagamo NELEC: Nevral and Lexical Combiner, sistem, ki elegantno združuje besedilne in globoko učne metode za klasifikacijo sentimenta. Naš sistem ocenjujemo kot del tretje naloge `Zaznavanje kontekstualnih čustev v besedilu' v okviru SemEval-2019. Naš sistem je bistveno boljši od osnovnih vrednosti, kot tudi meril modela globokega učenja. Dosegla je mikropovprečno F1 rezultat 0,7765 in se uvrstila na 3. mesto na vodilni lestvici testnega nabora. Naša koda je na voljo na spletni strani https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec", 'bo': "Existing Machine Learning techniques yield near to human performance on text-based classification tasks. However, the presence of multi modal noise in chat data such as emoticons, slang, spelling mistakes, code-mixed data, etc. makes existing deep-learning solutions perform poorly. ཁོང་ཚོའི་དགོས་ཆེན་གྱི་ཟབ་བློ་རིམ་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་མ་རྐྱེན་ཚད་འདི་དག་གི་སྒྲུབ་སྟངས་བསྟར་པར་ཆགས་པ་སྒྲིག We propose NELEC: Neural and Lexical Combiner, a system which elegantly combines textual and deep-learning based methods for sentiment classification. We evaluate our system as part of the third task of `Contextual Emotion Detection in Text' as part of SemEval-2019. Bizim sistemimiz bazı çizgileri... ...ve bizim derin öğrenme modellerimiz için çok iyi performansı olur. It achieved a micro-averaged F1 score of 0.7765, ranking 3rd on the test-set leader-board. ང་ཚོའི་ཨང་རྟགས་འདི་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/iamgroot42/nelec"}
{'en': 'NTUA-ISLab at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Determining emotions in contextual conversations with deep learning', 'ar': 'NTUA-ISLab في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: تحديد المشاعر في المحادثات السياقية مع التعلم العميق', 'fr': 'NTUA-ISlab au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Déterminer les émotions dans les conversations contextuelles grâce au deep learning', 'pt': 'NTUA-ISLab no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Determinando emoções em conversas contextuais com aprendizado profundo', 'es': 'NTUA-ISLAB en Semeval-2019 Tarea 3: Determinar las emociones en conversaciones contextuales con deep learning', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のNTUA - ISLabタスク3 ：ディープラーニングを伴う文脈での会話における感情の決定', 'zh': 'NTUA-ISLab at SemEval-2019 务3:深学定情', 'hi': 'NTUA-ISLab SemEval-2019 कार्य 3 पर: गहरी शिक्षा के साथ प्रासंगिक बातचीत में भावनाओं का निर्धारण', 'ru': 'NTUA-ISLab на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Определение эмоций в контекстных разговорах с глубоким обучением', 'ga': 'NTUA-ISlab ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Mothúcháin a chinneadh i gcomhráite comhthéacsúla le foghlaim dhomhain', 'ka': 'NTUA-ISLab SemEval-2019 სამუშაო სამუშაო დავალება 3: ემოციების განსაზღვრება კონტექსტური პარამეტრებში შავადი სწავლებით', 'hu': 'NTUA-ISLab a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: Az érzelmek meghatározása kontextuális beszélgetésekben mélytanulással', 'it': 'NTUA-ISLab a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Determinare le emozioni nelle conversazioni contestuali con il deep learning', 'kk': 'NTUA-ISLab at semiEval-2019 Task 3: Emotions in contextual conversations with deep learning', 'lt': 'NTUA-ISLab 2010 m. puslapyje 3 užduotis: emocijų nustatymas kontekstiniuose pokalbiuose su giliu mokymusi', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Προσδιορισμός συναισθημάτων σε συζητήσεις περιβάλλοντος με βαθιά μάθηση', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3- ലെ NTUA- ISLab: ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന സംസാരത്തിലെ വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d തീരുമാനിക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'NTUA-ISLab di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Menentukan emosi dalam perbualan kontekstual dengan belajar dalam', 'mk': 'NTUA-ISLab на SemEval-2019 задача 3: Одредување на емоциите во контекстуалните разговори со длабоко учење', 'mn': 'NTUA-ISLab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: context conversations with deep learning', 'ro': 'NTUA-ISLab la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Determinarea emoțiilor în conversațiile contextuale cu învățarea profundă', 'mt': 'NTUA-ISLab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Determining emotions in contextual conversations with deep learning', 'sr': 'NTUA-ISLab na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: određivanje emocija u kontekstualnim razgovorima sa dubokim učenjem', 'si': 'NTUA-ISLab at semeval-2019 Job 3: සංවේදනය සමග ග ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න හැඟීම් තියෙන්න', 'pl': 'NTUA-ISLab w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Wyznaczanie emocji w kontekstowych rozmowach za pomocą głębokiego uczenia', 'no': 'NTUA-ISLab at semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3: Bestemming av emosjonar i kontekstiske samtaler med dyp læring', 'sv': 'NTUA-ISLab på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Bestämning av känslor i kontextuella samtal med djupinlärning', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 3: தற்போதைய உரையாடலில் உள்ள உணர்வுகளை ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொண்டு தீர்மானிக்கிறது', 'so': 'NTUA-ISLab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Go’aan emotions in conversations contextual with deep learning', 'ur': 'NTUA-ISLab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: emotions in contextual conversations with deep learning', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Task 3: Determine emotions in contextual conversation with deep learning', 'vi': 'Định vị cảm xúc trong các cuộc đối thoại ngữ với học thức sâu', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Определяне на емоциите в контекстуалните разговори с дълбоко учене', 'hr': 'NTUA-ISLab na semiEval-2019. zadatak 3: određivanje emocija u kontekstalnim razgovorima s dubokim učenjem', 'id': 'NTUA-ISLab di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Menentukan emosi dalam percakapan kontekstual dengan belajar dalam', 'de': 'NTUA-ISLab bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Emotionen in kontextuellen Gesprächen mit Deep Learning ermitteln', 'da': 'NTUA-ISLab på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Bestemme følelser i kontekstuelle samtaler med dyb læring', 'ko': 'NTUA ISLab이SemEval-2019에서의 임무3: 심도 있는 학습을 통해 언어 대화의 정서를 확정한다', 'nl': 'NTUA-ISLab bij SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Emoties bepalen in contextuele gesprekken met deep learning', 'sw': 'NTUA-ISLab katika SemEval-2019 Task 3: Kugundua hisia katika mazungumzo ya wakati ujao na kujifunza kwa kina', 'tr': 'NTUA-ISLab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Duýgyny tenzim etmek', 'sq': 'NTUA-ISLab në SemEval-2019 Task 3: Determining emotions in contextual conversations with deep learning', 'hy': 'ՆԹՈԱ-ԻՍԼաբ, 2019 թվականի կիսագնդի 3. հանձնարարությունը. հույզերի որոշումը խորը սովորելու հետ համատեքստային զրույցներում', 'fa': 'NTUA-ISLab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Determining emotions in contextual conversations with deep learning', 'af': 'NTUA-ISLab by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 3: Besluit emosies in contextual conversations with deep learning', 'am': 'NTUA-ISLab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Detecting emotions in contextual conversation with deep learning', 'az': 'NTUA-ISLab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Duygusal 칬yr톛nm톛k il톛 m칲xt톛lif m칲zakir톛l톛rd톛 duygular캼 t톛yin etm톛k', 'ca': 'NTUA-ISLab a SemEval-2019 tasca 3: Determinar emocions en converses contextuals amb aprenentatge profund', 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৩-এ NTUA-ISLab: গভীর শিক্ষা দিয়ে গভীর শিক্ষা দিয়ে প্রাক্তন আলোচনায় অনুভূতি নির্ধারণ করা হচ্ছে', 'et': 'NTUA-ISLab SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 3: Emotsioonide määramine kontekstuaalsetes vestlustes süvaõppega', 'fi': 'NTUA-ISLab SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 3: Tunteiden määrittäminen kontekstuaalisissa keskusteluissa syväoppimisen avulla', 'bs': 'NTUA-ISLab na semiEval-2019 Task 3: određivanje emocija u kontekstalnim razgovorima sa dubokim učenjem', 'cs': 'NTUA-ISLab na SemEval-2019 Úkol 3: Stanovení emocí v kontextových konverzacích pomocí hlubokého učení', 'jv': 'For', 'sk': 'NTUA-ISLab na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Določanje čustev v kontekstnih pogovorih z globokim učenjem', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'he': 'NTUA-ISLab ב SemEval-2019 משימה 3: לקבוע רגשות בשיחות קונטקסטיות עם לימוד עמוק', 'bo': 'NTUA-ISLab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Determining emotions in contextual conversations with deep learning'}
{'en': 'Sentiment analysis (SA) in texts is a well-studied Natural Language Processing task, which in nowadays gains popularity due to the explosion of social media, and the subsequent accumulation of huge amounts of related data. However, capturing emotional states and the sentiment polarity of written excerpts requires knowledge on the events triggering them. Towards this goal, we present a computational end-to-end context-aware SA methodology, which was competed in the context of the SemEval-2019 / EmoContext task (Task 3). The proposed system is founded on the combination of two neural architectures, a deep recurrent neural network, structured by an attentive Bidirectional LSTM, and a deep dense network (DNN). The system achieved 0.745 micro f1-score, and ranked 26/165 (top 20 %) teams among the official task submissions.', 'ar': 'يعد تحليل المشاعر (SA) في النصوص مهمة معالجة اللغة الطبيعية المدروسة جيدًا ، والتي تكتسب شعبية في الوقت الحاضر بسبب انفجار وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ، والتراكم اللاحق لكميات هائلة من البيانات ذات الصلة. ومع ذلك ، فإن التقاط الحالات العاطفية والقطبية العاطفية للمقتطفات المكتوبة يتطلب معرفة بالأحداث التي أدت إليها. لتحقيق هذا الهدف ، نقدم منهجية حسابية شاملة للسياق واعية بالسياق SA ، والتي تم التنافس عليها في سياق مهمة SemEval-2019 / EmoContext (المهمة 3). تم إنشاء النظام المقترح على أساس مزيج من معمارتين عصبيتين ، شبكة عصبية متكررة عميقة ، منظمة من قبل ثنائية الاتجاه اليقظة LSTM ، وشبكة كثيفة عميقة (DNN). حقق النظام 0.745 micro f1-Score ، واحتلت المرتبة 26/165 (أعلى 20٪) فرقًا بين عمليات إرسال المهام الرسمية.', 'fr': "L'analyse des sentiments (SA) dans les textes est une tâche bien étudiée de traitement du langage naturel, qui gagne en popularité de nos jours en raison de l'explosion des médias sociaux et de l'accumulation subséquente d'énormes quantités de données connexes. Cependant, pour saisir les états émotionnels et la polarité des sentiments des extraits écrits, il faut connaître les événements qui les déclenchent. À cette fin, nous présentons une méthodologie informatique de bout en bout sensible au contexte, qui a été mise en œuvre dans le cadre de la tâche SemEval-2019/EMOContext (tâche 3). Le système proposé est fondé sur la combinaison de deux architectures neuronales, un réseau neuronal récurrent profond, structuré par un LSTM bidirectionnel attentif, et un réseau dense profond (DNN). Le système a obtenu un score micro f1 de 0,745 et a classé 26/165 équipes (20\xa0% des meilleures équipes) parmi les soumissions de tâches officielles.", 'es': 'El análisis de sentimientos (SA) en los textos es una tarea de procesamiento del lenguaje natural bien estudiada, que en la actualidad gana popularidad debido a la explosión de las redes sociales y la posterior acumulación de enormes cantidades de datos relacionados. Sin embargo, capturar los estados emocionales y la polaridad de los sentimientos de los extractos escritos requiere conocimiento de los eventos que los desencadenan. Para lograr este objetivo, presentamos una metodología de SA computacional de extremo a extremo sensible al contexto, que se compitió en el contexto de la tarea SemEval-2019/ EmoContext (Tarea 3). El sistema propuesto se basa en la combinación de dos arquitecturas neuronales, una red neuronal recurrente profunda, estructurada por un LSTM bidireccional atento y una red densa profunda (DNN). El sistema logró una puntuación de 0.745 micro F1 y clasificó a 26/165 (el 20% superior) de los equipos entre las presentaciones oficiales de tareas.', 'pt': 'A análise de sentimentos (SA) em textos é uma tarefa bem estudada do Processamento de Linguagem Natural, que atualmente ganha popularidade devido à explosão das mídias sociais e o consequente acúmulo de enormes quantidades de dados relacionados. No entanto, captar os estados emocionais e a polaridade sentimental dos excertos escritos requer o conhecimento dos eventos que os desencadeiam. Para este objetivo, apresentamos uma metodologia computacional ponta-a-ponta de SA sensível ao contexto, que foi competida no contexto da tarefa SemEval-2019 / EmoContext (Tarefa 3). O sistema proposto baseia-se na combinação de duas arquiteturas neurais, uma rede neural recorrente profunda, estruturada por um LSTM bidirecional atento, e uma rede densa profunda (DNN). O sistema alcançou 0,745 micro f1-score e classificou 26/165 (top 20%) equipes entre as submissões de tarefas oficiais.', 'zh': '文本之情析(SA)一穷治之自然语言,社交媒体爆炸式之长,随其大数之积,于今益受欢迎。 然捕情书面两极性须知触发。 为此者,举端到端上下文知SA之道,争于SemEval-2019 / EmoContext(任3)之上下文。 所建统立于二神经架构之上,即细心双向LSTM构之深递归神经网络与深密网络(DNN)。 统得0.745微f1分数,并于官中排名第26/165(前20%)团队。', 'ja': '文章における感情分析（ SA ）は、よく研究された自然言語処理タスクであり、ソーシャルメディアの爆発的な発展とその後の膨大な量の関連データの蓄積により、現在では人気を博しています。しかし、感情的な状態と抜粋の感情の極性を捉えるには、それらを引き起こす事象に関する知識が必要である。この目標に向けて、私たちは、SemEval -2019/EmoContextタスク（タスク3 ）のコンテキストで競われた、計算的エンドツーエンドのコンテキスト認識SA方法論を提示します。提案されているシステムは、注意深い双方向LSTMによって構成される深い再帰的ニューラルネットワークと、深い密度の高いネットワーク（ DNN ）という2つのニューラルアーキテクチャの組み合わせに基づいています。システムは0.745マイクロf 1スコアを達成し、公式タスク提出物の中で26/165 （上位20 ％ ）のチームをランク付けしました。', 'ru': 'Анализ сентиментов (SA) в текстах - хорошо изученная задача Natural Language Processing, которая в настоящее время набирает популярность благодаря взрыву социальных медиа, и последующему накоплению огромных объемов связанных с этим данных. Однако для фиксации эмоциональных состояний и полярности чувств письменных отрывков требуется знание о событиях, их провоцирующих. Для достижения этой цели мы представляем методологию SA, учитывающую весь контекст вычислений, которая конкурировала в контексте задачи SemEval-2019 / EmoContext (Задача 3). Предлагаемая система основана на комбинации двух нейронных архитектур, глубокой рекуррентной нейронной сети, структурированной внимательным двунаправленным LSTM, и глубокой плотной сети (DNN). Система достигла 0,745 микро f1 балла и заняла 26/165 место (топ-20%) среди официальных заданий.', 'hi': 'ग्रंथों में भावना विश्लेषण (एसए) एक अच्छी तरह से अध्ययन किया गया प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्य है, जो आजकल सोशल मीडिया के विस्फोट के कारण लोकप्रियता हासिल करता है, और संबंधित डेटा की भारी मात्रा के बाद के संचय के कारण। हालांकि, भावनात्मक राज्यों पर कब्जा करने और लिखित अंशों की भावना ध्रुवीयता के लिए उन्हें ट्रिगर करने वाली घटनाओं पर ज्ञान की आवश्यकता होती है। इस लक्ष्य की ओर, हम एक कम्प्यूटेशनल एंड-टू-एंड संदर्भ-जागरूक एसए पद्धति प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जिसे SemEval-2019 / EmoContext कार्य (कार्य 3) के संदर्भ में प्रतिस्पर्धा की गई थी। प्रस्तावित प्रणाली दो तंत्रिका आर्किटेक्चर, एक गहरी आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क, एक चौकस द्विदिश एलएसटीएम, और एक गहरे घने नेटवर्क (डीएनएन) द्वारा संरचित के संयोजन पर स्थापित की गई है। सिस्टम ने 0.745 माइक्रो एफ 1-स्कोर हासिल किया, और आधिकारिक कार्य प्रस्तुतियों के बीच 26/165 (शीर्ष 20%) टीमों को स्थान दिया।', 'ga': 'Is tasc Próiseála Teanga Nádúrtha atá dea-staidéar á dhéanamh ar anailís mothúcháin (SA) i dtéacsanna, a bhfuil an-tóir air sa lá atá inniu ann de bharr pléascadh na meán sóisialta, agus an carnadh ina dhiaidh sin de mhéideanna ollmhóra sonraí gaolmhara. Mar sin féin, teastaíonn eolas ar na himeachtaí a spreag iad chun staid mhothúchánach agus polaraíocht meon na sleachta scríofa a ghabháil. I dtreo na sprice seo, cuirimid i láthair modheolaíocht SA atá feasach ar an gcomhthéacs ríomhaireach ó cheann ceann go ceann, a cuireadh san iomaíocht i gcomhthéacs thasc SemEval-2019 / EmoContext (Tasc 3). Tá an córas atá beartaithe bunaithe ar dhá ailtireacht néaracha a chomhcheangal, gréasán néarach athfhillteach domhain, struchtúrtha ag LSTM Déthreo aireach, agus líonra dlúth domhain (DNN). Bhain an córas 0.745 micreascór f1 amach, agus rangaíodh 26/165 (20%) foirne i measc na n-aighneachtaí taisc oifigiúla.', 'el': 'Η ανάλυση συναισθημάτων (Α.Ε.) στα κείμενα είναι μια καλά μελετημένη εργασία επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας, η οποία στις μέρες μας κερδίζει δημοτικότητα λόγω της έκρηξης των μέσων κοινωνικής δικτύωσης και της συνακόλουθης συσσώρευσης τεράστιων ποσοτήτων σχετικών δεδομένων. Ωστόσο, η καταγραφή των συναισθηματικών καταστάσεων και της πολικότητας των γραπτών αποσπασμάτων απαιτεί γνώση των γεγονότων που τα προκαλούν. Για την επίτευξη αυτού του στόχου, παρουσιάζουμε μια υπολογιστική μεθοδολογία με επίγνωση του περιβάλλοντος, η οποία ανταγωνίστηκε στο πλαίσιο της εργασίας στο πλαίσιο της εργασίας του έργου ΈμοContext (Εργασία 3). Το προτεινόμενο σύστημα βασίζεται στο συνδυασμό δύο νευρωνικών αρχιτεκτονικών, ενός βαθύυ επαναλαμβανόμενου νευρωνικού δικτύου, δομημένου από ένα προσεκτικό αμφίδρομο δίκτυο και ενός βαθύυ πυκνού δικτύου (DNN). Το σύστημα πέτυχε 0.745 μικροσκορ και κατατάχθηκε στις ομάδες 26/165 (κορυφαία 20%) μεταξύ των επίσημων υποβαλλόμενων εργασιών.', 'ka': 'Sentiment ანალიზი (SA) ტექსტებში კარგი სწავლილი ნახვა ენერგიის პროცესის დავალება, რომელიც ახლა მოვიღებს პოლუგარიტება სოციალური მედიაზე ექსპლუზაციის შემდეგ და შემდეგ შესახებ მნიშვნელოვანი მონაცე მაგრამ, ემოციონალური ღირებები და დაწერების სენტიმენტური პოლარიტი უნდა იცოდნენ მოვლენების შესახებ. ამ მიზეზის მიხედვით, ჩვენ კომპიუტაციალური კონტექსტური კონტექსტური მეტოლოგია SA, რომელიც SemEval-2019 / EmoContext დავალების კონტექსტურში კონტექსტურებულია (დავალება 3). პროგრამეტული სისტემა იქნება ორი ნეიროლური აქტიქტიქტურების კომბინეციაზე, ძალიან რეკურენტიური ნეიროლური ქსელის კომბინეციაზე, სტრუქტურებული ორეთექციოლური LSTM, და ძალ სისტემის შესაძლებლობა 0,745 მიკრო f1-score და 26/165 (უფრო 20%) ჯგუფები უფრო ფაქტიურ დავამუშავებულების შორის.', 'hu': 'A szövegekben az érzelmek elemzése (SA) egy jól tanulmányozott Természetes Nyelv Feldolgozási feladat, amely napjainkban a közösségi média robbanása és az ezt követő hatalmas mennyiségű adat felhalmozódása következtében népszerűvé válik. Azonban az érzelmi állapotok és az írott részletek érzelmi polaritásának megörökítéséhez ismereteket igényel az azokat kiváltó eseményekről. Ennek érdekében bemutatunk egy számítástechnikai end-to-end kontextustudatos SA módszert, amely a SemEval-2019 / EmoContent feladat (3. feladat) keretében versenyzett. A javasolt rendszer két neurális architektúra, egy mély visszatérő neurális hálózat, amelyet figyelmes kétirányú LSTM strukturál, és egy mély sűrű hálózat (DNN) kombinációján alapul. A rendszer 0,745 micro f1 pontszámot ért el, és 26/165 (top 20%) csapatot rangsorolt a hivatalos feladatok között.', 'it': "L'analisi dei sentimenti (SA) nei testi è un compito di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale ben studiato, che oggi guadagna popolarità a causa dell'esplosione dei social media e del conseguente accumulo di enormi quantità di dati correlati. Tuttavia, catturare gli stati emotivi e la polarità sentimentale degli estratti scritti richiede conoscenze sugli eventi che li innescano. Per raggiungere questo obiettivo, presentiamo una metodologia computazionale end-to-end context-aware SA, che è stata competuta nel contesto del compito SemEval-2019 / EmoContent (Task 3). Il sistema proposto si basa sulla combinazione di due architetture neurali, una rete neurale ricorrente profonda, strutturata da un attento LSTM bidirezionale, e una rete densa profonda (DNN). Il sistema ha ottenuto 0,745 micro f1-score e classificato 26/165 (top 20%) squadre tra le candidature ufficiali.", 'lt': 'Sentimento analizė tekstuose yra gerai išnagrinėta gamtinės kalbos apdorojimo užduotis, kuri šiandien didėja populiarumas dėl social in ės žiniasklaidos sprogimo ir vėlesnio didelių susijusių duomenų kaupimo. Tačiau emocinės būklės ir rašytinių ištraukų jausmų poliarumas reikalauja žinių apie juos sukeliančius įvykius. Siekiant šio tikslo pristatome skaičiavimo metodiką, kuri buvo pagrįsta aplinkybėmis ir kuri konkuravo pagal SemEval-2019 / EmoContext užduotį (3 užduotis). Siūloma sistema grindžiama dviejų nervų architektūrų – gilaus pasikartojančio nervų tinklo, kurį struktūruoja atidus dvikryptis LSTM, ir gilaus tankio tinklo (DNN) deriniu. Sistema pasiekė 0,745 mikro f1 balai, o 26 iš 165 (geriausių 20 %) komandų buvo oficialiai pateiktos užduotys.', 'kk': 'Мәтіндерде Sentiment анализ (SA) жақсы зерттеулі Түзіндік тілдерді өңдеу тапсырмасы. Бұл әзіргі уақытта социалдық медиақтарды жұмыс істеу себебі, соңғы мәліметтердің көп бөлігін жұмыс істеу себебі болад Бірақ емоциялық күйлерді түсіру мен жазылған күйлердің поляриялығы оларды бастайтын оқиғалар туралы білім керек. Бұл мақсатына қарсы, біз компьютерлік соңындағы контексті бақылайтын SA методологиясын таңдаймыз. Бұл semiEval-2019 / EmoContext тапсырмасының контексті (3 тапсырма) бақылады. Келтірілген жүйе екі невралдық архитектураларды, қайталанатын қайталанатын невралдық желінің біріктіріміне негізделген, қайталанатын екі бағытты LSTM және қайталанатын қайталанатын желі (DNN) құрылады. Жүйе 0,745 микро f1- нүкте жеткізді, және официалдық тапсырмаларды жіберу үшін 26/ 165 (жоғары 20%) топтарды орындады.', 'mt': 'L-analiżi tas-sensazzjoni (SA) fit-testi hija kompitu ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi naturali studjat sewwa, li llum qed jikseb popolarità minħabba l-isplużjoni tal-midja soċjali, u l-akkumulazzjoni sussegwenti ta’ ammonti kbar ta’ dejta relatata. Madankollu, il-qbid ta’ stati emozzjonali u l-polarità tas-sentimenti ta’ l-eċċezzjonijiet bil-miktub jeħtieġu għarfien dwar l-avvenimenti li jikkawżawhom. Lejn dan l-għan, qed nippreżentaw metodoloġija tal-SA li tkun konxja mill-kuntest minn tarf sa tarf, li kienet ikkompetita fil-kuntest tal-kompitu SemEval-2019 / EmoContext (Kompitu 3). The proposed system is founded on the combination of two neural architectures, a deep recurrent neural network, structured by an attentive Bidirectional LSTM, and a deep dense network (DNN).  Is-sistema kisbet 0.745 punteġġ mikro f1, u kklassifikat 26/165 (l-ogħla 20%) timijiet fost is-sottomissjonijiet uffiċjali tal-kompiti.', 'mk': 'Анализата на чувствата (СА) во текстовите е добро проучена задача за процес на природен јазик, која во денешно време добива популарност поради експлозијата на социјалните медиуми и последната акумулација на огромни количини поврзани податоци. Сепак, заробувањето на емоционалните состојби и чувствителната поларитет на напишаните извлекувања бара знаење за настаните кои ги предизвикуваат. Надвор кон оваа цел, претставуваме компјутативна методологија на СА со контекст од крај до крај, која се натпреваруваше во контекст на задачата SemEval-2019 / EmoContext (задача 3). Предложениот систем се основа на комбинацијата на две нервни архитектури, длабока рецидентна нервна мрежа, структурирана од внимателна Бидирекционална ЛСТМ и длабока густа мрежа (ДНН). Системот постигна 0,745 микро ф1 оценки и рангираше 26/165 (највисоки 20 отсто) тимови помеѓу официјалните поднесувања на задачите.', 'ms': 'Analisis perasaan (SA) dalam teks adalah tugas Pemprosesan Bahasa Alami yang dipelajari dengan baik, yang pada hari ini mendapatkan popularitas disebabkan letupan media sosial, dan akumulasi seterusnya jumlah besar data berkaitan. Bagaimanapun, menangkap keadaan emosional dan polariti perasaan dari potongan tertulis memerlukan pengetahuan mengenai peristiwa yang memicu mereka. Ke arah tujuan ini, kami memperkenalkan metodologi SA yang menyadari konteks akhir-akhir, yang bersaing dalam konteks tugas SemEval-2019 / EmoContext (Tugas 3). Sistem yang diusulkan didasarkan pada kombinasi dua arkitektur saraf, rangkaian saraf yang berkurang dalam, struktur oleh LSTM Biarah yang perhatian, dan rangkaian yang padat dalam (DNN). Sistem mencapai 0.745 skor-f1 mikro, dan menjadikan 26/165 pasukan (top 20%) diantara penghantaran tugas rasmi.', 'mn': 'Шинэ санааны шинжилгээ (SA) нь сайн судалсан Байгалийн хэл Процессорын үйл ажиллагаа. Энэ нь өнөөдөр нийгмийн мэдээллийн ажиллагааны ажиллагаанд нэр хүндэтгэгддэг ба дараагийн дараа нь маш олон харилцааны өгөгдлийг цуглуулдаг. Гэвч сэтгэл хөдлөлийн төвшин болон бичсэн хэлбэрийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийг барьж авах нь тэднийг үүсгэдэг үйл явдлын талаар мэдлэг хэрэгтэй. Энэ зорилго руу бид компьютерийн төгсгөл-төгсгөлд мэдрэгдсэн SA методологийг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь SemEval-2019 / EmoContext ажлын төгсгөлд өрсөлдөг. Хоёр мэдрэлийн архитектур, гүн гүнзгий дахин давтагдах мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд байгуулагдсан байгууллагын систем үүсгэгддэг. Энэ систем нь 0.745 микро f1 оноо хүртэл, 26/165 (дээд 20%) баг официйн ажлын давтамжтайгаар нэмэгдсэн.', 'pl': 'Analiza sentymentów (SA) w tekstach to dobrze zbadane zadanie Przetwarzania Języka Naturalnego, które w dzisiejszych czasach zyskuje popularność ze względu na eksplozję mediów społecznościowych, a później gromadzenie ogromnych ilości powiązanych z nimi danych. Jednak uchwycenie stanów emocjonalnych i polaryzacji sentymentów pisanych fragmentów wymaga wiedzy na temat wydarzeń, które je wywołują. W tym celu przedstawiamy obliczeniową, kompleksową metodologię kontekstową SA, która została konkurowana w kontekście SemEval-2019 pod kątem zadania EmoContext (Zadanie 3). Proponowany system opiera się na połączeniu dwóch architektur neuronowych, głębokiej powtarzającej się sieci neuronowej, skonstruowanej przez uważny dwukierunkowy LSTM oraz głębokiej gęstej sieci (DNN). System osiągnął 0.745 micro f1 wynik, a zespoły 26/165 (najlepsze 20%) zaliczyły wśród oficjalnych zgłoszeń zadań.', 'ro': 'Analiza sentimentelor (SA) în texte este o sarcină bine studiată de procesare a limbajului natural, care în prezent câștigă popularitate datorită exploziei rețelelor sociale și acumulării ulterioare a cantităților imense de date conexe. Cu toate acestea, captarea stărilor emoționale și polaritatea sentimentală a extraselor scrise necesită cunoașterea evenimentelor care le declanșează. În acest scop, prezentăm o metodologie computațională end-to-end conștientă de context SA, care a fost concurată în contextul sarcinii SemEval-2019 / EmoContent (Task 3). Sistemul propus se bazează pe combinația a două arhitecturi neurale, o rețea neurală recurentă profundă, structurată de un LSTM bidirecțional atent și o rețea densă profundă (DNN). Sistemul a obținut 0,745 micro f1-scor și a clasat 26/165 (top 20%) echipe printre depunerile oficiale de sarcini.', 'no': 'Sentiment analyse (SA) i tekstar er ein godt studiert naturspråk-handteringsoppgåve, som i dagar får popularitet på grunn av eksploderinga av sosiale medier, og den følgjande akumuleringa av store mengdar av relaterte data. Men å henta emosjonelle tilstandar og sentimentpolariteten av skrivne uttrykk krev kunnskap om hendingane som utløysar dei. Til denne målet presenterer vi ein databasert kontekst-til-slutt-kjent SA-metodologi, som var kompetert i konteksten av semiEval-2019 / EmoContext-oppgåva (oppgåve 3). Systemet foreslått er basert på kombinasjonen av to neuralarkitekturar, ein dyp gjentakelig neuralnettverk, strukturert av ein attentiv Bidirectional LSTM, og ein dyp tett nettverk (DNN). Systemet oppnådd 0,745 mikro f1-poeng, og rangerte 26/165 (top 20%) grupper mellom dei offisielle oppgåvelsene.', 'si': 'සංවේදනය විශ්ලේෂණය (SA) පණිවිඩයට හොඳින් අභ්\u200dයාතික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් විශ්වාස කරනවා, ඒ වගේම අදින් සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමයේ  නමුත්, ලියපු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන හැඟීම් ස්ථානයක් අල්ලගන්න හැඟීම් ස්ථානය සහ ලියපු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවශ මේ අදහසට, අපි පරීක්ෂණය අවසානයෙන් ඉවරයි-අවසානයෙන් ඉවරයි-අවසානයෙන් ඉවරයි, SA පරීක්ෂණ විද්\u200dයාව, ඒක සෙම්වේල්-2019 / EmoContext ක් වැඩ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය පද්ධතිය ස්ථාපිත කරලා තියෙන්නේ න්\u200dයූරාල ස්ථාපනය දෙකක් සම්බන්ධයක්, ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය, සංස පද්ධතිය 0.745 මයික්රෝ f1-ස්කෝර් එකක් ලැබුණා, සහ 26/165 (උපරිම 20%) කණ්ඩායම් අධාරික වැඩ සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සිටි', 'sr': 'Sentimentna analiza (SA) u tekstima je dobar studiran zadatak procesiranja prirodnog jezika, koji danas dobija popularnost zbog eksplozije društvenih medija i poslednje akumulacije ogromnih količin a povezanih podataka. Međutim, uhvatiti emocionalne države i osjećaj polarnosti napisanih izraza zahteva znanje o događajima koji ih izazivaju. Prema ovom cilju predstavljamo računalnu metodologiju SA-a koji je bio natjecani u kontekstu zadatka semiEval-2019 / EmoContext-a (zadatak 3). Predloženi sistem je osnovan na kombinaciji dve neuralne arhitekture, duboko rekonstruirane neuralne mreže, strukturirane od strane pažnje dvosmjerne LSTM i duboke guste mreže (DNN). Sistem je postigao 0,745 mikro f1 rezultata, a u redovima su 26/165 (najboljih 20%) timova među službenim podacima zadataka.', 'so': 'Shahaadada ku saabsan qoraalka (SA) waa shaqo aad u bartay baaritaanka afka asalka ah, kaas oo maantadan la gaadhay dad faro badan sababtoo ah dillaacinta mitandada bulshada iyo dib u soo urursashada macluumaad badan oo la xiriira. Si kastaba ha ahaatee la qabsashada xaaladaha xisaabta iyo xuquuqda guud ee qoraalka waxay u baahan tahay aqoon ku saabsan dhacdooyinka ay soo wareegayaan. Ujeeda, waxaynu keenaynaa qaab xisaab ah dhammaad-dhammaad-dhammaad-aware SA, kaas oo lagu delayso xiliga SemEval-2019/EmoContext (Task 3). Waxaa la aasaasay nidaamka la soo jeeday labada meelood oo neurada ah, shabakad aad u dheer oo neurada ah, taasoo lagu dhisay qoraal aad u yaqaan LSTM iyo shabakad aad u dheer (DNN). Tirku wuxuu gaadhay 0.745 micro f1-score, wuxuuna ka mid ahaa koox 26/165 (top 20%).', 'sv': 'Känsleanalys (SA) i texter är en väl studerad Natural Language Processing uppgift, som idag blir populär på grund av explosionen av sociala medier och den efterföljande ackumuleringen av enorma mängder relaterade data. Men för att fånga känslomässiga tillstånd och känslopolariteten i skriftliga utdrag krävs kunskap om de händelser som utlöser dem. Mot detta mål presenterar vi en beräkningsmässig end-to-end kontextmedveten SA-metodik, som tävlades i samband med SemEval-2019 / EmoContent-uppgiften (Uppgift 3). Det föreslagna systemet bygger på en kombination av två neurala arkitekturer, ett djupt återkommande neuralt nätverk, strukturerat av en uppmärksam tvåriktad LSTM, och ett djupt tätt nätverk (DNN). Systemet uppnådde 0,745 mikro f1-poäng och rankade 26/165 (topp 20%) lag bland de officiella uppgiftslämnarna.', 'ta': 'உரைகளில் சென்டியல் விளக்கம் (SA) ஒரு நன்றாக ஆராய்ந்த இயல்பான மொழி செயல் செயல்பாடு, இப்போது சமூக ஊடகங்கள் வெடிப்பு காரணத்தால் மகிழ்ச்சியை பெருகிறது, பின்னர ஆனால், உணர்வு நாடுகளை பெற்றுக் கொள்வது மற்றும் எழுதப்பட்ட மேற்கூறுகளின் உணர்வு தீவிரம் தேவைப்படுகிறது அவர்களை விளைவ இந்த இலக்குக்கு வரை, நாம் கணக்கிட்ட முடிவு முடிவில் உள்ள சூழல் உணர்ந்த SA முறைமையை கொண்டு வருகிறோம், அது செம்Eval-2019 / EmoContext பணியின் சூழலில் ப The proposed system is founded on the combination of two neural architectures, a deep recurrent neural network, structured by an attentive Bidirectional LSTM, and a deep dense network (DNN).  அமைப்பு 0. 745 மைக்ரோ f1- புள்ளியை அடைந்தது, மற்றும் அரசியல் பணிக்கு அனுப்புகளில் 26/165 (மேல் 20%) குழுக்களை நிரப்பியது.', 'ml': 'Sentiment analysis (SA) in texts is a well-studied Natural Language Processing task, which in nowadays gains popularity due to the explosion of social media, and the subsequent accumulation of huge amounts of related data.  എന്നിട്ടും എഴുതിയിരിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥാനങ്ങളെ പിടിച്ചെടുക്കുന്നതും എഴുതിയിരിക്കുന്ന അഭിപ്രായത്തിന്റെ വികാരണ ഈ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെ അടുത്തേക്ക്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു കണക്ടിക്കൂട്ടി അവസാനിക്കുന്ന കോണ്\u200dട്ടെക്സ്റ്റോക്സ് അറിയുന്ന എസ് രീതിയില്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. അത്  പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സിസ്റ്റം രണ്ടു നെയൂറല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറുകളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d സ്ഥാപിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ആഴത്തെ തിരിച്ചുവരുന്ന ന നെയുറല്\u200d ന സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d 0. 745 മൈക്രോ എഫ്\u200c1 സ്കോര്\u200d എത്തിയപ്പോള്\u200d 26/165 (മുകളില്\u200d 20%) ടീമുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ചു.', 'ur': 'پیغام میں احساسات تحلیل (SA) ایک اچھی طرح تحقیق کی طبیعی زبان تحقیق کا کام ہے، جو آج سوسیل میڈیا کے انفجار کے باعث شفاعت حاصل کرتا ہے، اور اس کے بعد بہت سی معاملات کی جمع کرتی ہے۔ اگرچہ، احساساتی حالت کو پکڑنے اور لکھے ہوئے مثالیں کی احساساتی کی مضبوطی کو معلوم ہونے کی ضرورت ہے کہ ان کے ذریعے ان کے پیدا ہونے والی اتفاقات کے بارے میں علم ہے. اس مقصد کی طرف، ہم ایک کمپیوٹریشن end-to-end-context-aware SA methodology کو پیش کرتے ہیں، جو SemEval-2019 / EmoContext Task (Task 3) کے کنٹ میں مسابقه کی گئی تھی۔ پیشنهاد کی سیسٹم دو نیورل معماری، ایک عمیق دوبارہ نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک کی ترکیب پر بنیاد کی گئی ہے، جو ایک دہرائی دودہرانی LSTM کے ذریعہ ساختہ ہوئی ہے اور ایک عمیق گہرے نیورک (DNN) کے ذریعہ۔ سیسٹم نے 0.745 میکروفو f1-اسکو پہنچایا اور 26/165 (بالا 20%) ٹیموں کو رسمی ٹیموں میں شامل کیا۔', 'vi': 'Bản phân tích tình cảm (S) trong văn bản là một nhiệm vụ xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên được nghiên cứu cẩn thận, mà ngày nay trở nên phổ biến nhờ sự bùng nổ của các phương tiện xã hội, và sau đó tích lũy rất nhiều dữ liệu liên quan. Tuy nhiên, giành được các trạng thái cảm xúc và các quan điểm của các trích xuất viết yêu cầu kiến thức về các sự kiện đã kích động chúng. Để đạt được mục tiêu này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp theo dõi kết thúc tình huống, theo dự án SA, được thi hành trong ngữ cảnh SemEvol / EmoContact (Task 3). Hệ thống được đề xuất dựa trên sự kết hợp của hai kiến trúc thần kinh, một mạng lưới thần kinh tồn tại sâu và được cấu trúc bởi một tập trung hai hướng, và một mạng lưới dày đặc (DNS). Hệ thống đạt được 0.745 vi f1 điểm, và được xếp hạng 26/165 (top 20=) các nhóm làm nhiệm vụ chính thức.', 'uz': "Matlarda Sentiment Analysis (SA) yaxshi o'rganilgan tabiiy tilning jarayon vazifasi. Bu hozir hozirda sosial media eksplosiyati sababda jamiyatlarni yaxshi ko'plab olib keladi. Keyin esa ko'p bogʻ'liq maʼlumotlarni ko'paytirish mumkin. Lekin, hissiyot holatlarini olish va yozib qo'llangan hissiyotning hissiyotlarini tasavvur qilish uchun ularni ishga tushunadigan hodisalar haqida taʼlumot kerak. Bu maqsadga, biz SemEval-2019/EmoContext vazifa (Vazifa 3) muhit bilan birlashtirilgan kompyuterning oxiriga- oxiriga ega bo'lgan SA metodiyotga ega qilamiz. Aniqlanadigan tizim ikkita neyrol arkitekalari, davom etilgan neyrolik tarmoqni birlashtirish uchun yaratilgan, bidirektoriya va juda qiyin tarmoq (DNN) yaratilgan. Tizim 0.745 mikro f1 pochta topildi va rasm vazifalar imkoniyatlariga 26/165 (top 20%) guruhlarini boshqaradi.", 'bg': 'Анализът на сентимента в текстовете е добре проучена задача за обработка на естествения език, която в днешно време придобива популярност поради експлозията на социалните медии и последващото натрупване на огромни количества свързани данни. Заснемането на емоционалните състояния и полярността на сантименталните откъси обаче изисква знание за събитията, които ги задействат. За тази цел представяме изчислителна методология от край до край, която се конкурира в контекста на задачата Задача 3. Предложената система се основава на комбинацията от две неврални архитектури, дълбока рецидивираща неврална мрежа, структурирана от внимателен двупосочен ЛТМ и дълбока плътна мрежа (ДНН). Системата постигна 0,745 микро резултати и класира 26/165 (топ 20%) отбора сред официалните подадени задачи.', 'nl': "Sentiment analyse (SA) in teksten is een goed bestudeerde Natural Language Processing taak, die tegenwoordig populariteit wint door de explosie van sociale media en de daaropvolgende accumulatie van enorme hoeveelheden gerelateerde gegevens. Echter, het vastleggen van emotionele toestanden en de sentimentpolariteit van geschreven fragmenten vereist kennis over de gebeurtenissen die ze triggeren. Hiertoe presenteren we een computationele end-to-end context-bewuste SA methodologie, die werd gecompenseerd in de context van de SemEval-2019 'EmoContext' taak (Task 3). Het voorgestelde systeem is gebaseerd op de combinatie van twee neurale architecturen, een diep recidiverend neuraal netwerk, gestructureerd door een attent Bidirectioneel LSTM, en een diep dicht netwerk (DNN). Het systeem behaalde 0.745 micro f1-score en scoorde 26/165 (top 20%) teams onder de officiële inzendingen.", 'hr': 'Sentimentna analiza (SA) u tekstima je dobro ispitivan zadatak procesiranja prirodnog jezika, koji u današnje vrijeme dobija popularnost zbog eksplozije socijalnih medija, te nakon toga akumulacija ogromnih količin a povezanih podataka. Međutim, hvatanje emocionalnih država i polarnost osjećaja pisanih izraza zahtijeva znanje o događajima koji ih izazivaju. Prema ovom cilju predstavljamo računalnu metodologiju SA-a koja je bila natjecana u kontekstu zadatka semiEval-2019 / EmoContext-a (zadatak 3). Predloženi sustav je osnovan na kombinaciji dvije neuralne arhitekture, duboko rekonstruirane neuralne mreže, strukturirane pozornom dvosmjernom LSTM-om i dubokom gustoj mreži (DNN). Sistem je postigao 0,745 mikro f1 rezultata i rasporedao 26/165 (najboljih 20%) timova među službenim podacima zadataka.', 'da': 'Sentiment analyse (SA) i tekster er en velundersøgt Natural Language Processing opgave, som i dag vinder popularitet på grund af eksplosionen af sociale medier og den efterfølgende akkumulering af enorme mængder relaterede data. Men at fange følelsesmæssige tilstande og følelsespolariteten i skriftlige uddrag kræver viden om de begivenheder, der udløser dem. Mod dette mål præsenterer vi en beregningsmæssig end-to-end kontekstbevidst SA metode, som blev konkurreret i forbindelse med SemEval-2019 / EmoContent opgaven (Opgave 3). Det foreslåede system er baseret på en kombination af to neurale arkitekturer, et dybt tilbagevendende neuralt netværk, struktureret af en opmærksom bidirektional LSTM, og et dybt tæt netværk (DNN). Systemet opnåede 0,745 micro f1-score og rangerede 26/165 (top 20%) hold blandt de officielle opgaver indsendelser.', 'ko': '텍스트에서의 감정 분석은 광범위하게 연구된 자연 언어 처리 임무이다. 소셜 미디어의 폭발적인 발전과 그 후에 대량의 관련 데이터의 축적으로 인해 이 임무는 현재 점점 유행하고 있다.그러나 정서 상태와 서면 발췌의 정서를 포착하려면 그들을 촉발하는 사건을 알아야 한다.이 목표를 실현하기 위해 우리는 계산 단말기부터 단말기까지의 상하문 감지 SA 방법을 제시했는데 이 방법은SemEval-2019/EmoContext 임무(임무3)의 상하문에서 경쟁을 진행했다.제시된 시스템은 두 가지 신경 구조의 조합을 바탕으로 한다. 하나는 집중된 양방향 LSTM으로 구성된 깊이 귀속 신경 네트워크이고, 다른 하나는 깊이 밀집 네트워크(DNN)이다.이 시스템은 0.745점의 마이크로 f1 성적을 거두었고 제출한 공식 임무 중 26/165(상위 20%)에 올랐다.', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa mara kwa mara (SA) katika maandishi ni kazi inayosomwa vizuri katika Utarabu wa lugha, ambayo kwa sasa hivi sasa inapata umaarufu kutokana na mlipuko wa mitandao ya kijamii, na baada ya kukusanya idadi kubwa ya data zinazohusiana na. Hata hivyo, kuchukua matamko ya hisia na hisia za uchaguzi wa sehemu zilizoandikwa zinahitaji ufahamu wa matukio yanayowakabili. Mpaka lengo hili, tunaleta mbinu za takwimu za mwisho wa muktadha wa mafanikio ya SA, ambayo ilishindana katika muktadha wa SemEval-2019 / kazi ya EmoContext (Kazi 3). Mfumo huu unapendekezwa umeanzishwa kwenye muunganiko wa majengo mawili ya ubongo, mtandao wa neura unaoendelea kwa kiasi kikubwa, ulioanzishwa na LSTM yenye msimamo mkali, na mtandao wa ndani (DNN). Mfumo huo ulifanikiwa vipindi 0.745 vidogo vya f1, na ulipandisha timu 26/165 (asilimia 20 ya juu) miongoni mwa makubaliano rasmi ya kazi.', 'de': 'Sentiment Analysis (SA) in Texten ist eine gut studierte Aufgabe der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache, die heutzutage aufgrund der Explosion sozialer Medien und der anschließenden Anhäufung großer Mengen verwandter Daten an Popularität gewinnt. Die Erfassung emotionaler Zustände und der Stimmungspolarität schriftlicher Auszüge erfordert jedoch Kenntnisse über die Ereignisse, die sie auslösen. Zu diesem Zweck stellen wir eine computergestützte end-to-end kontextbezogene SA Methodik vor, die im Rahmen der SemEval-2019 und EmoContext Task (Task 3) konkurriert wurde. Das vorgeschlagene System basiert auf der Kombination von zwei neuronalen Architekturen, einem tiefen wiederkehrenden neuronalen Netzwerk, das von einem aufmerksamen bidirektionalen LSTM strukturiert ist, und einem tiefen dichten Netzwerk (DNN). Das System erzielte 0,745 Micro f1-Punktzahl und rangierte 26/165 (Top 20%) Teams unter den offiziellen Aufgabeneinträgen.', 'id': 'Analisis Sentiment (SA) dalam teks adalah tugas Proses Bahasa Alam yang dipelajari dengan baik, yang pada hari ini mendapatkan popularitas karena ledakan media sosial, dan akumulasi berikutnya jumlah besar data terkait. Namun, menangkap keadaan emosional dan polaritas sentimen dari potongan tertulis membutuhkan pengetahuan tentang peristiwa yang memicu mereka. Ke arah tujuan ini, kami mempersembahkan metodologi SA yang menyadari konteks akhir-akhir komputasi, yang berkompetisi dalam konteks tugas SemEval-2019 / EmoContext (Tugas 3). Sistem yang diusulkan didasarkan pada kombinasi dua arsitektur saraf, jaringan saraf yang berkurang dalam, terstruktur oleh LSTM Biarah yang perhatian, dan jaringan yang padat dalam (DNN). The system achieved 0.745 micro f1-score, and ranked 26/165 (top 20%) teams among the official task submissions.', 'fa': 'تحلیل احساساتی (SA) در متن یک کار پردازش زبان طبیعی خوب مطالعه می\u200cشود که در حال حاضر به خاطر انفجار رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی شهرت می\u200cیابد و جمع کردن تعداد بزرگی از داده\u200cهای مربوط به آن می\u200cیابد. با این حال، گرفتن وضعیت احساساتی و احساسات قطعی از مثالهای نوشته نیاز به دانش در مورد اتفاقات که ایجاد می کنند. به سمت این هدف، ما روش محاسبه\u200cای که در کنترل عملیات نیم\u200cEval-2019 / EmoContext (Task 3) آگاه شده\u200cایم را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. سیستم پیشنهاد بر ترکیب دو معماری عصبی، شبکه عصبی عمیق تکرار شده، ساخته شده توسط یک LSTM دو مستقیم و شبکه عمیق (DNN) است. این سیستم به 0.745 میکروفور f1 امتیاز رسید، و تیم\u200cهای ۲۶/165 (بالای ۲۰%) در میان تسلیم کارهای رسمی درجه داشت.', 'sq': 'Analiza e ndjenjave (SA) në tekste është një detyrë e studiuar mirë për procesimin e gjuhës natyrore, e cila në ditët e sotme fiton popullaritet për shkak të shpërthimit të mediave sociale dhe akumulimit të mëvonshëm të sasive të mëdha të të dhënave të lidhura. Megjithatë, kapja e shteteve emocionale dhe polariteti i ndjenjave të pjesëve të shkruara kërkon njohuri mbi ngjarjet që i shkaktojnë ato. Në drejtim të këtij qëllimi, ne paraqesim një metodologji kompjuterike të ndërgjegjëshme për kontekstin SA, e cila u konkurua në kontekstin e detyrës SemEval-2019 / EmoContext (Task 3). Sistemi i propozuar është themeluar në kombinimin e dy arkitekturave nervore, një rrjet nervor të thellë të përsëritur, të strukturuar nga një LSTM me vëmendje dy drejtime dhe një rrjet të thellë të dendur (DNN). Sistemi arriti 0.745 mikro pikë f1 dhe renditi 26/165 ekipe (20% më të lartë) midis paraqitjeve zyrtare të detyrës.', 'am': 'በጽሑፎች ውስጥ ሳንተርሚናል (SA) የተማረከ የናትሬካዊ ቋንቋ የሥርዓት ሥርዓት ነው፤ ዛሬ በማኅበራዊ ማኅበራዊ አውታር በመንቀሳቀስ እና ከዚህ በኋላ ብዙ የተለየ የዳታ አካባቢ ሰብስቦታል፡፡ ነገር ግን የemotional ሀብትን ለመወስድ እና የጽሕፈት ተግባር የሚያስፈልገውን ጉዳይ እውቀት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ወደዚህ አቃውሞ፣ የሳምEval-2019 / EmoContext ስራ (ስራ 3) በተቃውሞ የደረሰለት የፍጻሜ-ወደ መጨረሻው የSA ሥርዓት ማቀናቀል እናቀርባታለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ስርዓት በሁለት የናውሬል አካባቢዎች፣ ጥልቅ የሚቀጠል የናውሬል መረብ፣ በBidirectional LSTM እና ጥልቅ ጥቁር መረብ (DNN) የተመሠረተ ነው፡፡ ሲስተምሩ 0.745 ሚክሮር F1-score አግኝቷል፥ የሥልጣን ስራ አዋጅ ውስጥ 26/165 (በላይ 20 በመቶ) ቡድን ደረሰ።', 'tr': 'Sentiment analizi (SA) metinlerde gowy öwrenmeli Täbiýal dil işlemegi täblisasdyr. Şu wagtlar sosyal medýýatlaryň patlamasyndan we soňra gaty bir şekilde adamlaryň daňlapdyr. Ýöne duýgularyň durumlaryny taýýarlamak we ýazylan çykyşlaryň duýgularynyň polaritylygy olaryň başlatmagy üçin bilim gerek. Bu maksadyň ýanyna görä, biz sanat end-to-end context-aware SA methodologiýasyny görkezip otyrdyk. Bu maksady SemEval-2019 / EmoContext zadynyň (Görev 3) geçirildi. Bu teklip sistemi nuýral arhitektarlaryň birleşmesinde döredildi, gaty bir nuýral a ýry bilen döredildi. Bu sistemi nuýral arhitektarlaryň (DNN) bilen üýtgedildi. Sistem 0.745 mikro f1-skow bardy we resmi gören toparlaryň arasynda 26/165 (üst 20%) toparyna ýetdi.', 'af': "Sentiment analisie (SA) in tekste is 'n goed studieerde Natuurlike Taal-Prosessering-taak, wat vandag populariteit kry vanweë die uitbreiding van sosiale media en die volgende akumulasie van groot hoeveelheid verwante data. Maar om emosionele staatskappe en die sentimente polarisie van geskrywe uitdrukke te vang, benodig kennis op die gebeurtenis wat hulle ontvang. Gaan hierdie doel, voorsien ons 'n rekenasiese end-to-end context-aware SA metodologie, wat in die konteks van die SemEval-2019 / EmoContext taak (Taak 3) gemeenskap is. Die voorgestelde stelsel is gefundeer op die kombinasie van twee neurale arkitektuure, 'n diep herhaalde neuralnetwerk, gestrukteer deur 'n aandag tweederigtinglike LSTM en 'n diep dens netwerk (DNN). Die stelsel het 0.745 mikro f1-telling bereik en 26/165 (bo 20%) teams onder die offisiele taak-voorskrywings rangeer.", 'hy': 'Տեքստների զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը լավ ուսումնասիրել է բնական լեզվի վերլուծությունը, որը այսօր հայտնի է դառնում սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների պայթյունից և հետագայում կապված տվյալների հսկայական քանակությամբ: Այնուամենայնիվ, զգացմունքային վիճակների վերցնելը և գրված հատվածների զգացմունքային հյուսիսականությունը պահանջում են գիտելիք նրանց առաջացնող իրադարձությունների մասին: Այս նպատակի ուղղությամբ մենք ներկայացնում ենք հաշվարկների վերջ-վերջ կոնտեքստի գիտակցած ՍԱ մեթոդոլոգիա, որը մրցակցել է ՍեմԷվալ-2019-ի կոնտեքստում Պատրաստված համակարգը հիմնված է երկու նյարդային ճարտարապետությունների, խորը կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցի համադրության վրա, որը կառուցված է ուշադիր երկուղղությամբ LSMT-ի և խորը խտությամբ ցանցի (ԴՆԹ) միջոցով: Համակարգը ստացավ 0,745 միկրո f1-գնահատականներ, և 26-165 (լավագույն 20 տոկոսը) խմբեր դասակարգեց պաշտոնական խնդիրների ներկայացման մեջ:', 'az': 'Mətnlərdə Sentiment analizi (SA) yaxşı təhsil edilmiş Təbiətli Dil İşləməsi işidir. Bu günlərdə sosyal media patlamasından və sonradan böyük qiymətlərlə əlaqəli verilən məlumatların məşğullarını öyrənir. Lakin, emosiyal durumları və yazılmış sözlərin duygularını yaxalamaq olaraq onların başladıqları olaraq bilgi lazımdır. Bu məqsəd tərəfində, biz, SemEval-2019 / EmoContext işi (Task 3) ilə müqayisədə olduğu bilgisayar sona-sona-sona-bilən SA metodolojisini göstəririk. İstemli sistem iki nöral arhitektarının birləşdirilməsində qurulmuş, dərin bir nöral a ğ, dikkatli iki yönəlli LSTM və derin yoxlu ağ (DNN) ilə qurulmuşdur. Sistem 0,745 mikro f1 nöqtəsi qəbul etdi və resmi işlər təbliğlərinin arasında 26/165 (üst 20%) dəstəsi oldu.', 'bn': 'টেক্সটে সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণ (এসএ) একটি ভালো গবেষণা করা হয়েছে স্বাভাবিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার কাজ, যা সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যম বিস্ফোরণের কারণে বর্তমানে জনপ্র তবে আবেগের রাষ্ট্র এবং লিখিত ভাগের অনুভূতির বিষয়টি তুলে ধরার প্রয়োজন তাদের এই ঘটনার বিষয়ে জ্ঞানের প্রয়োজন। Towards this goal, we present a computational end-to-end context-aware SA methodology, which was competed in the context of the SemEval-2019 / EmoContext task (Task 3).  প্রস্তাবিত ব্যবস্থা দুটি নিউরেল স্থাপত্য, একটি গভীর পুনরাবর্তন নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক, একটি উদ্দেশ্য বাইডিয়াল এলএসএম এবং গভীর গভীর গভীর নেটওয়ার্ক (ডিএ এই সিস্টেম ০. ৭৪৫ মাইক্রো ফি১ স্কোর অর্জন করেছে এবং সরকারী কর্মসূচীর মধ্যে ২৬/১৬৫ (সর্বোচ্চ ২০%) দলের স্থাপন করেছে।', 'bs': 'Sentimentna analiza (SA) u tekstima je dobar studiran zadatak procesiranja prirodnog jezika, koji u današnje vrijeme dobija popularnost zbog eksplozije socijalnih medija, i nakon toga akumulacija ogromnih količin a povezanih podataka. Međutim, hvatanje emocionalnih država i polarnost osjećaja pisanih izraza zahtijeva znanje o događajima koji ih izazivaju. Prema ovom cilju predstavljamo računalnu metodologiju SA-a koji je bio natjecani u kontekstu zadatka semiEval-2019 / EmoContext-a (zadatak 3). Predloženi sistem je osnovan na kombinaciji dvije neuralne arhitekture, duboko rekonstruirane neuralne mreže, strukturirane od strane pažnje dvosmjerne LSTM i duboke guste mreže (DNN). Sistem je postigao 0,745 mikro f1 rezultata i u redovima 26/165 (najboljih 20%) timova među službenim podacima zadataka.', 'cs': 'Sentimentní analýza (SA) v textech je dobře studovaným úkolem zpracování přirozeného jazyka, který v dnešní době získává popularitu díky explozi sociálních médií a následné hromadění obrovského množství souvisejících dat. Zachycení emočních stavů a sentimentní polarity psaných úryvků však vyžaduje znalost událostí, které je spouštějí. Za tímto cílem představujeme výpočetní end-to-end kontextově orientovanou SA metodiku, která byla soutěžena v kontextu úlohy SemEval-2019 EmoContext (Task 3). Navržený systém je založen na kombinaci dvou neuronových architektur, hluboké rekurentní neuronové sítě strukturované pozorným obousměrným LSTM a hluboké husté sítě (DNN). Systém dosáhl 0,745 micro f1 skóre a zařadil 26/165 (nejlepší 20%) týmy mezi oficiální úkoly.', 'ca': "L'anàlisi del sentiment (SA) en els textos és una tasca ben estudiada de processament de llenguatges naturals, que actualment guanya popularitat a causa de l'explosió dels mitjans socials i l'acumulació posterior de grans quantitats de dades relacionades. Tot i així, capturar estats emocionals i la polaritat del sentiment de les extraccions escrites requereix coneixement sobre els esdeveniments que els desencadenan. Towards this goal, we present a computational end-to-end context-aware SA methodology, which was competed in the context of the SemEval-2019 / EmoContext task (Task 3).  El sistema proposat està basat en la combinació de dues arquitectures neuronales, una xarxa neuronal recurrent profunda, estructurada per un LSTM Bidireccional atent i una xarxa densa profunda (DNN). El sistema va aconseguir 0,745 micro f1 puntuacions i va classificar 26/165 equips (els 20% més grans) entre les proposicions oficials de la tasca.", 'et': 'Sentimendianalüüs tekstides on hästi uuritud looduskeele töötlemise ülesanne, mis tänapäeval muutub populaarseks sotsiaalmeedia plahvatuse ja sellele järgneva suure hulga seotud andmete kogunemise tõttu. Ent emotsionaalsete seisundite ja kirjalike väljavõtete sentimentaalse polaarsuse jäädvustamine nõuab teadmisi neid käivitavatest sündmustest. Selle eesmärgi saavutamiseks tutvustame arvutuslikku end-to-end kontekstiteadlikku SA metoodikat, mida konkureeriti SemEval-2019 / EmoContext ülesande kontekstis (ülesanne 3). Kavandatud süsteem põhineb kahe neuroarhitektuuri kombinatsioonil: sügav korduv neurovõrk, mida struktureerib tähelepanelik kahesuunaline LSTM, ja sügav tihe võrk (DNN). Süsteem saavutas 0,745 mikro f1 skoori ja sai ametlike ülesannete hulgas 26/165 (20% parim) meeskonna.', 'fi': 'Tekstien sentimenttianalyysi (SA) on hyvin tutkittu luonnollisen kielen prosessointitehtävä, joka nykyään saa suosiota sosiaalisen median räjähdyksen ja siihen liittyvän valtavan määrän kerääntymisen myötä. Tunnetilojen ja kirjallisten otteiden tunteiden polariteetin vangitseminen vaatii kuitenkin tietoa niitä laukaisevista tapahtumista. Tätä tavoitetta kohti esittelemme laskennallisen end-to-end kontekstitietoisen SA-menetelmän, jota kilpailtiin SemEval-2019 / EmoContext -tehtävän (Task 3) yhteydessä. Ehdotettu järjestelmä perustuu kahden neuroarkkitehtuurin yhdistelmään, syvään toistuvaan neuroverkkoon, joka on rakennettu tarkkaavaisen kaksisuuntaisen LSTM:n avulla, ja syvään tiheään verkkoon (DNN). Järjestelmä saavutti 0,745 mikrof1-pisteen ja sijoittui 26/165 (top 20%) joukkuetta virallisten tehtävien joukossa.', 'jv': 'Sentiment Awak dhéwé, nggawe stad duwek karo hal-hal kuwi kesempatan kanggo kelas kuwi, nik kuwi kesempatan kuwi tindakan. Ngawe mengko buku iki, nambah kita mulai sistem end-to-end context-awake sistem sa disenyong, iki wis dipatensi ing kontext semiinval-2011 9/EMOcontext task (task 3). Sayensi Sistem ono nggawe 0.', 'he': 'Sentiment analysis (SA) in texts is a well-studied Natural Language Processing task, which in nowadays gains popularity due to the explosion of social media, and the subsequent accumulation of huge amounts of related data.  עם זאת, לתפוס מדינות רגשיות והקוטביות הרגשות של מחלקות כתובות דורשת ידע על האירועים שהפעילו אותם. לכיוון המטרה הזו, אנחנו מציגים מטודולוגיה של אס.אס. מודעת לקונקסט סוף-סוף מחשבי, שהייתה מתחרה בקשר למשימה של SemEval-2019 / EmoContext (משימה 3). המערכת המוצעת מבוססת על שילוב של שתי ארכיטקטורות עצביות, רשת עצבית מתחזרה עמוקה, מבוססת על ידי LSTM שתי כיוונים תשומת לב, ורשת צפופה עמוקה (DNN). המערכת השיגה 0.745 נקודות מיקרו-f1, והצבעה 26/165 קבוצות (20% הטובות ביותר) בין השימושים הרשמיים.', 'sk': 'Analiza sentimenta (SA) v besedilih je dobro preučena naloga obdelave naravnega jezika, ki danes postaja popularna zaradi eksplozije družbenih medijev in naknadnega kopičenja ogromnih količin sorodnih podatkov. Zajemanje čustvenih stanj in sentimentalne polarnosti pisnih odlomkov pa zahteva znanje o dogodkih, ki jih sprožijo. Za ta cilj predstavljamo računalniško metodologijo konteksta zavedanja SA, ki je bila tekmovana v okviru naloge SemEval-2019 / EmoContext (naloga 3). Predlagani sistem temelji na kombinaciji dveh nevralnih arhitektur, globokega ponavljajočega se nevralnega omrežja, strukturiranega s pozornim dvosmernim LSTM, in globoko gostim omrežjem (DNN). Sistem je dosegel 0,745 mikro f1 rezultatov in med uradnimi prijavami nalog uvrstil 26/165 (najboljših 20%) ekip.', 'ha': "Anarari na zaman shawara (SA) a cikin littattafan littafin na da aka karanta wani aikin aiki na Taural, wanda a yanzu yana famous a yanzu, sabo da ɗan firawi na mitandai masu jamii, da kuma a ƙarƙashin samo ko'in jama'a mai girma da data masu husũma. A lokacin da, ta kãma staten hisia da cire na rubutu, yana tambayar wani ilmi a kan ayukan nan da ke tsoron su. Ga gaba ga wannan goa, Munã halatar da wata ƙidãya ta ƙari-zuwa-ƙari, mai ƙidãya na SA, wanda aka yi competitin a cikin mazaƙa na SemEV-2019 / EmoContContent aiki (Taaikin 3). An samar da shirin wannan na'urar da aka samu da haɗi biyu na'urar bakin neura, wata shirin neural wanda ke daura, an ƙididdige shi da wani mai inganci na LTRM, da kuma wata jerin murasa mai girma (DNN). Tiziman ya sami 0.745 micro f1-score, kuma ya ranked 26/165 (top 20%) team among the offisive aikin mataimaka.", 'bo': 'Sentiment analysis (SA) ཡི་གེ་ཚིག་ནང་ནི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྐད་ཆ་ལས་རྐྱེན་ངལ་ཅན་གྱིས་མཐོང་ནུས་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་། ད་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་འཕར་རྒྱས་ཁབ་ ཡིན་ནའང་། སེམས་ཚོར་གནས་སྟངས་དང་སེམས་ཚོར་རྣམས་ཀྱིས་འབྲི་བའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་དེ་དག་སྐྱེན་པའི་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་། འདི་ལྟ་བུ The proposed system is founded on the combination of two neural architectures, a deep recurrent neural network, structured by an attentive Bidirectional LSTM, and a deep dense network (DNN). མ་ལག་གི་ཚད་རྒྱ་ནག་ནང་དུ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་ཚད་ལྡན་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་ནང་གི་ཚད་ལྡན་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་སྒོ་ལས་ ༡༧༥་དང་། ལས་ཀྱང་ཕྱོགས་སྔོན་ག'}
{'en': 'PKUSE at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Emotion Detection with Emotion-Oriented Neural Attention Network', 'ar': 'PKUSE في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: اكتشاف المشاعر من خلال شبكة الاهتمام العصبي الموجهة للعاطفة', 'fr': "PKUSE au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Détection des émotions avec un réseau d'attention neuronale orienté sur les émotions", 'es': 'PUSE en la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2019: Detección de emociones con una red de atención neuronal orientada a las emociones', 'pt': 'PKUSE na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Detecção de Emoções com Rede de Atenção Neural Orientada a Emoções', 'ja': 'PKUSE at SemEval -2019 Task 3: Emotion - oriented Neural Attention Networkによる感情の検出', 'zh': 'PKUSE在SemEval-2019务3:以向情之神经网络检之', 'ru': 'PKUSE на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Обнаружение эмоций с помощью эмоционально-ориентированной нейронной сети внимания', 'hi': 'SEMEval-2019 कार्य 3 पर PKUSE: भावना-उन्मुख तंत्रिका ध्यान नेटवर्क के साथ भावना का पता लगाना', 'ga': 'PKUSE ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Brath Mothúchán le Líonra Airde Néarach Mothúchán-dhírithe', 'ka': 'PKUSE SemEval-2019 სამუშაო დავალება 3: Emotion Detection with Emotion-Oriented Neural Attention Network', 'it': 'PKUSE a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Rilevazione delle emozioni con la rete di attenzione neurale orientata alle emozioni', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Ανίχνευση Συναισθημάτων με Συναισθηματικό Δίκτυο Νευρικής Προσοχής', 'hu': 'PKUSE a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: Érzelmészlelés érzelmi orientált idegi figyelemhálózattal', 'mk': 'PKUSE на SemEval-2019 задача 3: Детектирање на емоции со мрежа на неурално внимание со емоции', 'ms': 'PKUSE di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Pengesanan Emosi dengan Rangkaian Perhatian Neural Berorientasi Emosi', 'kk': 'PKUSE жарым- 2019 тапсырмасының 3- тапсырмасында: көңіл- көңіл- бағытталған нейралық назарды желімен көңіл тапсырмаларын анықтау', 'lt': 'PKUSE per 2019 m. pusmetį 3 užduotis: emocijų aptikimas su emocijomis orientuotu neurologinio dėmesio tinklu', 'no': 'PKUSE ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3: Emotion Detection with Emotion-Oriented Neural Attention Network', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3- ല്\u200d പെക്യൂസ്: എമോട്ടിഷന്\u200d - ഓറിയനേറ്റ് നെയൂറല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ നെറ്റ്നോര്\u200dവര്\u200dക്കുമായി ഇമോട്ടിഷ', 'ro': 'PKUSE la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Detectarea emoțiilor cu rețeaua de atenție neurală orientată spre emoție', 'mt': 'PKUSE f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 3: Detezzjoni ta’ Emożjonijiet b’Netwerk ta’ Attenzjoni Newrali Orientata lejn l-Emożjonijiet', 'sr': 'PKUSE na semiEval-2019 Task 3: Detekcija emocija sa mrežom neurološke pažnje na emocijama', 'mn': 'PKUSE at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Emotion-Oriented Neural Attention Network', 'si': 'PKUSE at Halfeval-2019 Job 3: Emotion-East neuro Attension NetworkName', 'sv': 'PKUSE på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Känslighetsdetektering med känsloorienterat neuralt uppmärksamhetsnätverk', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 3: உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பு', 'ur': 'PKUSE at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Emotion-Oriented Neural Attention Network with Emotion Detection', 'so': 'PKUSE at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Emotion Detection with Emotion-Oriented Neural Attention Network', 'pl': 'PKUSE na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Wykrywanie emocji za pomocą emocjonalnej sieci uwagi neuronowej', 'uz': '3 Vazifani SemEval- 2019 bilan PKUSE: Emotion detection with Emotion- oriented Neural Attention Network', 'vi': 'Kiểm tra cảm xúc với mạng thần kinh hướng về cảm xúc', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Откриване на емоции с емоционално ориентирана мрежа за неврално внимание', 'da': 'PKUSE på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Følelsesdetektion med følelsesorienteret neural opmærksomhedsnetværk', 'de': 'PKUSE bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Emotionserkennung mit emotionsorientiertem neuronalem Aufmerksamkeitsnetzwerk', 'nl': 'PKUSE op SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Emotiedetectie met Emotiegericht Neural Attention Network', 'hr': 'PKUSE na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 3: otkrivanje emocija sa mrežom neurološke pažnje na emocijama', 'sw': 'PKUSE katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 3: Utafiti wa Uchunguzi na Mtandao wa Tamko wa Kiuraia', 'id': 'PKUSE di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Deteksi Emosi dengan Jaringan Perhatian Neural Berorientasi Emosi', 'ko': 'PKUSE가SemEval-2019퀘스트 참가3: 정서지향신경주의망을 바탕으로 정서검측', 'fa': 'PKUSE در تابع ۳: شناسایی احساسات با شبکه توجه عصبی\u200cهای ایمنی', 'af': 'Pkus by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 3: Emotie-beskrywing met Emotie-Orienteerde Neurale Aangaande Netwerk', 'sq': 'PKUSE at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Emotion Detection with Emotion-Oriented Neural Attention Network', 'hy': 'PKuse-ը "Halewal-2019"-ի 3-րդ հանձնարարում. զգացմունքների հայտնաբերում էմոցիոնալ ուղղությամբ նյարդային ուշադրության ցանցի միջոցով', 'tr': 'PKUSE at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Emotion Detection with Emotion-Oriented Neural Attention Network', 'az': 'PKUSE: Emotion-Oriented Neural Attention Network ilə Emotion Detection at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Emotion-Oriented Neural Attention Network', 'am': 'ስራ 3: Emotion Detection with Emotion-Oriented Neural Attention Network', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৩-এ পিকুসি: Emotion-orient Neural Attention Network', 'ca': 'PKUSE a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Emotion Detection with Emotion-Oriented Neural Attention Network', 'cs': 'Úkol 3: Detekce emocí s emočně orientovanou neuronovou pozorností sítí', 'fi': 'PKUSE SemEval-2019 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 3: Emotion Detection with Emotion Oriented Neural Attention Network', 'et': 'PKUSE SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 3: Emotsioonide tuvastamine emotsioonidele orienteeritud neuroaalse tähelepanu võrgustikuga', 'bs': 'PKUSE na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: Detekcija emocija sa mrežom neurološke pažnje iz emocija', 'jv': 'PKuSE at semiinval-2011 task 3: emuation detection with emuation-Oriented Neral Attention Network', 'ha': 'QShortcut', 'sk': 'PKUSE na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Zaznavanje čustev z čustveno usmerjeno mrežo nevralne pozornosti', 'bo': 'PKUSE at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Emotion Detection with Emotion-Oriented Neural Attention Network', 'he': 'PKUSE ב SemEval-2019 משימה 3: גילוי רגשות עם רשת תשומת לב נוירולי ממוקמת רגשות'}
{'en': 'This paper presents the system in SemEval-2019 Task 3, EmoContext : Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. We propose a deep learning architecture with bidirectional LSTM networks, augmented with an emotion-oriented attention network that is capable of extracting emotion information from an utterance. Experimental results show that our model outperforms its variants and the baseline. Overall, this system has achieved 75.57 % for the microaveraged F1 score.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة النظام في SemEval-2019 Task 3 ، "EmoContext: الكشف عن المشاعر السياقية في النص". نقترح بنية تعلم عميقة مع شبكات LSTM ثنائية الاتجاه ، مدعومة بشبكة انتباه موجهة نحو العاطفة قادرة على استخراج معلومات المشاعر من الكلام. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نموذجنا يتفوق على متغيراته وخط الأساس. بشكل عام ، حقق هذا النظام 75.57٪ لنتيجة F1 من النوع microaveraged.', 'fr': "Cet article présente le système de SemEval-2019 Task 3, «\xa0EmoContext\xa0: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text\xa0». Nous proposons une architecture d'apprentissage profond avec des réseaux LSTM bidirectionnels, complétés par un réseau d'attention orienté sur les émotions capable d'extraire des informations émotionnelles d'un énoncé. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre modèle surpasse ses variantes et sa base de référence. Dans l'ensemble, ce système a atteint 75,57\xa0% pour le score F1 micromoyenné.", 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta o sistema na Tarefa 3 do SemEval-2019, “EmoContext: Detecção contextual de emoções em texto”. Propomos uma arquitetura de aprendizado profundo com redes LSTM bidirecionais, aumentadas com uma rede de atenção orientada para a emoção que é capaz de extrair informações de emoção de um enunciado. Os resultados experimentais mostram que nosso modelo supera suas variantes e a linha de base. No geral, este sistema atingiu 75,57% para a pontuação F1 micromédia.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta el sistema en la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2019, «EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text». Proponemos una arquitectura de aprendizaje profundo con redes LSTM bidireccionales, aumentada con una red de atención orientada a las emociones que es capaz de extraer información emocional de un enunciado. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro modelo supera a sus variantes y a la línea base. En general, este sistema ha alcanzado el 75,57% para la puntuación micropromediada de F1.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2019タスク3「EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text」のシステムを紹介する。発話から感情情報を抽出できる感情指向の注意喚起ネットワークを拡張した、双方向のLSTMネットワークを備えた深層学習アーキテクチャを提案します。実験結果は、我々のモデルがそのバリアントとベースラインを上回っていることを示しています。全体として、このシステムは、マイクロ平均化されたF 1スコアで75.57 ％を達成しています。', 'ru': 'В данной статье система представлена в задаче 3 SemEval-2019 «EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text». Мы предлагаем архитектуру глубокого обучения с двунаправленными сетями LSTM, дополненную эмоционально-ориентированной сетью внимания, которая способна извлекать эмоциональную информацию из высказывания. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша модель превосходит ее варианты и базовую линию. В целом, эта система достигла 75,57% для микроусредненного балла F1.', 'zh': '本文引SemEval-2019务3"EmoContext文本上下文情检"之统。 发双向LSTM网络深学架构,增向情网络,网络能取信于言。 实验结果表明,吾形优于变体基线。 总体而言者,微弧F1得分之75.57%也。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2019 टास्क 3, "EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text" में सिस्टम प्रस्तुत करता है। हम द्विदिश एलएसटीएम नेटवर्क के साथ एक गहरी सीखने की वास्तुकला का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो एक भावना-उन्मुख ध्यान नेटवर्क के साथ संवर्धित है जो एक उच्चारण से भावना की जानकारी निकालने में सक्षम है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल अपने वेरिएंट और बेसलाइन को मात देता है। कुल मिलाकर, इस प्रणाली ने माइक्रोएवेरेज्ड एफ 1 स्कोर के लिए 75.57% हासिल किया है।', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo an córas i láthair i dTasc 3 SemEval-2019, “EmoContext: Contextual Mothúchán a Bhrath i Téacs”. Molaimid ailtireacht dhomhainfhoghlama le líonraí déthreoracha LSTM, arna mhéadú le líonra aird-dhírithe ar mhothúchán atá in ann faisnéis mhothúcháin a bhaint as an chaint. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go n-éiríonn lenár múnla níos fearr ná na leaganacha agus an bhunlíne. Tríd is tríd, tá 75.57% bainte amach ag an gcóras seo don scór micrea-mheánmhéide F1.', 'ka': "ამ გვერდის სისტემის SemEval-2019 სამუშაო დავალების სამუშაო სამუშაო შესახებ 'EmoContext: ტექსტის კონტექსტური ემოციების განახლება'. ჩვენ მუშაობთ ძალიან სწავლებელი აქტიქტიკური LSTM ქსელებით, რომელიც ემოციონის ორიენტირებული აღმოჩენის ქსელით, რომელიც ემოციონის ინფორმაციის გამოყენება შესაძლებელია. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები ჩვენი მოდელი გავაკეთებს მისი გარიანტები და ფესური ხაზი. ამ სისტემის ყველაფერად 75,57% მიკროცემეტური F1 წერტილისთვის მიღება.", 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a rendszert a SemEval-2019 feladat 3, "Emokontext: kontextuális érzelmek felismerése a szövegben". Egy kétirányú LSTM hálózatokkal rendelkező mélytanulási architektúrát javasolunk, amelyet egy érzelmi-orientált figyelemhálózattal bővítünk, amely képes kivonni az érzelmi információkat egy beszédből. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk felülmúlja a változatait és a kiindulási értéket. Összességében ez a rendszer 75,57%-ot ért el a mikroátlagos F1 pontszám tekintetében.', 'kk': "Бұл қағаз жүйені жарым- жарым- 2019 тапсырманың 3- тапсырмасында көрсетеді, 'көңіл- контекст: мәтінде контексті көңіл- көңіл анықтау' дегенді. Біз көтерілген LSTM желілерімен түсті оқыту архитектурасын ұсынамыз, емоциялық көтерілген қызықтық желімен көтерілген, көтерілген емоциялық мәліметті сөздерден тарқату мүмкіндігі Эксперименталдық нәтижелеріміздің үлгіміз өзінің варианттарын және негізгі жолын жасайды. Бұл жүйе микроорташа F1 нүктесі үшін 75,57% жеткізді.", 'it': "Questo articolo presenta il sistema in SemEval-2019 Task 3, 'EmoContent: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text'. Proponiamo un'architettura di deep learning con reti LSTM bidirezionali, arricchita da una rete di attenzione orientata alle emozioni in grado di estrarre informazioni emozionali da un'espressione. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro modello supera le sue varianti e la linea di base. Nel complesso, questo sistema ha raggiunto il 75,57% per il punteggio F1 micromedio.", 'mk': 'Овој документ го претставува системот во SemEval- 2019 задача 3, „EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text“. Ние предложуваме длабоко учење архитектура со дводрекционални ЛСТМ мрежи, зголемени со емоционално ориентирана мрежа на внимание која е способна да извлече емоционални информации од израз. Experimental results show that our model outperforms its variants and the baseline.  Overall, this system has achieved 75.57% for the microaveraged F1 score.', 'ml': "ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3, 'എമോക്ടെക്സ്റ്റ്: പദാവലിയിലെ കൂടുതല്\u200d എംഎക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്: എക്സ്റ്റോള്\u200dട് വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്ന് വികാര വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്ന ഒരു വികാരത്തിന്റെ ശ്രദ്ധയുടെ ശ്രദ്ധ നെറ്റര്\u200dനെറ്റില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂട്ടിച് പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d അതിന്റെ വേറിയന്റുകളും ബെസ്റ്റെലൈനും  മൈക്രോവേര്\u200dജേജ് എഫ്\u200c1 സ്കോര്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഈ സിസ്റ്റം 75.57% നേടിയിരിക്കുന്നു.", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει το σύστημα στην εργασία 3 με τίτλο "Συναισθηματική Ανίχνευση Συναισθημάτων στο Κείμενο". Προτείνουμε μια αρχιτεκτονική βαθιάς μάθησης με αμφίδρομη δίκτυα εμπλουτισμένη με ένα δίκτυο προσοχής προσανατολισμένο στο συναίσθημα που είναι ικανό να εξάγει πληροφορίες συναισθημάτων από μια ομιλία. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά τις παραλλαγές του και τη γραμμή βάσης. Συνολικά, το σύστημα αυτό έχει επιτύχει 75,57% για τη μικρομέση βαθμολογία F1.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь системийг SemEval-2019-ийн 3 даалгаварт "EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text" гэдэг. Бид суралцах гүн гүнзгий архитектур гэх мэт санал болгож, сэтгэл хөдлөлтэй анхаарлын сүлжээгээр нэмэгдсэн, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн мэдээллийг илтгэлээс гаргаж чадна. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний загвар нь өөрчлөлт болон суурь шугам дээр ажилладаг. Энэ систем жижиг дундаж F1 оноос 75.57% хүртсэн.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiama sistema „SemEval-2019“ 3 užduotyje „EmoContext: Contextal Emotion Detection in Text“. Siūlome gilaus mokymosi architektūrą su dvikryptiniais LSTM tinklais, papildytu emocijoms orientuotu dėmesio tinklu, kuris gali gauti emocinę informaciją iš žodžių. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modelis viršija jo variantus ir pradinę vertę. Apskritai ši sistema pasiekė 75,57 % mikrovidutinio F1 balo.', 'mt': "Dan id-dokument jippreżenta s-sistema f'SemEval-2019 Task 3, 'EmoContext: Context Emotion Detection in Text'. Aħna nipproponu arkitettura ta’ tagħlim profond b’netwerks ta’ LSTM bidirezzjonali, miżjuda b’netwerk ta’ attenzjoni orjentat lejn l-emozzjonijiet li jkun kapaċi jestrezzjona informazzjoni emozzjonali minn espressjoni. Experimental results show that our model outperforms its variants and the baseline.  B’mod ġenerali, din is-sistema kisbet 75.57% għall-punteġġ F1 mikromedjat.", 'ms': "This paper presents the system in SemEval-2019 Task 3, 'EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text'.  We propose a deep learning architecture with bidirectional LSTM networks, augmented with an emotion-oriented attention network that is capable of extracting emotion information from an utterance.  Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa model kita melampaui variasinya dan asasnya. Secara keseluruhan, sistem ini telah mencapai 75.57% untuk skor F1 yang berrata-rata mikro.", 'no': 'Denne papiret viser systemet i halvEval- 2019 oppgåve 3, «EmoContext: Kontekstoppdaging av følelser i tekst». Vi foreslår ein dyp læringsarkitektur med bidireksjonale LSTM-nettverk, augmentert med ein følsområde oppmerksnettverk som er i stand til å ekstrahera emosjonsinformasjon frå eit uttale. Eksperimentale resultat viser at modellen vårt utfører variantane og baselinja. Dette systemet har oppnådd 75,57% for mikrogjennomsnittet F1- poeng.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono system w SemEval-2019 Task 3 "EmoContext: Kontekstowe wykrywanie emocji w tekście". Proponujemy architekturę głębokiego uczenia z dwukierunkowymi sieciami LSTM, rozszerzoną o sieć uwagi zorientowaną na emocje, która jest w stanie wydobyć informacje o emocjach z wypowiedzi. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasz model przewyższa swoje warianty i bazę podstawową. Ogólnie rzecz biorąc, system ten osiągnął 75,57% dla mikrośredniego wyniku F1.', 'ro': "Această lucrare prezintă sistemul din SemEval-2019 Task 3, 'EmoContent: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text'. Propunem o arhitectură de învățare profundă cu rețele LSTM bidirecționale, amplificată cu o rețea de atenție orientată spre emoții, capabilă să extragă informații emoționale dintr-o exprimare. Rezultatele experimentale arată că modelul nostru depășește variantele sale și baza de referință. În general, acest sistem a atins 75,57% pentru scorul F1 micromediat.", 'sv': "Denna uppsats presenterar systemet i SemEval-2019 Task 3, 'EmoContent: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text'. Vi föreslår en djupinlärningsarkitektur med dubbelriktade LSTM-nätverk, förstärkt med ett känsloorienterat uppmärksamhetsnätverk som kan extrahera känsloinformation från ett uttalande. Experimentella resultat visar att vår modell överträffar dess varianter och baslinjen. Sammantaget har detta system uppnått 75,57% för den mikrogenomsnittliga F1-poängen.", 'si': "මේ පැත්ත තියෙනවා පද්ධතිය අවුරුද්ධ- 2019 වැඩක් 3 'EmoContexts: පද්ධතිය භාවිතාව හොයාගන්න පැත්තේ'. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න සිද්ධාව LSTM ජාලය සමඟ, හැඟීමක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන හැඟීමක් අවධාන ජාලය සමඟ, ඒක පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩේල් එකේ වෙනස් සහ අධාර්ථ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය න සම්පූර්ණයෙන්, මේ පද්ධතියේ මයික්\u200dරෝමාන්\u200dයය F1 ස්කෝර් වලට 75.57% ලැබුනා.", 'ur': "This paper presents the system in SemEval-2019 Task 3, 'EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text'. ہم نے ایک عمیق سیکھنے کی معماری پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو ایک بات سے احساس کی اطلاعات اٹھانے کی طاقت رکھتی ہے، ایک سیکھنے والی نیٹورک کے ساتھ۔ Experimental results show that our model performs its variations and baseline. اس سیستم نے مایکرومتوسط F1 اسکور کے لئے 75.57% تک پہنچ لیا ہے.", 'sr': "Ovaj papir predstavlja sistem u zadatku 3. polu-Eval-2019, 'EmoContext: Kontekstno otkrivanje emocija u tekstu'. Predlažemo duboku arhitekturu učenja sa dvodirektivnim LSTM mrežama, povećanom sa emocionalnom orientiranom pažnjom mreža koja je sposobna da izvuče emocionalne informacije iz govora. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model iznosi svoje varijante i početne linije. U svemu, ovaj sistem je postigao 75,57% za mikrosrednji rezultat F1.", 'so': "Kanu wuxuu nidaamka ku qoran yahay SemEval-2019 shaqo 3, 'EmoContext: Digta xasuusta ku qoran xarafka. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa dhismo aad u dheer oo waxbarasho leh shabakado la xiriira LSTM, kaas oo lagu kordhiyey shabakad aad u jeeda fikrada oo awoodi karta inuu ka soo bixiyo macluumaad la xiriira hadalka. Experimental results show that our model outperforms its variants and the baseline.  Sida caadiga ah nidaamkan wuxuu gaadhay 75,57% scorada F1 ee microaverage.", 'ta': "SemEval- 2019 பணி 3, 'EmoContext: உரையில் உள்ள சூழல் உணர்வு கணினியை காட்டுகிறது. நாம் ஒரு ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் பிணையமான LSTM வலைப்பின்னல்கள் உடன் ஒரு உணர்வு சார்ந்த கவனத்தின் வலைப்பின்னல் மேம்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது, ஒரு வார Experimental results show that our model outperforms its variants and the baseline.  மொத்தமாக, இந்த அமைப்பு F1 புள்ளிகளுக்கு 75.57% அடைந்தது.", 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz SemEval- 2019 Vazifa 3, 'EmoContext: Matnning Context Emotionni qidirish uchun tizimni koʻrsatiladi'. Biz bir so'zdan foydalanish haqida o'rganish maktablarini tasavvur qilamiz va o'z tildan foydalanish haqida o'ylab olish mumkin. Tekshirish natijalari koʻrsatiladi, modelmiz uning varianlarini va asosiy satrni bajaradi. Umumiy, bu tizim F1 xost uchun 75.57% tugatdi.", 'vi': 'Bài báo này giới thiệu hệ thống trong Nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 9 3, "EmoContact: Contextual Emotion detection in Text". Chúng tôi đề nghị một kiến trúc sâu học với các mạng dịch bệnh, được thêm vào một mạng lưới chú ý cảm xúc có khả năng khai thác thông tin cảm xúc từ một lời nói. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta vượt trội các biến thể và cơ sở. Toàn bộ hệ thống này đã đạt được số lượng F1 vi thu thập', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя системата в Задача 3, "Емоконтекс: Контекстуално откриване на емоции в текста". Предлагаме архитектура за дълбоко учене с двупосочни мрежи, допълнена с емоционално ориентирана мрежа за внимание, която е способна да извлича емоционална информация от дадено изказване. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият модел превъзхожда своите варианти и базовата база. Като цяло, тази система е постигнала 75,57% за микросредния резултат.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja sustav u zadatku 3. poluvremenoj ispitivanji 2019. „EmoContext: Kontekstno otkrivanje emocija u tekstu“. Predlažemo duboku arhitekturu učenja s bidirektivnim LSTM mrežama, povećanom s emocijskim obrazovanjem pažnje mreže koja je sposobna izvlačiti informacije o emocijama iz govora. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model iznosi svoje varijante i početne linije. Općenito, ovaj sustav je postigao 75,57% za mikrosrednji rezultat F1.', 'nl': "Deze paper presenteert het systeem in SemEval-2019 Taak 3, 'EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text'. We stellen een deep learning architectuur voor met bidirectionele LSTM netwerken, aangevuld met een emotie-georiënteerd aandachtsnetwerk dat in staat is emotie informatie uit een uiting te halen. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat ons model beter presteert dan zijn varianten en de baseline. Over het algemeen heeft dit systeem 75,57% bereikt voor de microgemiddelde F1 score.", 'da': "Denne artikel præsenterer systemet i SemEval-2019 Opgave 3, 'EmoContent: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text'. Vi foreslår en deep learning arkitektur med to retninger LSTM netværk, forstærket med et følelsesorienteret opmærksomhedsnetværk, der er i stand til at udtrække følelsesinformation fra en udtalelse. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores model overgår sine varianter og baseline. Samlet set har dette system opnået 75,57% for den mikrogennemsnitlige F1 score.", 'de': "In diesem Beitrag wird das System in SemEval-2019 Task 3 'EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text' vorgestellt. Wir schlagen eine Deep Learning Architektur mit bidirektionalen LSTM Netzwerken vor, ergänzt um ein emotionsorientiertes Aufmerksamkeitsnetzwerk, das in der Lage ist, Emotionsinformationen aus einer Äußerung zu extrahieren. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Modell seine Varianten und die Baseline übertrifft. Insgesamt hat dieses System 75,57% für den mikrogemittelten F1-Score erreicht.", 'ko': '본고는SemEval-2019퀘스트3"EmoContext: 텍스트의 상하문 감정 검측"의 시스템을 소개한다.우리는 쌍방향 LSTM 네트워크를 가진 깊이 있는 학습 체계 구조를 제시했다. 이 체계 구조는 감정에 대한 주의 네트워크를 추가하여 말에서 감정 정보를 추출할 수 있다.실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 모형은 변체와 기선보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.전반적으로 이 시스템은 F1의 미평균 점수에서 75.57% 에 달했다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم را در تابع سوم Eval-2019 نشان می دهد، «EmoContext: Detection of Emotions Contextual in Text». ما یک معماری عمیق یادگیری را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم با شبکه\u200cهای LSTM دوره\u200cای که با شبکه توجه\u200cی احساسات به افزایش داده شده است که می\u200cتواند اطلاعات احساسات را از یک سخن خارج کند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cی ما نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما متفاوت\u200cهایش و خط پایین را انجام می\u200cدهد. در کل این سیستم برای امتیاز میکرومتوسط F1 به 75.57 درصد رسیده است.', 'id': "Kertas ini mempersembahkan sistem dalam SemEval-2019 Tugas 3, 'EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text'. Name Kami mengusulkan arsitektur belajar dalam dengan jaringan LSTM bidireksi, ditambah dengan jaringan perhatian emosional yang mampu mengekstraksi informasi emosional dari sebuah ucapan. Experimental results show that our model outperforms its variants and the baseline.  Secara umum, sistem ini telah mencapai 75,57% untuk skor F1 mikrorata-rata.", 'sw': "Gazeti hili linaonyesha mfumo wa SemEval-2019 Task 3, 'EmoContext: Utafiti wa Matukio ya Kimataifa katika Maandishi'. We propose a deep learning architecture with bidirectional LSTM networks, augmented with an emotion-oriented attention network that is capable of extracting emotion information from an utterance.  Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba mifano yetu inaonyesha mabadiliko yake na msingi. Kwa ujumla, mfumo huu umefikia asilimia 75.57 kwa ajili ya kipindi cha F1 kilichokuwa na umri mdogo.", 'am': "ይህ ገጽ ስርዓቱን በSemEval-2019 ስራ 3, 'EmoContext: Context Emotion Detection in Text'. We propose a deep learning architecture with bidirectional LSTM networks, augmented with an emotion-oriented attention network that is capable of extracting emotion information from an utterance.  ፈተና ውጤቶች ሞዴላዎቻችን የልዩ ልዩ እና የመደቡን መስመር እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡ በጠቅላላ፣ ይህ ስርዓት F1 ነscore 75.57 በመቶ አግኝቷል፡፡", 'sq': "Ky artikull paraqet sistemin në SemEval-2019 Task 3, 'EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text'. Ne propozojmë një arkitekturë mësimi të thellë me rrjete LSTM dy-drejtuese, të shtuar me një rrjet vëmendjeje të orientuar në emocione që është në gjendje të nxjerrë informacion emocional nga një shprehje. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se modeli ynë mbivlerëson variantet e tij dhe bazën. Në përgjithësi, ky sistem ka arritur 75.57% për rezultatin e mikromesatarit F1.", 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է համակարգը Halewal-2019-ի 3. հանձնարարում, «EmoConxt: Conտեքստային զգացմունքների հայտնաբերումը տեքստում»։ Մենք առաջարկում ենք խորը ուսումնասիրության ճարտարապետություն երկու ուղղությամբ LSMT ցանցերով, ավելացված էմոցիոնալ ուշադրության ցանցով, որը կարող է զգացմունքային տեղեկատվություն ստանալ արտահայտությունից: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը գերազանցում է իր տարբերակները և հիմքը: Ընդհանուր առմամբ, այս համակարգը հասել է 75.57 տոկոսի միկրոմիջին F1 գնահատման համար:', 'bn': "এই পত্রিকাটি সেমEval-2019 কাজ ৩, 'EmoContext: লেখায় বিদ্যমান Emotion Detection' সিস্টেম উপস্থাপন করেছে। We propose a deep learning architecture with bidirectional LSTM networks, augmented with an emotion-oriented attention network that is capable of extracting emotion information from an utterance.  পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল তার ভেরেন্ট এবং বেস লাইনের বাইরে প্রদর্শন করে। সাধারণত এফ১ স্কোরের জন্য এই সিস্টেম ৭৫৭% অর্জন করেছে।", 'tr': "Bu käze SemEval-2019 Görevi 3, 'EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text' içinde sistemi gösterir. Biz LSTM şebekeleri bilen derin öwrenmek arhitektegi teklip edip, duýulyga görä üns berilýän bir şebeke bilen duýgyş maglumaty çykaryp biljek. Aramanyň netijeleri nusgasymyz öz wariantlaryny we esasy çyzgyny çykarýandygyny görkezýär. Munuň ýagdaýynda bu sistem mikrooortalyk F1 noty üçin 75,57% tapyldy.", 'af': "Hierdie papier stel die stelsel in SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 3, 'EmoContext: Kontekslike Emotie Opdekking in Teks'. Ons voorstel 'n diep leer-arkitektuur met bidireksjonale LSTM-netwerke wat met 'n emosie-orienteerde aandagnetwerk vergroot is wat moontlik is om emosie-inligting uit 'n uitdrukking te uittrek. Eksperimentale resultate vertoon dat ons model sy variante en die basisline uitvoer. Hierdie stelsel het altyd 75.57% bereik vir die mikrogemiddelde F1 telling.", 'ca': "Aquest article presenta el sistema en SemEval-2019 tasca 3, 'EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text'. Proposem una arquitectura d'aprenentatge profund amb xarxes LSTM bidireccionals, augmentata amb una xarxa d'atenció emocionalment orientada que és capaç d'extrair informació emocional d'una expressió. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre model supera les seves variants i la base. En general, aquest sistema ha aconseguit un 75,57% per a la puntuació F1 amb micromitjana.", 'cs': "Tento článek představuje systém v SemEval-2019 Task 3, 'EmoKontext: Kontextová detekce emocí v textu'. Navrhujeme architekturu hlubokého učení s obousměrnými LSTM sítěmi, rozšířenou o emoce orientovanou pozornostní síť, která je schopna extrahovat emoční informace z výroku. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš model překonává své varianty a základní hodnotu. Celkově tento systém dosáhl 75,57% za mikroprůměrné skóre F1.", 'et': 'Käesolev töö tutvustab süsteemi SemEval-2019 ülesandes 3, "Emokontekst: kontekstituaalne emotsioonide tuvastamine tekstis". Pakume välja sügavõppe arhitektuuri kahesuunaliste LSTM-võrkudega, mida täiendatakse emotsioonidele orienteeritud tähelepanuvõrguga, mis on võimeline väljendusest emotsiooniteavet hankima. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel on oma variantidest ja lähtetasemest parem. Kokkuvõttes on see süsteem saavutanud 75,57% mikrokeskmise F1 skoori.', 'fi': "Tﾃ､mﾃ､ artikkeli esittelee jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､n SemEval-2019 Task 3, 'EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text'. Ehdotamme syvﾃ､oppimisarkkitehtuuria kaksisuuntaisilla LSTM-verkoilla, joita tﾃ､ydennetﾃ､ﾃ､n tunteisiin keskittyneellﾃ､ huomioverkostolla, joka kykenee erottamaan tunteista tietoa puheesta. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, ettﾃ､ mallimme suoriutuu paremmin kuin sen variantit ja lﾃ､htﾃｶtilanne. Kaiken kaikkiaan tﾃ､mﾃ､ jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ on saavuttanut 75,57% mikrokeskiarvon F1-pisteen.", 'bs': "Ovaj papir predstavlja sistem u zadatku 3. poluvremenog 2019, 'EmoContext: Kontekstno otkrivanje emocija u tekstu'. Predlažemo duboku arhitekturu učenja sa bidirektivnim LSTM mrežama, povećanom sa emocionalnom orientiranom pažnjom mreža koja je sposobna izvlačiti emocionalne informacije iz govora. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model iznosi svoje varijante i početne linije. U ukupnom slučaju, ovaj sistem je postigao 75,57% za mikrosrednji F1 rezultat.", 'az': "Bu kağıt sistemi SemEval-2019 3. Gözəl'də göstərir, 'EmoContext: Kontekst Emotion Detection in Text'. Biz öyrəndiyimiz LSTM a ğları ilə dərin öyrənmək arhitektarını təklif edirik, duygusallıq tərəfindən fəaliyyət məlumatlarını çıxara bilən bir şəklə ilə artırdı. Müvəffəqiyyət sonuçları modellərimizin dəyişikliklərindən və dəyişikliklərindən üstün olduğunu göstərir. Bütün bunlar, bu sistem mikro ortalamalı F1 nöqtəsi üçün 75,57%-ə nail oldu.", 'jv': "Ngawe Perintah lan mungkahi sistem ning semi-2011 task 3, 'EMOcontext: contextual emuation detection in Text'. Name Awak dhéwé ngerasai architecture sing paling apik karo tambah sing basa ireksi LTT M, supoyo gambaran karo netah sing apik omosi sing gawe ngubah ijol-ijolan dipeneksi sing gawe ngubah informasi alam sing apik. Perintah sing paling awak dhéwé kuwi model nyeneng sawetara variant lan basa bon", 'ha': "Wannan avir na gaya na'urar na'ura cikin aikin SemEV-2019, 'EmoContent: Kashe Email na cikin Match'... Tuna goyyar da wani matsayi mai zura da tsarin LSSM masu ƙaranci, yana ƙaranci da wani zanen aikin da ke cikin hiso-ori wanda yana iya iya iya samun bayani daga magana. Matarin jarrabai ke nuna cewa misalinmu yana samar da variants da bazalin. Gamma, wannan na'ura ya isa %1.57", 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציגה את המערכת במשימה "SemEval-2019 Task 3, "EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text". אנו מציעים ארכיטקטורה למידה עמוקה עם רשתות LSTM שתי הכיווניות, מוגבלת ברשת תשומת לב ממוקמת רגשות תוצאות ניסיוניות מראות שהדוגמא שלנו עולה מעל השינויים שלה ואת הבסיס. באופן כללי, המערכת הזאת השיגה 75.57% לציון F1 במיקרוממוצע.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek predstavlja sistem v nalogi 3 SemEval-2019, "Emokontekst: kontekstualno zaznavanje čustev v besedilu". Predlagamo arhitekturo globokega učenja z dvosmernimi mrežami LSTM, dopolnjenimi s čustveno usmerjeno mrežo pozornosti, ki je sposobna izvleči čustvene informacije iz izgovora. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naš model presega njegove različice in osnovno vrednost. Na splošno je ta sistem dosegel 75,57% za mikropovprečno oceno F1.', 'bo': "ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་རིམ་ལ་2019ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལྡན་གསུམ་པ་, 'EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text'. We propose a deep learning architecture with bidirectional LSTM networks, augmented with an emotion-oriented attention network that is capable of extracting emotion information from an utterance. ལག་ལེན་པའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་འདིའི་ཁྱད་པར་གཞི་དང་གཞི་རྩལ་བ་སྒྱུར་བ་ཡོད་པ་ར འཛམ་གླིང་གི་དོན་ལྟར་ མ་ལག་འདིས་སྐྱེལ་ཚད་F1 རིམ་ཐང་ཚད་ལྡན་7557%རྙེད་ཐུབ་ཡོད།"}
{'en': 'Podlab at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : The Importance of Being Shallow', 'es': 'Podlab en SemEval-2019 Tarea 3: La importancia de ser superficial', 'ar': 'Podlab في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: أهمية أن تكون ضحلاً', 'fr': "Podlab au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: L'importance d'être superficiel", 'pt': 'Podlab no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: A importância de ser superficial', 'ja': 'Podlab at SemEval -2019 Task 3: The Importance of Be Shallow', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 3 में Podlab: उथले होने का महत्व', 'zh': 'Podlab at SemEval-2019 务3:浅大要', 'ru': 'Podlab на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Важность неглубокого залегания', 'ga': 'Podlab ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: An Tábhacht a bhaineann le Bheith Éadomhain', 'ka': 'Podlab semiEval-2019 სამუშაო დავალება 3: მნიშვნელობა გაყოფილი', 'hu': 'Podlab a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: A sekélység fontossága', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Η σημασία του να είσαι ρηχός', 'it': "Podlab a SemEval-2019 Task 3: L'importanza di essere superficiali", 'kk': 'Подлаборатор жарым- 2019 тапсырмасының 3- тапсырмасы: Бірінің маңыздылығы', 'ms': 'Podlab di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Kepentingan menjadi Gelombang', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ജോലിയിലെ പോഡ്ലാബ്: മഞ്ഞനായിരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രാധാന്യം', 'mk': 'Подлабораторија на SemEval-2019 задача 3: Важноста на тоа да бидеш безобразен', 'lt': 'Podlab SemEval-2019 3 užduotis: Geltonumo svarba', 'no': 'Podlab ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3: The Importance of Being Shallow', 'mt': 'Podlab f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 3: L-Importanza tal-Bżieżaq', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Task 3: The Importance of Being Shallow', 'pl': 'Podlab w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Znaczenie bycia płytkim', 'si': 'පොඩ්ලාබ් එක සම්වේල්-2019 වැඩ 3: වැඩක් වෙන්න පුළුවන්', 'ro': 'Podlab la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Importanța de a fi slab', 'so': 'Podlab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Importance of Being Shallow', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 3: The importance of becoming Shallow', 'sv': 'Podlab på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Vikten av att vara tunn', 'sr': 'Podlab na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: Važnost biti slava', 'ur': 'سیم اول-2019 ٹاکس 3 میں پوڈلاب: The Importance of Being Shallow', 'uz': 'Eval- 2019 Vazifani 3: The Importance of becoming Yellow', 'vi': 'Phòng thí nghiệm tại Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-209 3: Sự quan trọng của việc trở nên không vững mạnh.', 'nl': 'Podlab bij SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Het belang van ondiep zijn', 'bg': 'Подлаборатория в Задача 3: Значението на плитчината', 'de': 'Podlab bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabenstellung 3: Die Bedeutung von Flachheit', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019년의 팟캐스트 실험실 임무 3: 얕은 중요성', 'fa': 'پادلال آزمایشگاهی در نیم Eval-2019 تابع ۳: مهم بودن نرم', 'da': 'Podlab på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Betydningen af at være lav', 'sw': 'Podlab kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 3: Uumuhimu wa kuwa Yellow', 'tr': 'Podlab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: The Importance of Being Shallow', 'hr': 'Podlab na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: Važnost biti slavna', 'af': 'Podlab by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 3: Die belangrikheid van Being Shallow', 'sq': 'Podlab në SemEval-2019 Task 3: Importi i të qenit i hijshëm', 'hy': 'Պոդլաբորատորիան, 2019-ի "Սեմյալ լինելու կարևորությունը"', 'id': 'Podlab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: The Importance of Being Shallow', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৩-এ পডল্যাব: শালু হওয়ার গুরুত্বপূর্ণ', 'az': 'Podlab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: The Importance of Being Shallow', 'bs': 'Podlab na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: Važnost biti slava', 'am': 'Podlab at SemEval-2019 ስራ 3: The Importance of Being Shallow', 'fi': 'Podlab SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 3: Matalan olemisen merkitys', 'cs': 'Podlab na SemEval-2019 Úkol 3: Důležitost být mělký', 'et': 'Podlab SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 3: Pinnaline olemise tähtsus', 'ca': 'Podlab a SemEval-2019 tasca 3: La importància de ser sombrí', 'sk': 'Podlab na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Pomen plitvosti', 'ha': 'The important of being Shallow', 'he': 'Podlab ב SemEval-2019 משימה 3: חשיבות להיות שחור', 'jv': 'podLab at semiinval-2011 task 3: The Importance of being Wang', 'bo': 'Podlab at SemEval-2019 Task 3: The Importance of Being Shallow'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our linear SVM system for emotion classification from conversational dialogue, entered in SemEval2019 Task 3. We used off-the-shelf tools coupled with feature engineering and parameter tuning to create a simple, interpretable, yet high-performing, classification model. Our system achieves a micro F1 score of 0.7357, which is 92 % of the top score for the competition, demonstrating that shallow classification approaches can perform well when coupled with detailed fea- ture selection and statistical analysis.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظام SVM الخطي الخاص بنا لتصنيف المشاعر من حوار المحادثة ، الذي تم إدخاله في المهمة 3. SemEval2019. استخدمنا أدوات جاهزة إلى جانب هندسة الميزات وضبط المعلمات لإنشاء نموذج تصنيف بسيط وقابل للتفسير وعالي الأداء. يحقق نظامنا درجة F1 صغيرة تبلغ 0.7357 ، والتي تمثل 92٪ من أعلى الدرجات للمنافسة ، مما يدل على أن مناهج التصنيف "الضحلة" يمكن أن تؤدي أداءً جيدًا عند اقترانها باختيار الميزات المفصل والتحليل الإحصائي.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nosso sistema SVM linear para classificação de emoções a partir de diálogos conversacionais, inserido na Tarefa 3 do SemEval2019. Usamos ferramentas prontas para uso juntamente com engenharia de recursos e ajuste de parâmetros para criar um modelo de classificação simples, interpretável, mas de alto desempenho. Nosso sistema atinge uma pontuação micro F1 de 0,7357, que é 92% da pontuação máxima da competição, demonstrando que as abordagens de classificação “rasas” podem ter um bom desempenho quando combinadas com a seleção detalhada de recursos e análise estatística.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestro sistema SVM lineal para la clasificación de emociones a partir del diálogo conversacional, incluido en la Tarea 3 de SemEval2019. Utilizamos herramientas estándar junto con la ingeniería de características y el ajuste de parámetros para crear un modelo de clasificación simple, interpretable y de alto rendimiento. Nuestro sistema logra una puntuación micro F1 de 0.7357, que es el 92% de la puntuación más alta de la competencia, lo que demuestra que los enfoques de clasificación «superficiales» pueden funcionar bien cuando se combinan con una selección detallada de características y un análisis estadístico.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre système SVM linéaire pour la classification des émotions à partir d'un dialogue conversationnel, entré dans la tâche 3 de SemEval2019. Nous avons utilisé des outils standard associés à l'ingénierie des caractéristiques et au réglage des paramètres pour créer un modèle de classification simple, interprétable mais performant. Notre système obtient un score micro F1 de 0,7357, soit 92\xa0% du meilleur score de la compétition, démontrant ainsi que les approches de classification «\xa0superficielles\xa0» peuvent donner de bons résultats lorsqu'elles sont associées à une sélection détaillée des caractéristiques et à une analyse statistique.", 'zh': '本文述我线性SVM统,用于会话言之情类,当系于SemEval2019务3中输之。 用成器与参数调优合,创一而高性能分。 吾统得0.7357之F1微分,此最高分之92%也,明浅类之详fea-ture择统计分析之可以见善也。', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2019タスク3に記載されている会話的対話からの感情分類のための線形SVMシステムについて説明する。機能工学とパラメータチューニングと組み合わせた既製のツールを使用して、シンプルで解釈可能でありながら高性能な分類モデルを作成しました。当社のシステムは、コンペティションのトップスコアの92 ％である0.7357のマイクロF 1スコアを達成し、詳細な機能選択と統計分析と組み合わせると、「浅い」分類アプローチが良いパフォーマンスを発揮できることを示しています。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर संवादी संवाद से भावना वर्गीकरण के लिए हमारे रैखिक एसवीएम सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है, जो SemEval2019 टास्क 3 में दर्ज किया गया है। हमने एक सरल, व्याख्यायोग्य, अभी तक उच्च प्रदर्शन करने वाले, वर्गीकरण मॉडल बनाने के लिए फीचर इंजीनियरिंग और पैरामीटर ट्यूनिंग के साथ मिलकर ऑफ-द-शेल्फ टूल का उपयोग किया। हमारी प्रणाली 0.7357 का एक माइक्रो एफ 1 स्कोर प्राप्त करती है, जो प्रतियोगिता के लिए शीर्ष स्कोर का 92% है, यह दर्शाता है कि "उथले" वर्गीकरण दृष्टिकोण विस्तृत चयन और सांख्यिकीय विश्लेषण के साथ युग्मित होने पर अच्छी तरह से प्रदर्शन कर सकते हैं।', 'ru': 'Эта статья описывает нашу линейную систему SVM для классификации эмоций из разговорного диалога, введенную в Задаче 3 SemEval2019. Мы использовали готовые инструменты в сочетании с конструкцией функций и настройкой параметров для создания простой, интерпретируемой, но высокопроизводительной модели классификации. Наша система достигает микро- балла F1 0,7357, что составляет 92% от высшего балла для соревнований, демонстрируя, что «неглубокие» подходы к классификации могут хорошо работать в сочетании с детальным выбором характеристик и статистическим анализом.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcóras líneach SVM le haghaidh aicmiú mothúcháin ó chomhphlé, a cuireadh isteach i dTasc 3 SemEval2019. D’úsáideamar uirlisí as an tseilf mar aon le hinnealtóireacht gné agus tiúnadh paraiméadar chun samhail aicmithe simplí, inléirmhínithe, ach ardfheidhmíochta a chruthú. Gnóthaíonn ár gcóras scór micrea F1 de 0.7357, sin 92% den scór is airde don chomórtas, rud a thaispeánann gur féidir le cineálacha cur chuige aicmithe “éadomhain” feidhmiú go maith nuair a chuirtear i dteannta le mion-roghnú gné agus anailís staitistiúil.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az érzelmi osztályozás lineáris SVM rendszerét a beszélgetési párbeszédből, amelyet a SemEval2019 feladat 3-án vettünk be. Egy egyszerű, értelmezhető, mégis nagy teljesítményű osztályozási modell létrehozásához használtuk a polcon kívüli eszközöket a funkciók tervezésével és paraméterek hangolásával. Rendszerünk 0,7357 mikro F1 pontszámot ér el, ami a verseny legjobb pontszámának 92%-a, ami bizonyítja, hogy a "sekély" osztályozási megközelítések jól teljesítenek, ha részletes jellemzői kiválasztással és statisztikai elemzéssel párosulnak.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το γραμμικό μας σύστημα για ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων από διάλογο συνομιλίας, που εισήχθη στο έργο 3. Χρησιμοποιήσαμε έτοιμα εργαλεία σε συνδυασμό με τη μηχανική χαρακτηριστικών και τη ρύθμιση παραμέτρων για να δημιουργήσουμε ένα απλό, ερμηνευτό, αλλά υψηλής απόδοσης, μοντέλο ταξινόμησης. Το σύστημά μας επιτυγχάνει μια μικροβαθμολογία 0.7357, η οποία είναι 92% της κορυφαίας βαθμολογίας του διαγωνισμού, αποδεικνύοντας ότι οι "ρηχές" προσεγγίσεις ταξινόμησης μπορούν να αποδώσουν καλά όταν συνδυάζονται με λεπτομερή επιλογή χαρακτηριστικών και στατιστική ανάλυση.', 'ka': "ამ დოკუმენტი ჩვენი ლეინერი SVM სისტემის შესახებ ემოციონის კლასიფიკაციაში, როგორც კონტრაციოლური დიალოგიდან დაწყებული SemEval2019 სამუშაო 3-ში. ჩვენ გამოიყენეთ ფუნქციის ინზინერიცია და პარამეტრის კონფიგურაციას, რომელიც გამოიყენეთ განსხვავებელი, მაგრამ უფრო გამოყენებელი, კლასიფიკაციის მოდელი. ჩვენი სისტემა მიკრო F1 წერტილი 0,7357-ის, რომელიც უფრო დიდი წერტილის 92%-ია, რომელიც კონსპენტირებისთვის გამოიყენებს, რომ 'წყალი' კლასიფიკაციის წერტილებები შეუძლიათ გავაკეთოთ კარგი, როდესაც დაყენ", 'mk': 'This paper describes our linear SVM system for emotion classification from conversational dialogue, entered in SemEval2019 Task 3.  Користевме алатки надвор од полицата, поврзани со инженерство на карактеристики и параметри за да создадеме едноставен, интерпретабилен, но високо функционален, класификациски модел. Нашиот систем постигнува микро-Ф1 оценка од 0,7357, што претставува 92 отсто од највисоката оценка за натпреварот, демонстрирајќи дека „плошките“ класификациски пристапи можат да успеат добро кога се поврзани со деталната селекција на пердури и статистичка анализа.', 'it': 'Questo articolo descrive il nostro sistema SVM lineare per la classificazione delle emozioni dal dialogo conversazionale, inserito nel Task 3 SemEval2019. Abbiamo utilizzato strumenti off-the-shelf abbinati a feature engineering e regolazione dei parametri per creare un modello di classificazione semplice, interpretabile ma performante. Il nostro sistema raggiunge un punteggio micro F1 di 0,7357, che rappresenta il 92% del punteggio più alto per la competizione, dimostrando che gli approcci di classificazione "poco profondi" possono funzionare bene se abbinati a una selezione dettagliata delle caratteristiche e ad un\'analisi statistica.', 'kk': "Бұл қағаз шеңберлік диалогындағы эмоциялық түрлендіру үшін сызық SVM жүйесімізді таңдайды, шеңберлік 2019 3- тапсырмасында келтірілген. Қарапайым, интерпретациялық, бірақ жоғары жұмыс істеу, классификациялық үлгісін жасау үшін қарапайым инженерлік мен параметрлерді баптау құрылғыларды қолдандық. Біздің жүйеміз 0,7357 микро F1 нүктесін жеткізеді, бұл конкурстың жоғары нүктесінің 92% дегенді көрсетеді. Бұл 'жалғыз' классификациясының жағдайлары, егжей- тегжейі fea- ture таңдау мен статистикалық анализ арқылы бірі", 'lt': "Šiame dokumente aprašoma mūsų linijinė SVM sistema emocijų klasifikavimui iš pokalbio dialogo, įrašyta į SemEval2019 3 užduotį. Mes naudojomės ne platformos įrankius kartu su charakteristikų inžinerija ir parametrų pritaikymu, kad sukurtume paprastą, aiškinamą, tačiau aukštos kokybės klasifikacijos model į. Our system achieves a micro F1 score of 0.7357, which is 92% of the top score for the competition, demonstrating that 'shallow' classification approaches can perform well when coupled with detailed fea- ture selection and statistical analysis.", 'ms': "Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem SVM linear kita untuk klasifikasi emosi dari dialog perbualan, dimasukkan dalam SemEval2019 Tugas 3. Kami menggunakan alat off-the-shelf bersama dengan teknik ciri dan penyesuaian parameter untuk mencipta model klasifikasi sederhana, boleh diterjemahkan, namun berkesan tinggi. Sistem kita mencapai skor F1 mikro 0.7357, yang merupakan 92% dari skor terbaik untuk pertandingan, menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan klasifikasi 'rendah' boleh berjaya dengan baik apabila ditambah dengan pemilihan penambahan terperinci dan analisis statistik.", 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema SVM lineari tagħna għall-klassifikazzjoni tal-emozzjonijiet mid-djalogu ta’ konverżjoni, imdaħħla f’SemEval2019 Task 3. We used off-the-shelf tools coupled with feature engineering and parameter tuning to create a simple, interpretable, yet high-performing, classification model.  Is-sistema tagħna tikseb punteġġ mikro F1 ta’ 0.7357, li huwa 92% tal-ogħla punteġġ għall-kompetizzjoni, li juri li approċċi ta’ klassifikazzjoni ‘baxxi’ jistgħu jwettqu tajjeb meta flimkien ma’ għa żla dettaljata tal-firxa u analiżi statistika.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d2019 ടാസ്ക് 3 ല്\u200d കടന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന നമ്മുടെ വികാരത്തിന്റെ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം വ നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രത്യേക എഞ്ചിനിജിനീയറിനും പരാമീറ്ററിനും ഇണങ്ങിയ ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഒരു ലളിതമായ, വ്യാഖ്യാപിക്കുന്ന, പക്ഷെ ഉയര്\u200dന് നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ഒരു മൈക്രോ F1 സ്കോര്\u200d പ്രാപിക്കുന്നു. അത് പ്രതിയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ മുകളില്\u200d 92% സ്കോര്\u200d ആണ്. വിശദീകരിച്ച വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനും സ', 'mn': "Энэ цаас бидний сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хуваалцааны талаарх сэтгэл хөдлөлийн системийг SemEval2019 Task 3-д оруулсан салбарын SVM системийг тайлбарладаг. Бид машины инженерчлэл болон параметр цуглуулах хэрэгсэл ашиглаж энгийн, түгшилтэй, өндөр ажиллагаатай, хуваалцах загварыг бүтээхэд ашигласан. Бидний систем 0.7357 жижиг F1 оноо гарч ирнэ. Энэ нь өрсөлдөөний хамгийн өндөр тооны 92%-ын тоо юм. Энэ нь 'гүнзгий' хуваарилалтын тулд нарийвчлалтай холбогдож чадна.", 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz liniowy system SVM klasyfikacji emocji z dialogu konwersacyjnego, wprowadzony w SemEval2019 Zadanie 3. Wykorzystaliśmy gotowe narzędzia w połączeniu z inżynierią funkcji i dostrajaniem parametrów, aby stworzyć prosty, interpretowalny, a jednocześnie wydajny model klasyfikacji. Nasz system osiąga wynik mikro F1 0,7357, który stanowi 92% najwyższego wyniku konkursu, co pokazuje, że "płytkie" podejścia klasyfikacyjne mogą sprawdzić się dobrze w połączeniu ze szczegółową selekcją cech i analizą statystyczną.', 'sr': "Ovaj papir opisuje naš linearni SVM sistem za klasifikaciju emocija iz razgovornog dijaloga, koji je ušao u SemEval2019 Task 3. Koristili smo oružje iz police povezane sa funkcionalnim inženjerstvom i parametrima kako bi stvorili jednostavan, interpretabilan, ali visok izvođa č, klasifikacijski model. Naš sistem postiže mikro F1 rezultat od 0,7357, koji je 92% najboljih rezultata za konkurenciju, pokazujući da pristupi klasifikacije 'plitke' mogu dobro izvesti kada se povezuju sa detaljnim selekcijom fea-turne i statističkom analizu.", 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver vår lineær SVM-systemet for emosjonsklassifikasjon frå samtaledialogen, som er skriven inn i semiEval2019 oppgåve 3. Vi brukte av skjelverktøya kopla med funksjonsengineering og parametrar for å oppretta ein enkel, tolkbar, men høg utføringsmodul, klassifikasjonsmodul. Sistemet vårt oppnår eit mikro F1- poeng med 0,7357, som er 92% av det øvste poenget for konkurransen, som demonstrerer at tilnærmingane «shallow» kan utføra godt når det er kopla med detaljert fea- ture- utval og statistisk analyse.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul SVM liniar pentru clasificarea emoțiilor din dialogul conversațional, introdus în SemEval2019 Task 3. Am folosit instrumente off-the-shelf combinate cu ingineria caracteristicilor și reglarea parametrilor pentru a crea un model de clasificare simplu, interpretabil, dar de înaltă performanță. Sistemul nostru obține un scor micro F1 de 0,7357, care reprezintă 92% din scorul de top al competiției, demonstrând că abordările de clasificare "superficială" pot performa bine atunci când sunt combinate cu selecția detaliată a caracteristicilor și analiza statistică.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt linjära SVM-system för känsloklassificering från konversationsdialog, som tagits in i SemEval2019 Task 3. Vi använde färdiga verktyg tillsammans med funktionsteknik och parameterjustering för att skapa en enkel, tolkningsbar men ändå högpresterande klassificeringsmodell. Vårt system uppnår en mikroF1-poäng på 0,7357, vilket är 92% av topppoängen för tävlingen, vilket visar att "ytliga" klassificeringssätt kan prestera bra i kombination med detaljerat urval av egenskaper och statistisk analys.', 'si': "මේ පැත්තේ අපේ ලේනියාර් SVM පද්ධතිය සඳහා භාවිත සංවාදයෙන් වාර්තාවක් සංවාදයෙන් භාවිත විවෘත කරන්න, සෙම අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සමග ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විද අපේ පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණය 0.7357 වල මයික්රෝ F1 ස්කෝර් එකක් ලබාගන්නවා, ඒක තර්ජනය සඳහා උපස්ථ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් 92% කියලා, පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් කියලා 'shallow' විශ", 'so': "Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka SVM ee linear ah ee iskuulka hissiyadaada ka soo baxa dialogue iskala hadlo, wuxuuna galay shaqo 3. Waxaynu isticmaalnay qalabka caadiga ah oo la xidhiidhay injiilka iyo parameterka si aan u abuurno qaab fudud, turjuman, laakiin sameyn kara, fasax. Systemkanagu wuxuu gaadhaa koox fudud F1 oo ka mid ah 0.7357, taasoo ka mid ah 92 boqolkiiba kooxda sare, wuxuuna caddaynayaa in kooxaha fasalka 'cirro' uu si wanaagsan u sameyn karo marka la isku daray doorasho gaar ah iyo baaritaanka statistic ah.", 'ta': "இந்த தாள் உணர்வு வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கான நேர் SVM அமைப்பை வரையறுக்கிறது, பேச்சு உரையாடலிலிருந்து செம்Eval2019 பணி 3 ல் உள்ளிட் நாங்கள் குணங்கள் பொறியியல் மற்றும் அளபுருக்களை இணைத்து கொண்டிருந்தோம் ஷெல்ப் கருவிகளை பயன்படுத்தினோம் எளிய, பொருளாக்கும எங்கள் அமைப்பு 0.7357 க்கு ஒரு சிறிய F1 புள்ளியை பெறுகிறது, அது மேல் புள்ளிகளில் 92% ஆகும். இது 'மஞ்சள்' வகுப்பு முறைகள் செயல்படுத்தும் போது விவரமான தன்மை தேர்வு மற்", 'ur': "This paper describes our linear SVM system for emotional classification from conversational dialog, entered in SemEval2019 Task 3. ہم نے فائقہ انجینرینگ اور پارامیٹ ٹونگ کے ساتھ شروع ہوئے شیلف ابزار استعمال کیا ہے کہ ایک ساده, تفسیر قابل ہے، لیکن بلند عملکرد، کلاسپیٹ موڈل بنائیں۔ ہماری سیستم 0.7357 کی ایک میکروٹی F1 اسکور پہنچتی ہے، جو مقابلہ کے لئے بالای اسکور کی 92% ہے، دکھاتی ہے کہ 'گلے' کلاسپیٹ کی تقریبا بہت اچھی طرح کرسکتی ہے جب تفصیل فیا- ترور انتخاب اور آمار تحلیل کے ساتھ ملے جاتے ہیں۔", 'uz': "Name Biz tashqi asboblardan foydalanamiz imkoniyatlar va parametrlar bilan birga bog'liq, oddiy, tarjima qilish va yuqori darajalashtirish modelini yaratish uchun. Bizning tizimmiz 0.7357ning eng yuqori scori 0.7357 uchun kichkina F1 qismi topadi. Bu rivojlanish uchun 92% edi. Tafsilotning chegarasini ko'rsatish mumkin. Tafsilotlar bilan boshqa shaklni tanlash va statistik analytiklash bilan bog'liq bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống SVM tuyến của chúng ta để phân loại cảm xúc từ cuộc đối thoại, được nhập vào Nhiệm vụ SemEvul13. Chúng tôi sử dụng các công cụ ngoài kệ cùng với cấu trúc đặc trưng và độ chỉnh tham số để tạo ra một mô hình phân hạng đơn giản, được giải thích, nhưng có trình độ cao. Hệ thống của chúng ta đạt được một vi F1 số lượng 0.7357, 92=.=) của đỉnh điểm trong cuộc thi, chứng minh rằng các phương pháp phân hạng "nông cạn" có thể thực hiện tốt khi kết hợp với việc chọn lọc gan và phân tích thống kê chi tiết.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва нашата линейна система за класификация на емоциите от разговорен диалог, въведена в Задача 3. Използвахме готови инструменти, съчетани с функционален инженеринг и настройка на параметрите, за да създадем прост, интерпретиран, но с висока производителност модел за класификация. Системата ни постига микро оценка от 0,7357, което е 92% от най-високия резултат за състезанието, което показва, че "плитките" класификационни подходи могат да се представят добре, когато са съчетани с подробен подбор на качества и статистически анализ.', 'da': "Denne artikel beskriver vores lineære SVM-system til følelsesklassificering fra samtale dialog, indtastet i SemEval2019 Opgave 3. Vi brugte off-the-shelf værktøjer kombineret med feature engineering og parametertuning til at skabe en enkel, fortolkelig, men højtydende klassificeringsmodel. Vores system opnår en mikro F1 score på 0,7357, hvilket er 92% af topscoren for konkurrencen, hvilket viser, at 'lavvandede' klassifikationsmetoder kan klare sig godt, når de kombineres med detaljeret egenskabsudvælgelse og statistisk analyse.", 'nl': "Dit artikel beschrijft ons lineaire SVM-systeem voor emotie-classificatie uit conversationele dialoog, ingevoerd in SemEval2019 Taak 3. We gebruikten standaard tools in combinatie met feature engineering en parameter tuning om een eenvoudig, interpreteerbaar, maar goed presterend classificatiemodel te creëren. Ons systeem behaalt een micro F1 score van 0,7357, die 92% van de topscore voor de competitie is, wat aantoont dat 'ondiepe' classificatiebenaderingen goed kunnen presteren in combinatie met gedetailleerde feature selectie en statistische analyse.", 'hr': "Ovaj papir opisuje naš linearni sistem SVM za klasifikaciju emocija iz razgovornog dijaloga, koji je ušao u zadatak 3. SemEval2019. Koristili smo oružje izvan police povezane sa stručnjom inženjeringa i parametrima kako bi stvorili jednostavan, interpretabilan, ali visok izvođen, klasifikacijski model. Naš sustav postiže mikro F1 rezultat od 0,7357, koji je 92% najboljih rezultata za natjecanje, pokazujući da pristupi klasifikacije 'plitkih' mogu dobro obaviti kad se povezuju s detaljnim selekcijom fea-turne i statističkim analizom.", 'id': "This paper describes our linear SVM system for emotion classification from conversational dialogue, entered in SemEval2019 Task 3.  Kami menggunakan alat off-the-shelf bergabung dengan teknik karakteristik dan tuning parameter untuk menciptakan model klasifikasi sederhana, dapat diterjemahkan, namun prestasi tinggi. Sistem kita mencapai skor F1 mikro 0,7357, yang merupakan 92% dari skor terbaik untuk kompetisi, menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan klasifikasi 'rendah' dapat berjalan dengan baik ketika ditambah dengan seleksi penampilan rincian dan analisis statistik.", 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unser lineares SVM-System zur Emotionsklassifizierung aus dem Konversationsdialog, das in SemEval2019 Task 3 eingegeben wurde. Wir nutzten handelsübliche Tools in Verbindung mit Feature Engineering und Parameteroptimierung, um ein einfaches, interpretierbares und dennoch leistungsstarkes Klassifizierungsmodell zu erstellen. Unser System erzielt einen Mikro-F1-Score von 0,7357, der 92% der Top-Punktzahl des Wettbewerbs ausmacht, was zeigt, dass "flache" Klassifikationsansätze in Verbindung mit detaillierter Funktionsauswahl und statistischer Analyse gut abschneiden können.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم SVM خطی ما را برای classification احساسات از محاورۀ مکالمات توصیف می\u200cکند، که وارد شد در کار ۳ SemEval2019. ما از ابزارهای خارج از پناهگاه استفاده کردیم که با مهندسی ویژه و پارامتر برای ایجاد یک مدل ساده، تفسیر قابل تفسیر، هنوز عملکرد بالا و کلاسیف است. سیستم ما به یک امتیاز میکرو F1 از 0.7357 رسیده است که 92 درصد از امتیاز بالا برای رقابت است، نشان می دهد که نزدیک\u200cهای گروه\u200cشناسی «گسترده» می\u200cتوانند خوب انجام دهند وقتی با انتخاب\u200cهای جزئیات fea-ture و تحلیل آماری انجام دهند.', 'ko': "본고는 SemEval 2019 퀘스트 3에서 입력한 대화에서 감정을 분류하는 데 사용되는 우리의 선형 지원 벡터 시스템을 묘사한다.우리는 기존의 도구를 사용하여 특징 공학과 파라미터 조정을 결합하여 간단하고 해석 가능하지만 성능이 높은 분류 모델을 만들었다.우리 시스템은 0.7357의 미시F1 점수를 얻었는데 이것은 경기 최고 점수의 92% 로'얕은층'분류 방법이 상세한 특징 선택과 통계 분석을 결합할 때 좋은 성적을 거둘 수 있음을 나타낸다.", 'tr': "Bu käze çyzgyly SVM sistemamyzy çykyş dýalogdan, SemEval2019 Task 3 içine girdi. Biz offline aletleri özellikler inženjeriýa we paraýatçylar bilen birleşmiş ýeňil, terjime edilebilir, ýokary başarmak üçin ullanýardyk. Biziň sistemamyz mikro F1 nokat 0.7357 we ýaryşyk üçin iň üst nokatlaryň 92%-inden ýetip bilýär we bu şekilde 'gowy' klasifikasyýanyň golaýlarynyň detayly fea-turma saýlawy we statistik analýusiýasynda gowy edip biler.", 'sw': "Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wetu wa SVM wa msingi wa utambulisho wa hisia kutoka katika mazungumzo ya mazungumzo, uliingia katika Task 3 ya SemEval2019. Tulitumia vifaa vinavyotokana na vifaa vinavyohusiana na uhandisi na parameter kwa ajili ya kutengeneza muundo rahisi, yenye tafsiri, lakini ni mtindo wa usambazaji wa juu. Mfumo wetu unafanikiwa vipimo vidogo vya F1 vya 0.7357, ambavyo ni asilimia 92 ya vipande vya juu kwa ajili ya mashindano hayo, ikionyesha kwamba mbinu za usambazaji wa 'rangi mbaya' zinaweza kufanya vizuri pale ambapo wanaunganishwa na uchaguzi wa kina na uchambuzi wa takwimu.", 'sq': "Ky dokument përshkruan sistemin tonë linear SVM për klasifikimin e emocioneve nga dialogu bisedimor, hyrë në SemEval2019 Task 3. Ne përdorëm mjete jashtë raftit bashkuar me inxhinierin e funksioneve dhe rregullimin e parametrave për të krijuar një model të thjeshtë, të interpretueshëm, por me rezultate të larta klasifikimi. Sistemi ynë arrin një pikë mikro F1 prej 0.7357, e cila është 92% e pikës së lartë për konkurrimin, duke demonstruar se qasjet e klasifikimit 'të sipërme' mund të shkojnë mirë kur bashkohen me zgjedhjen e detajuar të peshkimit dhe analizën statistike.", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የሳመን SVM ስርዓታችንን ለስህተት መግለጫ የሚለውጠውን የስብሰባ ማነሻ ማነሻ፣ በSemEval2019 ስራ 3 ውስጥ ገባ፡፡ የፊደል መሣሪያዎች፣ የፊደል ኢንጂንጂንተር እና parameter እና ቀላል፣ የሚተረጉም፣ ነገር ግን ከፍተኛ እና የክፍለ መግለጫ ሞዴል ለመፍጠር ተጠቃሚ ነበር፡፡ የሥርዓታችን ቁጥር 0.7357 ሚክሮፕ F1 ነጥብ አግኝቷል፤ ይህም ትክክለኛውን ነጥብ 92 በመቶ ነው፡፡', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf ons lineêre SVM stelsel vir emosie klassifikasie van gesprekslys dialoog, ingevoer in SemEval2019 Opdrag 3. Ons het af- die- shelf nutsprogramme gebruik saam met funksie inženiering en parameters tuning om 'n eenvoudige, interpreterbare, nog hoë- uitvoerbare, klassifikasie model te skep. Ons stelsel bereik 'n mikro F1 skaal van 0.7357, wat is 92% van die boonste skaal vir die rekenaar, wat wys dat 'shallow' klassifikasie toegang kan goed uitvoer wanneer gekoppel is met gedetale fea- ture kies en statistiese analisie.", 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր գծային ԱՎՄ համակարգը զգացմունքների դասակարգման համար խոսակցության մեջ, ներկայացված ՍեմԵվալ 2019-ի 3-ի գործում: Մենք օգտագործեցինք անդաշտային գործիքներ, որոնք միացված էին հատկանիշների ճարտարագիտության և պարամետրերի կարգավորման հետ, որպեսզի ստեղծենք պարզ, մեկնաբանելի, սակայն բարձր արդյունքներ ունեցող, դասակարգման մոդել: Մեր համակարգը հասնում է 0.7357-ի միկրո F1 գնահատականի, որը մրցակցության ամենալավ գնահատականի 92 տոկոսն է, ցույց տալով, որ "մակերեսային" դասակարգման մոտեցումները կարող են լավ աշխատել, երբ միավորվում են մանրամասն փորձարկումների ընտրության և վիճակագրական վերլուծու', 'bs': "Ovaj papir opisuje naš linearni SVM sistem za klasifikaciju emocija iz razgovornog dijaloga, koji je ušao u SemEval2019 Task 3. Koristili smo oružje iz police povezane sa funkcionalnim inženjerstvom i parametrima kako bi stvorili jednostavan, interpretabilan, ali visok izvođa č, klasifikacijski model. Naš sistem postigne mikro F1 rezultat od 0,7357, koji je 92% najboljih rezultata za konkurenciju, pokazujući da pristupi klasifikacije 'plitke' mogu dobro izvesti kada se povezuju sa detaljnim selekcijom fea-turne i statističkim analizima.", 'bn': 'This paper describes our linear SVM system for emotion classification from conversational dialogue, entered in SemEval2019 Task 3.  আমরা ব্যবহার করেছিলাম বৈশিষ্ট্য ইঞ্জিনিয়ার এবং প্যারামিটারের সাথে যুক্ত হয়েছিলাম একটি সাধারণ, ব্যাখ্যাত, কিন্তু উচ্চকর্মী, ক আমাদের সিস্টেম ০. ৭৩৫৭ এর মাইক্রো এফ১ স্কোর অর্জন করে, যা প্রতিযোগিতার জন্য সর্বোচ্চ স্কোরের ৯২ শতাংশ। তারা প্রতিবাদ করছে যে বিস্তারিত বিশেষ বৈশিষ্ট্য নির্বাচন', 'az': "Bu kağıt, SemEval2019 Görevi 3 içində daxil olunan emosyon klasifikasyonu üçün linear SVM sistemimizi təsdiqləyir. Biz fərqli inženjeri və parametr təminatı ilə birləşdirilmiş şəffaf aletlerini sadəcə, yorumlayıb, hətta yüksək performans, klasifikasiya modeli yaratmaq üçün istifadə etdik. Sistemimiz 0,7357 mikro F1 nöqtəsinə nail ola bilər. Bu müqayisədə ən yüksək nöqtəsinin 92%-idir. Belə göstərilir ki, fea-ture seçimləri və statistik analizi ilə birlikdə 'çəkilmiş' klasifikasiya yaxınlıqları yaxşılıq edə bilər.", 'ca': 'Aquest article descriu el nostre sistema linear SVM per la classificació emocional del diàleg conversacional, entrat en SemEval2019 Task 3. Vam utilitzar eines fora de la plataforma acoplades amb enginyeria de característiques i ajustes de paràmetres per crear un model de classificació simple, interpretable, però de gran rendiment. El nostre sistema aconsegueix una puntuació micro F1 de 0,7357, que és el 92% de la puntuació superior de la competició, demostrant que els enfocaments de classificació "superficials" poden acompanyar-se de la selecció detallada de la perforació i l\'anàlisi estadística.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli kuvaa lineaarista SVM-järjestelmää tunteiden luokitteluun keskusteludialogista, joka on kirjattu SemEval2019 Task 3:een. Käytimme valmiita työkaluja yhdistettynä ominaisuuksien suunnitteluun ja parametrien viritykseen luodaksemme yksinkertaisen, tulkittavan, mutta suorituskykyisen luokittelumallin. Järjestelmämme saavuttaa mikro-F1-pisteen 0,7357, mikä on 92% kilpailun parhaista pisteistä, mikä osoittaa, että "matalat" luokittelumenetelmät voivat toimia hyvin, kun niihin liittyy yksityiskohtainen ominaisuusvalinta ja tilastollinen analyysi.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš lineární SVM systém pro klasifikaci emocí z konverzačního dialogu, zadaný v SemEval2019 Task 3. Použili jsme standardní nástroje spojené s technikou funkcí a laděním parametrů, abychom vytvořili jednoduchý, interpretovatelný a přesto vysoce výkonný klasifikační model. Náš systém dosahuje mikro F1 skóre 0,7357, což je 92% nejvyššího skóre soutěže, což dokazuje, že "mělké" klasifikační přístupy mohou výkonně fungovat v kombinaci s detailním výběrem funkcí a statistickou analýzou.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie lineaarset SVM-süsteemi emotsioonide klassifitseerimiseks vestlusdialoogist, mis on sisestatud SemEval2019 ülesandes 3. Kasutasime lihtsat, tõlgendatavat, kuid kõrge jõudlusega klassifikatsioonimudelit koos funktsioonide projekteerimise ja parameetrite häälestamisega. Meie süsteem saavutab mikro F1 skoori 0,7357, mis on 92% võistluse parimast skoorist, mis näitab, et "madalad" klassifitseerimislähenemisviisid võivad olla hästi tulemuslikud koos detailse tulemuste valiku ja statistilise analüüsiga.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na faɗaɗa tsarin SvM na ƙarani da aka canza tsari ga zaman hisani daga zauren akwatin bayani na daban-daban, na shiga cikin Tafiyar 3. Mun yi amfani da kayan aiki na shelf da aka haɗa shi da muhalli masu inganci da parameteri tunkuɗe zuwa a ƙiƙiro misali mai sauƙi, fassara da fassara, kuma amma masu sami da babban-mai fassara. Yaurinmu na sami matsayin F1 mai nau'i na 0.735 7, wanda ke kasa 92% na kwanan kwanan kwamfyuta, yana iya nuna cewa hanyoyin 'ya'yan hanyoyi' za'a iya aiki mai kyau idan an sami da zaɓan-zafi da Analissari na ƙayyade.", 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan naš linearni SVM sistem za klasifikacijo čustev iz pogovornega dialoga, vnesen v nalogo 3 SemEval2019. Uporabili smo pripravljena orodja skupaj z inženiringom funkcij in nastavitvijo parametrov, da smo ustvarili preprost, razložljiv, a visoko zmogljiv model klasifikacije. Naš sistem doseže mikro rezultat F1 0,7357, kar je 92% najvišje rezultate tekmovanja, kar kaže, da lahko "plitvi" pristopi klasifikacije uspešno delujejo, če so v kombinaciji s podrobno izbiro uspešnosti in statistično analizo.', 'he': "העיתון הזה מתאר את מערכת SVM לינרית שלנו להקליטה רגשות מדיולוג שיחה, נכנס ב SemEval2019 משימה 3. השתמשנו בכלי מחוץ למדף המזוודדים עם הנדסה של תכונות ופרמטרים כדי ליצור מודל קליזציה פשוט, אפשרי לפרש, אך בעל ביצועים גבוהים. המערכת שלנו משיגה נקודת מיקרו F1 של 0.7357, שהיא 92% מהנקודת העליונה של התחרות, שמוכיחת שגישות מסווג 'שטחים' יכולות להצליח היטב כשמוצגות לבחירה פרטית של פיטור ובניתוח סטטיסטי.", 'jv': 'Awaten iki rambarang kelompok nggawe SVM sistem linear kanggo kelompok nggawe conversations dialog, sisale nan semebal2011 task 3. We used off-the Sistem dhéwé iso nggawe mikro F1 sing sampek 0.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་སྒེར་གྱི་གཏོང་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ནང་གི་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་linear SVM་ལག་གི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།SemEval2019 Task 3 We used off-the-shelf tools coupled with feature engineering and parameter tuning to create a simple, interpretable, yet high-performing, classification model. ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་སྒྲ་བརྙན་ནང་གི་མིག་ཐག་F1 མ་ཚད་0.7357་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'SCIA at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Sentiment Analysis in Textual Conversations Using Deep Learning', 'ar': 'SCIA في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: تحليل المشاعر في المحادثات النصية باستخدام التعلم العميق', 'es': 'Tarea 3 de SCIA en SemEval-2019: Análisis de sentimientos en conversaciones textuales mediante aprendizaje profundo', 'fr': "SCIA au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Analyse des sentiments dans les conversations textuelles à l'aide du Deep Learning", 'pt': 'SCIA no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Análise de Sentimentos em Conversas Textuais Usando Deep Learning', 'ja': 'SEMEval -2019のSCIAタスク3 ：ディープラーニングを使用したテキスト会話における感情分析', 'zh': 'SCIA在SemEval-2019务3:以深学之情析', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 3 पर एससीआईए: गहरी शिक्षा का उपयोग करके पाठ्य वार्तालापों में भावना विश्लेषण', 'ru': 'SCIA на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Анализ настроений в текстовых разговорах с использованием глубокого обучения', 'ga': 'SCIA ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Anailís Mothúchán i gCainteanna Téacsúla le Foghlaim Dhomhain', 'ka': 'SCIA semiEval-2019 სამუშაო დავალება 3: ტექსტულ პარამეტრებში სწავლების გამოყენება სხვადასხვა ანალიზი', 'hu': 'SCIA a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: Érzelmelemzés a szöveges beszélgetésekben a mélytanulás segítségével', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Ανάλυση συναισθημάτων σε γραπτές συνομιλίες χρησιμοποιώντας τη βαθιά μάθηση', 'kk': 'SCIA жарым- Eval- 2019 тапсырмасының 3- тапсырмасы: Мәтіндік сұрақтардың Sentiment Analysis', 'mk': 'SCIA на SemEval-2019 задача 3: Анализа на чувствата во текстуалните разговори користејќи длабоко учење', 'ms': 'SCIA di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Analisi Sentiment dalam Perbualan Teks Menggunakan Belajar Dalam', 'mt': 'SCIA f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 3: Analiżi tas-Sentiment fi Konversjonijiet Tekstivi bl-Użu ta’ Tagħlim Profond', 'it': 'SCIA a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Analisi dei sentimenti nelle conversazioni testuali utilizzando il Deep Learning', 'lt': 'SCIA per 2019 m. pusmetį 3 užduotis: jautrumo analizė teksto konversacijose, kuriose naudojamas gilus mokymasis', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 ажил 3: Текст ярилцлагуудын сэтгэл санааны шинжилгээ', 'no': 'SCIA ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3: Sentimentanalyse i tekstsamtaler ved bruk av dyppa læring', 'pl': 'SCIA w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Analiza sentymentów w rozmowach tekstowych z wykorzystaniem Deep Learning', 'sr': 'SCIA na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: Sentimentna analiza u tekstualnim razgovorima korištenja dubokog učenja', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3: ടെക്സ്റ്റ്വല്\u200d സംസാരത്തിലെ സെന്റിമെന്റ് അന്വേഷണം', 'si': 'SCIA at semeval-2019 Job 3: Sentiment විශේෂණය පරීක්ෂණය පාළුවන් සම්බන්ධ කතාවක් භාවිත කරන්න', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 3: ஆழம் கற்றுக்கொண்டு உரை பேச்சுகளில் நேரம் ஆராய்வு', 'ro': 'SCIA la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Analiza sentimentelor în conversațiile textuale folosind învățarea profundă', 'so': 'SCIA at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Sentiment Analysis in Textual Conversations using Deep Learning', 'sv': 'SCIA på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Känsleanalys i textsamtal med hjälp av djupinlärning', 'ur': 'سیم ایویل-2019 ٹاکس 3 میں SCIA: سنٹیمینٹ تحلیل ٹیکسٹل کی باتوں میں', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'THtránh pháp lý tại Nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 9 3: Bước phân tích tình cảm trong giao tiếp theo cấu hình sử dụng học sâu', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Анализ на сентимента в текстови разговори с помощта на задълбочено обучение', 'da': 'SCIA på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Følelsesanalyse i tekstsamtaler ved hjælp af dyb læring', 'nl': 'SCIA bij SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Sentimentanalyse in tekstuele gesprekken met behulp van Deep Learning', 'hr': 'SCIA na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: Sentimentna analiza u tekstualnim razgovorima Koristeći duboko učenje', 'de': 'SCIA bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Sentimentanalyse in textuellen Gesprächen mit Deep Learning', 'id': 'SCIA at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Sentiment Analysis in Textual Conversations Using Deep Learning', 'ko': 'SCIA가SemEval-2019에서의 퀘스트 3: 심도 있는 학습을 사용하여 텍스트 대화에서의 정서 분석', 'fa': 'SCIA در پایین Eval-2019 کار ۳: تحلیل احساساتی در گفتگوهای متن استفاده از یادگیری عمیق', 'sw': 'SCIA kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 3: Uchambuzi wa Sentiment in mazungumzo ya Kiteknolojia kwa kutumia Elimu ya Kideep', 'tr': 'SCIA at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Sentiment Analysis in Textual Conversations Using Deep Learning', 'hy': 'ՍԿԻԱ-ն 2019-ի կիսագնդի 3. հանձնարարությունը. խորը սովորելով օգտագործվող տեքստային հաղորդակցություններում զգացմունքների վերլուծություն', 'af': 'SCIA by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 3: Sentiment Analysis in Textual Conversations gebruik Deep Leer', 'sq': 'SCIA në SemEval-2019 Task 3: Analysis Sentiment in Textual Conversations Using Deep Learning', 'am': 'SCIA at SemEval-2019 ስራ 3: Sentiment Analysis in Textual Conversations using Deep Learning', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Gözəl 3: Metin Konuşmalarında Sentiment Analizi', 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৩: গভীর শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করে টেক্সটুয়াল আলোচনায় সেনিমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণ', 'bs': 'SCIA na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: Sentimentna analiza u tekstualnim razgovorima koristeći duboko učenje', 'ca': 'SCIA at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Sentiment Analysis in Textual Conversations Using Deep Learning', 'fi': 'SCIA SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 3: Tunteanalyysi tekstikeskusteluissa syväoppimisen avulla', 'cs': 'Úkol 3: Analýza sentimentů v textových konverzacích s využitím hlubokého učení', 'et': 'SCIA SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 3: Sentimendianalüüs tekstivestlustes sügavõppe abil', 'ha': 'SCIA at SemEal-2019 Task 3: Analyze in Textical Conversation Using Depth Learni', 'jv': 'scIB at seminval-2011 task 3: Sentiment Test in textual conversations Using deep Learning', 'sk': 'SCIA na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Analiza čustev v besedilnih pogovorih z uporabo globokega učenja', 'he': 'SCIA at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Sentiment Analysis in Textual Conversations Using Deep Learning', 'bo': 'SCIA at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Sentiment Analysis in Textual Conversations Using Deep Learning'}
{'en': 'In this paper we present our submission for SemEval-2019 Task 3 : EmoContext. The task consisted of classifying a textual dialogue into one of four emotion classes : happy, sad, angry or others. Our approach tried to improve on multiple aspects, preprocessing with an emphasis on spell-checking and ensembling with four different models : Bi-directional contextual LSTM (BC-LSTM), categorical Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binary convolutional Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) and Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU). On the leader-board, we submitted two systems that obtained a micro F1 score (F1) of 0.711 and 0.712. After the competition, we merged our two systems with ensembling, which achieved a F1 of 0.7324 on the test dataset.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم تقديمنا لمهمة SemEval-2019 3: EmoContext. تألفت المهمة من تصنيف الحوار النصي في واحدة من أربع فئات للمشاعر: سعيد ، حزين ، غاضب أو غيرها. حاول نهجنا تحسين الجوانب المتعددة والمعالجة المسبقة مع التركيز على التدقيق الإملائي والتجميع بأربعة نماذج مختلفة: LSTM السياقي ثنائي الاتجاه (BC-LSTM) ، والفئة Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM) ، والتلافيف الثنائي Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) ووحدة البوابات المتكررة (GRU). على لوحة المتصدرين ، قدمنا نظامين حصلوا على درجة F1 صغيرة (F1μ) تبلغ 0.711 و 0.712. بعد المنافسة ، قمنا بدمج نظامينا مع التجميع ، والذي حقق F1μ من 0.7324 في مجموعة بيانات الاختبار.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons notre soumission pour SemEval-2019 Task 3\xa0: EmoContext. La tâche consistait à classer un dialogue textuel dans l'une des quatre classes d'émotions\xa0: heureux, triste, en colère ou autres. Notre approche a tenté d'améliorer plusieurs aspects, le prétraitement en mettant l'accent sur la vérification orthographique et l'assemblage avec quatre modèles différents\xa0: LSTM contextuel bidirectionnel (BC-LSTM), Bi-LSTM catégorique (CAT-LSTM), Bi-LSTM convolutionnel binaire (BIN-LSTM) et Unité récurrente fermée (GRU). Au classement, nous avons soumis deux systèmes qui ont obtenu un score micro F1 (F1μ) de 0,711 et 0,712. Après la compétition, nous avons fusionné nos deux systèmes avec ensembling, ce qui a obtenu un F1μ de 0,7324 sur le jeu de données de test.", 'es': 'En este artículo presentamos nuestra presentación para la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2019: EmoContext. La tarea consistía en clasificar un diálogo textual en una de cuatro clases de emociones: feliz, triste, enojado u otras. Nuestro enfoque trató de mejorar en múltiples aspectos, el preprocesamiento con énfasis en la revisión ortográfica y el ensamblaje con cuatro modelos diferentes: LSTM contextual bidireccional (BC-LSTM), bi-LSTM categórico (CAT-LSTM), bi-LSTM convolucional binario (BIN-LSTM) y unidad recurrente con compuerta (GRU). En la tabla de clasificación, presentamos dos sistemas que obtuvieron una puntuación micro F1 (F1μ) de 0.711 y 0.712. Después de la competencia, fusionamos nuestros dos sistemas con ensembling, lo que logró una F1μ de 0.7324 en el conjunto de datos de prueba.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo apresentamos nossa submissão para a Tarefa 3 do SemEval-2019: EmoContext. A tarefa consistia em classificar um diálogo textual em uma das quatro classes de emoção: feliz, triste, zangado ou outros. Nossa abordagem tentou melhorar em vários aspectos, pré-processamento com ênfase na verificação ortográfica e ensembling com quatro modelos diferentes: LSTM contextual bidirecional (BC-LSTM), Bi-LSTM categórico (CAT-LSTM), Bi-LSTM convolucional binário (BIN-LSTM) e Unidade Recorrente Fechada (GRU). No quadro de líderes, apresentamos dois sistemas que obtiveram uma pontuação micro F1 (F1μ) de 0,711 e 0,712. Após a competição, fundimos nossos dois sistemas com ensembling, que alcançou um F1μ de 0,7324 no conjunto de dados de teste.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2019 Task 3: EmoContextの提出物を紹介します。その課題は、テキストの対話を4つの感情クラスのうちの1つに分類することでした。幸せ、悲しい、怒っている、または他のものです。我々のアプローチは、双方向コンテキストLSTM （ BC - LSTM ）、カテゴリカルBi - LSTM （ CAT - LSTM ）、バイナリ畳み込みBi - LSTM （ BIN - LSTM ）、およびゲーテッドリカレントユニット（ GRU ）の4つの異なるモデルでのスペルチェックとアンサンブルを重視して、複数の側面で前処理を改善しようとしました。リーダーボードでは、マイクロＦ１スコア（ Ｆ１ μ ）が０ ． ７ １ １及び０ ． ７ １ ２の２つのシステムを提出した。競合後、2つのシステムをアンサンブルとマージし、テストデータセットで0.7324のF 1 μを達成しました。', 'zh': '本文中,我们介绍了我们为SemEval-2019任3:EmoContext提交的文件。 文本四情:乐,悲,怒。 吾法多所改进,预处理之重者,拼写检查和四体之融合:双向上下文LSTM(BC-LSTM),类双LSTM(CAT-LSTM),二元卷积双LSTM(BIN-LSTM)与门控循环单元(GRU)。 于排行榜之上,交二统,得0.7110.712之微F1分数(F1μ)。 既罢,并两统于ensembling,成0.7324F1μ于测试数据集上。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम SemEval-2019 टास्क 3 के लिए अपना सबमिशन प्रस्तुत करते हैं: EmoContext। कार्य में एक पाठ्य संवाद को चार भावना वर्गों में से एक में वर्गीकृत करना शामिल था: खुश, उदास, नाराज या अन्य। हमारे दृष्टिकोण ने कई पहलुओं पर सुधार करने की कोशिश की, चार अलग-अलग मॉडलों के साथ वर्तनी-जांच और ensembling पर जोर देने के साथ प्रीप्रोसेसिंग: द्वि-दिशात्मक प्रासंगिक LSTM (BC-LSTM), स्पष्ट Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), बाइनरी convolutional Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) और गेटेड आवर्तक इकाई (GRU)। लीडर-बोर्ड पर, हमने दो प्रणालियों को प्रस्तुत किया जो 0.711 और 0.712 का माइक्रो एफ 1 स्कोर (एफ 1μ) प्राप्त करते हैं। प्रतियोगिता के बाद, हमने अपने दो प्रणालियों को ensembling के साथ विलय कर दिया, जिसने परीक्षण डेटासेट पर 0.7324 का F1μ प्राप्त किया।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем нашу заявку для задачи 3 SemEval-2019: EmoContext. Задача состояла в том, чтобы классифицировать текстовый диалог на один из четырех классов эмоций: счастливый, грустный, злой или другие. Наш подход пытался улучшить по многим аспектам, предварительной обработке с акцентом на проверку орфографии и сборке с четырьмя различными моделями: двунаправленная контекстная LSTM (BC-LSTM), категориальная Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), двоичная сверточная Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) и стробированная рекуррентная единица (GRU). На лидер-борде мы представили две системы, которые получили оценку микро F1 (F1μ) 0,711 и 0,712. После конкурса мы объединили наши две системы с ансамблем, который достиг F1μ 0,7324 на тестовом наборе данных.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo cuirimid ár n-aighneacht le haghaidh SemEval-2019 i láthair Tasc 3: EmoContext. Is éard a bhí sa tasc ná dialóg théacsúil a rangú i gceann de cheithre rang mothúcháin: sona, brónach, feargach nó eile. Rinne ár gcur chuige iarracht feabhas a chur ar ghnéithe iolracha, ag déanamh réamhphróiseála le béim ar litriú agus ar chóimeáil le ceithre mhúnla éagsúla: LSTM comhthéacsúla déthreoracha (BC-LSTM), Bi-LSTM catagóiriúil (CAT-LSTM), dé-threoracha comhtháite Bi-LSTM. (BIN-LSTM) agus Aonad Athfhillteach Geata (GRU). Ar an gclár ceannaire, chuireamar isteach dhá chóras a fuair scór micrea F1 (F1μ) de 0.711 agus 0.712. Tar éis an chomórtais, chomhcheangail muid ár dhá chóras le comhcheangail, a bhain F1μ de 0.7324 amach ar an tacar sonraí tástála.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენ SemEval-2019 დავამუშავებთ სამუშაო სამუშაო: EmoContext. პარამეტრები იყო ტექსტულ დიალოგის კლასიზაციაში ერთ-ერთი ემოციონის კლასისში: ღახალი, ცუდილი, წარმოდგენი ან სხვა. ჩვენი პროგრამა უფრო მეტი აპექტებზე გაუქმება, წინაპროცესება მართლა შემოწმება და გადაწყება ოთხი განსხვავებული მოდელთან: ორეთექციონალური კონტექსტური LSTM (BC-LSTM), კატეგორიკალური Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), ბიუნალური კონტულური Bi-LSTM (BIN-LST ჩვენ ლიდერი-ბორეში ორი სისტემები გადავიტანეთ, რომლებიც 0,711 და 0,712-ის მიკრო F1 წერტილი (F1) დავიტანეთ. შემდეგ კონკრენტების შემდეგ ჩვენი ორი სისტემები დავყენებდით, რომელიც 0,7324-ის F1-ს გავაკეთეთ ტესტის მონაცემების სეტში.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a SemEval-2019 feladat 3: EmoContent. A feladat az volt, hogy a szöveges párbeszédet négy érzelmi osztályba soroljuk: boldog, szomorú, dühös vagy mások. Megközelítésünk több szempontból is megpróbált javítani, előfeldolgozással, hangsúlyt fektetve a helyesírás-ellenőrzésre és az összeállításra négy különböző modellel: kétirányú kontextuális LSTM (BC-LSTM), kategorikus Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), bináris konvuluális Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) és Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU). A vezetőtáblán két olyan rendszert nyújtottunk be, amelyek 0,711 és 0,712 mikro F1 pontszámot kaptak. A versenyt követően két rendszerünket egyesítettük az egységgel, ami a tesztadatokon 0,7324 F1 értéket ért el.', 'it': "In questo articolo presentiamo la nostra presentazione per SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContent. Il compito consisteva nel classificare un dialogo testuale in una delle quattro classi emotive: felice, triste, arrabbiato o altro. Il nostro approccio ha cercato di migliorare su molteplici aspetti, preelaborando con enfasi il controllo ortografico e l'ensembling con quattro diversi modelli: LSTM contestuale bidirezionale (BC-LSTM), Bi-LSTM categorico (CAT-LSTM), Bi-LSTM convoluzionale binario (BIN-LSTM) e Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU). Nella classifica, abbiamo presentato due sistemi che hanno ottenuto un punteggio micro F1 (F1) di 0,711 e 0,712. Dopo la competizione, abbiamo unito i nostri due sistemi con l'ensembling, che ha raggiunto una F1 di 0,7324 sul set di dati di test.", 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία παρουσιάζουμε την αίτησή μας για την εργασία 3: Περιεχόμενο. Το έργο συνίστατο στην ταξινόμηση ενός κειμένου διαλόγου σε μία από τις τέσσερις κατηγορίες συναισθημάτων: χαρούμενη, λυπημένη, θυμωμένη ή άλλες. Η προσέγγισή μας προσπάθησε να βελτιωθεί σε πολλαπλές πτυχές, με έμφαση στον ορθογραφικό έλεγχο και τη σύνθεση με τέσσερα διαφορετικά μοντέλα: Δικατεύθυνση περιεκτικού LSTM (BC-LSTM), κατηγορηματική Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), δυαδική συστολή Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) και Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU). Στον πίνακα κατάταξης, υποβάλαμε δύο συστήματα που απέκτησαν μια μικροβαθμολογία F1 (F1 ť 0.711 και 0.712. Μετά τον διαγωνισμό, συγχωνεύσαμε τα δύο συστήματα μας με το σύνολο, το οποίο πέτυχε ένα F1 των 0.7324 στο σύνολο δεδομένων δοκιμής.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз 2019 жылдың жарым- жарым- 2019 тапсырмасының 3- тапсырмасы: Эмоконтекстік. Тапсырма мәтіндік диалогын төрт емоциялық класынан біріншіден сыныптау болды: бақытты, қатты, қызық немесе басқаларға. Біздің тәсіліміз бірнеше аспекттерді жақсарту, емле тексеру және төрт түрлі үлгілерімен бірге көбірек өзгерту әрекетін қаладық: екі бағытталған LSTM (BC- LSTM), категориялық Bi- LSTM (CAT- LSTM), екі бөлікті Bi- LSTM (BIN- LSTM) және бірге қайталанған бірлік (GRU). Біз басшылық жолдарында 0,711 мен 0,712 микро F1 нөмірі (F1) алған екі жүйелерді жібердік. Сәйкестіктен кейін, біз екі жүйемізді тестік деректер жиынында 0,7324 F1- ге жеткіздік.', 'mk': 'Во овој документ го претставуваме нашето поднесување за SemEval-2019 задача 3: EmoContext. Оваа задача беше да се класификува текстуалниот дијалог во една од четирите часови на емоции: среќни, тажни, лути или други. Нашиот пристап се обиде да се подобри во повеќето аспекти, препроцесирајќи со акцент на проверка на правописот и ансемблирајќи со четири различни модели: двојно контекстуално LSTM (BC-LSTM), категорично Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), бинарно конволуционално Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) и Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU). На водечкиот одбор, поднесовме два системи кои добија микро Ф1 оценка (F1) од 0,711 и 0,712. После натпреварот, ги спојувавме нашите два системи со ансемблирање, што постигна F1 од 0,7324 на тестовите податоци.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2019 ടാസ്ക് 3: എമോക്സെക്സ്റ്റ്. നാലു വികാരങ്ങളിലേക്ക് ഒരു ടെക്സ്കൂള്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് ക്ലാസ്സ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനായിരുന്നു ഈ ജോലി: സന്തോഷം, ദുഃഖം, ക്ര നാലു വ്യത്യസ്ത മോഡലുകളുമായി എഴുതുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ സാധ്യതകള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുവാന്\u200d ശ്രമിച്ചു, വ്യത്യസ്തമായി പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുവാന്\u200d  On the leader-board, we submitted two systems that obtained a micro F1 score (F1 ) of 0.711 and 0.712.  മത്സരത്തിനു ശേഷം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രണ്ട് സിസ്റ്റമുകളെ ഒരുമിച്ചു ചേര്\u200dത്തു. അത് പരീക്ഷ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റില്\u200d 0.7324 എഫ്\u200c1-ല്\u200d നിന', 'lt': 'In this paper we present our submission for SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContext.  Užduotis buvo klasifikuoti tekstinį dialogą į vieną iš keturių emocijų klasių: laimingą, liūdną, pykstantį ar kitus. Mūsų metodas bandė pagerinti įvairius aspektus, parengti procesą, pabrėžiant raštiškumo tikrinimą ir susieti su keturiais skirtingais modeliais: dvikryptiniu kontekstiniu LSTM (BC-LSTM), dvikryptiniu dvikryptiniu LSTM (CAT-LSTM), dvikryptiniu konvoliuciniu dvikryptiniu LSTM (BIN-LSTM) ir Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU). On the leader-board, we submitted two systems that obtained a micro F1 score (F1 ) of 0.711 and 0.712.  Po konkurso sujungėme dvi sistemas su komplektu, o bandymų duomenų rinkinyje F1 buvo 0,7324.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument nippreżentaw is-sottomissjoni tagħna għas-SemEval-2019 Kompitu 3: EmoContext. Il-kompitu kien jikkonsisti fil-klassifikazzjoni ta’ djalogu testwali f’waħda minn erba’ klassijiet emozzjonali: kuntenti, tristi, irritati jew oħrajn. Our approach tried to improve on multiple aspects, preprocessing with an emphasis on spell-checking and ensembling with four different models: Bi-directional contextual LSTM (BC-LSTM), categorical Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binary convolutional Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) and Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU).  Fuq il-bord ta’ tmexxija, issottomettejna żewġ sistemi li kisbu punteġġ mikro F1 (F1 ) ta’ 0.711 u 0.712. After the competition, we merged our two systems with ensembling, which achieved a F1  of 0.7324 on the test dataset.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид SemEval-2019-ийн 3-р ажил: EmoContext-ын төлөөлөл өгдөг. Энэ үйл ажилд 4 сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хичээлийн нэг хэсэгт текст яриаг ангилж, аз жаргалтай, гунигтай эсвэл бусад хүмүүст ангилж байлаа. Бидний арга нь олон асуудлыг сайжруулахыг хичээсэн бөгөөд хэвлэлийн шалгалтыг анхаарлаа хандуулж, дөрвөн өөр загвартай холбогдохыг хичээсэн бөгөөд хоёр чиглэлийн contextual LSTM (BC-LSTM), категорик Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), хоёр чиглэлийн Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) болон Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU). Нийтийн удирдагч дээр бид 0.711 болон 0.712 жижиг F1 оноо авсан хоёр системийг тавьсан. Тэмцээний дараа бид хоёр системийг шалгалтын өгөгдлийн санд 0.7324-ын F1-г хүртэл нэгтгэсэн.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi søket vårt for semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3: EmoContext. Oppgåva consisterte av å klassifisera eit tekstdialogen i ein av fire emosjonsklassar: lykke, triste, sint eller andre. Tilnærminga vårt prøvde å forbetra fleire aspektar, førehandsaming med ein stadfesting på stavekontroll og ensembering med fire ulike modeller: Bi- retning kontekstell LSTM (BC- LSTM), kategorisk Bi- LSTM (CAT- LSTM), binær konvolusjonell Bi- LSTM (BIN- LSTM) og Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU). På hovudborden har vi sendt to systemer som fikk eit mikro F1- poeng (F1) av 0,711 og 0,712. Etter konkurransen, samlet vi to systemet våre med ensembling, som oppnådd ein F1 av 0,7324 på testdatasettet.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy naszą zgłoszenie do SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: EmoContext. Zadanie polegało na sklasyfikowaniu dialogu tekstowego na jedną z czterech klas emocji: szczęśliwą, smutną, złą lub inną. Nasze podejście próbowało ulepszyć wiele aspektów, wstępnie przetwarzając z naciskiem na sprawdzanie pisowni i zestawienie za pomocą czterech różnych modeli: dwukierunkowego kontekstowego LSTM (BC-LSTM), kategorycznego Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binarnego konwolucyjnego Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) i Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU). Na tablicy liderów zgłosiliśmy dwa systemy, które uzyskały wynik mikro F1 (F1 ťo 0.711 i 0.712. Po zakończeniu konkursu połączyliśmy nasze dwa systemy z zestawem, który osiągnął F1 od 0.7324 na zestawie danych testowych.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan penghantaran kami untuk SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: EmoContext. Tugas adalah mengklasifikasikan dialog teks ke salah satu dari empat kelas emosi: gembira, sedih, marah atau yang lain. pendekatan kami cuba untuk meningkatkan aspek berbilang, memproses-sedia dengan fokus pada pemeriksaan ejaan dan menyempurnakan dengan empat model berbeza: LSTM kontekstual dua arah (BC-LSTM), Bi-LSTM kategori (CAT-LSTM), Bi-LSTM konvolusi binari (BIN-LSTM) dan Unit Sekali Gated (GRU). On the leader-board, we submitted two systems that obtained a micro F1 score (F1 ) of 0.711 and 0.712.  After the competition, we merged our two systems with ensembling, which achieved a F1  of 0.7324 on the test dataset.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare vă prezentăm depunerea noastră pentru SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContent. Sarcina a constat în clasificarea unui dialog textual într-una din cele patru clase emoționale: fericit, trist, furios sau altele. Abordarea noastră a încercat să îmbunătățească mai multe aspecte, pre-procesând cu accent pe verificarea ortografică și ansamblarea cu patru modele diferite: LSTM contextual bidirecțional (BC-LSTM), Bi-LSTM categoric (CAT-LSTM), Bi-LSTM convoluțional binar (BIN-LSTM) și Unitatea Recurentă Gated (GRU). În clasamentul de lider, am prezentat două sisteme care au obținut un scor micro F1 (F1) de 0,711 și 0,712. După competiție, am fuzionat cele două sisteme ale noastre cu ansamblul, ceea ce a obținut un F1 de 0,7324 pe setul de date de testare.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo svoju predanost za pola Evala-2019 zadatak 3: EmoContext. Taj zadatak se sastoji od klasifikacije tekstualnog dijaloga u jednom od četiri razreda emocija: srećna, tužna, ljuta ili drugih. Naš pristup je pokušao poboljšati na višestruke aspekte, preobrađivati se naglaskom na provjeru pravopisa i osigurati četiri različite modele: dvosmjerne kontekstualne LSTM (BC-LSTM), kategorijske Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binarne konvolucione Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) i povratne povratne jedinice (GRU). Predložili smo dva sistema koji su dobili mikro F1 rezultat od 0,711 i 0,712. Nakon takmičenja, udružili smo naše dva sistema sa ensembliranjem, koji je postigao F1 od 0,7324 na testnom setu podataka.', 'so': 'Warqadan waxan ku qornaa warqaddayada loo soo diro SemEval-2019 shaqo 3: EmoContext. Shaqada waxaa ka mid ah qoraal qoraal ah oo u qoraalaya mid ka mid ah afarta fasalka hissiga: faraxsan, caloolxumo, cadhaysan ama qaar kale. Dhaqdhaqaalkayagii wuxuu isku dayay inuu hagaajiyo dhinaca badan, ka hor-baaraandegista ku saabsan imtixaanka iyo sidoo kale afarta model oo kala duduwan: Bi-directional contextual LSTM (BC-LSTM), categorical Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binary convulsion Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) iyo Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU). Shirkad hogaamiya, waxaan soo dhiibnay laba nidaam oo helay micro F1 score (F1) oo ah 0.711 iyo 0.712. Dagaalkii kadib, labadeennadii nidaam waxaynu ku dareelnay burbur, taasoo gaadhay F1 oo ka mid ah 0.7324 kooxda imtixaanka.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi vårt bidrag till SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: EmoContent. Uppgiften bestod i att klassificera en textdialog i en av fyra känsloklasser: lycklig, ledsen, arg eller andra. Vårt tillvägagångssätt försökte förbättra flera aspekter, förbehandling med tonvikt på stavningskontroll och ensemblering med fyra olika modeller: Bi-directional contextual LSTM (BC-LSTM), kategorisk Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binär konvulutiv Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) och Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU). På ledartavlan skickade vi in två system som fick en mikro F1 poäng (F1) på 0,711 och 0,712. Efter tävlingen slog vi ihop våra två system med ensembling, vilket uppnådde en F1 på 0,7324 på testdatauppsättningen.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි සේම්වේල්-2019 වැඩක් 3: EmoContext ක් වෙනුවෙන් අපේ පිළිගන්න පුළුවන්. මේ වැඩේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂයෙන් පාළුවක් සංවාදයක් ලැබෙන්න පුළුවන්: සතුටි, දුක්කුයි, පිස්සුවක් නැ අපේ අභිවිධානය වෙනස් අභිවිධානයක් විසින් විසින් පරීක්ෂණය සහ අභිවිධානයක් සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න උත්සාහ කළා තියෙන්නේ, වෙනස් අභිවිධානයක් හතරයි: Bi-yක්ෂිත සංවිධානය LSTM (BC- නියෝජක බෝර්ඩ් එකේ අපි පද්ධතියක් දෙකක් දාලා තියෙන්නේ මායික්\u200dරෝ F1 ස්කෝර් එකක් (F1) 0.711 සහ 0.712 වල. පරීක්ෂණයට පස්සේ, අපි අපේ පද්ධතිය දෙකක් එකතු කළා, ඒ වගේම පරීක්ෂණා දත්ත සැට වල F1 ∙ 0.7324 වලින්.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் SemEval-2019 செயல் 3: EmoContext. ஒரு நான்கு உணர்வு வகுப்பில் ஒரு உரையாடலை வகுப்பது செயல் சேர்ந்தது. மகிழ்ச்சி, துக்கம், கோபம் அல்லது மற்றவர்கள். நான்கு வித்தியாசமான மாதிரிகளுடன் சொல்லித் தேர்வு செய்ய முயற்சிக்கும் முன்செயல்படுத்தல் முயற்சிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது: Bi- திசையாக்கும் நிலையான LSTM (BC- LSTM), வகைப்பட்ட Bi- LSTM (CAT- LSTM), இருமுறை தொகுதி Bi தலைப்புபலகையில், நாங்கள் இரண்டு அமைப்புகள் கூறினோம், அது 0. 711 மற்றும் 0. 712 ஒரு சிறிய F1 மதிப்பெண்கள் (F1) கிடைத்தது. பிறகு, நாங்கள் எங்கள் இரண்டு அமைப்புகளை ஒதுங்கி சேர்த்தோம், அது 0.7324-ல் ஒரு F1-ல் பெற்றுவிட்டது.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں اپنی سم Eval-2019 ٹاکس 3 کے لئے اپنا تسلیم پیش کرتے ہیں: EmoContext. یہ کام چار احساسات کلاس میں ایک تفصیل کی گفتگو کا کلاس کرنا تھا: خوش، غمگین، غصہ یا دوسرے. ہمارا طریقہ بہت سی قسمتوں پر بہتر ہونے کی کوشش تھی، اسپے چک جانے اور چار مختلف موڈل کے ساتھ مضبوط ہونے کی تدبیر کے ساتھ پیش پردازی کرنے کی کوشش تھی: دو دقیقہ کنٹکسٹیول LSTM (BC-LSTM), کاٹیکیسیل Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), دوئناری کنولوٹیونل Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) اور Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU). لیڈر بورد پر، ہم نے دو سیستموں کو ڈال دیا جو 0.711 اور 0.712 میں سے ایک میکروٹر F1 اسکور (F1) حاصل کئے۔ مسابقات کے بعد، ہم نے اپنے دو سیستموں کو انسبلینگ کے ساتھ جمع کیا، جو 0.7324 سے ایک F1 پہنچ گئی تھی.', 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi xin giới thiệu tác phẩm của chúng tôi về SemEvil-209 Task 3: EmoContact. Nhiệm vụ là phân loại một cuộc đối thoại kết cấu thành một trong bốn lớp cảm xúc: hạnh phúc, buồn bã, tức giận hay những lớp khác. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi đã cố cải thiện nhiều khía cạnh, xử lý trước với nhấn mạnh kiểm tra chính tả và kết hợp với bốn mô hình khác nhau: Khoa LSD độc tính hai hướng (BC-LSTM), Thuyết phục hai-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), cấu trúc hai-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) và Đơn vị phục hồi liên kết (GRU). Trên bảng lãnh đạo, chúng tôi đã gửi hai hệ thống thu được vi F1 số (F1) của 0.711 và 0.712. Sau khi thi đấu, chúng tôi kết hợp hai hệ thống với kết hợp, đã đạt được một F1 of 0.7324 trên bộ dữ liệu thử nghiệm.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda SemEval-2019 Vazifa 3: EmoContext. EmoContext. Bu vazifa, matn muloqatlarni to'rtta hissiyotning biri sinfga tayyorlash mumkin: baxtli, хавфсир, ғазаб yoki boshqalarga. Bi- direktoriy lokal LSTM (BC-LSTM), kategorik Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), ikkinchi birinchi bir nechta murakkab Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) va qaytadan yuklangan bir xil usuli (GRU). Bir ikkita tizimni olib tashladik 0.711 va 0.712 bir kichkina F1 (F1) scorini olib tashlagan. Tashqi paytdan keyin biz ikki tizimimizni birlashtiramiz, bu tizimni sinov sohasida 0.7324'ning 0.7324'ning F1'ni yetardi.", 'bg': 'В тази статия представяме нашето предложение за Задача 3: Емоконтекс. Задачата се състои в класифициране на текстовия диалог в един от четирите емоционални класа: щастлив, тъжен, ядосан или други. Нашият подход се опита да подобри множество аспекти, предварителна обработка с акцент върху правописа и ансамблиране с четири различни модела: двупосочен контекстуален ЛСТМ (BC-LSTM), категоричен Би-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), двоичен конволюционален Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) и Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU). На лидерската борда представихме две системи, които получиха микро оценка от 0,711 и 0,712. След състезанието обединихме двете си системи с ансамблинг, което постигна Ф1 от 0.7324 на тестовия набор от данни.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo svoju podatku za pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 3: EmoContext. Zadatak se sastojio od klasifikacije tekstualnog dijaloga u jednom od četiri razreda emocija: srećna, tužna, ljuta ili drugih. Naš pristup se pokušao poboljšati na višestruke aspekte, preobrađivati s naglaskom na provjeru pismo i osigurati četiri različite modele: dvosmjerne kontekstualne LSTM (BC-LSTM), kategorijske Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binarne konvolucione Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) i povratne povratne jedinice (GRU). Predložili smo dva sustava koji su dobili mikro F1 rezultat od 0,711 i 0,712. Nakon takmičenja, udružili smo naše dvije sustave s ensembliranjem, koji je postigao F1 od 0,7324 na testnom setu podataka.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we onze inzending voor SemEval-2019 Taak 3: EmoContext. De taak bestond uit het indelen van een tekstuele dialoog in een van de vier emotieklassen: gelukkig, verdrietig, boos of anderen. Onze aanpak probeerde meerdere aspecten te verbeteren, met de nadruk op spellingscontrole en ensembling met vier verschillende modellen: Bi-directioneel contextueel LSTM (BC-LSTM), categorisch Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binair convolutioneel Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) en Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU). Op het klassement hebben we twee systemen ingediend die een micro F1 score behaalden (F1 ฆ van 0.711 en 0.712. Na de wedstrijd hebben we onze twee systemen samengevoegd met ensembling, wat een F1 van 0.7324 behaalde op de testdataset.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi vores indsendelse til SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: EmoContent. Opgaven bestod i at klassificere en tekstdialog i en af fire følelsesklasser: glad, trist, vred eller andre. Vores tilgang forsøgte at forbedre flere aspekter, forbearbejde med vægt på stavekontrol og sammensætning med fire forskellige modeller: Bi-directional contextual LSTM (BC-LSTM), kategorisk Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binær konvulutiv Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) og Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU). På leaderboard indsendte vi to systemer, der opnåede en mikro F1 score (F1 ) på 0,711 og 0,712. Efter konkurrencen fusionerede vi vores to systemer med ensembling, hvilket opnåede en F1 på 0,7324 på testdatasættet.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir unseren Beitrag für SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContext vor. Die Aufgabe bestand darin, einen Textdialog in eine von vier Emotionsklassen einzuordnen: glücklich, traurig, wütend oder andere. Unser Ansatz versuchte, mehrere Aspekte zu verbessern, wobei der Schwerpunkt auf Rechtschreibprüfung und Ensemble mit vier verschiedenen Modellen lag: Bidirektionales kontextuelles LSTM (BC-LSTM), kategorisches Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binäres Faltungs-Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) und Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU). Auf der Bestenliste haben wir zwei Systeme eingereicht, die eine Mikro-F1-Punktzahl erhielten (F1 ฆ von 0.711 und 0.712. Nach dem Wettkampf haben wir unsere beiden Systeme mit Ensemble zusammengeführt, was auf dem Testdatensatz eine F1 von 0.7324 erreichte.', 'id': 'In this paper we present our submission for SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContext.  Tugas ini terdiri dari mengklasifikasi dialog teks ke salah satu dari empat kelas emosi: bahagia, sedih, marah atau lainnya. Our approach tried to improve on multiple aspects, preprocessing with an emphasis on spell-checking and ensembling with four different models: Bi-directional contextual LSTM (BC-LSTM), categorical Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binary convolutional Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) and Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU).  On the leader-board, we submitted two systems that obtained a micro F1 score (F1 ) of 0.711 and 0.712.  Setelah kompetisi, kami menyatukan dua sistem kami dengan kumpulan, yang mencapai F1 0,7324 pada set data tes.', 'ko': '본문에서SemEval-19 퀘스트 3:EmoContext를 제출했습니다.이 임무는 텍스트 대화를 즐거움, 슬픔, 분노 또는 다른 네 가지로 나누는 것을 포함한다.우리의 방법은 여러 측면에서 개선을 시도하고 맞춤법 검사와 네 가지 서로 다른 모델의 융합에 중심을 두었다. 양방향 상하문 LSTM(BC-LSTM), 분류 Bi-LSTM(CAT-LSTM), 권적 2진법 Bi-LSTM(BIN-LSTM)과 선택 귀속 단원(GRU)이다.리더보드에서 우리는 두 개의 시스템을 제출했는데 그 미시적 F1 득점(F1)은 각각 0.711과 0.712이다.경기가 끝난 후, 우리는 두 시스템을 엔sembling과 합병하여 테스트 데이터 집합에서 F1이 0.7324에 이르도록 할 것이다.', 'sw': 'In this paper we present our submission for SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContext.  Kazi hiyo ilikuwa ni ya kutangaza mazungumzo ya maandishi katika moja ya darasa nne la hisia: furaha, huzuni, hasira au wengine. Mfumo wetu ulijaribu kuboresha upande mwingi, utaratibu wa kuchunguza utafiti na kuingilia mitindo wanne tofauti: LSTM (BC-LSTM), makubaliano ya Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) na Kitengo cha Mara (GRU). Kwenye kiongozi, tuliwasilisha mifumo miwili ambayo ilipata kipindi kidogo cha F1 (F1) cha 0.711 na 0.712. Baada ya mashindano hayo, tuliunganisha mifumo yetu miwili ikiwa ni pamoja, ambayo ilipata F1 ya 0.7324 kwenye seti ya jaribio.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما تسلیم کردن ما را برای تابع نیم Eval-2019 تابع ۳: EmoContext پیشنهاد می کنیم. این وظیفه از کلاس کردن یک گفتگو متن در یکی از چهار کلاس احساسات بود: خوشحال، غمگین، عصبانی یا بقیه. دستور ما سعی کرده بود که روی چندین نقطه\u200cها بهتر شود، پیش\u200cپردازی با تأثیر روی بررسی\u200cکننده\u200cی نوشته\u200cها و با چهار مدل متفاوت تأثیر داده شود: LSTM (BC-LSTM), BI-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), BIN-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) و واحد دوباره\u200cپرداخته شده باشد. در صندوق رهبر، دو سیستم را فرستادیم که یک امتیاز میکرو F1 (F1) از 0.711 و 0.712 دریافت شد. بعد از رقابت، ما دو سیستم\u200cهایمان را با انجمن جمع کردیم که در مجموعه داده\u200cهای آزمایش F1 از 0.7324 به دست آوردیم.', 'af': "In hierdie papier voorsien ons onderwerp vir SemEval-2019 Taak 3: EmoContext. Die taak het bestaan van 'n tekstuele dialoog in een van vier emosie klasse: gelukkig, triste, kwaad of ander. Ons toegang het probeer om op veelvuldige aspekte te verbeter, voorafwerking met 'n belangriking op spel- kontrole en ensembering met vier verskillende modele: Bi- rigting contextual LSTM (BC- LSTM), kategoriese Bi- LSTM (CAT- LSTM), binêre konvolusionele Bi- LSTM (BIN- LSTM) en Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU). Op die leier-bord, het ons twee stelsels voorgestuur wat 'n mikro F1 punt (F1 ) van 0,711 en 0,712 ontvang het. Na die rekenaar het ons twee stelsels saamgekom met ensembling, wat 'n F1 van 0,7324 op die toets datastel bereik het.", 'tr': "Bu kağıt içinde SemEval-2019 Görevi 3: EmoContext'u sunuyoruz. Bu zady dört duýgyş synplarynyň birine metin dialogyny a ýdyrmakdan ybaratdy: bagtly, gamgyn, gaharly ýa-da başga. Biziň ýaryşymyz birnäçe aspektlerde gelişmäge synanyşdy, ymlany barlamak we dört farklı nusga bilen gollanmagy bilen öňden çykyp synanyşdy: Bi-yön contextual LSTM (BC-LSTM), kategoriýaly Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), ikinji convolutional Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) we Gated Rekurrent Birim (GRU). Yöneticide mikro F1 sany (F1 ) 0,711 we 0,712 alan iki sisteme çykardyk Ol ýaryşykdan soň, testiň düzgünlerinde F1 ° 0,7324 we ýene bir sistemami bilen birleşdik.", 'az': 'Bu kağıtda halının 2019-ci Gözəli 3-si EmoContext üçün müəyyən olunduğumuzu göstəririk. Bu işdə dörd hiss sınıfından birinin mətn dialogını seçməkdən idi: xoşbəxt, kədərli, qəzəbli və ya digərlərindən biri idi. Bizim yolumuz çoxlu aspektlərdən daha yaxşılaşdırmağa çalışdı, imlâ təşkilinə təsirlənməyi və dörd müxtəlif modellərlə birləşdirməyi təsirlənməyi çalışdı: İki yönəli müxtəlif LSTM (BC-LSTM), kategorikalı Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), ikili müxtəlif Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) və Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU). Yönetici dağıtında, 0,711 və 0,712 mikro F1 sıra (F1) alan iki sistemi təyin etdik. Yarışmaqdan sonra, iki sistemimizi sınamaq verilən qutusunda 0,7324 F1 ilə birləşdirdik.', 'hy': 'In this paper we present our submission for SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContext.  Նրա առաջադրանքն այն էր, որ դասակարգեցին գրական խոսակցությունը չորս էմոցիոնալ դասերից մեկի, երջանիկ, տխուր, զայրացած կամ այլ դասերից մեկի: Our approach tried to improve on multiple aspects, preprocessing with an emphasis on spell-checking and ensembling with four different models: Bi-directional contextual LSTM (BC-LSTM), categorical Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binary convolutional Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) and Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU).  On the leader-board, we submitted two systems that obtained a micro F1 score (F1 ) of 0.711 and 0.712.  Հետո մրցակցությունից մենք միացրեցինք մեր երկու համակարգերը միավորման հետ, որը ստացավ 0.7324-ի F1-ը թեստերի տվյալների համակարգում:', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër ne paraqesim paraqitjen tonë për SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContext. The task consisted of classifying a textual dialogue into one of four emotion classes: happy, sad, angry or others.  Our approach tried to improve on multiple aspects, preprocessing with an emphasis on spell-checking and ensembling with four different models: Bi-directional contextual LSTM (BC-LSTM), categorical Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binary convolutional Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) and Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU).  Në bordin kryesor, ne paraqitëm dy sisteme që fituan një pikë mikro F1 (F1) prej 0.711 dhe 0.712. Pas konkurrencës, bashkuam dy sistemet tona me mbledhjen, e cila arriti një F1 prej 0.7324 në grupin e të dhënave të testit.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায় আমরা সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের জন্য আমাদের প্রতিবেদন উপস্থাপন করছি: এমোককন্টেক্স। The task consisted of classifying a textual dialogue into one of four emotion classes: happy, sad, angry or others.  আমাদের পদক্ষেপ বেশ কয়েকটি দিকে উন্নত করার চেষ্টা করার চেষ্টা করেছে, বানান পরীক্ষা এবং চারটি ভিন্ন মডেলের উপর একটি প্রেক্রিয়ার চেষ্টা করার চেষ্টা করেছে: বাই-সরাসরি প্রতিযোগিতা এলসিএম (বিসি-এলসিএম), বিভাগিক ব নেতৃত্ব বোর্ডে আমরা দুটি সিস্টেম জমা দিয়েছি যা একটি মাইক্রো F1 স্কোর (এফ১) পেয়েছে ০. ৭১ এবং ০. ৭১২। After the competition, we merged our two systems with ensembling, which achieved a F1  of 0.7324 on the test dataset.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ ለSemEval-2019 ስራ 3: EmoContext እናቀርባለን፡፡ ስራው የጽሑፍ ማኅበረሰብ ማኅበረሰብ በአራቱ እውቀት ክፍሎች ላይ መክፈት ነው፤ ደስታ፣ ኀዘን፣ ቁጣ ወይም ሌሎችን፡፡ እና አራት ልዩ ዓይነቶች በተለየ የድምፅ ምርጫዎችን በማሳመር እና በመስመር ላይ አካባቢ ማድረግ ፈቃድ ነው፡፡ Bi-directive contextual LSTM (BC-LSTM), ክፍተርኛ ቢ-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), ሁለተኛ ጉዳይ ቢ-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) እና የተሰበሰቡ የአሁኑን ክፍል (GRU). የመሪ ቦርድ ላይ፣ የ0.711 እና 0.712 ሚኮር F1 score (F1) የተገኘውን ሁለት ስርዓቶች ሰጥተናል፡፡ ከዋጋው በኋላ የሁለቱን ስርዓቶች በሞከሩ ዳታተር ውስጥ F1 አግኝቷል፡፡', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo svoju predanost za semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: EmoContext. Taj zadatak je sastojio od klasifikacije tekstualnog dijaloga u jednu od četiri razreda emocija: srećna, tužna, ljuta ili drugih. Naš pristup je pokušao poboljšati na višestruke aspekte, preobrađivati s naglaskom na provjeru pisma i osigurati četiri različite modele: dvosmjerne kontekstualne LSTM (BC-LSTM), kategorijske Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binarne konvolucione Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) i povratne povratne jedinice (GRU). Na liderskom odboru smo predali dva sistema koji su dobili mikro F1 rezultat od 0,711 i 0,712. Nakon takmičenja, udružili smo naše dva sistema sa ensembliranjem, koji je postigao F1 od 0,7324 na testnom setu podataka.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös esitame oma ettepaneku SemEval-2019 ülesanne 3: EmoContext. Ülesanne seisnes tekstidialoogi liigitamises üheks neljast emotsiooniklassist: õnnelik, kurb, vihane või muu. Meie lähenemisviis püüdis parandada mitmeid aspekte, eeltöötledes rõhuasetusega õigekirja kontrollimisele ja ansambleerimisele nelja erineva mudeliga: kahesuunaline kontekstuaalne LSTM (BC-LSTM), kategooriline Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binaarne konvolutsiooniline Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) ja Gated Repurrent Unit (GRU). Juhtplaanile esitasime kaks süsteemi, mis saavutasid mikro F1 skoori (F1) 0,711 ja 0,712. Pärast võistlust ühendasime oma kaks süsteemi ansamblingiga, mis saavutas testiandmete kogumis F1 0,7324.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme julkaisumme SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContext. Tehtävänä oli luokitella tekstidialogi neljään tunneluokkaan: onnellinen, surullinen, vihainen tai muu. Lähestymistapamme yritti parantaa useita näkökohtia, esikäsittely painottaen oikeinkirjoituksen tarkistamista ja kokoonpanoa neljällä eri mallilla: kaksisuuntainen kontekstuaalinen LSTM (BC-LSTM), kategorinen Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binaarinen konvolutionaalinen Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) ja Gated Toistuva yksikkö (GRU). Johtoryhmässä toimitimme kaksi järjestelmää, jotka saivat mikro F1 pisteet (F1) 0,711 ja 0,712. Kilpailun jälkeen yhdistimme kaksi järjestelmäämme ensemblingiin, mikä saavutti testiaineistossa F1:n 0,7324.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme náš příspěvek k SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContext. Úkolem bylo rozdělit textový dialog do jedné ze čtyř emočních tříd: šťastné, smutné, zlé nebo jiné. Náš přístup se snažil zlepšit na více aspektů, předzpracování s důrazem na kontrolu pravopisu a sestavování se čtyřmi různými modely: Bi-směrový kontextový LSTM (BC-LSTM), kategorický Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binární konvoluční Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) a Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU). Na žebříčku jsme předložili dva systémy, které získaly mikro F1 skóre (F1\u0e00; 0.711 a 0.712). Po skončení soutěže jsme spojili naše dva systémy s ensemblem, který dosáhl F1 z 0.7324 na testovacím datovém souboru.', 'ca': 'In this paper we present our submission for SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContext.  La tasca consistia en classificar un diàleg textual en una de les quatre classes emocionals: feliç, trist, enfadat o altres. Our approach tried to improve on multiple aspects, preprocessing with an emphasis on spell-checking and ensembling with four different models: Bi-directional contextual LSTM (BC-LSTM), categorical Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binary convolutional Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) and Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU).  A la junta líder vam presentar dos sistemes que van obtenir una puntuació micro F1 (F1) de 0,711 i 0,712. Després de la competició, vam fusionar els nostres dos sistemes amb un conjunt, que va aconseguir un F1 de 0,7324 en el conjunt de dades de prova.', 'jv': 'Nan pepul iki, kita nganggo tresnani kanggo semebal-2011 task 3: emuo context. Mampak sing ngejaraké kelas kuwi dialog textual One of the first types of gradients available Nang pamir-sanga, kita nambah sistem durung nggawe dolanan ping mikro F1 (F1) sing 0.7 1 lan 0.7 2. Soalé kampancen, awak dhéwé ngerasah sistem sing duwe lan sekonduran, sing wis nambah F1  sing 0.', 'sk': 'V tem prispevku predstavljamo našo predstavitev za nalogo 3 SemEval-2019: EmoContext. Naloga je bila razvrstitev besedilnega dialoga v enega od štirih čustvenih razredov: srečnega, žalostnega, jeznega ali drugega. Naš pristop je poskušal izboljšati več vidikov, predobdelavo s poudarkom na preverjanju črkovanja in ansambliranju s štirimi različnimi modeli: dvosmerni kontekstualni LSTM (BC-LSTM), kategorični Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binarni konvolucionalni Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) in Gated Repurrent Unit (GRU). Na vodilni lestvici smo predložili dva sistema, ki sta dosegla rezultat mikro F1 (F1) 0,711 in 0,712. Po tekmovanju smo naša dva sistema združili z ansambling, ki je dosegla F1 0,7324 na testnem naboru podatkov.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan da Muke halatar da inputinmu zuwa SemEV-2019 Tani 3: EmoContent. Kayan aiki na ƙunsa da kure zauren akwatin littafi cikin ɗayan darafõfi huɗu: farin, mai baƙin ciki, mai haske ko da wasu. @ info: status Daga shirin-board, mun aika da biyu na'ura wanda aka samu wani nau'i na F1 (F1) na 0.711 da 0.712. After the competition, we merged our two systems with ensembling, which achieved a F1  of 0.7324 on the test dataset.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་དོན་ལྟར་ལོགས་པ་-2019ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྣོད་གསུམ་པ་: EmoContext. བྱ་ཚིག་ནང་དུ་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་སྒྲ་ཚིགས་གཅིག་གི་སྒེར་གྱི་གྲྭའི་ནང་གི་གཅིག་རྣམས་མཐུན་གྱི་་རིམ་གྱི་གཏོང་གི་ནང Our approach tried to improve on multiple aspects, preprocessing with an emphasis on spell-checking and ensembling with four different models: Bi-directional contextual LSTM (BC-LSTM), categorical Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binary convolutional Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) and Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU). དཔེ་དབང་འཛིན་གྱི་དོ་དམ་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རིམ་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་དུས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱས་ཡོད། མཐའ་འཁོར་གྱི་རྗེས་སུ། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གཉིས་མཉམ་དུ་བཏོན་འདུག', 'he': 'In this paper we present our submission for SemEval-2019 Task 3: EmoContext.  The task consisted of classifying a textual dialogue into one of four emotion classes: happy, sad, angry or others.  Our approach tried to improve on multiple aspects, preprocessing with an emphasis on spell-checking and ensembling with four different models: Bi-directional contextual LSTM (BC-LSTM), categorical Bi-LSTM (CAT-LSTM), binary convolutional Bi-LSTM (BIN-LSTM) and Gated Recurrent Unit (GRU).  על הלוח המנהיג, שלחנו שתי מערכות שהשגו נקודת מיקרו F1 (F1) של 0.711 ו-0.712. לאחר התחרות, שילבנו את שתי המערכות שלנו עם התערבות, אשר השיג F1 של 0.7324 על קבוצת הנתונים המבחנים.'}
{'en': 'Sentim at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Convolutional Neural Networks For Sentiment in Conversations', 'pt': 'Sentim no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Redes Neurais Convolucionais para Sentimento em Conversas', 'es': 'Sentim en la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2019: Redes neuronales convolucionales para el sentimiento en las conversaciones', 'fr': 'Sentim au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Réseaux de neurones convolutifs pour le sentiment dans les conversations', 'ar': 'Sentim في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية للمشاعر في المحادثات', 'ja': 'Sentim at SemEval -2019 Task 3: Convolutional Neural Networks for Sentiment in Conversations', 'zh': 'Sentim在SemEval-2019务3:言情之卷积神经网络', 'hi': 'सेमवेल-2019 टास्क 3 में सेंटिम: बातचीत में भावना के लिए कनवल्शनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'Sentim на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Сверточные нейронные сети для чувств в разговорах', 'ga': 'Sentim ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Líonraí Néaracha Comhdhlúite le hAghaidh Mointe i gComhrá', 'ka': 'Sentim at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Convolutional Neural Networks for Sentiment in Conversations', 'hu': 'Sentim a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: Konvolúciós neurális hálózatok a beszélgetések érzelmeiért', 'el': 'Καθήκον 3: Σύλληλα Νευρικά Δίκτυα για Συναίσθημα στις συνομιλίες', 'it': 'Sentim a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Reti Neurali Convoluzionali Per Sentimento nelle Conversazioni', 'kk': 'Sentim at semiEval-2019 Task 3: Convolutional Neural Networks For Sentiment in Conversations', 'lt': '3 užduotis: konvoliuciniai nerviniai tinklai, skirti jausmui konversacijose', 'mk': 'Работата 3: Конволуционални неурални мрежи за чувство во разговори', 'mt': 'Sentiment f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 3: Netwerks newrali konvoluzzjonali għas-Sentiment fil-Konversjonijiet', 'ms': 'Hantar pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Rangkaian Neural Convolutional Untuk Sentiment dalam Perbualan', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3: സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സെന്റിമെന്\u200dറിനുള്ള സെന്റിമെന്\u200dറില്\u200d സെന്\u200dടിമിന്\u200dറ്', 'no': 'Sentim på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3: Konvolusjonelle neiralnettverk for sentidig i samtaler', 'pl': 'Sentim at SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Konwolucyjne sieci neuronowe dla sentymentów w rozmowach', 'mn': 'Sentim at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Convolutional Neural Networks For Sentiment in Conversations', 'ro': 'Sentim la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Rețele Neurale Convoluționale Pentru Sentiment în Conversații', 'so': 'Shaqada SemEval-2019 3: Internetka Neural-Neural For Sentiment Conversations', 'sr': 'Sentim na semiEval-2019 Task 3: Konvolucionalne neurone mreže za sentiment u razgovorima', 'si': 'සෙම්වේල්-2019 වැඩ 3: සංවේදනය සඳහා සංවේදනය සඳහා සංවේදනය', 'sv': 'Sentim på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Konvulutionella neurala nätverk för känslor i samtal', 'ur': 'SemEval-2019 ٹاکس 3 میں سنٹیم: مکالمات میں سنٹیمنٹ کے لئے کنویروشن نیورال نیٹورک', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணியில் சென்டிம் 3: பேச்சில் சென்டிமென்டிற்கான தொகுப்பான நெயுரல் வலைப்பின்னல்கள்', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifani 3: Суҳбатлар учун журнал tarmoq', 'vi': 'Cảm xúc ở nhiệm vụ SemEvl-209. 2: Gắn kết thần kinh cho cảm xúc trong đối thoại', 'bg': 'Сентим на Задача 3: Конволюционни неврални мрежи за сентимент в разговорите', 'hr': 'Sentim na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: Konvolucionalne neurone mreže za osjećaj u razgovorima', 'da': 'Sentim på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Konvolutionelle neurale netværk til følelse i samtaler', 'nl': 'Sentim bij SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Convolutionele Neurale Netwerken voor Sentiment in Gesprekken', 'de': 'Sentim at SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Convolutional Neuroral Networks for Sentiment in Conversations', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019의 Sentim 퀘스트 3: 대화 중 정서의 권적 신경 네트워크', 'id': 'Sentim di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Jaringan Neural Konvelusional Untuk Sentiment dalam Perbualan', 'fa': 'Sentim at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Convolutional Neural Networks For Sentiment in Conversations', 'sw': 'Wakatima katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 3: Mtandao wa Neural kwa ajili ya Seneti katika mazungumzo', 'tr': 'Sentim at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Convolutional Neural Networks For Sentiment in Conversations', 'af': 'Sentim by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 3: Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerke vir Sentiment in Gespraak', 'sq': 'Dërguar në SemEval-2019 Detyra 3: Rrjetet Neurale Konveolutive për Sentiment në Bisedime', 'am': 'Eval-2019 ስራ 3: Convolution Neural Network for Sentiment in Conversations', 'az': 'Sentim at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Convolutional Neural Networks for Sentiment in Conversations', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৩-এ সিনিটিম: কথোপকথনে সেন্টিমেন্টের জন্য বিনিময় নেটওয়ার্ক', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bs': 'Sentim na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: Konvolucionalne neurone mreže za sentiment u razgovorima', 'cs': 'Úkol 3: Convoluční neuronové sítě pro sentiment v konverzacích', 'ca': 'Sentim a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Convolutional Neural Networks For Sentiment in Conversations', 'et': 'Sentim SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 3: Konvolutsioonilised neuraalsed võrgud tunnete jaoks vestlustes', 'fi': 'Sentim SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 3: Konvolutionaaliset hermoverkot tunteiden luomiseksi keskusteluissa', 'jv': 'Sentiment at semebal-2011 task 3: convolution Neral networkFor Sentiment in conversations', 'sk': 'Sentim na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Konvolucijska živčna mreža za čustva v pogovorih', 'ha': 'QShortcut', 'bo': 'ཆེད་དུ་SemEval-2019 ལས་ཀ་གསུམ་པ：སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་Neural Networks For Sentiment in Conversations', 'he': 'משימה 3: רשתות עצביות משתנות לשיחות'}
{'en': 'In this work convolutional neural networks were used in order to determine the sentiment in a conversational setting. This paper’s contributions include a method for handling any sized input and a method for breaking down the conversation into separate parts for easier processing. Finally, clustering was shown to improve results and that such a model for handling sentiment in conversations is both fast and accurate.', 'ar': 'في هذا العمل ، تم استخدام الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية من أجل تحديد المشاعر في بيئة محادثة. تتضمن مساهمات هذه الورقة طريقة للتعامل مع أي إدخال بحجم وطريقة لتقسيم المحادثة إلى أجزاء منفصلة لتسهيل المعالجة. أخيرًا ، تبين أن التجميع يعمل على تحسين النتائج وأن مثل هذا النموذج للتعامل مع المشاعر في المحادثات سريع ودقيق.', 'es': 'En este trabajo se utilizaron redes neuronales convolucionales para determinar el sentimiento en un entorno conversacional. Las contribuciones de este documento incluyen un método para manejar entradas de cualquier tamaño y un método para dividir la conversación en partes separadas para facilitar el procesamiento. Por último, se demostró que la agrupación en clústeres mejora los resultados y que ese modelo para manejar los sentimientos en las conversaciones es rápido y preciso.', 'fr': "Dans ce travail, des réseaux de neurones convolutifs ont été utilisés afin de déterminer le sentiment dans un contexte conversationnel. Les contributions de cet article comprennent une méthode pour gérer les entrées de toute taille et une méthode pour décomposer la conversation en parties distinctes pour faciliter le traitement. Enfin, il a été démontré que le clustering améliore les résultats et qu'un tel modèle de gestion des sentiments dans les conversations est à la fois rapide et précis.", 'pt': 'Neste trabalho foram utilizadas redes neurais convolucionais para determinar o sentimento em um ambiente conversacional. As contribuições deste artigo incluem um método para lidar com entrada de qualquer tamanho e um método para dividir a conversa em partes separadas para facilitar o processamento. Por fim, o agrupamento mostrou melhorar os resultados e que esse modelo para lidar com o sentimento nas conversas é rápido e preciso.', 'ja': 'この研究では、会話の場で感情を決定するために、畳み込みニューラルネットワークが使用されました。本稿の貢献には、あらゆるサイズの入力を扱う方法と、会話を別々の部分に分解して処理を容易にする方法が含まれる。最後に、クラスタリングは結果を改善することが示され、会話における感情を処理するためのこのようなモデルは、迅速で正確であることが示されました。', 'zh': '于是卷积神经网络以定对情。 本文贡献一种大小输入之法,及一种将对话分解为独分以便处理的方法。 最后,聚类分析证可改,且以对语之情,速而准之。', 'ru': 'В этой работе использовались сверточные нейронные сети для определения настроений в разговорной обстановке. Вклад этого документа включает в себя метод обработки любого размера входных данных и метод разбивки разговора на отдельные части для упрощения обработки. Наконец, было показано, что кластеризация улучшает результаты и что такая модель для работы с настроениями в разговорах является одновременно быстрой и точной.', 'hi': 'इस काम में convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग एक संवादी सेटिंग में भावना को निर्धारित करने के लिए किया गया था। इस पेपर के योगदान में किसी भी आकार के इनपुट को संभालने के लिए एक विधि और आसान प्रसंस्करण के लिए बातचीत को अलग-अलग भागों में तोड़ने के लिए एक विधि शामिल है। अंत में, क्लस्टरिंग को परिणामों में सुधार करने के लिए दिखाया गया था और बातचीत में भावनाओं को संभालने के लिए ऐसा मॉडल तेज और सटीक दोनों है।', 'ga': 'San obair seo baineadh úsáid as líonraí néaracha comhbheartaithe chun an meon a chinneadh i suíomh comhrá. Áirítear le ranníocaíochtaí an pháipéir seo modh chun aon ionchur meánmhéide a láimhseáil agus modh chun an comhrá a bhriseadh síos ina chodanna ar leith ar mhaithe le próiseáil níos éasca. Ar deireadh, léiríodh go bhfeabhsódh cnuasú torthaí agus go bhfuil a leithéid de shamhail chun meon i gcomhráite a láimhseáil go tapa agus go cruinn.', 'ka': 'ამ სამუშაოში კონგულოციალური ნეიროლური ქსელები გამოყენებული იყო, რომ განსაზღვრება სენტიმენტის განსაზღვრებაში. ამ დოკუმენტის დამატებით უფრო მარტივი დამატებისთვის პროცესის მეტი და მეტი დამატებისთვის პარამეტრების განსახვავებული ნაწილებში უფრო მარტივი პროცესის გა საბოლოოდ, კლასტერირება ჩვენებულია, რომ გაუკეთება შედეგები და რომ ასეთი მოდელი სენტიმენტის გასაკეთება საუბარებში იქნება ბრძელი და მარტივი.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία χρησιμοποιήθηκαν σύνθετα νευρωνικά δίκτυα για τον προσδιορισμό του συναισθήματος σε ένα περιβάλλον συνομιλίας. Οι συνεισφορές αυτής της εργασίας περιλαμβάνουν μια μέθοδο για τον χειρισμό οποιασδήποτε εισαγωγής μεγέθους και μια μέθοδο για την κατανομή της συνομιλίας σε ξεχωριστά μέρη για ευκολότερη επεξεργασία. Τέλος, αποδείχθηκε ότι η ομαδοποίηση βελτιώνει τα αποτελέσματα και ότι ένα τέτοιο μοντέλο χειρισμού συναισθημάτων στις συνομιλίες είναι γρήγορο και ακριβές.', 'hu': 'Ebben a munkában konvolúciós neurális hálózatokat használtunk arra, hogy meghatározzuk az érzelmet egy beszélgetési környezetben. A tanulmány hozzájárulásai közé tartozik egy módszer, amely bármilyen méretű bevitel kezelésére és egy módszer, amely a beszélgetés külön részekre bontására szolgál a könnyebb feldolgozás érdekében. Végezetül a klaszterezés javítja az eredményeket, és egy ilyen modell a beszélgetések érzelmeinek kezelésére gyors és pontos.', 'it': "In questo lavoro sono state utilizzate reti neurali convoluzionali per determinare il sentimento in un ambiente conversazionale. I contributi di questo articolo includono un metodo per gestire input di qualsiasi dimensione e un metodo per suddividere la conversazione in parti separate per un'elaborazione più facile. Infine, è stato dimostrato che il clustering migliora i risultati e che un tale modello per gestire il sentiment nelle conversazioni è veloce e preciso.", 'kk': 'Бұл жұмыс істеу үшін конверсиялық невралдық желілерді айналысу параметрінде сезімін анықтау үшін қолданылды. Бұл қағаздың көмегілері кез келген өлшемі келтірілген кіріс әдісін басқару әдісін және сөйлесу әдісін оңай өңдеу үшін бөлшектерге бөліктеу әдісін Соңында, кластерлік нәтижелерді жақсарту үшін көрсетілді, және бұл сұрақтардың сезімділігін қамтамасыз ету үлгісі тез және дұрыс.', 'lt': 'Šiame darbe buvo naudojami konvoliuciniai nerviniai tinklai, siekiant nustatyti jausmą pokalbio aplinkoje. Šio popieriaus įnašai apima bet kokio dydžio įnašų tvarkymo metodą ir pokalbio suskirstymo į atskiras dalis, kad būtų lengviau apdoroti. Galiausiai įrodyta, kad klasifikavimas pagerina rezultatus ir kad toks jausmų tvarkymo pokalbiuose model is yra greitas ir tikslus.', 'mk': 'Во оваа работа беа искористени конволуционални нервни мрежи за да се одреди чувството во конверзационално место. Придонесите на оваа хартија вклучуваат метод за управување со било кој голем влог и метод за разделување на разговорот во одделни делови за полесно обработување. Конечно, се покажа дека групирањето ги подобрува резултатите и дека ваков модел за справување со чувствата во разговорите е брз и прецизен.', 'ml': 'ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d ഒരു സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംവിധാനത്തില്\u200d വികാരം തീരുമാനിക്കുന്നതിനായി ക്രമീകരിക്കുന്ന നെയൂറല്\u200d  ഈ പത്രത്തിന്റെ ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d വലിപ്പമുള്ള ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുന്ന ഒരു രീതിയും സംസാരം വേറെ ഭാഗങ്ങളിലേക്ക് വേര്\u200dത അവസാനം, ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനായി പരിശോധിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. സംസാരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d വേഗത്തിലും വിശേഷതയ', 'mt': 'F’dan ix-xogħol intużaw netwerks newrali konvoluzzjonali sabiex jiġi ddeterminat is-sentiment f’ambjent ta’ konvoluzzjoni. Il-kontribuzzjonijiet ta’ din id-dokument jinkludu metodu għall-immaniġġjar ta’ kwalunkwe input ta’ daqs u metodu għat-tqassim tal-konverżjoni f’partijiet separati għall-ipproċessar aktar faċli. Fl-a ħħar nett, intwera li r-raggruppament itejjeb ir-riżultati u li mudell bħal dan għall-immaniġġjar tas-sentiment fil-konverżjonijiet huwa kemm mgħaġġel kif ukoll preċiż.', 'ms': 'Dalam kerja ini rangkaian saraf konvolusi digunakan untuk menentukan perasaan dalam seting percakapan. kontribusi kertas ini termasuk kaedah untuk mengendalikan sebarang input saiz dan kaedah untuk pecahkan perbualan ke bahagian terpisah untuk pemprosesan yang lebih mudah. Akhirnya, kumpulan dipaparkan untuk meningkatkan keputusan dan bahawa model seperti untuk mengendalikan perasaan dalam perbualan adalah baik cepat dan tepat.', 'mn': 'Энэ ажлын тусламжтай мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд харилцааны хэмжээнд мэдрэмжийг тодорхойлдохын тулд хэрэглэгдсэн. Энэ цаасны нэмэлт нь ямар ч хэмжээний орлуулалт болон ярианы тухай илүү амархан үйлдвэрлэлт хийх арга юм. Эцэст нь, харилцааны сэтгэл хөдлөлийн загвар нь хурдан, зөв гэдгийг харуулсан.', 'no': 'I denne arbeidet vart konvolusjonelle neuralnettverk brukt for å bestemme sentimenten i eit konvolusjonell innstilling. Dette papiret inneheld ein metode for handtering av alle storleike inndata og ein metode for å avbryta samtalen i aparte deler for enklare handtering. I slutt viste clustering for å forbetra resultat, og at slik modell for å handtera sentiment i samtaler er både rask og nøyaktig.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare au fost folosite rețele neuronale convoluționale pentru a determina sentimentul într-un cadru conversațional. Contribuțiile acestei lucrări includ o metodă de gestionare a intrărilor de orice dimensiune și o metodă de defalcare a conversației în părți separate pentru o procesare mai ușoară. În cele din urmă, gruparea a fost demonstrată pentru a îmbunătăți rezultatele și că un astfel de model de gestionare a sentimentelor în conversații este atât rapid, cât și precis.', 'pl': 'W niniejszej pracy wykorzystano konwolucyjne sieci neuronowe w celu określenia sentymentu w otoczeniu rozmowy. Niniejszy artykuł zawiera metodę obsługi dowolnej wielkości wejścia oraz metodę podziału rozmowy na oddzielne części w celu łatwiejszego przetwarzania. Wreszcie wykazano, że klastrowanie poprawia wyniki i że taki model obsługi sentymentów w rozmowach jest zarówno szybki, jak i dokładny.', 'sr': 'U ovom radu su konvolucionalne neuralne mreže korišćene kako bi utvrdilo osjećaj u razgovornom stanju. Dodatak ovog papira uključuje metodu za rješavanje svakog veličine ulaza i metodu za razbijanje razgovora u odvojene dijelove za lakše obrade. Konačno je pokazalo da je skustering poboljšao rezultate i da je takav model za rješavanje sentiment a u razgovorima i brz i tačan.', 'so': 'Shaqodaas waxaa lagu isticmaalay shabakado neurada ah si uu u go’aamiyo fikradda marka la hadlo. Qaybaha warqaddaas waxaa ku jira qaab ay u sameyn karto input kasta oo waaweyn iyo qaab ay ka burburin karto hadalka gooni ah si aad u fududaatid baaraandegista. Ugu dambaysta waxaa la muujiyey in la hagaajiyo midhihiisa, tusaale caynkaas ah oo la sameynayo fikrada hadalka waa dhaqso iyo saxda.', 'si': 'මේ වැඩේ සම්පූර්ණ න්\u200dයුරෝල් ජාලය භාවිතා කරලා තියෙන්නේ වාර්තාවක් සැකසුම් වලින් සැකසුම් වෙ මේ පත්තරයේ සම්බන්ධ විදියට ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ඇතුළු ඇතුළුම් විදියට සහ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විදියට ක අන්තිමේදි, ක්ලොස්ටර් එක පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වැඩ කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ඒ වගේම සංවාදයේ', 'sv': 'I detta arbete användes konvulutionella neurala nätverk för att bestämma känslan i en konversationsmiljö. Uppsatsens bidrag inkluderar en metod för hantering av valfri inmatning och en metod för att dela upp konversationen i separata delar för enklare bearbetning. Slutligen visade sig klustring förbättra resultaten och att en sådan modell för hantering av sentiment i konversationer är både snabb och korrekt.', 'ta': 'இந்த வேலையில் ஒரு பேச்சு அமைப்பில் உணர்வு தீர்மானிக்க முழுமையான புதிரை வலைப்பின்னல் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டது. @ info இறுதியில், முடிவுகளை மேம்படுத்த வேண்டும் மற்றும் பேச்சில் இருந்து கையாளும் உணர்வு மாதிரி வேகமாகவும் சரியாகவும் இர', 'ur': 'اس کام میں ایک رابطہ اندازے میں احساس کا فیصلہ کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا تھا. یہ کاغذ کے ذریعے ایک طریقہ شامل ہوتا ہے کہ ہر سائز اینپیٹ کے ذریعے اور ایک طریقہ ہے کہ صحبت کو آسان طریقے کے لئے مختلف قسموں میں تقسیم کریں. بالآخر، کلسٹرینگ نتیجے بہتر کرنے کے لئے دکھائی گئی تھی اور یہ باتوں میں احساسات کے ذریعہ کا مدل ہے کہ وہ سریع اور دقیق ہے۔', 'uz': "Ushbu vazifani muloqat moslamada hisoblash uchun umumiy neyron tarmoq ishlatiladi. Ushbu qogʻozning parametrlarida hamma oʻlchamini boshqarish usuli va suhbatni qulay qilish uchun aloqalarni ajratish usuli. Endi, suhbat natijalarini yaxshi ko'rsatish mumkin va suhbatlar bilan hissiyotni boshqarish usuli tez va to'g'ri.", 'vi': 'Trong công trình này các mạng thần kinh rối loạn được sử dụng để xác định tình cảm trong một môi trường đối thoại. Những đóng góp của tờ giấy này gồm một phương pháp xử lý các nhập kích thước và một phương pháp chia cuộc đối thoại thành các phần riêng để dễ xử lý hơn. Cuối cùng, sự tụ tập đã được cho thấy để cải thiện kết quả và một mô hình để xử lý tình cảm trong cuộc nói chuyện cũng rất nhanh và chính xác.', 'bg': 'В тази работа са използвани конволюционни невронни мрежи, за да се определи настроението в разговорна обстановка. Докладът включва метод за обработка на всякакъв размер вход и метод за разделяне на разговора на отделни части за по-лесна обработка. И накрая, клъстерирането подобрява резултатите и че такъв модел за справяне с настроенията в разговорите е бърз и точен.', 'hr': 'U ovom radu su konvolucionalne neuralne mreže korišćene kako bi utvrdili osjećaj u razgovornom stanju. Dodatak ovog papira uključuje metodu za rješavanje bilo kojeg veličine ulaza i metodu za razbijanje razgovora u odvojene dijelove za lakše obrade. Konačno je pokazalo da je skustering poboljšao rezultate i da je takav model za rješavanje osjećaja u razgovorima i brz i tačan.', 'nl': 'In dit werk werden convolutionele neurale netwerken gebruikt om het sentiment in een gespreksomgeving te bepalen. De bijdragen van dit artikel omvatten een methode voor het verwerken van elke invoer en een methode voor het opsplitsen van het gesprek in afzonderlijke delen voor eenvoudiger verwerking. Tot slot werd aangetoond dat clustering de resultaten verbetert en dat een dergelijk model voor het omgaan met sentiment in gesprekken zowel snel als accuraat is.', 'da': 'I dette arbejde blev konvulutionelle neurale netværk brugt til at bestemme følelsen i en samtaleindstilling. Dette papirs bidrag omfatter en metode til at håndtere enhver størrelse input og en metode til at opdele samtalen i separate dele for lettere behandling. Endelig blev klyngning vist at forbedre resultaterne, og at en sådan model til håndtering af sentiment i samtaler er både hurtig og præcis.', 'de': 'In dieser Arbeit wurden convolutionale neuronale Netze verwendet, um die Stimmung in einem Konversationssetting zu bestimmen. Die Beiträge dieses Aufsatzes beinhalten eine Methode zur Handhabung beliebiger Eingaben und eine Methode zur Unterteilung der Konversation in separate Teile zur einfacheren Verarbeitung. Abschließend konnte gezeigt werden, dass Clustering die Ergebnisse verbessert und dass ein solches Modell für den Umgang mit Sentiment in Gesprächen sowohl schnell als auch präzise ist.', 'id': 'Dalam pekerjaan ini jaringan saraf konvolusi digunakan untuk menentukan perasaan dalam setting konvolusi. Kontribusi kertas ini termasuk metode untuk menangani input ukuran apapun dan metode untuk menghancurkan percakapan ke bagian terpisah untuk proses yang lebih mudah. Akhirnya, clustering menunjukkan untuk meningkatkan hasil dan bahwa model seperti untuk menangani sentimen dalam konversasi adalah baik cepat dan akurat.', 'ko': '이 작업에서 권적신경 네트워크는 대화 환경에서의 정서를 확인하는 데 쓰인다.본고의 공헌은 임의의 크기 입력을 처리하는 방법과 대화를 다른 부분으로 분해하여 처리하는 방법을 포함한다.마지막으로 집단은 결과를 개선할 수 있고 대화 중의 정서를 처리하는 모델이 빠르고 정확하다는 것이 증명되었다.', 'fa': 'در این کار شبکه\u200cهای عصبی کنترل برای تعیین احساسات در یک تنظیم مکالمه استفاده می\u200cشد. دسترسی این کاغذ شامل یک روش برای مدیریت هر ورودی اندازه و روش برای شکستن صحبت به بخش\u200cهای جدا برای پردازش آسانتر است. بالاخره، کلاسترینگ نشان داده شد تا نتیجه\u200cها را بهتر کند و این مدل برای مدیریت احساسات در گفتگوها هم سریع و دقیق است.', 'tr': 'Bu 챌al캇힊mada, g철r체힊me d체zeninde duygular캇 belirlemek i챌in kullan캇ld캇. Bu kagyzy흫 t채sirleri el챌i 철l챌체li girdi we g체rr체흫i a 흫satlyk i힊lemek 체챌in a첵ratyn b철leklere 챌ykmak 체챌in bir y철ntem bar. So흫unda, klustering netijeleri gowula힊dyrmak 체챌in g철rkezildi we g체rr체흫lerde du첵gular i힊lemek 체챌in 힊e첵le bir nusga hem tiz hem dogry.', 'sw': "Katika kazi hii mitandao ya kikatili ya neura yalitumika ili kuamua hisia katika mazungumzo. This paper's contributions include a method for handling any sized input and a method for breaking down the conversation into separate parts for easier processing.  Mwisho, kuunga mkono umeonyesha kuboresha matokeo na kuwa mfano wa namna hiyo wa kudhibiti hisia za mazungumzo ni haraka na sahihi.", 'af': "In hierdie werk was konvolusionele neuralnetwerke gebruik om die sentiment in 'n omskakelike instelling te bepaal. Hierdie papier se bydraaghings insluit 'n metode vir die handling van enige grootte invoer en 'n metode vir die afbreek van die gesprekslys in aparte dele vir makliker verwerking. Eindelik is klastering vertoon om resultate te verbeter en dat so 'n model vir die handling van sentiment in gesprekke is beide vinnig en presies.", 'sq': 'Në këtë punë rrjetet nervore konvolutive u përdorën me qëllim që të përcaktojnë ndjesinë në një ambient bisedimesh. Kontributet e këtij letre përfshijnë një metodë për trajtimin e çdo hyrje të madhe dhe një metodë për ndarjen e bisedës në pjesë të veçanta për trajtimin më të lehtë. Më në fund, grupimi u tregua që përmirëson rezultatet dhe se një model i tillë për trajtimin e ndjenjave në bisedime është i shpejtë dhe i saktë.', 'am': 'በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ የጠቅላላ የውይይት መረብ የተጠቀሙበት በተማያየት አካባቢ ጉዳይ ላይ የሚታወቅ ነው፡፡ የዚህ ገጽ አቀማመጥ ማንኛውም መጠን ጥያቄን በመስመር እና የንግግርን በተለየ ክፍሎች ለመቆረጥ ለቀላል ማሰናከል የሚችል ልማድ ነው፡፡ በመጨረሻም፣ ፍሬዎችን ለማሻሻል እና እንደዚህ መስመር ለመቆጣጠር ፍጻሜ ፈጥኖ እና እርግጠኛ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում օգտագործվեցին կոնվոլյուցիոն նեյրոնային ցանցերը զգացմունքների որոշումների համար խոսակցության միջոցով: Այս թղթի ներդրումները ներառում են ցանկացած մեծ ներդրման գործողության մեթոդ և խոսակցությունը բաժանելու մեթոդ առանձին մասերի ավելի հեշտ վերամշակման համար: Վերջապես ցույց տվեց, որ խմբավորումը բարելավում է արդյունքները, և որ խոսակցությունների ընթացքում զգացմունքների վերահսկման նման մոդելը արագ և ճշգրիտ է:', 'az': 'Bu işlərdə cürbəcür nürol a ğları müzakirə qurmaq üçün cürbəcür şəkildə duyguları tanımlamaq üçün istifadə edildi. Bu kağızın s ərbəstləri hər ölçülü giriş və sohbətini daha asan işləmək üçün ayrı parçalara bölüşdirmək üçün bir metodu ilə istifadə edir. Sonunda, clustering sonuçlarını yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün göstərildi və bu cümlələrdə hiss etmə modeli hızlı və doğrudur.', 'bn': 'এই কাজে বিশেষ নিউরুল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে যাতে কথোপকথন ব্যবস্থা নির্ধারণের জন্য। এই পত্রিকার অংশগ্রহণগুলোর মধ্যে যে কোনো আকারের ইনপুট হাতে নিয়ে যাওয়ার একটি পদ্ধতি রয়েছে এবং সহজে প্রক্রিয়ার জন্য আলাপকথনে ভ অবশেষে, ফলাফল উন্নতি দেখা যাচ্ছে এবং আলোচনায় এই ধরনের অনুভূতি নিয়ন্ত্রণের মডেল দ্রুত এবং সঠিক।', 'bs': 'U ovom radu su konvolucionalne neuralne mreže korišćene kako bi utvrdili osjećaj u razgovornom stanju. Dodatak ovog papira uključuje metodu za rješavanje bilo kojeg veličine ulaza i metodu za razbijanje razgovora u odvojene dijelove za lakše obrade. Konačno je pokazalo da je skustering poboljšao rezultate i da je takav model za rješavanje osjećaja u razgovorima i brz i tačan.', 'cs': 'V této práci byly použity konvoluční neuronové sítě k určení sentimentu v konverzačním prostředí. Příspěvky tohoto článku obsahují metodu manipulace s libovolnými velikostmi vstupu a metodu rozdělení konverzace na samostatné části pro snadnější zpracování. Nakonec bylo ukázáno, že clusterování zlepšuje výsledky a že takový model pro manipulaci se sentimentem v konverzacích je rychlý a přesný.', 'ca': "En aquesta feina es van utilitzar xarxes neurals convolucionals per determinar el sentiment en un entorn de conversació. Les contribucions d'aquest paper inclouen un mètode per manejar qualsevol entrada de mida i un mètode per trencar la conversa en parts separades per a un processament més fàcil. Finalment, es va demostrar que la agrupació millora els resultats i que aquest model de gestió del sentiment en les converses és ràpid i precis.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös kasutati konvolutsioonilisi närvivõrke, et määrata tunde vestluskeskkonnas. Käesoleva dokumendi panused sisaldavad meetodit mis tahes suurusega sisendite käsitlemiseks ja meetodit vestluse eraldi osadeks jaotamiseks lihtsamaks töötlemiseks. Lõpuks tõestati, et klastrite koostamine parandab tulemusi ja et selline mudel vestlustes tundete käsitlemiseks on nii kiire kui ka täpne.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä käytettiin konvolutionaalisia hermoverkkoja tunteiden määrittämiseen keskusteluympäristössä. Tämä artikkeli sisältää menetelmän käsitellä minkä tahansa kokoisia syötteitä ja menetelmän jakaa keskustelu erillisiin osiin käsittelyn helpottamiseksi. Lopuksi klusteroinnin osoitettiin parantavan tuloksia ja että tällainen malli tunteiden käsittelyyn keskusteluissa on sekä nopea että tarkka.', 'ha': 'A cikin wannan aikin da aka yi amfani da wasu zanayen neural masu tsawo dõmin ya gane hisãbi cikin wani muhimma mai haɗuwa. Candidancin wannan takardar na ƙunsa da wata hanyor wa ka yi amfani da tsarin ka tsare mazaɓa cikin ƙungiyõyi dabam-daban don a yi amfani da wajen aiki mai sauri. Haƙari, an nuna ƙaramar ta kyautata matsala, kuma an sami wannan misali dõmin ka yi amfani da hisani cikin mazaɓa, yana da fara da gaske.', 'he': 'בעבודה הזאת השתמשו ברשתות עצביות מעורבות כדי לקבוע את ההרגשה במסגרת שיחה. התרומות של הנייר הזה כוללות שיטה לטפל בכל כניסה בגודל ושיטה לשבור את השיחה לחלקים נפרדים לעבודה קלה יותר. בסופו של דבר, הוכח שמקבוצת קבוצה משפר את התוצאות ושמודל כזה לטפל ברגשות בשיחות הוא מהיר ודויק.', 'sk': 'V tem delu smo uporabili konvolucijske nevronske mreže za določitev sentimenta v pogovornem okolju. Prispevki tega članka vključujejo metodo za obdelavo vseh velikosti vnosov in metodo za razdelitev pogovora na ločene dele za lažjo obdelavo. Končno je bilo dokazano, da grozdje izboljšuje rezultate in da je takšen model za obvladovanje občutkov v pogovorih hiter in natančen.', 'jv': 'Nang barêng-barêng kuwi tambah sing nyerung nêrung kuwi bisa ngubah perusahaan dumadhi kapan kuwi kapan nggawe geraraning. Ombudhaka nggawe Perintah sing dibutuhke sistem kanggo nggawe input sampeyan karo sistem sing dibutuhke tarjamahan kanggo ngilangno sistem sing separahan kanggo ngilangno sistêm nggawe Lha wiwit, clustering wis ngomong nik nggawe dadi supaya lan padha model kanggo ngilanggar irungne seneng pisan karo kalawarta kuwi mabeh lan barang.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཚོར་བ་སྤྱོད་ཡོད་པ་དེ་ནི་ ཤོག་བྱང་གི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡུལ་དེ་ལ་ཆེ་ཆུང་ཀྱི་འཇུག་སྣོད་གང་རུང་ཞིག མཐའ་མར་མ་དེར། བསྡུ་ཚིག་གིས་མཐོང་སྣང་མངོན་གསལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'TDBot at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Context Aware Emotion Detection Using A Conditioned Classification Approach', 'ar': 'TDBot في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: الكشف عن المشاعر الواعية للسياق باستخدام نهج التصنيف الشرطي', 'es': 'TDBot en SemeVal-2019 Tarea 3: Detección de emociones sensible al contexto mediante un enfoque de clasificación condicionada', 'fr': "TDbot à SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Détection des émotions consciente du contexte à l'aide d'une approche de classification conditionnée", 'pt': 'TDBot no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Detecção de emoções consciente do contexto usando uma abordagem de classificação condicionada', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のTDBotタスク3 ：条件付き分類アプローチを使用したコンテキスト意識の感情検出', 'zh': 'TDBot at SemEval-2019 务 3:用类上下文知情检', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 3 पर TDBot: एक वातानुकूलित वर्गीकरण दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग करके संदर्भ जागरूक भावना का पता लगाना', 'ru': 'TDBot на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Контекстно-осознанное обнаружение эмоций с использованием подхода условной классификации', 'ga': 'TDBot ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Brath Mothúcháin Feasach ar an gComhthéacs Ag Úsáid Cur Chuige Aicmithe Coinníollach', 'hu': 'TDBot a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: kontextustudatos érzelmek felismerése kondicionált osztályozási megközelítéssel', 'ka': 'TDBot semiEval-2019 სამუშაო დავალება 3: კონტექსტური განვიცნობა ემოციების განვიცნობა გამოყენებული კლასიფიკაციის მიღება', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων με επίγνωση του περιβάλλοντος χρησιμοποιώντας μια υπό όρους προσέγγιση ταξινόμησης', 'it': 'TDBot a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Rilevazione delle emozioni consapevoli del contesto utilizzando un approccio di classificazione condizionato', 'kk': 'TDBot 3- жарым Eval- 2019 тапсырмасында: Контексті көңіл күйлерін анықтау шарты классификациялау жағдайын қолданып', 'mk': 'TDBot на SemEval-2019 задача 3: Детектирање на емоции на контекстна свест користејќи условен класификациски пристап', 'lt': 'TDBot at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Context Aware Emotion Detection Using A Conditioned Classification Approach', 'ms': 'TDBot pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Pengesanan Emosi Sedia Konteks Menggunakan Pendekatan Klasifikasi Bersyarat', 'mt': 'TDBot f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 3: Detezzjoni ta’ Emożizzjoni Konxja tal-Kuntest bl-Użu ta’ Approċċ ta’ Klassifikazzjoni Kundizzjonat', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3- ലെ ടിഡിബോട്ട്: ഒരു നിരന്തരമായ ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d സമീപം ഉപയോഗിച്ചു', 'mn': 'TDBot at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Context Aware Emotion Detection Use A Condition Classification Approach', 'pl': 'TDBot w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Kontekstowe wykrywanie emocji przy użyciu warunkowanego podejścia klasyfikacyjnego', 'sr': 'TDBot na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 3: otkrivanje emocija u kontekstu s upotrebom uslovnog pristupa klasifikaciji', 'no': 'TDBot ved halvEval-2019 oppgåve 3: Oppdaging av emosjonar for kontekstvekk ved bruk av ein vilkårleg klassifisering', 'ro': 'TDBot la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Detectarea emoțiilor conștiente de context folosind o abordare condiționată de clasificare', 'si': 'TDBot at Half-2019 Label 3: ContextKnown Emotion Detection Using a Conditioned Classication approach', 'so': 'TDBot at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Context aware Emotion Detection using A Conditioned Classification Approach', 'sv': 'TDBot på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Kontextmedveten känslodetektering med hjälp av en konditionerad klassificeringsmetod', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 3: சூழல் அறிந்த உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பு ஒரு நிகழ்ந்த வகைப்படுத்தல் நெருங்கு', 'ur': 'ٹی ڈی بیٹ ۲۰۱۹ ٹاکس ۳ میں: کنٹکسٹ Aware Emotion Detection Using a Conditioned Classification Approach', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifa 3: Context aware Emotion Detection using A Conditioned Classification Approach', 'vi': 'TDBot tại nhiệm vụ SemEvl-209 3: Kiểm tra cảm xúc tỉnh tình hình Sử dụng phương pháp mật khẩu dưới chế độ.', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Осъзнаване на емоциите с оглед на контекста чрез условен подход за класификация', 'nl': 'TDBot bij SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Context Aware Emotion Detection met behulp van een conditioned Classification Approach', 'da': 'TDBot på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Kontekstbevidst følelsesladelse ved hjælp af en konditioneret klassifikationsmetode', 'hr': 'TDBot na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 3: otkrivanje emocija u kontekstu s upotrebom uvjetnog pristupa klasifikaciji', 'de': 'TDBot bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Kontextbewusste Emotionserkennung unter Verwendung eines konditionierten Klassifikationsansatzes', 'id': 'TDBot di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Deteksi Emosi Awas Konteks Menggunakan Pendekatan Klasifikasi Berkondisi', 'fa': 'TDBot at semiEval-2019 Task 3: Context Aware Emotion Detection using a Conditional Classification Approach', 'ko': 'TDBot이SemEval-2019에서의 작업 3: 조건 분류 방법을 사용한 상하문 감지 정서 검측', 'af': "TDBot by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 3: Konteks Weg Emotie Opdekking gebruik 'n Bedinge Klassifikasie Toegang", 'am': 'Eval-2019 ስራ 3: Context aware Emotion Detection using A Conditioned Classification Approach', 'sq': 'TDBot në SemEval-2019 Task 3: Context Aware Emotion Detection Using A Conditioned Classification Approach', 'sw': 'TDBot kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 3: Utafiti wa Tamko la Matukio ya Habari kwa kutumia Matukio ya Makosa', 'tr': 'TDBot at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Context Aware Emotion Detection Using A Conditioned Classification Approach', 'az': 'TDBot at semiEval-2019 Task 3: Context Aware Emotion Detection Using a Conditional Classification Approach', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৩-এ টিডিবোট: এক পরিস্থিতির পরিস্থিতি ব্যবহার করে পরিচিত তথ্য সন্ধান', 'hy': 'Bot', 'ca': 'TDBot a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Context Aware Emotion Detection Using A Conditioned Classification Approach', 'et': 'TDBot SemEval-2019 ülesanne 3: kontekstiteadlik emotsioonide tuvastamine, kasutades konditsioneeritud klassifitseerimismeetodit', 'bs': 'TDBot na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 3: otkrivanje emocija u kontekstu s upotrebom uslovnog pristupa klasifikacije', 'cs': 'TDBot na SemEval-2019 Úkol 3: Kontextová detekce emocí s využitím podmíněného klasifikačního přístupu', 'fi': 'TDBot SemEval-2019 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 3: Kontekstitietoinen tunteiden havaitseminen ehdollistetulla luokittelumenetelmällä', 'jv': 'Tunisia', 'he': 'TDBot at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Context Aware Emotion Detection Using A Conditioned Classification Approach', 'sk': 'TDBot na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Zaznavanje čustev ozaveščenega konteksta z uporabo prilagojenega pristopa klasifikacije', 'ha': 'TDBot at SemEal-2019 Task 3: Contcontext knownt Emotment Discection Using A Conversioned Classification Approach', 'bo': 'TDBot at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Context Aware Emotion Detection Using a Conditioned Classification Approach'}
{'en': 'With the system description it is shown how to use the context information while detecting the emotion in a dialogue. Some guidelines about how to handle emojis was also laid out. While developing this system I realized the importance of pre-processing in conversational text data, or in general NLP related tasks ; it can not be over emphasized.', 'ar': 'مع وصف النظام ، يتم توضيح كيفية استخدام معلومات السياق أثناء اكتشاف المشاعر في الحوار. كما تم وضع بعض الإرشادات حول كيفية التعامل مع الرموز التعبيرية. أثناء تطوير هذا النظام ، أدركت أهمية المعالجة المسبقة في بيانات نص المحادثة ، أو في المهام المتعلقة بمعالجة اللغات الطبيعية بشكل عام ؛ لا يمكن المبالغة في التأكيد عليها.', 'es': 'Con la descripción del sistema se muestra cómo utilizar la información de contexto mientras se detecta la emoción en un diálogo. También se establecieron algunas pautas sobre cómo manejar emojis. Mientras desarrollaba este sistema me di cuenta de la importancia del preprocesamiento en los datos de texto conversacional, o en general en las tareas relacionadas con la PNL; no se puede exagerar.', 'pt': 'Com a descrição do sistema é mostrado como usar as informações de contexto ao detectar a emoção em um diálogo. Algumas diretrizes sobre como lidar com emojis também foram estabelecidas. Ao desenvolver este sistema percebi a importância do pré-processamento em dados de texto de conversação, ou em tarefas relacionadas à PNL em geral; não pode ser mais enfatizado.', 'fr': "La description du système montre comment utiliser les informations contextuelles tout en détectant l'émotion dans un dialogue. Quelques directives sur la façon de gérer les emojis ont également été énoncées. En développant ce système, j'ai pris conscience de l'importance du prétraitement dans les données textuelles conversationnelles, ou dans les tâches liées à la PNL en général\xa0; on ne saurait trop insister sur ce point.", 'ja': 'システムの説明では、ダイアログで感情を検出しながらコンテキスト情報を使用する方法が示されています。絵文字の扱い方に関するガイドラインもいくつか定められた。このシステムを開発している間、私は会話テキストデータ、または一般的なNLP関連のタスクでの前処理の重要性に気付きました。それは過度に強調することはできません。', 'zh': '以统言之,可以观情而用上下文。 又列表情符号指南。 发此统也,意预处理会话文本数NLP之要也。 不可过调。', 'ru': 'С помощью описания системы показано, как использовать контекстную информацию при обнаружении эмоции в диалоге. Были также изложены некоторые руководящие принципы обращения с эмодзи. Разрабатывая эту систему, я осознал важность предварительной обработки в разговорных текстовых данных, или в целом задач, связанных с NLP; это не может не подчеркиваться.', 'hi': 'सिस्टम विवरण के साथ यह दिखाया गया है कि संवाद में भावना का पता लगाते समय संदर्भ जानकारी का उपयोग कैसे किया जाए। इमोजी को संभालने के तरीके के बारे में कुछ दिशानिर्देश भी निर्धारित किए गए थे। इस प्रणाली को विकसित करते समय मुझे संवादी पाठ डेटा, या सामान्य रूप से एनएलपी से संबंधित कार्यों में पूर्व-प्रसंस्करण के महत्व का एहसास हुआ; इस पर अधिक जोर नहीं दिया जा सकता है।', 'ga': 'Leis an gcur síos ar an gcóras taispeántar conas an fhaisnéis comhthéacs a úsáid agus an mhothúchán á bhrath in idirphlé. Leagadh amach roinnt treoirlínte freisin maidir le conas emojis a láimhseáil. Agus an córas seo á fhorbairt agam thuig mé an tábhacht a bhaineann le réamhphróiseáil i sonraí téacs comhrá, nó i dtascanna ginearálta NLP; ní féidir an iomarca béime a chur air.', 'ka': 'სისტემის გამოსახულებით ჩვენება როგორ გამოყენება კონტექსტის ინფორმაციას, როგორ ემოციას დიალოგიში აღმოჩენა. ზოგიერთი მოწყობილობები, როგორ ემიეზების გადარწმუნება, იყო. ამ სისტემის განვითარებაში მე გავიგეთ საკუთარი ტექსტის მონაცემებში, ან საერთო NLP დაკავშირებული დავალებების მნიშვნელობა; ეს არ შეიძლება იყოს დამატებული.', 'el': 'Με την περιγραφή του συστήματος παρουσιάζεται πώς μπορείτε να χρησιμοποιήσετε τις πληροφορίες περιβάλλοντος ενώ ανιχνεύετε το συναίσθημα σε έναν διάλογο. Ορισμένες κατευθυντήριες γραμμές σχετικά με το πώς να χειρίζεστε τα εμόζι επίσης. Κατά την ανάπτυξη αυτού του συστήματος συνειδητοποίησα τη σημασία της προεπεξεργασίας σε δεδομένα κειμένου συνομιλίας, ή γενικά σε εργασίες που σχετίζονται με το ΝΛΠ. Δεν μπορεί να τονιστεί υπερβολικά.', 'hu': 'A rendszer leírásával bemutatjuk, hogyan használjuk fel a kontextus információkat, miközben érzékeljük az érzelmet egy párbeszédben. Az emojik kezelésére vonatkozó iránymutatásokat is meghatározták. A rendszer fejlesztése során felismertem az előzetes feldolgozás fontosságát a beszélgetési szövegadatokban, vagy általában az NLP-vel kapcsolatos feladatokban; Nem lehet túl hangsúlyozni.', 'kk': 'Жүйелік сипаттамасы бойынша диалогта емоцияларды табу кезінде контексті мәліметті қалай қолдану көрсетіледі. Кейбір көңіл көзгерістерді қалай басқару үшін бағыттау жолдары сондай-ақ орнатылды. Бұл жүйені құрастырғанда мен аудармалы мәтін деректерінде немесе NLP жалпы тапсырмалардың алдындағы өзгертудің маңыздысын түсіндім. бұл көмектесілмейді.', 'it': "Con la descrizione del sistema viene mostrato come utilizzare le informazioni di contesto mentre rileva l'emozione in un dialogo. Alcune linee guida su come gestire le emoji sono state anche delineate. Durante lo sviluppo di questo sistema mi sono reso conto dell'importanza del pre-elaborazione nei dati di testo conversazionali, o in generale nei compiti relativi alla PNL; non può essere troppo enfatizzato.", 'lt': 'Sistemos aprašymu parodoma, kaip naudoti kontekstinę informaciją nustatant emocijas dialoge. Taip pat buvo išdėstytos tam tikros gairės, kaip tvarkyti emodžius. Kurdamas šią sistemą supratau, kaip svarbu iš anksto apdoroti konversacinių tekstų duomenis arba apskritai su NLP susijusias užduotis; negalima per daug pabrėžti.', 'mk': 'Со описот на системот се покажува како да се користат контекстните информации додека се детектираат емоциите во дијалог. Исто така беа поставени некои насоки за тоа како да се справи со емоџиите. Додека го развивав овој систем сфатив важноста на преобработувањето на податоците од конверзационалниот текст, или општо задачите поврзани со НЛП; не може да се истакне премногу.', 'ms': 'Dengan keterangan sistem ia dipaparkan bagaimana menggunakan maklumat konteks semasa mengesan emosi dalam dialog. Beberapa panduan tentang bagaimana mengendalikan emoji juga telah ditetapkan. Sementara mengembangkan sistem ini, saya sedar pentingnya proses awal dalam data teks perbualan, atau secara umum tugas berkaitan dengan NLP; ia tidak boleh terlalu menekankan.', 'ml': 'സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ വിശദീകരണം ഉപയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഒരു ഡയലോഗില്\u200d വികാരം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d അത് എങ്ങനെയാ ഇമോജിക്ക് എങ്ങനെയാണ് കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യേണ്ടതെന്ന് കുറച്ച് വഴികാട്ടിയുണ്ട്. While developing this system I realized the importance of pre-processing in conversational text data, or in general NLP related tasks;  അത് പ്രശ്നമാക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയില്ല.', 'mt': 'Bid-deskrizzjoni tas-sistema jintwera kif tintuża l-informazzjoni tal-kuntest waqt li tiġi identifikata l-emozzjoni f’djalogu. Ġew stabbiliti wkoll xi linji gwida dwar kif wieħed għandu jimmaniġġja emojis. Waqt li żviluppajt din is-sistema għarriet l-importanza tal-ipproċessar minn qabel fid-dejta tat-test ta’ konverżjoni, jew b’mod ġenerali kompiti relatati mal-NLP; it can not be over emphasized.', 'mn': 'Системийн тодорхойлолтоор диалогт сэтгэл хөдлөлийг олох үед хэрхэн нөхцөл мэдээллийг хэрхэн ашиглах вэ гэдгийг харуулдаг. Эможийг хэрхэн удирдах талаар зарим загвар өгсөн. Энэ системийг хөгжүүлж байхдаа би ярилцлагын текст өгөгдлийн эсвэл NLP холбоотой ажил дээр урьд үйлдвэрлэх чухал зүйлийг ойлгосон. үүнийг батлаж чадахгүй.', 'no': 'Med systemskildringa vert det vist korleis kontekstinformasjonen skal brukast ved oppdaging av følelsene i eit dialogvindauge. Noen hjelpelinjer om korleis emojis skal handterast er også lagt ut. Mens jeg utvikla dette systemet, oppså eg viktigheten for å førehandsama i samtaletekstdata, eller generelt NLP-relaterte oppgåver. det kan ikkje vera over empisert.', 'pl': 'Z opisem systemu pokazano, jak wykorzystać informacje kontekstowe podczas wykrywania emocji w dialogu. Przedstawiono również kilka wytycznych dotyczących obsługi emoji. Podczas opracowywania tego systemu zdałem sobie sprawę z wagi wstępnego przetwarzania danych tekstowych konwersacyjnych lub ogólnie zadań związanych z NLP; Nie można tego zbyt podkreślić.', 'ro': 'Cu descrierea sistemului se arată cum se utilizează informațiile contextuale în timp ce detectează emoția într-un dialog. Au fost, de asemenea, stabilite câteva orientări despre modul de a gestiona emojis-uri. În timpul dezvoltării acestui sistem am realizat importanța prelucrării prealabile a datelor text conversaționale sau, în general, a sarcinilor legate de PNL; Nu poate fi prea subliniat.', 'sr': 'Sa opisom sistema pokazuje se kako koristiti kontekstske informacije dok otkrivaju emocije u dijalogu. Neke vodiče o tome kako se nositi emojis takođe su isplanirane. Dok sam razvio ovaj sistem, shvatio sam važnost predobrađivanja podataka o razgovornim tekstima ili općenito zadataka povezanih sa NLP-om; ne može biti gotovo naglasljeno.', 'sv': 'Med systembeskrivningen visas hur man använder kontextinformationen samtidigt som man upptäcker känslan i en dialog. Några riktlinjer om hur man hanterar emojis lades också fram. När jag utvecklade detta system insåg jag vikten av förbehandling i konversationstexter, eller generellt NLP-relaterade uppgifter; Det kan inte betonas för mycket.', 'si': 'පද්ධතිය විස්තර සමඟ ඒක පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් සංවාදයක් වල හොයාගන්න සම්බන්ධතා තොරතුරු භාවිත එමෝජිස් වලට කොහොමද බලන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට තියෙන්නේ. මේ පද්ධතිය විස්තර කරපු විදියට මට තේරුම් ගත්තා වාර්තාවේ පාළුවන් තොරතුරු වලින් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව ප්\u200dරතික ඒක අවධානය කරන්න බෑ.', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha nidaamka waxaa la muujin karaa sida loo isticmaalayo macluumaadka hoose marka la ogaanayo fikrada dialogue. Hagaha qaarkood oo ku saabsan sidoo kale xafiiska emojiska. Inta aan horumarinayo nidaamkan waxaan gartay muhiimka ka horeysa baaraandegista macluumaadka qoraalka ama shaqooyinka la xiriira ee NLP; laguma dhigi karo in la kordhiyo.', 'ta': 'உரையாடலில் உணர்வை கண்டுபிடிக்கும்போது தொடர்பு தகவலை எப்படி பயன்படுத்த வேண்டும் என்பதை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் அம உணர்வு எப்படி கையாள வேண்டும் என்பதை பற்றி சில வழிகாட்டிகள். இந்த முறைமையை உருவாக்கும் போது நான் பேச்சு உரை தகவலில் முன் செயல்படுத்தல் முக்கியமானதை உணர்ந்தேன், அல்லது பொதுவான N மேலும் அதை குறிப்பிட முடியாது.', 'ur': 'سیسٹم کی سفارش کے ساتھ یہ دکھائی جاتی ہے کہ کانٹس کی معلومات کس طرح استعمال کرنا ہے جبکہ ایک ڈالگو میں احساسات لکھنا ہے. کچھ راہ دکھانے والے ہیں کہ emojis کو کس طرح تحمل کرنا ہے۔ اس سیسٹم کو ایجاد کرنے کے موقع میں مجھے معلوم ہوا کہ کانٹروشن ٹکسٹ ڈیٹ میں پیش پردازی کا اہم کیا گیا ہے یا عمومی NLP رابطہ دار کاموں میں۔ یہ تسبیح نہیں کی جاتی۔', 'uz': "Name emojisni qanday boshqarish uchun boshqarish uchun bir necha qoidalar. Bu tizimni taʼminlovchi paytda men muloqat matn maʼlumotlarida yoki umumiy NLP bilan bogʻliq vazifalarning muhimligini tushundim; buni qo'yish mumkin emas.", 'vi': 'Với mô tả hệ thống, bạn sẽ thấy cách sử dụng thông tin ngữ cảnh trong khi tìm ra cảm xúc trong một cuộc đối thoại. Một số hướng dẫn về cách xử lý biểu tượng biểu tượng. Trong khi phát triển hệ thống này, tôi nhận ra tầm quan trọng của việc xử lý trước trong dữ liệu văn bản đối thoại, hay các công việc liên quan chọc Nchọc; nó không thể được nhấn mạnh quá.', 'bg': 'С описанието на системата се показва как да се използва контекстната информация, докато се открива емоцията в диалог. Бяха изложени и някои насоки за това как да се боравите с емотикони. При разработването на тази система осъзнах значението на предварителната обработка в разговорните текстови данни, или като цяло задачи, свързани с НЛО; Не може да бъде прекалено подчертано.', 'nl': "Met de systeembeschrijving wordt getoond hoe u de contextinformatie gebruikt terwijl u de emotie detecteert in een dialoog. Enkele richtlijnen over hoe om te gaan met emoji's werden ook uiteengezet. Tijdens de ontwikkeling van dit systeem realiseerde ik me het belang van pre-processing in conversational text data, of in het algemeen NLP gerelateerde taken; Het kan niet overdreven worden benadrukt.", 'da': 'Med systembeskrivelsen vises det, hvordan man bruger kontekstinformationen, mens man detekterer følelsen i en dialog. Nogle retningslinjer for, hvordan man håndterer emojis blev også lagt ud. Under udviklingen af dette system indså jeg betydningen af forhåndsbehandling i samtaletekstdata, eller generelt NLP relaterede opgaver; Det kan ikke være overunderstreget.', 'hr': 'S opisom sustava pokazuje se kako koristiti kontekstske informacije dok otkrivaju emocije u dijalogu. Neke vodiče o tome kako se nositi emojis također su određene. Dok sam razvijao ovaj sustav, shvatio sam važnost predobrazovanja podataka o razgovoru o tekstu ili općenito zadataka povezanih s NLP-om; ne može biti preko naglasljenog.', 'de': 'Mit der Systembeschreibung wird gezeigt, wie man die Kontextinformationen nutzt und die Emotion im Dialog erkennt. Einige Richtlinien zum Umgang mit Emojis wurden ebenfalls erstellt. Bei der Entwicklung dieses Systems erkannte ich die Bedeutung der Vorverarbeitung in Konversationstextdaten oder allgemein NLP-bezogenen Aufgaben; Es kann nicht überbewertet werden.', 'id': 'Dengan deskripsi sistem ditunjukkan bagaimana menggunakan informasi konteks sementara mendeteksi emosi dalam dialog. Beberapa petunjuk tentang bagaimana menangani emoji juga telah ditetapkan. Sementara mengembangkan sistem ini saya menyadari pentingnya proyeksi awal dalam data teks konversasi, atau secara umum tugas berkaitan dengan NLP; it can not be over emphasized.', 'fa': 'با توصیف سیستم نشان داده می\u200cشود چگونه از اطلاعات محیط استفاده شود در حالی که احساسات در یک محاوره شناسایی می\u200cشود. بعضی راهنمایی در مورد چگونه کنترل ایموجیس\u200cها قرار گرفته شده است. در حالی که این سیستم را توسعه می\u200cدهم، متوجه شدم که اهمیت پیش\u200cپردازش در داده\u200cهای متن مکالمه یا عمومی وظیفه\u200cهای مربوط به NLP است. نمی\u200cتواند بیشتر تشکیل دهد.', 'ko': '시스템 설명을 통해 대화 중의 정서를 측정할 때 상하문 정보를 어떻게 사용하는지 보여 준다.이모티콘을 어떻게 처리하는지에 대한 안내서도 열거되어 있다.이 시스템을 개발하는 과정에서 나는 세션 텍스트 데이터의 사전 처리의 중요성이나 NLP와 관련된 일반적인 임무를 깨달았다.이 점은 아무리 강조해도 지나치지 않다.', 'sw': 'Kwa maelezo ya mfumo inaonyesha jinsi ya kutumia taarifa za muktadha wakati wa kutambua hisia katika mazungumzo. Baadhi ya miongozo kuhusu namna ya kukabiliana na hisia ziliandikwa. Wakati nikaendeleza mfumo huu niligundua umuhimu wa upasuaji wa kabla katika data za mazungumzo, au kwa ujumla kazi zinazohusiana na NLP; haiwezi kuweka msisitizo.', 'tr': 'Sistem waspy bilen du첵gularyny a 흫lamak 체챌in n채hili kontekst maglumaty ullanyl힊y g철rkezil첵채r. Emotikler 체챌in n채dip g철zlemek barada k철p g철rkezili힊i Bu sistemi geli힊irken men 챌yky힊 metin maglumatynda 첵a-da NLP baglany t채sirlerde 철흫체nden i힊len첵채n wajyplygyny d체힊체ndim; Bu 체ns berip bilmez.', 'af': "Met die stelsel beskrywing word dit vertoon hoe om die konteks inligting te gebruik terwyl die emosie in 'n dialoog ontdek word. Sommige gidsline oor hoe emojis te hanteer is ook uitgelê. Terwyl ek hierdie stelsel ontwikkeling het, het ek die belangrikheid van voorafverwerking in konversasionale teks data, of in algemeen NLP verwante taak; dit kan nie oor uitgestrek word nie.", 'am': 'በሲስተም መግለጫ የዝርዝር መረጃዎችን በመጠቀም ጊዜ የስህተቱን መረጃ በመጠቀም ይታያል፡፡ ኢሜጂን እንዴት እንደተደረገ መቆጣጠር የሚችሉትን አንዳንዶች መግለጫ ነው፡፡ ይህንን ስርዓት ሲያሳድጉ የፊተኛውን የጽሑፍ ዳታዎች ወይም በጠቅላላ የNLP ስራ የሚያስፈልገውን ግንኙነት አወቅሁ፡፡ በአጠቃላይ አይችልም ።', 'sq': 'Me përshkrimin e sistemit shfaqet si të përdoret informacioni konteksti ndërsa të zbulohet emocioni në një dialog. U përcaktuan gjithashtu disa udhëzime rreth mënyrës së trajtimit të emoxhisë. Ndërsa zhvillova këtë sistem kuptova rëndësinë e paraprocesimit në të dhënat e tekstit bisedimor apo në përgjithësi detyrat e lidhura me NLP; nuk mund te theksohet shume.', 'hy': 'Համակարգը նկարագրելու միջոցով ցույց է տալիս, թե ինչպես օգտագործել կոնտեքստի ինֆորմացիան, երբ հայտնաբերվում է զգացմունքները խոսակցության մեջ: Այնուամենայնիվ, որոշ ուղղություններ էին ստեղծվել էմոջայի վերաբերյալ: While developing this system I realized the importance of pre-processing in conversational text data, or in general NLP related tasks;  այն չի կարող չափազանց ուշադրություն դարձնել:', 'bs': 'Sa opisom sistema pokazuje se kako koristiti kontekstske informacije dok otkrivaju emocije u dijalogu. Neke vodiče o tome kako se nositi emojis također su isplanirane. Dok sam razvijao ovaj sistem, shvatio sam važnost predobrazovanja podataka o razgovoru o tekstu ili općenito zadataka povezanih sa NLP-om; ne može biti preko naglasljenog.', 'bn': 'সিস্টেমের বর্ণনা দিয়ে একটি ডায়ালগে অনুভূতি সনাক্ত করার সময় প্রেক্ষিত তথ্য কিভাবে ব্যবহার করা হবে তা প্রদর্শন করা  ইমোজিকে কিভাবে নিয়ন্ত্রণ করার ব্যাপারে কিছু নির্দেশ নিয়েছে। এই সিস্টেম উন্নয়নের সময় আমি বুঝতে পারলাম যোগাযোগী টেক্সট ডাটা বা সাধারণত এনএলপি সম্পর্কিত কাজে it can not be over emphasized.', 'az': 'Sistem t…ôsbiqi il…ô, m…ôlumatlarńĪn m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪ tanńĪdńĪqlarńĪ vaxt m…ôlumatlarńĪ nec…ô istifad…ô edil…ôc…ôyini g√∂st…ôrilir. Emojil…ôri nec…ô idar…ô etm…ôk haqqńĪnda b…ôzi hiday…ôtl…ôr d…ô t…ôyin edilmiŇüdir. Bu sistemi inkiŇüaf edirken, m…ôn m√ľzakir…ô m…ôtn m…ôlumatńĪnńĪn …ôvv…ôlc…ô iŇül…ôm…ôsinin vacib…ôtini v…ô ya NLP m…ôlumatńĪnńĪn genel m…ôlumatńĪnńĪ anladńĪm; √ßox t…ôsirl…ônm…ôz.', 'ca': "Amb la descripció del sistema es mostra com utilitzar la informació contextual mentre es detecta l'emoció en un diàleg. També van establir algunes directrices sobre com manejar emoji. Mentre vaig desenvolupar aquest sistema vaig adonar-me de l'importància del pré-processament en les dades de text conversacional, o en general les tasques relacionades amb el NLP; no es pot enfatizar massa.", 'cs': 'S popisem systému je ukázáno, jak využít kontextové informace při detekci emoce v dialogu. Byly také stanoveny některé pokyny, jak zacházet s emoji. Při vývoji tohoto systému jsem si uvědomil důležitost předzpracování konverzačních textových dat, resp. obecně úkolů souvisejících s NLP; to nemůže být příliš zdůrazněno.', 'et': 'Süsteemi kirjeldusega näidatakse, kuidas kasutada kontekstiteavet, tuvastades emotsiooni dialoogis. Samuti esitati mõned juhised emojidega tegelemise kohta. Selle süsteemi arendamisel mõistsin vestlustekstiandmete eeltöötluse tähtsust või üldiselt NLP-ga seotud ülesandeid; Seda ei saa üle rõhutada.', 'fi': 'Järjestelmäkuvauksen avulla näytetään, miten kontekstitietoa käytetään samalla kun tunteita havaitaan dialogissa. Joitakin ohjeita emojien käsittelystä esitettiin myös. Kehittäessäni tätä järjestelmää ymmärsin, miten tärkeää on esikäsittely keskustelutekstitiedoissa tai yleisesti NLP:hen liittyvissä tehtävissä. Sitä ei voi liikaa korostaa.', 'ha': "Idan an nuna kwamfyutan shirin ayuka na tsari, za'a nuna yadda za'a yi amfani da maɓalli na cikin zauren akwatin bayani. Some guidelines about how to handle emojis was also laid out.  A lokacin da nake buɗe wannan na'ura, na gane muhimu na da za'a yi aiki a gaba ɗaya cikin data na mazaɓa da magana, ko kuma a jumla da aikin NLP masu husũma; ba za a iya yin wani muhimmi ba.", 'jv': 'Gambar kelompok sistem punika diperawat piye isan gambar informasi contextual politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nanging nggawe sistem iki, aku ngerasai perusahaan kanggo mbakdalakno-perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo mbakdalakno kapan pangan NLP ora iso ngududu emphasis.', 'he': 'עם תיאור המערכת הוראה איך להשתמש במידע הקשר בזמן שגילית את הרגשות בדיולוג. Some guidelines about how to handle emojis was also laid out.  בזמן שפיתחתי את המערכת הזאת הבנתי את חשיבות העבודה הקדמית במידע טקסט שיחה, או בכלל משימות קשורות ל-NLP; זה לא יכול להדגיש יותר מדי.', 'sk': 'Z opisom sistema je prikazano, kako uporabiti kontekstne informacije pri zaznavanju čustev v dialogu. Določena je bila tudi nekaj smernic o tem, kako ravnati z emojiji. Med razvojem tega sistema sem spoznal pomen predhodne obdelave besedilnih podatkov ali nalog, povezanih z NLP; Ne moremo ga pretirano poudariti.', 'bo': 'མ་ལག་གི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་དང་སྒེར་གྱི་ནང་དུ་སྟོན་པའི་ཁ་ཡིག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་སྟོན་པ emojis ཡི་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནི་ལ་བཟོ་བཅོས་བའི་སྐོར་གྲངས་ལ་ཤས་ཞིག་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། མ་ལག་འདི་ལ་ཡར་སྐྱེད་བཞིན་པའི་སྐབས་ལྟ་ངས་གྱིས་གཏམ་གླེང་གི་ཡིག་གེ་གནས་ཚུལ་ནང་གི་སྔོན་ལས་རིམ་སྒྲིག་གི་གལ་ཆོས་ གཙོ་གཏོང་ཞིག་དགོས་ཀྱི་མི་རེད།'}
{'en': 'THU-HCSI at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Hierarchical Ensemble Classification of Contextual Emotion in Conversation', 'ar': 'THU-HCSI في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: تصنيف المجموعة الهرمية للعاطفة السياقية في المحادثة', 'es': 'THU-HCSI en la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2019: Clasificación jerárquica de conjunto de emociones contextuales en la conversación', 'fr': "THU-HCSI au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Classification hiérarchique d'ensemble de l'émotion contextuelle dans la conversation", 'pt': 'THU-HCSI na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Classificação Hierárquica do Conjunto de Emoções Contextuais em Conversa', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 3 पर THU-HCSI: वार्तालाप में प्रासंगिक भावनाओं का पदानुक्रमित पहनावा वर्गीकरण', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019åŠ¡3THU-HCSI:ä¸Šä¸‹æ–‡æƒ…ä¹‹åˆ†ä¹Ÿ', 'ja': 'THU - HCSI at SemEval -2019 Task 3: Hierarchical Ensemble Classification of Contextual Emotion in Conversation', 'ru': 'THU-HCSI на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Иерархическая ансамблевая классификация контекстуальных эмоций в разговоре', 'ga': 'THU-HCSI ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Ensemble Ordlathach Aicmiú Mothúcháin Chomhthéacsúla sa Chomhrá', 'ka': 'THU-HCSI semiEval-2019 დავალება 3: კონტექსტური ემოციის ჰიერაციალური კლასიფიკაცია', 'hu': 'THU-HCSI a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: A kontextuális érzelmek hierarchikus osztályozása a beszélgetésben', 'el': 'THU-HCSI στο Εργασία 3: Ταξινόμηση του Συγκεντρωτικού Συναισθήματος στη Συζήτηση', 'it': "THU-HCSI a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Classificazione gerarchica dell'emozione contestuale nella conversazione", 'lt': 'THU-HCSI at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Hierarchical Ensemble Classification of Contextual Emotion in Conversation', 'mk': 'THU-HCSI на SemEval-2019 задача 3: Херархична класификација на контекстни емоции во разговори', 'kk': 'THU', 'ms': 'THU-HCSI pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Klasifikasi Hierarkikal Ensemble Emotion Konteksual dalam Perbualan', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3- ലെ THU- HCSI: സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിലെ കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുക', 'mt': 'THU-HCSI f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 3: Klassifikazzjoni Hierarkika Ensemble ta’ Emozzjoni Kuntest fil-Konversjoni', 'pl': 'THU-HCSI w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Klasyfikacja zespołu hierarchicznego emocji kontekstowych w rozmowie', 'ro': 'THU-HCSI la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Clasificarea ansamblului ierarhic a emoției contextuale în conversație', 'no': 'THU-HCSI på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3: Hierarisk klassifisering av kontekstære emosjon i samtale', 'si': 'THU-HCSI at semeval-2019 Job 3: hirarchical Ensemble Classication of Contextal Emotion in Conversation', 'sr': 'THU-HCSI na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: Hierarična klasifikacija kontekstualne emocije u razgovoru', 'mn': 'THU-HCSI at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Hierarchical Ensemble Classification of Contextual Emotion in Conversation', 'so': 'THU-HCSI at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Hierarchical Ensemable Classification of Contextual Emotion in Conversation', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணியில் THU- HCSI: உரையாடலில் உள்ளமைப்பு உணர்ச்சியின் உயர்ந்த வகைப்படுத்தல்', 'ur': 'THU-HCSI at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Hierarchical Ensemble Classification of Contextual Emotion in Conversation', 'sv': 'THU-HCSI på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: hierarkisk ensembleklassificering av kontextuella känslor i samtal', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifa 3: Hierarchical Ensemable Classification of Contextual Emotion in Conversation', 'vi': 'Đang phân tích cảm xúc liên tiếp trong quá trình chuyển đổi.', 'hr': 'THU-HCSI na semiEval-2019. zadatak 3: Hierarična klasifikacija kontekstalnih emocija u razgovoru', 'da': 'THU-HCSI ved SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: hierarkisk ensembleklassifikation af kontekstuel følelse i samtale', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Йерархичен ансамбъл Класификация на контекстуалната емоция в разговора', 'nl': 'THU-HCSI bij SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Hierarchische Ensembleclassificatie van contextuele emotie in gesprek', 'fa': 'THU-HCSI at semiEval-2019 Task 3: Classification of Hierarchical Ensemble Emotion Contextual in Conversation', 'id': 'THU-HCSI di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Klasifikasi Hierarchical Ensemble of Contextual Emotion in Conversation', 'de': 'THU-HCSI bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Hierarchische Ensembleklassifikation kontextueller Emotionen im Gespräch', 'ko': 'THU-HCSI가SemEval-2019에서의 임무 3: 대화에서 언어 환경 정서의 층별 통합 분류', 'sw': 'THU-HCSI katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 3: Utoaji wa Tamko la Mazungumzo', 'af': 'THU-HCSI by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 3: Hierarchical Ensemble Classification of Contextual Emotion in Conversation', 'tr': 'THU-HCSI at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Hierarchical Ensemble Classification of Contextual Emotion in Conversation', 'am': 'ስራ 3: Hierarchical Ensemble Classification of Contextual Emotion in Conversation', 'sq': 'THU-HCSI në SemEval-2019 Task 3: Hierarchical Ensemble Classification of Contextual Emotion in Conversation', 'hy': 'THU-HBCSI-ը 2019 թվականի կիսագնդի 3. հանձնարարությունը. հաղորդակցման ընթացքում կոնտեքստային զգացմունքների հիերարքիկական համակարգչային դասակարգման', 'az': 'THU-HCSI at semiEval-2019 Task 3: Hierarchical Ensemble Classification of Contextual Emotion in Conversation', 'bs': 'THU-HCSI na semiEval-2019. zadatak 3: Hierarična klasifikacija kontekstualne emocije u razgovoru', 'ca': 'THU-HCSI a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Hierarchical Ensemble Classification of Contextual Emotion in Conversation', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৩-এ থিউ-এইচসিআই: কথোপকথনের মধ্যে বিদ্যমান অনুমোদনের বিষয়বস্তু বিশ্লেষণ', 'cs': 'THU-HCSI na SemEval-2019 Úkol 3: Hierarchická souborová klasifikace kontextových emocí v konverzaci', 'et': 'THU-HCSI SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 3: Hierarhiline ansambli kontekstituaalsete emotsioonide klassifikatsioon vestluses', 'fi': 'THU-HCSI SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 3: Hierarkinen Ensemble Kontekstialisten tunteiden luokitus keskustelussa', 'sk': 'THU-HCSI na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Hierarhični ansambel Klasifikacija kontekstualnih čustev v pogovoru', 'jv': 'thoU-HCSI at semi-inval-2011', 'ha': 'FAILE', 'he': 'THU-HCSI at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Hierarchical Ensemble Classification of Contextual Emotion in Conversation', 'bo': 'THU-HCSI at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Hierarchical Ensemble Classification of Contextual Emotion in Conversation 3'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we describe our hierarchical ensemble system designed for the SemEval-2019 task3, EmoContext. In our system, three sets of classifiers are trained for different sub-targets and the predicted labels of these base classifiers are combined through three steps of voting to make the final prediction. Effective details for developing base classifiers are highlighted.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نصف نظام المجموعات الهرمي الخاص بنا المصمم لمهمة SemEval-20193 ، EmoContext. في نظامنا ، يتم تدريب ثلاث مجموعات من المصنفات على أهداف فرعية مختلفة ويتم دمج التسميات المتوقعة لهذه المصنفات الأساسية من خلال ثلاث خطوات للتصويت لعمل التنبؤ النهائي. يتم إبراز التفاصيل الفعالة لتطوير المصنفات الأساسية.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous décrivons notre système d'ensemble hiérarchique conçu pour la tâche3 SemEval-2019, EMOContext. Dans notre système, trois ensembles de classificateurs sont formés pour différentes sous-cibles et les étiquettes prédites de ces classificateurs de base sont combinées en trois étapes de vote pour effectuer la prédiction finale. Les détails efficaces pour développer des classificateurs de base sont mis en évidence.", 'es': 'En este artículo, describimos nuestro sistema de conjunto jerárquico diseñado para la tarea SemEval-20193, EmoContext. En nuestro sistema, se entrenan tres conjuntos de clasificadores para diferentes sub-objetivos y las etiquetas predichas de estos clasificadores base se combinan a través de tres pasos de votación para hacer la predicción final. Se resaltan los detalles efectivos para el desarrollo de clasificadores base.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, descrevemos nosso sistema de conjunto hierárquico projetado para a tarefa SemEval-20193, EmoContext. Em nosso sistema, três conjuntos de classificadores são treinados para diferentes sub-alvos e os rótulos previstos desses classificadores básicos são combinados por meio de três etapas de votação para fazer a previsão final. Detalhes efetivos para o desenvolvimento de classificadores básicos são destacados.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2019タスク3、EmoContextのために設計された階層型アンサンブルシステムについて説明する。我々のシステムでは、３組の分類子が異なるサブターゲットのために訓練され、これらのベース分類子の予測されたラベルが、最終的な予測を行うための３つの投票ステップを通して組み合わされる。ベース分類子を開発するための効果的な詳細が強調されています。', 'zh': '本文述SemEval-2019务3 EmoContext设计分集成系统。 凡我之统,练子三组器,合之三投票,以成其占。 显见开基分器之效详细信息。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम SemEval-2019 task3, EmoContext के लिए डिज़ाइन किए गए हमारे पदानुक्रमित पहनावा प्रणाली का वर्णन करते हैं। हमारी प्रणाली में, क्लासिफायरके तीन सेटों को विभिन्न उप-लक्ष्यों के लिए प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है और इन बेस क्लासिफायरों के अनुमानित लेबल को अंतिम भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए मतदान के तीन चरणों के माध्यम से जोड़ा जाता है। बेस क्लासिफायर्स के विकास के लिए प्रभावी विवरण पर प्रकाश डाला गया है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы описываем нашу иерархическую ансамблевую систему, разработанную для задачи 3 SemEval-2019, EmoContext. В нашей системе три набора классификаторов обучаются для различных подцелей, и прогнозируемые метки этих базовых классификаторов объединяются в три этапа голосования, чтобы сделать окончательный прогноз. Подчеркиваются эффективные детали для разработки базовых классификаторов.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid cur síos ar ár gcóras ensemble ordlathach atá deartha do thasc SemEval-20193, EmoContext. Inár gcóras, déantar trí shraith aicmitheora a oiliúint le haghaidh fo-spriocanna éagsúla agus cuirtear lipéid réamh-mheasta na mbunaicmitheoirí seo le chéile trí thrí chéim vótála chun an tuar deiridh a dhéanamh. Aibhsítear sonraí éifeachtacha maidir le bonn-aicmitheoirí a fhorbairt.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a SemEval-2019 feladathoz tervezett hierarchikus együttes rendszerünket, az EmoContent-ot. Rendszerünkben három osztályozócsoportot képeznek ki különböző alcélok számára, és ezeknek a bázisosztályozóknak a várható címkéit három szavazási lépésen keresztül kombináljuk, hogy elkészítsük a végső előrejelzést. Kiemelik az alap osztályozók kidolgozásának hatékony részleteit.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, περιγράφουμε το ιεραρχικό σύστημα συνόλων που σχεδιάστηκε για την εργασία SemEval-2019, EmoContext. Στο σύστημά μας, τρία σύνολα ταξινομητών εκπαιδεύονται για διαφορετικούς υποστόχους και οι προβλεπόμενες ετικέτες αυτών των βασικών ταξινομητών συνδυάζονται μέσω τριών βημάτων ψηφοφορίας για να γίνει η τελική πρόβλεψη. Τονίζονται αποτελεσματικές λεπτομέρειες για την ανάπτυξη βασικών ταξινομητών.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ამ წიგნაში ჩვენი იერაქტიკური ინსტემბლის სისტემა, რომელიც SemEval-2019 დავალების3, EmoContext-ის განსაზღვრებულია. ჩვენი სისტემაში, სამი კლასიფიკაციური კონფიკაციური კონფიკაციური კონფიკაციური კონფიკაციური კონფიკაციური კონფიკაციური კონფიკაციური კონფიკაციური კონფიკაციური კონფიკაცი ეფექტიური დეტალები ბაზის კლასიფიკაციების განვითარებისთვის აღწერა.', 'it': 'In questo articolo, descriviamo il nostro sistema gerarchico di ensemble progettato per la task SemEval-20193, EmoContent. Nel nostro sistema, tre serie di classificatori sono addestrati per diversi sub-target e le etichette previste di questi classificatori base sono combinate attraverso tre fasi di voto per fare la previsione finale. Vengono evidenziati dettagli efficaci per lo sviluppo di classificatori di base.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdiname mūsų hierarchinę komplekso sistemą, sukurtą SemEval-2019 uždaviniui3, EmoContext. Mūsų sistemoje trys klasifikatorių rinkiniai mokomi skirtingiems subtikslams, o prognozuojamos šių pagrindinių klasifikatorių etiketės derinamos trijuose balsavimo etapuose, kad būtų padaryta galutinė prognozė. Effective details for developing base classifiers are highlighted.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз жүйеңізді SemEval-2019 тапсырма3, EmoContext үшін құрылған иерархиялық ензембл жүйеңізді түсіндіреміз. Біздің жүйемізде үш классификациялық бағдарламалардың түрлі ішкі мақсаттары үшін оқылған және бұл негізгі классификациялық жарлықтарының бағдарламалы жарлықтары үш қадам бойынша соң Негізгі классификаторларды жасау үшін эффективті егжей- тегжейі бояулады.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник го опишуваме нашиот хиерархички ансембл систем дизајниран за задачата SemEval-2019, EmoContext. Во нашиот систем, три групи класификатори се обучени за различни подмети и предвидените етикети на овие бази класификатори се комбинирани преку три чекори на гласање за да се направи конечна предвидување. Се истакнуваат ефективни детали за развојот на базичките класификатори.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ഹീരാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2019 ടാസ്ക്ക് 3, എമോക്സെക്സ്റ്റ്. നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d മൂന്നു ക്ലാസ്ഫിളുകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഉപേക്ഷ ലക്ഷ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ബേസ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിളു അടിസ്ഥാനത്തെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സജ്ജമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എടുത്തുകാണിക്കുന്നു.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan sistem ensemble hierarkis kami direka untuk SemEval-2019 tugas3, EmoContext. Dalam sistem kita, tiga set pengeklasifikasi dilatih untuk subsasaran yang berbeza dan label yang dijangka bagi pengeklasifikasi asas ini digabungkan melalui tiga langkah pemilihan untuk membuat ramalan akhir. Perincian berkesan untuk mengembangkan pengeklasifikasi asas ditandai.', 'mt': 'In this paper, we describe our hierarchical ensemble system designed for the SemEval-2019 task3, EmoContext.  Fis-sistema tagħna, tliet settijiet ta’ klassifikaturi huma mħarrġa għal sottomiri differenti u t-tikketti mbassra ta’ dawn il-klassifikaturi bażi huma kkombinati permezz ta’ tliet passi ta’ votazzjoni biex isir it-tbassir finali. Huma enfasizzati dettalji effettivi għall-iżvilupp tal-klassifikaturi bażi.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид SemEval-2019 ажил 3, EmoContext-д зохион байгуулагдсан байгууллагын системийг тайлбарлаж байна. Бидний системд 3 хэсэг ангилагчид өөр суб-зорилготой болон эдгээр суурь ангилагчдын таамаглалтай маркилгууд нь төгсгөл таамаглах үед 3 давхар сонголтын давхар дамжуулагддаг. Үндсэн ангилалыг хөгжүүлэхэд эффективны нарийвчлал тодорхойлдог.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule opisujemy nasz hierarchiczny system zespołów zaprojektowany dla zadania SemEval-2019, EmoContext. W naszym systemie trzy zestawy klasyfikatorów są szkolone dla różnych podcelów, a przewidywane etykiety tych klasyfikatorów bazowych są łączone przez trzy etapy głosowania, aby dokonać ostatecznej przewidywania. Podkreślono skuteczne szczegóły dotyczące opracowywania podstawowych klasyfikatorów.', 'no': 'I denne papiret beskriver vi vår hierarkiske ensemble-systemet designert for semiEval-2019 oppgåve3, EmoContext. I systemet vårt er tre klassifikatorar trengte for ulike undermål, og dei foregåande merkelappene av desse baseklassifikatorane er kombinerte gjennom tre steg av steg for å gjera det siste foregåva. Effektiv detaljar for utvikling av baseklassifikatorar er markert.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, descriem sistemul nostru ierarhic de ansamblu conceput pentru sarcina SemEval-20193, EmoContent. În sistemul nostru, trei seturi de clasificatori sunt instruiți pentru diferite subținte și etichetele anticipate ale acestor clasificatori de bază sunt combinate prin trei etape de vot pentru a face predicția finală. Sunt evidențiate detalii eficiente pentru dezvoltarea clasificatorilor de bază.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo naš hijerarhički ensemble sistem dizajniran za posao semiEval-2019, EmoContext. U našem sistemu, tri grupa klasifikatora su obučena za različite podmeta i predviđene etikete ovih baznih klasifikatora su kombinirane kroz tri koraka glasanja kako bi se konačno predviđalo. Efektivni detalji za razvoj baznih klasifikatora su istaknuti.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats beskriver vi vårt hierarkiska ensemblesystem utformat för SemEval-2019uppgiften3, EmoContent. I vårt system utbildas tre uppsättningar klassificerare för olika delmål och de förutspådda etiketterna för dessa basklassificerare kombineras genom tre steg av omröstning för att göra den slutliga förutsägelsen. Effektiva detaljer för att utveckla basklassificerare lyfts fram.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaan ku qornaa nidaamka hierarchiga ah oo loo qoray SemEval-2019 task3, EmoContext. Isticmaddeena waxaa lagu tababariyaa saddex koox oo fasax ah oo lagu tababariyey waxyaabaha la sii sheegay, waxaana lagu soo wada ururiyaa saddex tallaabo oo codeynta si ay ugu dambeyso wax u sii sheego. Waxaa lagu qoraa macluumaad faa’iido ah oo horumarinta fasalka aasaasiga ah.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි අපේ පත්තරයේ සේම්වල්-2019 වැඩ3, EmoContext3 වැඩසටහන් කරලා තියනවා. අපේ පද්ධතියේදී, වෙනස් සබ් ලක්ෂණය සඳහා වෙනස් ලේබල් තුනක් පද්ධතිය කරලා තියෙන්නේ අන්තිම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න. ප්\u200dරශ්ණත විස්තර විශේෂකය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්ණත විස්තර විශ්වාස කරනවා.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாங்கள் செம்Eval-2019 செயல்பாடுகள் 3, EmoContext வடிவமைக்கப்பட்ட எங்கள் மிகப்பெரிய முறைமையை விவரிக்கிறோம். எங்கள் கணினியில், மூன்று வகுப்பாளர்கள் வேறு துணை இலக்குகளுக்கு பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளன மற்றும் இந்த அடிப்படை வகுப்பாளர்களின் மூன்று பட்டிகள் ச அடிப்படை வகுப்பாளர்களுக்கு விளைவான விவரங்கள் முன்னிலைப்படுத்தப்படுகிறது.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے ہماری سیسٹم سیمیEval-2019 ٹاکس ۳، EmoContext کے لئے طراحی کی ہے، ہمیشہ ہمیشہ آفریق اینسامبل سیسٹم کو توصیح دیتے ہیں. ہمارے سیسٹم میں، تین سیٹ کلاسیفوں کی مختلف زیر نشانیوں کے لئے آموزش کی جاتی ہیں اور ان بنیاد کلاسیفوں کی پیش بینی لیبل تین سٹ کے ذریعہ ایک دوسرے سے آپس کی پیش بینی کی جاتی ہیں۔ بنسٹ کلاسیٹر کے لئے اثرات تفصیل کیا جاتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda biz SemEval-2019 tashkilotlari 3, EmoContext uchun yaratilgan hierarchik ensemble tizimimizni anglatamiz. Bizning tizimimizda, uchta ta ta'lim turlari boshqa sub-goallar uchun o'rganadi, va bu asosiy klassiplarning ko'paytirilgan tugmalar uchta qadamda birlashtiriladi va oxirgi kutilgan deb hisoblash uchun. Name", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi mô tả hệ thống kết cấu phân cấp được thiết kế cho nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 9, EmoContact. Trong hệ thống của chúng tôi, ba nhóm phân loại được đào tạo cho các mục tiêu phụ khác nhau, và các nhãn được dự đoán của những người phân loại cơ bản này được kết hợp qua ba bước bỏ phiếu để làm dự đoán cuối cùng. Thông tin hiệu quả cho việc phát triển các phân loại cơ bản.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel beschrijven we ons hiërarchische ensemblesysteem ontworpen voor de SemEval-2019 taak3, EmoContext. In ons systeem worden drie sets classificatoren getraind voor verschillende subdoelen en de voorspelde labels van deze basis classificatoren worden gecombineerd door middel van drie stappen van stemmen om de uiteindelijke voorspelling te maken. Effectieve details voor de ontwikkeling van basisclassificatoren worden benadrukt.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия описваме нашата йерархична ансамбълна система, проектирана за задачата СемЕвал-2019г., Емоконтекс. В нашата система три комплекта класификатори се обучават за различни подцели и прогнозираните етикети на тези основни класификатори се комбинират чрез три стъпки на гласуване, за да се направи окончателната прогноза. Подчертани са ефективни детайли за разработване на базови класификатори.', 'da': 'I denne artikel beskriver vi vores hierarkiske ensemblesystem designet til SemEval-2019 opgave3, EmoContent. I vores system trænes tre sæt klassificerere til forskellige delmål, og de forudsigede etiketter af disse basisklassificatorer kombineres gennem tre trin af afstemning for at lave den endelige forudsigelse. Effektive oplysninger om udvikling af basisklassificatorer fremhæves.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir unser hierarchisches Ensemblesystem für die SemEval-2019 Task3, EmoContext. In unserem System werden drei Sätze von Klassifikatoren für verschiedene Teilziele trainiert und die vorhergesagten Labels dieser Basisklassifikatoren werden durch drei Abstimmungsschritte kombiniert, um die endgültige Vorhersage zu treffen. Effektive Details zur Entwicklung von Basisklassifikatoren werden hervorgehoben.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo naš hijerarhički ensemble sistem dizajniran za posao semiEval-2019, EmoContext. U našem sustavu, tri skupa klasifikatora obučena su za različite podmeta i predviđene etikete ovih baznih klasifikatora kombinirane su kroz tri koraka glasanja kako bi se konačno predviđalo. Efektivni detalji za razvoj baznih klasifikatora su istaknuti.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan sistem ensemble hierarkis kami dirancang untuk SemEval-2019 task3, EmoContext. Dalam sistem kita, tiga set klasifikasi dilatih untuk subtarget yang berbeda dan label yang diprediksi dari klasifikasi dasar ini dikombinasikan melalui tiga langkah pemilihan untuk membuat prediksi akhir. Rincian efektif untuk mengembangkan klasifikasi dasar diperingatkan.', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili, tunaelezea mfumo wetu wa mfumo wa kifua uliobuniwa kwa ajili ya kazi za SemEval-2019, EmoContext. Katika mfumo wetu, kundi tatu la wataalamu hufundishwa kwa lengo tofauti na alama zilizotabiriwa za wataalamu wa msingi hizi zinaunganishwa kwa njia tatu za kupiga kura ili kufanya utabiri wa mwisho. Tafsiri zenye ufanisi wa maendeleo ya wataalamu wa msingi zinaonyeshwa.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는SemEval-19퀘스트3 EmoContext를 위한 층별 통합 시스템을 묘사했다.우리 시스템에서 서로 다른 하위 목표에 대해 세 그룹의 분류기를 훈련시키고 세 가지 투표 절차를 통해 이러한 기본 분류기의 예측 라벨을 조합하여 최종 예측을 한다.기본 분류기 개발의 효과적인 세부 사항을 중점적으로 소개했다.', 'af': 'In hierdie papier beskryf ons hierarkies ensemble stelsel ontwerp vir die SemEval-2019 taak3, EmoContext. In ons stelsel is drie stelle klassifiseerders opgelei vir verskillende subdoels en die voorskoude etikette van hierdie basis klassifiseerders gekombineer deur drie stappe van stem om die eindelike voorskou te maak. Effektiewe besonderhede vir ontwikkeling van basis klassifiseerders is verlig.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda, SemEval-2019 task3, EmoContext'a tasarlanmış hiyerarşik taýýarlarymyzy tasvir edip görýäris. Biziň sistemimizde, üç sany klasifikatçy dürli sub-hedeflere we bu beýik klasifikatçylaryň önlenen etitleri üçin seredip bolup geçirilýär. Basit klasifikatyny bejermek üçin etkinlik maglumaty ýagtylandyrylýar.", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما سیستم انجمن\u200cآوری\u200cمان را توصیف می\u200cکنیم که برای کارهای نیم\u200cEval-2019، EmoContext طراحی شده است. در سیستم ما، سه مجموعه از گروه\u200cهای گروه برای زیر هدف\u200cهای مختلف آموزش داده می\u200cشوند و نقاشی پیش\u200cبینی از این گروه\u200cهای پایه\u200cها با سه قدم\u200cهای رای برای انجام پیش\u200cبینی نهایی ترکیب می\u200cشوند. جزئیات تاثیر برای توسعه گروه\u200cهای پایه\u200cها مشخص شده\u200cاند.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ ለSemEval-2019 ስራ 3፣ EmoContext የተዘጋጀውን የኤራርስክሪክ ስብስቡን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በሥርዓታችን ሦስት ደረጃዎች ለልዩ ልዩ ደረጃዎች ተማርተዋል፣ የዚህም መጨረሻ ትንቢት ለማድረግ የተቀረቡት የበይነመረ ደረጃዎች በሦስት ደረጃዎች ተማርተዋል፡፡ መሠረት ክፍተቶችን ለማሳመር የጥያቄ ዝርዝሮች በተለየ፡፡', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne përshkruajmë sistemin tonë hierarkik të ansamblit të dizajnuar për detyrën SemEval-2019, EmoContext. Në sistemin tonë, tre grupe klasifikues janë trajnuar për nënobjektiva të ndryshme dhe etiketat e parashikuara të këtyre klasifikuesve bazë kombinohen nëpërmjet tre hapave të votimit për të bërë parashikimin përfundimtar. Janë theksuar detajet efektive për zhvillimin e klasifikuesve bazë.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նկարագրում ենք մեր հիերարխիկ համակարգը, որը նախագծված է ՍեմԷվալ 2019-ի հանձնարարության3, EmoConxt-ի համար: Մեր համակարգում դասակարգիչների երեք խումբ ուսուցանվում են տարբեր ենթանպատակների համար, և այս հիմնական դասակարգիչների կանխատեսված պիտակները միավորվում են քվեարկության երեք քայլերի միջոցով վերջնական կանխատեսումը կատարելու համար: Effective details for developing base classifiers are highlighted.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা আমাদের হিয়ারার্কিয়ারিক্যাল সিস্টেমের বর্ণনা করছি যা সেমইভাল-২০১৯ টাস্ক ৩, এমোকন্টেক্স। আমাদের সিস্টেমে তিনটি সেট শ্রেণীকে বিভিন্ন সাব-লক্ষ্যের জন্য প্রশিক্ষণ দেওয়া হয়েছে এবং এই বেস শ্রেণীবিভাগের তিনটি পদক্ষেপের মাধ্যমে ভোট দে বেসের শ্রেণীবিভাগের জন্য কার্যকর বিস্তারিত বিবরণ উল্লেখ করা হয়েছে।', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, SemEval-2019 task3, EmoContext üçün hazırlanmış hiyerarşik ensemble sistemimizi təsdiq edirik. Sistemimizdə, üç dəstə klassifikatçı müxtəlif apa məqsədilər üçün təhsil edilir və bu baz klassifikatçıların tədbir etiketləri son tədbir etmək üçün üç dəstədən birləşdirilmişdir. Bütün klassifikatları təhsil etmək üçün effektiv detaylar işıqlandırılır.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo naš hijerarhički ensemble sistem dizajniran za posao semiEval-2019, EmoContext. U našem sustavu, tri grupa klasifikatora su obučena za različite podmeta i predviđene etikete ovih baznih klasifikatora su kombinirane kroz tri koraka glasanja kako bi se konačno predviđalo. Efektivni detalji za razvoj baznih klasifikatora su istaknuti.', 'ca': "En aquest article, descrivim el nostre sistema de conjunts jeràrquics dissenyat per la tasca SemEval-2019, EmoContext. En el nostre sistema, tres grups de classificadors estan entrenats per diferents subobjectius i les etiquetes predites d'aquests classificadors de base estan combinades a través de tres pas de votació per fer la predicció final. Es destaquen detalls efectius per desenvolupar classificadors de base.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös kirjeldame meie hierarhilist ansambli süsteemi, mis on loodud SemEval-2019 ülesande3 EmoContext jaoks. Meie süsteemis koolitatakse kolme klassifitseerijate komplekti erinevate alameesmärkide jaoks ja nende baasklassifikaatorite prognoositavad märgid kombineeritakse kolme hääletamise etapi kaudu, et teha lõplik prognoos. Tõstetakse esile tõhusad üksikasjad baasklassifikaatorite väljatöötamiseks.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku popisujeme náš hierarchický souborový systém navržený pro úlohu SemEval-2019, EmoContext. V našem systému jsou tři sady klasifikátorů trénovány pro různé dílčí cíle a předpokládané štítky těchto základních klasifikátorů jsou kombinovány třemi kroky hlasování, aby byla konečná predikce. Jsou zdůrazněny účinné podrobnosti pro vývoj základních klasifikátorů.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvailemme hierarkkista ryhmäjärjestelmäämme, joka on suunniteltu SemEval-2019 tehtävää3, EmoContext. Järjestelmässämme koulutetaan kolme luokitussarjaa eri alitavoitteille ja näiden perusluokitusten ennustetut merkinnät yhdistetään kolmen äänestysvaiheen avulla lopullisen ennusteen tekemiseksi. Korostetaan tehokkaita yksityiskohtia perusluokittelijoiden kehittämiseksi.', 'jv': 'Nan pepulan iki, kita rambaran sistem ensembedle awak dhéwé nggawe sistem kebutuhan kanggo kelompok semi-2011 task3, emuo context. Awak dhéwé sistem punika, telu akeh sing luwih akeh perusahaan kanggo sekondirno apat-Tarjamahan lan alam sing urwego nggawe barang dhéwé email-custom-header-Security', 'he': 'In this paper, we describe our hierarchical ensemble system designed for the SemEval-2019 task3, EmoContext.  במערכת שלנו, שלושה קבוצות של קלאסיפורים מאומנים לתי-מטרות שונות והתוויות הנצפויות של קלאסיפורים הבסיסיים האלה משולבות דרך שלושה צעדים של הצבעה כדי לעשות את החזוי הסופי. פרטים יעילים לפיתוח מסווגים בסיסיים מודגישים.', 'ha': 'Ga wannan takardan, muna bayyana tsarin da aka yi wa SemEl-2019 task3, EmoContent. A cikin aikin mu, an karanta fasalar uku na fasalar wa masu basu-goani, kuma an haɗa alama masu basĩri da aka ƙayyade shi cikin hanyoyinmu na daban uku-dabam domin ya kai ga bayani na ƙarshen. An ƙayyade kinai masu Effective wa masu motsari danne-danne-danne.', 'sk': 'V prispevku opisujemo naš hierarhični sistem ansamblov, zasnovan za nalogo SemEval-20193, EmoContext. V našem sistemu se trije sklopi klasifikatorjev usposabljajo za različne podcilje in predvidene oznake teh osnovnih klasifikatorjev združujejo skozi tri korake glasovanja, da se naredi končna napoved. Poudarjene so učinkovite podrobnosti za razvoj osnovnih klasifikatorjev.', 'bo': 'འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་དབུས་ཡུལ་གྱི་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་མ་ལག་ཆ་དེ་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པ་ལྟར་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། In our system, three sets of classifiers are trained for different sub-targets and the predicted labels of these base classifiers are combined through three steps of voting to make the final prediction. ནུས་པ་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་ལ་གསལ་བཤད་མང་ཙམ་ཞིག་བཀོད་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'TokyoTech_NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Emotion-related Symbols in Emotion Detection', 'ar': 'TokyoTech_NLP في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: الرموز المتعلقة بالعاطفة في اكتشاف المشاعر', 'fr': 'TokyoTech_NLP à SemEval-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Symboles liés aux émotions dans la détection des émotions', 'es': 'Tokyotech_NLP en Semeval-2019 Tarea 3: Símbolos relacionados con las emociones en la detección de emociones', 'pt': 'TokyoTech_NLP na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Símbolos relacionados à emoção na detecção de emoções', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のTokyoTech_NLPタスク3 ：感情検出における感情関連のシンボル', 'zh': 'TokyoTech_NLPÕ£©SemEval-20193:µāģµŻĆńøĖÕģ│ń¼”ÕÅĘ', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 3 पर TokyoTech_NLP: भावना का पता लगाने में भावना से संबंधित प्रतीक', 'ru': 'TokyoTech_NLP на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Символы, связанные с эмоциями, в обнаружении эмоций', 'ga': 'TokyoTech_NLP ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Siombailí a bhaineann le Mothúchán i mBraith Mothúchán', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Σύμβολα σχετιζόμενα με συναισθήματα στην ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων', 'hu': 'TokyoTech_NLP a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: Érzelmi szimbólumok az érzelmek felismerésében', 'it': 'TokyoTech_NLP a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Simboli legati alle emozioni nella rilevazione delle emozioni', 'kk': 'TokyoTech_ NLP жарым- 2019 тапсырмасының 3- тапсырмасы: күй белгілерді анықтау үшін күй белгілерімен байланысты символдар', 'mk': 'TokyoTech_NLP на SemEval-2019 задача 3: Симболи поврзани со емоциите во детекција на емоции', 'lt': 'TokyoTech_NLP per SemEval-2019 3 užduotis: su emocijomis susiję simboliai emocijos nustatymo srityje', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3: Emotion-related Symbols in Emotion Detection', 'mn': 'TokyoTech_NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Emotion Detection in Emotion-related Symbols', 'ms': 'TokyoTech_NLP di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Simbol berkaitan emosi dalam pengesan emosi', 'mt': 'TokyoTech_NLP f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 3: Simboli relatati mal-emozzjonijiet fl-iskoperta tal-emozzjonijiet', 'no': 'TokyoTech_NLP ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3: Emotionar-relaterte symboler i følelsesoppdaging', 'pl': 'TokyoTech_NLP w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Symbole związane z emocjami w wykrywaniu emocji', 'ro': 'TokyoTech_NLP la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Simboluri legate de emoții în detectarea emoțiilor', 'sr': 'TokyoTech_NLP na semiEval-2019 Task 3: Simboli povezani s emocijama u detekciji emocija', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'TokyoTech_NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Emotion-related Symbols in Emotion Detection', 'sv': 'TokyoTech_NLP på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Emotionsrelaterade symboler i känslodetektering', 'ur': 'ٹوکیوٹک_NLP سیمیوئل-2019 ٹاکس ۳: ایموٹیون شناسیٹ میں ایموٹیون رابطہ والی نشانیاں', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 3: உணர்வு தொடர்புடைய குறியீடுகள் உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பில்', 'uz': 'Task 3: Emotion related Symbols in Emotion Detection', 'vi': 'TokyoTechuNLP at SemEvl-209 Task 3: Emotion-related Symbols in Emotion trinh sát', 'nl': 'TokyoTech_NLP bij SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Emotie-gerelateerde symbolen in emotie detectie', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Емоционални символи в откриването на емоции', 'da': 'TokyoTech_NLP på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Følelsesrelaterede symboler i følelsesdetektion', 'de': 'TokyoTech_NLP bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Emotionsbezogene Symbole in der Emotionserkennung', 'hr': 'TokyoTech_NLP na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: Simboli povezani s emocijama u otkrivanju emocija', 'id': 'TokyoTech_NLP di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Simbol terkait emosi dalam deteksi emosi', 'ko': '도쿄이공대학 NLP가SemEval-2019임무3: 정서검측에서의 정서 관련 기호', 'fa': 'Comment', 'sw': 'TokyoTech_NLP katika SemEval-2019 Task 3: Alama zinazohusiana na hisia za kuhusiana na hisia', 'tr': 'TokyoTech_NLP at SemEval-2019 Görev 3: Emotika tanyşynda metinler', 'af': 'TokyoTech_NLP by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 3: Emosie-verwante simbole in Emosie-Opdekking', 'sq': 'TokyoTech_NLP në SemEval-2019 Task 3: Emotion-related Symbols in Emotion Detection', 'am': 'Tech_NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Emotion-related Symbols in Emotion Detection', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৩-এ টোকিওটেক_এনএলপি: Emotion Detection', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Task 3: Emotion Detection Symbols in Emotion-related Symbols', 'bs': 'TokyoTech_NLP na semiEval-2019 Task 3: Simboli povezani s emocijama u otkrivanju emocija', 'cs': 'TokyoTech_NLP na SemEval-2019 Úkol 3: Emoční symboly v detekci emocí', 'et': 'TokyoTech_NLP SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 3: Emotsioonidega seotud sümbolid emotsioonide tuvastamisel', 'ca': "TokyoTech_NLP a SemEval-2019 tasca 3: Símbols relacionats amb l'emoció en la detecció de l'emoció", 'fi': 'TokyoTech_NLP:ssä SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 3: Tunteisiin liittyvät symbolit tunteiden havaitsemisessa', 'jv': 'Tokyo Tek_NLP at seminval-2011 task 3: emuation-Relative Simulator in emuation detection', 'sk': 'TokyoTech_NLP na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Simboli, povezani s čustvi pri zaznavanju čustev', 'ha': 'TokyoTech_NLP at SemEal-2019 Task 3: Emotion-related Symbols in Emotment Discection', 'he': 'TokyoTech_NLP ב SemEval-2019 משימה 3: סמלים קשורים לרגשות', 'bo': 'TokyoTech_NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Emotion-related Symbols in Emotion Detection'}
{'en': 'This paper presents our contextual emotion detection system in approaching the SemEval2019 shared task 3 : EmoContext : Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. This system cooperates with an emotion detection neural network method (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) embedding, word2vec embedding (Mikolov et al., 2013), and our proposed emoticon and emoji preprocessing method. The experimental results demonstrate the usefulness of our emoticon and emoji prepossessing method, and representations of emoticons and emoji contribute model’s emotion detection.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta nosso sistema de detecção contextual de emoções na abordagem da tarefa compartilhada 3 do SemEval2019: EmoContext: Detecção contextual de emoções em texto. Este sistema coopera com um método de rede neural de detecção de emoção (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) embedding, word2vec embedding (Mikolov et al., 2013) e nosso método proposto de pré-processamento de emoticons e emojis. Os resultados experimentais demonstram a utilidade do nosso método de emoticon e emoji, e as representações de emoticons e emoji contribuem para a detecção de emoções do modelo.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta nuestro sistema de detección de emociones contextuales al abordar la tarea compartida 3 de SemEval2019: EmoContext: Detección de emociones contextuales en el texto. Este sistema coopera con un método de red neuronal de detección de emociones (Poria et al., 2017), incrustación de emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016), incrustación de word2vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) y nuestro método de preprocesamiento de emoticonos y emojis propuesto. Los resultados experimentales demuestran la utilidad de nuestro método de apropiación de emoticonos y emojis, y las representaciones de emoticonos y emojis contribuyen a la detección de emociones del modelo.', 'fr': "Cet article présente notre système de détection des émotions contextuelles dans l'approche de la tâche partagée 3 de SemEval2019\xa0: EmoContext\xa0: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. Ce système coopère avec une méthode de réseau neuronal de détection d'émotions (Poria et al., 2017), l'intégration emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016), l'intégration word2vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) et notre méthode de prétraitement d'émoticônes et d'émojis proposée. Les résultats expérimentaux démontrent l'utilité de notre méthode de prépossession d'émoticônes et d'émoticônes, et les représentations d'émoticônes et d'émoticônes contribuent à la détection des émotions du modèle.", 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة نظام الكشف عن المشاعر السياقية الخاص بنا في التعامل مع المهمة المشتركة 3 في SemEval2019: EmoContext: الكشف عن المشاعر السياقية في النص. يتعاون هذا النظام مع طريقة الشبكة العصبية لاكتشاف المشاعر (Poria et al. ، 2017) ، وتضمين emoji2vec (Eisner وآخرون ، 2016) ، وتضمين word2vec (Mikolov وآخرون ، 2013) ، وطريقة المعالجة المسبقة للرموز التعبيرية المقترحة. توضح النتائج التجريبية فائدة طريقة امتلاك الرموز التعبيرية والرموز التعبيرية ، كما تساهم تمثيلات الرموز والرموز التعبيرية في اكتشاف عواطف النموذج.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2019共有タスク3: EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Textへのアプローチにおけるコンテキスト感情検出システムについて紹介する。本システムは、感情検出ニューラルネットワーク法（ Poria et al., 2017 ）、emoji 2 vec （ Eisner et al., 2016 ）、word 2 vec embedding （ Mikolov et al., 2013 ）、および提唱された絵文字と絵文字の前処理法と協力している。実験結果は、私たちの絵文字と絵文字の前置法の有用性を示し、絵文字と絵文字の表現はモデルの感情検出に貢献します。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval2019 साझा कार्य 3: EmoContext: पाठ में प्रासंगिक भावना का पता लगाने के दृष्टिकोण में हमारी प्रासंगिक भावना का पता लगाने प्रणाली प्रस्तुत करता है। यह प्रणाली एक भावना का पता लगाने तंत्रिका नेटवर्क विधि (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) एम्बेडिंग, word2vec एम्बेडिंग (Mikolov et al., 2013), और हमारे प्रस्तावित इमोटिकॉन और इमोजी प्रीप्रोसेसिंग विधि के साथ सहयोग करती है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम हमारे इमोटिकॉन और इमोजी prepossessing विधि की उपयोगिता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं, और इमोटिकॉन्स और इमोजी के प्रतिनिधित्व मॉडल की भावना का पता लगाने में योगदान करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлена наша система контекстного обнаружения эмоций при подходе к совместной задаче 3 SemEval2019: EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. Эта система сотрудничает с методом нейронной сети обнаружения эмоций (Poria et al., 2017), внедрением emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016), внедрением word2vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) и предлагаемым нами методом предварительной обработки эмоций и эмодзи. Экспериментальные результаты демонстрируют полезность нашего метода предсказания эмотиконов и эмодзи, а представления эмотиконов и эмодзи способствуют обнаружению эмоций в модели.', 'zh': '本文介于近SemEval2019共享其务3:EmoContext文本之上下文情检其上下文情检其统。 其统与情检神经网络法(Poria等,2017),emoji2vec(Eisner等,2016)嵌,word2vec嵌(Mikolov等,2013)及所发表情符号与表情符号预处理法合。 实验验吾表情符号表情符号前置之实用性,表情符号表情符号之情检也。', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair ár gcóras braite mothúcháin comhthéacsúla agus muid ag druidim le tasc comhroinnte SemEval2019 3: EmoContext: Brath Mothúchán Comhthéacsúla sa Téacs. Comhoibríonn an córas seo le modh líonra néarúil braite mothúcháin (Poria et al., 2017), leabú emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016), leabú word2vec (Mikolov et al., 2013), agus ár modh réamhphróiseála straoiseog agus emoji molta. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha a úsáidí atá ár modh réamhshealbhaithe straoiseog agus emoji, agus cuireann léirithe straoiseoga agus emoji le braite mothúcháin na samhla.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja kontextuális érzelemfelismerő rendszerünket a SemEval2019 megosztott feladatának 3. közelében: EmoContent: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. Ez a rendszer együttműködik egy érzelemdetektáló neurális hálózati módszerrel (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016), word2vec beágyazással (Mikolov et al., 2013), valamint javasolt emoticon és emoji előfeldolgozási módszerünkkel. A kísérleti eredmények bemutatják az emoticon és emoji előkészítési módszerünk hasznosságát, az emoticon és emoji reprezentációk pedig hozzájárulnak a modell érzelmek felismeréséhez.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει το σύστημα ανίχνευσης συναισθημάτων στο πλαίσιο της προσέγγισης της κοινής εργασίας 3: Περιεχόμενο: Ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων στο κείμενο. Το σύστημα αυτό συνεργάζεται με τη μέθοδο νευρωνικού δικτύου ανίχνευσης συναισθημάτων (Πορία κ.α., 2017), την ενσωμάτωση και την προτεινόμενη μέθοδο προεπεξεργασίας emoticons και emoticons. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα καταδεικνύουν τη χρησιμότητα της μεθόδου προεπισκόπησης και των αναπαραστάσεων των και συμβάλλουν στην ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων του μοντέλου.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი ჩვენი კონტექსტური ემოციონის განახლების სისტემა სამუშაოდ SemEval2019 გარეშე სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო და ეს სისტემა იმუშაობს ემოციონის განახლების ნეიროლური ქსელის მეტისთვის (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) დაყენება, სიტყვები 2vec დაყენება (Mikolov et al., 2013) და ჩვენი წინახულებული ემოციკონის და ემოჯი პრეპროცესი ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები გამოიყენებენ ჩვენი ემოტიკონის და ემოჯიას რესპესუცირების გამოსაყენებელობა, და ემოტიკონის და ემოჯიას რესპეცენტაციები მოდელს ემოციონი', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatoma mūsų kontekstinė emocijų aptikimo sistema artėjant prie bendros užduoties „SemEval2019“ 3: EmoContext: Contextal Emotion Detection in Text. Ši sistema bendradarbiauja su emocijų aptikimo neuralinio tinklo metodu (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) įterpimu, word2vec įterpimu (Mikolov et al., 2013) ir mūsų siūlomu emoticon ir emoji parengiamuoju metodu. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūs ų emotikono ir emodžio prepossesijos metodas yra naudingas, o emotikonų ir emodžio parodymai prisideda prie modelio emocijų aptikimo.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз HalfEval2019 ортақ тапсырмасына жақында көзіміздің көзімізді анықтау жүйесімізді көрсетеді. 3: Көзіміз: Мәтінде контексті көзімізді анықтау жүйесі. Бұл жүйе эмоциялық анықтау невраллық желінің әдісімен (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) ендіру, Word2vec ендіру (Mikolov et al., 2013) және біздің көңіл күй- жайын және emoji преprocessing әдісімізді қолданады. Эмперациялық нәтижелер көңіл күй белгілеріміздің және эмоджиіміздің көңіл белгілеу әдісінің пайдалығын көрсетеді, көңіл белгілері мен эмоджидің түсініктері үлгіле', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta il nostro sistema contestuale di rilevazione delle emozioni nell'affrontare il compito condiviso di SemEval2019 3: EmoContesto: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. Questo sistema collabora con un metodo di rete neurale di rilevamento delle emozioni (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016), embedding word2vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) e il nostro metodo proposto di preelaborazione emoticon ed emoji. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano l'utilità del nostro metodo di pre-ossessing emoticon ed emoji, e le rappresentazioni di emoticon ed emoji contribuiscono al rilevamento delle emozioni del modello.", 'mk': 'Овој весник го претставува нашиот контекстен систем за детекција на емоции приближувајќи се до заедничката задача 3: Емоконтекст: детекција на контекстни емоции во текст. Овој систем соработува со методот на нервна мрежа за детекција на емоции (Poria et al., 2017), емоци2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) вградување, вградување на word2vec (Mikolov et al., 2013), и нашиот предложен метод на препроцес на емоции и емоции. Експерименталните резултати ја демонстрираат корисноста на нашиот метод за преопсесирање на емоционите и емоциите, и претставувањата на емоциите и емоциите придонесуваат за детекција на емоциите на моделот.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d2019 പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്ന ജോലി 3: എമോക്ടെക്സ്റ്റ്: എക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റെന്\u200dറ്റ ഈ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ഒരു വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് രീതിയുമായി സഹകരിക്കുന്നു (പോരിയെറ്റ് അല്\u200d., 2017), ഇമോജി2വെക്ക് (ഈസി പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലം നമ്മുടെ ഇമോജിയുടെയും ഇമോജിയുടെയും പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന രീതിയിലെ ഉപയോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്കും മോഡല', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас SemEval2019 оны хуваалцааны ажил 3: EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text-г ойртоход бидний сэтгэл хөдлөл ойлгох системийг харуулдаг. Энэ систем сэтгэл хөдлөлийн мэдрэлийн тархины сүлжээний арга (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) хамтран ажилладаг, үг 2vec хамтран ажилладаг (Mikolov et al., 2013) болон бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн сэтгэл хөдлөл болон эможи аль-процесс арга. Ингээд туршилтын үр дүнд бидний сэтгэл хөдлөл, эможи хүлээн зөвшөөрүүлэх аргын хэрэгцээг харуулж, сэтгэл хөдлөл, эможийн төсөөлөл загварын сэтгэл хөдлөлийн мэдрэмжүүдийн тухай нэмэгд', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta s-sistema ta’ detezzjoni tal-emozzjonijiet kuntestwali tagħna fl-avviċinament tal-kompitu kondiviż SemEval2019 3: EmoContext: Context Emotion Detection in Text. Din is-sistema tikkoopera ma’ metodu ta’ detezzjoni ta’ emozzjonijiet tan-netwerk newrali (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) inkorporazzjoni, inkorporazzjoni ta’ word2vec (Mikolov et al., 2013), u l-metodu ta’ pproċessar ta’ emoticon u emoji propost tagħna. Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru l-utilità tal-metodu ta’ prepossessjoni tal-emotikoni u l-emoji tagħna, u r-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-emotikoni u l-emoji jikkontribwixxu għad-detezzjoni tal-emozzjonijiet tal-mudell.', 'ms': "Kertas ini memperkenalkan sistem pengesan emosi kontekstual kami dalam mendekati tugas kongsi SemEval2019 3: EmoKontekst: Pengesanan Emosi Konteksual dalam Teks. Sistem ini bekerja sama dengan kaedah pengesan emosi rangkaian saraf (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) memasukkan, memasukkan word2vec (Mikolov et al., 2013), dan kaedah pemprosesan emoticon dan emoji yang kami cadangkan. The experimental results demonstrate the usefulness of our emoticon and emoji prepossessing method, and representations of emoticons and emoji contribute model's emotion detection.", 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono nasz kontekstowy system wykrywania emocji w podejściu do wspólnego zadania SemEval2019 3: EmoKontext: Kontekstowe wykrywanie emocji w tekście. System ten współpracuje z metodą detekcji emocji neuronowej sieci (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) embedding, word2vec embedding (Mikolov et al., 2013) oraz naszą proponowaną metodą wstępnego przetwarzania emotikonów i emoji. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują przydatność naszej metody wstępnego wykrywania emotikonów i emotikonów, a reprezentacje emotikonów i emotikonów przyczyniają się do wykrywania emocji modelu.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser vårt kontekstiske emosjonsoppdagingssystem i nærming av semiEval2019 delt oppgåve 3: EmoContext: Kontekstoppdaging av emosjonsoppdaging i tekst. Denne system et samarbeider med ein følelsesoppdagingsneuralnettverksmetode (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) innebygging, ord2vec innebygging (Mikolov et al., 2013) og vår foreslått følelsessesjonsmetode og emoji. Den eksperimentelle resultatene demonstrerer korleis vår emotikon og emoji preposserer metoden, og representasjonane av emotikon og emoji bidrar til å oppdaga emosjonar i modellen.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă sistemul nostru contextual de detectare a emoțiilor în abordarea sarcinii comune SemEval2019 3: EmoConținut: Detectarea emoțiilor contextuale în text. Acest sistem cooperează cu o metodă de detectare a emoțiilor neuronale (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016), încorporare word2vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) și metoda noastră propusă de pre-procesare emoticon și emoji. Rezultatele experimentale demonstrează utilitatea metodei noastre de precossesare a emoticoanelor și emoji, iar reprezentările emoticoanelor și emoji contribuie la detectarea emoțiilor modelului.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja naš sistem detekcije emocija u približavanju SemEval2019 zajedničkog zadatka 3: EmoContext: Kontekstualno detekcije emocija u tekstu. Ovaj sistem sarađuje sa metodom neuralne mreže emocija (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) ugrađenjem, rečenom 2vec ugrađenjem (Mikolov et al., 2013) i našim predloženim metodom predobrađivanja emotikona i emoji. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju korisnost našeg emotikone i emoji prepoznavajućeg metoda, i predstavljanja emotikona i emoji doprinose modelu otkrivanju emocija.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ සම්බන්ධ භාවිතාව හොයාගන්න පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධ වැඩසටහන් වැඩසටහන් 3: EmoContextal: Contextal Emotion Detection in Text. මේ පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා හැඟීමක් හොයාගන්න න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය විධානය (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2Vec (Aisler et al., 2016) සංවිධානය, word2Vec සංවිධානය (Miolov et al., 2013), සහ අපේ ප්\u200dරත පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා අපේ භාවිත්වය සහ එමෝජි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය, සහ භාවිත්වය සහ එම', 'so': "Warqaddan wuxuu soo bandhigaa nidaamka aqoonsashada xiliga ah ee ku soo dhowaanaya shaqada SemEval2019 3: EmoContext: Digitaanka ku qoran qoraalka. Sirkan ayaa la wadaajinaya qaab aad u aragto neural network (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) oo uu ku hoggaamiyo, word2vec embedding (Mikolov et al., 2013) iyo qaababkayaga la soo jeeday fikrada iyo emoji preprocessing. arimaha imtixaanka waxaa muujiya faa'iidada fikradeena iyo emojiga iyo qaababka aad u leedahay, aragtida fikrada iyo emoji waxay ka qayb galaan aragtida fikrada.", 'ta': 'SemEval2019 பகிர்ந்த பணியை நெருங்கும் பொழுது இந்த தாள் எங்கள் தற்போதைய உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பு அமைப்பை கூட்டுகிறது. பொருள் உள்ளமை: உரையில This system cooperates with an emotion detection neural network method (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) embedding, word2vec embedding (Mikolov et al., 2013), and our proposed emoticon and emoji preprocessing method.  சோதனை முடிவு', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar v疇rt kontextuella k瓣nslodetekteringssystem f繹r att n瓣rma sig SemEval2019 delade uppgift 3: EmoContent: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. Detta system samarbetar med en emotion detection neural n瓣tverksmetod (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) inb瓣ddning, word2vec inb瓣ddning (Mikolov et al., 2013) och v疇r f繹reslagna emoticon och emoji f繹rbehandling metod. De experimentella resultaten visar anv瓣ndbarheten av v疇r emoticon- och emoji-metod, och representationer av emoticons och emoji bidrar till modellens k瓣nslodetektering.', 'ur': 'This paper presents our contextual emotional detection system in approaching the SemEval2019 shared task 3: EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. This system cooperates with an emotion al detection neural network method (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) embedding, word2vec embedding (Mikolov et al., 2013), and our proposed emoticon and emoji preprocessing method. آزمائش کے نتیجے ہمارے احساسات اور emoji کی استفاده کرنے کے مطابق دکھاتے ہیں، اور احساسات اور emoji کی تصاویرات موڈل کی احساسات شناسایی کے ذریعہ اضافہ کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz SemEval2019 bilan birlashtirilgan vazifa 3: EmoContext: Matnning Context Emotion Detection. Bu tizim hissiyot nazar tarmoqni aniqlash usuli (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) bilan ishlab chiqaradi, soʻzni 2vek (Mikolov et al., 2013) va yaxshi hisob va emoji preprocessing usuli bilan ishlab chiqaradi. The experimental results demonstrate the usefulness of our emoticon and emoji prepossessing method, and representations of emoticons and emoji contribute model's emotion detection.", 'vi': 'Bài báo này trình bày hệ thống phát hiện cảm xúc ngữ cảnh của chúng ta khi tiếp cận nhiệm vụ chia sẻ SemEvul23: Tình huống: Phát hiện cảm chung trong Văn bản. Hệ thống này hợp tác với một phương pháp dò tìm cảm xúc hệ thần kinh (Poria et al., thẩm tê 7), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., thẩm tê tê 6) embedding, Từ Nghĩa 2vec (Mikolomv et al., 203) và phương pháp xử lý miễn phí của chúng ta. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy s ự hữu dụng của phương pháp tấn công hưng phấn và biểu tượng của biểu tượng biểu tượng và biểu tượng biểu hiện cảm xúc của mô hình.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя нашата контекстуална система за откриване на емоции при подхода към споделената задача 3: Емоконтекс: Контекстуално откриване на емоции в текст. Тази система си сътрудничи с метод на невронна мрежа за откриване на емоции (Пория и др., 2017), вграждане на емоджи2век (Ейснер и др., 2016), вграждане на word2vec (Миколов и др., 2013), както и нашия предложен метод за предварително обработка на емотикони и емоджи. Експерименталните резултати демонстрират полезността на метода ни за предпосесиране на емотикони и емоджи, а представянето на емотикони и емоджи допринася за откриването на емоции на модела.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja naš sustav otkrivanja emocija u približavanju semiEval2019 zajedničkog zadatka 3: EmoContext: Kontekstno otkrivanje emocija u tekstu. Ovaj sustav surađuje s metodom neuralne mreže emocija (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) ugrađivanjem, ugrađivanjem rečenica 2vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) i našem predloženom metodom predobrazovanja emotikona i emoji. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju korisnost naše emotike i emoji prepoznavajuće metode, i predstavljanja emotike i emoji doprinose otkrivanju emocija modela.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer vores kontekstuelle følelsesdetekteringssystem i nærmelsen af SemEval2019 delte opgave 3: EmoContent: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. Dette system samarbejder med en følelsesdetektion neural netværksmetode (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) embedding, word2vec embedding (Mikolov et al., 2013), og vores foreslåede emoticon og emoji forbehandling metode. De eksperimentelle resultater viser nytten af vores humørikon og emoji pre-ossessing metode, og repræsentationer af humørikoner og emoji bidrager med modellens følelsesdetektion.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert ons contextuele emotie detectie systeem bij het benaderen van de SemEval2019 gedeelde taak 3: EmoContext: Contextuele emotie detectie in tekst. Dit systeem werkt samen met een neurale netwerkmethode (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) embedding, word2vec embedding (Mikolov et al., 2013), en onze voorgestelde emoticon en emoji preprocessing methode. De experimentele resultaten tonen het nut van onze emoticon en emoji preossessing methode aan, en representaties van emoticons en emoji dragen bij aan de emotie detectie van het model.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag stellt unser kontextuelles Emotionserkennungssystem vor, um die gemeinsame SemEval2019 Aufgabe 3: EmoKontext: Kontextuelle Emotionserkennung im Text anzugehen. Dieses System arbeitet mit einer Emotionserkennungsmethode (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) Einbettung, word2vec Einbettung (Mikolov et al., 2013) und unserer vorgeschlagenen Emoticon- und Emoji-Vorverarbeitung Methode zusammen. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen die Nützlichkeit unserer Emoticon- und Emoji-Preossess-Methode, und Darstellungen von Emoticons und Emoji tragen zur Emotionserkennung des Modells bei.', 'id': 'Kertas ini memperlihatkan sistem deteksi emosi kontekstual kita dalam mendekati tugas berbagi SemEval2019 3: EmoContext: Deteksi Emosi Konteksual dalam Teks. This system cooperates with an emotion detection neural network method (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) embedding, word2vec embedding (Mikolov et al., 2013), and our proposed emoticon and emoji preprocessing method.  Hasil percobaan menunjukkan kebaikan dari metode memposisi emotikon dan emoji kita, dan representation emotikon dan emoji berkontribusi deteksi emosi model.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval2019 공유 임무 3:EmoContext: 텍스트의 상하문 감정 검측에 접근하기 위해 우리의 상하문 감정 검측 시스템을 소개했다.이 시스템은 정서 감지 신경 네트워크 방법(Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec(Eisner et al., 2016) 삽입, word2vec 삽입(Mikolov et al., 2013) 및 우리가 제시한 표정과 표정 예처리 방법과 어울린다.실험 결과는 우리의 표정과 이모티콘 전치 방법의 유효성을 증명했고 이모티콘과 이모티콘의 표시는 모델의 감정 검측에 도움이 되었다.', 'tr': 'Bu käze SemEval2019-iň ýakynda biziň duýgyşymyzy tanyş sistemimizi 3: EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text ýaly tanyýar. Bu sistem duýgyş tanyşyk netijesi bilen birleşýär (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) embedding, word2vec embedding (Mikolov et al., 2013), we biziň teklip eden emotikon we emoji öňden işleýän yöntemimiz. Deneysel netijeler duygymyzyň we emoji tanyş yöntemimiziň ulanylygyny görkezýär, we emotiklerin we emoji örnekleriniň nusgalarynyň duyglaryny tanyşmagyna kömekleýär.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaonyesha mfumo wetu wa kutambua hisia za wakati wa kufikia kazi ya SemEval2019 ilishirikishwa na kazi 3: EmoContext: Utafiti wa Matumizi ya Kimataifa kwa Kitaarifa. This system cooperates with an emotion detection neural network method (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) embedding, word2vec embedding (Mikolov et al., 2013), and our proposed emoticon and emoji preprocessing method.  Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha umuhimu wa hisia zetu na hisia zetu unaohusika, na uwakilizaji wa hisia na hisia zinachangia uchunguzi wa hisia.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم شناسایی احساسات محیط ما را در نزدیک کار تقسیم کردن نیم Eval2019 مشترک ۳: EmoContext: شناسایی احساسات محیط در متن نشان می دهد. این سیستم با روش شبکه عصبی شناسایی احساسات (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) همکاری می\u200cکند، ابتدایی کلمه 2vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) و روش پیش\u200cپردازی عصبی و emoji پیشنهاد ما. نتیجه\u200cهای آزمایشی، کاربردی از روش آزمایش احساسات و emoji ما را نشان می\u200cدهد، و نمایش\u200cهای احساسات و emoji، نشان\u200cدهندگان احساسات مدل را توصیف می\u200cکنند.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel ons contextual emosie beskrywing stelsel in die toegang van die semiEval2019 gedeelde taak 3: EmoContext: Konteksual Emotie beskrywing in Teks. Hierdie stelsel saamstig met 'n emosie-opdekking neuralnetwerk metode (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) inbêding, woord2vec inbêding (Mikolov et al., 2013), en ons voorgestelde emotikon en emoji voorafwerking metode. Die eksperimentele resultate vertoon die gebruikerheid van ons emotikon en emoji herbesondering metode, en voorstellings van emotikone en emoji bydra die model se emosie-opdekking.", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የሴmEval2019 ሥርዓት 3: EmoContext: Context Emotion Detection in Text. ይህም ስርዓት የነዌብ መረብ ዘዴ (Poria et al., 2017)፣ emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) ሲገባ፣ word2vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) እና በተዘጋጀው የemoticon እና emoji preprocessing method ነው፡፡ በተፈተናው ውጤቶች የስሜት እና የኢሜጂ አካባቢ ጥቅም እና የስሜት አካባቢዎች እና emoji የሞክራዊ አካባቢ ማሳየትን የሚያሳየው፡፡', 'hy': "Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է մեր կոնտեքստային զգացմունքների հայտնաբերման համակարգը' մոտենալով 2019-ի կիսված հանձնարարությանը' 3. Այս համակարգը համագործակցում է զգացմունքների հայտնաբերման նյարդային ցանցի մեթոդի (Porya et al., 2017), էմոյ2վիկի (Էյսներ et al., 2016) ներառման, բառերի 2վիկի ներառման (Միկոլով et al., 2013) և մեր առաջարկած էմոտիկոնի և էմոյի նախագործման մեթոդի հետ: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս մեր էմոտիկոնի և էմոզի նախասեղման մեթոդի օգտակարությունը, և էմոտիկոնների և էմոզի ներկայացումները ներդրում են մոդելի զգացմունքների հայտնաբերումը:", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল২০১৯-এর কাছাকাছি পৌঁছানোর সময় আমাদের বর্তমান অনুভূতি সনাক্ত ব্যবস্থা উপস্থাপন করেছে: ইমোকেন্ট: লেখায় বিদ্যমান Em এই সিস্টেম আবিষ্কারের নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক পদ্ধতির সাথে সহযোগিতা করছে (পোরিয়া নেটওয়ার্ক মাধ্যমে ২০১৭), ইমোজি২ভেক (ঈসেনার এন্ট এল., ২০১৬) যোগাযোগ করেছে, শব্দ ২ভেক বিভিন্ন প্রয পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করে আমাদের আবেগ এবং ইমোজির পূর্ববর্তী পদ্ধতি এবং মনোভাব এবং emojiের প্রতিনিধি মডেলের আবেগ আবিষ্কার করার প্রয়োজন।', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja naš sistem detekcije emocija u približavanju SemEval2019 zajedničkog zadatka 3: EmoContext: Kontekstualno detekcije emocija u tekstu. Ovaj sistem sarađuje sa metodom neuralne mreže emocija (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) ugrađenjem, ugrađenjem rečenica 2vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) i našim predloženim metodom predobrazovanja emotikona i emoji. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju korisnost naše emotike i emoji prepoznavajuće metode, i predstavljanja emotike i emoji doprinose otkrivanju emocija modela.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt SemEval2019 paylaşılan iş 3: EmoContext: Kontekst Emotion Detection in Text yaxınlaşdığımızı göstərir. Bu sistem duygusal keşif nöral ağ metodları ilə birləşdirir (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) inşa edilməsi, sözləri 2vec inşa edilməsi (Mikolov et al., 2013) və bizim təklif etdiyimiz emotikon və emoji preprocessing metodları ilə birləşdirir. Eksperiment sonuçları emotikon və emoji təşkil etmə metodlarının faydalanılığını göstərir, emotikon və emoji təşkillərinin modelinin emosiyalarının keşfetməsini kömək edir.', 'ca': "Aquest article presenta el nostre sistema contextual de detecció d'emocions en aproximació a la tasca compartida SemEval2019 3: EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. Aquest sistema coopera amb un mètode de detecció emocional de la xarxa neural (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) incorporant, incorporant word2vec (Mikolov et al., 2013), i el nostre mètode de preprocessió emoticon i emoji proposat. Els resultats experimental s demostren l'utilitat del nostre mètode de prepossessió emotònica i emoji, i representacions d'emotòniques i emoji contribueixen a la detecció emocional del model.", 'fi': 'Tﾃ､mﾃ､ artikkeli esittelee kontekstuaalisen tunteentunnistusjﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､n lﾃ､hestyessﾃ､ SemEval2019 jaettua tehtﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､ 3: EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text. Tﾃ､mﾃ､ jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ toimii yhteistyﾃｶssﾃ､ emoticon- ja emoji-esiprosessointimenetelmﾃ､n (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016), word2vec-upotuksen (Mikolov et al., 2013) ja ehdotetun emoticon- ja emoji-esiprosessointimenetelmﾃ､n kanssa. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat hymiﾃｶiden ja emojien esipainatusmenetelmﾃ､mme hyﾃｶdyllisyyden, ja hymiﾃｶiden ja emojien representaatiot edistﾃ､vﾃ､t mallin tunteiden havaitsemista.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis tutvustatakse meie konteksti emotsioonide tuvastamise süsteemi lähenemisel SemEval2019 jagatud ülesandele 3: Emokontekst: konteksti emotsioonide tuvastamine tekstis. See süsteem teeb koostööd emotsioonide tuvastamise neurovõrgu meetodiga (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) manustamise, word2vec manustamise (Mikolov et al., 2013) ning meie pakutud emotikoni ja emoji eeltöötlusmeetodiga. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad meie emotikonide ja emojide eelpossessimise meetodi kasulikkust ning emotikonide ja emojide esitused aitavad kaasa mudeli emotsioonide tuvastamisele.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje náš kontextový detekční systém emocí při přístupu ke sdílenému úkolu SemEval2019 3: EmoKontext: Kontextová detekce emocí v textu. Tento systém spolupracuje s metodou neuronové sítě detekce emocí (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) embedding, word2vec embedding (Mikolov et al., 2013) a naší navrhovanou metodou předzpracování emotikonů a emotikonů. Experimentální výsledky demonstrují užitečnost naší metody předběžného vytváření emotikonů a emotikonů a emotikonů přispívají k detekci emocí modelu.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet sistemin tonë kontekstual të zbulimit të emocioneve në afrimin e detyrës së përbashkët SemEval2019 3: EmoKontekst: zbulimi kontekstual i emocioneve në tekst. Ky sistem bashkëpunon me një metodë të zbulimit të emocioneve në rrjetin nervor (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) duke përfshirë, përfshirë word2vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) dhe metodën tonë të propozuar për përprocesimin e emoticon ëve dhe emoji. Rezultatet eksperimentale demonstrojnë dobinë e metodës sonë të përcaktimit të emotikonit dhe emoxhit dhe përfaqësimet e emoçonit dhe emoxhit kontribuojnë për zbulimin e emocioneve të modelit.', 'jv': 'Ngetong iki soko sistem Panjenengan langgambar contextual Sistem iki soko nggunakae karo nthasakno detection Neral network method (Port ia et al.), emuji2vec (Ayser et al.), embedding, word2vec embedding (mikolv et al.2013), karo awak dhéwé gawe mungkahin lan emuji pretracing method. Ndoleh sing paling nggambar uwong nêmên anyar tentang ning awak dhéwé éné awak dhéwé karo nggambar kuwi éwé, lan gambar kuwi cara-cara anyar tentang karo éwé éntuk sing ngerasakno modèl.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljen naš kontekstualni sistem za zaznavanje čustev pri pristopu k skupni nalogi 3 SemEval2019: Emokontekst: kontekstualno zaznavanje čustev v besedilu. Ta sistem sodeluje z metodo nevronskega omrežja za zaznavanje čustev (Poria et al., 2017), vdelavo emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016), vdelavo word2vec (Mikolov et al., 2013) in našo predlagano metodo predobdelave emotikon in emoji. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo uporabnost naše metode predossessiranja emotikonov in emojijev, reprezentacije emotikonov in emojijev pa prispevajo k zaznavanju čustev modela.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bãyar da kayan gane na'urar hisãbi da ke kusantar da aikin da aka raba shi 3: EmoContent: Continuous Emission in Text. Wannan na'ura yana samarari da wani na'urar gane na'urar wato neural (Poria et al., 2017), emji2vc (Esner et al., 2016) idan an embedded, word2vc embedding (Micolovo et al., 2013), da kuma zaɓen aikin da aka buƙata hanyoyin hisoyi da jiji. Matarin jarrabai sun nuna amfani da shiryoyin ayukanmu na fikokin da za'a ƙunsa, kuma masu halayyar da matsayin ayoyoyi da hisoyi sun ƙara bayani ga misalin ayuka.", 'he': "This paper presents our contextual emotion detection system in approaching the SemEval2019 shared task 3: EmoContext: Contextual Emotion Detection in Text.  המערכת הזאת שותפת פעולה עם שיטת גילוי רגשות רשת עצבית (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) תוכנית, תוכנית word2vec (Mikolov et al., 2013), ושיטת ההתקדמות המוצעת שלנו emoticon and emoji. התוצאות הניסיוניים מראות את השימוש של שיטת ההימוטיקון והאמוג'י שלנו, והייצוגים של האימוטיקונים והאמוג'י תורמים בזיהוי הרגשות של המודל.", 'bo': "ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་མཚམས་རྟོགས་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་མཚམས་འཇོག་སྟེ། SemEval2019 མཉམ་དུ་བསྒྲགས་ལས་ཀྱི་ཚོགས་ལྡན་དེ་: Em This system cooperates with an emotion detection neural network method (Poria et al., 2017), emoji2vec (Eisner et al., 2016) embedding, word2vec embedding (Mikolov et al., 2013), and our proposed emoticon and emoji preprocessing method. experimental results demonstrate the usefulness of our emoji and emoji preposition method, and representations of emoticon s and emoji contribute to the model's emotion detection."}
{'en': 'UAIC at SemEval-2019 Task 3 : Extracting Much from Little', 'ar': 'UAIC في SemEval-2019 المهمة 3: استخراج الكثير من القليل', 'es': 'La UAIC en la Tarea 3 de SemEval-2019: Extraer mucho de poco', 'fr': "L'UAIC au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 3\xa0: Extraire une grande partie de Little", 'pt': 'UAIC no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 3: Extraindo muito do pouco', 'ja': 'UAIC at SemEval -2019 Task 3: Littleから多くを抽出する', 'zh': 'UAIC在SemEval-2019务3:少多取', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 3 पर UAIC: थोड़ा से बहुत कुछ निकालना', 'ru': 'UAIC на SemEval-2019 Задача 3: Извлечение много из Little', 'ga': 'UAIC ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 3: Ag Baint Go leor as Beag', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εργασία 3: Εκχύλισμα πολλών από τα ελάχιστα', 'hu': 'UAIC a SemEval-2019 3. feladat: Sok mindent kivonni a kicsiből', 'it': 'UAIC a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Estrarre molto da poco', 'lt': 'UAIC 2010–2019 m. pusėje 3 užduotis: daug ištraukti iš mažo', 'kk': 'UAIC 3- тапсырмасы: Кішкентай тапсырманы тарқату', 'mk': 'UAIC на SemEval-2019 задача 3: извлекување многу од мало', 'ms': 'UAIC di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Mengekstrak Banyak dari Kecil', 'mt': 'UAIC f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 3: Estrazzjoni ta’ Ħafna minn Żgħir', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 3-ല്\u200d UAIC: ചെറിയ കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്താക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'UAIC-ын SemEval-2019 ажил 3: Бага зэрэг олон зүйлийг', 'no': 'UAIC på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 3: Ekstrar mykje frå liten', 'pl': 'UAIC na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 3: Wydobycie wiele z małego', 'ro': 'UAIC la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 3: Extragerea mult din puțin', 'sr': 'UAIC na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: izvlaèenje mnogo iz Malog', 'si': 'UAIC සම්වේල්-2019 වැඩ 3: පුංචි වලින් ගොඩක් පිළිගන්න', 'so': 'UAIC at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Extracting badan from Little', 'sv': 'UAIC på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 3: Att extrahera mycket från lite', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019ல் UAIC பணி 3: சிறிய இருந்து மிகவும் பெரிதாக்கப்படுகிறது', 'ur': 'UAIC سیم Eval-2019 ٹاکس 3 میں: چھوٹی سے بہت اٹھا رہا ہے', 'uz': "Eval- 2019 Vazifani 3: Kichimdan ko'p ajratish", 'vi': 'UAIC ở SemEvl-209 Task 3: rút nhiều từ giảm lượng nhỏ', 'da': 'UAIC på SemEval-2019 Opgave 3: Udtrække meget fra lidt', 'hr': 'UAIC na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: izvlačenje mnogo iz malog', 'bg': 'Задача 3: Извличане на много от малко', 'nl': 'UAIC op SemEval-2019 Taak 3: Veel uit weinig halen', 'de': 'UAIC bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 3: Viel aus wenig herausholen', 'id': 'UAIC di SemEval-2019 Tugas 3: Mengekstrak Banyak dari Kecil', 'fa': 'UAIC در پایین Eval-2019 کار ۳: اخراج زیادی از کوچک', 'ko': 'UAIC, SemEval-2019년의 작업 3: 사소한 일에서 더 많은 것 얻기', 'sw': 'UAIC katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 3: Kutoa mengi kutoka kidogo', 'tr': 'UAIC at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Köp Kiçijikden Açmak', 'af': 'UAIC by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 3: uitpak baie van Klein', 'sq': 'UAIC në SemEval-2019 Task 3: Extracting Much from Little', 'am': 'አድራሻ 3', 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৯-এর কাজ ৩: ছোট থেকে অনেক বের করা হচ্ছে', 'hy': 'UAIC-ը, 2019-ի "ՍեմԷվալ" 3-րդ հանձնարարում. շատ բան վերցնել փոքրից', 'az': 'UAIC-in SemEval-2019 Task 3: Küçükdən çox çıxarılır', 'bs': 'UAIC na semiEval-2019 zadatak 3: izvlačenje mnogo iz Malog', 'fi': 'UAIC SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 3: Paljon irti pienestä', 'ca': 'UAIC a SemEval-2019 Task 3: Extracting Much from Little', 'cs': 'UAIC na SemEval-2019 Úkol 3: Extrahování hodně z mála', 'et': 'UAIC SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 3: Vähest palju ekstraheerimine', 'jv': 'Name', 'he': 'UAIC ב SemEval-2019 משימה 3: Extracting Much from Little', 'sk': 'UAIC na SemEval-2019 Naloga 3: Izvleči veliko iz malega', 'ha': 'QSystemSemaphore', 'bo': 'UAIC at SemEval-2019 Task 3: Extracting Much from Little'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present a system description for implementing a sentiment analysis agent capable of interpreting the state of an interlocutor engaged in short three message conversations. We present the results and observations of our work and which parts could be further improved in the future.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم وصفًا للنظام لتنفيذ عامل تحليل المشاعر القادر على تفسير حالة المحاور المنخرط في محادثات الرسائل القصيرة الثلاث. نقدم نتائج وملاحظات عملنا والأجزاء التي يمكن تحسينها في المستقبل.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons une description de système pour implémenter un agent d'analyse des sentiments capable d'interpréter l'état d'un interlocuteur engagé dans de courtes conversations à trois messages. Nous présentons les résultats et les observations de nos travaux et les parties qui pourraient encore être améliorées à l'avenir.", 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos una descripción del sistema para implementar un agente de análisis de sentimientos capaz de interpretar el estado de un interlocutor que participa en conversaciones breves de tres mensajes. Presentamos los resultados y las observaciones de nuestro trabajo y qué partes podrían mejorarse aún más en el futuro.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos uma descrição do sistema para implementação de um agente de análise de sentimentos capaz de interpretar o estado de um interlocutor engajado em conversas curtas de três mensagens. Apresentamos os resultados e observações do nosso trabalho e quais partes podem ser melhoradas no futuro.', 'ja': '本稿では、短い3つのメッセージの会話に従事する対話者の状態を解釈できるセンチメント分析エージェントを実装するためのシステム記述を提示する。私たちは、仕事の結果と観察結果、そして今後さらに改善される可能性のある部分を提示します。', 'ru': 'В данной работе представлено системное описание реализации агента анализа настроений, способного интерпретировать состояние собеседника, участвующего в коротких трехсообщениях. Мы представляем результаты и замечания нашей работы, а также информацию о том, какие части можно было бы усовершенствовать в будущем.', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम एक भावना विश्लेषण एजेंट को लागू करने के लिए एक प्रणाली विवरण प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो छोटे तीन संदेश वार्तालापों में लगे एक वार्ताकार की स्थिति की व्याख्या करने में सक्षम है। हम अपने काम के परिणामों और टिप्पणियों को प्रस्तुत करते हैं और भविष्य में किन भागों को और बेहतर बनाया जा सकता है।', 'zh': '本文中,我们出了一个系统描述,所以成情析代,该代理能解释参短三条对话的对话者状。 我们说了我们事情的结果和观察,和那些将来可以改进。', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair cur síos ar an gcóras chun gníomhaire anailíse meon a chur i bhfeidhm atá in ann staid idirghabhálaí atá i mbun comhráite gearra trí theachtaireacht a léiriú. Cuirimid i láthair torthaí agus breathnuithe ár gcuid oibre agus na codanna a d’fhéadfaí a fheabhsú tuilleadh amach anseo.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ამ დომენტში სისტემის გამოსახულება სისტემის გამოსახულება სისტემის ანალიზაციის ადვნენტის გამოყენებაში, რომელიც შეუძლებელია ინტერპლექტორის სტაცია, რომელიც სამი ჩვენ ჩვენი სამუშაო მუშაობის წარმოდგენები და დააჩვენებები და რომელსაც ნაწილები შეიძლება უფრო მეტი გაუკეთება მომავალში.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια περιγραφή συστήματος για την εφαρμογή ενός πράκτορα ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων ικανού να ερμηνεύσει την κατάσταση ενός συνομιλητή που συμμετέχει σε σύντομες συζητήσεις τριών μηνυμάτων. Παρουσιάζουμε τα αποτελέσματα και τις παρατηρήσεις της εργασίας μας και ποια τμήματα θα μπορούσαν να βελτιωθούν περαιτέρω στο μέλλον.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a három rövid üzenetbeszélgetésben részt vevő beszélgetőpartnerek állapotának értelmezésére alkalmas érzelemelemző ügynök megvalósítására szolgáló rendszerleírást. Bemutatjuk munkánk eredményeit és megfigyeléseit, és mely részeket lehetne továbbfejleszteni a jövőben.', 'it': 'In questo articolo, presentiamo una descrizione del sistema per implementare un agente di analisi sentimentale in grado di interpretare lo stato di un interlocutore impegnato in brevi tre conversazioni di messaggio. Presentiamo i risultati e le osservazioni del nostro lavoro e quali parti potrebbero essere ulteriormente migliorate in futuro.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз жүйелік сипаттамасын көрсеткіздік көзі анализ агентін орындау үшін қысқа үш хаттар сұрақтарында орындайтын интерлоктордың күйін түсіндіруге болады. Біз жұмыстың нәтижелерін және қандай бөліктері болашақта жақсартылуы мүмкін.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, претставуваме системски опис за спроведување агент за анализа на чувствата кој е способен да ја интерпретира состојбата на интерлокутор вклучен во кратки три пораки разговори. Ги претставуваме резултатите и набљудувањата на нашата работа и кои делови може да се подобрат понатаму во иднина.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome sistemos aprašymą, skirtą įgyvendinti jausmų analizės agent ą, galintį aiškinti tarpininko būklę, dalyvaujančio trijuose trumpesniuose pranešimų pokalbiuose. Pateikiame savo darbo rezultatus ir pastabas ir kokias dalis ateityje galėtų būti toliau tobulinamos.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan keterangan sistem untuk melaksanakan ejen analisis perasaan yang mampu menerangkan keadaan interlocutor yang terlibat dalam 3 perbualan mesej pendek. Kami memperkenalkan hasil dan pengamatan kerja kami dan bahagian mana yang boleh diperbaiki lebih dalam masa depan.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw deskrizzjoni tas-sistema għall-implimentazzjoni ta’ a ġent tal-analiżi tas-sentimenti li kapaċi jinterpreta l-istat ta’ interlokutur involut f’konverżjonijiet qosra ta’ tliet messaġġi. Aħna nippreżentaw ir-riżultati u l-osservazzjonijiet tax-xogħol tagħna u liema partijiet jistgħu jitjiebu aktar fil-futur.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид мэдрэмжтэй шинжилгээний агентыг дамжуулах системийн тодорхойлолт гаргаж өгдөг. Бид ажлын үр дүнг, ажлын үзэл, ирээдүйд ямар хэсгийг илүү сайжруулах боломжтой вэ?', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, മൂന്നു സന്ദേശങ്ങളുടെ സംസാരത്തില്\u200d അഭിപ്രായം നടപ്പിലാക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്ന ഒരു സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ വിവരണമാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ നമ്മുടെ ജോലിയുടെ ഫലങ്ങളും നോക്കുന്നതും ഭാവിയില്\u200d ഏത് ഭാഗങ്ങളും കൂടുതല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d കഴിയും.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi eit systembeskrivelse for å implementera ein sentimentanalyseagent som kan tolka tilstanden til ein interlocutor som er engasjert i korta tre meldingsstaler. Vi presenterer resultatene og observasjonane av arbeidet vårt og kva deler kan forbetrast i framtiden.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy opis systemu wdrożenia agenta analizy sentymentów zdolnego do interpretacji stanu rozmówcy zaangażowanego w krótkie trzy komunikatowe rozmowy. Przedstawiamy wyniki i obserwacje naszej pracy oraz które części mogą być dalej ulepszone w przyszłości.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare prezentăm o descriere a sistemului pentru implementarea unui agent de analiză a sentimentelor capabil să interpreteze starea unui interlocutor implicat în conversații scurte de trei mesaje. Prezentăm rezultatele și observațiile activității noastre și care părți ar putea fi îmbunătățite în viitor.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo sistemski opis za provedbu agent a za analizu sentimenta sposobnog za interpretaciju stanja interlocutora uključenog u kratke tri poruke. Predstavljamo rezultate i promatranje našeg rada i koje delove bi mogle biti bolje u budućnosti.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි පද්ධතිය විස්තරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂණ නියෝජිතයක් විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරවේශන අපි අපේ වැඩේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d', 'so': 'Warqadan waxaan ku soo qoraynaa tilmaamo nidaamka si a an u sameyno qoraal baaritaanka xisaabta ah oo awoodda in uu turjumo xaaladda qofka macluumaadka ka dhexeeya oo ku qoran saddex hadal gaaban. Waxaynu keennaa fashihiisa iyo aragtida shaqadeeda iyo qaybaha aan ka hormarin karno mustaqbalka.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi en systembeskrivning för att implementera en sentimental analysagent som kan tolka tillståndet hos en samtalspartner som deltar i korta tre meddelandekonversationer. Vi presenterar resultat och observationer av vårt arbete och vilka delar som kan förbättras ytterligare i framtiden.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் சிறிய மூன்று செய்தி உரையாடல்களில் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட ஒரு உணர்வு ஆராய்ச்சி முகவரை செயல்படுத்த முடியும் அம நாங்கள் எங்கள் வேலையின் முடிவுகளையும் பார்வைகளையும் காண்பிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் எது பகுதிகள் எது வரும்', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک سیستم کا سفارش دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک احساس تحلیل اگنٹ کی تعبیر کرنے کے لئے قابل ہے کہ ایک مختلف تین پیغام مکالمانوں میں مشغول ہو سکتا ہے. ہم اپنے کام کے نتیجے اور نظر اندازے پیش کرتے ہیں اور کس قسموں کو آینده میں اضافہ کر سکتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz juda qisqa uch xabarlar bilan bog'liq boshqarish imkoniyatini bajarish uchun foydalanuvchi taʼrif qilamiz. Biz ishimizning natijalarini va taqdimizni hozir qilamiz va kelajakda qanday qismlarni bajarishimiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đưa ra một mô tả hệ thống để thực hiện một người phân tích cảm xúc có khả năng diễn giải tình trạng của người đối tác tham gia trong ba cuộc nói chuyện ngắn. Chúng tôi đưa ra kết quả và quan sát của chúng tôi và những phần nào có thể cải thiện hơn nữa trong tương lai.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме системно описание за внедряване на агент за анализ на сентимента, способен да интерпретира състоянието на събеседник, ангажиран в кратки три разговора с послания. Представяме резултатите и наблюденията на нашата работа и кои части могат да бъдат допълнително подобрени в бъдеще.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo sistemski opis za provedbu agent a za analizu osjećaja sposobnog za tumačenje stanja interlocutora uključenog u kratke tri poruke. Predstavljamo rezultate i promatranje našeg rada i koje dijelove bi mogle biti bolje u budućnosti.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi en systembeskrivelse til implementering af en følelsesanalyseagent, der er i stand til at fortolke tilstanden af en samtalepartner involveret i korte tre beskedssamtaler. Vi præsenterer resultaterne og observationerne af vores arbejde, og hvilke dele der kan forbedres yderligere i fremtiden.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we een systeembeschrijving voor het implementeren van een sentiment analysis agent die de toestand van een gesprekspartner kan interpreteren die betrokken is bij korte drie berichtgesprekken. We presenteren de resultaten en observaties van ons werk en welke onderdelen in de toekomst verder verbeterd kunnen worden.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine Systembeschreibung für die Implementierung eines Sentiment Analysis Agents vor, der in der Lage ist, den Zustand eines Gesprächspartners zu interpretieren, der in kurzen drei Nachrichtengesprächen involviert ist. Wir stellen die Ergebnisse und Beobachtungen unserer Arbeit vor und welche Teile in Zukunft noch verbessert werden könnten.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan deskripsi sistem untuk menerapkan agen analisis sentimen yang mampu menerjemahkan keadaan interlokutor yang terlibat dalam tiga percakapan pesan pendek. Kami mempersembahkan hasil dan pengamatan dari pekerjaan kami dan bagian mana yang bisa diperbaiki lebih lanjut di masa depan.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 정서 분석 에이전트를 실현하는 시스템 설명을 제시했는데 이 에이전트는 짧은 메시지 대화에서 대화자의 상태를 설명할 수 있다.우리는 우리의 업무 결과와 관찰 결과, 그리고 미래에 더욱 개선할 수 있는 부분을 소개할 것이다.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka maelezo ya mfumo wa kutekeleza mpango wa uchambuzi wa hisia mwenye uwezo wa kutafsiri hali ya mfanyakazi aliyejihusisha na mazungumzo machache matatu ya ujumbe. Tunatoa matokeo na maoni ya kazi yetu na sehemu gani zinaweza kuboreshwa zaidi katika siku za usoni.', 'af': "In hierdie papier stel ons 'n stelsel beskrywing voorsien vir die implementering van 'n sentiment analisie agent wat in staat van 'n interlocutor in kort drie boodskap gesprekke kan interpreteer. Ons stel die resultate en opmerking van ons werk voor en wat deel in die toekoms verder verbeter kan word.", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک توضیح سیستم برای عملیات یک مامور تحلیل احساسات را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که قادر به تعبیر وضعیت یک مامور مصاحبه کننده در سه مصاحبه پیغام کوتاه باشد. ما نتایج و مشاهده\u200cهای کار خود را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم و کدام بخش\u200cها در آینده می\u200cتوانند بهتر شود.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz gysga üç mesaj gürrüňinde işe alan çykyş durumyny terjime etmek üçin sistem tasvir etdik. Biz öz işimiziň netijelerini we gözlerimizi görkeýäris we gelejekde nähili böleklerimiz gowulaşabiler.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një përshkrim sistemi për zbatimin e një agjenti të analizës së ndjenjave të aftë për të interpretuar gjendjen e një interlokutori të angazhuar në tre biseda të shkurtra mesazhe. Ne paraqesim rezultatet dhe vëzhgimet e punës sonë dhe cilat pjesë mund të përmirësohen më tej në të ardhmen.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք համակարգի նկարագրություն զգացմունքների վերլուծության գործակալի իրականացման համար, որը կարողանում է մեկնաբանել ինտերլոկուտորի վիճակը, որը մասնակցում է կարճ երեք հաղորդագրությունների զրույցներում: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեր աշխատանքի արդյունքները և հետազոտությունները, և այն մասերը, որոնք կարող են ապագայում ավելի բարելավվել:', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በሦስት መልዕክት የተጠቃሚ የኢንተርኔት አካባቢ እናስተራርገው የሚችል የኢንተርኔት አስተያየት አካባቢ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የሥራችንንም ፍሬታና ተመልከቶችን እናቀርባለን እና የትኛውም ክፍሎች ለኋለኛው ይሻራሉ፡፡', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, üç qısa mesaj danışmalarında iştirak edən bir müxtəlif analizi a ģentərin istifadə etməsi üçün sistem təfsiləsini göstəririk. Biz işimizin sonuçlarını və gözləmələrini göstəririk və gələcəkdə hansı parçaları daha yaxşılaşdırılabilir.', 'ca': "En aquest article, presentem una descripció del sistema per implementar un agent d'an àlisi de sentiments capaç d'interpretar l'estat d'un interlocutor involucrat en tres breus converses de missatges. Presentam els resultats i observacions de la nostra feina i quines parts podrien millorar més en el futur.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme popis systému pro implementaci agenta analýzy sentimentů schopného interpretovat stav partnera zapojeného do krátkých tří zpráv. Představujeme výsledky a pozorování naší práce a které části by mohly být v budoucnu dále zlepšeny.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি সিস্টেম বর্ণনা উপস্থাপন করেছি একটি অনুভূতিবিশ্লেষণ এজেন্ট ব্যবহার করার জন্য যার মধ্যে সংক্ষিপ্ত তিন বার্তা আলোচনা We present the results and observations of our work and which parts could be further improved in the future.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo sistemski opis za provedbu agent a za analizu sentimenta sposobnog za interpretaciju stanja interlocutora uključenog u kratke tri poruke. Predstavljamo rezultate i promatranje našeg rada i koje dijelove bi mogle biti bolje u budućnosti.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esittelemme järjestelmäkuvauksen tunteiden analyysiagentin käyttöönotosta, joka kykenee tulkitsemaan kolmen lyhytsanomaisen keskustelukumppanin tilaa. Esittelemme työmme tulokset ja havainnot ja mitä osia voitaisiin tulevaisuudessa parantaa.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös esitame süsteemi kirjelduse sentimentaalüüsi agendi rakendamiseks, mis suudab tõlgendada kolme lühikese sõnumivestlusega tegeleva vestluspartneri seisundit. Tutvustame oma töö tulemusi ja tähelepanekuid ning milliseid osi saaks tulevikus veelgi parandada.', 'jv': 'Nang pemilih iki, kita mudhaya sistem sembarang nggawe ngubah perusahaan winih sing ngubah kapan kanggo ngerasakno iki bakal kelas interlocutor iki bakal kelas telu barêng nggambar. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem lan mulasar iki sak ning acara iki dadi bisa luwih dumadhi kanggo nggawe gerak dhéwé.', 'ha': 'Ga wannan takardan, munã gabatar da description na tsari na kasa ga amfani da mai amfani da mai fassara halin wani mai lokalori da ya yi aiki a cikin mazaɓan maganar uku. Munã halatar da matsala da gani ga aikinmu, kuma wane rabo zai iya ƙarami a gabani.', 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo opis sistema za izvedbo agenta za analizo sentimenta, ki je sposoben interpretirati stanje sogovornika, ki se ukvarja s kratkimi tremi sporočilnimi pogovori. Predstavljamo rezultate in opazovanja našega dela ter katere dele bi lahko v prihodnosti še izboljšali.', 'he': 'In this paper, we present a system description for implementing a sentiment analysis agent capable of interpreting the state of an interlocutor engaged in short three message conversations.  אנחנו מציגים את התוצאות והצפיות בעבודתנו ואיזה חלקים יכולים להשתפר יותר בעתיד.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོར་མ་ལག་གི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཞིག ང་ཚོས་ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་གསལ་འབྲས་བ་དང་ལྟ་སྟངས་མངོན་གསལ་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'ABARUAH at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Bi-directional LSTM for Hate Speech Detection', 'fr': 'ABARUAH au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 5\xa0: LSTM bidirectionnel pour la détection des discours haineux', 'pt': 'ABARUAH na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 5: LSTM bidirecional para detecção de discurso de ódio', 'ar': 'ABARUAH في SemEval-2019 المهمة 5: LSTM ثنائي الاتجاه لاكتشاف الكلام الذي يحض على الكراهية', 'es': 'ABARUAH en la Tarea 5 de SemEval-2019: LSTM bidireccional para la detección de discursos de odio', 'ja': 'SEMEval -2019のABARUAHタスク5 ：ヘイトスピーチ検出のための双方向LSTM', 'zh': 'ABARUAH在SemEval-2019务5:仇言检之双向LSTM', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 5 पर ABARUAH: नफरत भाषण का पता लगाने के लिए द्वि-दिशात्मक LSTM', 'ru': 'ABARUAH на SemEval-2019 Задача 5 : Двунаправленная LSTM для обнаружения ненавистнической речи', 'ga': 'ABARUAH ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 5 : LSTM déthreoch le haghaidh Brath Fuath-Urlabhra', 'it': "ABARUAH al SemEval-2019 Task 5: LSTM bidirezionale per il rilevamento del discorso d'odio", 'hu': 'ABARUAH a SemEval-2019 5. feladat: kétirányú LSTM a gyűlölet beszédérzékeléséhez', 'ka': 'ABARUAH semiEval-2019 დავალება 5 : ორეთექციონალური LSTM განახლებისთვის', 'kk': 'ABARUAH жалғыз- 2019 тапсырма 5 : Екі бағытты LSTM жұмыс сөздерді анықтау үшін', 'el': 'Εργασία 5: Δικατεύθυνση για την ανίχνευση ομιλίας μίσους', 'lt': 'ABARUAH at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Bi-directional LSTM for Hate Speech Detection', 'ms': 'ABARUAH di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: LSTM dua arah untuk pengesan Ucapan Kebencian', 'mk': 'АБАРУАХ на SemEval-2019 задача 5 : Бидирекционален LSTM за детекција на говор на омраза', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ജോലി 5: വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരം ഡിറ്റീഷന്\u200d', 'mn': 'ABARUAH at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Two directional LSTM for Hate Speech Detection', 'mt': 'ABARUAH at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Bi-directional LSTM for Hate Speech Detection', 'no': 'ABARUAH på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 5 : Bi retning LSTM for hatspråk oppdaging', 'ro': 'ABARUAH la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 5: LSTM bidirecțională pentru detectarea vorbirii de ură', 'sr': 'ABARUAH na semiEval-2019 zadatak 5 : dvosmjerno LSTM za otkrivanje govora mržnje', 'so': 'Shaqada 5: Bi-directional LSTM for Hate Speech Detection', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 5: வெறுப்பு பேச்சு கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான இருதிசை LSTM', 'pl': 'ABARUAH na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 5: Dwukierunkowy LSTM do wykrywania mowy nienawiści', 'si': 'ABARUAH at HalfEvel-2019 Job 5 : Bi-Points LSTM for Hate Talk Detection', 'sv': 'ABARUAH på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 5: Dubbelriktad LSTM för detektering av hattal', 'ur': 'ABARUAH at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Two directional LSTM for Hate Speech Detection', 'vi': 'ABARUAH tại Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-2009 5: cử tri khác nhau cho phát hiện kênh đáng ghét', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifani 5: Hat Speech Detection uchun Bi- directional LSTM', 'bg': 'Задача 5: Двупосочна ЛТМ за откриване на говора на омразата', 'hr': 'ABARUAH na semiEval-2019 zadatak 5 : dvosmjerno LSTM za otkrivanje govora mržnje', 'da': 'ABARUAH på SemEval-2019 Opgave 5: To-retningsbestemt LSTM til detektering af had tale', 'nl': 'ABARUAH op SemEval-2019 Taak 5: Bidirectioneel LSTM voor haatspraakdetectie', 'fa': 'ABARUAH در پایین اول-2019 کار ۵ : دو مسیر LSTM برای شناسایی سخنرانی دشمنی', 'sw': 'ABARUAH katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 5: LSTM kwa njia moja kwa moja kwa moja kwa ajili ya Kutambua Hotuba ya Hati', 'de': 'ABARUAH auf der SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 5: Bidirektionales LSTM zur Hassspracherkennung', 'id': 'ABARUAH di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: LSTM bidireksi untuk Deteksi Kebencian Perkataan', 'ko': 'ABARUAH가 SemEval-2019 퀘스트 5: 어그로 음성 검출에 사용되는 양방향 LSTM', 'am': 'ስራ 5', 'tr': 'ABARUAH at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Bi-directional LSTM for Hate Speech Detection', 'hy': 'ԱԲԱՌՈՀ-ը, 2019-ի "ՍեմԵվալ" 5-րդ հանձնարարությունը. ատելության խոսքի բացահայտումների երկու ուղղությամբ LSMT', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯-এর কাজ ৫: ঘৃণা কথা ডিটেক্টরের জন্য বিদায়-সরাসরি এলসিএম', 'af': 'ABARUAH by SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 5 : Bi- rigting LSTM vir Hate Speech Deteksie', 'sq': 'ABARUAH në SemEval-2019 Task 5: Bi-directional LSTM for Hate Speech Detection', 'cs': 'ABARUAH na SemEval-2019 Úkol 5: Obousměrný LSTM pro detekci nenávistné řeči', 'az': 'ABARUAH at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Two directional LSTM for Hate Speech Detection', 'et': 'ABARUAH SemEval-2019 ülesanne 5: kahesuunaline LSTM vihakõne tuvastamiseks', 'bs': 'ABARUAH na semiEval-2019 zadatak 5 : dvosmjerno LSTM za otkrivanje govora mržnje', 'ca': "ABARUAH a SemEval-2019 tasca 5: LSTM bidireccional per la detecció del discurs d'odi", 'fi': 'ABARUAH SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 5: Kaksisuuntainen LSTM vihapuheen havaitsemiseen', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'sk': 'ABARUAH na SemEval-2019 Naloga 5: Dvosmerni LSTM za zaznavanje sovražnega govora', 'bo': 'ABARUAH at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Bi-directional LSTM for Hate Speech Detection', 'jv': 'Aspect ratio', 'he': 'ABARUAH at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Bi-directional LSTM for Hate Speech Detection'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present the results obtained using bi-directional long short-term memory (BiLSTM) with and without attention and Logistic Regression (LR) models for SemEval-2019 Task 5 titled HatEval : Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter. This paper presents the results obtained for Subtask A for English language. The results of the BiLSTM and LR models are compared for two different types of preprocessing. One with no stemming performed and no stopwords removed. The other with stemming performed and stopwords removed. The BiLSTM model without attention performed the best for the first test, while the LR model with character n-grams performed the best for the second test. The BiLSTM model obtained an F1 score of 0.51 on the test set and obtained an official ranking of 8/71.', 'ar': 'في هذا البحث ، نقدم النتائج التي تم الحصول عليها باستخدام الذاكرة طويلة المدى ثنائية الاتجاه (BiLSTM) مع وبدون الانتباه ونماذج الانحدار اللوجستي (LR) لمهمة SemEval-2019 5 بعنوان "HatEval: الكشف متعدد اللغات لخطاب الكراهية ضد المهاجرين و المرأة في تويتر ". تقدم هذه الورقة النتائج التي تم الحصول عليها لـ Subtask A للغة الإنجليزية. تتم مقارنة نتائج نماذج BiLSTM و LR لنوعين مختلفين من المعالجة المسبقة. واحد مع عدم تنفيذ الاشتقاق وإزالة كلمات التوقف. الآخر مع تنفيذ الاشتقاق وإزالة كلمات الإيقاف. كان نموذج BiLSTM الذي لم ينتبه هو الأفضل في الاختبار الأول ، بينما كان نموذج LR ذو الحرف n-grams هو الأفضل للاختبار الثاني. حصل نموذج BiLSTM على درجة F1 تبلغ 0.51 في مجموعة الاختبار وحصل على تصنيف رسمي 8/71.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos os resultados obtidos usando a memória bidirecional de longo prazo (BiLSTM) com e sem atenção e modelos de regressão logística (LR) para a Tarefa 5 SemEval-2019 intitulada ”HatEval: detecção multilíngue de discurso de ódio contra imigrantes e Mulheres no Twitter”. Este artigo apresenta os resultados obtidos para a Subtarefa A para língua inglesa. Os resultados dos modelos BiLSTM e LR são comparados para dois tipos diferentes de pré-processamento. Um sem stemming realizado e sem stopwords removidos. O outro com stemming realizado e stopwords removidos. O modelo BiLSTM sem atenção teve o melhor desempenho no primeiro teste, enquanto o modelo LR com n-gramas de caracteres teve o melhor desempenho no segundo teste. O modelo BiLSTM obteve uma pontuação F1 de 0,51 no conjunto de teste e obteve uma classificação oficial de 8/71.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons les résultats obtenus à l'aide de la mémoire longue à court terme bidirectionnelle (BilsTM) avec et sans attention et des modèles de régression logistique (LR) pour la tâche 5 SEMEVAL-2019 intitulée «\xa0HaTeval\xa0: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter\xa0». Cet article présente les résultats obtenus pour la sous-tâche A pour la langue anglaise. Les résultats des modèles BilsTM et LR sont comparés pour deux types de prétraitement différents. Un sans radical effectué et aucun mot d'arrêt supprimé. L'autre avec raclage effectué et mots d'arrêt supprimés. Le modèle BilsTM sans attention a donné les meilleurs résultats pour le premier test, tandis que le modèle LR avec des n-grammes de caractères a obtenu les meilleurs résultats pour le second test. Le modèle BilsTM a obtenu un score F1 de 0,51 sur le plateau de test et a obtenu un classement officiel de 8/71.", 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos los resultados obtenidos con la memoria bidireccional a corto plazo (BILSTM) con y sin atención y los modelos de Regresión Logística (LR) para la Tarea 5 de SemEval-2019 titulada «HatEval: Detección multilingüe del discurso de odio contra los inmigrantes y las mujeres en Twitter». Este artículo presenta los resultados obtenidos para la subtarea A para el idioma inglés. Los resultados de los modelos BilsTM y LR se comparan para dos tipos diferentes de preprocesamiento. Uno sin derivaciones realizadas y sin palabras vacías eliminadas. El otro con derivaciones realizadas y palabras vacías eliminadas. El modelo BilsTM sin atención obtuvo el mejor rendimiento para la primera prueba, mientras que el modelo LR con n-gramas de caracteres obtuvo el mejor rendimiento para la segunda prueba. El modelo BilsTM obtuvo una puntuación F1 de 0.51 en el set de pruebas y obtuvo una clasificación oficial de 8/71.', 'ja': '本稿では、「HatEval: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter」というタイトルのSemEval -2019タスク5の注意喚起とロジスティック回帰（ LR ）モデルの有無にかかわらず、双方向長期記憶（ BiLSTM ）を用いて得られた結果を提示する。本稿では，英語のSubtask Aについて得られた結果を紹介する。BiLSTMモデルとLRモデルの結果は、2つの異なるタイプの前処理について比較されます。ステムなしで実行され、ストップワードが削除されていないもの。もう1つはSTEMINGで実行され、ストップワードは削除された。注意を払わないＢｉＬＳＴＭモデルは、第１の試験で最も優れた性能を示し、文字ｎグラムを有するＬＲモデルは、第２の試験で最も優れた性能を示した。BiLSTMモデルは、試験器のF 1スコアが0.51であり、公式ランキングが8/71であった。', 'zh': '本文引用双向长短期记(BiLSTM)及不带注意及SemEval-2019务5者Logistic归(LR)模形得之,其务5名曰"HatEval多言检Twitter中针移民女性之仇言"。 本文言英语子务A得。 二者预处理 BiLSTM LR 也。 一无行词干,亦无删停。 其一行词干分解而删停用词。 不留意者BiLSTM一试最佳,而带字符n-gram者LR再试最佳。 BiLSTM试集上得0.51F1分数,得8/71官名。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम द्वि-दिशात्मक दीर्घकालिक अल्पकालिक स्मृति (BiLSTM) का उपयोग करके प्राप्त परिणामों को प्रस्तुत करते हैं और बिना ध्यान और लॉजिस्टिक रिग्रेशन (एलआर) मॉडल के साथ और बिना SemEval-2019 टास्क 5 के लिए "HatEval: चहचहाना में आप्रवासियों और महिलाओं के खिलाफ नफरत भाषण का बहुभाषी पता लगाना" शीर्षक से। यह पेपर अंग्रेजी भाषा के लिए सबटास्क ए के लिए प्राप्त परिणामों को प्रस्तुत करता है। BiLSTM और LR मॉडल के परिणामों की तुलना दो अलग-अलग प्रकार के प्रीप्रोसेसिंग के लिए की जाती है। कोई stemming प्रदर्शन और कोई stopwords हटा दिया के साथ एक. stemming के साथ अन्य प्रदर्शन किया और stopwords हटा दिया. ध्यान के बिना BiLSTM मॉडल ने पहले परीक्षण के लिए सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन किया, जबकि चरित्र एन-ग्राम के साथ एलआर मॉडल ने दूसरे परीक्षण के लिए सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन किया। BiLSTM मॉडल ने परीक्षण सेट पर 0.51 का F1 स्कोर प्राप्त किया और 8/71 की आधिकारिक रैंकिंग प्राप्त की।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем результаты, полученные с использованием двунаправленной кратковременной памяти (BiLSTM) с и без внимания и логистической регрессии (LR) для задачи 5 SemEval-2019 под названием “HatEval: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter”. В данной статье представлены результаты, полученные для Подзадачи А для английского языка. Результаты моделей BiLSTM и LR сравниваются для двух различных типов предварительной обработки. Не выполнено привязки и не удалены стоп-слова. Другой со створкой выполнено и стоп-слова удалены. Модель BiLSTM без внимания показала лучшее для первого теста, в то время как модель LR с n-граммами символов показала лучшее для второго теста. Модель BiLSTM получила оценку F1 0,51 на тестовом наборе и получила официальный рейтинг 8/71.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair na torthaí a fuarthas trí úsáid a bhaint as cuimhne ghearrthéarmach dhá-threorach (BiLSTM) le haird agus gan aird agus samhlacha Aischéimniúcháin Loighistic (LR) le haghaidh Tasc SemEval-2019 5 dar teideal ”HatEval: Brath Ilteangach ar Fhuathchaint in aghaidh Inimircigh agus Mná ar Twitter”. Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair na torthaí a fuarthas le haghaidh Fothasc A don Bhéarla. Cuirtear torthaí na samhlacha BiLSTM agus LR i gcomparáid le haghaidh dhá chineál éagsúla réamhphróiseála. Ceann amháin gan aon eascairt déanta agus gan aon stopfhocail bainte. Bhain an ceann eile le eascairt agus baintear stopfhocail. Is é an tsamhail BiLSTM gan aird a rinne an ceann ab fhearr don chéad triail, agus ba í an tsamhail LR le carachtar n-gram ab fhearr don dara tástáil. Fuair samhail BiLSTM scór F1 de 0.51 ar an tacar tástála agus fuair sé rangú oifigiúil 8/71.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban bemutatjuk a kétirányú hosszú rövid távú memória (BiLSTM) és a logisztikai regresszió (LR) modellek használatával kapott eredményeket a SemEval-2019 "HatEval: többnyelvű detektálás a bevándorlók és nők ellen a Twitteren" című 5. feladathoz. Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az angol nyelvű A. alcsoport eredményeit. A BiLSTM és LR modellek eredményeit két különböző előfeldolgozás esetén hasonlítjuk össze. Olyat, amelynek nincs szárítása és nincs eltávolítása. A másik szárítással végrehajtott és a stopwords eltávolításával. A BiLSTM modell figyelem nélkül teljesítette a legjobbat az első teszthez, míg az n-grammos karakteres LR modell teljesítette a legjobbat a második teszthez. A BiLSTM modell F1 pontszámot kapott a tesztkészleten, és hivatalos 8/71 pontszámot kapott.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε τα αποτελέσματα που επιτεύχθηκαν με τη χρήση αμφίδρομης μακροχρόνιας βραχυπρόθεσμης μνήμης (με και χωρίς προσοχή και μοντέλα Logistic Regression (LR) για την εργασία 5 με τίτλο "Πολυγλωσσική ανίχνευση μίσους κατά των μεταναστών και των γυναικών στο Twitter". Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει τα αποτελέσματα που επιτεύχθηκαν για την Υποεργασία Α για την αγγλική γλώσσα. Τα αποτελέσματα των μοντέλων BiLSTM και LR συγκρίνονται για δύο διαφορετικούς τύπους προεπεξεργασίας. Ένα χωρίς να εκτελείται στέλεχος και χωρίς παύση λέξεων. Το άλλο με στέλεχος εκτελέστηκε και παύλα αφαιρέθηκαν. Το μοντέλο BiLSTM χωρίς προσοχή πέτυχε το καλύτερο για την πρώτη δοκιμή, ενώ το μοντέλο LR με χαρακτήρες n-γραμμάτων πέτυχε το καλύτερο για τη δεύτερη δοκιμή. Το μοντέλο BiLSTM έλαβε βαθμολογία F1 0.51 στο σετ δοκιμής και έλαβε επίσημη κατάταξη 8/71.', 'ka': "ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოყენებთ მონაცემები, რომელიც მიღებულია ორგანიზაციონალური კრტაქტიური მეხსიერება (BiLSTM) სემEval-2019 მოდელთან და ლოგისტიკური რეგრესი (LR) მოდელთან, რომელიც სახელ მიერ 'HatEval: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Imm ეს დოკუმენტი აჩვენებს A-ს სამუშაო დავალებისთვის მიღებული შედეგი. BiLSTM და LR მოდელების შემდეგ ორი განსხვავებული პროცესის შემდეგ შედგენა. ერთი, რომელიც არაფერი გავაკეთებულია და არაფერი წაშლა სიტყვები. მეორე, რომელიც გავაკეთებულია და დასრულებულია სიტყვები. BiLSTM მოდელი პირველი ტესტისთვის ყველაზე უკეთესი გავაკეთეთ, როცა LR მოდელი n-გრამის სიმბოლოებით მეორე ტესტისთვის უკეთესი გავაკეთეთ. BiLSTM მოდელის მონაცემებში F1 მონაცემების 0,51 წერტილი მიიღეთ და 8/71 წერტილი მიიღეთ.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз 5- тапсырма "HatEval: Бірнеше тілдерді Твиттердегі иммигранттер және әйелдердің қарсы қарсы және логистикалық регрессия (LR) үлгілерімен (BiLSTM) екі бағытты қысқақ жады қолданып алған нәтижелерді көрсетедік. Бұл қағаз A ішкі тапсырма үшін ағылшын тілінде алған нәтижелерді көрсетеді. BiLSTM және LR үлгілерінің нәтижелері екі түрлі алдын- ала өткізу үшін салыстырылады. Орындалмаған және тоқтату сөздері өшірілмеген. Біріншісі жасалған және тоқтату сөздері өшірілген. BiLSTM үлгісі бірінші сынақ үшін ең жақсы жасады, бірақ LR үлгісі n- граммалар таңбалармен екінші сынақ үшін ең жақсы жасады. BiLSTM үлгісі сынақтағы 0,51 деңгейін F1 деңгейін алды және 8/71 деңгейі официалдық деңгейін алды.', 'it': "In questo articolo presentiamo i risultati ottenuti utilizzando la memoria bidirezionale a lungo termine (BiLSTM) con e senza attenzione e modelli di regressione logistica (LR) per SemEval-2019 Task 5 intitolato 'HatEval: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter'. Questo articolo presenta i risultati ottenuti per la Sottomissione A per la lingua inglese. I risultati dei modelli BiLSTM e LR sono confrontati per due diversi tipi di preelaborazione. Uno senza gambo eseguito e senza parole di arresto rimosse. L'altro con stelo eseguito e stopwords rimossi. Il modello BiLSTM senza attenzione ha eseguito il meglio per il primo test, mentre il modello LR con caratteri n-grammi ha eseguito il meglio per il secondo test. Il modello BiLSTM ha ottenuto un punteggio F1 di 0,51 sul set di test e ha ottenuto una classifica ufficiale di 8/71.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome rezultatus, gautus naudojant dvikrypčius ilgalaikes atminties (BiLSTM) modelius su dėmesiu ir be jo bei Logistinės regresijos (LR) modelius, skirtus 5-ajam SemEval-2019 uždaviniui, pavadintam "HatEval: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women on Twitter". Šiame dokumente pateikiami rezultatai, gauti pagal A posėdį anglų kalba. BiLSTM ir LR modelių rezultatai lyginami dviejų skirtingų rūšių išankstinio apdorojimo atveju. Vienas, kuriame nenustatyta jokių stabdžių ir kuriame nebūtų pašalinti stabdžių žodžiai. Kitas su atliktu stabdymu ir pašalintu stabdymo žodžiu. BiLSTM modelis be dėmesio atliko geriausią pirmojo bandymo rezultatą, o LR modelis su n-gramais atliko geriausią antrojo bandymo rezultatą. BiLSTM modelis įgijo 0,51 F1 balas bandymų rinkinyje ir oficialiai įgijo 8/71.', 'mk': "In this paper, we present the results obtained using bi-directional long short-term memory (BiLSTM) with and without attention and Logistic Regression (LR) models for SemEval-2019 Task 5 titled 'HatEval: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter'.  Овој документ ги претставува резултатите добиени за подзадачата А за англискиот јазик. Резултатите од моделите BiLSTM и LR се споредуваат за два различни типи на препроцес. Еден без притисок извршен и без отстранување на запирачките зборови. The other with stemming performed and stopwords removed.  The BiLSTM model without attention performed the best for the first test, while the LR model with character n-grams performed the best for the second test.  Моделот БиLSTM доби оценка од 0,51 на тестот и официјално рангираше 8/71.", 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നീണ്ട നീണ്ട മെമ്മറി ഉപയോഗിച്ച് രണ്ട് നീണ്ട മെമ്മറി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. ശ്രദ്ധിക്കാതെയും ലോഗിസ്റ്റിക്ക് റിഗ്രഷനും (LR) മോഡലുകളും സെമ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഭാഷയ്ക്കുള്ള സബ്ബ്ബാസ് A നുള്ള ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നു. ബിഎല്\u200dസ്റ്റിംഗിന്റെയും LR മോഡലുകളുടെയും ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ടു വ്യത്യസ്ത തരം മുന്\u200dപ് പ്രോസിക്സിന്റെയും താല്\u200dപര്യമ സ്റ്റോമിങ്ങ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത ഒരാള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുകയും നിര്\u200dത്തുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d നീക്കുകയും ചെയ്തിട്ടുള്ള മറ്റൊരാള്\u200d. ശ്രദ്ധിക്കാതെ ബിഎല്\u200dസ്റ്റം മോഡല്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ പരീക്ഷണത്തിനായി ഏറ്റവും നല്ലത് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിച്ചു. രണ്ടാമത്തെ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന് ഏറ്റവ ബിഎല്\u200dസ്റ്റം മോഡല്\u200d പരീക്ഷണസെറ്റില്\u200d ഒരു F1 സ്കോര്\u200d ലഭിച്ചു 8/71 ഓഫീസില്\u200d റാങ്ങിങ് ലഭിച്ചു.', 'ms': "In this paper, we present the results obtained using bi-directional long short-term memory (BiLSTM) with and without attention and Logistic Regression (LR) models for SemEval-2019 Task 5 titled 'HatEval: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter'.  Kertas ini memperkenalkan keputusan yang diperoleh untuk Subtugas A untuk bahasa Inggeris. The results of the BiLSTM and LR models are compared for two different types of preprocessing.  Satu dengan tiada penghujung dilakukan dan tiada kata berhenti dibuang. Yang lain dengan penghujung dilakukan dan kata berhenti dibuang. Model BiLSTM tanpa perhatian melakukan yang terbaik untuk ujian pertama, sementara model LR dengan aksara n-gram melakukan yang terbaik untuk ujian kedua. Model BiLSTM mendapat skor F1 0.51 pada set ujian dan mendapat peringkat rasmi 8/71.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид SemEval-2019-ийн 5 даалгаварын төлөвлөгөө "HatEval: Олон хэлний хэл хэлэлцэх дуртай яриаг Твиттерийн хөгжлийн эсрэг эмэгтэйчүүдийн эсрэг үзэн ядах яриаг олон хэлний тодорхойлолтоор (BiLSTM) ашиглаж авсан үр дүнг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ цаас Англи хэлний А суб-даалгаварын үр дүнг харуулдаг. BiLSTM болон LR загварын үр дүн нь хоёр өөр төрлийн аль боловсруулалтыг харьцуулдаг. Хэрэв зөвшөөрөхгүй, зогсохгүй үгийг устгахгүй. Нөгөө нь зөвхөн дамжуулан, зогсоох үгийг устгасан. BiLSTM загвар анхааралгүй анхаарлын шалгалтын хувьд хамгийн сайн ажиллаж байлаа. LR загвар нь n-граммын харин хоёр дахь шалгалтын хувьд хамгийн сайн ажиллаж байлаа. BiLSTM загвар шалгалт дээр 0.51 оноо авсан ба 8/71 онолын үндсэн цэгийг авсан.', 'no': 'I denne papiret viser vi resultatene som er fått ved hjelp av langtidig minne (BiLSTM) med og utan oppmerksområde og logistisk regresjon (LR) for semiEval-2019 oppgåve 5 med tittel « HatEval: Multispråk oppdaging av hatespråk mot imigrantar og kvinner i Twitter ». Denne papiret viser resultatet for underoppgåva A for engelsk språk. Resultatet av BiLSTM- og LR- modelane er samanlikna med to ulike typar førehandsaming. Ein med ingen stemming utført og ingen stoppeder fjerna. Den andre med stemming utført og stoppetord fjerna. BiLSTM-modellen utførte det beste for den første testen utan oppmerkinga, mens LR-modellen med teikn n-gram utførte det beste for den andre testen. BiLSTM-modellen fikk eit F1-poeng med 0,51 på testsettet og fikk ein offisiell rekning på 8/71.', 'mt': "F'dan id-dokument, nippreżentaw ir-riżultati miksuba bl-użu ta' memorja bidirezzjonali fit-tul (BiLSTM) b'attenzjoni u mingħajr attenzjoni u mudelli ta' Regressjoni Loġistika (LR) għal SemEval-2019 Task 5 bit-titolu 'HatEval: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women on Twitter'. Dan id-dokument jippreżenta r-riżultati miksuba għas-Subkompitu A għall-lingwa Ingliża. Ir-riżultati tal-mudelli BiLSTM u LR jitqabblu għal żewġ tipi differenti ta’ pproċessar minn qabel. Waħda mingħajr waqfien magħmul u mingħajr waqfien imneħħija. L-ieħor bil-waqfien imwettaq u l-kelmiet tal-waqfien jitneħħew. Il-mudell BiLSTM mingħajr attenzjoni wettaq l-aħjar għall-ewwel test, filwaqt li l-mudell LR b’karattru n-grammi wettaq l-aħjar għat-tieni test. Il-mudell BiLSTM kiseb punteġġ F1 ta’ 0.51 fuq is-sett tat-test u kiseb klassifikazzjoni uffiċjali ta’ 8/71.", 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono wyniki uzyskane przy użyciu dwukierunkowej pamięci krótkoterminowej (BiLSTM) z uwagą i bez uwagi oraz regresji logistycznej (LR) dla zadania SemEval-2019 5 zatytułowanego "HatEval: wielojęzyczne wykrywanie mowy nienawiści wobec imigrantów i kobiet w Twitterze". W artykule przedstawiono wyniki uzyskane dla podzadania A dla języka angielskiego. Wyniki modeli BiLSTM i LR porównywane są dla dwóch różnych rodzajów przetwarzania wstępnego. Taki, który nie wykonywał stosowania i nie usunął żadnych skrótów. Drugi z wykonywanym stemowaniem i usunięciem stopów. Model BiLSTM bez uwagi najlepiej wykonał pierwszy test, podczas gdy model LR o znaku n-gramach najlepiej wykonał drugi test. Model BiLSTM uzyskał wynik F1 0,51 na zestawie testowym i uzyskał oficjalny ranking 8/71.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තට, අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාර දෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාර දෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාර දුරකාල මතකය (BiLSTM) එක්ක සහ හා අවධානය සහ ලෝජිස්ටික රිජ්\u200dරේෂ් මොඩේල් නැතුව (LR) සෙම්වේල්-2019 වැඩේ 5 මේ පැත්තේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂාව සබ් වැඩ A වලට ලැබෙන ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරත BiLSTM සහ LR මෝඩේල්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති කිසිම කිසිම කිසිම කිසිම කිරීමක් නැති වචනයක් නැති වචනයක් නැති වචනයක්. අනිත් වෙනුවෙන් ස්ටීම් එක්ක ඉවරයි නවත්තන්න වචනය. BiLSTM මොඩල් අවධානයක් නැතුව පලවෙනි පරීක්ෂණයට හොඳම පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා, LR මොඩල් අක්ෂර n-ග්\u200dරාම්ස් සමග අක්ෂ BiLSTM මොඩල් එක පරීක්ෂණ සෙට් එකේ F1 ප්\u200dරමාණයක් 0.51 ක් ලැබුණා ඒ වගේම අධාරික ප්\u200dරමාණයක් 8/71 ක් ලැබුණා.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm rezultatele obținute folosind memoria bidirecțională pe termen scurt (BiLSTM) cu și fără atenție și modele de regresie logistică (LR) pentru Sarcina 5 SemEval-2019 intitulată "HatEval: detectarea multilingvă a discursului de ură împotriva imigranților și femeilor în Twitter". Lucrarea prezintă rezultatele obținute pentru Subsarcina A pentru limba engleză. Rezultatele modelelor BiLSTM și LR sunt comparate pentru două tipuri diferite de pre-procesare. Unul fără călcare efectuată și fără opriri eliminate. Cealaltă cu tulpină efectuată și stopwords eliminate. Modelul BiLSTM fără atenție a realizat cel mai bine pentru primul test, în timp ce modelul LR cu caracter n-grame a realizat cel mai bine pentru al doilea test. Modelul BiLSTM a obținut un scor F1 de 0,51 pe setul de testare și a obținut un clasament oficial de 8/71.', 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaan ku soo bandhignaa midhihiisa ku soo bandhigayaa xusuusta waqtiga dheer oo gaaban (BiLSTM) oo aan la'aanin iyo aan la'aan u fiirsanayn iyo qoraalka Regression (LR) modellada SemEval-2019 Shaqada 5 ee la yidhaahdo 'Hateel: Dhaqanka luuqadaha badan ee Hate Speech Against Immiga iyo dumarka Twitterka )'. Kanu wuxuu soo bandhigaa resultinta lagu helay luuqada Ingiriiska. Midhaha sameynta BiLSTM iyo LR waxaa la barbaran karaa laba noocyo oo kala duduwan oo kala duduwan. Mid aan cod la'aan la samayn ama aan la qaadin hadal joojinta ah. Mida kale oo cod-dhig leh waa la qaaday Tusaalada BiLSTM oo aan la fiirsanayn ayaa sameynay ugu wanaagsan imtixaanka ugu horeeya, marka lagu sameynayo modelka LR oo ku qoran xaraf n-gram wuxuu sameynay ugu wanaagsan imtixaanka labaad. Tusaalada BiLSTM wuxuu helay F1 koox 0.51 oo ku qoran imtixaanka, wuxuuna helay saf rasmi ah oo ay tahay 8/71.", 'sr': "U ovom papiru predstavljamo rezultate dobiveni korištenjem dvosmjernog kratkoročnog sjećanja (BiLSTM) sa i bez pažnje i modelima logističke regresije (LR) za pola Eval-2019 zadatak 5 pod nazivom 'HatEval: Multilingual Detection of hate speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter'. Ovaj papir predstavlja rezultate dobiveni za podzadatak A za engleski jezik. Rezultati modela BiLSTM i LR se uspoređuju za dve različite vrste preobradu. Jedan bez naglašavanja izvršen i bez zaustavljanja. Drugi sa nastavkom izvršenim i uklonjenim prestanačnim rečima. Model BiLSTM bez pažnje izvršio je najbolje za prvi test, dok je model LR sa karakterom n-gramom izvršio najbolje za drugi test. Model BiLSTM dobio je rezultat F1 od 0,51 na testu i dobio službenu redovitost od 8/71.", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi de resultat som erhållits med tvåriktad långtidsminne (BiLSTM) med och utan uppmärksamhet och Logistic Regression (LR) modeller för SemEval-2019 Task 5 med titeln "HatEval: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter". Denna uppsats presenterar de resultat som erhållits för deluppgift A för engelska språket. Resultaten från BiLSTM- och LR-modellerna jämförs för två olika typer av förbehandling. En utan stamning utförd och inga stopwords borttagna. Den andra med stamning utförd och stopwords borttagna. BiLSTM-modellen utan uppmärksamhet presterade bäst för det första testet, medan LR-modellen med tecken n-gram presterade bäst för det andra testet. BiLSTM-modellen fick en F1-poäng på 0,51 på testset och fick en officiell rankning på 8/71.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم نے ان نتائج کو دوسری سمت کی لند مدت یاد (BiLSTM) کے مطابق اور بغیر توئیٹ میں مہاجرین اور عورتوں کے مقابلہ میں لوجیسٹی ریگرس (LR) نمڈلوں کے ساتھ پیش کیا ہے۔ یہ کاغذ انگلیسی زبان کے لئے Subtask A کے لئے حاصل ہونے کے نتائج کو پیش کرتا ہے. BiLSTM اور LR نمڈلوں کا نتیجہ دو مختلف طریقوں پر مقایسہ کیا جاتا ہے۔ وہ جس کے ساتھ کوئی چلنے والی بات نہیں ہے اور کوئی روکتی بات نہیں ہے اور دوسری بات مطابق ہوئی اور روکتی ہوئی باتوں کے ساتھ۔ BiLSTM موڈل بغیر توجه پہلی امتحان کے لئے بہترین عمل کرتا تھا، حالانکہ LR موڈل کے ساتھ علامت n-گرم کے لحاظ سے دوسری امتحان کے لئے بہترین عمل کرتا تھا. BiLSTM موڈل نے آزمائش سٹ پر 0.51 کی F1 اسکور حاصل کی اور 8/71 کی رسمی رینگ حاصل کی۔', 'ta': 'இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் இர- திசையாக நீண்ட நீண்ட கால நினைவகம் (பில்STM) பயன்படுத்தி விட்ட முடிவுகளை காண்பிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் கவனத்துடன் இல்லாமல் மற்றும் லாஜிஸ்டிக் கட்டுப்பாட்டுகள் (L இந்த தாள் உப பணிக்கு A ஆங்கிலத்திற்கு பெற்ற முடிவுகளை அளிக்கிறது. பில்எஸ்டிஎம் மற்றும் LR மாதிரிகளின் முடிவுகள் இரண்டு வேறு வித்தியாசமான முன்செயல்படுத்தல் வகை குறிப்பு இல்லாத ஒன்று செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட மற்றும் நிறுத்தப்பட்ட வார்த்தைகள் நீக்கப்பட்டது The BiLSTM model without attention performed the best for the first test, while the LR model with character n- grams performed for the second test best. The BiLSTM model obtained an F1 score of 0.51 on the test set and obtained an official ranking of 8/71.', 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu kết quả có được nhờ hai hướng trí nhớ ngắn hạn (BiLSTM) với và không cần chú ý và các mô hình áp dụng theo logic (LR) cho nhiệm vụ SemEvl-2009, tiêu đề "HatEvol: phát hiện ngôn ngữ thù ghét đối với người nhập và phụ nữ trên Twitter". Tờ giấy này trình bày kết quả của Subask A for English language. Kết quả của mô hình BiLSTM và LR được so sánh với hai loại chế tạo sẵn. Một mà không có nội dung và không dùng tạm thời. Còn lại dùng nội dung và tạm dừng. Mô hình BiLSTM không được dùng để thử lần đầu, trong khi mô hình LR với ký tự n-grams thực hiện tốt nhất cho lần thử thứ hai. Mô hình BiLSTM lấy được con số F1 của 0.51 trong bộ thử và lấy được khẩu 8/71 theo thứ hạng chính thức.', 'uz': 'Bu hujjatda, biz SemEval-2019 Tashqi 5 "Hat Eval: Immigrant va Oddiy ayollar haqida qanday kuch aytish haqida bir nechta qisqa xotira (BiLSTM) yordamida olingan natijalarini ko\'rsamiz va hech qanday foydalanuvchi va logistik boshqaruvchi modellari bilan ishlatamiz. Ushbu hujjat ingliz tili uchun Subtask A uchun natijalarini koʻrsatiladi. @ info: status Name The other with stemming performed and stopwords removed.  Name Name', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме резултатите, получени чрез двупосочна дългосрочна краткосрочна памет (БиЛСТМ) с и без внимание и модели логистична регресия (ЛР) за Задача 5, озаглавена "Многоезично откриване на речта на омразата срещу имигранти и жени в Туитър". Настоящата статия представя резултатите, получени по подзадача А за английски език. Резултатите от моделите се сравняват за два различни вида предварителна обработка. Такъв, който не е изпълнен и не е премахнат спиращите думи. Другият с изстрелване и изключване на спиращите думи. Моделът без внимание се представи най-добре за първия тест, докато моделът с символ н-грама се представи най-добре за втория тест. Моделът получава оценка от 0,51 на тестовия комплект и официално класиране от 8/71.', 'hr': "U ovom papiru predstavljamo rezultate dobiveni korištenjem dvosmjernog kratkoročnog sjećanja (BiLSTM) s modelima logičke regresije (LR) za pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 5 pod nazivom 'HatEval: Multilingual Detection of hate speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter'. Ovaj papir predstavlja rezultate dobiveni za podzadatak A za engleski jezik. Rezultati modela BiLSTM i LR uspoređuju se za dvije različite vrste preobradu. Jedan bez naglašavanja izvršen i bez zaustavljanja riječi uklonjene. Drugi sa nastavkom izvršenim i uklonjenim prestanačnim riječima. Model BiLSTM bez pažnje izvršio je najbolje za prvi test, dok je model LR s karakterom n-grama izvršio najbolje za drugi test. Model BiLSTM dobio je rezultat F1 od 0,51 na testu i dobio službenu redovitost od 8/71.", 'nl': "In dit artikel presenteren we de resultaten verkregen met behulp van bi-directioneel long short-term memory (BiLSTM) met en zonder aandacht en Logistic Regression (LR) modellen voor SemEval-2019 Taak 5 getiteld 'HatEval: Meertalige Detectie van haatspraak tegen immigranten en vrouwen in Twitter'. Dit artikel presenteert de resultaten die zijn verkregen voor Subtaak A voor Engelse taal. De resultaten van de BiLSTM- en LR-modellen worden vergeleken voor twee verschillende soorten voorbewerking. Eentje zonder stemmen uitgevoerd en zonder stopwoorden verwijderd. De andere met stemwerk uitgevoerd en stopwoorden verwijderd. Het BiLSTM model zonder aandacht presteerde het beste voor de eerste test, terwijl het LR model met karakter n-gram het beste presteerde voor de tweede test. Het BiLSTM model behaalde een F1 score van 0,51 op de testset en behaalde een officiële ranking van 8/71.", 'da': "I denne artikel præsenterer vi resultaterne opnået ved hjælp af bi-directional long-term memory (BiLSTM) med og uden opmærksomhed og Logistic Regression (LR) modeller for SemEval-2019 Task 5 med titlen 'HatEval: Multilingual Detection of Hade Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter'. Denne artikel præsenterer resultaterne for underopgave A for engelsk sprog. Resultaterne af BiLSTM- og LR-modellerne sammenlignes for to forskellige typer forbearbejdning. En uden stævn udført og ingen stopord fjernet. Den anden med stemning udført og stopord fjernet. BiLSTM modellen uden opmærksomhed udførte det bedste til den første test, mens LR modellen med karakter n-gram udførte det bedste til den anden test. BiLSTM modellen opnåede en F1 score på 0,51 på testsættet og opnåede en officiel placering på 8/71.", 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir die Ergebnisse vor, die mit bidirektionalem Langzeitgedächtnis (BiLSTM) mit und ohne Aufmerksamkeit und Logistic Regression (LR) Modellen für SemEval-2019 Task 5 mit dem Titel "HatEval: Mehrsprachige Erkennung von Hassreden gegen Immigranten und Frauen in Twitter" erzielt wurden. Diese Arbeit stellt die Ergebnisse für Subtask A für englische Sprache vor. Die Ergebnisse der BiLSTM- und LR-Modelle werden für zwei verschiedene Arten der Vorverarbeitung verglichen. Eine ohne Stemming durchgeführt und keine Stoppwörter entfernt. Die andere mit Stemming durchgeführt und Stoppworte entfernt. Das BiLSTM-Modell ohne Aufmerksamkeit lieferte für den ersten Test die besten Ergebnisse, während das LR-Modell mit Zeichen n-Gramm für den zweiten Test die besten Ergebnisse erbrachte. Das BiLSTM-Modell erhielt eine F1-Punktzahl von 0,51 auf dem Testset und erhielt eine offizielle Rangliste von 8/71.', 'id': "In this paper, we present the results obtained using bi-directional long short-term memory (BiLSTM) with and without attention and Logistic Regression (LR) models for SemEval-2019 Task 5 titled 'HatEval: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter'.  Kertas ini memperlihatkan hasil yang diperoleh untuk Subtask A untuk bahasa Inggris. The results of the BiLSTM and LR models are compared for two different types of preprocessing.  Satu tanpa penampilan dan tidak ada kata berhenti dihapus. Yang lain dengan penampilan dan kata berhenti dihapus. The BiLSTM model without attention performed the best for the first test, while the LR model with character n-grams performed the best for the second test.  The BiLSTM model obtained an F1 score of 0.51 on the test set and obtained an official ranking of 8/71.", 'sw': "Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha matokeo yaliyopata kwa kutumia kumbukumbu ya muda mrefu kwa mara mbili (BiLSTM) yenye na bila kusikiliza na kutumia mifano ya Udhibiti wa KiLogistic (LR) kwa ajili ya kazi ya SemEval-2019 yenye kichwa cha 5 kinachoitwa 'Hati: Kugundua lugha nyingine ya Kuzungumza Hati dhidi ya Wahamiaji na Wanawake kwenye mtandao wa Twita'. Gazeti hili linaonyesha matokeo yaliyopata kwa ajili ya Ujumbe wa A kwa lugha ya Kiingereza. Matokeo ya mifano ya BiLSTM na LR yanalinganishwa na aina mbili tofauti za upasuaji. Mmoja ambaye hakuna kura ya kura imefanya na hakuna maneno ya kusitishwa. The other with stemming performed and stopwords removed.  The BiLSTM model without attention performed the best for the first test, while the LR model with character n-grams performed the best for the second test.  Mradi wa BiLSTM ulipata score ya F1 ya 0.51 kwenye seti ya jaribio na kupata rangi rasmi ya 8/71.", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، نتیجه\u200cهای دریافت شده را با استفاده از حافظه طولانی دوراهی (BiLSTM) با و بدون توجه و مدل\u200cهای تغییر منطقی (LR) برای ماده\u200cهای نیم\u200cEval-2019 تابع ۵ به عنوان «HatEval: کشف چندین زبانی از سخن\u200cهای دشمنی علیه مهاجران و زنان در توئیتر» نشان می\u200cدهیم. این کاغذ نتیجه\u200cهایی را برای زیر کار A برای زبان انگلیسی نشان می\u200cدهد. نتایج مدل BiLSTM و LR برای دو نوع پیش پردازش مختلف مقایسه می\u200cشوند. یکی که هیچ استفاده\u200cای انجام نمی\u200cشود و هیچ استفاده\u200cای از کلمات استفاده نمی\u200cشود. ديگري که با استفاده کردن کلمات انجام شده و متوقف شده مدل BiLSTM بدون توجه بهترین برای اولین امتحان انجام داد، در حالی که مدل LR با شخصیت n گرم بهترین برای امتحان دوم انجام داد. مدل BiLSTM یک نمونه F1 از 0.51 در مجموعه آزمایش گرفت و یک نمونه رسمی از 8/71 دریافت کرد.', 'ko': "이 논문에서는 주의가 없는 양방향 장단시 기억(BilSTM)과 논리 회귀(LR) 모델을 사용해 Sem Eval-2019의'Hat Eval: 트위터에서 이민과 여성을 겨냥한 증오 발언을 다국어로 검출하는 임무 5가 얻은 결과를 보여준다.본고는 영어 하위 임무 A의 결과를 제시했다.미리 처리된 두 가지 유형의 BilSTM과 LR 모델을 비교한 결과어간 분석을 실행하지 않았고 정지자도 삭제하지 않았다.다른 하나는 어간 분석을 실행하고 stopwords를 삭제하는 것이다.주의하지 않은 BilSTM 모델은 1차 테스트에서 가장 잘 표현됐고, 문자 n-grams가 있는 LR 모델은 2차 테스트에서 가장 잘 표현됐다.BilSTM 모델은 테스트세트에서 F1이 0.51점을 받았고 공식 순위는 8/71이었다.", 'tr': "Bu kagyzda, netijeleri SemEval-2019 sany çykyş üçin 'HatEval: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter' hasaplanýar. Bu kagyz Iňlisçe dil üçin A subişi üçin netijeleri getirilýär. BiLSTM we LR nusgalarynyň netijesi iki dürli işleýän nusgalary üçin daýanlaşdyrylýar. Açmak ýok adam edip goýulmady we goýulmady sözler. Beýleki çykyş edip duran sözleri çykardy. Ilkinji test üçin iň gowy görkezilen BiLSTM nusgasy, we LR nusgasy ikinji test üçin iň gowy görkezildi. BiLSTM nusgasy testde 0,51 sany tapdy we resmi sahypalary 8/71 düzüldi.", 'af': "In hierdie papier, ons stel die resultate wat verkry word deur gebruik van twee-rigting lang-term geheue (BiLSTM) met en sonder aandag en Logistiese Regresie (LR) modele vir SemEval-2019 Opdrag 5, genaamd 'HatEval: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrante en Vroue in Twitter'. Hierdie papier stel die resultate wat ontvang word vir Subtask A vir Engels taal. Die resultate van die BiLSTM en LR-modelles word vergelyk vir twee verskillende tipes voorbereiding. Een met geen stemming uitgevoer en geen stopwoorde verwyder nie. Die ander met stamming uitgevoer en stopwoorde verwyder. Die BiLSTM model sonder aandag het die beste vir die eerste toets uitgevoer, terwyl die LR model met karakter n- grams die beste vir die tweede toets uitgevoer het. Die BiLSTM model het 'n F1 telling van 0.51 ontvang op die toets stel en 'n offisiele ranging van 8/71 ontvang.", 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք արդյունքները, որոնք ստացվել են օգտագործելով երկու ուղղությամբ երկարաժամկետ հիշողություն (ԲիԼՍԹՄ), ուշադրության հետ և առանց ուշադրության և Լոգիստիկ ռեգրեսիայի (ԼՌ) մոդելներ, որոնք օգտագործվում են Սեմեվալ 2019-ի 5-ի հանձնարարությամբ, որը կոչվում է «Վատասխանատվո Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է Անգլերենի A-ի ենթախնդրի արդյունքները: ԲիLSԹՄ և LR մոդելների արդյունքները համեմատում են նախամշակումների երկու տարբեր տեսակների համար: Առաջինը, որն առանց ընթացքի, առանց վերացման բառերի: Մյուսը կատարվում է հետևյալներով և հեռացվում են կանգբառերը: ԲիLSԹ մոդելը առանց ուշադրության առաջին փորձի համար լավագույնը կատարեց, մինչդեռ LR մոդելը, որն ունի n-գրամը, կատարեց երկրորդ փորձի լավագույնը: The BiLSTM model obtained an F1 score of 0.51 on the test set and obtained an official ranking of 8/71.', 'sq': "Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim rezultatet e arritura duke përdorur kujtesën dy-drejtuese afat-shkurtër afat-gjatë (BiLSTM) me dhe pa vëmendje dhe modele të Regresionit Logjik (LR) për SemEval-2019 Task 5 titulluar 'HatEval: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women on Twitter'. Ky dokument paraqet rezultatet e fituara për Subtask A për gjuhën angleze. The results of the BiLSTM and LR models are compared for two different types of preprocessing.  Një pa kryer gjurmë dhe pa hequr fjalë ndaluese. Tjetri me kryerje dhe heqjen e fjalëve të ndaluara. Modeli BiLSTM pa vëmendje bëri më të mirën për testin e parë, ndërsa modeli LR me karakter n-gram bëri më të mirën për testin e dytë. Modeli BiLSTM mori një rezultat F1 0.51 në grupin e testit dhe mori një renditje zyrtare 8/71.", 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ለሴmEval-2019 ስራ “HatEval: በተሰደዱት እና ሴቶችን ላይ የሚቃወም የጥል ቋንቋ እና ጥላቻ እና ጥላቻን የሚናገር የጥላቻ ቋንቋ አወቅት የተገኘውን ፍቺኮችን እና ያለ ማስታወቂያ እና የሎጂካዊ መግለጫ (LR) ሞዴላዎችን እና አቀረብናለን፡፡ ይህ ፕሮግራም ለደብዳቤ አ ለመንግሊዝኛ ቋንቋ የተገኘውን ፍሬዎችን ያሳያል፡፡ የቢልSTM እና የLR ዓይነቶች ውጤቶች ለሁለት ልዩ ዓይነቶች ይተካከላሉ። የመስመር ቃላት ያልተፈጸመ እና የማይሰራ The other with stemming performed and stopwords removed.  የቢLSTM ሞዴል ያለ ማስታወቂያ ለመጀመሪያው ፈተና የተሻለ ነው፡፡ የቢልSTM ሞዴል በፈተናው ላይ የ0.51 ነጥብ አግኝቶ 8/71 ባለሥልጣን ደረጃ አገኘ።', 'ca': 'En aquest paper, presentem els resultats obtenits usant la memòria bidireccional a curt termini (BiLSTM) amb i sense atenció i models de regressió logística (LR) per la tasca 5 de SemEval-2019 titulada "HatEval: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women on Twitter". This paper presents the results obtained for Subtask A for English language.  Els resultats dels models BiLSTM i LR es comparen per dos tipus diferents de preprocessos. Una sense aparell i sense paraules paraules eliminades. L\'altre amb paraules arrelants i eliminades. El model BiLSTM sense atenció va fer el millor per la primera prova, mentre el model LR amb caracter n-grams va fer el millor per la segona prova. El model BiLSTM va obtenir una puntuació F1 de 0,51 en el conjunt de provas i va obtenir una puntuació oficial de 8/71.', 'az': "Bu kağıtda, ikiyönəlmiş qısa sürəkli yadına (BiLSTM) istifadə edilən sonuçları, halının paylaşılması və lojistik regresiya modelləri ilə təmin edirik. 5. Gözəldən 'HatEval: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter' adlı Cənnətdə olan 'HatEval: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women'. Bu kağıt A Subtask üçün İngilizce dili üçün alınan sonuçlarını göstərir. BiLSTM və LR modellərin sonuçları iki cür əvvəlcə işləmə növlərinə salınır. Süfür edilməyən və heç kəs istifadə edilməyən kəslər yoxdur. Digəri istifadə edilən və dəf sözləri alındı. BiLSTM modeli ilk sınamaq üçün ən yaxşı işlədi, lakin LR modeli n-gram karakteri ilə ikinci sınamaq üçün ən yaxşı işlədi. BiLSTM modeli sınama qutusında 0,51 dəfə F1 dəfə qəbul etdi və 8/71 dəfə resmi dəfə qəbul etdi.", 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিসরাসরি দীর্ঘমেয়াদ স্মৃতি ব্যবহারের ফলাফল উপস্থাপন করি এবং তাদের মনোযোগ ছাড়া আর লোজিক্সিক নিয়ন্ত্রণ (এলআর) মডেল দেখাচ্ছি যার শিরোনাম “ঘৃণা: অভিবাসী এবং নারীদের বিরুদ্ধে  এই পত্রিকাটি ইংরেজি ভাষার জন্য সাবম্যাস এ-এর ফলাফল প্রদান করেছে। বিএলস্টিএম এবং এলআর মডেলের ফলাফল দুটি ভিন্ন ধরনের প্রক্রিয়ার তুলনা করা হয়েছে। কোন স্টোমিং নেই এবং কোন স্টপওয়ার্ড অপসারণ করা হয়নি। অন্যদের স্ট্যামিং করা হয়েছে এবং শব্দ অপসারণ করা হয়েছে। মনোযোগ ছাড়াই বিএলস্টিম মডেল প্রথম পরীক্ষার জন্য সর্বোচ্চ পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করেছে, কিন্তু দ্বিতীয় পরীক্ষার জন্যে LR মডেল প্রদর বিএলস্টিএম মডেল পরীক্ষার সেটে ০. ৫১ স্কোর পেয়েছে এবং ৮/৭১ এর অফিসিয়াল রেঙ্ক পেয়েছে।', 'bs': "U ovom papiru predstavljamo rezultate dobiveni korištenjem dvosmjernog kratkoročnog sjećanja (BiLSTM) sa modelima logističke regresije (LR) za pola Evala-2019 zadatak 5 pod nazivom 'HatEval: Multilingual Detection of hate speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter'. Ovaj papir predstavlja rezultate dobiveni za podzadatak A za engleski jezik. Rezultati modela BiLSTM i LR se uspoređuju za dvije različite vrste preobrade. Jedan bez naglasaka izvršen i bez zaustavljanja riječi uklonjene. Drugi sa nastavkom izvršenim i uklonjenim prestanačnim riječima. Model BiLSTM bez pažnje izvršio je najbolje za prvi test, dok je model LR s karakterom n-grama izvršio najbolje za drugi test. Model BiLSTM dobio je rezultat F1 od 0,51 na testu i dobio službenu redovitost od 8/71.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame tulemusi, mis on saadud kahesuunalise pikaajalise lühiajalise mälu (BiLSTM) abil koos tähelepanu- ja logistilise regressiooni (LR) mudelitega SemEval-2019 ülesande 5 pealkirjaga "HatEval: mitmekeelne vihkamiskõne tuvastamine sisserändajate ja naiste vastu Twitteris". Käesolevas töös esitatakse tulemusi, mis on saadud alamülesanne A inglise keele. BiLSTM ja LR mudelite tulemusi võrreldakse kahe eri tüüpi eeltöötluse puhul. Üks, kus ei ole tehtud tühjendamist ja ei eemaldatud peatussõnu. Teine koos lõikamisega ja peatussõnadega eemaldatud. Esimese katse puhul oli parim BiLSTM mudel tähelepanuta, teise katse puhul parim tähemärgiga LR mudel. BiLSTM mudel sai F1 skoori 0,51 testikomplektis ja sai ametliku edetabeli 8/71.', 'fi': "Tässä artikkelissa esitellään tulokset, jotka on saatu käyttämällä kaksisuuntaista pitkän aikavälin muistia (BiLSTM) huomiolla ja ilman huomiota ja logistista regressiota (LR) -malleja SemEval-2019 Task 5 otsikolla 'HatEval: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitterissä'. Tässä artikkelissa esitellään tulokset, jotka on saatu alatehtävästä A englannin kielellä. BiLSTM- ja LR-mallien tuloksia verrataan kahteen eri esiprosessointityyppiin. Sellaista, jossa ei ole tehty jarrutusta eikä pysähdyksiä poistettu. Toinen, jossa jarrutus suoritettu ja pysäytyssanat poistettu. BiLSTM-malli ilman huomiota suoriutui parhaiten ensimmäisessä testissä, kun taas LR-malli, jossa on merkki n-grammia, suoriutui parhaiten toisessa testissä. BiLSTM-malli sai F1-pisteen 0,51 testisarjassa ja virallisen sijoituksen 8/71.", 'cs': "V tomto článku prezentujeme výsledky získané pomocí obousměrné dlouhodobé paměti (BiLSTM) s pozorností a bez pozornosti a logistické regrese (LR) modelů pro SemEval-2019 Task 5 s názvem 'HatEval: vícejazyčná detekce nenávistné řeči proti přistěhovalcům a ženám na Twitteru'. Tento článek prezentuje výsledky získané pro Subúlohu A pro anglický jazyk. Výsledky modelů BiLSTM a LR jsou porovnány pro dva různé typy předzpracování. Takový, který není proveden žádným zápisem a nebyl odstraněn. Ten druhý s provedením kmenování a odstraněním slov. Model BiLSTM bez pozornosti provedl nejlepší při prvním testu, model LR se znakem n-gramy nejlépe vykonal pro druhý test. Model BiLSTM získal F1 skóre 0,51 na testovací sadě a získal oficiální hodnocení 8/71.", 'ha': 'Daga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da matsalar da aka amfani da amfani da lokacin bayani-bayani-daidai-kure (BiLStM) tãre da kuma bã da saurãre da kuma kuma ma\'anar Logistic Regression (LR) wa Shirin na Semeval-2019, ana sunan "Hat-al\'a: Kullum Jarrabi\'a na Kulamawa na Nake Agare Imrantai da mãtã a cikin Twitter". Wannan takardan na bãyar da matsalar da aka samu wa Subaikin A wa harshen Ingiriya. Faramar motsi na BiLSM da LR za\'a daidaita wa nau\'i biyu daban-daban. One with no stemming performed and no stopwords removed.  @ info: whatsthis @ action: button Moden BiLStM ya motsa wata F1 nau\'i na 0.51 kan jarraba kuma ya sami wata rasmi na rubutu 8/71.', 'sk': "V prispevku predstavljamo rezultate, pridobljene z uporabo dvosmernega dolgoročnega kratkoročnega pomnilnika (BiLSTM) z in brez pozornosti in modelov logistične regresije (LR) za nalogo 5 SemEval-2019 z naslovom 'HatEval: večjezično odkrivanje sovražnega govora proti priseljencem in ženskam v Twitterju'. V prispevku so predstavljeni rezultati podnaloge A za angleški jezik. Rezultate modelov BiLSTM in LR primerjamo za dve različni vrsti predobdelave. Takšnega brez izvedbe stebla in brez odstranjenih zastojev. Drugi z izvedbo stemming in odstranitvijo zastojnih besed. Model BiLSTM brez pozornosti je bil najboljši za prvi test, model LR z znakom n-grami pa je bil najboljši za drugi test. Model BiLSTM je na testiranju dosegel rezultat F1 0,51 in uradno razvrstitev 8/71.", 'bo': "In this paper, we present the results obtained using bi-directional long-term memory (BiLSTM) with and without attention and Logistic Regression (LR) models for SemEval-2019 Task 5 titled 'HatEval: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter'. ཤོག The results of the BiLSTM and LR models are compared for two different types of preprocessing. ཁྱེར་རྐྱང་མེད་པའི་གཅིག་གིས་ཀྱང་ཁ་ཤས་བསུབ་མི་འདུག འདི་གཞན་པ་ཞིག་ལ་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད་རྩོམ་པ་དང་མཚམས་འཇོག་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་བསུབ་དགོས། The BiLSTM model without attention to the first test for the best performed, while the LR model with the character n-grams performed the best for the second test. BiLSTM མ་དབྱིབས་བརྟག་ཞིབ", 'jv': 'Nang pepulan iki, kita mulai mbutuhak kelas telas telas nggawe mentingan langgar sampeyan (BiLTT M) nganggo sistem pakan lan ngakpe nggunakake lan model nggawe Regresyon (LR) di sistem seminval-2011 task 5 terulih \'HAinval: Multilanguage detection of HAE Speaker against Inimigrants and Widow in YouTube\'. pembang ngene kuwi nggawe Perintah dumadhi, cah onh dumadhi lan babagan kelas ngga Gambar iki bakal ngewehke pawartos nggo Subtask A kanggo langkung Inggris. Laptop" and "Desktop Siji ora ono sithik sing bisa ditambah lan ora ono stampen Digawe karo nganggo kelompok lan ngaturang model BiLTT sane sampeyan nganggo sampeyan kanggo teka tualke sampeyan, terus model LR karo cara n-gram sing apik dhéwé kanggo teka segondé. model BiLTT ono wektu kelompok F1 sing 0,31', 'he': "In this paper, we present the results obtained using bi-directional long short-term memory (BiLSTM) with and without attention and Logistic Regression (LR) models for SemEval-2019 Task 5 titled 'HatEval: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter'.  העבודה הזו מציגה את התוצאות שנקבלו עבור Subtask A לשפה אנגלית. התוצאות של דוגמני BiLSTM ו LR שוואות לשני סוגים שונים של התהליך. אחת בלי סיבוב מבצע ולא הוסרו מילים עצר. השני עם מופע מופע ומילים עצר הוסרו. מודל BILSTM ללא תשומת לב ביצע את הטוב ביותר למבחן הראשון, בעוד מודל LR עם אופי n-גרם ביצע את הטוב ביותר למבחן השני. דוגמנית BILSTM השיגה נקודת F1 של 0.51 על קבוצת הבדיקות וקיבלה ציור רשמי של 8/71."}
{'en': 'CIC at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Simple Yet Very Efficient Approach to Hate Speech Detection, Aggressive Behavior Detection, and Target Classification in Twitter', 'fr': 'CIC au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 5\xa0: Approche simple mais très efficace de la détection des discours haineux, de la détection des comportements agressifs et de la classification des cibles sur Twitter', 'es': 'CIC en la Tarea 5 de SemEval-2019: Enfoque simple pero muy eficiente para la detección del discurso de odio, la detección de comportamientos agresivos y la clasificación de objetivos en Twitter', 'ar': 'CIC في SemEval-2019 المهمة 5: نهج بسيط ولكنه فعال للغاية للكشف عن الكلام الذي يحض على الكراهية ، واكتشاف السلوك العدواني ، والتصنيف المستهدف في تويتر', 'pt': 'CIC no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 5: Abordagem simples, mas muito eficiente para detecção de discurso de ódio, detecção de comportamento agressivo e classificação de alvos no Twitter', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 5 पर सीआईसी: ट्विटर में हेट स्पीच डिटेक्शन, आक्रामक व्यवहार का पता लगाने और लक्ष्य वर्गीकरण के लिए सरल अभी तक बहुत कुशल दृष्टिकोण', 'zh': 'CIC at SemEval-2019 务5:Twitter仇言检,攻击性行检类而效', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019タスク5のCIC ：ヘイトスピーチ検出、攻撃的行動検出、およびTwitterのターゲット分類へのシンプルでありながら非常に効率的なアプローチ', 'ru': 'CIC на SemEval-2019 Задача 5: Простой, но очень эффективный подход к обнаружению ненависти к речи, обнаружению агрессивного поведения и классификации целей в Twitter', 'ga': 'CIC ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 5: Cur Chuige Simplí Ach An-Éifeachtach chun Fuath a Thabhairt do Bhrath Cainte, Brath Iompraíochta Ionsaitheach, agus Rangú Sprice ar Twitter', 'ka': 'CIC semiEval-2019 პარამეტრი 5: მხოლოდ მაგრამ ძალიან ეფექტიური დახმარება წარმოდგენისთვის წარმოდგენისთვის, Aggressive Behavior Detection, და Target Classification in Twitter', 'hu': 'CIC a SemEval-2019 5. feladat: Egyszerű, mégis nagyon hatékony megközelítés a gyűlölet beszédfelismeréséhez, az agresszív viselkedés felismeréséhez és a célosztályozáshoz a Twitteren', 'el': 'Καθήκον 5: Απλή αλλά πολύ αποτελεσματική προσέγγιση για την ανίχνευση ομιλίας μίσους, την ανίχνευση επιθετικής συμπεριφοράς και την ταξινόμηση στόχων στο Twitter', 'it': 'CIC al SemEval-2019 Task 5: approccio semplice ma molto efficiente per il rilevamento della voce odiata, il rilevamento del comportamento aggressivo e la classificazione degli obiettivi su Twitter', 'kk': 'CIC тапсырма 5: Қарапайым, бірақ қарапайым тілі анықтау, қарапайым қасиеттерді анықтау, қарапайым қасиеттерді анықтау және Твиттерде мақсатты классификациялау', 'mk': 'CIC на SemEval-2019 задача 5: Едноставен, но многу ефикасен пристап до детекција на говорот на омраза, детекција на агресивно однесување и класификација на метата на Твитер', 'lt': 'CIC pusevalio 2019 m. 5 užduotis: paprastas, tačiau labai veiksmingas požiūris į neapykantos kalbos nustatymą, agresyvaus elgesio nustatymą ir tikslinį klasifikavimą Twitter', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 5: വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരം ഡിറ്റീഷനിലേക്ക് എത്തുന്നത് വളരെ പ്രയാസകരമാണ്, ഗ്രാഗ്രേജിവ് പെരുമാറ്റുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d', 'ms': 'CIC di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Pendekatan Mudah Namun Sangat Efisien untuk Pengesanan Ucapan Kebencian, Pengesanan Perilaku Aggresif, dan Klasifikasi Sasaran dalam Twitter', 'mt': 'CIC f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 5: Approċċ Simpli Iżda Effiċjenti Ħafna għad-Detezzjoni tal-Kellem tal-Mibegħda, Detezzjoni tal-Imġiba Aggressiva, u Klassifikazzjoni tal-Mira fuq Twitter', 'pl': 'Zadanie 5: Proste, ale bardzo skuteczne podejście do wykrywania mowy nienawiści, agresywnego wykrywania zachowań i klasyfikacji celów w Twitterze', 'ro': 'CIC la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 5: Abordare simplă, dar foarte eficientă a detectării vorbirii urâte, detectarea comportamentului agresiv și clasificarea țintelor în Twitter', 'sr': 'CIC na semiEval-2019 zadatku 5: Jednostavni, ali vrlo efikasni pristup otkrivanju govora mržnje, otkrivanju agresivnog ponašanja i ciljnoj klasifikaciji na Twitter', 'no': 'Comment', 'si': 'CIC at HalfEvel-2019 Job 5: Easy but Real Effficent approach to Hate Talk Detection, Aggressive Behavior Detection, and Targe Classication in Twitter', 'so': 'CIC at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Simple still very efficient Approach to Hate Speech Detection, Aggressive Behavior Detection, and Target Classification in Twitter', 'sv': 'CIC på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 5: Enkel men ändå mycket effektiv metod för att upptäcka hattal, upptäcka aggressivt beteende och klassificera mål på Twitter', 'mn': 'ЦИК нь SemEval-2019 Task 5: Харамсалтай ярианы нээлттэй хялбар боловч маш үр дүнтэй ойлголт, эсрэг үйл ажиллагааны нээлттэй, Твиттерийн Цахилгаан Классификаци', 'ta': 'Я«џЯ»єЯ««Я»ЇEval- 2019 Я«фЯ«БЯ«┐', 'ur': 'سی سی ایول-2019 ٹاکس ۵ میں: ناپسندیدہ بات کی آشنائی کے لئے بہت ساده اور بہت اثر کی تقریبا ہے، غیر قابل رفتار کی آشنائی، اور ٹویٹر میں Target Classification', 'uz': '5 Ish stolida CIC:', 'vi': 'CIC tại SemEvl-209 Task 5: tiếp cận đơn giản nhưng rất hiệu quả đến ghét phát hiện Ngôn ngữ, Phát hiện hành vi hung hăng, và Classification trên Twitter.', 'bg': 'Задача 5: Прост, но много ефективен подход към откриване на реч на омраза, откриване на агресивно поведение и класификация на целевите цели', 'da': 'CIC på SemEval-2019 Opgave 5: Enkel, men meget effektiv tilgang til hadeforståelse, aggressiv adfærd detektering og målklassificering i Twitter', 'hr': 'CIC na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 5: Jednostavni ali vrlo efikasni pristup otkrivanju govora mržnje, otkrivanju agresivnog ponašanja i klasifikaciji ciljeva na Twitter-u', 'nl': 'CIC op SemEval-2019 Taak 5: Eenvoudige maar zeer efficiënte aanpak van haatspraakdetectie, agressieve gedragsdetectie en doelclassificatie in Twitter', 'fa': 'CIC در کار ۵ در نیمه Eval-2019: نزدیک بسیار ساده و بسیار تاثیر برای شناسایی سخنرانی از نفرت، شناسایی رفتاری گران و کلاس هدف در توئیتر', 'sw': 'CIC kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 5: Ni rahisi lakini ina ufanisi sana Kutafuta Kuchukia Hotuba, Kutambua tabia za Kiaguzi, na Kutangaza Tarehe kwenye Twita', 'de': 'CIC bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabenstellung 5: Einfacher, aber sehr effizienter Ansatz zur Erkennung von Hassreden, aggressiver Verhaltenserkennung und Zielklassifizierung in Twitter', 'id': 'CIC di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: pendekatan sederhana namun sangat efisien untuk Deteksi Bicara Kebencian, Deteksi Perilaku Aggresif, dan Klasifikasi Target di Twitter', 'ko': 'CIC가SemEval-2019의 임무5: 트위터에서 증오언론검측, 공격행위검측과 목표분류를 간단하고 효율적으로 하는 방법', 'am': 'ስምንት 5:', 'tr': 'CIC at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Simple Yet Very Efficient Approach to Hate Speech Detection, Aggressive Behavior Detection, and Target Classification in Twitter', 'af': 'Cic by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 5: Eenvoudige Nog Baie Effektiewe Toegang na Hatte Spraak Opdekking, Aggressive Gedrag Opdekking, en Teël Klassifikasie in Twitter', 'hy': 'CIC-ը, 2019-ի կիսագնդի 5. հանձնարարությունը. պարզ, բայց շատ արդյունավետ մոտեցում ատելության խոսքի հայտնաբերման, ագրեսիվ վարքագծի հայտնաբերման և Թվիթերի նպատակային դասակարգում', 'sq': 'CIC në SemEval-2019 Task 5: Përqasje e thjeshtë por shumë e efektshme për zbulimin e fjalës së urrejtjes, zbulimin e sjelljes agresive dhe klasifikimin e objektivave në Twitter', 'ca': 'CIC a SemEval-2019 Task 5: Simple but Very Efficient Approach to Hate Speech Detection, Aggressive Behavior Detection, and Target Classification on Twitter', 'az': "CIC'nin yarısı-2019 Görevi 5: Nefrət sözlərini keşfetməyə çox asanlıq, həddi aşmağa çox etkili Yaxınlaşdırma, Agressiv Davranışlar keşfetməsi və Twitter'də Heç Klasifikasiyası", 'et': 'SemEval-2019 ülesanne 5: lihtne, kuid väga tõhus lähenemine vihkamise kõne tuvastamisele, agressiivse käitumise tuvastamisele ja sihtmärkide klassifitseerimisele Twitteris', 'fi': 'CIC SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 5: Yksinkertainen mutta erittäin tehokas lähestymistapa vihapuheen havaitsemiseen, aggressiivisen käyttäytymisen havaitsemiseen ja kohdeluokitukseen Twitterissä', 'bn': 'সিসি সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের ৫: ঘৃণা বাক বক্তব্য সনাক্ত, গুরুত্বপূর্ণ আচরণ এবং টুইটারে টুইটারে টার্গেট ক্লাসিকেশন', 'bs': 'CIC na semiEval-2019 zadatku 5: Jednostavni, ali vrlo efikasni pristup otkrivanju govora mržnje, otkrivanju agresivnog ponašanja i klasifikaciji cilja na Twitter', 'cs': 'Úkol 5: Jednoduchý, ale velmi efektivní přístup k detekci nenávistné řeči, detekci agresivního chování a klasifikaci cílů na Twitteru', 'he': 'CIC ב SemEval-2019 משימה 5: גישה פשוטה אך מאוד יעילה לגלות נאום שנאה, לגלות התנהגות אגרסיבית', 'ha': 'CIC at SemEal-2019 Tafiyar 5: Simle amma Very Effective Approach to Hate Spelling Discection, Aggressive Oppression, and Target Classification in Twitter', 'sk': 'CIC na SemEval-2019 naloga 5: preprost, a zelo učinkovit pristop k zaznavanju sovražnega govora, zaznavanju agresivnega vedenja in klasifikaciji ciljev v Twitterju', 'bo': 'CIC at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Simple Yet Very Efficient Approach to Hate Speech Detection, Aggressive Behavior Detection, and Target Classification in Twitter', 'jv': 'CIC at semiinval-2011 task 5: Simple Yes'}
{'en': 'In recent years, the use of social media has in-creased incredibly. Social media permits Inter-net users a friendly platform to express their views and opinions. Along with these nice and distinct communication chances, it also allows bad things like usage of hate speech. Online automatic hate speech detection in various aspects is a significant scientific problem. This paper presents the Instituto Politcnico Nacional (Mexico) approach for the Semeval 2019 Task-5 [ Hateval 2019 ] (Basile et al., 2019) competition for Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech on Twitter. The goal of this paper is to detect (A) Hate speech against immigrants and women, (B) Aggressive behavior and target classification, both for English and Spanish. In the proposed approach, we used a bag of words model with preprocessing (stem-ming and stop words removal). We submitted two different systems with names : (i) CIC-1 and (ii) CIC-2 for Hateval 2019 shared task. We used TF values in the first system and TF-IDF for the second system. The first system, CIC-1 got 2nd rank in subtask B for both English and Spanish languages with EMR score of 0.568 for English and 0.675 for Spanish. The second system, CIC-2 was ranked 4th in sub-task A and 1st in subtask B for Spanish language with a macro-F1 score of 0.727 and EMR score of 0.705 respectively.', 'ar': 'في السنوات الأخيرة ، ازداد استخدام وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي بشكل لا يصدق. تتيح وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي لمستخدمي Inter-net منصة ودية للتعبير عن آرائهم وآرائهم. إلى جانب فرص الاتصال الرائعة والمميزة هذه ، فإنه يسمح أيضًا بأشياء سيئة مثل استخدام الكلام الذي يحض على الكراهية. يعد الاكتشاف التلقائي لخطاب الكراهية عبر الإنترنت في جوانب مختلفة مشكلة علمية كبيرة. تقدم هذه الورقة نهج المعهد السياسي الوطني (المكسيك) لمسابقة Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al.، 2019) لمسابقة الكشف متعدد اللغات لخطاب الكراهية على Twitter. الهدف من هذه الورقة هو الكشف عن (أ) خطاب الكراهية ضد المهاجرين والنساء ، (ب) السلوك العدواني والتصنيف المستهدف ، لكل من اللغة الإنجليزية والإسبانية. في النهج المقترح ، استخدمنا نموذج كيس من الكلمات مع المعالجة المسبقة (إزالة الكلمات الجذعية وإيقاف الكلمات). قدمنا نظامين مختلفين بأسماء: (1) CIC-1 و (2) CIC-2 لمهمة Hateval 2019 المشتركة. استخدمنا قيم TF في النظام الأول و TF-IDF للنظام الثاني. حصل النظام الأول ، CIC-1 على المرتبة الثانية في المهمة الفرعية B لكل من اللغتين الإنجليزية والإسبانية مع درجة EMR 0.568 للغة الإنجليزية و 0.675 للغة الإسبانية. احتل النظام الثاني ، CIC-2 المرتبة الرابعة في المهمة الفرعية A والأول في المهمة الفرعية B للغة الإسبانية مع درجة ماكرو F1 تبلغ 0.727 ودرجة EMR تبلغ 0.705 على التوالي.', 'fr': "Ces dernières années, l'utilisation des réseaux sociaux a considérablement augmenté. Les réseaux sociaux offrent aux internautes une plateforme conviviale pour exprimer leurs points de vue et leurs opinions. En plus de ces chances de communication agréables et distinctes, il permet également de mauvaises choses comme l'utilisation de discours haineux. La détection automatique en ligne des discours haineux sous divers aspects est un problème scientifique important. Cet article présente l'approche de l'Instituto Politëcnico Nacional (Mexique) pour le concours Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) pour la détection multilingue du discours de haine sur Twitter. Le but de cet article est de détecter (A) les discours de haine contre les immigrants et les femmes, (B) les comportements agressifs et la classification ciblée, à la fois en anglais et en espagnol. Dans l'approche proposée, nous avons utilisé un modèle de sac de mots avec prétraitement (suppression des radicaux et des mots vides). Nous avons soumis deux systèmes différents avec des noms\xa0: (i) CIC-1 et (ii) CIC-2 pour la tâche partagée Hateval 2019. Nous avons utilisé les valeurs TF dans le premier système et TF-IDF pour le second système. Le premier système, CIC-1, a obtenu le 2e rang dans la sous-tâche B pour les langues anglaise et espagnole avec un score EMR de 0,568 pour l'anglais et de 0,675 pour l'espagnol. Le deuxième système, CIC-2, a été classé 4e dans la sous-tâche A et 1er dans la sous-tâche B pour la langue espagnole avec un score macro-F1 de 0,727 et un score EMR de 0,705 respectivement.", 'pt': 'Nos últimos anos, o uso das mídias sociais aumentou incrivelmente. A mídia social permite aos usuários da Internet uma plataforma amigável para expressar seus pontos de vista e opiniões. Junto com essas boas e distintas chances de comunicação, também permite coisas ruins, como o uso de discurso de ódio. A detecção automática de discurso de ódio online em vários aspectos é um problema científico significativo. Este artigo apresenta a abordagem do Instituto Politëcnico Nacional (México) para a competição Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) para detecção multilíngue de discurso de ódio no Twitter. O objetivo deste trabalho é detectar (A) Discurso de ódio contra imigrantes e mulheres, (B) Comportamento agressivo e classificação de alvos, tanto para o inglês quanto para o espanhol. Na abordagem proposta, foi utilizado um modelo bag of words com pré-processamento (stem-ming e remoção de stop words). Submetemos dois sistemas diferentes com nomes: (i) CIC-1 e (ii) CIC-2 para a tarefa compartilhada Hateval 2019. Usamos valores de TF no primeiro sistema e TF-IDF para o segundo sistema. O primeiro sistema, CIC-1 obteve o 2º lugar na subtarefa B para os idiomas inglês e espanhol com pontuação EMR de 0,568 para inglês e 0,675 para espanhol. O segundo sistema, CIC-2, ficou em 4º lugar na subtarefa A e 1º na subtarefa B para o idioma espanhol com uma pontuação macro-F1 de 0,727 e pontuação EMR de 0,705, respectivamente.', 'es': 'En los últimos años, el uso de las redes sociales ha aumentado increíblemente. Las redes sociales permiten a los usuarios de Internet una plataforma amigable para expresar sus puntos de vista y opiniones. Junto con estas buenas y distintas posibilidades de comunicación, también permite cosas malas como el uso de discursos de odio. La detección automática de discursos de odio en línea en varios aspectos es un problema científico importante. Este artículo presenta el enfoque del Instituto Politécnico Nacional (México) para la competencia Semeval 2019 Tarea-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) para la detección multilingüe del discurso de odio en Twitter. El objetivo de este artículo es detectar (A) el discurso de odio contra inmigrantes y mujeres, (B) el comportamiento agresivo y la clasificación de objetivos, tanto para el inglés como para el español. En el enfoque propuesto, utilizamos un modelo de bolsa de palabras con preprocesamiento (remoción de palabras clave y eliminación de palabras vacías). Presentamos dos sistemas diferentes con nombres: (i) CIC-1 y (ii) CIC-2 para la tarea compartida Hateval 2019. Usamos valores de TF en el primer sistema y TF-IDF para el segundo sistema. El primer sistema, CIC-1, obtuvo el segundo puesto en la subtarea B para los idiomas inglés y español con una puntuación EMR de 0.568 para inglés y 0.675 para español. El segundo sistema, CIC-2, ocupó el cuarto lugar en la subtarea A y el primero en la subtarea B para el idioma español con una puntuación Macro-F1 de 0.727 y una puntuación EMR de 0.705, respectivamente.', 'ja': '近年、ソーシャルメディアの利用は信じられないほど増加しています。 ソーシャルメディアは、インターネットユーザーが自分の意見や意見を表明するためのフレンドリーなプラットフォームを可能にします。 これらの優れた明確なコミュニケーションの機会に加えて、ヘイトスピーチの使用などの悪いことも可能にします。 さまざまな側面でのオンラインの自動ヘイトスピーチ検出は、重大な科学的問題です。 本稿では、Twitterにおけるヘイトスピーチの多言語検出のためのセムバル2019タスク-5 [Hateval 2019 ]( Basile et al., 2019)コンペティションのためのInstituto Politëcnico Nacional (Mexico)アプローチを紹介する。 この論文の目的は、(A)移民と女性に対するヘイトスピーチ、(B)英語とスペイン語の両方での攻撃的行動とターゲット分類を検出することです。 提案されたアプローチでは、前処理（ステムミングと停止語の除去）を備えた言葉のバッグモデルを使用しました。 (i) CIC -1、(ii) Hateval 2019の共有タスクのためのCIC -2の2つの異なるシステムの名前を提出しました。 第1系統はTF値、第2系統はTF - IDFを使用した。 最初のシステムであるCIC -1は、英語とスペイン語の両方でサブタスクBで2位になり、EMRスコアは英語が0.568、スペイン語が0.675でした。 2番目のシステムであるCIC -2は、スペイン語のサブタスクAで4位、サブタスクBで1位にランク付けされ、マクロF 1スコアは0.727、EMRスコアは0.705であった。', 'hi': 'हाल के वर्षों में, सोशल मीडिया का उपयोग अविश्वसनीय रूप से इन-क्रीज़ किया गया है। सोशल मीडिया इंटर-नेट उपयोगकर्ताओं को अपने विचारों और विचारों को व्यक्त करने के लिए एक दोस्ताना मंच की अनुमति देता है। इन अच्छे और अलग संचार अवसरों के साथ, यह हेट स्पीच के उपयोग जैसी बुरी चीजों की भी अनुमति देता है। विभिन्न पहलुओं में ऑनलाइन स्वचालित घृणा भाषण का पता लगाना एक महत्वपूर्ण वैज्ञानिक समस्या है। यह पेपर ट्विटर पर हेट स्पीच के बहुभाषी पता लगाने के लिए सेमेवल 2019 टास्क -5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) प्रतियोगिता के लिए Instituto Politçcnico Nacional (मेक्सिको) दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करता है। इस पेपर का लक्ष्य (ए) आप्रवासियों और महिलाओं के खिलाफ नफरत भाषण का पता लगाना है, (बी) आक्रामक व्यवहार और लक्ष्य वर्गीकरण, अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश दोनों के लिए। प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण में, हमने प्रीप्रोसेसिंग (स्टेम-मिंग और स्टॉप वर्ड्स रिमूवल) के साथ शब्दों के मॉडल के एक बैग का उपयोग किया। हमने नामों के साथ दो अलग-अलग प्रणालियों को प्रस्तुत किया: (i) सीआईसी -1 और (ii) हेटवल 2019 साझा कार्य के लिए सीआईसी -2। हमने पहली प्रणाली में TF मानों और दूसरी प्रणाली के लिए TF-IDF का उपयोग किया। पहली प्रणाली, सीआईसी -1 को अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश दोनों भाषाओं के लिए सबटास्क बी में दूसरा स्थान मिला, जिसमें अंग्रेजी के लिए 0.568 और स्पेनिश के लिए 0.675 का ईएमआर स्कोर था। दूसरी प्रणाली, सीआईसी -2 को क्रमशः 0.727 के मैक्रो-एफ 1 स्कोर और 0.705 के ईएमआर स्कोर के साथ स्पेनिश भाषा के लिए उप-कार्य ए में 4 वें और सबटास्क बी में पहला स्थान दिया गया था।', 'ru': 'В последние годы использование социальных сетей невероятно возросло. Социальные сети позволяют пользователям Интернета дружественной платформы выражать свои взгляды и мнения. Наряду с этими приятными и отчетливыми шансами на общение, он также допускает плохие вещи, такие как использование ненавистнических высказываний. Онлайн автоматическое обнаружение ненавистнических высказываний в различных аспектах является значительной научной проблемой. В этой статье представлен подход Instituto Politëcnico Nacional (Мексика) для задачи Semeval 2019-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) конкурса на многоязычное обнаружение ненавистнической речи в Twitter. Целью настоящего документа является выявление (A) ненавистнических высказываний в отношении иммигрантов и женщин, (B) агрессивного поведения и целевой классификации как для английского, так и для испанского языка. В предлагаемом подходе мы использовали модель мешка слов с предварительной обработкой (удаление стеблевых и стоповых слов). Мы представили две различные системы с названиями: (i) CIC-1 и (ii) CIC-2 для совместной задачи Hateval 2019. Мы использовали значения TF в первой системе и TF-IDF для второй системы. Первая система, CIC-1, получила 2-е место в подзадаче B как для английского, так и для испанского языков с баллом EMR 0,568 для английского и 0,675 для испанского. Вторая система, CIC-2, занимала 4-е место в подзадаче A и 1-е место в подзадаче B для испанского языка с баллом макро-F1 0,727 и баллом EMR 0,705 соответственно.', 'zh': '近年以来,社交媒体用已困难以置信。 社交媒体许Inter-net用户有好平台以达其说。 除此独通机外,还许诸如用恶言。 在线自仇言检测,各为大科学。 本文言Instituto Politëcnico Nacional(墨西哥)于Twitter上Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019](Basile等,2019)恨言多言检竞之法。 本文者,检(A)移民妇人之仇言,(B)英语西班牙语之攻击性行也。 凡所建白,用一带预处理(stem-ming及停词删)单词袋。 二者异统,名曰:(i)CIC-1与(ii)Hateval 2019共其CIC-2。 吾于第一统中用 TF 直,于第二统中用 TF-IDF。 初统,CIC-1于英语、西班牙语子职B第二,英语EMR分为0.568,西班牙语为0.675。 其二统,CIC-2排名第4于西班牙语子A,排名第4于子职B中,宏观F1得分为0.727、EMR为0.705。', 'ga': "Le blianta beaga anuas, tá méadú thar cuimse tagtha ar úsáid na meán sóisialta. Ceadaíonn na meáin shóisialta ardán cairdiúil d'úsáideoirí Inter-net a gcuid tuairimí agus tuairimí a chur in iúl. Mar aon leis na seansanna deasa agus sainiúla cumarsáide seo, ceadaíonn sé rudaí dona cosúil le húsáid na cainte fuatha. Fadhb shuntasach eolaíoch is ea braite fuathchaint ar líne i ngnéithe éagsúla. Cuireann an páipéar seo cur chuige an Instituto Politëcnico Nacional (Meicsiceo) i láthair don chomórtas Semeval 2019 Tasc-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) maidir le hUrlabhra Ilteangach a Bhrath Is fuath ar Twitter. Is é sprioc an pháipéir seo ná (A) Caint fuatha in aghaidh inimirceach agus ban a bhrath, (B) Iompar ionsaitheach agus sprioc-aicmiú, don Bhéarla agus don Spáinnis. Sa chur chuige atá molta, d’úsáideamar múnla mála focal le réamhphróiseáil (focal a bhaint agus a stopadh). Chuireamar dhá chóras éagsúla isteach a raibh ainmneacha orthu: (i) CIC-1 agus (ii) CIC-2 le haghaidh tasc comhroinnte Hateval 2019. D’úsáideamar luachanna TF sa chéad chóras agus TF-IDF don dara córas. Sa chéad chóras, fuair CIC-1 an 2ú rang i bhfothasc B don Bhéarla agus don Spáinnis le scór EMR de 0.568 don Bhéarla agus 0.675 don Spáinnis. Rangaíodh an dara córas, CIC-2 sa 4ú háit i bhfothasc A agus sa 1ú háit i bhfothasc B don Spáinnis le scór macra-F1 de 0.727 agus scór EMR de 0.705 faoi seach.", 'ka': 'ბოლო წლის შემდეგ სოციალური მედიაზე გამოყენება უკეთესი გახდება. სოციალური მედიაში ინტერნეტი მომხმარებელი საკუთარი პლატატრამის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც საკუთარი ხელსახულებები და მიზეზები გამოსახულებ ამ საშუალო და განსხვავებული კომუნიკაციის შესაძლებლობით, ეს ასევე შეუძლებელია ცოტა რაღაცები, როგორც მპატის სიტყვის გამოყენება. ავტომატიკური მპატის სიტყვების აღმოჩენა განსხვავებული აპექტებში უნიშვნელოვანი მეცნიერო პრობლემა. ამ დოკუნტის შესახებ ინსტუტიო პოლიტექნიკო ნაციონალური (მექსიკო) პროგრამის შესახებ 2019 წლის სამუშაო დავალება-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) კონსპენტირება მრავალური ენერგიური განა ამ დოკუმენტის მიზეზი არის აღმოჩნოთ (A) თმიგრანტების და ქალთან მუშაობის სიტყვა, B) წარმოადგენელი ქცევა და მიზეზი კლასიფიკაცია, ანგლისური და სპანელი. პროცესტის შესახებ, ჩვენ გამოიყენეთ სიტყვების მოდელის ფანჯარა პროცესტის შესახებ (სიტყვების გადასრულება და წაშლა სიტყვების გადასრ ჩვენ ორი განსხვავებული სისტემის სახელებით გადატანა: (i) CIC-1 და (ii) CIC-2 სახელი 2019 წლის სახელი. ჩვენ პირველი სისტემაში და TF-IDF-ში გამოყენეთ TF მნიშვნელობები მეორე სისტემაში. პირველი სისტემა, CIC-1 მიიღეთ მეორე წერტილი B წერტილი ანგლისური და სპანელი ენისთვის, რომელიც EMR წერტილი 0,568 ანგლისური და 0,675 სპანელი. მეორე სისტემა, CIC-2 პროგრამეტში A და 1-ში სპექონული B-ის სპექონული ენაზე, რომელიც 0,727 და EMR სპექტორია 0,705.', 'el': 'Τα τελευταία χρόνια, η χρήση των μέσων κοινωνικής δικτύωσης έχει αυξηθεί απίστευτα. Τα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης επιτρέπουν στους χρήστες του Διαδικτύου μια φιλική πλατφόρμα για να εκφράσουν τις απόψεις και τις απόψεις τους. Μαζί με αυτές τις ωραίες και διακριτές ευκαιρίες επικοινωνίας, επιτρέπει επίσης κακά πράγματα όπως τη χρήση της ομιλίας μίσους. Ηλεκτρονική αυτόματη ανίχνευση φωνής μίσους σε διάφορες πτυχές είναι ένα σημαντικό επιστημονικό πρόβλημα. Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει την προσέγγιση του Ινστιτούτου Πολιτικού Ναcional (Μεξικό) για τον διαγωνισμό για την Πολυγλωσσική Ανίχνευση της ομιλίας μίσους στο Twitter. Στόχος της παρούσας εργασίας είναι η ανίχνευση (Α) της ρητορικής μίσους κατά μεταναστών και γυναικών, (Β) της επιθετικής συμπεριφοράς και της ταξινόμησης στόχων, τόσο στα αγγλικά όσο και στα ισπανικά. Στην προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση, χρησιμοποιήσαμε ένα μοντέλο σακούλας λέξεων με προεπεξεργασία (αφαίρεση λέξεων και παύσης). Υποβάλαμε δύο διαφορετικά συστήματα με ονόματα: (i) και (ii) για κοινή εργασία Hateval 2019. Χρησιμοποιήσαμε τιμές TF στο πρώτο σύστημα και TF-IDF στο δεύτερο σύστημα. Το πρώτο σύστημα, το CIC-1 πήρε τη 2η θέση στην υποταγή Β τόσο για τις Αγγλικές όσο και για τις Ισπανικές γλώσσες με βαθμολογία EMR 0.568 για τα Αγγλικά και 0.675 για τα Ισπανικά. Το δεύτερο σύστημα, CIC-2 κατατάχθηκε 4η στην υποεργασία Α και 1η στην υποεργασία Β για την ισπανική γλώσσα με μακρο-F1 βαθμολογία 0.727 και EMR βαθμολογία 0.705 αντίστοιχα.', 'hu': 'Az elmúlt években a közösségi média használata hihetetlenül nőtt. A közösségi média lehetővé teszi az Inter-net felhasználók számára, hogy barátságosan fejezzék ki véleményüket és véleményüket. Ezekkel a szép és különböző kommunikációs esélyekkel együtt lehetővé teszi a rossz dolgok, mint például a gyűlölet beszéd használata. Az online automatikus gyűlöletbeszéd felismerése különböző szempontokban jelentős tudományos probléma. Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Mexikó) megközelítését a Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) versenyre a Twitteren. A tanulmány célja (A) a bevándorlók és nők elleni gyűlöletbeszéd, (B) az agresszív viselkedés és a célosztályozás felismerése angol és spanyol nyelven egyaránt. A javasolt megközelítésben előfeldolgozással (származás és stop szavak eltávolítása) egy zsákmodellt használtunk. Két különböző nevű rendszert küldtünk be: (i) CIC-1 és (ii) CIC-2 a Hateval 2019 megosztott feladatra. TF értékeket használtunk az első rendszerben és TF-IDF-et a második rendszerben. Az első rendszer, a CIC-1 második helyezést kapott az angol és spanyol nyelvek B részfeladatában, EMR pontszáma 0,568 az angol és 0,675 a spanyol. A második rendszer, a CIC-2 a negyedik helyen állt a spanyol nyelvű "A" alprogramban és az első helyen a spanyol nyelvű "B" alprogramban 0,727 makro-F1 pontszámmal, illetve 0,705 EMR pontszámmal.', 'it': "Negli ultimi anni, l'uso dei social media è aumentato incredibilmente. I social media consentono agli utenti di Inter-net una piattaforma amichevole per esprimere le loro opinioni e opinioni. Insieme a queste belle e distinte possibilità di comunicazione, consente anche cose cattive come l'uso del discorso di odio. Il rilevamento automatico del discorso d'odio online in vari aspetti è un problema scientifico significativo. Questo articolo presenta l'approccio dell'Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Messico) per il concorso Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) per il Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech su Twitter. L'obiettivo di questo articolo è quello di rilevare (A) discorsi d'odio contro immigrati e donne, (B) comportamenti aggressivi e classificazione dei target, sia per l'inglese che per lo spagnolo. Nell'approccio proposto, abbiamo utilizzato un modello di sacchetto di parole con preelaborazione (stemming e stop words removal). Abbiamo presentato due diversi sistemi con nomi: (i) CIC-1 e (ii) CIC-2 per il compito condiviso Hateval 2019. Abbiamo usato valori TF nel primo sistema e TF-IDF per il secondo sistema. Il primo sistema, CIC-1 ha ottenuto il secondo posto nella sottomissione B per entrambe le lingue inglesi e spagnole con punteggio EMR di 0,568 per l'inglese e 0,675 per lo spagnolo. Il secondo sistema, CIC-2 è stato classificato 4 ° nella sottomissione A e 1 ° nella sottomissione B per la lingua spagnola con un punteggio macro-F1 di 0,727 e EMR di 0,705 rispettivamente.", 'lt': 'Pastaraisiais metais social in ės žiniasklaidos naudojimas labai padidėjo. Socialinė žiniasklaida interneto naudotojams suteikia galimybę draugiškai išreikšti savo nuomonę ir nuomonę. Kartu su šiomis gražiomis ir aiškiomis ryšių galimybėmis, tai taip pat leidžia blogus dalykus, pvz., neapykantos kalbos naudojimą. Automatinis neapykantos kalbos aptikimas internetu įvairiais aspektais yra didelė mokslinė problem a. Šiame dokumente pristatomas Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Meksika) metodas 2019 m. pusmečio uždaviniui 5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019 m.) konkursui dėl daugiakalbio neapykantos kalbos aptikimo Twitter. Šio dokumento tikslas – nustatyti A) neapykantos kalbą prieš imigrantus ir moteris, B) agresyvų elgesį ir tikslinę klasifikaciją anglų ir ispanų kalbomis. Siūlomame metode naudojome žodžių model į su išankstiniu apdorojimu (užfiksuojant ir sustabdant žodžių pašalinimą). Mes pateikėme dvi skirtingas sistemas su pavadinimais: i) CIC-1 ir ii) CIC-2 bendrai užduočiai „Hateval 2019“. Pirmojoje sistemoje TF vertės buvo naudojamos ir antrojoje sistemoje TF-IDF. The first system, CIC-1 got 2nd rank in subtask B for both English and Spanish languages with EMR score of 0.568 for English and 0.675 for Spanish.  Antroji sistema, CIC-2, buvo priskirta 4-ajai A ir 1-ajai B paklausai ispanų kalba, o makro-F1 balas buvo atitinkamai 0,727, o EMR balas – 0,705.', 'kk': 'Соңғы жылдарда социалдық медиақтардың қолдануы келмейді. Жалпы медиақтар Интернет пайдаланушыларының көріністерін мен түсініктерін көрсетуге мүмкіндік береді. Бұл жақсы және түрлі коммуникациялық мүмкіндіктерімен бірге, сондай-ақ бұл жаман сөйлемелерді қолдануға мүмкіндік береді. Онлайн автоматты жұмыс сөздерін түрлі аспектерде анықтау - ғылыми мәселе. Бұл қағаз 2019 жылдың жарым-жылдық тапсырма-5 туралы институт политенико национал (Мексика) институты Твиттердегі көптеген тілдердің атқару сөзінің көпшілігін анықтау үшін қарсы көрсетеді. Бұл қағаздың мақсаты - иммигранттер мен әйелдерге қарсы жек сөйлейтін (А) сөйлейтін сөйлейтін сөйлейтін (B), ағылшын және испан тілдеріне қарсы жақсы әрекеттер мен мақсаттау. Келтірілген арқылы, біз алдын- ала өзгерту үшін сөздер үлгісін қолдандық (стемминг және сөздерді өшіруді тоқтатуды). Біз атаулармен екі түрлі жүйелерді жібердік: (i) CIC-1 және (ii) CIC-2 жалпы 2019 жылдың ортақ тапсырмасы үшін. Біз бірінші жүйелік және TF-IDF-де екінші жүйелік үшін TF мәндерін қолдандық. Бірінші жүйе, CIC- 1, ағылшын және Испан тілдерінің алдында 2- жолы B- тілінде, EMR- нәтижесі 0, 568 - ағылшын және 0, 675 - испан тілдеріне. Екінші жүйе, CIC-2, A және 1- тапсырманың A және 1- тапсырмасында, B- тіліне испан тілінің асты сұрауының 4- сынып, 0, 727 және EMR нөмірі 0, 705 деген.', 'ml': 'കഴിഞ്ഞ വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d, സാമൂഹ്യ മീഡിയയുടെ ഉപയോഗം അത്ഭുതകരമായി സൃഷ്ടിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയ ഇന്റര്\u200dനെറ്റ് ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് അവരുടെ കാഴ്ചകളും അഭിപ്രായങ്ങളും പ്രസ്താവിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു സു ഈ നല്ല വ്യത്യസ്തമായ സംസാര സാധ്യതകളോടൊപ്പം, വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് പോലെ മോശം കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക വ്യത്യസ്ത കാര്യങ്ങളില്\u200d സ്വയം വെറുപ്പുള്ള സംസാരം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് ശാസ്ത്രിക പ്രശ്നമാണ്. This paper presents the Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Mexico) approach for the Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) competition for Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech on Twitter.  ഈ പത്രത്തിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം ഇംഗ്ലീഷും സ്പാനിഷും ഇംഗ്ലീഷും ഇംഗ്ലീഷിനും വേണ്ടി വെറുപ്പുള്ള സംസാരം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാനാണ്. പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു ബാഗ് വാക്കുകളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചു (സ്റ്റോമിംഗ് ചെയ്യുന്ന വാക്കുകള്\u200d നീക് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ടു വ്യത്യസ്ത സിസ്റ്റത്തിന് പേരുകള്\u200d നല്\u200dകി: (i) സിസി- 1 (ii) ഹാട്വേല്\u200d 2019 പങ്കുചേര്\u200dത്ത ജോലിക്കായി സിസി ആദ്യത്തെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിലും TF-IDF-ലും നമ്മള്\u200d ടിഎഫ് മൂല്ല്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചു രണ്ടാമത്തെ സിസ്റ്റത്തി ആദ്യ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d സിസി- 1 ഇംഗ്ലീഷും സ്പാനിഷ് ഭാഷകളും എംആര്\u200d സ്കോര്\u200d 0. 568 ഇംഗ്ലീഷിനും 0. 675 സ്പാനിഷിനും വേണ്ടി രണ്ടാമത്തെ സ രണ്ടാമത്തെ സിസ്റ്റത്തെ സിലിസ്റ്റം, സ്പാനിഷ് ഭാഷയ്ക്കുവേണ്ടി സിലിസി- 2 സബ് ജോലി A ലും ആദ്യത്തെ സ്പാനിഷ് ഭാഷയിലും സ്കോര്\u200d എഫ്1 സ്കോര്\u200d 0. 727 നും എ', 'mt': 'F’dawn l-aħħar snin, l-użu tal-midja soċjali żdied b’mod eċċessiv. Il-midja soċjali tippermetti lill-utenti tal-Inter net pjattaforma faċli biex jesprimu l-fehmiet u l-opinjonijiet tagħhom. Flimkien ma’ dawn l-opportunitajiet ta’ komunikazzjoni tajbin u distinti, tippermetti wkoll affarijiet ħżiena bħall-użu ta’ diskors ta’ mibegħda. L-individwazzjoni awtomatika ta’ diskors ta’ mibegħda onlajn f’diversi aspetti hija problem a xjentifika sinifikanti. Dan id-dokument jippreżenta l-approċċ tal-Instituto Politecnico Nacional (il-Messiku) għas-Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) kompetizzjoni għad-Detezzjoni Multilingwi ta’ Diskors ta’ Mibegħda fuq Twitter. L-għan ta’ dan id-dokument huwa li jinstab (A) diskors ta’ mibegħda kontra l-immigranti u n-nisa, (B) imġiba aggressiva u klassifikazzjoni fil-mira, kemm għall-Ingliż kif ukoll għall-Ispanjol. Fl-approċċ propost, użajna borża ta’ mudell ta’ kliem bi proċessar minn qabel (it-tneħħija tal-kliem li jitwaqqfu u li jitwaqqfu). Intbagħtu żewġ sistemi different i bl-ismijiet: (i) CIC-1 u (ii) CIC-2 għal kompitu komuni Hateval 2019. Użat valuri TF fl-ewwel sistema u TF-IDF għat-tieni sistema. L-ewwel sistema, CIC-1 kisbet it-tieni grad fis-sottotalba B kemm għall-Ingliż kif ukoll għall-Ispanjol b’punteġġ EMR ta’ 0.568 għall-Ingliż u 0.675 għall-Ispanjol. It-tieni sistema, CIC-2 kienet ikklassifikata r-raba’ fis-sottokompitu A u l-ewwel fis-sottotalba B għall-lingwa Spanjola b’punteġġ makro-F1 ta’ 0.727 u punteġġ EMR ta’ 0.705 rispettivament.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн жилүүд нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглээ гайхамшигтай нэмэгдсэн. Нийгмийн хэвлэлүүд интернет хэрэглэгчид өөрсдийн үзэл, бодлоо илэрхийлж найзуудтай платформ болгож байна. Эдгээр сайхан, ялгаатай харилцааны боломжтой холбоотой ч мөн үзэн ядах илтгэлийн хэрэглээ зөвхөн муу зүйлсийг ашиглах боломжтой. Онлайн автоматик үзэн ядах илтгэлийг олон асуудлууд нь шинжлэх ухааны асуудал юм. Энэ цаас 2019 оны дундаж зууны 2019 оны ажил-5 (Hateval 2019) (Basile et al., 2019) олон хэл хэл хэлэлцээний яриаг олон хэлний мэдэх өрсөлдөөний аргыг дэвшүүлдэг. Энэ цаасны зорилго нь хөдөлгөөнтүүд, эмэгтэйчүүдийн эсрэг (А) үзэн ядуурлын илтгэлийг олж мэдэх, (B) Англи болон Испанийн хувьд хоёуланг агуулах, зорилготой хуваалцаа. Өөрчлөгдсөн арга хэмжээнд бид өмнө үйлдвэрлэхэд хэдэн үг загварыг ашигласан. Бид хоёр өөр системийг нэрлэж өгсөн: (i) CIC-1 болон (ii) CIC-2 Хатвелл 2019 онд хуваалцагдсан ажил. Бид анхны систем болон TF-IDF-г хоёр дахь системд ашигласан. Эхний систем, CIC-1 нь 2-р англи, Испан хэл хоёуланд 2-р англи хэл болон 0.568-г англи хэл болон 0.675-г авсан юм. Хоёр дахь систем, CIC-2 нь А, 1 дахь дахь асуулт B-д Испанийн хэл дээр 4-р ангид байлаа. Макро-F1 нь 0,727 ба EMR 0,705 тоо байлаа.', 'no': 'I løpet av siste år har bruken av sosiale medier auka utrolig. Sosiale mediar tillèt internettbrukarar ein vennlig plattform å uttrykke sine synar og meningar. I tillegg til desse finte og spesielle kommunikasjonskynse kan det også tillata dårlige ting som bruk av hatespråk. Oppdaging av automatisk hatespråk på nettet i ulike aspektar er eit viktig vitenskapelig problem. Denne papiret viser tilnærminga Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Mexico) for den halvåande 2019 oppgåva-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) for fleirspråksoppdaging av hatspråk på Twitter. Målet på denne papiret er å oppdaga (A) hatespråk mot imigrantar og kvinner, B) Aggresiv atferd og målklassifikasjon både for engelsk og spansk. I den foreslåtte tilnærminga brukte vi ein pakke ord-modell med forhandtering (stammering og stopp fjerning av ord). Vi sendte to ulike systemar med namn: i) CIC-1 og ii) CIC-2 for delt oppgåve i Hateval 2019. Vi brukte TF-verdiar i den første systemet og TF-IDF for den andre systemet. Det første systemet fikk CIC-1 andre rank i subtspørjinga B for både engelsk og spansk språk med EMR- score 0,568 for engelsk og 0,675 for spansk. Den andre systemet, CIC-2 var rankert 4. i underoppgåve A og 1. i subtspørjinga B for spansk språk med makro-F1- poeng med 0,727 og EMR- poeng med 0,705 respectively.', 'pl': 'W ostatnich latach korzystanie z mediów społecznościowych niesamowicie wzrosło. Media społecznościowe umożliwiają użytkownikom internetu przyjazną platformę do wyrażania swoich poglądów i opinii. Wraz z tymi ładnymi i wyraźnymi szansami komunikacji, pozwala również na złe rzeczy, takie jak używanie mowy nienawiści. Automatyczne wykrywanie mowy nienawiści online w różnych aspektach jest istotnym problemem naukowym. W artykule przedstawiono podejście Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Meksyk) do konkursu Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) na Wielojęzyczne Wykrywanie Mowy Nienawiści na Twitterze. Celem artykułu jest wykrycie (A) mowy nienawiści wobec imigrantów i kobiet, (B) zachowań agresywnych i klasyfikacji docelowej, zarówno dla angielskiego, jak i hiszpańskiego. W proponowanym podejściu zastosowaliśmy model worka of words z przetwarzaniem wstępnym (usuwanie słów typu stamming i stop). Przesłaliśmy dwa różne systemy o nazwiskach: (i) CIC-1 i (ii) CIC-2 dla wspólnego zadania Hateval 2019. W pierwszym systemie użyliśmy wartości TF i TF-IDF dla drugiego systemu. Pierwszy system, CIC-1 otrzymał drugą rangę w podzadaniu B zarówno dla języków angielskich, jak i hiszpańskich z wynikiem EMR 0.568 dla angielskiego i 0.675 dla hiszpańskiego. Drugi system, CIC-2 został czwarty w podzadaniu A i pierwszy w podzadaniu B dla języka hiszpańskiego z wynikiem makro F1 0,727 i wynikiem EMR 0,705.', 'mk': 'Во последниве години, употребата на социјалните медиуми се зголеми неверојатно. Социјалните медиуми им овозможуваат на интернет корисниците пријателска платформа да ги изразат своите ставови и мислења. Along with these nice and distinct communication chances, it also allows bad things like usage of hate speech.  Онлајн автоматско детекција на говорот за омраза во различни аспекти е значителен научен проблем. Овој документ го претставува пристапот на Институто Politecnico Nacional (Мексико) за полуевалната задача 2019 [Hateval 2019] (Базил и г. Целта на овој весник е да се открие (А) говорот на омраза против имигрантите и жените, (Б) агресивното однесување и класификацијата на метите, како на англиски, така и на шпански. Во предложениот пристап, употребивме торба со модел на зборови со препроцесор (отстранување на зборовите и спречување). We submitted two different systems with names: (i) CIC-1 and (ii) CIC-2 for Hateval 2019 shared task.  Користевме вредности на TF во првиот систем и TF-IDF во вториот систем. Првиот систем, ЦИЦ-1 доби втор ранг во потпрашањето Б за англиски и шпански јазици со ЕМР оценка од 0,568 за англиски и 0,675 за шпански. The second system, CIC-2 was ranked 4th in sub-task A and 1st in subtask B for Spanish language with a macro-F1 score of 0.727 and EMR score of 0.705 respectively.', 'ro': 'În ultimii ani, utilizarea rețelelor sociale a crescut incredibil. Social media permite utilizatorilor Inter-net o platformă prietenoasă pentru a-și exprima opiniile și opiniile. Împreună cu aceste șanse de comunicare frumoase și distincte, permite, de asemenea, lucruri rele, cum ar fi utilizarea discursului de ură. Detectarea automată online a discursului de ură în diferite aspecte este o problemă științifică semnificativă. Această lucrare prezintă abordarea Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Mexic) pentru concursul Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) pentru detectarea multilingvă a discursului de ură pe Twitter. Scopul acestei lucrări este de a detecta (A) discursul de ură împotriva imigranților și femeilor, (B) comportamentul agresiv și clasificarea țintelor, atât în limba engleză, cât și în limba spaniolă. În abordarea propusă, am folosit un model de sac de cuvinte cu pre-procesare (stemming și stop words removal). Am depus două sisteme diferite cu nume: (i) CIC-1 și (ii) CIC-2 pentru sarcina partajată Hateval 2019. Am folosit valori TF în primul sistem și TF-IDF pentru al doilea sistem. Primul sistem, CIC-1 a obținut locul 2 în subsarcina B atât pentru limbile engleză cât și spaniolă, cu scorul EMR de 0,568 pentru engleză și 0,675 pentru spaniolă. Al doilea sistem, CIC-2 a fost clasat pe locul 4 în subsarcina A și pe locul 1 în subsarcina B pentru limba spaniolă cu un scor macro-F1 de 0,727 și EMR de 0,705 respectiv.', 'ms': 'In recent years, the use of social media has in-creased incredibly.  Social media permits Inter-net users a friendly platform to express their views and opinions.  Bersama dengan peluang komunikasi yang baik dan jelas ini, ia juga membolehkan perkara buruk seperti penggunaan ucapan kebencian. Pengesanan ucapan kebencian secara automatik dalam berbagai aspek adalah masalah saintifik yang penting. Kertas ini memperkenalkan pendekatan Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Mexico) untuk Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) pertandingan untuk Pengesanan Berbahasa Kebencian dalam Twitter. Tujuan kertas ini adalah untuk mengesan (A) ucapan kebencian terhadap imigran dan perempuan, (B) perilaku agresif dan klasifikasi sasaran, kedua-dua untuk bahasa Inggeris dan Sepanyol. In the proposed approach, we used a bag of words model with preprocessing (stem-ming and stop words removal).  We submitted two different systems with names: (i) CIC-1 and (ii) CIC-2 for Hateval 2019 shared task.  We used TF values in the first system and TF-IDF for the second system.  The first system, CIC-1 got 2nd rank in subtask B for both English and Spanish languages with EMR score of 0.568 for English and 0.675 for Spanish.  Sistem kedua, CIC-2 ditangkap ke-4 dalam sub-tugas A dan ke-1 dalam sub-tanya B untuk bahasa Sepanyol dengan skor makro-F1 0.727 dan skor EMR 0.705 sesuai.', 'sr': 'U poslednjih godina, korištenje društvenih medija je neverovatno povećano. Socijalni mediji dozvoljavaju korisnicima interneta prijateljsku platformu da izraze svoje mišljenje i mišljenje. Uz ove lepe i različite šanse komunikacije, takođe omogućava loše stvari poput korištenja govora mržnje. Онлайн автоматично откривање речи мрази у различnim аспектима је значителен научни проблем. Ovaj papir predstavlja pristup Instituta Politecnico Nacional (Meksiko) za polovični 2019. Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) natjecanje za multijezički otkrivanje govora mržnje na Twitter. Cilj ovog papira je otkrivanje (A) govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena, B) Aggresivno ponašanje i ciljne klasifikacije, kako za engleski i španjolski. U predloženom pristupu, koristili smo vreæu reèi model sa preobrazovanjem (uklanjanjem matičnih i zaustavljanjem reèi). Predložili smo dva različita sistema sa imenima: i) CIC-1 i ii) CIC-2 za zajednički zadatak Hateval 2019. Koristili smo vrijednosti TF u prvom sistemu i TF-IDF za drugi sistem. Prvi sistem, CIC-1 je dobio dva reda u podpitanju B za engleski i španjolski jezik sa 0,568 za engleski i 0,675 za španjolski. Drugi sistem, CIC-2 je određen 4. u podzadatku A i 1. u podpitanju B za španjolski jezik sa makro-F1 rezultatom od 0,727 i EMR rezultatom od 0,705.', 'sv': 'De senaste åren har användningen av sociala medier ökat otroligt. Sociala medier ger Inter-net användare en vänlig plattform för att uttrycka sina åsikter och åsikter. Tillsammans med dessa fina och tydliga kommunikationschanser tillåter det också dåliga saker som användning av hattal. Automatisk detektering av hattal online i olika aspekter är ett betydande vetenskapligt problem. Denna uppsats presenterar Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Mexiko) strategi för Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) tävlingen om flerspråkig upptäckt av hattal på Twitter. Syftet med denna uppsats är att upptäcka (A) Hattal mot invandrare och kvinnor, (B) Aggressivt beteende och målklassificering, både för engelska och spanska. I det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet använde vi en påse med ord modell med förbehandling (stamming och stopword removal). Vi skickade in två olika system med namn: (i) CIC-1 och (ii) CIC-2 för Hateval 2019 delad uppgift. Vi använde TF-värden i det första systemet och TF-IDF för det andra systemet. Det första systemet, CIC-1 fick 2:a rankning i subaktivitet B för både engelska och spanska språk med EMR poäng på 0,568 för engelska och 0,675 för spanska. Det andra systemet, CIC-2, rankades 4:a i deluppgift A och 1:a i deluppgift B för spanska språket med en makro-F1 poäng på 0,727 respektive EMR poäng på 0,705.', 'si': 'අන්තිම අවුරුදු වලින්, සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙනවා. සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයානය අන්තර්ජාලය ප්\u200dරයෝජකයන්ට ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ඔවුන්ගේ දර්ශනය සහ හිතාව ප්\u200dරකාශ මේ හොඳ සහ විශේෂ සම්බන්ධ අවස්ථාවක් එක්ක, ඒකෙන් විරෝධ කතාවක් වගේ නරක දේවල් වගේ භාවිත අන්තර්ජාලයේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විවිධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය වි This papers presents the Insto Polictecnico Najonal (Mexico) approach for the Halfeval 2019 Job-5 [Hateval 2019] [Basle et al., 2019) Competition for Multilanguage Detection of Hate Talk on Twitter. මේ පත්තරයේ අලක්ෂාව තමයි (A) ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ ගෑණියන්ට විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ කතාවක් හොයාගන්න, B) සාමාන්\u200dය ව්\u200dයාපාරය සහ අ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා වචන මොඩල් බෑග් එකක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා. අපි නම් තියෙන වෙනස් පද්ධතිය දෙකක් පිළිගත්තා: (i) CIC-1 සහ (i) CIC-2 හැට්වල් 2019 වෙනුවෙන් භාගත වැඩක් වෙනු අපි පළමු පද්ධති සහ TF-IDF පද්ධති වලට TF විශ්වාස කරනවා. පළමුවෙනි පද්ධතිය, CIC-1, ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය සහ ස්පැනිස් භාෂාවන්ගේ අංග්\u200dරීසියෙන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසියෙන් 0.568 අංක්\u200dරීසි දෙවෙනි පද්ධතිය, CIC-2 ස්පැනිස් භාෂාව සඳහා ස්පැනිස් භාෂාව සඳහා ස්පැනිස් භාෂාව සඳහා ස්ක්\u200dරෝෆ්1 ස්කෝර් 0.727 සහ EMR ස්කෝර්', 'ur': 'اگلے سالوں میں، سوسیل میڈیا کا استعمال یقیناً زیادہ بڑھا گیا ہے۔ اجتماعی میڈیا انٹرنیٹ کارساز کو ایک دوستی پلٹورم اجازت دیتا ہے کہ اپنی نظریں اور نظریں بیان کریں۔ اور یہ اچھی اور مختلف بات کی شانس کے ساتھ یہ بھی برائی باتوں کو بھی اجازت دیتا ہے جیسے ناپسند بات کا استعمال کرنا۔ آنلاین کی اتمام نفرت کی بات شناسایی مختلف طریقوں میں ایک اہم علمی مسئلہ ہے۔ This paper presents the Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Mexico) approach for the Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) competition for Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech on Twitter. اس کاغذ کا موقع یہ ہے کہ ہجرت کرنے والوں اور عورتوں کے مقابلہ میں ناپسند بات پڑھنا، غریب رفتار اور قسم کا موقع، انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی کے لئے۔ پیشنهاد کی تقریبا میں ہم نے ایک بستی کلمات مدل کو پیش پردازی کے ساتھ استعمال کیا۔ ہم نے دو مختلف سیسٹم کو نام کے ساتھ مستقیم کر دیا: (i) CIC-1 اور (ii) CIC-2 ہٹوئل 2019 کے لئے شریک کار. ہم نے پہلی سیسٹم میں TF ارزش استعمال کی اور TF-IDF دوسری سیسٹم کے لئے استعمال کی۔ پہلی سیسٹم، CIC-1 نے انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی زبانوں کے لئے B کے ساتھ دوسری رقم پائی جو 0.568 انگلیسی اور 0.675 اسپانیایی زبانوں کے لئے ہے۔ دوسری سیسٹم، CIC-2، سپٹ-کارس A اور 1 میں سپٹ-پرس B کی زبان میں چوتھا رنگ کیا گیا تھا، جو 0.727 اور 0.705 کے EMR اسکور میں ہے.', 'so': 'Sannadihii ugu danbeeyey, isticmaalka shabakada bulshada ayaa si khatar ah u abuurtay. Macluumaadka bulshada ayaa isticmaalayaasha Internetka si ay u muujiyaan aragtidooda iyo fikirkooda. Along with these nice and distinct communication chances, it also allows bad things like usage of hate speech.  Internetka waxaa laga helaa macluumaad aad u weyn oo ku saabsan hadalka nebcaadiga ah oo iskuulka ah. Kanu warqaddan wuxuu ka muujiyaa qaabilaada xafiiska Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) ee u qayb gala qeybta luqadaha badan ee Hate Speech Twitterka. Ujeedada warqaddan waa in la ogaado (A) hadal nebcaadi ah oo ka gees ah dadka dalka u soo guuray iyo dumarka, (B) tababar horumar ah iyo fasax, Ingiriis iyo Isbanish. Dhaqdhaqaaqa la soo jeeday, waxaynu isticmaalnay muusiko hadal ah oo ka hor baaraandegista (codsiga iyo joojinta hadallada iska qaadista). Waxaan u soo dhiibnay laba nidaam oo kala duduwan oo magacyo leh: (i) CIC-1 iyo (ii) CIC-2 ee hawsha la qaybsaday Hateval 2019. Waxaynu isticmaalnay qiimaha TF ee nidaamka kowaad iyo TF-IDF nidaamka labaad. Isbanishka ugu horeeyay, CIC-1 waxay leedahay darajada labaad ee sub-safka B, afka ingiriisiga iyo Isbanish labadooda luqadood oo ay ku qoran EMR score 0.568 Ingiriis iyo 0.675 Isbanishka. Sirtii labaad, CIC-2 waxaa lagu safray 4aad oo lagu qoray sub-task A iyo 1aad oo lagu qoray afka Isbanishka lagu qoray macro-F1 score 0.727 iyo EMR score 0.705.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்திய ஆண்டுகளில், சமூக ஊடகங்களின் பயன்பாடு நம்பிக்கையாக உருவாக்கப்பட்டது. Social media permits Inter-net users a friendly platform to express their views and opinions.  இந்த நல்ல மற்றும் வேறுபட்ட தொடர்பு வாய்ப்புகளுடன், அது வெறுப்பு பேச்சின் பயன்பாடு போன்ற கெட்ட விஷயங்களை அன வேறு விஷயங்களில் தானாகவே வெறுப்பு பேச்சை கண்டுபிடிப்பது ஒரு முக்கியமான அறிவியல் பிரச்சனை. இந்த காகிதம் தொடர்பில் வெறுப்பு பேச்சை கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான நிறுவனம் மெக்சிகோ (மெக்சிகோ) செமெம்வால் 2019 செயல்-5 [ஹாட்வெல் 2019] (பாஸைல் et al., 2019) பேசில்  இந்த காகிதத்தின் இலக்கு என்னவென்றால் (A) குடியாளிகள் மற்றும் பெண்களுக்கு எதிரான பேச்சை கண்டுபிடி பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட நெறிமுறையில், நாங்கள் முன்செயல்படுத்தும் ஒரு பாக்கு வார்த்தை மாதிரியை பயன்படுத்தி ( நாங்கள் இரண்டு வித்தியாசமான அமைப்புகள் பெயர்களுடன் கூறினோம்: (i) சிசி- 1 மற்றும் (ii) சிசி- 2 ஹாட்வெல் 2019 பகிர்ந்த பண நாங்கள் முதல் அமைப்பில் TF மதிப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி மற்றும் TF-IDF இரண்டாவது கணினியில் பயன்படுத்தினோம். @ info இரண்டாவது அமைப்பு, CIC- 2 துணை பணி A மற்றும் ஸ்பானிஷ் மொழிக்கான துணை பணி B ல் 4வது நிறுவப்பட்டது, மேக்ரோ- F1 புள்ளி 0. 727 மற்றும் EMR மதிப்பு 0. 705 ஆகும்.', 'uz': "Yaqinda yillarda, shamol medyaya foydalanish juda ajoyib narsa yaratiladi. Name Bu ajoyib va ajoyib aloqa imkoniyatlari bilan, bu yomon narsalarning foydalanishiga ruxsat beradi. Online automatic hate speech detection in various aspects is a significant scientific problem.  Bu qoʻllar Twitterda Hat Speech ta'sirishini Multilingua Tilni qidirish uchun Instituto Politecnico Nazional (Mexico) rivojlanishini koʻrsatiladi. Bu qogʻozning maqsadi, muhожирлар va ayollarni aniqlash (A) yolg'on gapirishini ko'rsatish mumkin, (B) Ingliz va Ispanchaga gapiruvchi harakat qilish va darajalashni anglat. Mavjud soʻzda, biz bir so'zlar modelini oldin boshqarish bilan foydalanamiz. Biz ikkita boshqa tizim nomlari bilan joʻnatilgan: (i) Hateval 2019 uchun CIC-1 va (ii) CIC-2. Biz birinchi tizimda TF qiymatlarini, ikkinchi tizimga TF-IDF qiymatdan foydalanamiz. Birinchi tizim, CIC-1 ingliz va Ispanchadan ham eng tilda EMR scori 0. 568 va Ispanchaga 0. 675 darajasi bo'lgan birinchi darajada ikkinchi darajaga ega. Ikkinchi tizim, CIC-2 turi 0. 727 va EMR scori 0. 705 darajasi 0. 705 boʻyicha Ispanchadan tub vazifa A va birinchi vazifa B tilida.", 'vi': 'Trong những năm gần đây, việc sử dụng các phương tiện xã hội đã tăng lên đáng kinh ngạc. Các phương tiện truyền thông xã hội cho người dùng mạng một nền tảng thân thiện để phát biểu quan điểm và ý kiến. Cùng với những cơ hội giao tiếp đẹp đẽ và khác biệt này, nó cũng cho phép những thứ xấu xa như sử dụng ngôn ngữ thù ghét. Phát hiện trực tuyến ngôn ngữ ghét trực tiếp trong nhiều khía cạnh khác nhau là một vấn đề khoa học quan trọng. Bài viết này giới thiệu về phương pháp trinh sát trung học Quốc gia (Mexico) cho nhiệm vụ bắt đầu tại Semeval 2009 (Hateval 2009), (Basile et al., 2009) đối đầu với việc trinh sát ngôn ngữ đa ngôn ngữ về ghét diễn văn trên Twitter. Mục tiêu của bài báo này là phát hiện biểu ghét đối với người nhập cư và phụ nữ (B) Hành vi hung hãn và phân loại mục tiêu, cả cho người Anh và Tây Ban Nha. Trong phương pháp đề nghị, chúng tôi sử dụng một túi đựng từ điển trong việc xử lý trước (gỡ bỏ các từ ngữ gốc và dừng lại). Chúng tôi đã gửi hai hệ thống khác nhau với tên: i) CIC-1 và giây) CIC-2 cho tác vụ Hateval xứng đáng bị chia sẻ. Chúng tôi sử dụng giá trị TF trong lần đầu và TF-IDF cho lần thứ hai. Hệ thống đầu tiên, CIC-1 có hàm thứ hai theo thứ B, cho cả tiếng Anh và Tây Ban Nha với số EMR ghi số 0.58 cho tiếng Anh và 0.675 cho tiếng Tây Ban Nha. Hệ thống thứ hai, CIC-2 được phân loại thứ tư trong phân nhiệm vụ A và thứ nhất thuộc dạng B cho ngôn ngữ Tây Ban Nha với tỉ số macro-F1 ghi số 0.727 và EMR ghi số 0.705.', 'nl': 'De afgelopen jaren is het gebruik van social media enorm toegenomen. Social media biedt Internetgebruikers een vriendelijk platform om hun mening en mening te uiten. Samen met deze mooie en duidelijke communicatiekansen, laat het ook slechte dingen toe, zoals het gebruik van haatspraak. Online automatische haatspraakdetectie in verschillende aspecten is een belangrijk wetenschappelijk probleem. Dit artikel presenteert de aanpak van het Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Mexico) voor de Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) wedstrijd voor meertalige detectie van haatspraak op Twitter. Het doel van dit artikel is om (A) Hate speech tegen immigranten en vrouwen, (B) Agressief gedrag en doelclassificatie op te sporen, zowel voor Engels als Spaans. In de voorgestelde aanpak gebruikten we een zak woordenmodel met voorbewerking (stamming en stop woordverwijdering). We hebben twee verschillende systemen ingediend met namen: (i) CIC-1 en (ii) CIC-2 voor Hateval 2019 gedeelde taak. We gebruikten TF waarden in het eerste systeem en TF-IDF voor het tweede systeem. Het eerste systeem, CIC-1 kreeg 2e rang in subtaak B voor zowel Engels als Spaans met EMR score van 0.568 voor Engels en 0.675 voor Spaans. Het tweede systeem, CIC-2, werd 4e gerangschikt in subtaak A en 1e in subtaak B voor Spaanse taal met een macro-F1 score van respectievelijk 0.727 en EMR score van 0.705.', 'hr': 'U posljednjih godina, upotreba društvenih medija je nevjerojatno povećala. Društveni mediji dozvoljavaju korisnicima internetske mreže prijateljsku platformu da izraze svoje mišljenje i mišljenje. Uz te lijepe i različite šanse komunikacije, također omogućava loše stvari poput korištenja govora mržnje. Online automatski otkrivanje govora mržnje u različitim aspektima je značajan znanstveni problem. Ovaj papir predstavlja pristup Institutu Politecnico Nacional (Meksiko) za polovični 2019. Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) natjecanje za multijezički otkrivanje govora mržnje na Twitter. Cilj ovog papira je otkriti (A) govor mržnje protiv imigranta i žena, B) Aggresivno ponašanje i ciljno klasifikacije, kako za engleski, tako i španjolski. U predloženom pristupu, koristili smo torbu riječi model s preobrazovanjem (uklanjanjem matičnih i zaustavljanjem riječi). Predložili smo dva različita sustava s imenima: i) CIC-1 i ii) CIC-2 za zajednički zadatak Hateval 2019. Koristili smo vrijednosti TF u prvom sustavu i TF-IDF za drugi sustav. Prvi sustav, CIC-1 dobio je drugi red u podpitanju B za engleski i španjolski jezik s EMR rezultatom 0,568 za engleski i 0,675 za španjolski. Drugi sustav, CIC-2 je određen 4. u podzadatku A i 1. u podpitanju B za španjolski jezik s makro-F1 rezultatom od 0,727 i EMR rezultatom od 0,705.', 'de': 'In den letzten Jahren hat die Nutzung von Social Media unglaublich zugenommen. Social Media ermöglicht Inter-Net-Nutzern eine freundliche Plattform, um ihre Ansichten und Meinungen auszudrücken. Zusammen mit diesen schönen und eindeutigen Kommunikationschancen erlaubt es auch schlechte Dinge wie die Verwendung von Hassreden. Die automatische Online-Erkennung von Hassreden in verschiedenen Aspekten ist ein bedeutendes wissenschaftliches Problem. In diesem Beitrag wird der Ansatz des Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Mexiko) für den Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) Wettbewerb zur mehrsprachigen Erkennung von Hassreden auf Twitter vorgestellt. Das Ziel dieser Arbeit ist es, (A) Hassrede gegen Immigranten und Frauen, (B) Aggressives Verhalten und Zielklassifikation sowohl für Englisch als auch für Spanisch aufzuspüren. In dem vorgeschlagenen Ansatz verwendeten wir ein Sack-of-Words-Modell mit Vorverarbeitung (Stamm-ming und Stop-Words-Entfernung). Wir haben zwei verschiedene Systeme mit Namen eingereicht: (i) CIC-1 und (ii) CIC-2 für Hateval 2019 gemeinsame Aufgabe. Wir verwendeten TF Werte im ersten System und TF-IDF für das zweite System. Das erste System, CIC-1 erhielt den zweiten Rang in Subtask B für Englisch und Spanisch mit EMR-Score von 0.568 für Englisch und 0.675 für Spanisch. Das zweite System, CIC-2, wurde Vierter in Teilaufgabe A und Erster in Teilaufgabe B für spanische Sprache mit einem Makro-F1-Score von 0.727 bzw. EMR-Score von 0.705.', 'da': 'I de seneste år er brugen af sociale medier steget utroligt. Sociale medier giver Inter-net brugere en venlig platform til at udtrykke deres synspunkter og meninger. Sammen med disse gode og tydelige kommunikationsmuligheder tillader det også dårlige ting som brug af had tale. Online automatisk hadefuldtale detektering i forskellige aspekter er et betydeligt videnskabeligt problem. Denne artikel præsenterer Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Mexico) tilgang til Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) konkurrencen om flersproget detektion af had tale på Twitter. Formålet med denne artikel er at opdage (A) Had tale mod indvandrere og kvinder, (B) Aggressiv adfærd og målklassificering, både for engelsk og spansk. I den foreslåede fremgangsmåde anvendte vi en pose of words model med forbehandling (stemming og stopord fjernelse). Vi indsendte to forskellige systemer med navne: (i) CIC-1 og (ii) CIC-2 til Hateval 2019 delt opgave. Vi brugte TF værdier i det første system og TF-IDF til det andet system. Det første system, CIC-1 fik 2. rang i underopgave B for både engelsk og spansk sprog med EMR score på 0,568 for engelsk og 0,675 for spansk. Det andet system, CIC-2 blev rangeret 4. i underopgave A og 1. i underopgave B for spansk sprog med en makro-F1 score på henholdsvis 0,727 og EMR score på 0,705.', 'bg': 'През последните години използването на социалните медии се увеличи невероятно. Социалните медии дават възможност на потребителите на Интернет да изразят своите възгледи и мнения. Заедно с тези приятни и различни възможности за комуникация, тя също позволява лоши неща като използването на реч на омразата. Онлайн автоматичното откриване на реч на омразата в различни аспекти е значителен научен проблем. Настоящата статия представя подхода на Институт Политико Национал (Мексико) за конкурса за многоезично откриване на речта на омразата в Туитър. Целта на настоящата статия е да открие (А) речта на омразата срещу имигранти и жени, (Б) агресивно поведение и целева класификация, както за английски, така и за испански език. В предложения подход се използва модел торба с думи с предварителна обработка (отстраняване на стъбло-минг и стоп думи). Изпратихме две различни системи с имена: (и) ЦИК-1 и (ii) ЦИК-2 за споделената задача на Хатевал 2019. Използвахме стойностите на TF в първата система и TF-IDF за втората система. Първата система получава втори ранг в подзадача Б както за английски, така и за испански език с оценка от 0,568 за английски и 0,675 за испански. Втората система, CIC-2 се класира на 4-то място в подзадача А и на 1-во място в подзадача Б за испански език с макро-F1 резултат съответно 0,727 и EMR резултат 0,705.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 소셜 미디어의 사용량이 급격히 증가하였다.소셜 미디어는 인터넷 사용자들에게 그들의 관점과 의견을 표현할 수 있는 우호적인 플랫폼을 제공한다.이런 아름답고 독특한 의사소통 기회 외에도 원한 발언 등 좋지 않은 일도 허용한다.온라인 자동 증오 음성 검출은 각 방면에서 중대한 과학 문제이다.본고는 멕시코 국립이공대학(Instituto Politecnico Nacional)이 Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019](Basile et al., 2019)가 트위터에서 헤이트 스피치에 대한 다국어 검사 경연대회에서 채택한 방법을 소개한다.본고의 목적은 (A)가 이민과 여성에 대한 증오 발언, (B) 공격 행위와 목표 분류, 영어와 스페인어를 포함한 것을 검출하는 것이다.제시된 방법에서, 우리는 미리 처리된 단어 패키지 모델 (간명과 정지어 삭제) 을 사용했다.Hateval 2019 공유 작업에 사용되는 (i) CIC-1과 (ii) CIC-2 두 개의 이름이 다른 시스템을 제출했습니다.첫 번째 시스템에서는 TF 값을 사용하고 두 번째 시스템에서는 TF-IDF를 사용합니다.첫 번째 시스템은 CIC-1이 영어와 스페인어의 하위 임무 B에서 2위를 차지했고, 영어의 EMR 점수는 0.568, 스페인어의 EMR 점수는 0.675였다.두 번째 시스템은 CIC-2가 하위 임무 A에서 4위, 하위 임무 B에서 1위, 스페인어의 매크로F1 점수는 0.727, EMR 점수는 0.705였다.', 'tr': 'Soňky ýyllar içinde sosyal medýýatlaryň ulanylygy ýagdaýda ynamly bolup ýöredi. Sosyal medýdançalar internetki ulananlaryna öz pikirlerini we düşüneklerini ifade etmek üçin dostluk platformasyna rugsat berýärler. Bu gowy we tapawutlyk komunikaciýa bilen birlikte ýigrenýän çykyş ýaly erbet zatlar üçin rugsat berýär. Çeşitli aspektlerde otomatik ýigrenýän çykyş alynmasy elmi meseledir. Bu kagyz çykyş Politekniko Nacional (Mexico) Instituto Nacional (Mexico) Şablon:Efsany 2019 Taýika-5 Bu kagyzyň maksady göçmenlere we aýallara garşy ýigrenýän sözlerini (A) tanamak, (B) agressy hereket we paýlaşmagy, hem iňlisçe, hem espanyola üçin. Öň teklip eden ýagdaýda, öňden işleýän sözler nusgasyny ulandyk (stam-a çylyk we sözleri çykarmak bilen bes et). Biz isim bilen iki farklı sistemi gönderdik: (i) CIC-1 we (ii) CIC-2 for Hateval 2019 paylaşyk görevi. Biz ilkinji sistemde TF mykdarlary we ikinji sistemde TF-IDF ulladyk. Ilkinji sistem, CIC-1 Iňlisçe we Ispanýolça dilleri üçin 2-nji setir elde etdi, EMR iňlisçe we 0,675 iňlisçe 0,568 eser bilen. Ikinji sistem, CIC-2 sub-zada A we 1-nji sany paýlaşdy we ispanyol dilinde 1-nji sany paýlaşdy we 0.727 we EMR sany 0.705 sany paýlaşdy.', 'sw': 'Katika miaka ya hivi karibuni, matumizi ya mitandao ya kijamii yametengenezwa vizuri sana. Mitandao ya kijamii huruhusu watumiaji wa mtandao wa intaneti jukwaa la urafiki kuonyesha maoni yao na maoni yao. Pamoja na fursa hizi nzuri na tofauti za mawasiliano, pia inaruhusu vitu vibaya kama matumizi ya hotuba ya chuki. Kugundua hotuba ya kujichukia mtandaoni katika mambo mbalimbali ni tatizo kubwa la kisayansi. Makala hii inaonyesha mbinu ya taasisi ya Politecnico Nacional (Mexico) ya Mexico ya Tamko-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) ya mashindano ya Kuchunguza Hotuba ya Hati kwenye mtandao wa Twita. Lengo la gazeti hili ni kutambua hotuba ya chuki dhidi ya wahamiaji na wanawake, (B) tabia za ukatili na lengo la kutangazwa kwa Kiingereza na Kihispania. In the proposed approach, we used a bag of words model with preprocessing (stem-ming and stop words removal).  Tulifanya mifumo miwili tofauti yenye majina: (i) CIC-1 na (ii) CIC-2 kwa ajili ya Hateval 2019. Tulitumia thamani za TF katika mfumo wa kwanza na TF-IDF kwa mfumo wa pili. The first system, CIC-1 got 2nd rank in subtask B for both English and Spanish languages with EMR score of 0.568 for English and 0.675 for Spanish.  Mfumo wa pili, CIC-2 ulikuwa na rangi ya nne katika kazi za subira A na ya kwanza katika kazi B kwa lugha ya Kihispania yenye score ya 0.727 na EMR yenye 0.705.', 'id': 'In recent years, the use of social media has in-creased incredibly.  Media sosial memungkinkan pengguna Inter net platform ramah untuk mengungkapkan pandangan dan pendapat mereka. Along with these nice and distinct communication chances, it also allows bad things like usage of hate speech.  Online automatic hate speech detection in various aspects is a significant scientific problem.  Kertas ini memperkenalkan pendekatan Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Mexico) untuk Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) kompetisi untuk Deteksi Berbahasa Kebencian di Twitter. Tujuan kertas ini adalah untuk mendeteksi (A) pidato benci terhadap imigran dan wanita, (B) perilaku agresif dan klasifikasi sasaran, baik untuk bahasa Inggris maupun Spanyol. Dalam pendekatan yang diusulkan, kami menggunakan tas kata model dengan preproses (stem-ming dan menghentikan penghapusan kata). We submitted two different systems with names: (i) CIC-1 and (ii) CIC-2 for Hateval 2019 shared task.  Kami menggunakan nilai TF dalam sistem pertama dan TF-IDF untuk sistem kedua. Sistem pertama, CIC-1 mendapat peringkat kedua dalam subtask B untuk bahasa Inggris dan Spanyol dengan skor EMR 0,568 untuk bahasa Inggris dan 0,675 untuk bahasa Spanyol. Sistem kedua, CIC-2 diangkat ke-4 dalam sub-tugas A dan ke-1 dalam sub-tanya B untuk bahasa Spanyol dengan skor makro-F1 0,727 dan skor EMR 0,705.', 'sq': 'Në vitet e fundit, përdorimi i medias sociale është rritur shumë. Media sociale lejon përdoruesit e Inter net një platform ë miqësore për të shprehur pikëpamjet dhe opinionet e tyre. Së bashku me këto shanse të bukura dhe të qarta komunikimi, ajo lejon gjithashtu gjëra të këqija si përdorimi i fjalimit të urrejtjes. Gjetja automatike e fjalëve të urrejtjes në internet në aspekte të ndryshme është një problem shkencor i rëndësishëm. Ky dokument paraqet qasjen e Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Meksika) për garën gjysmë-vjeçare 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) për zbulimin shumëgjuhësor të fjalëve të urrejtjes në Twitter. The goal of this paper is to detect (A) Hate speech against immigrants and women, (B) Aggressive behavior and target classification, both for English and Spanish.  Në qasjen e propozuar, ne përdorëm një çantë fjalësh modeli me përdorim të përgatitur. Ne paraqitëm dy sisteme të ndryshme me emra: (i) CIC-1 dhe (ii) CIC-2 për detyrën e përbashkët të Hateval 2019. Ne përdorëm vlerat TF në sistemin e parë dhe TF-IDF për sistemin e dytë. The first system, CIC-1 got 2nd rank in subtask B for both English and Spanish languages with EMR score of 0.568 for English and 0.675 for Spanish.  Sistemi i dytë, CIC-2 u rendit i katërti në nëndetyrën A dhe i parë në nëndetyrë B për gjuhën spanjolle me një pikë makro-F1 prej 0.727 dhe pikë EMR prej 0.705 respektivisht.', 'af': "In die onlangse jaar het die gebruik van sosiale media ongelukkig vergroot. Soziale media laat Internetgebruikers 'n vriendelike platform a toe om hul besigte en besigte te uitdruk. En saam met hierdie mooi en verskillende kommunikasie kanse, laat dit ook slegte dinge toe soos gebruik van haat spreek. Online ële outomatiese haat spraak beskrywing in verskeie aspekte is 'n betekende wetenskaplike probleem. Hierdie papier stel die Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Mexico) toegang voor die semievaal 2019 Opdrag-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) aankondiging vir Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech op Twitter. Die doel van hierdie papier is om (A) haat spreek teen immigrante en vroue te beskry, (B) Aggressiewe gedrag en doel klasifikasie, beide vir Engels en Spaanse. In die voorgestelde toegang het ons 'n sak woorde model gebruik met voorafverwerking (stammering en stop woorde verwyder). Ons het twee verskillende stelsels met naams ingestuur: (i) Cic-1 en (ii) Cic-2 vir Hateval 2019 gedeelde taak. Ons gebruik TF waardes in die eerste stelsel en TF-IDF vir die tweede stelsel. Die eerste stelsel, CIC-1 het tweede rank in subtask B gekry vir beide Engels en Spaanse tale met EMR telling 0.568 vir Engels en 0.675 vir Spaanse. Die tweede stelsel, CIC-2 was rankeer 4de in sub-task A en 1de in subtask B vir Spaanse taal met 'n makro-F1 telling van 0.727 en EMR telling van 0.705 respectively.", 'am': 'ባለፈው ዓመታት፣ የማኅበራዊ አውታር ተጠቃሚ በአደጋጋሚ ነው፡፡ ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ተጠቃሚዎች የራሳቸውን አሳዩና አስተያየትን ለመግለጥ የሚችሉትን ተቃውሞ ይፈቅዳሉ፡፡ በዚህ መልካምና በተለየ መለያየት ምናልባት ደግሞ የጥል ንግግርን ለመጠቀም ይፈቅዳል፡፡ በተለያዩ ጉዳዮች ላይ የጥል ንግግር ማግኘት በመስመር ላይ የሳይንዊ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ ይህም ገጽ የጥል ንግግር ለመጠቀም የብዙልቋንቋ ቋንቋ መፍታት የኢንስቲቲቱዮ ፖሊቲካክኖ ናሲኮ (ሜክሲኮ) ስራ-5 (Hateval 2019)(Basile et al., 2019) ትዊተር ላይ የጥል ቋንቋ መፍትሄን ያቀርባል፡፡ የዚህ ገጽ ጉዳዩ (A) በተሰደዱት እና ሴቶችን ላይ ጥል ንግግር ማግኘት ነው፣ (B) የግል አድራጊ ሁኔታ እና የግልፅ እና ስፓኒሽ ቋንቋ ለማግኘት ነው፡፡ በተዘጋጀው ግንኙነት፣ የቃላት ዓይነት ሞዴል በመቀስቀስ እና ቃላትን ለማስወገድ እና አቋርጠን፡፡ ሁለትን የተለያዩ ስርዓቶች በስማዎች አቀረብን:(i) CIC-1 እና (ii) CIC-2 ለHateval 2019 የተካፈለ ስራ ነው፡፡ We used TF values in the first system and TF-IDF for the second system.  የመጀመሪያው ስርዓት CIC-1 በንግግሊዝና እና ስፓኒስዊ ቋንቋዎች ላይ የኢሜሪክ ደረጃ 0.568 እና ለስፓኒሽ ቋንቋ 0.675 ደረጃ አቀረበ። ሁለተኛይቱ ሲኮ-2 በተለያዩ የስፓኒሽ ቋንቋ በ አዳራሽ ስራ አ እና በመስፈሪያው B ላይ አራተኛ ደረጃ ተደረገ፤ ማክሮ-F1 score በ0.727 እና EMR score 0.705.', 'az': 'Son illərdə sosyal mediyaların istifadəsi inanılmaz olaraq artırıldı. Sosyal media istifadəçiləri öz görünüşünü və fikirlərini ifadə etmək üçün internet istifadəçilərinə dostluq platformu sağlar. Bu yaxşı və müxtəlif əlaqə şansları ilə birlikdə, həmçinin nifrət sözlərinin istifadəsi kimi pis şeylərə də imkan verir. Çeşitli aspektlərdə online avtomatik nefret sözləri keşfetməsi möhkəm elmi problemidir. Bu kağıt 2019-in yarısı çəkilməsi üçün Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Meksiko) tərzini Tövratda çoxlu dilli Nehşi Sözünü keşfetməsi üçün tərzini göstərir. Bu kağıtların məqsədi göçənlərə və qadınlara qarşı nifrət sözlərini tanıtmaq, İngilizce və İspanyolca danışmaq, müharibə davranışları və məqsədilə müəyyən edilmək. Öndərilən tərzdə, əvvəlcə işləmək üçün bir çubuq kelimelər modeli kullandıq (stem-ming və sözləri silmək üçün durduq). Biz adlı iki müxtəlif sistemi təbliğ etdik: i) CIC-1 və ii) CIC-2 Hateval 2019 ilə paylaşılmış i ş. Biz ilk sistemdə TF qiymətlərini və TF-IDF ikinci sistemdə kullandıq. İlk sistem, CIC-1, İspanyol dillərini və İngilizce dillərini və İspanyol dillərini B subtask üçün ikinci dəf aldı. İkinci sistem, CIC-2, A və 1 dəstədə, İspanyolca dili üçün B dəstədə 4 dəstədir. Makro-F1 dəstədə 0,727 və EMR dəstədə 0,705 dəstədir.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোতে সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের ব্যবহার অবিশ্বাস্য সৃষ্টি করেছে। সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যম ইন্টারনেট ব্যবহারকারীদের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি এবং মতামত প্রকাশের জন্য একটি বন্ধুত্ব প্লাটফর্ম প্রদ এই সুন্দর এবং বিভিন্ন যোগাযোগের সুযোগের সাথে এটি ঘৃণা ব্যবহারের মতো খারাপ জিনিসগুলোকে অনুমতি দেয়। বিভিন্ন দিকে অনলাইনে স্বয়ংক্রিয় ভাষণের ঘৃণা আবিষ্কার হচ্ছে বিজ্ঞানিক সমস্যা। এই পত্রিকাটি টুইটারে প্রতিযোগিতার জন্য ইনস্টিটিটো পুলিটেক্কো নাসিকো (মেক্সিকো) সেমেভাল ২০১৯ সালের কাজ-৫ [হাটেভেল ২০১৯] (বাসাইলেট আল, ২০১৯)(বাসা এই পত্রিকার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে অভিবাসী এবং নারীদের বিরুদ্ধে ঘৃণার বিরুদ্ধে বক্তৃতা আবিষ্কার করা এবং ইংরেজি এবং স্প্যানিশের জন্য লক্ষ্যে  প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতিতে আমরা একটি ব্যাগ ব্যবহার করেছিলাম পূর্ব প্রক্রিয়ার মোডেল (স্ট্যামিং এবং শব্দ সরিয়ে নেওয়া থা আমরা দুই বিভিন্ন সিস্টেম নামের সাথে জমা দিয়েছি: (i) সিসি-১ এব (ii) হাতেভাল ২০১৯-এর জন্য সিসি-২ শেয়ার কর্মসূচী We used TF values in the first system and TF-IDF for the second system.  প্রথম সিসি-১ ইংরেজি এবং স্প্যানিশ ভাষার জন্য সিসি-১ দ্বিতীয় বিভাগে দ্বিতীয় ভাষা পেয়েছে ইংরেজি এবং স্প্যানিশের জন্য এমআর দ্বিতীয় সিসি-২ সাব-কাজ A এবং স্প্যানিশ ভাষার জন্য সাব-কাজ বিভাষায় চারতম রান্না করা হয়েছিল, যার মধ্যে ম্যাক্রো-এফ১ স্কোর পরিমাণ 0. 727 এবং এ', 'fa': 'در سالهای اخیر، استفاده از رسانه های اجتماعی به طور باور نکرده است. رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی اجازه می\u200cدهد که استفاده\u200cکنندگان شبکه\u200cهای بین\u200cالملل یک پلاتومپ دوستی باشند تا نظرشان و نظرشان را بیان کند. همچنین با این شانس ارتباطی خوبی و متفاوت، همچنین به کارهای بدی مثل استفاده از سخنرانی متنفر اجازه می دهد. کشف سخنرانی متنفر خودکار در آنلاین در منطقه\u200cهای مختلف یک مشکل علمی بزرگ است. این کاغذ به عنوان رقابت Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Mexico) روش نیمه قرن 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) برای شناسایی سخنرانی دشمنی چندین زبان در توئیتر نشان می دهد. هدف این کاغذ این است که (A) سخنرانی ناخوشایند در برابر مهاجران و زنان، و (B) رفتار ناخوشایند و گروه\u200cهای هدف، هر دو برای انگلیسی و اسپانیایی، شناسایی کنیم. در روش پیشنهاد، ما از یک کیف کلمه مدل با پیش\u200cپردازی استفاده کردیم (استفاده از استفاده از کلمه\u200cها و متوقف کردن کلمه\u200cها). ما دو سیستم متفاوت را با نام\u200cهای مختلف فرستادیم: (i) CIC-1 و (ii) CIC-2 برای کارهای مشترک هتولد 2019. ما از ارزش TF در اولین سیستم و TF-IDF برای سیستم دوم استفاده کردیم. اولین سیستم، CIC-1 درجه دوم در زیر سوال B برای هر زبان انگلیسی و اسپانیایی با امتیاز EMR 0.568 برای انگلیسی و 0.675 برای اسپانیایی گرفته است. سیستم دوم، CIC-2 در زیر کار A و اولین درجه در زیر درخواست B برای زبان اسپانیایی با نمونه Makro-F1 از 0,727 و نمونه EMR از 0,705 درجه گرفته شد.', 'ca': "En els últims anys, l'ús dels mitjans socials ha incrementat increïblement. Els mitjans socials permeten als usuaris d'Inter net una plataforma amigable per expressar les seves opinions. Along with these nice and distinct communication chances, it also allows bad things like usage of hate speech.  La detecció automàtica en línia del discurs d'odi en diversos aspectes és un problem a científic significatiu. Aquest paper presenta l'enfocament de l'Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Mèxic) per a la competició Semeval 2019 Task-5 (Hateval 2019) (Basile et al., 2019) per la detecció multilingüe del discurs d'odi a Twitter. L'objectiu d'aquest article és detectar (A) discurs d'odi contra immigrants i dones, (B) comportament agressiv i classificació d'objectius, tant en anglès com en espanyol. En l'enfocament proposat, vam utilitzar un model de paraules amb la preprocessió. Vam presentar dos sistemes diferents amb noms: i) CIC-1 i ii) CIC-2 per Hateval 2019 tasca compartida. Vam utilitzar valors de TF al primer sistema i TF-IDF al segon sistema. El primer sistema, CIC-1 va rebre el segon rangen la subterrània B per anglès i espanyol amb una puntuació EMR de 0,568 per anglès i 0,675 per espanyol. The second system, CIC-2 was ranked 4th in sub-task A and 1st in subtask B for Spanish language with a macro-F1 score of 0.727 and EMR score of 0.705 respectively.", 'hy': 'In recent years, the use of social media has in-creased incredibly.  Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցները թույլ են տալիս ինտերնետային օգտագործողներին ընկերական հարթակ արտահայտել իրենց կարծիքները և կարծիքները: Այս գեղեցիկ և հստակ հաղորդակցման հնարավորությունների հետ միասին այն նաև թույլ է տալիս վատ բաներ, ինչպիսիք են ատելության խոսքի օգտագործումը: Օնլայն ավտոմատիկ ատելության խոսքի հայտնաբերումը տարբեր ասպեկտներում կարևոր գիտական խնդիր է: Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է 2019 թվականի կեսնամյակի հանձնարարության 5-ի (Բասիլ և այլն., 2019 թվականի) մրցակցությունը Թվիթերում ատելության բազմալեզու հայտնաբերման համար: The goal of this paper is to detect (A) Hate speech against immigrants and women, (B) Aggressive behavior and target classification, both for English and Spanish.  Առաջարկված մոտեցության մեջ մենք օգտագործեցինք բառերի մի շարք մոդել նախամշակումների հետ: Մենք ներկայացրեցինք երկու տարբեր համակարգ անուններով. i) CIC-1 և (i) CIC-2 2019 թվականի Հադարյան ընդհանուր խնդրի համար: We used TF values in the first system and TF-IDF for the second system.  The first system, CIC-1 got 2nd rank in subtask B for both English and Spanish languages with EMR score of 0.568 for English and 0.675 for Spanish.  Երկրորդ համակարգը CIC-2-ն 4-րդ դասակարգում էր Իսպաներեն լեզվի A ենթախնդրի մեջ և 1-րդ դասակարգում՝ Իսպաներեն լեզվի B ենթախնդրի մեջ, որի մակարո-F1 գնահատականը 0,727 է, իսկ ԷՄՌ-ն 0,705 է:', 'et': 'Viimastel aastatel on sotsiaalmeedia kasutamine uskumatult suurenenud. Sotsiaalmeedia võimaldab Interneti kasutajatel sõbralikku platvormi oma seisukohtade ja arvamuste väljendamiseks. Lisaks nendele kenadele ja eristuvatele suhtlusvõimalustele võimaldab see ka halbu asju nagu vihakõne kasutamine. Online automaatne vihakõne tuvastamine erinevates aspektides on oluline teaduslik probleem. Käesolev töö tutvustab Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Mehhiko) lähenemisviisi Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile jt., 2019) konkursil vihakõne mitmekeelse tuvastamise kohta Twitteris. Käesoleva töö eesmärgiks on tuvastada (A) vihkamiskõne sisserändajate ja naiste vastu, (B) agressiivne käitumine ja sihtklassifikatsioon, nii inglise kui hispaania keeles. Kavandatud lähenemisviisis kasutasime eeltöötlusega kott of words mudelit (tüve-ming ja stopp-sõnade eemaldamine). Esitasime Hateval 2019 jagatud ülesandeks kaks erinevat nimega süsteemi: (i) CIC-1 ja (ii) CIC-2. Esimeses süsteemis kasutasime TF väärtusi ja teises süsteemis TF-IDF-i. Esimene süsteem, CIC-1 sai teise astme alamülesandes B nii inglise kui ka hispaania keeles EMR skooriga 0,568 inglise ja 0,675 hispaania keeles. Teine süsteem CIC-2 oli neljandal kohal alaülesandes A ja esimene alaülesandes B hispaania keele makro-F1 skooriga vastavalt 0,727 ja EMR skooriga 0,705.', 'bs': 'U poslednjih godina, upotreba socijalnih medija je nevjerojatno povećala. Socijalni mediji dozvoljavaju korisnicima interneta prijateljsku platformu da izraze svoje mišljenje i mišljenje. Uz ove lijepe i različite šanse komunikacije, također omogućava loše stvari poput korištenja govora mržnje. Online automatski otkrivanje govora mržnje u različitim aspektima je značajan naučni problem. Ovaj papir predstavlja pristup Instituta Politecnico Nacional (Meksiko) za polovični 2019. Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) natjecanje za multijezički otkrivanje govora mržnje na Twitter. Cilj ovog papira je otkrivanje (A) govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena, B) Aggresivno ponašanje i ciljne klasifikacije, kako za engleski i španjolski. U predloženom pristupu, koristili smo vreću reči s preobrazovanjem (uklanjanjem matičnih i zaustavljanjem riječi). Predložili smo dva različita sistema sa imenima: i) CIC-1 i ii) CIC-2 za zajednički zadatak Hateval 2019. Koristili smo vrijednosti TF u prvom sistemu i TF-IDF za drugi sistem. Prvi sistem, CIC-1 je dobio dva reda u podpitanju B za engleski i španjolski jezik s EMR rezultatom 0,568 za engleski i 0,675 za španjolski. Drugi sistem, CIC-2 je određen 4. u podzadatku A i 1. u podpitanju B za španjolski jezik sa makro-F1 rezultat 0,727 i EMR rezultat 0,705.', 'fi': 'Viime vuosina sosiaalisen median käyttö on lisääntynyt uskomattoman paljon. Sosiaalinen media antaa Internetin käyttäjille ystävällisen alustan ilmaista näkemyksiään ja mielipiteitään. Näiden mukavien ja erillisten viestintämahdollisuuksien lisäksi se mahdollistaa myös pahoja asioita, kuten vihapuheen käytön. Online automaattinen vihapuheen havaitseminen eri näkökulmista on merkittävä tieteellinen ongelma. Tässä artikkelissa esitellään Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Meksiko) lähestymistapaa Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) -kilpailussa vihapuheen monikielisestä havaitsemisesta Twitterissä. Tämän tutkimuksen tavoitteena on havaita (A) vihapuhe maahanmuuttajia ja naisia kohtaan, (B) aggressiivinen käyttäytyminen ja kohdeluokitus sekä englanniksi että espanjaksi. Ehdotetussa lähestymistavassa käytettiin esikäsittelyllä varustettua sanapussimallia (stem-ming ja stop words poisto). Lähetimme Hateval 2019:n jaettuun tehtävään kaksi eri järjestelmää: (i) CIC-1 ja (ii) CIC-2. Ensimmäisessä järjestelmässä käytettiin TF-arvoja ja toisessa järjestelmässä TF-IDF-arvoa. Ensimmäisessä järjestelmässä CIC-1 sai toisen sijan alatehtävässä B sekä englanniksi että espanjaksi EMR-pisteellä 0,568 englanniksi ja 0,675 espanjaksi. Toinen järjestelmä, CIC-2, sijoittui neljänneksi osatehtävässä A ja ensimmäiseksi osatehtävässä B espanjan kielen makro-F1-pisteellä 0,727 ja EMR-pisteellä 0,705.', 'cs': 'V posledních letech se využívání sociálních médií neuvěřitelně zvýšilo. Sociální média umožňují uživatelům internetu přátelskou platformu pro vyjádření svých názorů a názorů. Spolu s těmito pěknými a jasnými komunikačními šancemi umožňuje také špatné věci, jako je použití nenávistné řeči. Online automatická detekce nenávistné řeči v různých aspektech je významným vědeckým problémem. Tento článek představuje přístup Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Mexiko) pro soutěž Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) pro vícejazyčnou detekci nenávistné řeči na Twitteru. Cílem tohoto článku je detekovat (A) nenávistnou řeč vůči imigrantům a ženám, (B) agresivní chování a cílovou klasifikaci, a to jak pro angličtinu, tak pro španělštinu. V navrženém přístupu jsme použili model sáčku slov s předzpracováním (odstranění kmenů a stop slov). Předložili jsme dva různé systémy s názvem: (i) CIC-1 a (ii) CIC-2 pro Hateval 2019 sdílený úkol. V prvním systému jsme použili TF hodnoty a TF-IDF pro druhý systém. První systém CIC-1 získal druhé místo v podúkolu B pro anglický i španělský jazyk s EMR skóre 0.568 pro angličtinu a 0.675 pro španělštinu. Druhý systém CIC-2 byl čtvrtý v podúkolu A a první v podúkolu B pro španělský jazyk s makro F1 skóre 0,727 a EMR skóre 0,705.', 'sk': 'V zadnjih letih se je uporaba socialnih medijev neverjetno povečala. Družbeni mediji uporabnikom interneta omogočajo prijazno platformo za izražanje svojih stališč in mnenj. Poleg teh lepih in različnih komunikacijskih možnosti omogoča tudi slabe stvari, kot je uporaba sovražnega govora. Spletno samodejno odkrivanje sovražnega govora v različnih vidikih je pomemben znanstveni problem. V prispevku je predstavljen pristop Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Mehika) za natečaj Semeval 2019 Task-5 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) za večjezično odkrivanje sovražnega govora na Twitterju. Cilj prispevka je odkriti (A) sovražni govor proti priseljencem in ženskam, (B) agresivno vedenje in ciljno klasifikacijo, tako za angleščino kot za španščino. V predlaganem pristopu smo uporabili model vrečke besed s predobdelavo (odstranitev stebla in stop besed). Za skupno nalogo Hateval 2019 smo predložili dva različna sistema z imeni: (i) CIC-1 in (ii) CIC-2. V prvem sistemu smo uporabili TF vrednosti in TF-IDF za drugi sistem. Prvi sistem je CIC-1 dobil 2. mesto v podnalogi B za angleške in španske jezike z EMR oceno 0,568 za angleščino in 0,675 za španščino. Drugi sistem, CIC-2, je bil uvrščen na 4. mesto v podnalogi A in 1. mesto v podnalogi B za španski jezik z makro-F1 oceno 0,727 oziroma EMR oceno 0,705.', 'he': 'בשנים האחרונות, השימוש בתקשורת חברתית גדל באופן מדהים. התקשורת החברתית מאפשרת למשתמשים באינטרנט פלטפורמה ידידותית להביע את דעתם והדעות שלהם. יחד עם הסיכויים הנחמדים והברורים האלה לתקשורת, זה גם מאפשר דברים רעים כמו השימוש בנאום שנאה. זיהוי נאום שנאה אוטומטי באינטרנט בנושאים שונים הוא בעיה מדעית משמעותית. העבודה הזו מציגה את הגישה של Instituto Politecnico Nacional (מקסיקו) למשימה חצי-מימי 2019 [Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) בתחרות לגילוי רבולוגי של נאום שנאה בטוויטר. המטרה של העיתון הזה היא לגלות (A) נאום שנאה נגד מהגרים ונשים, (B) התנהגות אגרסיבית וסיפור המטרה, גם לאנגלית וגם לספרדית. In the proposed approach, we used a bag of words model with preprocessing (stem-ming and stop words removal).  שלחנו שני מערכות שונות עם שמות: (i) CIC-1 ו (ii) CIC-2 עבור משימה משותפת Hateval 2019. השתמשנו בערכים TF במערכת הראשונה TF-IDF למערכת השנייה. המערכת הראשונה, CIC-1, קיבלה את הדרגה השנייה בתת-שאלה ב לשפות אנגלית וספרדית עם נקודת EMR של 0.568 לאנגלית ו-0.675 לספרדית. The second system, CIC-2 was ranked 4th in sub-task A and 1st in subtask B for Spanish language with a macro-F1 score of 0.727 and EMR score of 0.705 respectively.', 'ha': "A cikin shekara na farko, amfani da mitandai na jamii ya halicca baya. Social media permits Inter-net users a friendly platform to express their views and opinions.  Inã da waɗannan masu yiwuwa masu kawaici da gauraya, yana yarda da abubuwa kamar matuƙar maganar ƙeta. An gane hoton farat ɗaya cikin masu cikin masu hususan daban-daban Wannan karatun na bayar wa InstInstituo Politecnico Nacional (Meksiko) hanyor wa the Semewal 2019 Task-5[Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) competitin for multilugha Finishment of Hate Speak on Twitter. Gagon wannan takarda shine a gane (A) hoto mai ƙiyayya a kan immigranta da mãtã, (B) aikin Aggressive da kure'awa, kuma don Ingiriya da Isbanish. Aka cikin shirin da aka faɗa, mun yi amfani da wani misalin maganar da ke samun aiki (da za'a yi sauri da magana da za'a goge). Mun aika biyu masu nau'i biyu da sunayen: (i) CIC-1 da (ii) CIC-2 wa Hateval 2019 sharrin aikin. Mun yi amfani da kimar TF cikin na'ura na farko da TF-IDF wa na'urar farko. @ item Spelling dictionary Sistemi na biyu, CIC-2 aka range na 4 cikin mai sub-aikin A da 1 cikin ƙanƙan aikin B na fassarar spanish da wani score na macro-F1 na 0.77 da kimar EMR na 0.705.", 'jv': 'Rasané sing klèn, mpamongké media sothik dumadhi durung apik. Media sing permet pengguna Inter net pengguna kamulyan banget kanggo nguasai persilangan karo hal-hal Kaya wae ngono nganggo perusahaan sing apik lan didalakno sing apik, iki ngono iso nggawe barang apik sing dirasakake offline This paper Presents the Insto politeknio National (meksi) method for the semingle 2011 task-5 goal of this paper is to detect (A) Debug anti-imigran lan babasane, Nang jeograhan, kita wis nggambar kelas kuwi model nggawe Perintah banter (stem-ping lan ngawasi gambar). We filed 2 Awak dhéwé sistem tualke kanggo sistem tualke lan TIF-ID F kanggo sistem wis digawe. Sistem tualke, CIC-1 wis rampungan 2h sing ditambah tanggal B kanggo saboh ingkang karo spanyola karo EMR sing rampungan 0.588 kanggo Inggal lan 0.585 kanggo Spanyola. Sistem wis segondi, CIC-2 wis digawe 4th ning apa-task A lan 1no wae nambah B kanggo kelas panjenengan langkung karo macro-F1 sing sampek 0.247 lan EMR sing sampek 0.2007 5.', 'bo': 'དབུས་གཞུང་གི་ལོ་ངོ་དག་ལ། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་རིགས་འདི་མ་ཤེས་པ་ཞིག་རེད། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་མཐོང་སྣང་དང་བསམ་བྱེད་པའི་གླེང་སྟེགས སྐྱིད་དུ་དང་ཁྱད་པར་ཡོད་པའི་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་འདི་དག་ལ་བསྡུར་ན། དེ་ཡང་ན། ཕྱིར་ཉིད་ཅིག་གིས་སྤྱད་པར་བྱས་པ དྲ་ཐོག་ཏུ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཕྱིར་ཉེན་སྐྱོང་བའི་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྟོགས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ནི་ཚན་རིག་གི་དཀའ This paper presents the Instituto Politecnico Nacional (Mexico) approach for the Semeval 2019 Task-5 (Hateval 2019] (Basile et al., 2019) competition for Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech on Twitter. ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཨིན་སིའི་སྐོར་ལས་བུད་མེད་ཚོར་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་དང་། གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་འདྲི་ཚིག་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་སྔ་ལས་རིམ་སྒྲིག་གི་ཐུམ་སྒྲིལ་གྱི་ཚིག་རྩིས་པ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད། We submitted two different systems with names: (i) CIC-1 and (ii) CIC-2 for Hateval 2019 shared task. ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་དང་པོ་དང་TF-IDF་གི་མ་ལག་གི་ནང་གི་TF་རིན་ཐང་དག་སྤྱོད་པ The first system, CIC-1 got 2nd rank in subtask B for both English and Spanish languages with EMR score of 0.568 for English and 0.675 for Spanish. འདིའི་མ་ལག་གི་གཉིས་པ་དེ་ CIC-2 རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་ལས་གནད་དོན་འགྲུལ་བཞི་པ་ཡིན། གནད་སྡུད་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ sub task B for Spanish language with a macro-F1 score of 0.727 and EMR score of 0.705 respectively.'}
{'en': 'CiTIUS-COLE at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Combining Linguistic Features to Identify Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women on Multilingual Tweets', 'ar': 'CiTIUS-COLE في SemEval-2019 المهمة 5: الجمع بين الميزات اللغوية لتحديد خطاب الكراهية ضد المهاجرين والنساء في التغريدات متعددة اللغات', 'pt': 'CiTIUS-COLE na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 5: Combinando recursos linguísticos para identificar discurso de ódio contra imigrantes e mulheres em tweets multilíngues', 'es': 'Citius-cole en la Tarea 5 de Semeval-2019: Combinar características lingüísticas para identificar el discurso de odio contra inmigrantes y mujeres en tuits multilingües', 'fr': 'Citius-Cole au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 5\xa0: Combiner les caractéristiques linguistiques pour identifier les discours de haine contre les immigrants et les femmes sur des tweets multilingues', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のCiTIUS - COLEタスク5 ：多言語ツイートにおける移民と女性に対するヘイトスピーチを識別するための言語機能の組み合わせ', 'zh': 'CiTIUS-COLE在SemEval-2019务5:合言而识多言,移民妇人之怨言', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 5 में CiTIUS-COLE: बहुभाषी ट्वीट्स पर आप्रवासियों और महिलाओं के खिलाफ नफरत भरे भाषण की पहचान करने के लिए भाषाई विशेषताओं का संयोजन', 'ru': 'CiTIUS-COLE на SemEval-2019 Задача 5: Сочетание языковых особенностей для выявления ненавистнических высказываний против иммигрантов и женщин в многоязычных твитах', 'ga': 'CiTIUS-COLE ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 5: Gnéithe Teangeolaíocha a Chomhcheangail chun Fuathchaint in Aghaidh Inimircigh agus Mná a Aithint ar Tweetanna Ilteangacha', 'ka': 'CiTIUS-COLE semiEval-2019 პარამეტრი 5: Linguistic Features Combining to Identify Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women on Multilingual Tweets', 'el': 'Εργασία 5: Συνδυασμός γλωσσικών χαρακτηριστικών για τον εντοπισμό της ομιλίας μίσους κατά των μεταναστών και των γυναικών σε πολυγλωσσικά tweets', 'hu': 'CiTIUS-COLE a SemEval-2019 5. feladat: Nyelvi jellemzők kombinálása a bevándorlók és nők elleni gyűlöletbeszéd azonosítására többnyelvű tweeteken', 'it': "CiTIUS-COLE a SemEval-2019 Task 5: Combinare caratteristiche linguistiche per identificare il discorso d'odio contro immigrati e donne su tweet multilingue", 'kk': 'CiTIUS-COLE жарым- 2019 тапсырмасында 5. тапсырма: Иммигранттер және әйелдер көптілік tweets тілінде қарсылық сөйлесуді анықтау үшін лингвистикалық мүмкіндіктерді біріктіру', 'mk': 'ЦИТИУС-КОЛЕ на SemEval-2019 задача 5: Комбинирање на јазични карактеристики за идентификување на говорот на омраза против имигрантите и жените на мултијазични твитови', 'lt': 'CiTIUS-COLE 2010 m. pusmečio mėn. 5 uždavinys: kalbinių savybių derinimas, siekiant nustatyti neapykantos kalbą prieš imigrantus ir moteris daugiakalbėse tweetuose', 'ms': 'CiTIUS-COLE di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Menggabungkan Ciri-ciri Bahasa untuk mengenalpasti Ucapan Kebencian terhadap Imigrant dan Perempuan pada Tweet Berbahasa', 'mn': 'CiTIUS-COLE at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Linguistic Features to Identify Immigrants and Women Against Hate Speech on Multilingual Tweets', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 5- ലെ സിറ്റിയാസ്- കോള്\u200d: അഭയാര്\u200dത്ഥികള്\u200dക്കും സ്ത്രീകള്\u200dക്കും വെറുപ്പുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d ലിങ്കിസ്റ', 'mt': 'CiTIUS-COLE f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 5: Il-Kombinazzjoni ta’ Karatteristiċi Lingwistiċi biex jiġi identifikat il-kelma ta’ mibegħda kontra l-immigranti u n-nisa fuq Tweets Multilingwi', 'no': 'CiTIUS-COLE på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 5: Kombinerer linguistiske funksjonar for å identifisera hatspråk mot imigrantar og kvinner på fleirspråk tweeter', 'ro': 'CiTIUS-COLE la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 5: Combinarea caracteristicilor lingvistice pentru identificarea discursului de ură împotriva imigranților și femeilor pe Tweeturi multilingve', 'pl': 'Zadanie 5: Łączenie cech językowych w celu identyfikacji mowy nienawiści wobec imigrantów i kobiet na wielojęzycznych tweetach', 'si': 'CiTIUS-COLE at HalfEvel-2019 Job 5: Combining Linguist Featuries to ID Hate Talk Anti Immimigrants and Female on Multilanguage Tweets', 'sr': 'CiTIUS-COLE na pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 5: Kombiniranje lingvističkih karakteristika za identifikaciju govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena na višejezičkim tweetima', 'sv': 'CiTIUS-COLE på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 5: Kombinera språkliga funktioner för att identifiera hattal mot invandrare och kvinnor på flerspråkiga tweets', 'ta': 'Я«џЯ»єЯ««Я»ЇEval- 2019 Я«фЯ«БЯ«┐', 'so': 'CiTIUS-COLE at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Combining Linguistic Features to Identify Hate Speech Against Immigrant and Women on Tweets', 'ur': 'سیٹیوس-کول (سیٹیوس-کول) کے سامنے 2019 ٹاکس ۵ میں: ملی زبان کے ٹویٹوں پر ناپسندیدہ بات پہچان کرنے کے لئے لینگ گوئسٹ فکریں', 'uz': '5. SemEval- 2019 Vazifani CiTIUS- COLE: Muhammadlar va ayollar haqida bir nechta Twitterlar bilan foydalanish uchun lingvistik imkoniyatlarini ajratish uchun foydalanish', 'vi': 'Tập hợp các chức năng ngôn ngữ để xác định ghét diễn văn đối với người nhập cư và phụ nữ trên Tweet đa ngôn ngữ', 'da': 'CiTIUS-COLE på SemEval-2019 Opgave 5: At kombinere sproglige funktioner for at identificere had tale mod indvandrere og kvinder på flersprogede tweets', 'bg': 'Задача 5: Комбиниране на езикови характеристики за идентифициране на речта на омразата срещу имигранти и жени в многоезични туитове', 'nl': 'CiTIUS-COLE op SemEval-2019 Taak 5: Het combineren van taalkundige kenmerken om haatspraak tegen immigranten en vrouwen op meertalige tweets te identificeren', 'id': 'CiTIUS-COLE di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Kombinasi Features Linguistic to Identify Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women on Multilingual Tweets', 'de': 'CiTIUS-COLE bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 5: Zusammenführung sprachlicher Merkmale zur Identifizierung von Hassreden gegen Einwanderer und Frauen auf mehrsprachigen Tweets', 'ko': 'CitiUS COLE가Sem Eval-19 임무5: 언어 특징과 결합하여 다중 언어 트윗에서 이민과 여성에 대한 증오 발언 식별', 'fa': 'CiTIUS-COLE در عملۀ ۲۰۱۹ نیمه ۲۰۱۹: ترکیب ویژه\u200cهای لینگیستیک برای شناسایی سخنرانی دشمنی علیه مهاجران و زنان در Tweets Multilingual', 'sw': 'CiTIUS-COLE kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 5: Kuunga Tamko za Kilinguistic ili Kutambua Hotuba ya Hati dhidi ya Wahamiaji na Wanawake kwenye twiti za lugha nyingi', 'tr': 'CiTIUS-COLE at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Combining Linguistic Features to Identify Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women on Multilingual Tweets', 'sq': 'CiTIUS-COLE at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Combining Linguistic Features to Identify Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women on Multilingual Tweets', 'am': 'CiTIUS-COLE at SemEval-2019 ስራ 5: Combining Linguistic Features to identify hate speech against immigrants and women on Multilingual Tweets', 'hy': 'CITIus-COLE-ը 2019-ի կիսագնդի 5. հանձնարարությունը. լեզվաբանական առանձնահատկությունների համադրումը, որպեսզի բազլեզու թվիթերում հայտնաբերենք անհաջողության խոսքը ազդակների և կանանց դեմ', 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৯ কার্যক্রমের সিটিয়াস-কলকে: বহুভাষী টুইটে অভিবাসী এবং নারীদের বিরুদ্ধে ঘৃণার বিরুদ্ধে লিঙ্গিস্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাথে যো', 'bs': 'CiTIUS-COLE na pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 5: Kombiniranje lingwističkih karaktera za identifikaciju govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena na višejezičkim tweetima', 'af': 'CiTIUS-COLE by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 5: Kombineer Linguistiese Funksies om Hatte Spraak teen Immigrante en Vroue te identifiseer op Multilingual Tweets', 'cs': 'Úkol 5: Kombinace jazykových funkcí k identifikaci nenávistné řeči proti přistěhovalcům a ženám na vícejazyčných tweetech', 'az': 'CiTIUS-COLE at semiEval-2019 Task 5: Linguistic Features Combining to Identify Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women on Multilingual Tweets', 'et': 'CiTIUS-COLE SemEval-2019 ülesanne 5: keeleliste omaduste kombineerimine sisserändajate ja naiste vihkamise tuvastamiseks mitmekeelsetes tweetides', 'fi': 'CiTIUS-COLE SemEval-2019 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 5: Kielellisten ominaisuuksien yhdistäminen maahanmuuttajiin ja naisiin kohdistuvan vihapuheen tunnistamiseksi monikielisissä tweeteissä', 'ca': 'CiTIUS-COLE a SemEval-2019 Task 5: Combining Linguistic Features to Identify Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women on Multilingual Tweets', 'hr': 'CiTIUS-COLE na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 5: Kombiniranje lingwističkih karakteristika za identifikaciju govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena na višejezičkim tweetima', 'ha': 'CiTIU-COLE at SemEV-2019 Tafiyar 5: Combining Linguistic Features to Idify Hate Spelling Agare Imrants and mãtã on multiziman Twitter', 'he': 'CiTIUS-COLE ב SemEval-2019 משימה 5: שילוב תכונות שפתיות לזהות נאום שנאה נגד מהגרים ונשים בטוויטים רבים שפתיים', 'jv': 'CiTIus-corle at semiinval-2011', 'sk': 'CiTIUS-COLE na SemEval-2019 Naloga 5: Združevanje jezikovnih značilnosti za prepoznavanje sovražnega govora proti priseljencem in ženskam na večjezičnih tweetih', 'bo': 'CiTIUS-COLE at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Combining Linguistic Features to Identify Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women on Multilingual Tweets'}
{'en': 'This article describes the strategy submitted by the CiTIUS-COLE team to SemEval 2019 Task 5, a task which consists of binary classi- fication where the system predicting whether a tweet in English or in Spanish is hateful against women or immigrants or not. The proposed strategy relies on combining linguis- tic features to improve the classifier’s perfor- mance. More precisely, the method combines textual and lexical features, embedding words with the bag of words in Term Frequency- Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF) repre- sentation. The system performance reaches about 81 % F1 when it is applied to the training dataset, but its F1 drops to 36 % on the official test dataset for the English and 64 % for the Spanish language concerning the hate speech class', 'ar': 'تصف هذه المقالة الإستراتيجية التي قدمها فريق CiTIUS-COLE إلى SemEval 2019 Task 5 ، وهي مهمة تتكون من تصنيف ثنائي حيث يتنبأ النظام بما إذا كانت تغريدة باللغة الإنجليزية أو الإسبانية تحض على الكراهية ضد النساء أو المهاجرين أم لا. تعتمد الإستراتيجية المقترحة على دمج السمات اللغوية لتحسين أداء المصنف. بتعبير أدق ، تجمع الطريقة بين السمات النصية والمعجمية ، وتضمين الكلمات مع حقيبة الكلمات في تمثيل التردد المعكوس للمستند (TF-IDF). يصل أداء النظام إلى حوالي 81٪ F1 عند تطبيقه على مجموعة بيانات التدريب ، لكن F1 ينخفض إلى 36٪ في مجموعة بيانات الاختبار الرسمية للغة الإنجليزية و 64٪ للغة الإسبانية فيما يتعلق بفئة خطاب الكراهية', 'es': 'Este artículo describe la estrategia presentada por el equipo de Citius-COLE a la Tarea 5 de SemEval 2019, una tarea que consiste en una clasificación binaria en la que el sistema predice si un tuit en inglés o en español es odioso contra las mujeres o los inmigrantes o no. La estrategia propuesta se basa en combinar características lingüísticas para mejorar el rendimiento del clasificador. Más precisamente, el método combina características textuales y léxicas, incorporando palabras con la bolsa de palabras en la representación de Frecuencia de Términos- Frecuencia Inversa de Documentos (TF-IDF). El rendimiento del sistema alcanza alrededor del 81% F1 cuando se aplica al conjunto de datos de entrenamiento, pero su F1 cae al 36% en el conjunto de datos de prueba oficial para el inglés y al 64% para el español en relación con la clase de discurso de odio', 'fr': "Cet article décrit la stratégie soumise par l'équipe Citius-cole à SemEval 2019 Task 5, une tâche qui consiste en une classification binaire dans laquelle le système prédit si un tweet en anglais ou en espagnol est haineux envers les femmes ou les immigrés ou non. La stratégie proposée repose sur la combinaison de caractéristiques linguistiques afin d'améliorer les performances du classificateur. Plus précisément, le procédé combine des caractéristiques textuelles et lexicales, incorporant des mots avec le sac de mots dans la représentation Term Frequency- Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF). Les performances du système atteignent environ 81\xa0% F1 lorsqu'il est appliqué à l'ensemble de données d'entraînement, mais sa F1 chute à 36\xa0% sur le jeu de données de test officiel pour l'anglais et à 64\xa0% pour la langue espagnole concernant le cours de discours haineux", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve a estratégia apresentada pela equipe CiTIUS-COLE à Tarefa 5 do SemEval 2019, tarefa que consiste em classificação binária onde o sistema de previsão se um tweet em inglês ou em espanhol é odioso contra mulheres ou imigrantes ou não. A estratégia proposta baseia-se na combinação de características linguísticas para melhorar o desempenho do classificador. Mais precisamente, o método combina características textuais e lexicais, embutindo palavras com o saco de palavras na representação Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF). O desempenho do sistema atinge cerca de 81% de F1 quando aplicado ao conjunto de dados de treinamento, mas seu F1 cai para 36% no conjunto de dados de teste oficial para o idioma inglês e 64% para o idioma espanhol em relação à classe de discurso de ódio', 'ja': 'この記事では、CiTIUS - COLEチームがSemEval 2019タスク5に提出した戦略について説明します。このタスクは、英語またはスペイン語のツイートが女性または移民に対して憎悪的であるかどうかを予測するシステムで構成されるバイナリ分類です。提案された戦略は、分類子のパーフォーマンスを向上させるために言語機能を組み合わせることに依存している。より正確には、この方法はテキスト機能と辞書機能を組み合わせ、単語を用語頻度-逆文書頻度（ TF - IDF ）の繰り返しの単語の袋に埋め込む。システムのパフォーマンスは、トレーニングデータセットに適用すると約81%のF 1に達しますが、そのF 1は、ヘイトスピーチクラスに関する公式テストデータセットでは英語の36%、スペイン語の64%に低下します', 'zh': '本文述CiTIUS-COLE团队SemEval 2019 Task 5之策,二进制类相成,其统占英语西班牙语推文女移仇否。 所建策赖于合言特征以崇分类之性。 正言合文本及词汇特征,嵌单词囊于术语频率 - 反向文档频率(TF-IDF)repre-sentation中。 当宜用于练数集时,统性达于约81%之F1,而集于英语之官测试数据,其F1降于36%,西班牙语仇言类降64%', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается стратегия, представленная командой CiTIUS-COLE для задачи 5 SemEval 2019, задача, которая состоит из двоичной классификации, где система предсказывает, является ли твит на английском или испанском языке ненавистным по отношению к женщинам или иммигрантам или нет. Предлагаемая стратегия опирается на сочетание лингвистических особенностей для улучшения производительности классификатора. Точнее, метод сочетает в себе текстовые и лексические особенности, встраивая слова с пакетом слов в репликации Частота терминов - Обратная частота документа (TF-IDF). Производительность системы достигает 81% F1, когда она применяется к обучающему набору данных, но ее F1 падает до 36% на официальном тестовом наборе данных для английского языка и 64% для испанского языка относительно класса ненавистнической речи', 'hi': 'यह आलेख CiTIUS-COLE टीम द्वारा SemEval 2019 कार्य 5 को प्रस्तुत की गई रणनीति का वर्णन करता है, एक ऐसा कार्य जिसमें बाइनरी क्लासिकेशन होता है, जहां सिस्टम भविष्यवाणी करता है कि अंग्रेजी में या स्पेनिश में एक ट्वीट महिलाओं या आप्रवासियों के खिलाफ घृणित है या नहीं। प्रस्तावित रणनीति क्लासिफायर के परफॉर-मैन्स में सुधार करने के लिए लिंगुइस-टिक विशेषताओं के संयोजन पर निर्भर करती है। अधिक सटीक रूप से, विधि पाठ्य और लेक्सिकल सुविधाओं को जोड़ती है, शब्द आवृत्ति में शब्दों के बैग के साथ शब्दों को एम्बेड करती है- व्युत्क्रम दस्तावेज़ आवृत्ति (TF-IDF) पुनरावृत्ति। सिस्टम का प्रदर्शन लगभग 81% F1 तक पहुंच जाता है जब इसे प्रशिक्षण डेटासेट पर लागू किया जाता है, लेकिन इसका F1 अंग्रेजी के लिए आधिकारिक परीक्षण डेटासेट पर 36% और नफरत भाषण वर्ग से संबंधित स्पेनिश भाषा के लिए 64% तक गिर जाता है।', 'ga': 'Déanann an t-alt seo cur síos ar an straitéis a chuir foireann CiTIUS-COLE isteach chuig Tasc 5 SemEval 2019, tasc atá comhdhéanta d’aicmiú dénártha ina bhfuil an córas ag tuar cé acu an bhfuil nó nach bhfuil tvuít i mBéarla nó i Spáinnis fuathmhar in aghaidh ban nó inimircigh. Tá an straitéis atá beartaithe ag brath ar ghnéithe teangeolaíochta a chomhcheangal le feabhas a chur ar fheidhmíocht an aicmitheora. Níos cruinne, comhcheanglaíonn an modh gnéithe téacsúla agus foclóireachta, ag neadú focail leis an mála focal i Minicíocht Téarma- Minicíocht Inbhéartach Doiciméid (TF-IDF). Sroicheann feidhmíocht an chórais thart ar 81% F1 nuair a chuirtear i bhfeidhm é ar an tacar sonraí oiliúna, ach titeann a F1 go 36% ar an tacar sonraí trialach oifigiúil don Bhéarla agus 64% don Spáinnis maidir leis an rang fuathchaint.', 'ka': 'ამ პექტიკის შესახებ სტრატიგია, რომელიც საბინერო კლასის შესახებ, რომელიც სისტემა წარმოდგენა თუ ანგლისურად ან სპანელად ქალებისთვის ან იმიგრანტებისთვის გაგზავნილია ან არა. პროგრაფიკაციის კლასიფიკაციის კონფორმაციის მანქანობის შესაძლებლობისთვის სტრატიკური ფუნქციების შესაბამისათვის გამოყენება. სწორედ, მეტი ტექსტულ და ლექსიკალური განსაზღვრებების შემდეგ სიტყვების სიტყვებით Term Frequency- Inverse Document Frequency (TF- IDF) განსაზღვრება. სისტემის შესაძლებლობა 81% F1 წარმოდგენა, როდესაც ის აყენებულია განათლების მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში, მაგრამ მისი F1 მოთავსდება 36% დან ინგლისური ტესტის მონაცემების კონფიგურაცი', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive la strategia presentata dal team CiTIUS-COLE a SemEval 2019 Task 5, un compito che consiste nella classificazione binaria in cui il sistema predice se un tweet in inglese o in spagnolo è odioso o meno contro donne o immigrati. La strategia proposta si basa sulla combinazione di caratteristiche linguistiche per migliorare le prestazioni del classificatore. Più precisamente, il metodo combina caratteristiche testuali e lessicali, incorporando parole con il sacchetto di parole nella rappresentazione Term Frequency- Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF). Le prestazioni del sistema raggiungono circa l'81% F1 quando viene applicato al set di dati di allenamento, ma la sua F1 scende al 36% sul set di dati ufficiali di test per l'inglese e al 64% per la lingua spagnola per quanto riguarda la classe hate speech", 'kk': 'Бұл мақала CiTIUS-COLE тобының 2019 жылдың semiEval тапсырмасына жіберілген стратегияны таңдайды. Бұл тапсырма, ағылшын не испан тілінде tweet әйелдерге немесе иммигранттерге қарсы қарсы не қарсы деп ойлайтын жүйе екі класының құрам Келтірілген стратегия тілінгі- тик мүмкіндіктерді біріктіру үшін классификацияның маңыздығын жасау үшін қолданылады. Ең дұрыс, әдіс мәтін және лексикалық мүмкіндіктерді біріктіреді, сөздерді терминдің жиілігі - Құжат жиілігін терістеу (TF- IDF) қайта сөздеріне ендіру. Жүйелік жасауы 81% F1 дегенді оқыту деректер жиына қолданғанда жеткізеді, бірақ F1 ағылшын тілінің официальны сынақтар жиынында 36% дегенді және 64% деген испан тілінде жасырын сөйлеу класына қатысты.', 'el': 'Αυτό το άρθρο περιγράφει τη στρατηγική που υπέβαλε η ομάδα στο έργο 5, μια εργασία που αποτελείται από δυαδική ταξινόμηση όπου το σύστημα προβλέπει εάν ένα tweet στα αγγλικά ή στα ισπανικά είναι μίσος εναντίον γυναικών ή μεταναστών ή όχι. Η προτεινόμενη στρατηγική βασίζεται στον συνδυασμό γλωσσικών χαρακτηριστικών για τη βελτίωση της απόδοσης του ταξινομητή. Πιο συγκεκριμένα, η μέθοδος συνδυάζει κείμενα και λεξικά χαρακτηριστικά, ενσωματώνοντας λέξεις με τον σάκο λέξεων στην αναπαράσταση συχνότητας όρων- αντίστροφης συχνότητας εγγράφων (TF-IDF). Η απόδοση του συστήματος φτάνει περίπου 81% F1 όταν εφαρμόζεται στο σύνολο δεδομένων εκπαίδευσης, αλλά το F1 μειώνεται σε 36% στο επίσημο σύνολο δεδομένων δοκιμής για την αγγλική και 64% για την ισπανική γλώσσα σχετικά με την τάξη ομιλίας μίσους', 'hu': 'Ez a cikk bemutatja a CiTIUS-COLE csapat által a SemEval 2019 Task 5-nek benyújtott stratégiát, amely a bináris osztályozásból áll, ahol az a rendszer, amely előrejelzi, hogy egy angol vagy spanyol tweet utálatos-e a nők vagy bevándorlók ellen vagy sem. A javasolt stratégia a besoroló teljesítményének javítása érdekében a nyelvi jellemzők kombinációján alapul. Pontosabban, a módszer ötvözi a szöveges és lexikai jellemzőket, beágyazva a szavak zsákját a Term Frequency- Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF) reprezentációba. A rendszer teljesítménye eléri az F1 81%-át, amikor az edzési adatkészletre alkalmazzák, de F1-je 36%-ra csökken az angol és 64%-ra a spanyol nyelvre a gyűlöletbeszéd osztályára vonatkozóan.', 'lt': 'Šiame straipsnyje aprašoma strategija, kurią CiTIUS-COLE komanda pateikė SemEval 2019 5 uždaviniui, užduotį, kurią sudaro dviguba klasifikacija, kai sistema, numatanti, ar tweetas anglų arba ispanų kalbomis yra neapykantingas prieš moteris ar imigrantus, ar ne. Siūloma strategija grindžiama kalbinių savybių derinimu siekiant pagerinti klasifikatoriaus kokybę. Tiksliau, metodu derinami tekstiniai ir leksiniai požymiai, įtraukiami žodžiai į žodžių maišelį „Term Frequency- Inverse Document Frequency“ (TF-IDF) atstovavime. Sistemos veiksmingumas pasiekia maždaug 81 % F1, kai jis taikomas mokymo duomenų rinkiniui, tačiau jo F1 sumažėja iki 36 % oficialaus bandymų duomenų rinkinio anglų kalba ir 64 % ispanų kalba neapykantos kalbos klasei.', 'ms': 'Artikel ini menggambarkan strategi yang dihantar oleh pasukan CiTIUS-COLE kepada SemEval 2019 Tugas 5, tugas yang terdiri dari klasifikasi binari dimana sistem meramalkan sama ada tweet dalam bahasa Inggeris atau Sepanyol membenci wanita atau imigran atau tidak. Strategi yang diusulkan bergantung pada menggabungkan ciri- ciri bahasa untuk meningkatkan kelebihan kelas. Lebih tepat, kaedah menggabungkan ciri-ciri teks dan leksikal, memasukkan kata-kata dengan beg perkataan dalam penambahan Frekuensi Term- Frekuensi Dokumen Terbalik (TF-IDF). Performasi sistem mencapai sekitar 81% F1 apabila ia dilaksanakan pada set data latihan, tetapi F1 jatuh ke 36% pada set data ujian rasmi untuk bahasa Inggeris dan 64% untuk bahasa Sepanyol mengenai kelas ucapan kebencian', 'mk': 'Оваа статија ја опишува стратегијата поднесена од тимот ЦИТИУС-КОЛЕ на SemEval 2019 задача 5, задача која се состои од бинарна класификација каде системот предвидува дали твитот на англиски или шпански е мразен против жените или имигрантите или не. Предложената стратегија се потпира на комбинација на јазични карактеристики за подобрување на перферменцијата на класификаторот. Попрецизно, методот ги комбинира текстуалните и лексичките карактеристики, вклучувајќи зборови со торбата со зборови во репрезентација на фреквенцијата на термин- инверзниот документ (TF- IDF). Системската перформанса достигнува околу 81 отсто F1 кога се применува на наборот на податоци за обука, но нејзиниот F1 се намалува на 36 отсто на официјалниот набор на податоци за тестирање на англискиот јазик и 64 отсто на шпанскиот јазик во врска со класата за говор', 'mt': 'Dan l-artikolu jiddeskrivi l-istrateġija ppreżentata mit-tim CiTIUS-COLE lil SemEval 2019 Task 5, kompitu li jikkonsisti minn klassifikazzjoni binarja fejn is-sistema li tipprevedi jekk tweet bl-Ingliż jew bl-Ispanjol huwiex mibegħdu kontra n-nisa jew l-immigranti jew le. L-istrateġija proposta tiddependi fuq it-taħlita ta’ karatteristiċi lingwistiċi biex ittejjeb il-prestazzjoni tal-klassifikatur. B’mod aktar preċiż, il-metodu jgħaqqad karatteristiċi testwali u lexiċi, billi jinkorpora kliem mal-borża ta’ kliem fir-rappreżentazzjoni ta’ Term Frequency- Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF). The system performance reaches about 81% F1 when it is applied to the training dataset, but its F1 drops to 36% on the official test dataset for the English and 64% for the Spanish language concerning the hate speech class', 'no': 'Denne artikkelen beskriver strategien som er sendt av CiTIUS-COLE-gruppa til semiEval 2019 oppgåve 5, eit oppgåve som inneheld av binær klassifikasjon der systemet forventar om ein tweet på engelsk eller spansk er hattig mot kvinner eller imigrantar eller ikkje. Den foreslåde strategien er avhengig av å kombinere lingviske funksjonar for å forbetra klassifiserens perfor- mann. Meir nøyaktig kombinerer metoden tekstuelle og leksiske funksjonar, og innebygger ord med søket med ord i Term Frekvens- Inverse dokumentfrekvens (TF- IDF) gjenoppretting. Systemutviklinga når det vert brukt på opplæringsdatasettet, men F1 går til 36% på den offisielle testdatasettet for engelsk og 64% for den spanske språket som gjelder hatespråkklassen.', 'mn': 'Энэ баримт CiTIUS-COLE багийн SemEval 2019-н 5 даалгаварт өгсөн стратегийг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь хоёр дахь ангид, эсвэл Испан хэлний tweet нь эмэгтэйчүүдийн эсвэл хөдөлгөөнтүүдийн эсрэг үзэн ядах эсэхийг тодорхойлдог. Холбоотой стратеги нь хэл хэлний хувьд хэлбэрийн төвөгтэй байдлыг сайжруулахын тулд нэгтгэдэг. Илүү тодорхой, арга нь текст болон лексикийн өөрчлөлтийг нэгтгэдэг, үгнүүдийг Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF) дахин нэгтгэдэг. Сургуулийн өгөгдлийн санд ашиглах үед системийн үйл ажиллагаа 81% F1 хүртэл хүртэл байна. Гэхдээ F1 нь Англи хэлний шалгалтын үндсэн өгөгдлийн санд 36% хүртэл хүртэл хүртэл хүртэл хүртэл буурсан.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje strategię zgłoszoną przez zespół CiTIUS-COLE do SemEval 2019 Task 5, zadania polegającego na klasyfikacji binarnej, w której system przewiduje, czy tweet w języku angielskim czy hiszpańskim jest nienawiściwy wobec kobiet czy imigrantów czy też nie. Proponowana strategia opiera się na łączeniu cech językowych w celu poprawy wydajności klasyfikatora. Dokładniej, metoda łączy cechy tekstowe i leksykalne, osadzając słowa z workiem słów w reprezentacji Term Frequency- Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF). Wydajność systemu osiąga około 81% F1, gdy jest stosowana do zbioru danych treningowych, ale F1 spada do 36% na oficjalnym zbiorze danych testowym dla języka angielskiego i 64% dla języka hiszpańskiego dotyczących klasy mowy nienawiści', 'ro': 'Acest articol descrie strategia prezentată de echipa CiTIUS-COLE la SemEval 2019 Task 5, o sarcină care constă în clasificarea binară în care sistemul prezice dacă un tweet în limba engleză sau spaniolă este urât sau nu împotriva femeilor sau imigranților. Strategia propusă se bazează pe combinarea caracteristicilor lingvistice pentru a îmbunătăţi performanţa clasificatorului. Mai exact, metoda combină caracteristicile textuale și lexicale, încorporând cuvintele cu sacul de cuvinte în reprezentarea Frecvenței termene - Frecvența inversă a documentului (TF-IDF). Performanța sistemului atinge aproximativ 81% F1 atunci când este aplicată la setul de date de antrenament, dar F1 scade la 36% pe setul oficial de date de testare pentru engleză și 64% pentru limba spaniolă în ceea ce privește clasa de vorbire ură', 'si': 'මේ ලේඛනය පැහැදිලි කරනවා CiTIUS-COLE කණ්ඩායමේ සෙම්වල් 2019 වැඩක් 5, වැඩක් සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා, බායිනර් කණ්ඩායම් වලින් ස්ථානයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය ප්\u200dරශ්ණාත්මක ව්\u200dයාපෘතියේ භාෂාව සම්බන්ධ කරලා තියෙන්නේ භාෂාවක් අවශ්\u200dය- විශේෂකයේ ප්\u200dරශ විශේෂයෙන්, පද්ධතිය පාළ සහ ලෙක්සිකල් අවශ්\u200dයය සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, වචන් බෑග් එක්ක පද්ධතිය භාවිතයේදී වචන් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා - වි පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරවේශනය 81% F1 වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය දත්ත සූදානයට ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා නමුත් ඒ F1 වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා ඉංග්\u200dරීසියාව සඳ', 'sr': 'Ovaj članak opisuje strategiju koju je CiTIUS-COLE tim predložio SemEval 2019. zadatak 5. godine, zadatak koji se sastoji od dvostruke klase-definicije u kojem sistem predviđa da li je tweet na engleskom ili na španjolskom jeziku mrzio žene ili imigrante ili ne. Predložena strategija se oslanja na kombinaciju lingvističkih karakteristika kako bi poboljšala profil klasifikatora. Taènije, metod kombinira tekstualne i leksiène karakteristike, ukljuèujuæi reèi sa vreæom reèi u Term Frekvenciju - Inversièna frekvencija dokumenta (TF-IDF) ponovno rečenica. Izvrsnost sistema postiže oko 81% F1 kada se primjenjuje na setu podataka obuke, ali njegov F1 se spušta na 36% na službenu setu podataka za testove za engleski i i 64% na španjolski jezik u vezi razgovora mržnje.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan wuxuu ku qoran qoraalka kooxda CiTIUS-COLE u soo dhiibay SemEval 2019 Shaqad 5, kaas oo ka mid ah fasaxa labaad oo ku qoran, kaas oo ku qoran qoraalka uu ku qorayo warqadda ingiriisiga ama Isbanishka uu u nebcaado dumarka ama dadka dalka u soo guuray. Qatarka la soo jeeday waxay ku xiran tahay in lagu soo ururiyo luqadaha- tic si uu u beddelo fasaxa-sharciga. Si saxda ah, qaabku wuxuu ku soo bandhigaa xarafta iyo leksikal, wuxuuna ku qoraa erayada ku qoran qoraalka Term Frequency-Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF) re-sentension. Muujinta nidaamka waxay gaadhaa qiyaastii 81% F1 marka lagu codsado taariikhda waxbarashada, laakiin F1 wuxuu dropaa ilaa 36% oo ku qoran taariikhda rasmiga baaritaanka Ingiriiska iyo 64% afka Isbanishka ee la xiriira fasalka hadalka nebcaalka', 'sv': 'Denna artikel beskriver den strategi som CiTIUS-COLE-teamet lagt fram för SemEval 2019 Task 5, en uppgift som består av binär klassifikation där systemet som förutspår om en tweet på engelska eller spanska är hatiskt mot kvinnor eller invandrare eller inte. Den föreslagna strategin bygger på att kombinera språkliga egenskaper för att förbättra klassificerarens prestation. Mer exakt kombinerar metoden text- och lexikala egenskaper och bäddar in ord med påsen med ord i termfrekvens- omvänd dokumentfrekvens (TF-IDF) repre- sentation. Systemets prestanda når ca 81% F1 när den tillämpas på träningsdatauppsättningen, men dess F1 sjunker till 36% på det officiella testdatauppsättningen för engelska och 64% för det spanska språket avseende hattalet.', 'ta': 'இந்த கட்டுரை சிடியிUS- COLE குழு செம்Eval 2019 செயல் 5 வழங்கப்பட்ட திட்டத்தை விளக்குகிறது, இது இரு வகுப்பு உறுதிப்படுத்தல் இருக்கும் செயல், அங்கு கணினி ஒரு கட்டுரை ஆங்கிலத்தி திருத்தப்பட்ட திட்டம் மொழி- டிக் குணங்களை ஒன்று சேர்த்து வகுப்பாளரின் குணங்களை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு நம்புகிறது. மேலும் குறிப்பிலாக, முறைமையில் நிரல் மற்றும் லெக்சிகிய பண்புகளை ஒன்று சேர்க்கும், முறை வார்த்தைகளின் பைத்தில் உள்ளிடும் வார்த்தைகளை பொத் பயிற்சி தரவுத்தளத்திற்கு பயன்படுத்தப்படும்போது அமைப்பு செயல்கூறு 81% F1 அடைகிறது, ஆனால் அதில் F1 விட்டு 36% ஆங்கிலத்திற்கு அரசில சோதனை தரவுக்க', 'ur': 'اس لکھی نے سیٹیوس-کول ٹیم کے ذریعہ SemEval 2019 ٹاکس ۵ کی استراتژی کا مفصل بیان کرتا ہے، ایک ٹاکس جس میں دو کلاس کی تعریف ہے جہاں سیستم کی پیش بینی کرتی ہے کہ کیا انگلیسی میں ٹویٹ یا اسپانیایی میں عورتوں یا مهاجروں کے خلاف ناپسند ہے یا نہیں ہے. پیغمبر کی استراتژی زبان کی جمع کرنے کے لئے آسانی ہے کہ کلاسپیر کی پارفار-مرد کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے۔ اور زیادہ دقیق، یہ طریقہ ٹیکسٹل اور لکسیکل ویٹیوں کو جمع کرتا ہے، کلمات کو ترمیم فرکانسی میں جمع کرتا ہے- ڈیکسٹ فرکانسی (TF-IDF) دوبارہ جمع کرتا ہے۔ سیسٹم کی فعالیت 81% F1 تک پہنچ جاتی ہے جب اسے ترینس ڈیٹ سٹ پر لازم کیا جاتا ہے، لیکن اس کا F1 36% تک انگلیسی کے لئے رسمی ٹیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ پر ڈوبتا ہے اور 64% اسپانیایی زبان کے لئے hate speech کلاس کے بارے میں', 'ml': "ഈ ലിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടില്\u200d സിറ്റിയുസ്-കോള്\u200d ടീം സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ടാസ്ക് 5-ലേക്ക് നല്\u200dകിയിരിക്കുന്ന പദ്ധതിയെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d ബൈനര്\u200d ക്ലാസ്സി-  The proposed strategy relies on combining linguis- tic features to improve the classifier's perfor- mance.  കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d, ടെര്\u200dമി ഫ്രെയിന്\u200dസി- തിരിച്ചുവരുത്തുന്ന രേഖയുടെ ഫ്രെയിന്\u200dസ് ഫ്രെയിന്\u200dസിയിലെ വാക്കുകളുടെ ബാഗില്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന രേഖയു പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം പ്രകടനം 81% എഫ്\u200c1 എത്തുന്നു. പക്ഷെ അതിന്റെ F1 വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരം ക്ലാസിനെ കു", 'uz': "Bu maqola SemEval 2019 Vazifa 5 uchun CiTIUS-COLE guruhiga joʻnatilgan strategiya aytish mumkin. Bu bir qanday bir qanday bir sinfni tasdiqlash mumkin. Bu yerda tizim ingliz tilida Twitt yoki Ispanchadan foydalanuvchi ayollar yomon'q emas deb hisoblash mumkin. Aniqlanadigan strategiya, tillar- tik xususiyatlarini birlashtirishga ishonchini ishlatadi. @ info: whatsthis Name", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả chiến lược được gửi bởi đội bóng đường CiTIUS đến Nhiệm vụ Semkhai mạc 89, nhiệm vụ gồm các lớp phân loại nhị phân, nơi hệ thống dự đoán rằng tweet bằng tiếng Anh hay tiếng Tây Ban Nha ghét phụ nữ hay ngoại nhập. Kế hoạch được đề nghị dựa trên việc kết hợp các yếu tố ngôn ngữ để cải thiện lỗ hổng của người phân loại. Chi tiết hơn là, phương pháp này kết hợp các tính năng văn học và ngôn ngữ, chứa từ với túi các chữ trong số tần số của các chữ trên bảng số, tần số tài liệu liên tục (TF-IDF) phân biệt. Hệ thống ứng dụng đạt khoảng 82=. F1 khi nó được áp dụng vào bộ dữ liệu huấn luyện, nhưng con F1 giảm đến 36=. trong bộ dữ liệu thử nghiệm chính thức dành cho ngôn ngữ ngữ ngữ Tây Ban Nha liên quan đến lớp diễn văn bị ghét.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва стратегията, представена от екипа на задача 5, която се състои от двоична класификация, при която системата предвижда дали туитът на английски или на испански език е омразен срещу жени или имигранти или не. Предложената стратегия разчита на комбиниране на лингвистични характеристики за подобряване на ефективността на класификатора. По-точно методът съчетава текстови и лексикални особености, вграждайки думи с торбата с думи в повторение на терминална честота – обратна честота на документа (ТФ-ИДФ). Ефективността на системата достига около 81% когато се прилага към набора от данни за обучение, но пада до 36% при официалния набор от данни за теста за английски и 64% за испански език по отношение на класа по реч на омразата', 'hr': 'Ovaj članak opisuje strategiju koju je CiTIUS-COLE tim predložio zadatku 5. polEvalu 2019. godine, zadatak koji se sastoji od dvostruke klase-definicije u kojem sustav predviđa da li je tweet na engleskom ili na španjolskom jeziku mrzio žene ili imigrante ili ne. Predložena strategija oslanja se na kombinaciju lingvističkih karakteristika kako bi poboljšala savršenost klasifikatora. Tačnije, metoda kombinira tekstualne i leksičke funkcije, uključujući riječi sa torbom riječi u Term frekvencije - Invertirajući frekvenciju dokumenta (TF-IDF) ponovno izjavu. Proizvodnja sustava postiže oko 81% F1 kada se primjenjuje na setu podataka obuke, ali njegov F1 pada na 36% na službenu setu podataka za testove za engleski i i 64% na španjolski jezik u vezi razgovora mržnje.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft de strategie die het CiTIUS-COLE team heeft voorgelegd aan SemEval 2019 Task 5, een taak die bestaat uit binaire classificatie waarbij het systeem voorspelt of een tweet in het Engels of in het Spaans haatdragend is tegen vrouwen of immigranten of niet. De voorgestelde strategie berust op het combineren van linguistische kenmerken om de prestaties van de classificator te verbeteren. Meer precies combineert de methode tekstuele en lexicale kenmerken, waarbij woorden worden ingesloten met de zak woorden in Term Frequency- Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF) representatie. De systeemprestaties bereiken ongeveer 81% F1 wanneer deze worden toegepast op de trainingsdataset, maar de F1 daalt tot 36% op de officiële testdataset voor het Engels en 64% voor de Spaanse taal met betrekking tot de haatspraakklasse', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver den strategi, som CiTIUS-COLE-teamet har indsendt til SemEval 2019 Task 5, en opgave der består i binær klassifikation, hvor systemet, der forudsiger, om et tweet på engelsk eller spansk er hadefuldt mod kvinder eller indvandrere eller ej. Den foreslåede strategi bygger på at kombinere sproglige træk for at forbedre klassificererens resultater. Mere præcist kombinerer metoden tekst- og leksikalske funktioner og integrerer ord med posen af ord i Term Frequency- Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF) repræsentation. Systemets ydeevne når omkring 81% F1, når den anvendes på træningsdatasættet, men dens F1 falder til 36% på det officielle testdatasæt for engelsk og 64% for det spanske sprog vedrørende hadefuldtale klassen', 'de': 'Dieser Artikel beschreibt die Strategie, die das CiTIUS-COLE-Team bei SemEval 2019 Task 5 eingereicht hat, eine Aufgabe, die aus der binären Klassifizierung besteht, bei der das System voraussagt, ob ein Tweet auf Englisch oder auf Spanisch gegen Frauen oder Immigranten hasserfüllt ist oder nicht. Die vorgeschlagene Strategie beruht auf der Kombination linguistischer Merkmale zur Verbesserung der Leistung des Klassifikators. Genauer gesagt kombiniert das Verfahren textuelle und lexikalische Merkmale und bettet Wörter mit dem Wortsack in Term Frequency- Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF) Representation ein. Die Systemleistung erreicht etwa 81% F1, wenn sie auf den Trainingsdatensatz angewendet wird, aber ihre F1 sinkt auf 36% im offiziellen Testdatensatz für Englisch und 64% für die spanische Sprache in Bezug auf die Hassrede-Klasse', 'ko': '본고는 CiTIUS COLE팀이 SemEval 2019 미션 5에 제출한 전략을 기술하는데, 이 미션은 영어나 스페인어 트윗이 여성이나 이민을 증오하는지를 체계적으로 예측하는 이원 분류로 구성된다.이 전략은 언어 특징을 결합시켜 분류기의 성능을 향상시키는 데 의존한다.더 정확히 말하면 이 방법은 텍스트와 어휘 특징을 결합시켜 용어 주파수-역문서 주파수(TF-IDF) 표현에 단어와 단어 패키지를 삽입한다.훈련 데이터 세트에 적용했을 때 시스템 성능은 81% 정도였지만, 공식 테스트 데이터 세트에서는 헤이트 스피치 관련 영어와 스페인어의 F1이 각각 36%, 64%로 떨어졌다.', 'fa': 'این مقاله استراتژی که توسط تیم CiTIUS-COLE به کار ۵ در سال ۲۰۱۹ فرستاده شده است، توسط استراتژی که توسط تیم سیTIUS-COLE به کار ۲۰۱۹ فرستاده شده است، توسط استراتژی دو کلاس است، جایی که سیستم پیش بینی می\u200cکند که آیا توئیت به انگلیسی یا اسپانیایی از زن استراتژی پیشنهاد بر ترکیب کردن ویژه\u200cهای زبانی- تایکی برای افزایش عملکرد کلانتری است. دقیقاً این روش ویژگی\u200cهای متن و زبانی را ترکیب می\u200cکند، کلمات را با کیف کلمات در فرکانس Term- فرکانس سند برعکس (TF- IDF) بازگردانیده می\u200cکند. فعالیت سیستم حدود ۱۸۸ درصد F1 را می رسد وقتی به مجموعه داده آموزشی کاربرد می شود، ولی F1 آن در مجموعه داده\u200cهای رسمی برای انگلیسی و ۶۴ درصد برای زبان اسپانیایی در مورد کلاس سخنرانی متنفر فرود می\u200cآید.', 'id': 'Artikel ini menjelaskan strategi yang diserahkan oleh tim CiTIUS-COLE ke SemEval 2019 Task 5, tugas yang terdiri dari klasifikasi binari di mana sistem memprediksi apakah tweet dalam bahasa Inggris atau Bahasa Spanyol membenci terhadap wanita atau imigran atau tidak. Strategi yang diusulkan bergantung pada menggabungkan karakteristik bahasa-bahasa untuk meningkatkan kelebihan klasifikasi. More precisely, the method combines textual and lexical features, embedding words with the bag of words in Term Frequency- Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF) repre- sentation.  The system performance reaches about 81% F1 when it is applied to the training dataset, but its F1 drops to 36% on the official test dataset for the English and 64% for the Spanish language concerning the hate speech class', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaelezea mkakati uliotolewa na timu ya CiTIUS-COLE kwa SemEval 2019 Task 5, jukumu ambalo linajumuisha darasa la mbili ambapo mfumo unatabiri kama twiti ya Kiingereza au Kihispania inachukia wanawake au wahamiaji au la. Mpango huu unapendekezwa unategemea kuunganisha lugha- tamaa ili kuboresha umuhimu wa aina ya mfanyakazi. Zaidi zaidi, mbinu inaunganisha vipengele vya maandishi na vilexico, na kuweka maneno kwa mfuko wa maneno katika Ufaransa wa Ufaransa wa Nyaraka (TF-IDF) kwa upya. The system performance reaches about 81% F1 when it is applied to the training dataset, but its F1 drops to 36% on the official test dataset for the English and 64% for the Spanish language concerning the hate speech class', 'sq': 'This article describes the strategy submitted by the CiTIUS-COLE team to SemEval 2019 Task 5, a task which consists of binary classi- fication where the system predicting whether a tweet in English or in Spanish is hateful against women or immigrants or not.  Strategjia e propozuar mbështetet në kombinimin e karakteristikave gjuhësore për të përmirësuar perforatën e klasifikuesit. Më saktësisht, metoda kombinon karakteristika tekstuale dhe lexike, duke përfshirë fjalë me çantën e fjalëve në përfaqësimin e Frekvencës së Termit- Përkundrazi të Dokumentit (TF- IDF). Performanca e sistemit arrin rreth 81% F1 kur aplikohet në grupin e të dhënave të trainimit, por F1 e tij bie në 36% në grupin zyrtar të të dhënave të test it për anglishtin dhe 64% për gjuhën spanjolle lidhur me klasën e fjalimit të urrejtjes', 'am': 'ይህ ጽሑፍ የሲቲUS-COLE ቡድን ለሴምEval 2019 ስራ 5 የተደረገውን strategy ይናገራል፡፡ ይህ ስርዓት በንግግሊዝና ወይም በስፓኒስዊው ትዊተር በሴቶችን ወይም በተሰደዱት ላይ የሚጠል ወይም አይሆንም ብናዊ ክፍል መሆኑን የሚያስታውቀው ስርዓት ነው፡፡ በተዘጋጀው ስርዓት የቋንቋዎች-tic ምርጫዎችን ለማሳደግ ይታያል፡፡ በተጨማሪም ጊዜ የጽሑፍ እና የሌክሲ ምርጫዎችን ማቀናቀል እና ቃላትን በቴርመ ፍቀት-ለዋጭ ሰነድ ፍቀድ (TF-IDF) እንደገና አስገድድ የስርቨርስቲው ድምፅ በጥላቻ ቋንቋ ላይ የተጠቃሚ ቋንቋ የተጠቃሚ ቋንቋ ላይ የተጠቃሚ የድምፅ መረጃ ማዘጋጀት ግን F1 ወደ36 በመቶ ይደርሳል፡፡', 'az': 'Bu m…ôktub, CiTIUS-COLE takńĪmńĪnńĪn 2019-in SemEval Task 5 t…ôyin etdiyi stratejiyi t…ôsdiql…ôyir. Bu m…ôktub ikili sńĪnńĪf t…ôsdiql…ôyicisidir. Sistemin ńįngilizce v…ô ńįspanyolca tweet qadńĪnlara v…ô ya imigrantl…ôr…ô qarŇüńĪ nifr…ôt edir v…ô ya yoxdur. Bu t…ôdbir stratejisi, klasifikatńĪnńĪn perfor-manlńĪńüńĪnńĪ d√ľz…ôltm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn dill…ôrini birl…ôŇüdirm…ôy…ô t…ôv…ôkk√ľl edir. Daha dońürudan, metod textual and lexical features combined, words with the bag of words in Term Frequency- Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF) re-sentation. Sistem performansńĪ t…ôhsil veri qutusuna istifad…ô edildiyi zaman 81% F1 q…ôd…ôr yetiŇüir, amma F1 ńįngiliz…ô t…ôhsil veri qutusuna 36% g…ôlir. ńįspanyol dilind…ô nifr…ôt s√∂zl…ôri sńĪnańüńĪ bar…ôsind…ô ńįspanyol dilind…ô 64% g…ôlir.', 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধটি বর্ণনা করে সিটিয়ার-কোলির দল সেমইভাল ২০১৯ কাজের কৌশলের প্রতি প্রদান করেছে, যা কাজের মধ্যে রয়েছে বাইনারি ক্লাসি-স্বীকৃতি- যেখানে ব্যবস্থা ভাষায় টুইট কর প্রস্তাবিত কৌশলটি ভাষার- টিক বৈশিষ্ট্য সম্পাদনের উপর নির্ভর করে শ্রেণীবিশ্লেষকের পার্ফোর-মেন্সের উন্নতি করা আরো সুনির্দিষ্ট, এই পদ্ধতি টেক্সচুয়াল এবং লেক্সিক্সিক্যাল বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাথে একত্রিত করে, টার্ম ফ্রেন্সি- ফ্রেন্সি ফ্রেন্স (TF-IDF) পুনরায় ব্ সিস্টেমের প্রায় ১৮% এফ১ পৌঁছায় যখন এটি প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য সেটে প্রয়োগ করা হয়, কিন্তু এফ১ ট্রেনিং এর অফিসিয়াল পরীক্ষার ডাটাসেটে ৩৬% কমে যায় এবং', 'hy': "Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է Սիտիուս-ԿոԼ թիմի կողմից ներկայացված ռազմավարությունը ՍեմԵվալ 2019-ի 5-ի հանձնարարությանը, որը կազմված է երկու դասակարգումներից, որտեղ համակարգը կանխատեսում է, թե անգլերենով, թե իսպաներենով թվիթը ատելի է կանանց կամ միգր The proposed strategy relies on combining linguis- tic features to improve the classifier's perfor- mance.  Ավելի ճշգրիտ է, մեթոդը համադրում է տեքստալ և լեքսիկական հատկություններ, ներառում է բառերը բառերի պայուսի հետ տերմին Հաճախ- Հարկադրված փաստաթղթի հաճախ (ԹՖ- IDF) ներկայացման մեթոդով: Համակարգման արդյունքը հասնում է մոտ 81 տոկոսի F1-ին, երբ այն կիրառվում է կրթության տվյալների համակարգին, բայց F1-ը նվազում է մինչև 36 տոկոսի անգլերենի պաշտոնական թեստերի տվյալների համակարգին և 64 տոկոսի իսպանական լեզուն ատելության խոսքի դա", 'tr': 'Bu makala CiTIUS-COLE toparynyň SemEval 2019-nji Görevi 5-nji buýrukynda gönderilen strategiýany tassyýar. Bu maksadyň 2-nji klas şeklinde bolan zady. Bu sistemiň iňlisçe ýa-da ispanyýada tweet a ýal ýa-da göçmenlere garşy ýigrenýändigini ýa-da ýigrenýändigini tanaý Teklif edilen strateji, klasifikatörün s üslemesini geliştirmek için dil karakterlerini birleştirmeke dayanar. Daha dogry bir şekilde, metin we leksik özellikleri birleştir, sözleri Term Frequency-Dönüş Sened Frequency (TF-IDF) Tekrar-sözleri bilen ekleýär Sistem çykyşy 81% F1 öňünde tutylýan zaman, ýöne F1-iň resmi hatlary Iňlis dilinde 36% diýip barýar we 64% iňlis dilinde ýigrenýän çykyş klasy barada.', 'af': "Hierdie artikel beskrywe die strategie wat deur die CiTIUS-COLE-span aan SemEval 2019 taak 5 ingestuur is, 'n taak wat bestaan van binêre klas- definisie waar die stelsel voorskou of 'n tweet in Engels of in Spaanse haat teen vroue of immigrante of nie. Die voorgestelde strategie verlig op die kombinasie van lingwistike funksies om die klassifiseerder se perfor- manlik te verbeter. More precise, the method combines textual and lexical features, embedding words with the bag of words in Term Frequency- Inverse Document Frequency (TF- IDF) repre- sentation. Name", 'et': 'Artiklis kirjeldatakse CiTIUS-COLE meeskonna poolt SemEval 2019 ülesandele 5 esitatud strateegiat, mis koosneb binaarsest klassifitseerimisest, kus süsteem ennustab, kas säutsu inglise või hispaania keeles on naiste või sisserändajate vastu vihkamine või mitte. Kavandatud strateegia tugineb klassifitseerija tulemuslikkuse parandamiseks keeleliste omaduste kombineerimisele. Täpsemalt, meetod ühendab tekstilised ja leksikaalsed omadused, manustades sõnad sõnakotiga Term Frequency- Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF) kordamisel. Süsteemi jõudlus jõuab koolituse andmekogumile ligikaudu 81%ni F1, kuid selle F1 langeb ametliku testi andmekogumi puhul 36%ni inglise keele ja 64%ni hispaania keele puhul vihakõne klassi puhul', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje strategii, kterou tým CiTIUS-COLE předložil SemEval 2019 Task 5, úkol, který se skládá z binární klasifikace, kde systém předpovídá, zda je tweet v angličtině nebo španělštině nenávistný vůči ženám či imigrantům. Navrhovaná strategie spočívá v kombinaci jazykových vlastností ke zlepšení výkonnosti klasifikátoru. Přesněji řečeno, metoda kombinuje textové a lexikální rysy, vkládá slova se sáčkem slov do reprezentace Term Frequency- Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF). Výkon systému dosahuje asi 81% F1, když je aplikován na výcvikový soubor dat, avšak jeho F1 klesá na 36% v oficiálním testovacím souboru pro angličtinu a 64% pro španělský jazyk týkající se třídy nenávistné řeči', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan CiTIUS-COLE-tiimin SemEval 2019 Task 5:lle esittämää strategiaa, joka koostuu binaarisesta luokittelusta, jossa järjestelmä ennustaa, onko twiitti englanniksi tai espanjaksi vihamielinen naisia tai maahanmuuttajia vastaan vai ei. Ehdotettu strategia perustuu kielellisten ominaisuuksien yhdistämiseen luokittelijan suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi. Tarkemmin sanottuna menetelmässä yhdistyvät teksti- ja sanastoominaisuudet, upottamalla sanat termitaajuus- käänteinen dokumenttitaajuus (TF-IDF) -sanapussiin. Järjestelmän suorituskyky saavuttaa noin 81% F1 kun sitä käytetään harjoitusaineistoon, mutta sen F1 laskee 36% virallisesta testiaineistosta englannin kielellä ja 64% espanjan kielellä vihapuhetunnilla.', 'bs': 'Ovaj članak opisuje strategiju koju je CiTIUS-COLE tim predložio u zadatku 5. iz polEvala 2019. godine, zadatak koji se sastoji od dvostruke klase-definicije u kojem sistem predviđa da li je tweet na engleskom ili na španjolskom jeziku mrzio žene ili imigrante ili ne. Predložena strategija se oslanja na kombinaciju lingvističkih karakteristika kako bi poboljšala savršenost klasifikatora. Tačnije, metoda kombinira tekstualne i leksičke karakteristike, uključujući riječi sa vrećom riječi u Term Frekvencije - Inversija frekvencije dokumenta (TF-IDF) ponovno rečenice. Proizvodnja sustava postiže oko 81% F1 kada se primjenjuje na setu podataka obuke, ali njegov F1 pada na 36% na službenu setu podataka za testove za engleski i i 64% na španjolski jezik u vezi razgovora mržnje.', 'ca': "This article describes the strategy submitted by the CiTIUS-COLE team to SemEval 2019 Task 5, a task which consists of binary classi- fication where the system predicting whether a tweet in English or in Spanish is hateful against women or immigrants or not.  The proposed strategy relies on combining linguis- tic features to improve the classifier's perfor- mance.  Més precisament, el mètode combina característiques textuals i lècsiques, incorporant paraules amb la bolsa de paraules en la representació de la freqüència de termes - la freqüència inversa del document (TF-IDF). The system performance reaches about 81% F1 when it is applied to the training dataset, but its F1 drops to 36% on the official test dataset for the English and 64% for the Spanish language concerning the hate speech class", 'jv': 'Artiklé iki dadi nglarawa tasari nggawe kelompok CiTIus-Cole nggawe seminval 2011 task 5, dadi sing katêpakan karo kelompok binêr- nggawe sistem Where the sistem supayapun dhéwé kuwi tuwit inglissi apa karo perusahaan uwong. Awak dhéwé nggunakake kuwi nguasakno wigatining luwih-wigatik kanggo nguasai luwih apik. box Sistem kanggo nggawe barang kotak karo', 'sk': 'Ta članek opisuje strategijo, ki jo je ekipa CiTIUS-COLE predložila za nalogo 5 SemEval 2019, nalogo, ki je sestavljena iz binarne klasifikacije, pri kateri sistem napoveduje, ali je tweet v angleščini ali španščini sovražen proti ženskam ali priseljencem ali ne. Predlagana strategija temelji na združevanju jezikovnih značilnosti za izboljšanje uspešnosti klasifikatorja. Natančneje, metoda združuje besedilne in leksikalne značilnosti ter vključuje besede z vrečo besed v ponovno zaznavanje terminske frekvence- obratne frekvence dokumentov (TF-IDF). Učinkovitost sistema doseže približno 81% F1, ko se uporablja za nabor podatkov o usposabljanju, njegova F1 pa pade na 36% pri uradnem naboru podatkov o testih za angleščino in 64% pri španskem jeziku v zvezi s tečajem sovražnega govora.', 'ha': "Wannan rubutu yana bayyana kimar da aka aiko na CiTIU-COLE zuwa Tafiyar 5 zuwa SemEV 2019, wani aikin wanda ke ƙunsa da fassarar-mai labari-inda na'ura ya ƙayyade wani littafi ta zama mai ƙyãma a cikin Ingiriya ko kuma a cikin Hispanish, ko yana ƙyãma a kan mãtã da suka yi hijira. The proposed strategy relies on combining linguis- tic features to improve the classifier's perfor- mance.  @ action: button Tafiyar da na'urar tsarin na'ura ya kai taki 81% F1 idan an applet shi zuwa tsarin da za'a yi amfani da shi, kuma amma F1 na saka zuwa 36% da aka daidaita data masu rasmi wa jarraba na Ingiriya da 64% wa harshen Isbanish game da fasalin haske", 'he': 'המאמר הזה מתאר את האסטרטגיה שנשלחה על ידי צוות סיטיוס-קול לסימוול 2019 משימה 5, משימה שמתכתבת בכיתה בינרית - איפה המערכת חוששת אם טוויט באנגלית או בספרדית שונא נגד נשים או מהגרים או לא. האסטרטגיה המוצעת מסמכת על שילוב תכונות שפתיים כדי לשפר את השפעה של המקלסיסטר. יותר מדויק, השיטה משלבת תכונות טקסטוליות ולקסיות, תוספת מילים עם תיק מילים בתוצאות תדירות - תדירות מסמכים ההפוך (TF- IDF). ביצועי המערכת מגיעים ל-81% F1 כאשר היא מופעלת לקבוצת נתונים האימונים, אך F1 שלה נופלת ל-36% בקבוצת נתונים רשמית לבדיקות לאנגלית ו-64% לשפה הספרדית בנוגע לשיעור נאום השנאה', 'bo': 'གྲངས་སུ་འདིས་CiTIUS-COLE གླེང་མོལ་ཁང་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་SemEval 2019 ལས་འགན་འགྲུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། སྔོན་འཛིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་ཐུབ་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་། More precisely, the method combines textual and lexical features, embedding words with the bag of words in Term Frequency- Inverse Document Frequency (TF-IDF) repre-sentation. མ་ལག'}
{'en': 'Grunn2019 at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate', 'pt': 'Grunn2019 em SemEval-2019 Tarefa 5: Tarefa Compartilhada sobre Detecção Multilíngue de Ódio', 'ar': 'Grunn2019 في SemEval-2019 المهمة 5: مهمة مشتركة حول الكشف متعدد اللغات عن الكراهية', 'fr': 'Grunn2019 at SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 5\xa0: Tâche partagée sur la détection multilingue de la haine', 'es': 'Grunn2019 en SemEval-2019 Tarea 5: Tarea compartida sobre la detección multilingüe del odio', 'ja': 'Grunn 2019 at SemEval -2019 Task 5: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate', 'zh': 'Grunn2019 at SemEval-2019 务5:仇多言检之共同任务', 'hi': 'Grunn2019 SemEval-2019 टास्क 5 पर: नफरत के बहुभाषी डिटेक्शन पर साझा कार्य', 'ru': 'Grunn2019 на SemEval-2019 Задача 5: Общая задача по многоязычному обнаружению ненависти', 'ga': 'Grunn2019 ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 5: Tasc Comhroinnte ar Bhrath Ilteangach fuatha', 'ka': 'Grunn2019 semiEval-2019 სამუშაო დავალება 5: მრავალური განსახულებაზე მრავალური განსახულებაზე', 'el': 'Εργασία 5: Κοινή εργασία για την πολύγλωσση ανίχνευση μίσους', 'hu': 'Grunn2019 at SemEval-2019 5. feladat: Megosztott feladat a gyűlölet többnyelvű felismerésére', 'kk': 'Грун2019 жартық-2019 тапсырмасы 5: Бірнеше тілдік ненависті анықтау үшін ортақ тапсырма', 'it': "Grunn2019 a SemEval-2019 Task 5: Compito condiviso sulla rilevazione multilingue dell'odio", 'lt': '2019 m. pabaiga pusevalyje – 2019 m. 5 užduotis: bendra užduotis daugiakalbio neapykantos nustatymo srityje', 'mk': 'Грун2019 на SemEval-2019 задача 5: Соделена задача за мнографско откривање на омраза', 'ms': 'Grunn2019 di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Tugas Berkongsi mengenai Pengesanan Kebencian Berbahasa', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 5-ല്\u200d ഗ്രൂണ്\u200dന്\u200d2019: വെറുപ്പിന്\u200d', 'mn': 'Grunn2019 at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate', 'mt': 'Grunn2019 f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 5: Kompitu Konġunt dwar id-Detezzjoni Multilingwi tal-Mibegħda', 'no': 'Grunn2019 på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 5: Delt oppgåve på fleirspråk oppdaging av hatt', 'pl': 'Grunn2019 na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 5: Wspólne zadanie dotyczące wielojęzycznego wykrywania nienawiści', 'ro': 'Grunn2019 la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 5: Sarcina partajată privind detectarea multilingvă a urăi', 'sr': 'Grunn2019 na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 5: podeljeni zadatak o multijezičkom otkrivanju mržnje', 'si': 'Grunn 2019 at Halfeval-2019 Job 5: shared Job on Multilanguage Detection of Hate', 'so': 'Grunn2019 at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Shared Task on Dictionary of Hate', 'sv': 'Grunn2019 på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 5: Delad uppgift om flerspråkig upptäckt av hat', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 செயல் 5: வெறுப்பின் பல மொழி கண்டுபிடிப்பில் பகிர்ந்த பணி', 'ur': 'Grunn2019 at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifa 5: Koʻrsatilgan Multilingual Detection of Hat', 'vi': 'Một nhiệm vụ lớn hoạt động nhiều ngôn ngữ về trinh sát thù ghét', 'bg': 'Задача 5: Споделена задача за многоезично откриване на омраза', 'hr': 'Grunn2019 na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 5: zajednički zadatak o multijezičkom otkrivanju mržnje', 'da': 'Grunn2019 på SemEval-2019 Opgave 5: Delt opgave om flersproget detektering af had', 'nl': 'Grunn2019 op SemEval-2019 Taak 5: Gedeelde Taak over Meertalige Detectie van Haat', 'de': 'Grunn2019 auf SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 5: Gemeinsame Aufgabe zur mehrsprachigen Erkennung von Hass', 'ko': 'Grunn2019년 SemEval-2019 퀘스트 5: 다중 언어 원한 검출 공유 퀘스트', 'id': 'Grunn2019 di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Tugas Bersama tentang Deteksi Berbahasa Berbahasa Kebencian', 'fa': 'Grunn2019 at semiEval-2019 Task 5: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate', 'tr': '2019 at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate', 'sw': 'Grunn2019 kwenye SemEval-2019 Kazi 5: Kushirikishwa kazi katika Utafiti wa Lugha nyingi wa Hati', 'af': 'Grunn2019 by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 5: Gedeelde Opdrag op Multilingual Detection of Hate', 'am': 'Grunn2019 at SemEval-2019 ስራ 5: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate', 'az': 'Grunn2019 at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate', 'hy': '2019-ի «ՍեմԷվալ-2019» 5. հանձնարարությունը՝ ատելության բազմալեզու հայտնաբերման ընդհանուր հանձնարարություն', 'bn': 'গ্রুন২০১৯ সেমইভাল-২০১৯-এর কাজ ৫: ঘৃণার মাল্টিভাষায় কাজ শেয়ার করা হয়েছে', 'bs': 'Grunn2019 na pola izvještaja 2019. zadatak 5: zajednički zadatak o multijezičkom otkrivanju mržnje', 'ca': 'Grunn2019 a SemEval-2019 Task 5: Task Shared on Multilingual Detection of Hate', 'cs': 'Grunn2019 na SemEval-2019 Úkol 5: Sdílený úkol o vícejazyčné detekci nenávisti', 'et': 'Grun2019 SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 5: Ühisülesanne mitmekeelse vihkamise tuvastamise kohta', 'fi': 'Grun2019 SemEval-2019 Task 5: Jaettu tehtävä monikielisestä vihan havaitsemisesta', 'sq': 'Grunn2019 at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate', 'ha': 'QScriptBreakpointsModel', 'sk': 'Grunn2019 na SemEval-2019 Naloga 5: Skupna naloga o večjezičnem odkrivanju sovraštva', 'bo': 'Grunn2019 at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate', 'jv': 'Grun2011 at semiinval-2011 task 5: shared task on Multilanguage detection of Ate', 'he': '2019 ב SemEval-2019 משימה 5: משימה משותפת על גילוי שונא רבים'}
{'en': 'Hate speech occurs more often than ever and polarizes society. To help counter this polarization, SemEval 2019 organizes a shared task called the Multilingual Detection of Hate. The first task (A) is to decide whether a given tweet contains hate against immigrants or women, in a multilingual perspective, for English and Spanish. In the second task (B), the system is also asked to classify the following sub-tasks : hateful tweets as aggressive or not aggressive, and to identify the target harassed as individual or generic. We evaluate multiple models, and finally combine them in an ensemble setting. This ensemble setting is built of five and three submodels for the English and Spanish task respectively. In the current setup it shows that using a bigger ensemble for English tweets performs mediocre, while a slightly smaller ensemble does work well for detecting hate speech in Spanish tweets. Our results on the test set for English show 0.378 macro F1 on task A and 0.553 macro F1 on task B. For Spanish the results are significantly higher, 0.701 macro F1 on task A and 0.734 macro F1 for task B.', 'fr': "Les discours de haine sont plus fréquents que jamais et polarisent la société. Pour aider à contrer cette polarisation, SemEval 2019 organise une tâche commune appelée Multilingual Detection of Hate. La première tâche (A) est de décider si un tweet contient de la haine contre les immigrés ou les femmes, dans une perspective multilingue, pour l'anglais et l'espagnol. Dans la deuxième tâche (B), il est également demandé au système de classer les sous-tâches suivantes\xa0: les tweets haineux comme agressifs ou non agressifs, et d'identifier la cible harcelée comme étant individuelle ou générique. Nous évaluons plusieurs modèles, puis nous les combinons dans un ensemble. Ce décor d'ensemble est composé de cinq et trois sous-modèles pour les tâches en anglais et en espagnol respectivement. Dans la configuration actuelle, cela montre que l'utilisation d'un ensemble plus grand pour les tweets en anglais est médiocre, tandis qu'un ensemble légèrement plus petit fonctionne bien pour détecter les discours de haine dans les tweets en espagnol. Nos résultats sur l'ensemble de test pour l'anglais montrent 0,378 macro F1 sur la tâche A et 0,553 macro F1 sur la tâche B. Pour l'espagnol, les résultats sont nettement plus élevés, 0,701 macro F1 sur la tâche A et 0,734 macro F1 pour la tâche B.", 'ar': 'يحدث خطاب الكراهية في كثير من الأحيان أكثر من أي وقت مضى ويؤدي إلى استقطاب المجتمع. للمساعدة في مواجهة هذا الاستقطاب ، تنظم SemEval 2019 مهمة مشتركة تسمى الكشف متعدد اللغات عن الكراهية. المهمة الأولى (أ) هي تحديد ما إذا كانت تغريدة ما تحتوي على كراهية ضد المهاجرين أو النساء ، من منظور متعدد اللغات ، للغة الإنجليزية والإسبانية. في المهمة الثانية (ب) ، يُطلب من النظام أيضًا تصنيف المهام الفرعية التالية: التغريدات البغيضة على أنها عدوانية أو غير عدوانية ، وتحديد الهدف الذي تمت مضايقته على أنه فردي أو عام. نقوم بتقييم نماذج متعددة ، ثم نجمعها في النهاية في إعداد مجموعة. تم إنشاء إعداد المجموعة هذا من خمسة وثلاثة نماذج فرعية للمهمة الإنجليزية والإسبانية على التوالي. في الإعداد الحالي ، يُظهر أن استخدام مجموعة أكبر للتغريدات الإنجليزية يحقق أداءً متواضعًا ، بينما تعمل المجموعة الأصغر قليلاً بشكل جيد للكشف عن خطاب الكراهية في التغريدات الإسبانية. تُظهر نتائجنا في مجموعة الاختبار للغة الإنجليزية 0.378 ماكرو F1 في المهمة A و 0.553 ماكرو F1 في المهمة B. بالنسبة للإسبانية ، تكون النتائج أعلى بشكل ملحوظ ، و 0.701 ماكرو F1 في المهمة A و 0.734 ماكرو F1 للمهمة B.', 'es': 'La incitación al odio ocurre con más frecuencia que nunca y polariza a la sociedad. Para ayudar a contrarrestar esta polarización, SemEval 2019 organiza una tarea compartida llamada Detección multilingüe del odio. La primera tarea (A) es decidir si un tuit determinado contiene odio contra los inmigrantes o las mujeres, en una perspectiva multilingüe, en inglés y español. En la segunda tarea (B), también se le pide al sistema que clasifique las siguientes subtareas: los tuits de odio como agresivos o no agresivos, y que identifique al objetivo acosado como individual o genérico. Evaluamos varios modelos y, finalmente, los combinamos en un entorno conjunto. Esta configuración de conjunto se compone de cinco y tres submodelos para la tarea de inglés y español, respectivamente. En la configuración actual, muestra que usar un conjunto más grande para tuits en inglés es mediocre, mientras que un conjunto un poco más pequeño funciona bien para detectar el discurso de odio en los tuits en español. Nuestros resultados en el conjunto de pruebas para inglés muestran 0.378 macro F1 en la tarea A y 0.553 macro F1 en la tarea B. Para español los resultados son significativamente más altos, 0.701 macro F1 en la tarea A y 0.734 macro F1 para la tarea B.', 'pt': 'O discurso de ódio ocorre com mais frequência do que nunca e polariza a sociedade. Para ajudar a combater essa polarização, o SemEval 2019 organiza uma tarefa compartilhada chamada Detecção Multilíngue de Ódio. A primeira tarefa (A) é decidir se um determinado tweet contém ódio contra imigrantes ou mulheres, em uma perspectiva multilíngue, para inglês e espanhol. Na segunda tarefa (B), o sistema também é solicitado a classificar as seguintes subtarefas: tweets de ódio como agressivos ou não agressivos e identificar o alvo assediado como individual ou genérico. Avaliamos vários modelos e, finalmente, os combinamos em um conjunto. Essa configuração de conjunto é composta por cinco e três submodelos para a tarefa de inglês e espanhol, respectivamente. Na configuração atual, mostra que usar um conjunto maior para tweets em inglês tem um desempenho medíocre, enquanto um conjunto um pouco menor funciona bem para detectar discurso de ódio em tweets em espanhol. Nossos resultados no conjunto de testes para inglês mostram 0,378 macro F1 na tarefa A e 0,553 macro F1 na tarefa B. Para espanhol, os resultados são significativamente maiores, 0,701 macro F1 na tarefa A e 0,734 macro F1 na tarefa B.', 'ja': 'ヘイトスピーチはこれまで以上に頻繁に起こり、社会を二極化させる。 この二極化に対抗するために、SemEval 2019は多言語ヘイト検出と呼ばれる共有タスクを組織しています。 最初の課題（ A ）は、与えられたツイートに英語とスペイン語の多言語視点で、移民や女性への憎悪が含まれているかどうかを判断することです。 2番目のタスク（ B ）では、システムはまた、次のサブタスクを分類するように要求されます：憎悪的なツイートを攻撃的または攻撃的ではないと分類し、嫌がらせを受けたターゲットを個人または一般として識別します。 私たちは複数のモデルを評価し、最後にそれらをアンサンブルの設定で組み合わせます。 このアンサンブルセッティングは、英語とスペイン語の課題のためにそれぞれ5つのサブモデルと3つのサブモデルで構築されています。 現在の設定では、大きなアンサンブルを英語のツイートに使用すると、平凡なパフォーマンスを発揮することが示されていますが、少し小さなアンサンブルはスペイン語のツイートでのヘイトスピーチを検出するのにうまく機能します。 英語のテストセットの結果は、タスクAのマクロF 1が0.378、タスクBのマクロF 1が0.553です。スペイン語の場合、結果はタスクAのマクロF 1が0.701、タスクBのマクロF 1が0.734と大幅に高くなります。', 'hi': 'हेट स्पीच पहले से कहीं अधिक बार होती है और समाज को ध्रुवीकृत करती है। इस ध्रुवीकरण का मुकाबला करने में मदद करने के लिए, SemEval 2019 एक साझा कार्य का आयोजन करता है जिसे बहुभाषी डिटेक्शन ऑफ हेट कहा जाता है। पहला कार्य (ए) यह तय करना है कि क्या किसी दिए गए ट्वीट में आप्रवासियों या महिलाओं के खिलाफ नफरत है, एक बहुभाषी परिप्रेक्ष्य में, अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश के लिए। दूसरे कार्य (बी) में, सिस्टम को निम्नलिखित उप-कार्यों को वर्गीकृत करने के लिए भी कहा जाता है: घृणित ट्वीट्स को आक्रामक या आक्रामक नहीं के रूप में, और व्यक्तिगत या जेनेरिक के रूप में परेशान किए गए लक्ष्य की पहचान करने के लिए। हम कई मॉडलों का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, और अंत में उन्हें एक पहनावा सेटिंग में जोड़ते हैं। यह पहनावा सेटिंग क्रमशः अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश कार्य के लिए पांच और तीन उपमॉडलों से निर्मित है। वर्तमान सेटअप में यह दिखाता है कि अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स के लिए एक बड़े पहनावे का उपयोग करना औसत दर्जे का प्रदर्शन करता है, जबकि थोड़ा छोटा पहनावा स्पेनिश ट्वीट्स में नफरत भरे भाषण का पता लगाने के लिए अच्छी तरह से काम करता है। अंग्रेजी के लिए परीक्षण सेट पर हमारे परिणाम कार्य A पर 0.378 मैक्रो F1 और कार्य B पर 0.553 मैक्रो F1 दिखाते हैं। स्पैनिश के लिए परिणाम काफी अधिक हैं, कार्य A पर 0.701 मैक्रो F1 और कार्य B के लिए 0.734 मैक्रो F1।', 'zh': '仇言比往时常起,并使世间两极分化。 助此两极分化,SemEval 2019多言检之共同任务。 一务(A)定给定之推文包移民女之仇,以多言之角观之,英语西班牙语也。 其二务(B)中,统犹求将以下子职分类:仇推文为攻击性不攻击性,而识扰为私。 我评数模样,终合置一成。 合置五三子,各以英语西班牙语为务。 当今之设也,明英语推文用大合庸,而小合诚可善检西班牙语推文之仇言也。 试于英语集上 A 示 0.378 宏 F1,示 0.553 F1于任 B 。 其于西班牙语也,明而益高, A 为 0.701 宏 F1,任 B 为 0.734 F1。', 'ru': 'Ненавистнические высказывания происходят чаще, чем когда-либо, и поляризуют общество. Чтобы противостоять этой поляризации, SemEval 2019 организует совместную задачу под названием «Многоязычное обнаружение ненависти». Первая задача (А) заключается в том, чтобы решить, содержит ли тот или иной твит ненависть к иммигрантам или женщинам, в многоязычной перспективе, в отношении английского и испанского языков. Во второй задаче (B) системе также предлагается классифицировать следующие подзадачи: ненавистнические твиты как агрессивные или неагрессивные и идентифицировать объект преследования как индивидуальный или общий. Мы оцениваем несколько моделей и, наконец, объединяем их в ансамблевую среду. Этот ансамбль построен из пяти и трех подмоделей для задачи на английском и испанском языках соответственно. В текущей настройке это показывает, что использование большего ансамбля для английских твитов выполняет посредственную функцию, в то время как немного меньший ансамбль хорошо работает для обнаружения ненавистнических высказываний в испанских твитах. Наши результаты по тестовому набору для английского языка показывают 0,378 макроса F1 по задаче A и 0,553 макроса F1 по задаче B. Для испанского языка результаты значительно выше, 0,701 макроса F1 по задаче A и 0,734 макроса F1 по задаче B.', 'ga': 'Tarlaíonn fuathchaint níos minice ná riamh agus polaraíonn sí an tsochaí. Chun cabhrú leis an bpolarú seo a chomhrac, eagraíonn SemEval 2019 tasc comhroinnte ar a dtugtar Brath Ilteangach fuatha. Is é an chéad tasc (A) cinneadh a dhéanamh an bhfuil gráin in aghaidh na n-inimirceach nó na mban, i bpeirspictíocht ilteangach, i gcás Béarla agus Spáinnis. Sa dara tasc (B), iarrtar ar an gcóras freisin na fo-thascanna seo a leanas a rangú: tvuíteanna fuatha mar ionsaitheach nó gan a bheith ionsaitheach, agus an sprioc a ciapadh a shainaithint mar sprioc aonair nó cineálach. Déanaimid meastóireacht ar mhúnlaí iomadúla, agus ar deireadh iad a chur le chéile i suíomh ensemble. Tá an suíomh ensemble seo tógtha de chúig agus trí fho-mhúnla don tasc Béarla agus Spáinnis faoi seach. Sa leagan amach atá ann faoi láthair léiríonn sé go n-éiríonn go han-mhaith le ensemble níos mó a úsáid le haghaidh tweets Béarla, cé go n-oibríonn ensemble beagán níos lú go maith chun fuathchaint a bhrath i dtvuíteanna Spáinneacha. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí ar an tacar tástála don Bhéarla 0.378 macra F1 ar thasc A agus 0.553 macra F1 ar thasc B. I gcás na Spáinne tá na torthaí i bhfad níos airde, 0.701 macra F1 ar thasc A agus 0.734 macra F1 do thasc B.', 'ka': 'მპატის სიტყვა ხდება უფრო მეტი, ვიდრე საზოგადოება და პოლარიზებს საზოგადოება. ამ პოლარიზაციის შესაძლებელად, SemEval 2019-ს განსაზღვრებული რაოდენობა, რომელიც მრავალენგური განსაზღვრება მხარდაპირობა. პირველი დავალება (A) არის გადაწყვეტა, თუ მინდომირებული ტივიტი არსებობს მრავალენგური ან ქალების მრავალენგური პერსპექტიკში, ანგლისური და სპანელი. მეორე დავალებში (B) სისტემის კლასიფიკაცია შემდეგ საკუთარი დავალებების შესაძლებელია: მყვერული tweets როგორც ადგრესიური ან არ ადგრესიური, და იდენტიფიკაცია საკუთარი ან გენერიკური მისამართი. ჩვენ მრავალ მოდელების შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი. ეს ინგლისური და სპანელი დავალებისთვის 5 და 3 სუბმოდელზე შექმნა. მიმდინარე კონფიგურაციაში ის გამოყენება, რომ ანგლისური ტივიტებისთვის უფრო დიდი ინსნემბლის გამოყენება მედიოკური გამოყენება, მაგრამ ცოტა ნაკლები ინსენმბლის გამოყენება კა ჩვენი შედეგი ინგლისური ტესტის შესახებ 0.378 მაკრო F1 დააჩვენება A და 0.553 მაკრო F1 დავალებში B დავალებში. სპანელის შესახებ შედეგი უფრო მეტია, 0.701 მაკრო F1 დავალებით A და 0.734 მაკრო F1 დავალებით B დავალებით', 'hu': 'A gyűlölet beszéd gyakrabban fordul elő, mint valaha, és polarizálja a társadalmat. A polarizáció elleni küzdelem érdekében a SemEval 2019 megszervezi a gyűlölet többnyelvű felismerése címet. Az első feladat (A) az, hogy eldöntsük, hogy egy adott tweet tartalmaz-e gyűlöletet a bevándorlók vagy a nők ellen, többnyelvű szempontból angol és spanyol nyelven. A második feladat (B) során a rendszer a következő alfeladatokat is felkéri: gyűlöletes tweetek agresszív vagy nem agresszív, valamint a zaklatott célpont egyéni vagy általános jellegű azonosítására. Több modellt értékelünk, és végül kombináljuk őket együttes környezetben. Ez az együttes beállítás öt és három almodellből áll az angol és a spanyol feladathoz. A jelenlegi beállításban azt mutatja, hogy egy nagyobb együttes használata angol tweetekhez középszerű, míg egy kissé kisebb együttes jól működik a spanyol tweetekben a gyűlöletbeszéd felismerésére. Az angol nyelvű tesztkészleten szereplő eredményeink 0,378 F1 makró az A tevékenységen és 0,553 F1 makró a B tevékenységen. A spanyol nyelvű eredmények jelentősen magasabbak, 0,701 F1 makró az A tevékenységen és 0,734 F1 makró a B tevékenységen.', 'el': 'Η ρητορική μίσους εμφανίζεται πιο συχνά από ποτέ και πολώνει την κοινωνία. Για να βοηθήσει στην αντιμετώπιση αυτής της πόλωσης, το οργανώνει μια κοινή εργασία που ονομάζεται Πολυγλωσσική Ανίχνευση του μίσους. Το πρώτο καθήκον (Α) είναι να αποφασίσει αν ένα συγκεκριμένο tweet περιέχει μίσος κατά των μεταναστών ή των γυναικών, σε μια πολύγλωσση προοπτική, για τα αγγλικά και τα ισπανικά. Στη δεύτερη εργασία (Β), το σύστημα καλείται επίσης να ταξινομήσει τις ακόλουθες δευτερεύουσες εργασίες: μισητά tweets ως επιθετικά ή όχι επιθετικά, και να προσδιορίσει τον στόχο που παρενοχλείται ως ατομικό ή γενικό. Αξιολογούμε πολλαπλά μοντέλα και τελικά τα συνδυάζουμε σε ένα σύνολο. Αυτό το σύνολο αποτελείται από πέντε και τρία υπομοντέλα για την αγγλική και ισπανική εργασία αντίστοιχα. Στην τρέχουσα ρύθμιση δείχνει ότι η χρήση ενός μεγαλύτερου συνόλου για αγγλικά tweets αποδίδει μέτρια, ενώ ένα ελαφρώς μικρότερο σύνολο λειτουργεί καλά για την ανίχνευση της ομιλίας μίσους στα ισπανικά tweets. Τα αποτελέσματά μας στο σετ δοκιμών για τα αγγλικά δείχνουν 0.378 μακροεντολή F1 στην εργασία A και 0.553 μακροεντολή F1 στην εργασία Β. Για τα ισπανικά τα αποτελέσματα είναι σημαντικά υψηλότερα, 0.701 μακροεντολή F1 στην εργασία A και 0.734 μακροεντολή F1 για εργασία Β.', 'it': "Il discorso d'odio si verifica più spesso che mai e polarizza la società. Per aiutare a contrastare questa polarizzazione, SemEval 2019 organizza un compito condiviso chiamato Multilingual Detection of Hate. Il primo compito (A) è quello di decidere se un dato tweet contiene odio contro immigrati o donne, in una prospettiva multilingue, per l'inglese e lo spagnolo. Nel secondo compito (B), al sistema viene inoltre chiesto di classificare i seguenti sottocompiti: tweet odiosi come aggressivi o non aggressivi, e di identificare il bersaglio molestato come individuale o generico. Valutiamo più modelli, e infine li combiniamo in un ambiente di ensemble. Questa impostazione di insieme è composta da cinque e tre sottomodelli rispettivamente per l'attività inglese e spagnola. Nella configurazione attuale mostra che l'utilizzo di un ensemble più grande per i tweet inglesi è mediocre, mentre un ensemble leggermente più piccolo funziona bene per rilevare i discorsi di odio nei tweet spagnoli. I risultati del test set per l'inglese mostrano 0,378 macro F1 per l'attività A e 0,553 macro F1 per l'attività B. Per lo spagnolo i risultati sono significativamente più alti, 0,701 macro F1 per l'attività A e 0,734 macro F1 per l'attività B.", 'lt': 'Nekenčių kalba vyksta dažniau nei kada nors anksčiau ir polarizuoja visuomenę. Kad padėtų kovoti su šia poliarizacija, 2019 m. SemEval organizuoja bendrą užduotį, vadinamą Nekenčiavimo daugiakalbiu aptikimu. Pirmoji užduotis (A) yra nuspręsti, ar tam tikrame tweete anglų ir ispanų kalbomis yra neapykantos prieš imigrantus ar moteris. Antroje užduotyje (B) sistema taip pat prašoma klasifikuoti šias subužduotis: neapykantinį tweetą kaip agresyvų arba ne agresyvų ir nustatyti priekabiavamą tikslą kaip individual ų arba bendrų. Mes vertiname kelis modelius ir galiausiai juos deriname ansambliuose. This ensemble setting is built of five and three submodels for the English and Spanish task respectively.  Dabartinėje struktūroje matyti, kad naudojant didesnį Ensamblą anglų tweetams vyksta vidutiniškai, o šiek tiek mažesnis Ensamblis gerai veikia neapykantos kalbos aptikimui ispanų tweetuose. Mūsų rezultatai bandymų rinkinyje anglų kalba rodo 0,378 makro F1 užduotyje A ir 0,553 makro F1 užduotyje B. Ispanijos atveju rezultatai yra gerokai didesni, 0,701 makro F1 užduotyje A ir 0,734 makro F1 užduotyje B.', 'mk': 'Зборот за омраза се случува често отколку некогаш и го поларизира општеството. За да помогне во борбата против оваа поларизација, SemEval 2019 организира заедничка задача наречена Мултијазична Детекција на омразата. Првата задача (А) е да се одлучи дали одреден твит содржи омраза против имигрантите или жените, во мултијазичка перспектива, за англиски и шпански. Во втората задача (Б), системот, исто така, се бара да ги класификува следните подзадачи: мразните твитови како агресивни или не агресивни, и да ја идентификува метата која е малтретирана како индивидуална или генерална. Ги проценуваме многуте модели и конечно ги комбинираме во услов на ансамбл. Оваа поставка е изградена од пет и три подмодели за англиската и шпанската задача. Во сегашната поставка покажува дека користењето на поголем англиски твитови претставува средно, додека малку помал англиски твитови добро функционира за детектирање на говорот на омраза на шпански твитови. Нашите резултати на тестот за англиски покажуваат 0, 378 макро F1 на задачата A и 0, 553 макро F1 на задачата B. За шпански резултатите се значително повисоки, 0, 701 макро F1 на задачата A и 0, 734 макро F1 за задачата B.', 'kk': 'Жарамсыз сөйлесу көбірек көбірек болады және көбірек қоғамдығын поларизациялады. Бұл поляризацияны бағыттауға көмектесу үшін 2019 жылдың жарым-бағытталған тапсырманы бірнеше тілді ненависті анықтау деп аталады. Бірінші тапсырма (А) келтірілген тапсырманың иммигранттерге не әйелдерге қарсы қарсы, көптілік тілдерінде, ағылшын және испан тілдеріне қарсы қарсы бар ма деп шешілу Екінші тапсырма (B) дегенде жүйе келесі ішкі тапсырмаларды бағалау үшін сұралады: қарсы tweets агрессивні не агрессивні деп аталмайды, және жеке не жалпы деп белгіленген мақсатты анықтау үшін. Біз бірнеше үлгілерді оқу және соңында оларды ензембл параметрлерінде біріктіреміз. Бұл параметр ағылшын және Испан тапсырмаларының бес және үш ішкі үлгілерінен құрылады. Қолданыстағы орнатылғанда, ағылшын tweets үшін үлкен енземблі қолдану орташа орташа жұмыс істейді, бірақ бірнеше кішкентай енземблі испан tweets тізімдерінде қарсы сөйлесу үшін жақсы жұмыс Біздің ағылшын тілінің сынақтарының нәтижесіміз B тапсырмасында A және 0,553 макро F1 тапсырмасында 0,378 макро F1 дегенді көрсетеді. Испан тілінде нәтижелері A және 0,734 макро F1 тапсырмасында көп жоғары болады.', 'ms': 'Ucapan kebencian berlaku lebih sering dari sebelumnya dan menguasai masyarakat. Untuk membantu melawan polarizasi ini, SemEval 2019 mengatur tugas berkongsi yang dipanggil Deteksi Berbahasa Kebencian. Tugas pertama (A) adalah untuk memutuskan sama ada tweet tertentu mengandungi kebencian terhadap imigran atau perempuan, dalam perspektif berbilang bahasa, untuk bahasa Inggeris dan Sepanyol. Dalam tugas kedua (B), sistem juga diminta untuk mengklasifikasi sub-tugas berikut: tweet yang benci sebagai agresif atau tidak agresif, dan untuk mengenalpasti sasaran yang diganggu sebagai individu atau generik. Kami menilai beberapa model, dan akhirnya menggabungkannya dalam seting ensemble. Tetapan ensemble ini dibina dari lima dan tiga model bawah tanah untuk tugas Bahasa Inggeris dan Sepanyol respectively. Dalam seting semasa ia menunjukkan bahawa menggunakan ensemble yang lebih besar untuk tweet Inggeris melaksanakan sederhana, sementara ensemble yang sedikit lebih kecil bekerja dengan baik untuk mengesan ucapan kebencian dalam tweet Sepanyol. Hasil kami pada set ujian untuk bahasa Inggeris menunjukkan 0.378 makro F1 pada tugas A dan 0.553 makro F1 pada tugas B. Untuk bahasa Sepanyol hasilnya jauh lebih tinggi, 0.701 makro F1 pada tugas A dan 0.734 makro F1 untuk tugas B.', 'ml': 'വെറുപ്പുള്ള സംസാരം എപ്പോഴും സംഭവിക്കുന്നു. സമൂഹത്തെക്കാളും വെറുപ്പുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. ഈ പരിശോധനത്തെ എതിര്\u200dത്താന്\u200d സഹായിക്കാന്\u200d, സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 വെറുപ്പിന്റെ അധികാരത്തിന്റെ പേരില്\u200d പങ്കെടുത്ത ജോലി ഒരു  ഒന്നാമത്തെ ജോലി (A) കൊടുത്ത ടൂട്ടില്\u200d കൊടുത്തിരിക്കുന്നത് അഗസ്ഥികള്\u200dക്കോ സ്ത്രീകള്\u200dക്കോ വെറുപ്പുണ്ടോ എന്നാണോ എന്നാ രണ്ടാമത്തെ ജോലിയില്\u200d സിസ്റ്റമിനോടും താഴെയുള്ള ഉപാധികളെ വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ആവശ്യപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു: വെറുപ്പുള്ള ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200d അക്രമവും ആക നമ്മള്\u200d പല മോഡലുകളെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, അവസാനം അവയെ ഒരു മാതൃകയില്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. ഇംഗ്ലീഷും സ്പാനിഷ് ജോലിക്കും അഞ്ചും മൂന്നും സബ്മോഡലുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഈ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ് ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ സജ്ജീകരണത്തില്\u200d അത് കാണിക്കുന്നു, ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി വലിയൊരു സംസാരം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് മദ്ധ്യേ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് കാണിക്കാനുള്ള പരീക്ഷണ സജ്ജീകരണത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d എ. 378 മാക്രോ എഫ്1 ജോലിയിലും 0. 553 മാക്രോ F1 പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു. സ്പാനിഷിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d വളരെ വലുതാണ്, എ', 'mt': 'Id-diskors tal-mibegħda jseħħ aktar spiss minn qatt qabel u polarizza s-soċjetà. Biex tgħin fil-ġlieda kontra din il-polarizzazzjoni, SemEval 2019 jorganizza kompitu komuni msejjaħ id-Detezzjoni Multilingwi tal-Mibegħda. L-ewwel kompitu (A) huwa li jiġi deċiż jekk tweet partikolari jinkludix mibegħda kontra l-immigranti jew in-nisa, f’perspettiva multilingwi, għall-Ingliż u l-Ispanjol. Fit-tieni kompitu (B), is-sistema tintalab tikklassifika wkoll is-sottokompiti li ġejjin: tweets mibegħda bħala aggressivi jew mhux aggressivi, u tidentifika l-mira fastidjata bħala individwali jew ġeneriċi. Nivvalutaw mudelli multipli, u fl-aħħar nett nikkombinawhom f’ambjent ta’ ensemble. Dan is-sett ta’ ensemble huwa mibni minn ħames u tliet sottomudelli għall-kompitu Ingliż u Spanjol rispettivament. Fl-istruttura attwali dan juri li l-użu ta’ ensemble akbar għat-tweets Ingliżi jwassal għal medjakre, filwaqt li ensemble kemmxejn iżgħar jaħdem tajjeb biex jinstab diskors ta’ mibegħda fit-tweets Spanjoli. Ir-riżultati tagħna fuq is-sett tat-test għall-Ingliż juru 0.378 makro F1 fuq il-kompitu A u 0.553 makro F1 fuq il-kompitu B. Għall-Ispanjol ir-riżultati huma sinifikament ogħla, 0.701 makro F1 fuq il-kompitu A u 0.734 makro F1 għal kompitu B.', 'mn': 'Харамсалтай яриа хэзээ ч ихэвчлэн нийгэмдээ багасгаж байдаг. Энэ хөгжлийн эсрэг туслахын тулд 2019 оны SemEval нь хэт хэлний үзэн ядуурлын олон хэлний нээлтийг зохион байгуулдаг. Эхний даалгавар (А) гэдэг нь англи болон Испан хэлний зэрэг олон хэлний үзэл дээр хөдөлгөөнтүүд эсвэл эмэгтэйчүүдийн эсрэг үзэн ядах эсэхийг шийдэх юм. Хоёрдугаар даалгаварт (B) даалгаварт систем нь дараагийн суб-даалгаваруудыг хэлэхэд хүсэгддэг. Харамсалтай tweets нь агуу эсвэл агуу байхгүй, хүндрэлтэй зорилготой зорилго нь хувийн эсвэл ерөнхийлөгч гэж тодорхойлдог. Бид олон загварыг үнэлдэг. Эцэст нь тэднийг загварын хэмжээнд нэгтгэдэг. Энэ загвар нь Англи болон Испанийн ажлын 5, 3 субзагвараар бүтээсэн. Харин одоогийн суурь дээр Англи tweets дээр илүү том эмбэлэг ашиглах нь дундаж байдаг. Гэхдээ бага зэрэг жижиг эмбэлэг нь Испанийн tweets дээр үзэн ядуурлын яриаг олохын тулд сайн ажилладаг. Англи хэлний шалгалтын үр дүн нь A болон 0.553 макро F1 даалгаврын талаар 0.378 макро F1 болон B даалгаврын талаар үзүүлдэг.', 'no': 'Hatt-tale skjer ofte enn noen gang og polariserer samfunnet. For å hjelpa å telja denne polarisasjonen, organiserer semiEval 2019 eit delt oppgåve kalla det fleirspråksoppdaginga av hatt. Den første oppgåva (A) er å bestemme om ein gitt tweet inneheld hatt mot imigrantar eller kvinner, i ein fleirspråk perspektiv, for engelsk og spansk. I den andre oppgåva (B) vert systemet også spurd om å klassifisera desse underoppgåva: hatefulle tweeter som aggressiv eller ikkje aggressiv, og å identifisera målet som individuelt eller generelt. Vi evaluerer fleire modeller, og til slutt kombinerer dei i ein innstilling av ensemble. Dette innstillinga er bygd av fem og tre undermodeller for engelsk og spansk oppgåve. I det gjeldande oppsettet viser det at bruk av ein større ensembel for engelske tweets utfører mediocre, mens ein litt mindre ensembel fungerer bra for å finna hatespråk i spanske tweeter. Resultatet våre på testsettet for engelsk viser 0,378 makro F1 på oppgåva A og 0,553 makro F1 på oppgåva B. For spansk er resultatet mykje høgare, 0,701 makro F1 på oppgåva A og 0,734 makro F1 for oppgåva B.', 'pl': 'Mowa nienawiści występuje częściej niż kiedykolwiek i polaryzuje społeczeństwo. Aby przeciwdziałać tej polaryzacji, SemEval 2019 organizuje wspólne zadanie zwane Wielojęzyczne Wykrywanie Nienawiści. Pierwszym zadaniem (A) jest zdecydowanie, czy dany tweet zawiera nienawiść wobec imigrantów czy kobiet, w perspektywie wielojęzycznej, dla angielskiego i hiszpańskiego. W drugim zadaniu (B) system zostaje również poproszony o klasyfikację następujących podzadań: nienawiściwe tweety jako agresywne lub nieagresywne oraz o identyfikację nękanego celu jako indywidualnego lub ogólnego. Oceniamy wiele modeli, a w końcu łączymy je w zespole. Ten zestaw zbudowany jest z pięciu i trzech podmodeli odpowiednio do zadania angielskiego i hiszpańskiego. W obecnej konfiguracji pokazuje, że używanie większego zespołu dla angielskich tweetów wydaje się przeciętnie, podczas gdy nieco mniejszy zespół sprawdza się dobrze do wykrywania mowy nienawiści w hiszpańskich tweetach. Nasze wyniki na zestawie testowym dla angielskiego pokazują makro 0.378 F1 na zadaniu A i makro 0.553 F1 na zadaniu B. W przypadku hiszpańskiego wyniki są znacznie wyższe, makro 0.701 F1 na zadaniu A i makro 0.734 F1 dla zadania B.', 'ro': 'Discursul de ură apare mai des ca niciodată și polarizează societatea. Pentru a ajuta la combaterea acestei polarizări, SemEval 2019 organizează o sarcină comună numită Detectarea Multilingvă a Urii. Prima sarcină (A) este de a decide dacă un anumit tweet conține ură împotriva imigranților sau a femeilor, într-o perspectivă multilingvă, pentru engleză și spaniolă. În a doua sarcină (B), sistemului i se cere, de asemenea, să clasifice următoarele subsarcini: tweeturile pline de ură ca fiind agresive sau neagresive, și să identifice ținta hărțuită ca fiind individuală sau generică. Evaluăm mai multe modele și, în cele din urmă, le combinăm într-un cadru ansamblu. Această setare de ansamblu este construită din cinci și trei submodele pentru sarcina engleză și respectiv spaniolă. În configurația actuală arată că utilizarea unui ansamblu mai mare pentru tweeturile în limba engleză este mediocră, în timp ce un ansamblu puțin mai mic funcționează bine pentru detectarea discursului de ură în tweeturile spaniole. Rezultatele noastre pe setul de testare pentru limba engleză arată 0,378 macro F1 pentru sarcina A și 0,553 macro F1 pentru sarcina B. Pentru limba spaniolă rezultatele sunt semnificativ mai mari, 0,701 macro F1 pentru sarcina A și 0,734 macro F1 pentru sarcina B.', 'sr': 'Mrzim govor se pojavljuje češće nego ikad i polarizuje društvo. Da bi pomogla da se suoči sa ovim polarizacijom, SemEval 2019 organizuje zajednički zadatak koji se zove Multilingual Detection of Hate. Prvi zadatak (A) je odlučiti da li određeni tweet sadrži mržnju prema imigrantima ili ženama, u višejezičkoj perspektivi, za engleski i španjolski. U drugom zadatku (B), sistem se takođe traži da klasifikuje sljedeće podzadatke: mržne tweete kao agresivne ili ne agresivne, i da identifikuju metu uznemirenu kao individualne ili generične. Procjenjujemo višestruke modele i konačno ih kombinujemo u postavku ensembla. Ovaj nastav ensembla je izgrađen od pet i tri podmodela za engleski i španjolski zadatak. U trenutnom setu pokazuje da korištenje većeg ensembla za engleske tweets izvodi mediokret, dok malo manje ensemble dobro radi za otkrivanje govora mržnje na španjolskim tweetima. Naši rezultati na testu za engleski pokazuju 0,378 makro F1 na zadatku A i 0,553 makro F1 na zadatku B. Za španjolski su rezultati značajno veći, 0,701 makro F1 na zadatku A i 0,734 makro F1 za zadatak B.', 'so': 'Hadalka nebcaagu wuxuu marar badan ku dhacaa inta aan weligeed ahayn, bulshadana wuu ka baaraandeeyaa. Si loo caawiyo ka hor dhigidda polarinta, SemEval 2019 wuxuu qabanqaabiyaa shaqo la qaybsan oo la yidhaahdo baaritaanka luuqadaha badan ee hat. Shaqada ugu horeeya (A) waa in uu go’aano in twiti la siiyay uu ku jiro nebcaan ka gees ah dadka dalka u soo guuray ama dumarka, aragtida luuqadaha kala duduwan, Ingiriis iyo Isbanish. Shaqada labaad (B) waxaa sidoo kale lagu weydiinayaa in nidaamka lagu kala qeybiyo shaqooyinka soo socda: tweetiyada la nacay oo ah mid xadgudub ah ama aan xadgudub lahayn, iyo in la caddeeyo waxyaabaha lagu dhibay sida mid gaar ah ama caadi ah. Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa tusaalooyin badan, ugu danbayna waxaynu ku soo darsameynaa dabool. Shaqooyinkan waxaa loo dhisaa shan iyo saddex submodel oo loo qorayo shuqulka ingiriisiga iyo Isbanishka. Xafiiska la joogo waxay muuqataa in isticmaalka afka Ingiriiska looga hadlo mid ka weyn wuxuu sameeyaa mid dhexdhexaad, isla markaasna mid yar oo ka yar ayaa si wanaagsan u shaqeeya si aad u ogaato hadalka nebcaada ee Isbanishka ku qoran. Fashihiisa imtixaanka ingiriisiga waxaa laga helaa 0.378 macro F1 oo ku saabsan shaqo A iyo 0.553 macro F1 oo ku qoran shaqo B. Ilmaha Isbanishka waxaa laga helaa mid aad u sareeya, 0.701 macro F1 shaqo A iyo 0.734 macro F1 oo loo sameeyo shaqo B.', 'sv': 'Hattal förekommer oftare än någonsin och polariserar samhället. För att motverka denna polarisering organiserar SemEval 2019 en gemensam uppgift som kallas flerspråkig upptäckt av hat. Den första uppgiften (A) är att avgöra om en viss tweet innehåller hat mot invandrare eller kvinnor, i ett flerspråkigt perspektiv, för engelska och spanska. I den andra uppgiften (B) uppmanas systemet också att klassificera följande underuppgifter: hatiska tweets som aggressiva eller icke aggressiva, och att identifiera målet som trakasseras som individ eller generisk. Vi utvärderar flera modeller och kombinerar dem slutligen i en ensemble miljö. Denna ensembleinställning består av fem och tre delmodeller för den engelska respektive spanska uppgiften. I den nuvarande uppsättningen visar det att en större ensemble för engelska tweets presterar medelmåttigt, medan en något mindre ensemble fungerar bra för att upptäcka hatpropaganda i spanska tweets. Våra resultat på testuppsättningen för engelska visar 0,378 makro F1 för uppgift A och 0,553 makro F1 för uppgift B. För spanska är resultaten betydligt högre, 0,701 makro F1 för uppgift A och 0,734 makro F1 för uppgift B.', 'si': 'නමුත් කතාවක් වෙන්නේ කවදාවත් වඩා වැඩියෙන් සමාජ විශ්වාස කරනවා. මේ පෝලියාසිකරණය ගැන බලන්න උදව් කරන්න, 2019 සෙම්වෙල් එක්ක බොහොම භාෂාවක් හොයාගන්න කාර්යයක් සංයෝජ මුලින් වැඩ (A) තීරණය වෙන්නේ කියලා තියෙන්නේ දෙන්න තුවක්කුවක් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ස්පැනිස් වලට විරුද්ධ වෙනුවෙන දෙවෙනි කාර්ය (B) වලින්, පද්ධතියට පස්සේ සබ් කාර්ය විශ්වාස කරන්න කියලා අහන්නේ පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය: ප්\u200dරශ්නය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය වෙ අපි වඩා මොඩේල් විශ්වාස කරනවා, අන්තිමේදී ඔවුන්ව එන්සෙම්බුල් සැකසුම් වලට එකතු කරනවා. මේ සැකසුම්බල් සැකසුම් පහයි තුනයි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ස්පැනිස් වැඩ සබ් මොඩේල් වලින් හදන්නේ. ප්\u200dරස්තූත සැටුම් වලින් ඒක පෙන්වන්නේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ට්වීට් වලට විශාලයෙන් විශාලයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා කියලා, ස්පැනිස් ට් ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ පරීක්ෂණ සැකසුමේ අපේ පරීක්ෂණාව පෙන්වන්නේ A සහ 0.553 මැක්රෝ F1 වැඩේ B වල. ස්පැනිස් වලින් පරීක්ෂණාවල් ගොඩක් උඩ, 0.701 මැක්රෝ F1 ව', 'ta': 'எதிர்பார்ப்பு பேச்சு எப்போதும் விட அதிகமாக நடக்கிறது மற்றும் சமூகத்தை தீவிரமாக்குகிறது. இந்த தேர்வு எதிர்பார்ப்பதற்கு உதவி, SemEval 2019 வெறுப்பின் பங்கிடப்பட்ட பணியை அமைக்கிறது. முதல் செயல் (A) கொடுக்கப்பட்ட ஒரு தொடர்பு கொடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளதா குடிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளதா அல்லது பெண்களுக்கு எதிரான வெறுப்பு இருக்கி இரண்டாவது செயல் (B) முறைமையில், பின்வரும் துணை பணிகளை வகுப்பதற்கும் கேட்கப்பட்டுள்ளது: வெறுப்புள்ள tweets என்பது aggressive அல்லது aggressive அல்ல, மற்றும் இலக்கை தனிய நாம் பல மாதிரிகளை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம், இறுதியாக அவற்றை ஒரு ஒட்டை அமைப்பில் இணைக்கிறோம். இந்த குறிப்பு அமைப்பு ஆங்கிலத்துக்கும் ஸ்பானிஷ் பணிக்கும் ஐந்தும் மூன்று துணை மாதிரிகளில் அமைக தற்போதைய அமைப்பில் அது காண்பிக்கிறது என்றால் ஆங்கிலத்திற்கு ஒரு பெரிய ஒப்பந்தம் உபயோகிக்கும் ஒரு பெரிய ஆங்கிலத்திற்கு இடைவெளியே ச A மற்றும் 0. 553 மேக்ரோ F1 பணியில் உள்ள சோதனைக்கு அமைக்கப்பட்ட முடிவுகள் 0. 378 மேக்ரோ F1 காட்டியில் உள்ளது. ஸ்பானிஷ் க்கு முடிவுகள் மிக அதிகமாக இருக்கும், பணி B க்கு 0. 701', 'ur': 'عداوت کی بات کبھی بھی زیادہ ہوتی ہے اور اجتماعی کو مغلوب کرتی ہے۔ اس قطعہ کی مخالفت کی مدد کرنے کے لئے، سامیEval 2019 ایک مشترک کام کا سازمان کرتا ہے جس کا نام Multilingual Detection of Hate ہے. پہلا کام (A) یہ ہے کہ فیصلہ کرنا چاہے کہ ایک نوشتہ ٹویٹ میں مہاجرین یا عورتوں کے مقابلہ میں ناپسند ہے، کئی زبان کی نظر میں، انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی کے لئے۔ دوسرے کام میں (B) سیسٹم کو بھی پکارا جاتا ہے کہ نیچے sub-tasks کا کلاس کرے: ناپسندیدہ ٹیوٹ (ٹیوٹ) اذیت کرنے والا یا ناپسندیدہ ہے یا ناپسندیدہ ہے، اور موقع کو شخصی یا عمومی کے طور پر پہچان کرنا چاہتا ہے۔ ہم بہت سی موڈل کا ارزش کرتے ہیں، اور بالآخر ان کو ایک انسبل سیٹینٹ میں ترکیب کرتے ہیں۔ یہ انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی کام کے لئے پانچ اور تین سوب موڈل سے بنایا گیا ہے۔ موجود سیٹاپ میں یہ دکھاتا ہے کہ انگلیسی ٹویٹوں کے لئے بڑا انڈیسمبل استعمال کرتا ہے، حالانکہ ایک تھوڑا چھوٹا انڈیسمبل اسپانیایی ٹویٹوں میں دشمنی کی بات شناسایی کے لئے بہتر کام کرتا ہے. ہمارے نتائج انگلیسی کے لئے تست سٹ پر 0.378 مکرو F1 کو ٹاکس A اور 0.553 مکرو F1 پر نشان دیتے ہیں. اسپانیایی کے لئے نتائج بہت زیادہ ہیں، 0.701 مکرو F1 کو ٹاکس A اور 0.734 مکرو F1 کو ٹاکس B کے لئے.', 'uz': "Ko'p so'zlarni ko'p ko'p ko'p o'ylab buladi va jamiyatni o'zgartiradi. SemEval 2019 bir necha tilni ajratish uchun bir necha tilni ajratish jarayoni boshlaydi. The first task (A) is to decide whether a given tweet contains hate against immigrants or women, in a multilingual perspective, for English and Spanish.  Ikkinchi vazifa (B) da, tizim quyidagi sub-vazifalarni tayyorlash talab qilinadi: kichkina Twitterlarni anglagan yoki aggressiv emas, va harakat qilingan qandaydir shaxsiy yoki umumiy deb aniqlash mumkin. Biz bir necha modellarni qiymatimiz, va oxirida ularni bir eksempel moslamada birlashtiramiz. Bu moslama ingliz va ispancha vazifa uchun 5 va 3 submodellar yaratiladi. Joriy moslamada, ingliz tilida katta foydalanuvchi foydalanishni ko'rsatadi va kichkina foydalanuvchi ispanchadan foydalanish uchun juda yaxshi ishlaydi. Bu vazifa B da ingliz tilida sinov tugmalarimiz 0.378 macro F1 va 0.553 makro F1 bilan ishlaydi. Ispancha uchun natijalari juda katta, vazifa B uchun 0.701 macro F1 va 0.734 macro F1.", 'vi': 'Những lời nói căm ghét xảy ra thường xuyên hơn bao giờ hết. Để chống lại cực quang này, SemEvol dùm tổ chức một nhiệm vụ chia sẻ gọi là "Việc phát hiện ngôn ngữ rộng thù ghét". Việc đầu tiên (A) là quyết định xem một dòng tweet có chứa thù ghét đối với người nhập cư hay phụ nữ, trong một quan điểm đa dạng, cho người Anh và Tây Ban Nha hay không. Trong nhiệm vụ thứ hai (B), hệ thống cũng được yêu cầu phân loại các chi nhánh sau: những tweet ghét phải hung hăng hay không hung hăng, và để xác định mục tiêu bị quấy rối là cá nhân hay chung. Chúng tôi đánh giá nhiều mẫu, và kết hợp chúng trong một dàn hợp. Thiết lập này được chế tạo gồm năm và ba mẫu con cho nhiệm vụ Anh và Tây Ban Nha. Trong tình hình hiện tại, nó cho thấy rằng sử dụng một dàn nhạc lớn hơn cho những tweet tiếng Anh diễn ra tầm thường, trong khi một dàn nhạc nhỏ hơn hoạt động tốt cho việc phát hiện ngôn ngữ ghét trên Twitter của Tây Ban Nha. Những kết quả của chúng ta trên bộ thử nghiệm cho trình lệnh 0.38 macro F1 về nhiệm vụ A và 0.53X về nhiệm vụ B. Đối với Tây Ban Nha, kết quả cao hơn nhiều, 0.701, macro F1, nhiệm vụ A và 0.734, macro F1 cho nhiệm vụ B.', 'bg': 'Речта на омразата се случва по-често от всякога и поляризира обществото. За да помогне за противодействие на тази поляризация, организира споделена задача, наречена Многоезично откриване на омраза. Първата задача (А) е да се реши дали даден туит съдържа омраза срещу имигранти или жени, в многоезична перспектива, за английски и испански. Във втората задача (Б) системата също така трябва да класифицира следните подзадачи: омразни туитове като агресивни или не агресивни, и да идентифицира тормозената цел като индивидуална или обща. Оценяваме множество модели и накрая ги комбинираме в ансамбълна обстановка. Тази настройка на ансамбъла е изградена от пет и три подмодела съответно за английската и испанската задача. В настоящата настройка това показва, че използването на по-голям ансамбъл за английски туитове изпълнява посредствено, докато малко по-малък ансамбъл работи добре за откриване на реч на омраза в испански туитове. Нашите резултати от тестовия набор за английски език показват 0,378 макрос Ф1 за задача А и 0,553 макрос Ф1 за задача Б. За испански резултатите са значително по-високи, 0,701 макрос Ф1 за задача А и 0,734 макрос Ф1 за задача Б.', 'hr': 'Govor mržnje se pojavljuje češće nego ikad i polarizira društvo. Da bi pomogla da se suoči s ovim polarizacijom, SemEval 2019 organizira zajednički zadatak nazvan Mnogjezički otkrivanje mržnje. Prvi zadatak (A) je odlučiti da li dajeni tweet sadrži mržnju prema imigrantima ili ženama, u višejezičkoj perspektivi, za engleski i španjolski. U drugom zadatku (B), sustav se također traži da klasifikira sljedeće podzadatke: mržne tweete kao agresivne ili ne agresivne, te da identifikuju cilj uznemiren kao individualni ili generični. Procjenjujemo višestruke modele i konačno ih kombiniramo u postavku ensembla. Ovaj nastav ensembla je izgrađen od pet i tri podmodela za engleski i španjolski zadatak. U sadašnjoj nastavi pokazuje da koristeći veću ensemblu za engleske tweets izvodi srednju, dok malo manja ensembla dobro radi za otkrivanje govora mržnje na španjolskim tweetima. Naši rezultati na testu za engleski pokazuju 0,378 makro F1 na zadatku A i 0,553 makro F1 na zadatku B. Za španjolski su rezultati značajno veći, 0,701 makro F1 na zadatku A i 0,734 makro F1 za zadatak B.', 'nl': 'Hate speech komt vaker voor dan ooit en polariseert de samenleving. Om deze polarisatie tegen te gaan organiseert SemEval 2019 een gedeelde taak genaamd de Meertalige Detectie van Haat. De eerste taak (A) is om te bepalen of een bepaalde tweet haat tegen immigranten of vrouwen bevat, in een meertalig perspectief, voor Engels en Spaans. In de tweede taak (B) wordt het systeem ook gevraagd om de volgende subtaken te classificeren: haatdragende tweets als agressief of niet agressief, en het doelwit dat wordt lastiggevallen te identificeren als individueel of generiek. We evalueren meerdere modellen en combineren ze uiteindelijk in een ensemble setting. Deze ensemble setting is opgebouwd uit vijf en drie submodellen voor respectievelijk de Engelse en Spaanse taak. In de huidige opstelling blijkt dat het gebruik van een groter ensemble voor Engelse tweets middelmatig werkt, terwijl een iets kleiner ensemble goed werkt voor het detecteren van haatspraak in Spaanse tweets. Onze resultaten op de testset voor Engels tonen 0.378 macro F1 op taak A en 0.553 macro F1 op taak B. Voor Spaans zijn de resultaten aanzienlijk hoger, 0.701 macro F1 op taak A en 0.734 macro F1 voor taak B.', 'da': 'Had tale forekommer oftere end nogensinde og polariserer samfundet. For at hjælpe med at imødegå denne polarisering organiserer SemEval 2019 en delt opgave kaldet Multilingual Detection of Hade. Den første opgave (A) er at afgøre, om et givet tweet indeholder had mod indvandrere eller kvinder, i et flersproget perspektiv, til engelsk og spansk. I den anden opgave (B) bliver systemet også bedt om at klassificere følgende underopgaver: hadefulde tweets som aggressive eller ikke aggressive, og at identificere det chikanerede mål som individuelt eller generisk. Vi evaluerer flere modeller, og til sidst kombinerer dem i en ensemble indstilling. Denne ensemble indstilling er bygget af fem og tre undermodeller til henholdsvis engelsk og spansk opgave. I den nuværende opsætning viser det, at brugen af et større ensemble til engelske tweets fungerer middelmådigt, mens et lidt mindre ensemble fungerer godt til at detektere hadefulde tale i spanske tweets. Vores resultater på testsættet for engelsk viser 0,378 makro F1 på opgave A og 0,553 makro F1 på opgave B. For spansk er resultaterne betydeligt højere, 0,701 makro F1 på opgave A og 0,734 makro F1 for opgave B.', 'de': 'Hassreden tritt häufiger denn je auf und polarisiert die Gesellschaft. Um dieser Polarisierung entgegenzuwirken, organisiert SemEval 2019 eine gemeinsame Aufgabe namens Mehrsprachige Erkennung von Hass. Die erste Aufgabe (A) besteht darin, zu entscheiden, ob ein bestimmter Tweet Hass gegen Immigranten oder Frauen enthält, in einer mehrsprachigen Perspektive, für Englisch und Spanisch. In der zweiten Aufgabe (B) wird das System auch aufgefordert, die folgenden Unteraufgaben zu klassifizieren: hasserfüllte Tweets als aggressiv oder nicht aggressiv und das belästigte Ziel als individuell oder generisch zu identifizieren. Wir evaluieren mehrere Modelle und kombinieren sie schließlich in einem Ensemble-Setting. Dieses Ensemble-Setting besteht aus fünf und drei Teilmodellen für die englische und spanische Aufgabe. Im aktuellen Setup zeigt sich, dass die Verwendung eines größeren Ensembles für englische Tweets mittelmäßig wirkt, während ein etwas kleineres Ensemble gut zur Erkennung von Hassreden in spanischen Tweets funktioniert. Unsere Ergebnisse auf dem Testsatz für Englisch zeigen 0.378 Makro F1 auf Aufgabe A und 0.553 Makro F1 auf Aufgabe B. Für Spanisch sind die Ergebnisse deutlich höher, 0.701 Makro F1 auf Aufgabe A und 0.734 Makro F1 für Aufgabe B.', 'id': 'Bicara kebencian sering terjadi dan menguasai masyarakat. Untuk membantu melawan polarizasi ini, SemEval 2019 mengatur tugas bersama yang disebut Deteksi Kebencian Multibahasa. Tugas pertama (A) adalah memutuskan apakah tweet tertentu mengandung kebencian terhadap imigran atau wanita, dalam perspektif berbilang bahasa, untuk bahasa Inggris dan Spanyol. Dalam tugas kedua (B), sistem juga diminta untuk mengklasifikasi sub-tugas berikut: tweet yang benci sebagai agresif atau tidak agresif, dan untuk mengidentifikasi target yang dilecehkan sebagai individu atau generik. Kami mengevaluasi beberapa model, dan akhirnya menggabungkannya dalam set ensemble. Seting ensemble ini dibangun dari lima dan tiga submodel untuk tugas Bahasa Inggris dan Spanyol respectively. Dalam pengaturan saat ini menunjukkan bahwa menggunakan ensemble yang lebih besar untuk tweet Inggris tampak sederhana, sementara ensemble yang sedikit lebih kecil bekerja dengan baik untuk mendeteksi pidato kebencian dalam tweet Spanyol. Hasil kami pada set tes untuk bahasa Inggris menunjukkan 0,378 makro F1 pada tugas A dan 0,553 makro F1 pada tugas B. Untuk Spanyol hasilnya jauh lebih tinggi, 0,701 makro F1 pada tugas A dan 0,734 makro F1 untuk tugas B.', 'fa': 'سخنرانی نفرت بیشتر از هرگز اتفاق می افتد و جامعه را قطعه می دهد. برای کمک به مقابل این قطعه قطعه\u200cبندی، SemEval 2019 یک کار مشترک به نام کشف چند زبان نفرت را سازمان می\u200cکند. اولین وظیفه (A) این است که تصمیم بگیریم آیا توئیت داده شده از مهاجران یا زنان، در یک چشم بسیاری زبان، برای انگلیسی و اسپانیایی متنفر است. در وظیفه دوم (B) سیستم نیز از این خواسته می\u200cشود که از زیر وظیفه\u200cهای زیر پایه\u200cای: توئیت\u200cهای ناخوشایند به عنوان حمله\u200cکننده یا نه حمله\u200cکننده، و هدف\u200cای که به عنوان فردی یا عمومی زخمی می\u200cشوند شناسایی کند. ما مدل\u200cهای چندین را ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم، و بالاخره آنها را در یک تنظیم انجمن می\u200cکنیم. این تنظیم از پنج و سه زیر مدل برای کار انگلیسی و اسپانیایی به طور مختلف ساخته شده است. در تنظیم فعلی نشان می دهد که استفاده از یک انگلیسی بزرگتر برای tweets انگلیسی متوسط عمل می کند، در حالی که یک انگلیسی کوچکتر برای شناسایی سخنرانی ناخوشایند در tweets اسپانیایی خوب کار می کند. نتیجه\u200cهای ما در مجموعه آزمایش برای انگلیسی نمایش 0.378 ماکرو F1 در کار A و 0.553 ماکرو F1 در کار B. نتیجه\u200cهای اسپانیایی بسیار بالاتر است، 0.701 ماکرو F1 در کار A و 0.734 ماکرو F1 برای کار B.', 'sw': 'Hotuba ya chuki hutokea mara nyingi zaidi ya wakati wowote na inachafua jamii. Ili kusaidia kukabiliana na uchaguzi huu, SemEval 2019 anaandaa kazi ya ushirikiano iitwayo Kugundua Kilugha cha Hati. Kazi ya kwanza (A) ni kuamua ikiwa twiti iliyotolewa in a chuki dhidi ya wahamiaji au wanawake, kwa mtazamo wa lugha mbalimbali, kwa Kiingereza na Kihispania. Katika kazi ya pili (B), mfumo pia unaulizwa kutangaza kazi zifuatazo: twiti zinazochukia kama kibaguzi au si wenye kibaguzi, na kutambua lengo linalodhalilishwa kama mtu binafsi au asili. Tunatathmini mifano mingi, na hatimaye tunaunganisha katika mazingira ya kiungo. Mpango huu unajengwa kwa mifano mitano na mitatu kwa ajili ya kazi ya Kiingereza na Kihispania kwa namna fulani. Katika taasisi ya sasa inaonyesha kuwa kwa kutumia ujumbe mkubwa wa twiti za Kiingereza hufanya kazi za kati, wakati mdogo kidogo hufanya kazi vizuri kwa kutambua hotuba ya chuki katika twiti za Kihispania. Our results on the test set for English show 0.378 macro F1 on task A and 0.553 macro F1 on task B. For Spanish the results are significantly higher, 0.701 macro F1 on task A and 0.734 macro F1 for task B.', 'ko': "증오 발언은 그 어느 때보다 빈번해지고 사회를 양극화시켰다.이런 양극화에 맞서는 데 도움을 주기 위해 SemEval 2019는'다국어 혐오 검출'이라는 공유 임무를 조직했다.첫 번째 임무(A)는 영어와 스페인어를 포함한 이민자나 여성에 대한 증오가 포함된 트윗을 확인하는 것이다.두 번째 임무(B)에서 시스템은 다음 임무에 대해 원한 트윗을 공격적인 트윗 또는 비공격적인 트윗으로 분류하고 소란을 피우는 목표를 개인 또는 일반적인 트윗으로 식별하도록 요구받았다.우리는 여러 모델을 평가한 후에 그것들을 하나의 전체로 조합했다.이 집합 설정은 영어와 스페인어 작업에 각각 사용되는 다섯 개의 서브 모델과 세 개의 서브 모델로 구성되어 있다.현재 설정에서 더 큰 집합을 사용하여 영어 트윗의 효과를 측정하는 것은 보통이고, 조금 작은 집합은 스페인어 트윗의 증오 발언을 측정하는 데 효과가 좋다.우리는 영어 시험집의 결과에 의하면 퀘스트 A의 매크로 F1은 0.378이고 퀘스트 B의 매크로 F1은 0.553이다. 스페인어의 결과는 현저히 높다. 퀘스트 A의 매크로 F1은 0.701이고 퀘스트 B의 매크로 F1은 0.734이다.", 'af': "Hatte spreek kom meer dikwels as ooit en polariseer samelewing. Om hierdie polarisasie te tel, organiseer SemEval 2019 'n deelde taak wat genoem word die Multilingual Deteksie van Hat. Die eerste taak (A) is om te besluit of 'n gegewe tweet haat teen imigrante of vroue bevat, in 'n multitaalske perspektief, vir Engels en Spaanse. In die tweede taak (B), word die stelsel ook gevra om die volgende sub-taak te klassifiseer: haatlike tweets as aggressief of nie aggressief, en om die doel wat individueel of genereek is, te identifiseer. Ons evalueer veelvuldige modele, en eindelik kombinieer hulle in 'n ensemble instelling. Hierdie ensemble instelling is gebou van vyf en drie submodele vir die Engels en Spaanse taak respektief. In die huidige opstelling vertoon dit dat die gebruik van 'n groter ensembleem vir Engelske tweets middeloog uitvoer, terwyl 'n klein klein ensembleem werk goed vir ontdekking van haat spreek in Spaanse tweets. Ons resultate op die toets stel vir Engels vertoon 0.378 makro F1 op taak A en 0.553 makro F1 op taak B. Vir Spaanse is die resultate betekenlik hoër, 0.701 makro F1 op taak A en 0.734 makro F1 vir taak B.", 'tr': "Hat çykyşy öňünden köplenç bolýar we jemgyýeti polarizlaýar. Bu polarizasyon sayesine yardım etmek için, SemEval 2019'ün çoxlu dilli nefret tanımasını düzenledi. Ilkinji zady (A) görkezilen tweet göçmenler ýa-da a ýallar bilen ýigrenç alyp barýandygyny düşünmek bolýar. Ikinji buýrukda (B), sistema indiki sub-zadlary bejermek üçin soralanýar: ýigrenýän tweets agressiv ýa-da agressiv däl, we nusgalan maksady bejermek üçin bir nusga ýa-da däldir. Biz birnäçe nusgalary çykarýarys we soňunda olary ensemble düzümlerinde bir birleştir. Bu ýagdaý çykyşy beş we üç sany iňlisçe we ispaňlisçe işi üçin guruldy. Häzirki düzümlerde iňlisçe tweets üçin uly bir ensemble ulanmakda orta çykýar. Biraz kiçi ensemble iň ýigrenýän sözlerini ispanyň tweetlerde tanamak üçin gowy işleýär. Iňlisçe barlag üçin netijelerimiz 0.378 makro F1 täblisasynda A we 0.553 makro F1 täblisasynda görkezilýär. Iňlisçe netijelerimiz bardyr, 0.701 makro F1 täblisasynda A we 0.734 makro F1 täblisasynda görkezilýär.", 'sq': 'Fjala e urrejtjes ndodh më shpesh se kurrë dhe polarizon shoqërinë. Për të ndihmuar kundër kësaj polarizimi, SemEval 2019 organizon një detyrë të përbashkët të quajtur Detektimi Shumë-gjuhësor i urrejtjes. Detyra e parë (A) është të vendosësh nëse një tweet i caktuar përmban urrejtjen kundër emigrantëve apo grave, në një perspektivë shumëgjuhëse, për anglishtin dhe spanjollin. Në detyrën e dytë (B), sistemi kërkohet gjithashtu të klasifikojë nëndetyrat që vijnë: tweetet e urrejtur si agresivë apo jo agresivë dhe të identifikojë objektivin e ngacmuar si individ apo gjeneral. Ne vlerësojmë modele të shumta, dhe më në fund i kombinojmë në një sistem ensemble. Ky rregullim i ansamblit është ndërtuar nga pesë dhe tre nënmodele respektivisht për detyrën angleze dhe spanjolle. In the current setup it shows that using a bigger ensemble for English tweets performs mediocre, while a slightly smaller ensemble does work well for detecting hate speech in Spanish tweets.  Rezultatet tona në grupin e testit për anglisht tregojnë 0.378 makro F1 në detyrën A dhe 0.553 makro F1 në detyrën B. Për spanjollin rezultatet janë ndjeshëm më të larta, 0.701 makro F1 në detyrën A dhe 0.734 makro F1 për detyrën B.', 'am': 'ጥል ንግግር ከዘላለም ይልቅ ይደርሳል እና ማኅበረሰብን ይነግራል፡፡ ይህንን ምርጫ ለመከላከል፣ SemEval 2019 የጥል ብዙልቋንቋ አጣራጭ የሚባል ተሳካሚ ስራ ያስተካክላል፡፡ የመጀመሪያው ስራ (A) በተሰጠው ትዊት በተሰደዱት ወይም ሴቶች ላይ ጥላቻ እንዲኖር፣ በቋንቋ ቋንቋ፣ ለእንግሊዝና ስፓኒሽ ቋንቋ ላይ ነው፡፡ In the second task (B), the system is also asked to classify the following sub-tasks: hateful tweets as aggressive or not aggressive, and to identify the target harassed as individual or generic.  ብዙዎችን ምሳሌዎች እናሳውቃለን፣ በመጨረሻም በምሳሌ ውስጥ እናጋራቸዋለን፡፡ ይሄ አቀማመጥ ማቀናጃ በአምስት እና ሦስት ደብዳቤዎች በንግግሊዝና በስፓኒሽ ስራ ላይ ነው፡፡ በሁኑ ዕቅድ ውስጥ ትልቅ የኢንጂልኛ ትዊተሮች የሚጠቀም የጥል ንግግር በስፓኒሽ ትዊተሮች ላይ የሚጠል ጥል ንግግር ለማግኘት የሚደረግ ጥሩ ነው፡፡ የኢንጂልኛ ፈተና የተደረገ ውጤቶች አ እና 0.553 ማክሮ F1 በስራ B ላይ ነው። ለስፓኒሽ ፍጻሜዎች ትልቅ ነው፤ 0.701 ማክሮ F1 ለስራ አ እና 0.734 ማክሮ F1 ለስራ B ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'ատելության խոսքը ավելի հաճախ է տեղի ունենում, քան երբևէ, և պոլարիզացնում է հասարակությունը: To help counter this polarization, SemEval 2019 organizes a shared task called the Multilingual Detection of Hate.  Առաջին խնդիրը (Ա) է որոշել, թե արդյոք տվյալ թվիթերը անգլերենով և իսպաներենով անգլերենով ազդեցություն ունի ազդեցություն ազդեցության դեմ, կամ կանանց դեմ: Երկրորդ խնդրում (Բ) համակարգը նաև խնդրում է դասակարգել հետևյալ ենթախնդիրները. ատելի թվիթերը որպես ագրեսիվ կամ ոչ ագրեսիվ, և հայտնաբերել նպատակը, որը հարձակվում է որպես անհատական կամ ընդհանուր: Մենք գնահատում ենք բազմաթիվ մոդելներ և վերջապես դրանք համադրում ենք համակարգչային միջավայրում: Այս համակարգը կառուցված է հինգ և երեք ենթամոդելներից անգլերենի և իսպաներենի խնդիրների համար: Այսօրվա կառուցվածքում այն ցույց է տալիս, որ անգլերենի թվիթերի համար ավելի մեծ համակարգ օգտագործելը միջինակ է, մինչդեռ մի քիչ ավելի փոքր համակարգը լավ է աշխատում իսպաներեն թվիթերում ատելության խոսքի հայտնաբերելու համար: Անգլերենի վերաբերյալ մեր փորձարկումների արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս 0.378 մակրո F1 A-ի և 0.553 մակրո F1-ի B-ի վերաբերյալ: Իսպաներենի համար արդյունքները շատ ավելի բարձր են, 0.701 մակրո F1-ի A-ի և 0.734 մակրո F1-ի B-ի վերաբերյալ:', 'az': 'Nefrət sözləri həmişdən daha çox olar və toplumu polariza edər. Bu polarizasiya qarşılaşmağa kömək etmək üçün, 2019-ci SemEval, çoxlu dil Nehrətin keşfini təsdiqləməsi üçün paylaşılan bir işi organize edir. İlk iş (A) mühacirlərə və qadınlara qarşı, çoxlu dil perspektivində, İngilizə və İspanyola qarşı nifrət barəsində olmadığını çəkməkdir. İkinci görevdə (B) sistemi də beləcə aşağıdaki sub-görevləri seçmək istəyir: nifrət tweetləri agresif və ya agresif olaraq təşkil etmək və təşkil edilmiş məqsədi individu və ya generik olaraq tanımmaq üçün. Biz çoxlu modelləri değerləşdiririk və sonunda onları ensemble ayarlarında birləşdiririk. Bu ensemble quruluşu İngilizə və İspanyolca işləri üçün beş və üç alt modellərlə inşa edilir. Hazırkı quruluşda, İngilizce tweetlərinin daha böyük ensembli istifadə etmək ortaq işlədiyini göstərir. Biraz kiçik ensembli İspanyol tweetlərində nifrət sözlərini keçmək üçün yaxşı işlədir. İngilizə üçün test qurduğumuz sonuçlarımız B işində A və 0.553 makro F1 işində 0.378 makro F1 göstərir. İspanyol üçün sonuçlar çox yüksək, A və 0.734 makro F1 işində 0.701 makro F1 mövcuddur.', 'bn': 'প্রায়শই ঘৃণার কথা ঘটে এবং সমাজের নির্বোধ করে। এই নির্বাচনের বিরুদ্ধে সাহায্য করার জন্য সেমইভাল ২০১৯ একটি শেয়ার কর্মসূচী আয়োজন করেছে যার নামে ঘৃণার মাধ্যমে মাল্টি প্রথম কাজ হচ্ছে একটি টুইট প্রদান করা হয়েছে অভিবাসী অথবা নারীদের বিরুদ্ধে ঘৃণা আছে কিনা, একটি বহুভাষার দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিতে, ইংরেজি এবং স্ দ্বিতীয় কাজে (বি) এই ব্যবস্থাটিকে নিম্নলিখিত সাব-কাজের ব্যাপারে বিভিন্ন করার জন্য অনুরোধ করা হয়েছে: ঘৃণিত টুইট হিসেবে অত্যাচারী হিসেব আমরা বেশ কিছু মডেলের মূল্য দিচ্ছি এবং শেষ পর্যন্ত তাদের একত্রিত করে একটি বৈশিষ্ট্যের মাধ্যমে। ইংরেজি এবং স্প্যানিশ কাজের জন্য পাঁচটি এবং তিনটি সাবমডেল তৈরি করা হয়েছে। বর্তমান বিন্যাসে এটি দেখা যাচ্ছে যে ইংরেজী টুইটের জন্য বৃহত্তর একটি প্রতিবেদন ব্যবহার করে মাধ্যমের মধ্যে প্রকাশ করে, আর স্প্যানিশ টুইটে ঘৃণা ভাষণ খুঁ Our results on the test set for English show 0.378 macro F1 on task A and 0.553 macro F1 on task B. For Spanish the results are significantly higher, 0.701 macro F1 on task A and 0.734 macro F1 for task B.', 'bs': 'Mrzim govor se pojavljuje češće nego ikad i polarizuje društvo. Da bi pomogla da se suoči sa ovim polarizacijom, SemEval 2019 organizuje zajednički zadatak nazvan Mnogjezički otkrivanje mržnje. Prvi zadatak (A) je odlučiti da li dodatni tweet sadrži mržnju prema imigrantima ili ženama, u višejezičkoj perspektivi, za engleski i španjolski. U drugom zadatku (B), sistem se također traži da klasifikuje sljedeće podzadatke: mržne tweete kao agresivne ili ne agresivne, te da identifikuju cilj uznemiren kao individualni ili generični. Procjenjujemo višestruke modele i konačno ih kombiniramo u postavku ensembla. Ova postavka je izgrađena od pet i tri podmodela za engleski i španjolski zadatak. U trenutnom setu pokazuje da koristeći veću ensemblu za engleske tweets izvodi srednju, dok malo manja ensembla dobro radi za otkrivanje govora mržnje na španjolskim tweetima. Naši rezultati na testu za engleski pokazuju 0,378 makro F1 na zadatku A i 0,553 makro F1 na zadatku B. Za španjolski su rezultati značajno veći, 0,701 makro F1 na zadatku A i 0,734 makro F1 za zadatak B.', 'cs': 'Nenávistná řeč se vyskytuje častěji než kdy předtím a polarizuje společnost. Aby pomohl proti této polarizaci, SemEval 2019 organizuje sdílený úkol nazvaný Multilingual Detection of Hate. Prvním úkolem (A) je rozhodnout, zda daný tweet obsahuje nenávist vůči přistěhovalcům nebo ženám, z vícejazyčného hlediska, pro angličtinu a španělštinu. V druhém úkolu (B) je systém také požádán, aby klasifikoval následující podúkoly: nenávistné tweety jako agresivní nebo ne agresivní a identifikoval cíl obtěžovaný jako individuální nebo generický. Vyhodnocujeme více modelů a nakonec je kombinujeme do souborového prostředí. Toto souborové prostředí je postaveno z pěti a tří podmodelů pro anglický a španělský úkol. V současném nastavení ukazuje, že použití většího souboru pro anglické tweety je průměrné, zatímco o něco menší soubor funguje dobře pro detekci nenávistné řeči ve španělských tweetech. Naše výsledky na testovací sadě pro angličtinu ukazují 0.378 makro F1 na úkol A a 0.553 makro F1 na úkol B. Pro španělštinu jsou výsledky výrazně vyšší, 0.701 makro F1 na úkol A a 0.734 makro F1 pro úkol B.', 'ca': "El discurs d'odi surt més sovint que mai i polariza la societat. Per ajudar a combatre aquesta polarizació, SemEval 2019 organitza una tasca compartida anomenada la detecció multilingüe del odi. La primera tasca (A) és decidir si un tweet determinat conté odi contra les immigrants o les dones, en una perspectiva multilingüe, per anglès i espanyol. En la segona tasca (B), el sistema també es demana que classifique les següents sub-tasques: tweets odiosos com agressius o no agressius, i que identifiquen l'objectiu assetjat com individual o genèric. Evaluam múltiples models i finalment els combinam en un conjunt. Aquest conjunt està construït de cinc i tres submodels per a la tasca anglesa i espanyola respectivament. In the current setup it shows that using a bigger ensemble for English tweets performs mediocre, while a slightly smaller ensemble does work well for detecting hate speech in Spanish tweets.  Els nostres resultats en el conjunt d'exàmens per anglès mostran 0,378 macro F1 en la tasca A i 0,553 macro F1 en la tasca B. Per a l'espanyol els resultats són significativament més alts, 0,701 macro F1 en la tasca A i 0,734 macro F1 en la tasca B.", 'et': 'Vihakõne esineb sagedamini kui kunagi varem ja polariseerib ühiskonda. Selle polarisatsiooni vastu võitlemiseks korraldab SemEval 2019 ühise ülesande nimega mitmekeelne vihkamise tuvastamine. Esimene ülesanne (A) on otsustada, kas antud säutsu sisaldab mitmekeelses perspektiivis vihkamist sisserändajate või naiste vastu inglise ja hispaania keeles. Teises ülesandes (B) palutakse süsteemil liigitada ka järgmised alamülesanded: vihkavad säutsud agressiivseks või mitte agressiivseks ning tuvastada ahistatav sihtmärk individuaalseks või üldiseks. Hindame mitmeid mudeleid ja lõpuks kombineerime need ansambliks. See ansambli seade koosneb viiest ja kolmest alammudelist vastavalt inglise ja hispaania ülesande jaoks. Praeguses seadistuses näitab see, et suurema ansambli kasutamine inglise säutsude jaoks on keskpärane, samas kui veidi väiksem ansambl toimib hästi vihakõne tuvastamiseks hispaania säutsudes. Meie inglise keele testikomplekti tulemused näitavad 0,378 makrot F1 ülesandel A ja 0,553 makrot F1 ülesandel B. Hispaania keeles on tulemused oluliselt kõrgemad, 0,701 makrot F1 ülesandel A ja 0,734 makro F1 ülesandel B.', 'fi': 'Vihanpuhetta esiintyy useammin kuin koskaan ja polarisoi yhteiskuntaa. Tämän polarisaation torjumiseksi SemEval 2019 järjestää yhteisen tehtävän nimeltä Multilingual Detection of Hate. Ensimmäinen tehtävä (A) on päättää, sisältääkö tietty twiitti vihaa maahanmuuttajia vai naisia kohtaan monikielisessä näkökulmasta englanniksi ja espanjaksi. Toisessa tehtävässä (B) järjestelmää pyydetään myös luokittelemaan seuraavat alitehtävät: vihatut twiitit aggressiiviseksi tai ei-aggressiiviseksi ja tunnistamaan ahdisteltava kohde yksilöksi tai yleiseksi. Arvioimme useita malleja, ja lopuksi yhdistämme ne kokoonpanossa. Tämä kokoonpano koostuu viidestä ja kolmesta englannin ja espanjan tehtävän alimallista. Nykyisessä kokoonpanossa se osoittaa, että isomman kokoonpanon käyttäminen englanninkielisille tweeteille on keskinkertaista, kun taas hieman pienempi kokoonpano toimii hyvin vihapuheen havaitsemisessa espanjalaisissa tweeteissä. Englanninkielisen testijoukon tulokset osoittavat 0,378 makroa F1 tehtävässä A ja 0,553 makroa F1 tehtävässä B. Espanjan osalta tulokset ovat huomattavasti korkeammat, 0,701 makroa F1 tehtävässä A ja 0,734 makroa F1 tehtävässä B.', 'sk': 'Sovražni govor se pojavlja pogosteje kot kdajkoli prej in polarizira družbo. Da bi pomagali preprečiti to polarizacijo, SemEval 2019 organizira skupno nalogo, imenovano Večjezično odkrivanje sovraštva. Prva naloga (A) je odločiti, ali določen tweet vsebuje sovraštvo do priseljencev ali žensk v večjezičnem smislu za angleščino in španščino. V drugi nalogi (B) se sistem zahteva tudi, da razvrsti naslednje podnaloge: sovražne tweete kot agresivne ali neagresivne ter identificira tarčo, ki ga nadleguje, kot individualno ali splošno. Ocenjujemo več modelov in jih končno združimo v ansamblu. Ta nastavitev ansambla je sestavljena iz petih in treh podmodelov za angleško in špansko opravilo. V trenutni nastavitvi kaže, da uporaba večjega ansambla za angleške tweete deluje povprečno, medtem ko nekoliko manjši ansambl deluje dobro za zaznavanje sovražnega govora v španskih tweetih. Naši rezultati testnega nabora za angleščino kažejo 0,378 makrov F1 pri opravilu A in 0,553 makrov F1 pri opravilu B. V španščini so rezultati bistveno višji, 0,701 makrov F1 pri opravilu A in 0,734 makro F1 pri opravilu B.', 'ha': "Haƙĩƙa na faɗi ko da yawa daga wanda ba haka ba, kuma ya haramta jamii. To taimako in motsari ga wannan surarinsa, SemEal 2019 yana organize wani aiki wanda aka raba shi da sunan The multilingulin Diagnostic of Hate. Kayyar farkon aikin A (A) shine ya zãɓi ko an haɗa wani littafi ta ƙunsa da ƙeta a kan immigranta ko kuwa mãtã, a cikin wani kassal na'ura mulki'u, don Ingiriya da Isbanish. A cikin aikin na ƙarshe (B), ana tambayi tsari na'urar aikin da ke ƙara: mai ƙyacewa na Twitter kamar kibiyya ko kuma ba ta yi ƙetare ba, kuma dõmin a gane goan da aka haramta shi kamar wanda aka haramta ko jama'a. We evaluate multiple models, and finally combine them in an ensemble setting.  Wannan shirin ayuka aka gina wa misãlai shan da uku wa aikin English da spanish. Daga tsarin da ake kai yanzu, yana nũna cewa, ka yi amfani da wani abu mafi girma wa littafan Ingiriya, yana aiki mai tsakanin, kuma da wani abu kaɗan ya yi aiki mai kyau dõmin ka gani magana na ƙi a cikin spanish. MataimakinMu na daidaita matsayin English show 0.378 macro F1 on aikin A and 0.553 macro F1 on aikin B. Ga spanish matsala za'a yi significant girma, 0.701 macro F1 on aikin A da 0.734 macro F1 wa aikin B.", 'bo': 'སྤྲོ་བ་ཡུལ་བརྗོད་གཞིས་དེ་ཆེ་མཐོང་མི་སྣང་དང་མི་རྣམས་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བ་ཡིན། རྒྱ་ཆེ་མཐོང་ཚད་འདི་ལྟར་འགྱུར་བའི་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་2019ལྟ་བུ་ཚོའི་སྣ་གྲངས་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག་གི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ སྤྱི་ཚོགས་དང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་བརྗོད་ཐོག་ཅིག་གིས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་པ་དང་། བུད་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཕྱིར་ཉེན་ཡིན་ནའང་། སྐད་ཡིག་སྣེ་ཚོ ལཱ་གཡོག་གཉིས་པ་(B)ནང་དུ་མ་ལག་གིས་འདི་གཤམ་གྱི་sub-tasks་ལ་འཛིན་གྲྭར་གསོ་བ་དགོས། ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་པ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྟར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྟར་མཇུག་ཡོད་ཀྱང་། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་འདི་དབྱིན་ཡིག་དང་སེར་བ་གཉིས་དབྱེ་རིགས་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ལ་5དང་གསུམ་ཀྱི་རྩ་སྒྲིག་གཞ ད་ལྟོའི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ནང་དུ་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་tweets་ལ་ཞིབ་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཆེ་བའི་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཞིག་ཏུ་འཇུག་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ཞིབ་ཆུང་ཆུང་ཙམ་ཤི ང་ཚོའི་འབྲུག', 'he': 'נאום שנאה מתרחש לעתים קרובות יותר מאי פעם ומפולט את החברה. To help counter this polarization, SemEval 2019 organizes a shared task called the Multilingual Detection of Hate.  המשימה הראשונה (A) היא להחליט אם טוויט מסוים מכיל שנאה נגד מהגרים או נשים, בפרספקטיבה רבת-שפותית, לאנגלית וספרדית. במשימה השנייה (ב), המערכת גם מבקשת להקליף את הת-משימות הבאות: טוויטים שנאה כאגרסיביים או לא אגרסיביים, ולזיהוי את המטרה המטרדת כאדם או כללי. אנחנו מעריכים מודלים רבים, ולבסוף משלבים אותם בסביבה של אנסמבל. הסדרה הזאת בנויה מחמישה ושלושה דוגמנים למשימה האנגלית והספרדית בהתאם. במערכת הנוכחית היא מראה שהשימוש באנסבול גדול יותר לטוויטים אנגליים מופיע בצורה בינונית, בזמן שאנסבול קטן מעט עובד טוב כדי לגלות נאום שנאה בטוויטים ספרדיים. Our results on the test set for English show 0.378 macro F1 on task A and 0.553 macro F1 on task B. For Spanish the results are significantly higher, 0.701 macro F1 on task A and 0.734 macro F1 for task B.', 'jv': 'Soalé kapan tengahan kawit sewulang ing sakjane sakjane sampeyan. Ngawe bantuan nggawe polalisation iki, seminval 2011 sampeyan nggawe task sing ngengambar Multilanguage detection of Kupasa. Sampeyan perusahaan (A) kang disimbane kapan kuwi tuwit sing nyimpen karo pawaran karo perusahaan sampeyan karo nganggo wong liyane, lan akèh akeh langgar, kanggo ingkang karo Spanyola. deep We value Entèké iki nggawe barang lima lan telu model kanggo sabên ingkang karo Spanyol sing berarti. Nang setup atus mengkar ngomong nik nguasai iki banget nggo tuwit Inggris mengkar biasa Reject'}
{'en': 'HATERecognizer at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Using Features and Neural Networks to Face Hate Recognition', 'pt': 'HATERecognizer na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 5: Usando recursos e redes neurais para enfrentar o reconhecimento de ódio', 'ar': 'HATERecognizer في SemEval-2019 Task 5: استخدام الميزات والشبكات العصبية لمواجهة التعرف على الكراهية', 'es': 'HateRecognizer en la Tarea 5 de SemEval-2019: Uso de funciones y redes neuronales para enfrentar el reconocimiento del odio', 'fr': 'HateRecognizer à SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 5\xa0: Utiliser des fonctionnalités et des réseaux de neurones pour faire face à la reconnaissance haineuse', 'ja': 'HATERecognizer at SemEval -2019タスク5 ：機能とニューラルネットワークを使用して憎悪認識に直面する', 'ru': 'HATERecognizer на SemEval-2019 Задача 5: Использование функций и нейронных сетей для распознавания ненависти', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 5 पर HATERecognizer: नफरत पहचान का सामना करने के लिए सुविधाओं और तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग करना', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019任5之仇识别器:用特与神经网络对仇', 'ga': 'HATER-cognizer ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 5: Gnéithe agus Líonraí Néaracha a Úsáid chun Aghaidh a thabhairt ar Fuath Aitheantas', 'hu': 'HATERecogniser a SemEval-2019 5. feladat: funkciók és ideghálózatok használata a gyűlölet felismerésére', 'el': 'Καθήκον 5: Χρήση χαρακτηριστικών και νευρωνικών δικτύων για να αντιμετωπίσει την αναγνώριση μίσους', 'kk': 'HATERecognizer at semiEval-2019 Task 5: Features and Neural Networks to Face Hate Recognition', 'ka': 'HATERecognizer at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Using Features and Neural Networks to Face Hate Recognition', 'lt': 'HATERecognizer at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Using Features and Neural Networks to Face Hate Recognition', 'mt': 'HATERecognizer f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 5: Użu ta’ Karatteristiċi u Netwerks Newrali biex Jiffaċċjaw ir-Rikonoxximent tal-Mibegħda', 'it': "HATERecogniser al SemEval-2019 Task 5: Utilizzo di funzionalità e reti neurali per affrontare il riconoscimento dell'odio", 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 5- ല്\u200d ഹാട്ട് പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നവന്\u200d: ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വിശിഷ്ടമും ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റുവര്\u200dക്കുകളും മു', 'mn': 'HATERecognizer at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Features and Neural Networks to Face Hate Recognition', 'no': 'HATERecognizer at semiEval-2019 oppgåve 5: Bruk funksjonar og nøyralnettverk for å få mot hattskjenning', 'pl': 'HATERecognizer na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 5: Wykorzystanie funkcji i sieci neuronowych do stawienia czoła rozpoznawaniu nienawiści', 'mk': 'HATERecognizer на SemEval-2019 задача 5: Користење функции и неврални мрежи за соочување со препознавање на омразата', 'ms': 'HATERecognizer di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Menggunakan Features and Neural Networks to Face Hate Recognition', 'ro': 'HATERecogniser la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 5: Utilizarea caracteristicilor și rețelelor neurale pentru a face față recunoașterii urii', 'sr': 'HATERecognizer na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 5: Koristenje Features i Neuralnih mreža za suočavanje priznanja mržnje', 'si': 'සම්වේල්-2019 වැඩක් 5 වල HATEREKnow', 'so': 'HATERecognizer at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Using Features and Neural Networks to Face Hate Recognition', 'sv': 'HATERecogniser på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 5: Använda funktioner och neurala nätverk för att möta hatigenkänning', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 5: பயன்படுத்தும் பணிகள் மற்றும் புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் முகத்தில் வெறுப்பு அறிதல்', 'ur': 'سیم اول-2019 ٹاکس ۵ میں HATERecognizer: Features and Neural Networks to Face Hate Recognition', 'uz': 'Hisobot 5: Using Features and Neural Networks to Face Hate Recognition', 'vi': 'HATerecognizer ở SemEvl-2009 Task 5: Sử dụng các chức năng và mạng thần kinh để nhận dạng thù hằn đối mặt', 'bg': 'Задача 5: Използване на функции и неврални мрежи за разпознаване на омраза', 'da': 'HATERecogniser på SemEval-2019 Opgave 5: Brug af funktioner og neurale netværk til at imødegå hadgenkendelse', 'nl': 'HATERecognizer bij SemEval-2019 Taak 5: Functies en Neurale Netwerken gebruiken om Hate Recognition onder ogen te zien', 'hr': 'HATERecognizer na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 5: Koristenje Features i Neuralnih mreža za suočavanje priznanja mržnje', 'de': 'HATERecognizer bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 5: Mit Funktionen und neuronalen Netzwerken Hasserkennung bekämpfen', 'id': 'HATERecognizer di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Menggunakan Features and Neural Networks to Face Hate Recognition', 'fa': 'HATERecognizer at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Use Features and Neural Networks to Face Recognition Hate', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019 퀘스트 5: 특징과 신경 네트워크를 사용하여 증오 식별', 'sw': 'HATERecognizer katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 5: Utumiaji Tamko na Mtandao wa Neural kwa Kutambua Hati', 'sq': 'HATERecognizer në SemEval-2019 Task 5: Using Features and Neural Networks to Face Hate Recognition', 'af': 'HATERecognizer by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 5: Gebruik eienskappe en neurale netwerke om Hatte herkening te aangesig', 'am': 'Recognizer at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Using Features and Neural Networks to Face Hate Recognition', 'tr': 'HATERecognizer at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Using Features and Neural Networks to Face Hate Recognition', 'hy': 'HATER-ի հայտնագործողը ՍեմԵվալ-2019-ի 5-րդ հանձնարարում. Նյարդային ցանցերի և ֆունկցիաների օգտագործումը ատելության ճանաչելու համար', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের ৫-এ হাটের পরিচিতি: বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে ঘৃণা স্বীকার করার জন্য', 'az': 'HATERecognizer at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Features and Neural Networks to Face Hate Recognition', 'ca': 'HATERecognizer a SemEval-2019 tasca 5: Utilitzar característiques i xarxes neuronals per enfrontar el reconeixement del odi', 'bs': 'HATERecognizer na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 5: Koristenje Features i Neuralnih mreža za suočavanje priznanja mržnje', 'cs': 'Úkol 5: Využití funkcí a neuronových sítí k rozpoznávání nenávisti', 'et': 'HATERecognizer SemEval-2019 ülesanne 5: Funktsioonide ja neurovõrgustike kasutamine vihkamise äratundmiseks', 'fi': 'HATERecognizer SemEval-2019 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 5: Ominaisuuksien ja hermoverkkojen käyttäminen vihantunnistuksen kohtaamiseen', 'ha': 'HATERecognizer at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Using Features and Neural Networks to Face Hate Recognition', 'he': 'HATERecognizer at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Using Features and Neural Networks to Face Hate Recognition', 'sk': 'HATERecognizer na SemEval-2019 naloga 5: Uporaba funkcij in nevralnih omrežij za soočanje s prepoznavanjem sovraštva', 'jv': 'HAMELearn at semi-2011 task 5', 'bo': 'HATERecognizer at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Using Features and Neural Networks to Face Hate Recognition'}
{'en': 'This paper presents a detailed description of our participation in task 5 on SemEval-2019. This task consists of classifying English and Spanish tweets that contain hate towards women or immigrants. We carried out several experiments ; for a finer-grained study of the task, we analyzed different features and designing architectures of neural networks. Additionally, to face the lack of hate content in tweets, we include data augmentation as a technique to in- crease hate content in our datasets.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة وصفاً مفصلاً لمشاركتنا في المهمة 5 في SemEval-2019. تتكون هذه المهمة من تصنيف التغريدات باللغة الإنجليزية والإسبانية التي تحتوي على كراهية تجاه النساء أو المهاجرين. أجرينا عدة تجارب. من أجل دراسة أدق للمهمة ، قمنا بتحليل الميزات المختلفة وتصميم بنيات الشبكات العصبية. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، لمواجهة نقص المحتوى الذي يحض على الكراهية في التغريدات ، نقوم بتضمين زيادة البيانات كأسلوب لزيادة محتوى الكراهية في مجموعات البيانات الخاصة بنا.', 'fr': "Cet article présente une description détaillée de notre participation à la tâche 5 sur SemEval-2019. Cette tâche consiste à classer les tweets en anglais et en espagnol qui contiennent de la haine envers les femmes ou les immigrés. Nous avons réalisé plusieurs expériences\xa0; pour une étude plus fine de la tâche, nous avons analysé différentes caractéristiques et conçu des architectures de réseaux de neurones. De plus, pour faire face au manque de contenu haineux dans les tweets, nous incluons l'augmentation des données comme technique pour augmenter le contenu haineux dans nos ensembles de données.", 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta uma descrição detalhada de nossa participação na tarefa 5 do SemEval-2019. Essa tarefa consiste em classificar tweets em inglês e espanhol que contenham ódio contra mulheres ou imigrantes. Realizamos vários experimentos; para um estudo mais detalhado da tarefa, analisamos diferentes recursos e projetamos arquiteturas de redes neurais. Além disso, para enfrentar a falta de conteúdo de ódio nos tweets, incluímos o aumento de dados como uma técnica para aumentar o conteúdo de ódio em nossos conjuntos de dados.', 'es': 'Este documento presenta una descripción detallada de nuestra participación en la tarea 5 de SemEval-2019. Esta tarea consiste en clasificar los tuits en inglés y español que contienen odio hacia las mujeres o los inmigrantes. Realizamos varios experimentos; para un estudio más detallado de la tarea, analizamos diferentes características y diseñamos arquitecturas de redes neuronales. Además, para hacer frente a la falta de contenido de odio en los tuits, incluimos el aumento de datos como una técnica para aumentar el contenido de odio en nuestros conjuntos de datos.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2019のタスク5への参加について詳しく説明します。このタスクは、女性や移民への憎悪を含む英語とスペイン語のツイートを分類することで構成されています。私たちはいくつかの実験を行いました。タスクのより細かい研究のために、ニューラルネットワークのさまざまな特徴とアーキテクチャを分析しました。さらに、ツイートにヘイトコンテンツが含まれていないことに直面するために、データセットにヘイトコンテンツを作成するためのテクニックとしてデータ拡張を含めています。', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе представлено подробное описание нашего участия в задаче 5 на SemEval-2019. Эта задача состоит в классификации английских и испанских твитов, содержащих ненависть к женщинам или иммигрантам. Мы провели несколько экспериментов, для более детального изучения задачи мы проанализировали различные особенности и спроектировали архитектуры нейронных сетей. Кроме того, чтобы противостоять отсутствию содержания ненависти в твитах, мы включаем расширение данных в качестве метода для включения содержания ненависти в наши наборы данных.', 'zh': '本文具言SemEval-2019事5状。 此女性移民之英语,西班牙语推文之类也。 数实验。 为之更细粒度,论神经网络之异而设架构。 此外推文无仇,增数为术,以集仇数。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2019 पर कार्य 5 में हमारी भागीदारी का एक विस्तृत विवरण प्रस्तुत करता है। इस कार्य में अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश ट्वीट्स को वर्गीकृत करना शामिल है जिसमें महिलाओं या आप्रवासियों के प्रति नफरत होती है। हमने कई प्रयोग किए; कार्य के एक महीन-दाने वाले अध्ययन के लिए, हमने विभिन्न विशेषताओं का विश्लेषण किया और तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के आर्किटेक्चर को डिजाइन किया। इसके अतिरिक्त, ट्वीट्स में नफरत सामग्री की कमी का सामना करने के लिए, हम अपने डेटासेट में नफरत सामग्री को इन-क्रीज करने के लिए एक तकनीक के रूप में डेटा वृद्धि शामिल करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tugann an páipéar seo cur síos mionsonraithe ar ár rannpháirtíocht i dtasc 5 ar SemEval-2019. Is éard atá sa tasc seo ná tvuíteanna Béarla agus Spáinnise a rangú ina bhfuil fuath i leith ban nó inimircigh. Rinneamar roinnt turgnamh; le haghaidh staidéar níos míne ar an tasc, rinneamar anailís ar ghnéithe éagsúla agus ar ailtireachtaí de líonraí néaracha a dhearadh. Ina theannta sin, chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an easpa ábhair fuatha i dtvuíteanna, áirímid méadú sonraí mar theicníc chun ábhar fuatha a mhéadú inár dtacar sonraí.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტი ჩვენი მოთავსება სამუშაო-2019 წლის 5-ში ჩვენი მოთავსება. ეს სამუშაო შეფარდება ანგლისური და სპანელი ტივიტების კლასიფიკაცია, რომლებიც ქალების ან იმიგრანტების მყავრებით მყავრებს. ჩვენ რამდენიმე ექსპერიმენტები გავაკეთეთ; ჩვენ განსხვავებული განსხვავებები და ნეიროლური ქსელების აქტიქტიქტურების განაზღვრებას გავაკეთებთ. დამატებით, რომ მპატის შემდგომარების არსებობა Tვირში, ჩვენ ჩვენი მონაცემების აზრუმენტაცია როგორც ტექნოგია, რომ ჩვენი მონაცემების შემდგომარების შემდგ', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει μια λεπτομερή περιγραφή της συμμετοχής μας στο έργο 5 στο SemEval-2019. Το καθήκον αυτό συνίσταται στην ταξινόμηση των Αγγλικών και Ισπανικών tweets που περιέχουν μίσος προς τις γυναίκες ή τους μετανάστες. Κάναμε διάφορα πειράματα. Για μια λεπτομερέστερη μελέτη του έργου, αναλύσαμε διάφορα χαρακτηριστικά και σχεδιάζουμε αρχιτεκτονικές νευρωνικών δικτύων. Επιπλέον, για να αντιμετωπίσουμε την έλλειψη περιεχομένου μίσους στα tweets, συμπεριλαμβάνουμε την αύξηση δεδομένων ως τεχνική για να αυξήσουμε το περιεχόμενο μίσους στα σύνολά μας.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány részletesen ismerteti a SemEval-2019 5. feladatában való részvételünket. Ez a feladat a nők és bevándorlók iránti gyűlöletet tartalmazó angol és spanyol tweetek osztályozásából áll. Több kísérletet végeztünk. A feladat finomabb szemcséjű tanulmányozásához az ideghálózatok különböző jellemzőit elemeztük és architektúráit terveztük. Továbbá, hogy szembenézzünk a tweetekben található gyűlölettartalom hiányával, az adatok nagyobbítását olyan technikát használjuk, amely a gyűlölettartalom növelésére szolgál adatkészleteinkben.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta una descrizione dettagliata della nostra partecipazione al task 5 su SemEval-2019. Questo compito consiste nella classificazione dei tweet inglesi e spagnoli che contengono odio verso donne o immigrati. Abbiamo effettuato diversi esperimenti; Per uno studio più accurato del compito, abbiamo analizzato diverse caratteristiche e progettato architetture di reti neurali. Inoltre, per affrontare la mancanza di contenuti di odio nei tweet, includiamo l'aumento dei dati come tecnica per aumentare i contenuti di odio nei nostri dataset.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente išsamiai aprašomas mūsų dalyvavimas 5 užduotyje „SemEval-2019“. Šią užduotį sudaro klasifikuoti anglų ir ispanų tweetus, kuriuose yra neapykanta moterims ar imigrantams. atlikome keletą eksperimentų; for a finer-grained study of the task, we analyzed different features and designing architectures of neural networks.  Be to, norint susipažinti su neapykantos turinio trūkumu tweetuose, mes įtraukiame duomenų didinimą kaip būdą padidinti neapykantos turinį mūsų duomenų rinkiniuose.', 'mk': 'Овој документ претставува детализиран опис на нашето учество во задачата 5 на SemEval-2019. Оваа задача се состои од класификација на англиски и шпански твитови кои содржат омраза кон жените или имигрантите. We carried out several experiments;  за подобро проучување на задачата, анализиравме различни карактеристики и дизајниравме архитектури на невровните мрежи. Покрај тоа, за да се соочиме со недостатокот на содржина на омраза на твитови, вклучуваме зголемување на податоците како техника за зголемување на содржината на омраза во нашите податоци.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 5- деген тапсырмаға қатынасыздың егжей- тегжейі сипаттамасын таңдайды. Бұл тапсырма әйелдер немесе иммигранттерге қарсы жек болатын ағылшын және испан тійттерін сыныптау болады. Біз бірнеше тәжірибелер істедік. Тапсырманың жақсы зерттеу үшін біз түрлі мүмкіндіктерді анализ және невралдық желінің архитектураларын жасадық. Қосымша, tweets мазмұның жоқ болуы үшін, деректер мазмұнын өзгерту техникасы ретінде біз деректер қорларымыздың мазмұнын өзгертуге болады.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan keterangan terperinci tentang pesertaan kami dalam tugas 5 di SemEval-2019. Tugas ini terdiri daripada mengklasifikasi tweet bahasa Inggeris dan Sepanyol yang mengandungi kebencian terhadap perempuan atau imigran. Kami melakukan beberapa eksperimen; untuk kajian tugas yang lebih baik, kami menganalisis ciri-ciri yang berbeza dan merancang arkitektur rangkaian saraf. Selain itu, untuk menghadapi kekurangan kandungan kebencian dalam tweet, kita termasuk peningkatan data sebagai teknik untuk meningkatkan kandungan kebencian dalam set data kita.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ പങ്കെടുക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ 5 ജോലിയില്\u200d പങ്കെടുക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി വിശദീകരിച്ചു ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷും സ്പാനിഷും ടൂട്ടുകളും വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. പെണ്ണുങ്ങള്\u200dക്കോ വെറുപ്പുണ്ട്. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പല പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തി; ഈ ജോലിയുടെ ഏറ്റവും മികച്ച പഠനത്തിനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങളെയും ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്കുകളുടെ ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടുകളെ കൂടാതെ, ടൂട്ടില്\u200d വെറുപ്പുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ കുറവില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d വെറുപ്പുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതി', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас SemEval-2019 оны 5-р ажил дээр оролцож байгаа талаар нарийвчлан тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ үйл ажил нь эмэгтэйчүүд эсвэл хөдөлгөөнүүд дээр үзэн ядах Англи болон Испанийн tweets-г ангид хэлэх юм. Бид олон туршилтыг хийсэн. ажлын тухай илүү сайхан судалгааны тулд бид мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектуруудыг шинжилсэн. Мөн бид tweets дээр үзэн ядах contentsгүй байхын тулд өгөгдлийн санааг нэмэгдүүлэх техник болгоно.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta deskrizzjoni dettaljata tal-parteċipazzjoni tagħna fil-kompitu 5 dwar SemEval-2019. This task consists of classifying English and Spanish tweets that contain hate towards women or immigrants.  Saru diversi esperimenti; għal studju a ħjar tal-kompitu, analizzaw karatteristiċi differenti u ddisinjaw arkitetturi tan-netwerks newrali. Barra minn hekk, biex niffaċċjaw in-nuqqas ta’ kontenut ta’ mibegħda fit-tweets, a ħna inkludew żieda fid-dejta bħala teknika biex jiżdied il-kontenut ta’ mibegħda fis-settijiet tad-dejta tagħna.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser ein detaljert skildring av vår deltakar i oppgåva 5 på semiEval-2019. Denne oppgåva inneheld av å klassifisera engelsk og spansk tweeter som inneheld hatt mot kvinner eller imigrantar. Vi utførte fleire eksperimenter. for ein finere studie av oppgåva, analyserte vi ulike funksjonar og utforming av arkitekturar av neuralnettverk. I tillegg, for å sjå mot mangling av hatt-innhaldet i tweeter, inkluderer vi data økning som teknikk for å oppretta hatt-innhaldet i datasettet våre.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł przedstawia szczegółowy opis naszego udziału w zadaniu 5 na SemEval-2019. Zadanie to polega na klasyfikacji angielskich i hiszpańskich tweetów, które zawierają nienawiść wobec kobiet lub imigrantów. Przeprowadziliśmy kilka eksperymentów. W celu dokładniejszego badania zadania analizowaliśmy różne cechy i projektowaliśmy architekturę sieci neuronowych. Dodatkowo, aby zmierzyć się z brakiem treści nienawiści w tweetach, włączamy powiększanie danych jako technikę zwiększania treści nienawiści w naszych zbiorach danych.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă o descriere detaliată a participării noastre la sarcina 5 pe SemEval-2019. Această sarcină constă în clasificarea tweeturilor în limba engleză și spaniolă care conțin ură față de femei sau imigranți. Am efectuat mai multe experimente; Pentru un studiu mai detaliat al sarcinii, am analizat diferite caracteristici și am proiectat arhitecturi ale rețelelor neuronale. În plus, pentru a face față lipsei conținutului de ură în tweeturi, includem mărirea datelor ca o tehnică de a crește conținutul de ură în seturile noastre de date.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja detaljno opis našeg sudjelovanja u zadatku 5 o semiEval-2019. Ovaj zadatak se sastoji od klasifikacije engleskih i španjolskih tweeta koje sadrže mržnju prema ženama ili imigrantima. Provodili smo nekoliko eksperimenata; za bolju studiju zadatka, analizirali smo različite karakteristike i dizajnirali arhitekture neuralnih mreža. Osim toga, da bi se suoèili sa nedostatkom sadržaja mržnje u tweetovima, uključujemo povećanje podataka kao tehniku za povećanje sadržaja mržnje u našim podacima.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ සෙම්වෙල්-2019 වැඩේ 5 වැඩේ අපේ සම්පූර්ණ විස්තර විස්තරයක් තියෙනවා. මේ වැඩේ තමයි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ස්පැනිස් ට්විට් වලින් විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා ගෑණු වලින් නැත්තර ව අපි පරීක්ෂණයක් වෙනස් කළා; අපි වෙනස් අවශ්\u200dයාවක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරලා න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලයේ ස්ථාපනයක් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ. ඒවගේම, ට්විට් වල විරුද්ධ අවස්ථාවක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න, අපි දත්ත සේට් වල දත්ත අවස්ථාවක් වෙනුවෙන් තේක්ෂණයක්', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran warqad faah’iido ah oo ku saabsan ka qeybqaadashada shaqada 5 ee SemEval-2019. Shaqadan waxaa ka mid ah mid ku qoran luuqada Ingiriiska iyo Isbanishka oo ku jira nebcaad dumarka ama dadka dalka u soo guuray. waxaynu sameynay jirrabo badan; for a finer-grained study of the task, we analyzed different features and designing architectures of neural networks.  Sidoo kale, si aan looga jeedno baahida waxyaabaha nacayb ee tweetka, waxaynu ku qornaa kordhinta macluumaadka sida teknolojiyo ku sameynta kooxda nacaybka.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval-2019ல் எங்கள் பணியில் பங்கிடுவதின் விவரமான விவரம் கூறுகிறது. இந்த செயல் ஆங்கிலம் மற்றும் ஸ்பானிஷ் tweets வகைப்படுத்தல் உள்ளது பெண்கள் அல்லது குடியாதவர்களுக்கு வெறுப்பு உள்ளது. நாங்கள் பல சோதனைகளை செய்தோம். for a finer-grained study of the task, we analyzed different features and designing architectures of neural networks.  கூடுதலாக, தொடர்புகளில் வெறுப்பு உள்ளடக்கத்தை எதிர்பார்ப்பதற்கு, நாம் தரவு கூட்டுதல் தகவலை சேர்த்து நம் தரவுத் தளங்களில் வெற', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar en detaljerad beskrivning av vårt deltagande i uppgift 5 på SemEval-2019. Denna uppgift består i att klassificera engelska och spanska tweets som innehåller hat mot kvinnor eller invandrare. Vi utförde flera experiment. För en finkornig studie av uppgiften analyserade vi olika funktioner och utformade arkitekturer för neurala nätverk. Dessutom, för att möta bristen på hatinnehåll i tweets, inkluderar vi dataförstärkning som en teknik för att öka hatinnehåll i våra dataset.', 'ur': 'This paper presents a detailed description of our participation in task 5 on SemEval-2019. یہ کام ہے انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی ٹویٹوں کا کلاس کرنا جو عورتوں یا مہاجرین کے بارے میں نفرت ہے۔ ہم نے چند امتحان کیا ہم نے اس کام کے مطابق بہترین دانے کی تحقیق کے لئے مختلف فائدے کا تحقیق کیا اور نورول نیٹورک کی معماری طراحی کیا۔ اور اضافہ، ٹویٹوں میں نفرت منصفات کی کمزوری کے سامنے موجود ہونے کے لئے، ہم اپنے ڈیٹ سٹ میں ڈیٹ اضافہ کرنے کی تکنیک کے طور پر داخل ہوتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu sahifa SemEval-2019 tashkilotimizning 5 vazifasiga шерик бўлишимизнинг тафсилотини кўрсатади. Bu vazifa ingliz va Ispanchadan foydalanuvchi tweetilarni bir xil tarjima qiladigan ayollar yoki immigrantlarga yomon. Biz bir necha tizimni bajardik. Vazifani ajoyib o'rganish uchun, biz har xil xususiyatlarni analyzdik va neyrol tarmoqlarining maktablarini nazarlashtirdik. Ko'pchilik, Twittlarda kuch tarkibini ko'rib chiqish uchun, biz maʼlumot yordamida foydalanuvchi tarkibini yaratish texnologiga qo'shish imkoniyatlarimiz.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả chi tiết về sự tham gia của chúng ta trong nhiệm vụ 5 về Semkhai-thẩm 9. Nhiệm vụ này gồm việc phân loại những dòng tweet tiếng Anh và tiếng Tây Ban Nha chứa thù hận với phụ nữ và nhập cư. Chúng tôi đã thực hiện nhiều thí nghiệm. chúng tôi phân tích các tính năng khác nhau và thiết kế kiến trúc các mạng thần kinh. Thêm nữa, để đối mặt với sự thiếu hụt các nội dung hận thù trên Twitter, chúng tôi đã bao gồm việc gia tăng dữ liệu như một kỹ thuật để tăng nội dung hận thù trong dữ liệu của chúng tôi.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя подробно описание на нашето участие в задача 5 на СемЕвал-2019. Тази задача се състои в класифициране на английски и испански туитове, които съдържат омраза към жени или имигранти. Извършихме няколко експеримента. за по-фино проучване на задачата, анализирахме различни характеристики и проектирахме архитектури на невронните мрежи. Освен това, за да се справим с липсата на съдържание на омраза в туитове, включваме увеличаване на данните като техника за увеличаване на съдържанието на омраза в нашите набори от данни.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer en detaljeret beskrivelse af vores deltagelse i opgave 5 på SemEval-2019. Denne opgave består i at klassificere engelske og spanske tweets, der indeholder had mod kvinder eller indvandrere. Vi udførte adskillige eksperimenter. Til en finere undersøgelse af opgaven analyserede vi forskellige funktioner og designede arkitekturer af neurale netværk. For at imødegå manglen på hadeindhold i tweets inkluderer vi desuden dataforøgelse som en teknik til at øge hadeindhold i vores datasæt.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja detaljno opis našeg sudjelovanja u zadatku 5 o semiEval-2019. Ovaj zadatak sastoji od klasifikacije engleskih i španjolskih tweeta koje sadrže mržnju prema ženama ili imigrantima. Provodili smo nekoliko eksperimenata; za bolje zrno ispitivanje zadatka, analizirali smo različite karakteristike i dizajnirali arhitekture neuralnih mreža. Osim toga, kako bi se suočili s nedostatkom sadržaja mržnje u tweetovima, uključujemo povećanje podataka kao tehniku za povećanje sadržaja mržnje u našim podacima.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel geeft een gedetailleerde beschrijving van onze deelname aan taak 5 op SemEval-2019. Deze taak bestaat uit het classificeren van Engelse en Spaanse tweets die haat tegen vrouwen of immigranten bevatten. We hebben verschillende experimenten uitgevoerd. Voor een fijnere studie van de taak hebben we verschillende kenmerken geanalyseerd en architecturen van neurale netwerken ontworpen. Om het gebrek aan hate content in tweets onder ogen te zien, nemen we data augmentation op als een techniek om hate content in onze datasets te vergroten.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unsere Teilnahme an Aufgabe 5 auf SemEval-2019 ausführlich. Diese Aufgabe besteht darin, englische und spanische Tweets zu klassifizieren, die Hass auf Frauen oder Einwanderer enthalten. Wir haben mehrere Experimente durchgeführt. Für eine genauere Untersuchung der Aufgabe analysierten wir verschiedene Merkmale und entwarfen Architekturen neuronaler Netze. Um dem Mangel an Hassinhalten in Tweets entgegenzuwirken, integrieren wir außerdem eine Datenauswertung als Technik, um Hassinhalte in unseren Datensätzen zu vergrößern.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-2019 퀘스트 5에 참여한 우리의 상황을 상세하게 묘사하였다.이 임무에는 여성이나 이민자에 대한 증오가 담긴 영어와 스페인어 트윗을 분류하는 것이 포함된다.우리는 몇 가지 실험을 했다.이 임무를 더욱 세밀하게 연구하기 위해 우리는 신경 네트워크의 서로 다른 특징과 디자인 구조를 분석했다.또한 트윗에 증오 내용이 부족하다는 문제에 대응하기 위해 데이터 증강을 증오 콘텐츠를 추가하는 기술로 활용했다.', 'id': 'Kertas ini memperlihatkan deskripsi rinci dari parteċipasi kami dalam tugas 5 di SemEval-2019. This task consists of classifying English and Spanish tweets that contain hate towards women or immigrants.  Kami melakukan beberapa eksperimen; untuk mempelajari tugas yang lebih baik, kami menganalisa fitur yang berbeda dan merancang arsitektur jaringan saraf. Selain itu, untuk menghadapi kekurangan isi kebencian dalam tweet, kita termasuk peningkatan data sebagai teknik untuk meningkatkan isi kebencian dalam dataset kita.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک توضیح جزئیح از مشارکت ما در کار ۵ در مورد نیمه Eval-2019 را نشان می دهد. این وظیفه از توئیت\u200cهای انگلیسی و اسپانیایی که از زنان یا مهاجران متنفر می\u200cشوند، تشکیل می\u200cدهد. ما چند آزمایش را انجام دادیم، برای مطالعه\u200cی مطالعه بهتر از این کار، ویژه\u200cهای مختلف و طراحی معماری شبکه\u200cهای عصبی را تحلیل کردیم. به اضافه، برای مبارزه با ناتوانی از محتوای متنفر در توئیت، ما به عنوان تکنیک افزایش داده ها در مجموعه های داده\u200cهای ما شامل می\u200cشویم.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz SemEval-2019-njy g철revimizde 5-nji maglumaty bardygyny maglumatlandyr첵ar. Bu zady a첵al 첵a-da g철챌menler bilen 첵igren첵채n i흫lis챌e we ispany흫 tweetlerini toparlamakdan ybarat첵ar. Biz birn채챌e deneyler etdik; Ta첵첵arlary흫 i흫 gowy g철rn체힊 철wrenmesi 체챌in, be첵leki 체첵tgewleri we neural 힊ebekelerini흫 arhitektarlaryny tasarlamak 체챌in 챌철z체ldik. Ayr캇ca tweets i챌inde 첵igren첵채n mazmunlary흫 첵ok bolmagyny 체챌in, maglumatlarymyzy da힊ary d체zenlemek 체챌in teknik edip g철r첵채ris.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linatoa maelezo ya kina kuhusu ushiriki wetu katika kazi 5 kwenye SemEval-2019. Kazi hii ni pamoja na kuandika twiti za Kiingereza na Kihispania zinazohusu chuki kwa wanawake au wahamiaji. Tulifanya majaribio kadhaa; kwa utafiti mzuri wa kazi hiyo, tulichambua vipengele tofauti na kutengeneza majengo ya mitandao ya kijamii. Kwa nyongeza, kukabiliana na ukosefu wa maudhui ya chuki katika twiti, tunajumuisha kuongeza taarifa kama teknolojia ya kutengeneza maudhui ya chuki katika seti zetu za data.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n gedetale beskrywing van ons deelnadering in taak 5 op SemEval-2019. Hierdie taak bestaan van die klassifisering van Engels en Spaanse tweets wat haat teen vroue of immigrante bevat. Ons het verskeie eksperimente uitgevoer; vir 'n finer-grained studie van die taak, het ons verskillende funksies en architectures van neuralnetwerke ontwerp. In addition, to face the lack of hate content in tweets, we include data in crease as a technique to in- crease hate content in our datasets.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet një përshkrim të hollësishëm të pjesëmarrjes sonë në detyrën 5 në SemEval-2019. Kjo detyrë përbëhet nga klasifikimi i tweeteve angleze dhe spanjolle që përmbajnë urrejtjen ndaj grave apo emigrantëve. Ne kryem disa eksperimente; për një studim më të mirë të detyrës, ne analizuam karakteristika të ndryshme dhe dizajnuam arkitektura të rrjeteve nervore. Përveç kësaj, për të përballur mungesën e përmbajtjes së urrejtjes në tweet, ne përfshijmë rritjen e të dhënave si një teknikë për të rritur përmbajtjen e urrejtjes në të dhënat tona.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ በሴmEval-2019 ላይ ተግባራችንን የዘረዘ ግልጽን የሚያቀርብ ነው፡፡ ይህ ስራ የሴቶችን ወይም ስደተኞችን ጥል የሚያደርጉ እንግሊዝኛ እና ስፓኒሽ ትዊተቶችን በመለፍ ነው፡፡ ብዙ ፈተናዎች አደረግን:: ለስራው የተጠቃሚ ትምህርት፣ ለልዩ ምርጫዎች እና የናቡብ መረብ መሠረት መሠረትን እናስተምር ነበር፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የጥላቻን ጥላቻ ለመቀበል፣ የዳታ መስጠት ጥላቻን ለመፍጠር ማድረግ የዳታ አካባቢ ማድረግ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին ներկայացնում է մեր մասնակցության մանրամասն նկարագրությունը "ՍեմԷվալ-2019" 5-ի հանձնարարության մեջ: Այս խնդիրը կազմված է անգլերենի և իսպաներենի թվիթերի դասակարգելուց, որոնք պարունակում են ատելություն կանանց կամ միգրանտների նկատմամբ: Մենք մի քանի փորձեր կատարեցինք, այս խնդիրը ավելի լավ ուսումնասիրելու համար մենք վերլուծեցինք տարբեր հատկանիշներ և նախագծեցինք նյարդային ցանցերի ճարտարապետական կառուցվածքներ: Ավելին, դիմադրելու ատելության պարունակության պակասը թվիթերում մենք ներառում ենք տվյալների աճը որպես մեթոդ ատելության պարունակության աճելու համար մեր տվյալների համակարգերում:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt, 5-ci məsələmiz barəsində partisiplənmək üçün xəbərdarlıq göstərir. Bu işlər qadınlara və imigrantlərə nifrət bəxş edən İngilis və İspanyol tweetlərini təsdiqləməkdir. Biz bir neçə təcrübə etdik. Bu işin daha yaxşı təhsil edilməsi üçün, fərqli təhsil və nöral a ğların arhitektarını təhsil etdik. Tövtlərdə nifrət məlumatının yoxsulluğuna qarşılaşmaq üçün, verilən qurğularımızda nifrət məlumatını artırmaq üçün məlumatı artırmaq tekniki olaraq daxil edirik.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja detaljno opis našeg sudjelovanja u zadatku 5 o semiEval-2019. Ovaj zadatak se sastoji od klasifikacije engleskih i španjolskih tweeta koje sadrže mržnju prema ženama ili imigrantima. Provodili smo nekoliko eksperimenata; za bolju studiju zadatka, analizirali smo različite karakteristike i dizajnirali arhitekture neuralnih mreža. Osim toga, da bi se suočili sa nedostatkom sadržaja mržnje u tweetovima, uključujemo povećanje podataka kao tehniku za povećanje sadržaja mržnje u našim podacima.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল-২০১৯-এ আমাদের অংশগ্রহনের বিস্তারিত বর্ণনা দিয়েছে। এই কাজের মধ্যে ইংরেজী এবং স্প্যানিশ টুইট বিভিন্ন ভাষায় রয়েছে যা নারী অথবা অভিবাসীদের প্রতি ঘৃণা রয়েছে। আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি পরীক্ষা করেছি; for a finer-grained study of the task, we analyzed different features and designing architectures of neural networks.  এছাড়াও টুইটে ঘৃণার বিষয়বস্তুর অভাবের মুখোমুখি হওয়ার জন্য আমরা তথ্য যোগ করি আমাদের ডাটাসেটে ঘৃণা বিষয়বস্তু তৈরি করার একটি প্রয', 'ca': "Aquest paper presenta una descripció detallada de la nostra participació a la tasca 5 de SemEval-2019. Aquesta tasca consisteix en classificar tweets anglès i espanyols que contenen odi a les dones o immigrants. Vam fer varis experiments; per un estudi més detallat de la tasca, vam analitzar diferents característiques i dissenyar arquitectures de les xarxes neurals. A més, per enfrontar la falta de contingut d'odi en els tweets, inclouem el augment de dades com una tècnica per incrementar el contingut d'odi en els nostres conjunts de dades.", 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje podrobný popis naší účasti na úkolu 5 na SemEval-2019. Tento úkol spočívá v klasifikaci anglických a španělských tweetů, které obsahují nenávist vůči ženám nebo imigrantům. Provedli jsme několik experimentů. Pro jemnější studium úkolu jsme analyzovali různé vlastnosti a navrhli architektury neuronových sítí. Kromě toho, abychom čelili nedostatku obsahu nenávisti ve tweetech, zahrnujeme rozšíření dat jako techniku pro zvýšení obsahu nenávisti v našich datových sadách.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis esitatakse üksikasjalik kirjeldus meie osalemisest SemEval-2019 ülesandes 5. See ülesanne seisneb inglise ja hispaania säutsude klassifitseerimises, mis sisaldavad vihkamist naiste või sisserändajate vastu. Me tegime mitu katset. Ülesande täpsemaks uurimiseks analüüsisime närvivõrkude erinevaid funktsioone ja projekteerisime arhitektuure. Lisaks sellele lisame vihkamise sisu puudumisele säutsudes andmete suurendamise tehnikana, et suurendada vihkamise sisu oma andmekogumites.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitetään yksityiskohtainen kuvaus osallistumisestamme tehtävään 5 SemEval-2019. Tämä tehtävä koostuu englannin- ja espanjankielisten twiittien luokittelusta, jotka sisältävät vihaa naisia tai maahanmuuttajia kohtaan. Teimme useita kokeita. Tehtävän tarkempaa tutkimusta varten analysoimme neuroverkkojen eri ominaisuuksia ja suunnitteluarkkitehtuuria. Lisäksi, jotta voimme kohdata vihasisällön puutteen tweeteissä, lisäämme datan lisäämistä keinona lisätä vihasisältöä tietoaineistoihimme.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na buga wani fassarai na fassarar da shirinmu a cikin aikin 5 on SemEl-2019. Wannan aikin na kamfata a fasalin Ingiriya da Isbanisi na Twitter wanda ke ƙunsa da ƙeta a kan mãtã ko muhami. We carried out several experiments;  wa'anar mafiya kyakkyawan karatun na aikin, kuma mun yi anayya cikin wasu misfealum da ke ƙayyade bakwai na garwaya masu aikin neura. Ina ƙaranci, dõmin a haɗi manyan maɓallin hatsi a cikin Twitter, za'a include ƙaramako da data kamar an technical zuwa-in-halitta maɓallin hatsi cikin danganyinmu.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek predstavlja podroben opis našega sodelovanja pri nalogi 5 na SemEval-2019. Ta naloga je razvrščanje angleških in španskih tweetov, ki vsebujejo sovraštvo do žensk ali priseljencev. Izvedli smo več poskusov. Za natančnejšo študijo naloge smo analizirali različne značilnosti in oblikovali arhitekture nevronskih omrežij. Poleg tega, da bi se soočili s pomanjkanjem sovražne vsebine v tweetih, vključujemo povečanje podatkov kot tehniko za povečanje sovražne vsebine v naših naborih podatkov.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מציג תיאור מפורט של השתתפות שלנו במשימה 5 ב SemEval-2019. המשימה הזו היא להקליף טוויטרים אנגליים וספרדיים שמכילים שנאה כלפי נשים או מהגרים. We carried out several experiments;  for a finer-grained study of the task, we analyzed different features and designing architectures of neural networks.  בנוסף, כדי להתמודד עם חוסר תוכן שנאה בטיוויטים, אנחנו מכילים גידול נתונים כטכניקה לגדול תוכן שנאה בתוכניות הנתונים שלנו.', 'jv': 'Ngetongkat-ne soko nggawe akeh nggawe barang kelas nang sampek 5 ing semi-2011. Opong iki lak sumelang lan kelas kuwi bintang ingkang karo Spanyol kuwi tau ngomong nik kuwi mrambah karo mulih. Awak dhéwé wis ngeraké karo akeh operasi; akeh deep Mungkin maneh, iso nglanggar nganggo kuwi kaleh-seneng pisan i tiket, awake dhéwé mulai perusahaan data ngono nggawe sistem kanggo kejahatan', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་བྱ་ཚིག་ལ་ཞེན་འཇུག་གི་ལས་འགུལ་བཤད་གསལ་བཤད་པ་དེ་སྤྲོད་ཡོད། ལོ5ཨེ་Eval-201 བྱ་འགུལ་འདིས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་བརྟེན་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ནང་དུ་བུད་མེད་བསམ། ང་ཚོས་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་འདུག ལཱ་གཡོག་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཏུ་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་སྐྱེན་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་སོ་སྒྲིག་དང་བཟོ་བརྩོན ད་དུང་། Tweets ནང་དུ་ཚོར་དགའ་ཕྱིར་ཡོད་པའི་ནང་དོན་ཡིག་ཆའི་ལྷག་སྟེ།'}
{'en': 'GL at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Identifying hateful tweets with a deep learning approach.', 'ar': 'GL في SemEval-2019 المهمة 5: تحديد التغريدات البغيضة من خلال نهج التعلم العميق.', 'fr': "GL au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 5\xa0: Identifier les tweets haineux avec une approche d'apprentissage profond.", 'es': 'GL en SemEval-2019 Tarea 5: Identificar los tuits de odio con un enfoque de aprendizaje profundo.', 'pt': 'GL no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 5: Identificando tweets de ódio com uma abordagem de aprendizado profundo.', 'zh': 'GL at SemEval-2019 务5:以深学知仇推文。', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 5 पर GL: एक गहरी सीखने के दृष्टिकोण के साथ घृणित tweets की पहचान.', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019タスク5のGL ：深層学習アプローチで憎悪的なツイートを特定する。', 'ru': 'GL на SemEval-2019 Задача 5: Выявление ненавистных твитов с подходом глубокого обучения.', 'ga': 'GL ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 5: tweets fuathmhara a aithint le cur chuige domhain foghlama.', 'ka': 'GL SemEval-2019 სამუშაო დავალება 5: განსაზღვრება მყავრებელი ტივიტები, რომელიც ძალიან ძალიან სწავლებელი მიზეზით.', 'hu': 'GL a SemEval-2019 5. feladat: Gyűlöletes tweetek azonosítása mélytanulási megközelítéssel.', 'el': 'Καθήκον 5: Αναγνώριση μίσους στα tweets με μια προσέγγιση βαθιάς μάθησης.', 'it': 'GL a SemEval-2019 Task 5: Identificare tweet odiosi con un approccio di deep learning.', 'kk': 'SemEval-2019 тапсырмасының 5- тапсырмасындағы GL: қарапайым tweets тізімдерін түсіндіру арқылы түсіндіру.', 'lt': '5 užduotis – nustatyti neapykantingus tweetus taikant gilaus mokymosi metodą.', 'mk': 'GL на SemEval-2019 задача 5: Идентификување на мразни твитови со пристап на длабоко учење.', 'ms': 'GL di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Mengenalpasti tweet benci dengan pendekatan belajar dalam.', 'mt': 'GL f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 5: L-identifikazzjoni ta’ tweets mibegħda b’approċċ ta’ tagħlim profond.', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2019 ടാസ്ക് 5-ല്\u200d ജിഎല്\u200d: വെറുപ്പുള്ള ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് ആഴമായ വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തി', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Task 5: Харамсалтай tweets-г гүн гүнзгий суралцах арга замыг тайлбарлах.', 'pl': 'GL w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 5: Identyfikowanie nienawiściwych tweetów z podejściem do głębokiego uczenia.', 'ro': 'GL la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 5: Identificarea tweeturilor pline de ură cu o abordare profundă de învățare.', 'sr': 'GL na semiEval-2019 Task 5: identifikacija mržnih tweeta sa dubokim pristupom učenja.', 'no': 'GL ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 5: Identifiserer hatefulle tweeter med ein dyp læringstilnærming.', 'si': 'GL සම්වෙල්-2019 වැඩක් 5: අවශ්\u200dයයාත්මක ට්විට් අඳුරගන්න ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන්', 'so': 'Shaqada 5:', 'sv': 'GL på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 5: Identifiera hatiska tweets med ett djupt lärande tillvägagångssätt.', 'ta': 'செம்Eval-2019 பணி 5-ல் ஜிஎல்: வெறுப்பில்லாத தொடர்புகளை ஆழமான கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் முறையை அடையாளம்.', 'ur': 'سیم اول-2019 ٹاکس ۵ میں GL: ایک عمیق سیکھنے کے مطابق ناپسند ٹیوٹ شناسایی کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "5 Vazifani SemEval-2019 yilda GL: yomon o'rganish muvaffaqiyatlarini o'rganish usuli bilan aniqlash mumkin.", 'vi': 'GL at SemEvl-2009 Task 5: xác định những tweet đầy thù hận với phương pháp học sâu.', 'nl': 'GL bij SemEval-2019 Taak 5: Het identificeren van haatdragende tweets met een deep learning aanpak.', 'hr': 'GL na semiEval-2019 zadatku 5: identifikacija mržnih tweeta sa dubokim pristupom učenja.', 'bg': 'Задача 5: Идентифициране на омразни туитове с подход на дълбоко обучение.', 'da': 'GL på SemEval-2019 Opgave 5: Identificere hadefulde tweets med en dyb læring tilgang.', 'ko': '독일 로이드 선급사 Sem Eval-2019 퀘스트 5: 심도 있는 학습 방법으로 원한 트윗을 식별한다.', 'de': 'Aufgabe 5: Identifizierung hasserfüllter Tweets mit einem Deep Learning Ansatz.', 'id': 'GL di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Identifikasi tweet benci dengan pendekatan belajar dalam.', 'fa': 'GL در ماموریت ۵ در SemEval-2019: شناسایی توئیت های متنفر با روش یادگیری عمیق.', 'sw': 'GL kwenye kazi 5 ya SemEval-2019: Kutambua twiti za chuki kwa njia ya kujifunza kwa kina.', 'tr': 'GL SemEval-2019 Görev 5: ýigrenýän tweetleri derin öwrenmek üçin tanyşdyrmak.', 'af': "GL by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 5: identifiseer haatlike tweets met 'n diep onderwerp toegang.", 'am': 'የሴምEval-2019 ስራ 5 GL: የሚጠሉትን ትዊተሮችን በብርቱ ትምህርት ማግኘት አግኝቷል፡፡', 'sq': 'GL në SemEval-2019 Task 5: Identifikimi i tweeteve të urryer me një qasje mësimi të thellë.', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Task 5: 칐yr톛nm톛k 칲칞칲n nifr톛tli tweetl톛ri tan캼ma.', 'hy': 'ԳԼ-ը 2019-ի "ՍեմԷվալ" 5-րդ հանձնարարությունում. ատելի թվիթերների հայտնաբերումը խորը սովորելու միջոցով:', 'bs': 'GL na semiEval-2019 Task 5: identifikacija mržnih tweeta sa dubokim pristupom učenja.', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ টাস্ক ৫-এ জিএল: গভীর শিক্ষার পদক্ষেপ নিয়ে ঘৃণাকৃত টুইট চিহ্নিত করা হয়েছে।', 'ca': 'GL at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Identifying hateful tweets with a deep learning approach.', 'cs': 'Úkol 5: Identifikace nenávistných tweetů s přístupem hlubokého učení.', 'et': 'GL SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 5: Vihkavate säutsude tuvastamine sügavõppe lähenemisviisi abil.', 'fi': 'GL SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 5: Vihaisten twiittien tunnistaminen syväoppimisella.', 'jv': 'GL nang semebal-2011 task 5: Daftar kuwi kesempatan tuytir nganggo deep', 'he': 'GL ב SemEval-2019 משימה 5: לזהות טוויטים שנאה עם גישה למידה עמוקה.', 'ha': 'GL a kan aikin SemEV-2019 5: Ina iya gane wasu Twitter masu motsi da wata matsayi mai ƙaranci.', 'sk': 'GL na SemEval-2019 naloga 5: prepoznavanje sovražnih tweetov s pristopom globokega učenja.', 'bo': 'GL at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Identifying hateful tweets with a deep learning approach.'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the system we developed for SemEval 2019 on Multilingual detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (HatEval-Task 5). We use an approach based on an Attention-based Long Short-Term Memory Recurrent Neural Network. In particular, we build a Bidirectional LSTM to extract information from the word embeddings over the sentence, then apply attention over the hidden states to estimate the importance of each word and finally feed this context vector to another LSTM model to get a representation. Then, the output obtained with this model is used to get the prediction of each of the sub-tasks.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe el sistema que desarrollamos para SemEval 2019 sobre detección multilingüe del discurso de odio contra inmigrantes y mujeres en Twitter (HaTeval - Tarea 5). Utilizamos un enfoque basado en una red neuronal recurrente de memoria a corto plazo a largo plazo basada en la atención. En particular, creamos un LSTM bidireccional para extraer información de las incrustaciones de palabras sobre la oración, luego aplicamos atención sobre los estados ocultos para estimar la importancia de cada palabra y, finalmente, alimentamos este vector de contexto a otro modelo LSTM para obtener una representación. Luego, el resultado obtenido con este modelo se utiliza para obtener la predicción de cada una de las subtareas.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة النظام الذي قمنا بتطويره لـ SemEval 2019 حول الكشف متعدد اللغات لخطاب الكراهية ضد المهاجرين والنساء في تويتر (HatEval - المهمة 5). نحن نستخدم نهجًا يعتمد على شبكة عصبية متكررة للذاكرة طويلة المدى قائمة على الانتباه. على وجه الخصوص ، نقوم ببناء LSTM ثنائي الاتجاه لاستخراج المعلومات من الكلمة embeddings فوق الجملة ، ثم نركز الانتباه على الحالات المخفية لتقدير أهمية كل كلمة وأخيراً نقوم بتغذية متجه السياق هذا إلى نموذج LSTM آخر للحصول على تمثيل. بعد ذلك ، يتم استخدام المخرجات التي تم الحصول عليها باستخدام هذا النموذج للحصول على التنبؤ بكل مهمة من المهام الفرعية.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le système que nous avons développé pour SemEval 2019 sur la détection multilingue des discours de haine contre les immigrés et les femmes sur Twitter (HatEval - Tâche 5). Nous utilisons une approche basée sur un réseau de neurones récurrents à mémoire longue et à court terme basé sur l'attention. En particulier, nous construisons un LSTM bidirectionnel pour extraire des informations des incorporations de mots sur la phrase, puis nous appliquons notre attention sur les états cachés pour estimer l'importance de chaque mot et enfin nous alimentons ce vecteur de contexte à un autre modèle LSTM pour obtenir une représentation. Ensuite, la sortie obtenue avec ce modèle est utilisée pour obtenir la prédiction de chacune des sous-tâches.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve o sistema que desenvolvemos para o SemEval 2019 sobre detecção multilíngue de discurso de ódio contra imigrantes e mulheres no Twitter (HatEval - Tarefa 5). Usamos uma abordagem baseada em uma Rede Neural Recorrente de Memória de Longo e Curto Prazo baseada em Atenção. Em particular, construímos um LSTM bidirecional para extrair informações dos embeddings de palavras sobre a frase, depois aplicamos atenção aos estados ocultos para estimar a importância de cada palavra e, finalmente, alimentamos esse vetor de contexto para outro modelo LSTM para obter uma representação. Em seguida, a saída obtida com este modelo é usada para obter a previsão de cada uma das subtarefas.', 'ja': '本稿では、Twitterにおける移民や女性に対するヘイトスピーチの多言語検出に関するSemEval 2019のために開発したシステムについて説明する（ HatEval - Task 5 ）。アテンションベースの長期記憶再帰ニューラルネットワークに基づいたアプローチを使用しています。特に、双方向LSTMを構築して、文章上の単語埋め込みから情報を抽出し、隠れた状態に注意を払って各単語の重要性を推定し、最後にこのコンテキストベクトルを別のLSTMモデルにフィードして表現を得る。次に、このモデルで得られた出力を使用して、各サブタスクの予測を取得します。', 'zh': '本文述我们为SemEval 2019开发的系统,该系统及对Twitter中针对移民和女性的仇恨言语的多言检测(HatEval - Task 5)。 用一本长短期记递归神经网络之法。 特构一双向LSTM,取息于句单词嵌中,然后注意于隐藏状态以度单词之要,而上下文向量给LSTM形以示之。 然后用此模得的输出用子务的占候。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर उस प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है जिसे हमने ट्विटर में आप्रवासियों और महिलाओं के खिलाफ नफरत भरे भाषण का बहुभाषी पता लगाने पर SemEval 2019 के लिए विकसित किया था (HatEval - कार्य 5)। हम एक ध्यान-आधारित दीर्घकालिक अल्पकालिक स्मृति आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के आधार पर एक दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम वाक्य पर शब्द एम्बेडिंग से जानकारी निकालने के लिए एक द्विदिश एलएसटीएम का निर्माण करते हैं, फिर प्रत्येक शब्द के महत्व का अनुमान लगाने के लिए छिपे हुए राज्यों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं और अंत में इस संदर्भ वेक्टर को प्रतिनिधित्व प्राप्त करने के लिए एक और एलएसटीएम मॉडल में फ़ीड करते हैं। फिर, इस मॉडल के साथ प्राप्त आउटपुट का उपयोग प्रत्येक उप-कार्यों की भविष्यवाणी प्राप्त करने के लिए किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается система, которую мы разработали для SemEval 2019 по многоязычному обнаружению ненавистнических высказываний против иммигрантов и женщин в Twitter (HatEval - Задача 5). Мы используем подход, основанный на рекуррентной нейронной сети долгосрочной краткосрочной памяти, основанной на внимании. В частности, мы строим двунаправленный LSTM для извлечения информации из вложений слов над предложением, затем применяем внимание над скрытыми состояниями, чтобы оценить важность каждого слова и, наконец, подаем этот вектор контекста на другую модель LSTM, чтобы получить представление. Затем выходные данные, полученные с помощью этой модели, используются для получения предсказания каждой из подзадач.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcóras a d’fhorbraíomar do SemEval 2019 ar Bhrath ilteangach cainte fuatha in aghaidh inimirceach agus ban ar Twitter (HatEval - Tasc 5). Bainimid úsáid as cur chuige atá bunaithe ar Líonra Néarach Athfhillteach Cuimhne Fada Gearrthéarmach Bunaithe ar Aire. Tógaimid LSTM Déthreo go háirithe chun faisnéis a bhaint as an bhfocal leabaithe thar an abairt, ansin aird a thabhairt ar na stáit fholaithe chun tábhacht gach focal a mheas agus ar deireadh cuir an veicteoir comhthéacs seo chuig samhail LSTM eile chun léiriú a fháil. Ansin, úsáidtear an t-aschur a fhaightear leis an múnla seo chun gach ceann de na fo-thascanna a thuar.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα που αναπτύξαμε για το SemEval 2019 με θέμα την πολύγλωσση ανίχνευση ρητορικής μίσους κατά μεταναστών και γυναικών στο Twitter (HatEval-Task 5). Χρησιμοποιούμε μια προσέγγιση βασισμένη σε ένα Επαναλαμβανόμενο Νευρικό Δίκτυο Μακροπρόθεσμης Μνήμης με βάση την προσοχή. Ειδικότερα, κατασκευάζουμε ένα αμφίδρομο για να εξάγουμε πληροφορίες από τις ενσωμάτωση λέξεων πάνω από την πρόταση, στη συνέχεια εφαρμόζουμε προσοχή στις κρυφές καταστάσεις για να εκτιμήσουμε τη σημασία κάθε λέξης και τελικά τροφοδοτούμε αυτό το διάνυσμα περιβάλλοντος σε ένα άλλο μοντέλο για να πάρουμε μια αναπαράσταση. Στη συνέχεια, η παραγωγή που λαμβάνεται με αυτό το μοντέλο χρησιμοποιείται για να ληφθεί η πρόβλεψη για κάθε μία από τις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2019 számára kifejlesztett rendszert a bevándorlók és nők elleni gyűlöletbeszéd többnyelvű felismeréséről Twitteren (HatEval – 5. feladat). Figyelem alapú, rövid távú memória ismétlődő ideghálózaton alapuló megközelítést alkalmazunk. Különösen kétirányú LSTM-t építünk, hogy információkat vegyünk ki a mondat fölé a szóbeágyazásokból, majd figyelmet fordítsunk a rejtett állapotokra, hogy becsüljük meg az egyes szavak fontosságát, és végül ezt a kontextusvektort egy másik LSTM modellhez, hogy ábrázolhassuk. Ezután az ezzel a modellel kapott kimenetet használjuk az egyes alcsoportok előrejelzésére.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ SemEval 2019 წლის სისტემის მრავალური განვიხსნა მრავალური მრავალური განვიხსნა იმიგრანტების და ქალების გარეშე Twitter-ში (HatEval - Task 5). ჩვენ გამოყენებთ მოხმარება, რომელიც დაახლოებით განახლოებით ძალიან ბრძანი მეხსიერებაზე განახლოებით ნეიროლური ქსელი. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ ორედირექციონალური LSTM-ს ინფორმაციის გამოყენება სიტყვების შემდეგ სიტყვების შემდეგ ინფორმაციის გამოყენებას, შემდეგ დააყენებთ ინფორმაცია ყველა სიტყვების მნიშვნელობის შემდეგ, ეს მოდელზე მიღებული გამოყენება გამოყენება, რომ ყოველ სამუშაო დავალების წინასწორება.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il sistema che abbiamo sviluppato per SemEval 2019 sulla rilevazione multilingue dei discorsi d'odio contro immigrati e donne su Twitter (HatEval - Task 5). Usiamo un approccio basato su una rete neurale ricorrente di memoria a breve termine basata sull'attenzione. In particolare, costruiamo un LSTM bidirezionale per estrarre informazioni dalle incorporazioni di parole sopra la frase, quindi applichiamo l'attenzione sugli stati nascosti per stimare l'importanza di ogni parola e infine alimentamo questo vettore di contesto ad un altro modello LSTM per ottenere una rappresentazione. Quindi, l'output ottenuto con questo modello viene utilizzato per ottenere la previsione di ciascuno dei sottocompiti.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma sistema, kurią parengėme 2019 m. SemEval dėl neapykantos kalbų prieš imigrantus ir moteris daugiakalbio aptikimo Twitter (HatEval - 5 užduotis). Naudojame požiūrį, pagrįstą dėmesiu grindžiamu ilgalaikiu trumpalaikiu prisiminimu pasikartojančiu nerviniu tinklu. Visų pirma mes sukuriame dvikryptį LSTM, kad ištrauktume informaciją iš žodžio įtraukimo į sakinį, tada kreiptume dėmesį į paslėptas valstybes, kad įvertintume kiekvieno žodžio svarbą ir galiausiai perduodame šį konteksto vektorių kitam LSTM modeliui, kad gautume atstovavimą. Tuomet naudojant šį model į gautas rezultatas naudojamas kiekvienos subužduoties prognozavimui gauti.', 'mk': 'This paper describes the system we developed for SemEval 2019 on Multilingual detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (HatEval - Task 5).  Користиме пристап базиран на внимание базиран на долгорочна неурална мрежа за повторна меморија. Особено, ние изградуваме Бидирекционален ЛСТМ за да извлечеме информации од зборот вложени во текот на реченицата, потоа да примениме внимание врз скриените држави за да ја процениме важноста на секој збор и конечно да го прехраниме овој контекстен вектор на друг ЛСТМ модел за да доби Потоа, излезот постигнат со овој модел се користи за да се добие предвидување на секоја од подзадачите.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2019 жылдың semiEval үшін көптеген тілдер жүйесінің Твиттердегі иммигранттер мен әйелдерге қарсы жек сөйлесу жүйесін анықтайды (HatEval - 5 тапсырма). Біз назардағы қысқа уақыт жады қайталанатын нейралық желіне негізделген тәсілді қолданамыз. Мәліметті сөздің ендіру үшін біз екі бағытты LSTM құрамыз, содан кейін жасырылған күйлердің маңыздылығын бағалау үшін, әрбір сөздің маңыздылығын бағалау үшін, соңында осы контексті векторды басқа LSTM моделіне енд Содан кейін, бұл үлгімен алған шығыс әрбір ішкі тапсырмалардың алдын- ала алу үшін қолданылады.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem yang kami bangun untuk SemEval 2019 tentang pengesan berbilang bahasa ucapan kebencian terhadap imigran dan wanita di Twitter (HatEval - Task 5). We use an approach based on an Attention-based Long Short-Term Memory Recurrent Neural Network.  Secara khususnya, kami membina LSTM Dua Arah untuk mengekstrak maklumat dari penyampaian perkataan atas kalimat, kemudian laksanakan perhatian atas keadaan tersembunyi untuk menghargai pentingan setiap perkataan dan akhirnya memberi makan vektor konteks ini ke model LSTM lain untuk mendapatkan perwakilan. Kemudian, output yang diperoleh dengan model ini digunakan untuk mendapatkan ramalan setiap sub-tugas.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019-ന് വികസിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം വിവരിക്കുന്നു. കുടുംബങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വെറുപ്പുള്ള സംസാരം തി ശ്രദ്ധ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള നീളം ചെറുതായ മെമ്മറിയില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സമ്മാനം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്ന് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ബൈഡഡിയനേഷണല്\u200d LSTM നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നീട് ഒളിഞ്ഞ രാജ്യങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും  എന്നിട്ട് ഈ മോഡല്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ലഭ്യമായ ഫലം സബ് ജോലികളുടെ പ്രവചനം ലഭ്യമാക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema li żviluppajna għal SemEval 2019 dwar l-iskoperta multilingwi ta’ diskors ta’ mibegħda kontra l-immigranti u n-nisa fuq Twitter (HatEval - Task 5). Aħna nużaw approċċ ibbażat fuq Netwerk Newrali Rikorrenti tal-Memorja fuq medda twila ta’ żmien qasira bbażat fuq l-Attenzjoni. B’mod partikolari, a ħna nibnu LSTM Bidirezzjonali biex nieħdu informazzjoni mill-kliem inkorporati fuq is-sentenza, imbagħad nagħtu attenzjoni fuq l-istati moħbija biex nistmaw l-importanza ta’ kull kelma u fl-aħħar mill-aħħar nagħtu dan il-vettur tal-kuntest lil mudell ieħor LSTM biex tinkiseb rappreżentazzjoni. Imbagħad, il-produzzjoni miksuba b’dan il-mudell tintuża biex tinkiseb it-tbassir ta’ kull waħda mis-sottokompiti.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний 2019 оны SemEval-д хөгжүүлсэн системийг Твиттерийн хөгжүүлэгчид болон эмэгтэйчүүдийн эсрэг үзэн ядуурлын яриаг олон хэлний хэлний тухай тайлбарладаг. Бид анхаарлын үндсэн урт хугацааны санамж дахин дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээний үндсэн арга хэрэглэдэг. Ялангуяа бид өгүүлбэрээс өгүүлбэрээс мэдээллийг гаргахад хоёр багын LSTM-г бүтээж, дараа нь нуугдсан орнуудын тухай анхаарал хандуулж өгүүлбэрээр энэ контекст векторыг өөр LSTM загвар руу илэрхийлэл авах гэсэн үг юм. Дараа нь энэ загвараар гарсан үр дүн нь суб-даалгаварын тухай таамаглах хэрэгтэй.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano system opracowany dla SemEval 2019 na temat Wielojęzycznego wykrywania mowy nienawiści wobec imigrantów i kobiet na Twitterze (HatEval-Task 5). Stosujemy podejście oparte na uważności długotrwałej sieci neuronowej pamięci krótkoterminowej. W szczególności budujemy dwukierunkowy LSTM, aby wyodrębnić informacje z osadzeń słowa nad zdaniem, a następnie zwracamy uwagę na ukryte stany, aby oszacować znaczenie każdego słowa i na koniec przesyłać ten wektor kontekstu do innego modelu LSTM, aby uzyskać reprezentację. Następnie wyjście uzyskane za pomocą tego modelu służy do uzyskania przewidywania każdego z podzadań.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet vi utvikla for semiEval 2019 om fleirspråksoppdaging av hatespråk mot imigrantar og kvinner i Twitter (HatEval - oppgåve 5). Vi bruker ein tilnærming basert på ein attmerksbasert langsiktig minne på gjentakelig nøyralnettverk. I særskilt bygger vi ein divretning LSTM for å pakke ut informasjon frå ordinnbygginga over setninga, og så bruke oppmerksomhet over gøymde tilstandane for å vurdere viktigheten for kvar ord og til slutt køyre denne kontekstvektoren til ein annan LSTM-modell for å få eit representasjon. Deretter blir utdata som er henta med denne modellen brukt for å få forhåndsvising av kvar av underoppgåva.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul pe care l-am dezvoltat pentru SemEval 2019 privind detectarea multilingvă a discursului de ură împotriva imigranților și femeilor pe Twitter (HatEval - Task 5). Folosim o abordare bazată pe o rețea neurală recurentă de memorie pe termen scurt, bazată pe atenție. În special, construim un LSTM bidirecțional pentru a extrage informații din încorporarea cuvântului peste propoziție, apoi aplicăm atenție asupra stărilor ascunse pentru a estima importanța fiecărui cuvânt și, în cele din urmă, hrănim acest vector context la un alt model LSTM pentru a obține o reprezentare. Apoi, rezultatul obținut cu acest model este folosit pentru a obține predicția fiecărei subsarcini.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපි 2019 සෙම්වෙල් වෙනුවෙන් විශ්වාස කරපු පද්ධතිය පැහැදිලි කරනවා වගේම වගේම භාෂාවක් හොයාගන්න විරුද්ධ ක අපි ප්\u200dරවේශයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා අවධානය සඳහා ලොකු වාර්තාව මතකය ආපහු ප්\u200dරවේශයක් නිර්මාණ ජාලයේ  විශේෂයෙන්, අපි දෙපාර්ශික LSTM එකක් හදන්නේ වාක්ෂා වලින් තොරතුරු අරගෙන යන්න, ඊට පස්සේ හැංගුණු ස්ථාන වලින් අවධානය අනුමාන කරලා හැම වචන ඊට පස්සේ, මේ මොඩේල් එක්ක ලැබෙන ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem koji smo razvili za SemEval 2019 o multijezičkom otkrivanju govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena na Twitter (HatEval - Task 5). Koristimo pristup na temelju dugoročne memorije na osnovu pažnje ponovne neuronske mreže. Posebno, izgradili smo dvosmjernu LSTM kako bi izvukli informacije iz reči ugrađene po rečenici, zatim privukli pažnju na skrivene države kako bi procenili važnost svake reči i konačno nahranili ovaj kontekstni vektor drugim LSTM modelom kako bi dobili predstavu. Onda se proizvod koji je dobio sa ovim modelom koristi za predviđanje svakog podzadataka.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoraa nidaamka aan u soo hormarinay SemEval 2019 oo ku saabsan baaritaanka hadalka nacaybka ee loogu talagalay dadka dalka u soo guuray iyo dumarka Twitterka (Hat-Eval-Shaqada 5). Waxaynu isticmaalnaa qaab ku saleysan shabakadda Neural ee xasuusta waqtiga dheer ee wakhtiga la soo degay. Si gaar ah, waxaynu dhisnaa LSTM si aan macluumaad uga soo saarno hadalka ku qoran hadalka, kadibna waxaynu ka dalbannaa labada dowladood ee qarsoon si aan u qiimeyno muhiimka hadal kasta iyo ugu dambaysta waxan u quudinno vectoran qaab kale oo LSTM ah si uu u helo mid u wakiil. Markaas waxaa loo isticmaalaa in laga sii sheegayo qaababkan.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver det system vi utvecklat för SemEval 2019 om flerspråkig upptäckt av hatpropaganda mot invandrare och kvinnor på Twitter (HatEval - Uppgift 5). Vi använder ett tillvägagångssätt baserat på ett uppmärksamhetsbaserat Long Short-Term Memory Recurrent Neural Network. I synnerhet bygger vi en dubbelriktad LSTM för att extrahera information från ordet inbäddningar över meningen, sedan uppmärksamma de dolda tillstånden för att uppskatta betydelsen av varje ord och slutligen mata denna kontextvektor till en annan LSTM modell för att få en representation. Därefter används resultatet som erhållits med denna modell för att få förutsägelsen av varje underuppgift.', 'ta': 'This paper describes the system we developed for SemEval 2019 on Multilingual detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (HatEval - Task 5).  நாங்கள் ஒரு கவனத்தை அடிப்படையில் பயன்படுத்தும் நீண்ட குறைந்த நினைவகம் நினைவகம் நினைவூட்டல் வலைப்பின்னல். குறிப்பிட்டு, வாக்கியத்தின் மேல் உள்ளிடும் வார்த்தையிலிருந்து தகவலை வெளியேற்ற ஒரு இரைதிசையாக LSTM உருவாக்கி, மறைந்த நாடுகள் மீது கவனம் பயன்படுத்தி ஒவ்வொரு வ பின்னர், இந்த மாதிரியில் கிடைக்கப்பட்ட வெளியீடு ஒவ்வொரு துணை பணிகளின் முன்னோட்டம் பெற பயன்படுத்தப்படும்.', 'ur': 'This paper describes the system we developed for SemEval 2019 on Multilingual Detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (HatEval - Task 5). ہم نے ایک طریقہ استعمال کیا ہے، جو انتظار پر بنیاد رکھی ہے، لانگ ٹر ٹر میموری دوبارہ نیورال نیورل نیٹ ورک پر۔ مخصوصا، ہم ایک دوسری دکھانے والی LSTM بناتے ہیں کہ کلمات میں سے اطلاعات اضافہ کریں، پھر چھپائے ہوئے ایٹیوں پر اظہار کریں کہ ہر کلمات کا اظہار مقرر کریں اور بالآخر اس کنٹکس ویکتور کو ایک دوسرے LSTM موڈل کے لئے اضافہ کریں۔ اس کے بعد، اس مدل کے ساتھ حاصل ہونے والی نتیجہ ہر sub-tasks کی پیش بینی حاصل کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے.', 'uz': "Бу саҳифа биз SemEval 2019 учун тарзда ташкил қилган системни Twitterda муҳожирлар ва аёлларга қарши қизиқ сўзларни кўриб чиқиш (Hat-Eval - Vazifa 5) uchun ko'plab tillar tilini anglatadi. @ info: whatsthis Shunday qilib, biz gapning ichki so'zlaridan maʼlumotni olib tashlash uchun Bidirectional LSTM quyidagi so'zlardan foydalanamiz, keyin eng so'zlarning muhimligini qiymatlashga qarang va охиратда bu context vektorini tashqarish uchun boshqa LSTM modeliga qoʻyish. Keyin, bu model bilan olingan natijasi har bir vazifalarning oldini ishlatish uchun ishlatiladi.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả hệ thống mà chúng tôi đã phát triển cho SemEvl 209. Về việc phát hiện ngôn ngữ thù ghét người nhập cư và phụ nữ trên Twitter. Chúng tôi sử dụng một phương pháp dựa trên mạng thần kinh Nhắc nhở ngắn hạn. Chúng tôi đặc biệt xây dựng một tập tin BiDirection LSTM để lấy thông tin từ từ tác vụ tham nhũng trên câu này, sau đó chú ý đến các bang bị giấu để ước lượng tầm quan trọng của từng từ và cuối cùng cung cấp véc- tơ ngữ cảnh này cho một mô hình LSD khác để có được sự đại diện. Sau đó, kết quả lấy từ mẫu này được dùng để dự đoán của mỗi công việc phụ.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft het systeem dat we hebben ontwikkeld voor SemEval 2019 over Meertalige detectie van haatspraak tegen immigranten en vrouwen in Twitter (HatEval-Task 5). We hanteren een aanpak gebaseerd op een Attention-based Long-Term Memory Recurrent Neural Network. In het bijzonder bouwen we een bidirectionele LSTM om informatie uit de woordinsluitingen over de zin te extraheren, dan aandacht toe te passen op de verborgen staten om het belang van elk woord te schatten en tenslotte deze contextvector te voeren naar een ander LSTM model om een representatie te krijgen. Vervolgens wordt de output verkregen met dit model gebruikt om de voorspelling van elk van de subtaken te krijgen.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва системата, която разработихме за Многоезично откриване на речта на омразата срещу имигранти и жени в Туитър (Задача 5). Използваме подход, базиран на вниманието, базиран на дългосрочна краткосрочна памет за повтаряща се неврална мрежа. По-конкретно, ние изграждаме двупосочен ЛТМ, за да извлечем информация от вграждането на думата върху изречението, след което прилагаме внимание върху скритите състояния, за да оценим значението на всяка дума и накрая подаваме този контекстен вектор към друг модел ЛТМ, за да получим представяне. След това полученият с този модел изход се използва, за да се получи прогнозирането на всяка от подзадачите.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver det system, vi har udviklet til SemEval 2019 om flersproget detektion af hadefulde tale mod indvandrere og kvinder på Twitter (HatEval - Opgave 5). Vi bruger en tilgang baseret på en opmærksomhedsbaseret lang korttidshukommelse tilbagevendende neural netværk. Især bygger vi en bidirektionel LSTM til at udtrække oplysninger fra ordet indlejringer over sætningen, derefter anvende opmærksomhed over de skjulte tilstande for at estimere vigtigheden af hvert ord og endelig fodre denne kontekstvektor til en anden LSTM model for at få en repræsentation. Derefter bruges output opnået med denne model til at få forudsigelsen af hver af underopgaverne.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt das System, das wir für SemEval 2019 zum Thema Mehrsprachige Erkennung von Hassreden gegen Immigranten und Frauen in Twitter entwickelt haben (HatEval-Task 5). Wir verwenden einen Ansatz, der auf einem aufmerksamkeitsbasierten Long-Term Memory Recurrent Neural Network basiert. Insbesondere bauen wir ein bidirektionales LSTM, um Informationen aus den Worteinbettungen über den Satz zu extrahieren, dann Aufmerksamkeit auf die versteckten Zustände zu richten, um die Bedeutung jedes Wortes zu schätzen und schließlich diesen Kontextvektor an ein anderes LSTM-Modell zu übertragen, um eine Darstellung zu erhalten. Dann wird die mit diesem Modell erhaltene Ausgabe verwendet, um die Vorhersage für jede der Teilaufgaben zu erhalten.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sustav koji smo razvili za SemEval 2019. o multijezičkom otkrivanju govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena na Twitter (HatEval - zadatak 5). Koristimo pristup na temelju dugoročne memorije na temelju pažnje ponovne neurone mreže. Posebno, izgradimo dvosmjernu LSTM kako bi izvukli informacije iz riječi ugrađene na rečenicu, zatim privukli pažnju na skrivene države kako bi procijenili važnost svake riječi i konačno nahranili ovaj kontekstni vektor drugim LSTM modelom kako bi dobili zastupanje. Onda se izlaz koji je dobio s ovim modelom koristi za predviđanje svakog podzadataka.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem yang kami kembangkan untuk SemEval 2019 tentang deteksi berbagai bahasa pembicaraan kebencian terhadap imigran dan wanita di Twitter (HatEval - Task 5). Kami menggunakan pendekatan berdasarkan Jaringan Neural Memori Panjang Panjang Berdasarkan Perhatian. Terutama, kita membangun LSTM Biarah untuk mengekstrak informasi dari kata-kata embedding di atas kalimat, kemudian menerapkan perhatian di atas negara tersembunyi untuk memperkirakan penting setiap kata dan akhirnya memberi makan vektor konteks ini ke model LSTM lain untuk mendapatkan sebuah representation. Kemudian, output yang diperoleh dengan model ini digunakan untuk mendapatkan prediksi setiap sub-tugas.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval 2019를 위해 개발한 시스템으로 트위터에서 이민과 여성에 대한 증오 발언을 다양한 언어로 감지한다(HatEval-퀘스트 5).우리는 주의를 바탕으로 하는 장단기 기억 귀속 신경 네트워크의 방법을 사용했다.특히 우리는 문장에 삽입된 단어에서 정보를 추출한 다음에 숨겨진 상태에 대해 주의를 기울여 모든 단어의 중요성을 평가하고 마지막으로 이 상하문 벡터를 다른 LSTM 모델에 피드백하여 표시를 얻는다.그리고 이 모델을 사용하여 얻은 것은 모든 하위 임무의 예측을 얻는다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم را توسعه می\u200cدهد که ما برای SemEval 2019 توسعه کرده\u200cایم در مورد شناسایی از سخنرانی متنفر در برابر مهاجران و زنان توئیتر (HatEval - Task 5). ما از طریقی استفاده می کنیم که بر اساس یک شبکه عصبی کوتاه زمان طولانی بر پایه توجه استفاده می کنیم. مخصوصا، ما یک LSTM دو مسیر ساختیم تا اطلاعات را از کلمه وارد کردن بر جمله خارج کنیم، سپس توجه را بر روی وضعیت مخفی برای ارزیابی اهمیت هر کلمه بررسی کنیم و بالاخره این ویکتور محیط را به یک مدل LSTM دیگر تغذیه دهیم تا یک نمایش بگیریم. بعدش، نتیجه\u200cای که با این مدل دریافت شده استفاده می\u200cشود تا پیش\u200cبینی از هر یک از عملیات زیر کار را بگیرد.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz 2019-njy SemEval 2019-nji ýylda göçmenleriň we aýallaryň Twitter-de ýigrençäk sözleriniň ýigrenýän çykyşyny tapmaklygyny düşünýär. Attention-Based on a Short-Term Memory Registry ýaly nusgala ulanýarys. Hassa bir şekilde, sözlän içinde gizli durumlar üzerinde bilgi a çmak üçin iki yönde bir LSTM inşa edip, soňra her sözüň wajyplygyny hasaplamak üçin bu kontekst vektörünü başga bir LSTM modelini süýtgetmek üçin üns berip duruyoruz. Sonra bu modelde alınan çizgi her sub-görevinin önümlenmesini almak üçin ullanılır.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo tulioujenga kwa ajili ya SemEval 2019 kuhusu kutambua hotuba ya chuki dhidi ya wahamiaji na wanawake kwenye mtandao wa Twita (Hati - Kazi 5). Tunatumia mbinu inayotokana na Mtandao wa Neural unaoendelea Kumbukumbu kwa muda mrefu wa muda mrefu unaoendelea kusikilizwa. Kwa hakika, tunajenga LSTM kwa njia ya moja kwa moja ili kuondoa taarifa kutoka kwenye neno linaloingizwa kwenye hukumu hiyo, kisha tumia mwangalizi juu ya nchi zilizofichikana ili kudhani umuhimu wa kila neno na hatimaye kulipa vector hii kwenye muundo mwingine wa LSTM ili kupata uwakilishi. Kisha, matokeo yaliyopatikana na mtindo huu yanatumiwa kupata utabiri wa kila moja ya kazi hizo.', 'sq': 'This paper describes the system we developed for SemEval 2019 on Multilingual detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (HatEval - Task 5).  Ne përdorim një qasje bazuar në një rrjet nervor të përhershëm të kujtesës së afatit të shkurtër të bazuar në vëmendje. In particular, we build a Bidirectional LSTM to extract information from the word embeddings over the sentence, then apply attention over the hidden states to estimate the importance of each word and finally feed this context vector to another LSTM model to get a representation.  Pastaj, rezultati i fituar me këtë model përdoret për të marrë parashikimin e secilit nga nëndetyrat.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ለሴmEval 2019 የስደተኞች እና በተዊተር ሴቶችን ላይ የጥላቻን ንግግር በሚለይ ቋንቋ አግኝቷል፡፡ የረጅም አቋራጭ የቆራጭ ጊዜ ማስታወሻ መረብ በመሠረት ላይ የተደረገውን ሥርዓት እንጠይቃለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ ከንግግር ውስጥ ካለው ቃላት የግንኙነቱን መረጃ ለማውጣት የBidirectional LSTM እናደርጋለን፡፡ በዚያን ጊዜም የዚህ ሞዴል የተገኘው ውጤት የሁሉን አካባቢ ስራዎችን ለመቀበል ይጠቀማል፡፡', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die stelsel wat ons ontwikkel het vir SemEval 2019 op veelvuldige taak van haat spreek teen imigrante en vroue in Twitter (HatEval - Task 5). Ons gebruik 'n toegang gebaseer op 'n aandag- gebaseerde Lang- Term Geheue Herhaalde Neurale Netwerk. In besonderhede bou ons 'n Bidireksionale LSTM om inligting uit die woord inbettings oor die seting te uitpak, dan toepassing aandag oor die verborge staatste om die belangrikheid van elke woord te vurig en eindelik hierdie konteksvektor te voer na 'n ander LSTM model om 'n verteenwoording te kry. Dan, die uitvoer wat saam met hierdie model ontvang is gebruik word om die voorskou van elke van die sub-taak te kry.", 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է այն համակարգը, որը մենք ստեղծեցինք 2019 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" թվիթերում, որը վերաբերում է ատելության խոսքի բազմալեզու հայտնաբերման մասին միգրանտների և կանանց դեմ (Հաթեվալ - 5-րդ խնդի Մենք օգտագործում ենք մի մոտեցում, որը հիմնված է ուշադրության վրա հիմնված երկար կարճ ժամանակահատվածի հիշողության կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցի վրա: In particular, we build a Bidirectional LSTM to extract information from the word embeddings over the sentence, then apply attention over the hidden states to estimate the importance of each word and finally feed this context vector to another LSTM model to get a representation.  Հետո, այս մոդելի միջոցով ստացված արտադրությունը օգտագործվում է ենթախնդիրներից յուրաքանչյուրի կանխատեսման համար:', 'az': "Bu kağıt 2019-ci SemEval üçün mühacirlərə və qadınlara qarşı nifrət sözlərinin çoxlu dil keşfetməsi barəsində hazırladığımız sistemi Twitter'da təşkil edir (HatEval - Task 5). Biz gözləmə tabanlı Uzun-Uzun-Term Hafızası Yenidən Nöral Ağı tərəfindən istifadə edirik. Özellikle, biz sözlərin içində məlumatları çıxartmaq üçün iki yönəlli LSTM inşa edirik, sonra gizli durumlar üzərində gözləyirik ki, hər sözün vacibətini təmin edək və sonunda bu məlumat vektorunu başqa bir LSTM modeli ilə təmin etmək üçün təmin edirik. Sonra bu modellə alınan çıxış hər birinin sub-taskların tədbirlərini almaq üçün istifadə edilir.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা ব্যাখ্যা করেছে যে আমরা সেমভাল ২০১৯ এর জন্য উন্নয়ন করেছি সিস্টেমের ব্যাপারে অভিবাসী এবং নারীদের বিরুদ্ধে ঘৃণা ভাষণের বিষ মনোযোগ ভিত্তিক দীর্ঘ সংক্ষিপ্ত টার্ম মেমরি পুনরায় নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্কের উপর ভিত্তিক একটি উপায় ব্যবহার করি। বিশেষ করে, আমরা একটি বাইডেডিয়াল এলসিএম তৈরি করি বাক্যের বিরুদ্ধে শব্দের বিভিন্ন তথ্য বের করার জন্য, তারপর গোপন রাষ্ট্রের উপর মনোযোগ প্রয়োগ করা যায় প্রত্যেক শব্দের গু তারপর, এই মডেল দ্বারা পাওয়া আউটপুট ব্যবহার করা হয় প্রত্যেকটি সাব-কাজের ভবিষ্যৎবাণী পাওয়ার জন্য।', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el sistema que vam desenvolupar per SemEval 2019 sobre la detecció multilingüe del discurs d'odi contra immigrants i dones a Twitter (HatEval - tasca 5). Utilitzem un enfocament basat en una xarxa neuronal recurrent de memòria a curt termini basada en l'atenció. En particular, construïm un LSTM bidireccional per extrair informació de la paraula incorporació sobre la frase, després aplicar atenció sobre els estats ocults per estimar la importància de cada paraula i finalment alimentar aquest vector contextual a un altre model LSTM per obtenir una representació. Llavors, la producció obtenida amb aquest model s'utilitza per a obtenir la predicció de cada una de les subtasques.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje systém, který jsme vyvinuli pro SemEval 2019 na Twitteru o vícejazyčné detekci nenávistné řeči proti imigrantům a ženám (HatEval-Task 5). Používáme přístup založený na pozornosti založené na dlouhodobé krátkodobé paměti recidivní neuronové síti. Konkrétně vytvoříme obousměrný LSTM, který extrahuje informace ze slovních vložení nad větou, pak upozorňujeme na skryté stavy, abychom odhadli důležitost každého slova a nakonec tento kontextový vektor poskytli jinému LSTM modelu, abychom získali reprezentaci. Poté se výstup získaný tímto modelem použije k získání predikce každého z dílčích úkolů.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse SemEval 2019 jaoks välja töötatud süsteemi sisserändajate ja naiste vihakõne mitmekeelse tuvastamise kohta Twitteris (HatEval – Task 5). Me kasutame lähenemisviisi, mis põhineb tähelepanupõhisel pikaajalisel mälu korduvatel närvivõrgustikul. Eelkõige ehitame kahesuunalise LSTM-i, et ekstraheerida teavet sõna manustamisest lause kohal, seejärel pöörata tähelepanu peidetud olekutele, et hinnata iga sõna tähtsust ja lõpuks suunata see konteksti vektor teise LSTM-i mudeli, et saada esitus. Seejärel kasutatakse selle mudeliga saadud väljundit iga alamülesande prognoosimiseks.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem koji smo razvili za semiEval 2019. o multijezičkom otkrivanju govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena na Twitter (HatEval - Task 5). Koristimo pristup na temelju dugoročne memorije na temelju pažnje ponovne neurone mreže. Posebno, izgradimo dvosmjernu LSTM za izvlačenje informacija iz riječi o uvlačenju rečenice preko rečenice, zatim privlačimo pažnju na skrivene države kako bi procijenili važnost svake riječi i konačno nahranili ovaj kontekstni vektor drugim LSTM modelom kako bi dobili zastupanje. Onda se proizvod koji je dobio sa ovim modelom koristi za predviđanje svakog podzadataka.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan SemEval 2019:lle kehittämämme järjestelmä maahanmuuttajiin ja naisiin kohdistuvan vihapuheen monikielisestä havaitsemisesta Twitterissä (HatEval - Task 5). Käytämme lähestymistapaa, joka perustuu huomiopohjaiseen pitkän aikavälin muistin toistuviin hermoverkkoihin. Erityisesti rakennamme kaksisuuntaisen LSTM:n poimimaan tietoa sanan upotuksista lauseen päälle, sitten kiinnitämme huomiota piilotettuihin tiloihin arvioidaksemme kunkin sanan tärkeyden ja lopuksi syötämme tämän kontekstivektorin toiseen LSTM-malliin saadaksemme esityksen. Tämän mallin avulla saatuja tuloksia käytetään kunkin osatehtävän ennustamiseen.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את המערכת שפיתחנו עבור SemEval 2019 על גילוי רבות שפות של נאום שנאה נגד מהגרים ונשים בטוויטר (HatEval - Task 5). אנחנו משתמשים באמצעות גישה מבוססת על רשת נוירולית חוזרת זכרון ארוכה לטווח קצר ומבוססת על תשומת לב. במיוחד, אנו בונים LSTM ביכיווני כדי להוציא מידע מהמילה המתוקפת מעל המשפט, ואז להפעיל תשומת לב מעל המדינות החבויות כדי להעריך את חשיבות כל מילה ולבסוף להאכיל את ווקטור הקשר הזה למודל LSTM אחר כדי לקבל ייצוג. ואז, ההוצאה שנקבלה עם המודל הזה משתמשת כדי לקבל את החזוי של כל משימה התחתונה.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na faɗaɗa tsarin da muka developed wa SemEal 2019 a kan gane magana na takaici a kan mutane da mãtã a cikin Twitter (Hatal - Tafiyar 5). @ info: whatsthis Kayyade, Munã samar da wani LTRM na Bi-Directive zuwa ka sami tsari daga maganar da aka shigar da shi a kan maganar, sa'an nan ka yi amfani da aikin muhimmin duk staten da aka ɓõye, dõmin ka ƙaddara muhimmin faɗi ga duk kalma kuma, ƙarami, za'a samar da wannan matsayin mazaɓa zuwa wani misali na LTRM dõmin ya sami wani uwar. Sa'an nan, ana yi amfani da fitarwa wanda aka samu da wannan misalin don ya iya gane wa kõwane abu na aikin sub-taskõki.", 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan sistem, ki smo ga razvili za SemEval 2019 o večjezičnem odkrivanju sovražnega govora proti priseljencem in ženskam v Twitterju (HatEval – naloga 5). Uporabljamo pristop, ki temelji na pozornosti temelječem dolgoročnem kratkoročnem živčnem omrežju. Zlasti zgradimo dvosmerni LSTM, da izvlečemo informacije iz besednih vdelav nad stavkom, nato uporabimo pozornost nad skritimi stanji, da ocenimo pomembnost vsake besede in končno prenesemo ta kontekstni vektor v drug LSTM model, da dobimo predstavitev. Nato se izhod, dobljen s tem modelom, uporabi za pridobitev napovedi vsake od podnalog.', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé éntuk ngénaké sistem awak dhéwé nggawe kanggo seminval 2011 banjur akeh langgar sapa-tanggal kuwi tindakan kejahatan karo perkaran-kanggo nganggep wong liyané karo ngénaké bawat karo Tuter (Hadinval - task 5). Awak dhéwé Ngawe Perintah sing basa ning Atténtion-basa Tatanan Ngawe Perintah Kemik windows-action Sampeyan, akeh mbubuti punika dipoleh kanggo model iki dadi kaé ngerasai pertualisi sak apa-task.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་མིང་ལ་2019ལྟ་བུའི་སྐད་རིགས་དབྱེ་བ་དུ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཤེས་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ཨ་ཕི་ཨེ ང་ཚོས་གནད་དོན་ལྟར་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་ཉེན་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་འདུག དམིགས་བསལ་ན། ང་ཚོས་ཚིག་འདི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག དེ་ནས་དབྱིབས་མཐུན་པའི་ཚད་གཞི་འདི་དང་མཉམ་དུ་སྔོན་ཚུལ་གྱི་sub-tasks རེ་རེར་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'INF-HatEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Convolutional Neural Networks for Hate Speech Detection Against Women and Immigrants on Twitter', 'ar': 'INF-HatEval في SemEval-2019 المهمة 5: الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية للكشف عن خطاب الكراهية ضد النساء والمهاجرين على تويتر', 'pt': 'INF-HatEval na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 5: Redes neurais convolucionais para detecção de discurso de ódio contra mulheres e imigrantes no Twitter', 'fr': 'INF-Hateval au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 5\xa0: Réseaux de neurones convolutifs pour la détection des discours haineux contre les femmes et les immigrants sur Twitter', 'es': 'Inf-hateval en Semeval-2019 Tarea 5: Redes neuronales convolucionales para la detección del discurso de odio contra mujeres e inmigrantes en Twitter', 'hi': 'SEMEval-2019 टास्क 5 में INF-HatEval: ट्विटर पर महिलाओं और आप्रवासियों के खिलाफ हेट स्पीच डिटेक्शन के लिए Convolutional Neural Networks', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019でのINF - HatEvalタスク5 ： Twitterでの女性と移民に対するヘイトスピーチ検出のための畳み込みニューラルネットワーク', 'zh': 'INF-HatEval于SemEval-2019务5:卷积神经网络,以检女移之恶言于Twitter也', 'ru': 'INF-HatEval на SemEval-2019 Задача 5: Сверточные нейронные сети для обнаружения ненавистнических высказываний в отношении женщин и иммигрантов в Twitter', 'ga': 'INF-HatEval ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 5: Líonraí Néaracha Comhráiteacha um Fhuath-Bhraith Cainte i gCoinne na mBan agus na nInimirceach ar Twitter', 'ka': 'INF-HatEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Convolutional Neural Networks for Hate Speech Detection Against Women and Immigrants on Twitter', 'hu': 'INF-HatEval a SemEval-2019 5. feladat: Konvolúciós ideghálózatok a nők és bevándorlók elleni gyűlöletbeszéd felismerésére Twitteren', 'el': 'Εργασία 5: Σύλληλα Νευρικά Δίκτυα για την Ανίχνευση Λόγου μίσους κατά των Γυναικών και των Μεταναστών στο Twitter', 'it': "INF-HatEval al SemEval-2019 Task 5: Reti Neurali Convoluzionali per la rilevazione del discorso d'odio contro donne e immigrati su Twitter", 'lt': 'INF-HatEval SemEval-2019 5 užduotis: konvoliuciniai neurologiniai tinklai neapykantos kalbų prieš moteris ir imigrantus nustatymui Twitter', 'kk': 'INF-HatEval at semiEval-2019 Task 5: Convolutional Neural Networks for Hate Speech Detection Against Women and Immigrants on Twitter', 'mk': 'ИНФ-HatEval на SemEval-2019 задача 5: Конволуционални неврални мрежи за детекција на говор на омраза против жените и имигрантите на Твитер', 'ms': 'INF-HatEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Convolutional Neural Networks for Hate Speech Detection Against Women and Immigrants on Twitter', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 5-ലെ INF-ഹാറ്റ്വാല്\u200d: സ്ത്രീകള്\u200dക്കും അഭയാര്\u200dത്ഥികള്\u200dക്കും വിരോധമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും വെറുപ്പുള്ള നെയ', 'mt': 'INF-HatEval f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 5: Netwerks newrali konvoluzzjonali għall-iskoperta ta’ diskors ta’ mibegħda kontra n-nisa u l-immigranti fuq Twitter', 'mn': 'INF-HatEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Convolutional Neural Networks for Hate Speech Detection Against Women and Immigrants on Twitter', 'no': 'INF-HatEval at semiEval-2019 Task 5: Convolutional Neural Networks for Hate Speech Detection Against Women and Immigrants on Twitter', 'pl': 'INF-HatEval na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 5: Konwolucyjne sieci neuronowe do wykrywania mowy nienawiści wobec kobiet i imigrantów na Twitterze', 'ro': 'INF-HatEval la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 5: Rețele Neurale Convoluționale pentru detectarea discursului de ură împotriva femeilor și imigranților pe Twitter', 'sr': 'INF-HatEval na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 5: Konvolucionalne neurone mreže za detekciju govora mržnje protiv žena i imigranta na Twitter', 'sv': 'INF-HatEval på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 5: Konvulutionella neurala nätverk för detektering av hattal mot kvinnor och invandrare på Twitter', 'si': 'INF-Hateval at semeval-2019 Job 5: ConVoltive neuroral Netwarks for Hate Talk Detection adverse Female and ImmImmediants on Twitter', 'so': 'INF-HatEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Convolution Neural Network for Hate Speech Against Women and Immigrant on Twitter', 'ta': 'செம்Eval-2019 பணியில் உள்ள INF- HatEval 5: தொடர்பில் பெண்களுக்கும் குடியாத பேச்சுக்கும் எதிரான பேச்சு கண்டறிதல்', 'ur': 'INF-HatEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Convolutional Neural Networks for Hate Speech Detection against Women and Immigrants on Twitter', 'uz': '5. Vazifani SemEval-2019 yilda INF-HatEval: Oddiy va Muhammadlarning Agar Hat Sichqonchaning qidirish uchun muvaffaqiyatli tarmoq', 'vi': 'NHẬT VỤ-HatEvl tại SemEvl-2009 Task 5: Liên kết kết các mạng thần kinh cho chương trình trinh sát ghét bỏ phụ nữ và phong phú trên Twitter.', 'bg': 'Задача 5: Конволюционни неврални мрежи за откриване на речта на омразата срещу жени и имигранти в Туитър', 'hr': 'INF-HatEval na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 5: Konvolucionalne neurone mreže za otkrivanje govora mržnje protiv žena i imigranta na Twitter-u', 'nl': 'INF-HatEval bij SemEval-2019 Taak 5: Convolutionele Neurale Netwerken voor Hate Speech Detection tegen Vrouwen en Immigranten op Twitter', 'da': 'INF-HatEval på SemEval-2019 Opgave 5: Konvolutionelle Neurale Netværk til påvisning af hadtaler mod kvinder og indvandrere på Twitter', 'de': 'INF-HatEval bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 5: Convolutional Neuroral Networks for Hate Speech Detection on Women and Immigrants on Twitter', 'id': 'INF-HatEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Convolutional Neural Networks for Hate Speech Detection Against Women and Immigrants on Twitter', 'ko': 'INF Hat Eval Sem Eval-2019 미션 5: 트위터에서 여성과 이민자에 대한 증오 발언을 감지하는 권적 신경 네트워크', 'fa': 'INF-HatEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Convolutional Neural Networks for Hate Speech Against Women and Immigrants on Twitter', 'sw': 'INF-HatEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Convolutional Neural Networks for Hate Speech Detection Against Women and Immigrants on Twitter', 'af': 'InF-HatEval by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 5: Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerke vir Hate Speech Deteksie teen Vroue en Immigrante op Twitter', 'tr': 'INF-HatEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Convolutional Neural Networks for Hate Speech Detection Against Women and Immigrants on Twitter', 'sq': 'INF-HatEval në SemEval-2019 Task 5: Convolutional Neural Networks for Hate Speech Detection Against Women and Immigrants on Twitter', 'am': 'ስራ 5: በሴቶችና ስደተኞች ላይ የጥል ንግግር ምርመራ ላይ የነዌር መረብ', 'hy': 'Ինֆ-Հաթեվալ 2019-ի «Սեմեվալ» 5-րդ հանձնարարությունը. Թվիթերում կանանց և ազգականների դեմ ատելության հայտնաբերման համառուցվածքային նյարդային ցանցեր', 'az': 'ÜmiEval-2019 Task 5: Twitterdə qadınlar və İmlərin qarşısında nifrət sözlərini keşfetmək üçün nöqsanlıq Nöqsanlıq Netikləri', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯-এর কাজ ৫: নারী এবং অভিবাসীদের বিরুদ্ধে ঘৃণার বিরুদ্ধে ঘৃণা প্রকাশের জন্য নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক', 'bs': 'INF-HatEval na pola Evala-2019. zadatak 5: Konvolucionalne neurone mreže za otkrivanje govora mržnje protiv žena i imigranta na Twitter', 'ca': 'INF-HatEval a SemEval-2019 Task 5: Convolutional Neural Networks for Hate Speech Detection Against Women and Immigrants on Twitter', 'cs': 'Úkol 5: Convoluční neuronové sítě pro detekci nenávistné řeči proti ženám a přistěhovalcům na Twitteru', 'et': 'INF-HatEval SemEval-2019 ülesanne 5: Naiste ja sisserändajate vihakõne tuvastamiseks Twitteris', 'fi': 'INF-HatEval SemEval-2019 Task 5: Konvolutionaaliset hermoverkot vihapuheen havaitsemiseksi naisia ja maahanmuuttajia vastaan Twitterissä', 'sk': 'INF-HatEval na SemEval-2019 Naloga 5: Konvolucijske nevralne mreže za odkrivanje sovražnega govora proti ženskam in priseljencem na Twitterju', 'ha': 'INF-Hateval at SemEV-2019 Tafiyar 5: Congolous Neural Networks for Hate Speak Discection Agare Woman and Imrants on Twitter', 'he': 'INF-HatEval ב SemEval-2019 משימה 5: רשתות נוירוליות משתנות לגלות נאום שנאה נגד נשים ומגירים בטוויטר', 'bo': 'INF-HatEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Convolutional Neural Networks for Hate Speech Detection Against Women and Immigrants on Twitter', 'jv': 'INF'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we describe our approach to detect hate speech against women and immigrants on Twitter in a multilingual context, English and Spanish. This challenge was proposed by the SemEval-2019 Task 5, where participants should develop models for hate speech detection, a two-class classification where systems have to predict whether a tweet in English or in Spanish with a given target (women or immigrants) is hateful or not hateful (Task A), and whether the hate speech is directed at a specific person or a group of individuals (Task B). For this, we implemented a Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) using pre-trained word embeddings (GloVe and FastText) with 300 dimensions. Our proposed model obtained in Task A 0.488 and 0.696 F1-score for English and Spanish, respectively. For Task B, the CNN obtained 0.297 and 0.430 EMR for English and Spanish, respectively.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نصف نهجنا للكشف عن خطاب الكراهية ضد النساء والمهاجرين على تويتر في سياق متعدد اللغات ، الإنجليزية والإسبانية. تم اقتراح هذا التحدي من قبل SemEval-2019 Task 5 ، حيث يجب على المشاركين تطوير نماذج للكشف عن الكلام الذي يحض على الكراهية ، وهو تصنيف من فئتين حيث يتعين على الأنظمة التنبؤ بما إذا كانت تغريدة باللغة الإنجليزية أو الإسبانية مع هدف معين (نساء أو مهاجرون) الكراهية أم لا الكراهية (المهمة أ) ، وما إذا كان خطاب الكراهية موجهًا إلى شخص معين أو مجموعة من الأفراد (المهمة ب). لهذا ، قمنا بتنفيذ شبكات عصبية تلافيفية (CNN) باستخدام زخارف كلمة مدربة مسبقًا (GloVe و FastText) بأبعاد 300. تم الحصول على نموذجنا المقترح في المهمة أ 0.488 و 0.696 درجة F1 للغة الإنجليزية والإسبانية ، على التوالي. بالنسبة للمهمة B ، حصلت CNN على 0.297 و 0.430 EMR للغة الإنجليزية والإسبانية ، على التوالي.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, descrevemos nossa abordagem para detectar discursos de ódio contra mulheres e imigrantes no Twitter em um contexto multilíngue, inglês e espanhol. Este desafio foi proposto pela Tarefa 5 do SemEval-2019, onde os participantes devem desenvolver modelos para detecção de discurso de ódio, uma classificação de duas classes onde os sistemas têm que prever se um tweet em inglês ou em espanhol com um determinado alvo (mulheres ou imigrantes) é odioso ou não odioso (Tarefa A), e se o discurso de ódio é dirigido a uma pessoa específica ou a um grupo de indivíduos (Tarefa B). Para isso, implementamos uma Rede Neural Convolucional (CNN) utilizando word embeddings pré-treinados (GloVe e FastText) com 300 dimensões. Nosso modelo proposto obteve na Tarefa A 0,488 e 0,696 F1-score para inglês e espanhol, respectivamente. Para a Tarefa B, a CNN obteve 0,297 e 0,430 EMR para inglês e espanhol, respectivamente.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous décrivons notre approche pour détecter les discours haineux contre les femmes et les immigrants sur Twitter dans un contexte multilingue, en anglais et en espagnol. Ce défi a été proposé par la tâche 5 SEMEVAL-2019, dans laquelle les participants devraient développer des modèles de détection des discours haineux, une classification en deux classes dans laquelle les systèmes doivent prédire si un tweet en anglais ou en espagnol avec une cible donnée (femmes ou immigrés) est haineux ou non (tâche A), et si le discours haineux est dirigé contre une personne ou un groupe d'individus en particulier (tâche B). Pour cela, nous avons mis en place un réseau de neurones convolutifs (CNN) utilisant des intégrations de mots pré-entraînées (Glove et FastText) avec 300 dimensions. Notre modèle proposé a obtenu dans la tâche A 0,488 et 0,696 score F1 pour l'anglais et l'espagnol, respectivement. Pour la tâche B, le CNN a obtenu 0,297 et 0,430 EMR pour l'anglais et l'espagnol, respectivement.", 'es': 'En este artículo, describimos nuestro enfoque para detectar el discurso de odio contra las mujeres y los inmigrantes en Twitter en un contexto multilingüe, inglés y español. Este desafío fue propuesto por la Tarea 5 de SemEval-2019, donde los participantes deben desarrollar modelos para la detección del discurso de odio, una clasificación de dos clases en la que los sistemas tienen que predecir si un tuit en inglés o en español con un objetivo determinado (mujeres o inmigrantes) es odioso o no odioso (Tarea A), y si el discurso de odio está dirigido a una persona específica o a un grupo de personas (Tarea B). Para ello, implementamos una Red Neural Convolucional (CNN) utilizando incrustaciones de palabras previamente entrenadas (GloVe y FastText) con 300 dimensiones. Nuestro modelo propuesto obtuvo en la Tarea A una puntuación F1 de 0.488 y 0.696 para inglés y español, respectivamente. Para la Tarea B, la CNN obtuvo 0.297 y 0.430 EMR para inglés y español, respectivamente.', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम एक बहुभाषी संदर्भ, अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश में ट्विटर पर महिलाओं और आप्रवासियों के खिलाफ नफरत भरे भाषण का पता लगाने के लिए हमारे दृष्टिकोण का वर्णन करते हैं। इस चुनौती को SemEval-2019 टास्क 5 द्वारा प्रस्तावित किया गया था, जहां प्रतिभागियों को हेट स्पीच डिटेक्शन के लिए मॉडल विकसित करना चाहिए, एक दो-वर्ग वर्गीकरण जहां सिस्टम को यह अनुमान लगाना होता है कि अंग्रेजी में या स्पेनिश में किसी दिए गए लक्ष्य (महिलाओं या आप्रवासियों) के साथ एक ट्वीट घृणित है या घृणित नहीं है (टास्क ए), और क्या नफरत भाषण एक विशिष्ट व्यक्ति या व्यक्तियों के समूह (टास्क बी) पर निर्देशित है। इसके लिए, हमने 300 आयामों के साथ पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेडिंग (GloVe और FastText) का उपयोग करके एक Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) को लागू किया। हमारे प्रस्तावित मॉडल कार्य ए 0.488 और 0.696 F1-क्रमशः अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश के लिए स्कोर में प्राप्त किया। टास्क बी के लिए, सीएनएन ने क्रमशः अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश के लिए 0.297 और 0.430 ईएमआर प्राप्त किया।', 'ja': 'この論文では、英語とスペイン語を含む多言語の文脈で、Twitter上の女性や移民に対するヘイトスピーチを検出するためのアプローチについて説明します。この課題は、SemEval -2019タスク5によって提案された。参加者は、ヘイトスピーチ検出のためのモデルを開発すべきである。この2クラスの分類では、システムは、特定のターゲット（女性または移民）を含む英語またはスペイン語のツイートがヘイトであるか否かを予測しなければならない（タスクA ）。また、ヘイトスピーチが特定の個人または個人のグループに向けられているかどうかを予測する必要がある（タスクB ）。このため、300次元の事前にトレーニングされた単語埋め込み（ GloVeとFastText ）を使用して、畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ CNN ）を実装しました。提案されたモデルは、英語とスペイン語のタスクA 0.488および0.696 F 1スコアで取得されました。タスクＢについては、ＣＮＮは英語及びスペイン語でそれぞれ０ ． ２ ９ ７及び０ ． ４ ３ ０ ＥＭＲを取得した。', 'zh': '本文中,述在多言背景下(英语与西班牙语)检Twitter上针女性移民之仇言。 此挑战由SemEval-2019务5发,参与者宜开怨检模,此二类也,统必占给定(女性移民)之英语或西班牙语推文仇(任A),及仇言特定私伍(任B)。 为此得卷积神经网络(CNN),以预训之词嵌(GloVeFastText),有300维度。 臣等所陈模范A得英语、西班牙语为0.488、0.696 F1分数。 其于任B,CNN得英语、西班牙语之0.297、0.430 EMR。', 'ru': 'В этом документе мы описываем наш подход к выявлению ненавистнических высказываний в отношении женщин и иммигрантов в Twitter в многоязычном контексте, на английском и испанском языках. Эта задача была предложена в Задаче 5 SemEval-2019, где участники должны разработать модели для обнаружения ненавистнических высказываний, двухклассную классификацию, где системы должны предсказывать, является ли твит на английском или испанском языке с заданной целью (женщины или иммигранты) ненавистническим или нет (Задача A), и направлена ли ненавистническая речь на конкретного человека или группу лиц (Задача B). Для этого мы реализовали сверточные нейронные сети (CNN) с использованием предварительно обученных вложений слов (GloVe и FastText) с 300 измерениями. Наша предлагаемая модель получена в Задании A 0.488 и 0.696 F1-балл для английского и испанского языков, соответственно. Что касается задачи В, то CNN получила 0,297 и 0,430 EMR соответственно для английского и испанского языков.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid cur síos ar ár gcur chuige maidir le fuathchaint i gcoinne ban agus inimircigh a bhrath ar Twitter i gcomhthéacs ilteangach, Béarla agus Spáinnis. Moladh an dúshlán seo le Tasc 5 SemEval-2019, áit ar cheart do rannpháirtithe samhlacha a fhorbairt do bhrath fuathchaint, aicmiú dhá aicme ina gcaithfidh córais a thuar cé acu an bhfuil tweet i mBéarla nó i Spáinnis le sprioc ar leith (mná nó inimircigh). fuathmhar nó nach bhfuil fuathmhar (Tasc A), agus cibé an bhfuil an fuathchaint dírithe ar dhuine ar leith nó ar ghrúpa daoine aonair (Tasc B). Chuige seo, chuireamar Líonraí Néaracha Comhdhlúite (CNN) i bhfeidhm ag úsáid leabaithe focal réamhoilte (GloVe agus FastText) le 300 toise. Fuair ár múnla molta i dTasc A 0.488 agus 0.696-scór F1 don Bhéarla agus don Spáinnis, faoi seach. Maidir le Tasc B, fuair an CNN 0.297 agus 0.430 EMR don Bhéarla agus don Spáinnis, faoi seach.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban ismertetjük a nők és bevándorlók elleni gyűlöletbeszéd felismerésére irányuló megközelítésünket Twitteren többnyelvű kontextusban, angolul és spanyolul. Ezt a kihívást a SemEval-2019 5. feladat javasolta, ahol a résztvevőknek modelleket kell kidolgozniuk a gyűlöletbeszéd felismerésére, egy két osztályos osztályozást, ahol a rendszereknek meg kell jósolniuk, hogy egy adott célponttal (nők vagy bevándorlók) angol vagy spanyol nyelvű tweet utálatos-e vagy sem (A feladat), és hogy a gyűlöletbeszéd egy adott személyre vagy egyének csoportjára irányul-e (B feladat). Ehhez egy előre képzett szóbeágyazásokkal (GloVe és FastText) rendelkező Convolucional Neural Networks (CNN) megvalósítottunk 300 dimenzióval. A javasolt modellünk az A feladat 0,488 és 0,696 F1 pontszám angol és spanyol nyelven kapott. A B feladat esetében a CNN 0,297, illetve 0,430 EMR-t kapott angolul és spanyolul.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, περιγράφουμε την προσέγγισή μας για την ανίχνευση ρητορικών μίσους κατά γυναικών και μεταναστών στο Twitter σε ένα πολύγλωσσο πλαίσιο, αγγλικά και ισπανικά. Αυτή η πρόκληση προτάθηκε από την εργασία 5, όπου οι συμμετέχοντες θα πρέπει να αναπτύξουν μοντέλα ανίχνευσης ρητορικής μίσους, μια ταξινόμηση δύο τάξεων όπου τα συστήματα πρέπει να προβλέψουν εάν ένα tweet στα αγγλικά ή στα ισπανικά με δεδομένο στόχο (γυναίκες ή μετανάστες) είναι μίσος ή όχι μίσος (εργασία Α), και αν η ομιλία μίσους απευθύνεται σε ένα συγκεκριμένο άτομο ή μια ομάδα ατόμων (εργασία Β). Για το σκοπό αυτό εφαρμόσαμε ένα Νευρικό Δίκτυο (ΚΝΝ) χρησιμοποιώντας προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις λέξεων (GloVe και FastText) με διαστάσεις 300. Το πρότεινό μας μοντέλο αποκτήθηκε στην εργασία Α 0.488 και 0.696 F1-βαθμολογία για Αγγλικά και Ισπανικά αντίστοιχα. Για την εργασία Β, το CNN έλαβε 0.297 και 0.430 EMR για τα αγγλικά και τα ισπανικά αντίστοιχα.', 'ka': 'ამ კონტექტში ჩვენ განახსენებთ ჩვენი წარმოდგენა, რომელიც მრავალენგური კონტექსტში, ანგლისური და სპანელი ქალთან და იმიგრანტების განმავლობაში. SemEval-2019 დავალების 5-ის გამოსახულება იყო, სადაც მონახულებელი უნდა განვითარება მოდელების გამოსახულება, ორკლასის კლასიფიკაცია, სადაც სისტემები უნდა განვითარება თუ არა ინგლისურად ან სპანელად განვითარებული მიზეზი (ქალები ან იმიგრანტები) ცნობიერებელია ან არა ცნობი ამისთვის, ჩვენ კონტუალური ნეიროლური ქსელები (CNN) გამოყენებთ 300 განზომილებებით საკუთარი სიტყვები (Glove and FastText) გამოყენებული. ჩვენი მოწყობინებული მოდელი, რომელიც მიღებულია საქმე A 0.488 და 0.696 F1-score ანგლისური და სპანელი. B დავალებისთვის CNN მიიღეთ 0.297 და 0.430 EMR ანგლისური და სპანელი.', 'it': "In questo articolo, descriviamo il nostro approccio per rilevare i discorsi d'odio contro donne e immigrati su Twitter in un contesto multilingue, inglese e spagnolo. Questa sfida è stata proposta dal SemEval-2019 Task 5, dove i partecipanti dovrebbero sviluppare modelli per la rilevazione del discorso di odio, una classificazione in due classi in cui i sistemi devono prevedere se un tweet in inglese o in spagnolo con un determinato target (donne o immigrati) è odioso o meno (Task A), e se il discorso di odio è rivolto a una persona specifica o a un gruppo di individui (Task B). Per questo, abbiamo implementato una Rete Neurale Convoluzionale (CNN) utilizzando incorporazioni di parole pre-addestrate (GloVe e FastText) con 300 dimensioni. Il nostro modello proposto è stato ottenuto nel Task A 0.488 e 0.696 F1-score rispettivamente per inglese e spagnolo. Per il Task B, la CNN ha ottenuto 0,297 e 0,430 EMR rispettivamente per l'inglese e lo spagnolo.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз Твиттердегі әйелдер мен иммигранттерге қарсы сөйлесуді көптілік тілдерде, ағылшын және испан тілдерінде анықтау арқылымызды таңдаймыз. Бұл мәселе 5- жарым Eval- 2019 тапсырмасы бойынша ұсынылды, қатысушылар сөйлесу үшін үлгілерін жасау керек, жүйелер ағылшын тілінде не испандықта келтірілген мақсатты (әйелдер не иммигранттер) тәртіпсіздікті немесе қарапайды (A тапсырмасы) деген үлгілерін жасау керек, жүй Бұл үшін біз 300 өлшемдерді қолдануға арналған сөздерді (Glove және FastText) қолданатын Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) жасадық. Біздің тапсырма A, 488 және 0, 696 F1- нүктесі ағылшын және испан тілінде алған үлгі. B тапсырмасы үшін CNN 0, 297 және 0, 430 EMR арқылы ағылшын және испан тілінде алды.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdiname savo požiūrį į neapykantos kalbą prieš moteris ir imigrantus Twitter daugiakalbėje aplinkoje, anglų ir ispanų kalboje. This challenge was proposed by the SemEval-2019 Task 5, where participants should develop models for hate speech detection, a two-class classification where systems have to predict whether a tweet in English or in Spanish with a given target (women or immigrants) is hateful or not hateful (Task A), and whether the hate speech is directed at a specific person or a group of individuals (Task B).  Šiuo tikslu sukūrėme konvoliucinius nervinius tinklus (CNN), naudojant iš anksto parengtus žodžių įdėjimus (GloVe ir FastText) su 300 matmenų. Mūsų siūlomas modelis gautas atitinkamai A užduotyje 0,488 ir 0,696 F1 taškų anglų ir ispanų kalbomis. B užduoties atveju CNN gavo atitinkamai 0,297 ir 0,430 EMR anglų ir ispanų kalbomis.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник го опишуваме нашиот пристап за детектирање на говорот на омраза против жените и имигрантите на Твитер во мултијазичен контекст, англиски и шпански. Овој предизвик беше предложен од SemEval-2019 задачата 5, каде учесниците треба да развиваат модели за детекција на говорот на омраза, двокласна класификација каде системите мора да предвидат дали твитот на англиски или шпански со одредена цел (жени или имигранти) е омразен или не (задача А), и дали говорот на омраза е насочен кон специфична личност или група индивидуалци ( За ова, спроведовме конволуционални неврални мрежи (CNN) користејќи преобучени зборови вградени (GloVe и FastText) со 300 димензии. Нашиот предложен модел доби во задачата А 0,488 и 0,696 F1-оценки за англиски и шпански, односно. За задачата Б, СНН доби 0,297 и 0,430 ЕМР за англиски и шпански.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, niddeskrivu l-approċċ tagħna biex jinstabu diskors ta’ mibegħda kontra n-nisa u l-immigranti fuq Twitter f’kuntest multilingwi, bl-Ingliż u bl-Ispanjol. Din l-isfida ġiet proposta mis-SemEval-2019 Task 5, fejn il-parteċipanti għandhom jiżviluppaw mudelli għad-detezzjoni tad-diskors tal-mibegħda, klassifikazzjoni ta’ żewġ klassijiet fejn is-sistemi jridu jipprevedu jekk tweet bl-Ingliż jew bl-Ispanjol b’mira partikolari (nisa jew immigranti) huwiex mibegħda jew le (Task A), u jekk id-diskors tal-mibegħda huwiex dirett lejn persuna speċifika jew grupp ta’ individwi (Task B). Għal dan, implimentajna Netwerks Newrali Konveoluzzjonali (CNN) bl-użu ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet bil-kliem imħarrġa minn qabel (GloVe u FastText) b’300 dimensjoni. Il-mudell propost tagħna miksub fil-Punteġġ A 0.488 u 0.696 F1 għall-Ingliż u l-Ispanjol, rispettivament. For Task B, the CNN obtained 0.297 and 0.430 EMR for English and Spanish, respectively.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan pendekatan kami untuk mengesan ucapan kebencian terhadap wanita dan imigran di Twitter dalam konteks berbilang bahasa, Bahasa Inggeris dan Sepanyol. Tandakan ini diusulkan oleh SemEval-2019 Task 5, di mana peserta patut mengembangkan model untuk pengesan ucapan benci, klasifikasi dua kelas di mana sistem perlu meramalkan sama ada tweet dalam bahasa Inggeris atau Sepanyol dengan sasaran tertentu (wanita atau imigran) adalah benci atau tidak benci (Task A), dan sama ada ucapan benci ditujukan kepada orang tertentu atau kumpulan individu (Task B). Untuk ini, kami melaksanakan Rangkaian Neural Konveolutional (CNN) menggunakan penyembedding perkataan terlatih-terlatih (GloVe dan FastText) dengan 300 dimensi. Model kami diusulkan mendapat dalam Tugas A 0.488 dan 0.696 F1-skor untuk bahasa Inggeris dan Sepanyol, berdasarkan. Untuk Tugas B, CNN mendapat 0.297 dan 0.430 EMR untuk bahasa Inggeris dan Sepanyol, respectively.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, സ്ത്രീകള്\u200dക്കും അഗസ്ഥികള്\u200dക്കും വിരോധമായി വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരം കണ്ടെത്താനുള്ള നമ്മുടെ പ്രായോഗ്യം വിവരിച ഈ ചോദ്യം സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2019 ടാസ്ക് 5-ല്\u200d നിന്ന് പങ്കാളികള്\u200d വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരിക്കാന്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കേണ്ടതുണ്ടായിരുന്നു. ഒരു രണ്ട് ക്ലാസ്സില്\u200d പങ്കാളികള്\u200d വെറുപ്പുണ്ടാക്കേണ്ടതുണ്ട്. കൊടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ലക ഇതിനുവേണ്ടി മുമ്പ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200d (ഗ്ലോവെയും ഫാസ്റ്റ് ടെക്സ്റ്റ്) ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d നാം പ് ഞങ്ങളുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട model A 0. 488, 0. 696 F1-സ്കോര്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഇംഗ്ലീഷും സ്പാനിഷും ലഭിച്ചു. ടാസ്ക് ബിന് വേണ്ടി, സിഎന്\u200d എം. എം. എം. എം. എം. എം. എം. എല്ലാം ഇംഗ്ലീഷും സ്പാനിഷും കിട്ടി.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisujemy nasze podejście do wykrywania mowy nienawiści wobec kobiet i imigrantów na Twitterze w kontekście wielojęzycznym, angielskim i hiszpańskim. Wyzwanie to zostało zaproponowane przez SemEval-2019 Task 5, w którym uczestnicy powinni opracować modele wykrywania mowy nienawiści, klasyfikację dwuklasową, w której systemy muszą przewidywać, czy tweet w języku angielskim czy hiszpańskim z danym celem (kobiety lub imigranci) jest nienawiściwy czy nie (Zadanie A) oraz czy mowa nienawiści skierowana jest do konkretnej osoby lub grupy osób (Zadanie B). W tym celu wdrożyliśmy Konwolucyjne Sieci Neuralne (CNN) z wykorzystaniem wstępnie przeszkolonych osadzeń słów (GloVe i FastText) o 300 wymiarach. Nasz proponowany model uzyskał odpowiednio w zadaniu A 0.488 i 0.696 F1-score dla angielskiego i hiszpańskiego. W przypadku zadania B CNN uzyskał odpowiednio 0.297 i 0.430 EMR dla angielskiego i hiszpańskiego.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, descriem abordarea noastră de detectare a discursului de ură împotriva femeilor și imigranților pe Twitter într-un context multilingv, engleză și spaniolă. Această provocare a fost propusă de SemEval-2019 Task 5, unde participanții ar trebui să dezvolte modele de detectare a discursului la ură, o clasificare de două clase în care sistemele trebuie să prezică dacă un tweet în limba engleză sau în limba spaniolă cu o anumită țintă (femei sau imigranți) este urât sau nu (Task A), și dacă discursul la ură este direcționat către o anumită persoană sau un grup de indivizi (Task B). Pentru aceasta, am implementat o Rețea Neurală Convoluțională (CNN) folosind încorporări de cuvinte pre-instruite (GloVe și FastText) cu 300 de dimensiuni. Modelul nostru propus a obținut în Task A 0.488 și 0.696 F1-scor pentru engleză și respectiv spaniolă. Pentru sarcina B, CNN a obținut 0,297 și 0,430 EMR pentru limba engleză și, respectiv, spaniolă.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид Твиттерийн эмэгтэйчүүдийн, хөдөлгүүдийн эсрэг үзэн ядуурлын яриаг олон хэлний тухай, Англи болон Испанийг тодорхойлох аргыг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ сорилтыг SemEval-2019 Task 5-ын санал болгосон бөгөөд оролцогчдын үзэн ядах илтгэлийн шинжлэх ухааны загваруудыг хөгжүүлэх хэрэгтэй бөгөөд системүүд англи, эсвэл испан хэл хэлэлцээтэй (эмэгтэйчүүд, хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжли Үүний тулд бид 300 хэмжээсүүд болгон сургалтын хэмжээсүүд (Glove and FastText) ашиглаж Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) хийсэн. Бидний санал өгсөн загвар нь Task A 0.488, 0.696 B-ийн ажил дээр CNN нь 0.297 болон 0.430 EMR авсан юм.', 'no': 'I denne papiret beskriver vi tilnærminga vårt for å finna hatspråk mot kvinner og imigrantar på Twitter i ein fleirspråk kontekst, engelsk og spansk. Dette utfordringen vart foreslått av oppgåva 5 av semiEval-2019, der deltakarane bør utvikla modeller for å oppdaga hatespråk, ei to klassesklassesklassifikasjon der systemet må foreslå om eit tweet på engelsk eller spansk med eit gitt mål (kvinner eller imigrantar) er hattig eller ikkje hattig (oppgåve A), og om hatespråket er direktert på ein spesifikk person eller ei gruppe individuer (oppgåve B). For dette implementerte vi ein konvolusjonell neiralnettverk (CNN) med føretrainerte ordinnbygging (Glove and FastText) med 300 dimensjonar. Vårt foreslått modell er henta i oppgåve A 0,488 og 0,696 F1-poeng for engelsk og spansk. For oppgåve B fikk CNN 0,297 og 0,430 EMR for engelsk og spansk.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා ගැහැණියෝ සහ ගැහැණියෝ ගැහැණියෝ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ කතාවක් හොයාගන්න බැ This challenge is preached by the semeval-2019 Job 5, where partipartipartipartints should develop Model for Hate Talk Detection, a Two-Class classification where systems have to forecast if a tweet in English or in spanya with a data Targe මේකට, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන සාමාන්\u200dය න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලවාර්ක්ස් (CNN) එක්ක අපේ ප්\u200dරාර්ථනා කරපු මොඩේල් එක 0.488 සහ 0.696 F1-ප්\u200dරාර්ථනාවක් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ස්පැනිස් වලින් ප්\u200dරාර්ථනාවක්  B වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන්, CNN ට 0.297 සහ 0.430 EMR ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ස්පැනිස් වෙනුවෙන්.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qoraynaa hababkayaga si aan u ogaano hadalka nacaybka ah ee dumarka iyo dadka dalka u soo guuray ee Twitterka ku qoran xarumo luuqado kala duduwan, Ingiriis iyo Isbanish. Shaqooyinkan waxaa laga soo jeeday Shaqada 5 ee SemEval-2019, meesha ay dadka ka qayb galay u horumariyaan modelal ku saabsan baaritaanka hadalka nebcaalka ah, fasalka labaad oo ay ku qoran yihiin in nidaamka ay sii sheegto in uu Twitteet ku qoran Ingiriis ama Isbanish ku yaalo waxyaabo la qoray (dumar ama dadka dalka u soo guuray) uu neceb yahay iyo in aan la nebcaan (shaqo A), iyo in hadalka nacaylka la hago qof gaar ah ama koox qof gaar ah (shaqo B). Taas darteed, waxaynu sameynay shabakadda Neural Neural (CNN) oo lagu isticmaalayo hadal horay loo tababaray (GloVe iyo FastText) oo lagu qoray 300 dimensions. Tusaale horay loo soo jeeday oo loo soo qabtay shaqo A 0.488 iyo 0.696 F1-score loogu talagalay Ingiriis iyo Isbanish. Shaqo B waxaa loogu talagalay CNN si walba u helay 0.297 iyo 0.430 EMR Ingiriis iyo Isbanish.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats beskriver vi vårt sätt att upptäcka hatpropaganda mot kvinnor och invandrare på Twitter i ett flerspråkigt sammanhang, engelska och spanska. Denna utmaning föreslogs av SemEval-2019 Task 5, där deltagarna bör utveckla modeller för hattalsdetektering, en tvåklassklassificering där system måste förutsäga om en tweet på engelska eller spanska med ett visst mål (kvinnor eller invandrare) är hatiskt eller inte hatiskt (Task A), och om hattalet riktar sig mot en specifik person eller en grupp individer (Task B). För detta implementerade vi ett Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) med hjälp av förklädda ord inbäddningar (GloVe och FastText) med 300 dimensioner. Vår föreslagna modell erhålls i uppgift A 0,488 och 0,696 F1-poäng för engelska respektive spanska. För uppgift B erhöll CNN 0,297 respektive 0,430 EMR för engelska respektive spanska.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo naš pristup otkrivanju govora mržnje protiv žena i imigranta na Twitter u multijezičkom kontekstu, engleskom i španjolskom. Ovaj izazov je predložen od strane 5. zadatka iz polovice 2019. godine, gde bi sudionici trebali razviti modele za otkrivanje govora mržnje, klasifikaciju dvoklase gde sistemi moraju predvidjeti da li je tweet na engleskom ili na španjolskom jeziku sa određenom ciljem (žene ili imigranti) mržna ili ne mržna (zadatak A), i da li je govor mržnje usmjeren na određenu osobu ili grupu pojedinaca (zadatak B). Za to smo implementirali konvolucionalne neuronske mreže (CNN), koristeći predobučene reèi integracije (Glove i FastText) sa 300 dimenzija. Naš predloženi model dobijen na zadatku A 0,488 i 0,696 F1-rezultat za engleski i španjolski. Za zadatak B, CNN je dobio 0,297 i 0,430 EMR za engleski i španjolski.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பெண்கள் மற்றும் குடியாடிகளுக்கு எதிரான வெறுப்பு பேச்சை கண்டுபிடிக்க எங்கள் வழியை விவரிக்கிற SemEval-2019 பணி 5 ஆல் இந்த சவால் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்டது, அங்கு பங்காளிகள் வெறுப்பு பேச்சு கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான மாதிரிகளை உருவாக்க வேண்டும், ஒரு இரண்டு வகுப்பு வகுப்பு, அமைப்புகள் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட இங்கிலத்தில் ஒரு twitter அல்லது ஸ்பா இதுக்கு, நாங்கள் முன் பயிற்சி சொல்லின் உள்ளடக்கங்கள் (GloVe மற்றும் வேகமான உரை) பயன்படுத்தி ஒரு தொகுதியான நெயுரல் வலைப்பின்னலை செயல்பட இந்த பணியில் 0. 488 மற்றும் 0. 696 F1- புள்ளிகளை ஆங்கிலத்துக்கும் ஸ்பானிஷுக்கும் திட்டமான மாதிரி பெற்றது. செயல் B க்கு, CNN மற்றும் ஸ்பானிஷ் க்கு 0. 297 மற்றும் 0. 430 EMR கிடைத்தது.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم نے اپنے طریقے کو توئیٹر پر عورتوں اور مهاجروں کے خلاف نفرت کی بات پڑھنے کے لئے توئیٹر میں بہت سی زبان کے متعلق، انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی میں بیان کیا ہے۔ اس چال کو نصف-2019 ٹاکس ۵ کی پیشنهاد کی گئی ہے جہاں شرکت کرنے والوں کو نفرت کی بات شناسایی کے لئے موڈل ڈالنا چاہیے، ایک دو کلاس کلاس کا کلاسپی ڈالنا چاہیے جہاں سیسٹم کو پیشنهاد کرنا چاہیے کہ انگلیسی میں یا اسپانیایی میں ٹویٹ کا ذریعہ (عورتوں یا مهاجروں) ناپسند ہے یا ناپسند نہیں ہے (ٹاکس A) اور کیا ناپسند کی بات ایک شخص یا ایک گر اس کے لئے ہم نے 300 اندازے کے ساتھ پیش آموزش کی کلمات ابڈینگ (Glove and FastText) کے مطابق ایک سراسر نئورل نیٹورک (CNN) کو استعمال کیا۔ ہماری پیشنهاد کی موڈل جو تاسک A 0.488 اور 0.696 F1-score میں ملی ہے انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی کے لئے۔ ٹاکس ب کے لئے سین نے 0.297 اور 0.430 ایم پایا انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی کے لئے۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz Twitterda ayollar va муҳожирларнинг нафсларини кўриб чиқиш учун қизиқни билдирамиз, bir nechta tilda, ingliz tili va ispancha tilida. Bu muammolar SemEval-2019 Vazifa 5 (SemEval-2019 Vazifa) bilan ishlatiladi. Bu muammolar yolg'on tilni aniqlash modellarini yaratish kerak, ikkita darajada, bu muammolar bir xil tilida Twittitterni yoki Ispanchadan foydalanishini anglatishi kerak emas va ishni yolg'on emas (Vazifa A) bilan foydalanishi foydalanishi mumkin yoki bir qanchalik bir guruh (Vazifa B) bilan ishlatilishi kerak. Bu uchun biz 300 daraja bilan o'rgangan so'zlar (GloVe va FastText) yordamida (CNN) tarmoq tarmoqni bajardik. Ish vazifani 0.488 va 0.696 F1 scorida topilgan modelmiz ingliz va Ispanchaga ega. Vazifalar B uchun CNN har xil va Ispanchaga 0.297 va 0.430 EMR qabul qildi.", 'vi': 'Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi mô tả phương pháp phát hiện tiếng nói căm ghét phụ nữ và nhập cư trên Twitter trong một ngữ cảnh đa dạng, Anh và Tây Ban Nha. Thử thách này được đề xuất bởi Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-2009, nơi những người tham gia phát triển các mô hình để phát hiện ngôn ngữ ghét bỏ, một phân loại hai lớp mà hệ thống phải dự đoán nếu một dòng tweet bằng tiếng Anh hay tiếng Tây Ban Nha với một mục tiêu cụ thể (phụ nữ hay nhập) chứa đầy hận thù (Task A) và liệu bài diễn văn thù ghét được hướng tới một người cụ thể hay một nhóm cá nhân (Task B). Với điều này, chúng tôi đã thực hiện một mạng lưới thần kinh có liên kết (CNN) sử dụng những từ được huấn luyện trước (GloVe và FastbText) với giá 300. Mẫu thử của chúng tôi được tìm thấy trong Task A 0.488 và 0.696 F1-điểm cho tiếng Anh và Tây Ban Nha. Đối với Nhiệm vụ B, CNN lấy được 0.297 và 0.430 EMR dành cho tiếng Anh và tiếng Tây Ban Nha.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия описваме нашия подход за откриване на речта на омразата срещу жени и имигранти в многоезичен контекст, английски и испански. Това предизвикателство беше предложено от Задача 5, където участниците трябва да разработят модели за откриване на речта на омразата, двукласна класификация, при която системите трябва да предвидят дали туитът на английски или на испански с определена цел (жени или имигранти) е омразен или не (Задача А), и дали речта на омразата е насочена към конкретен човек или група индивиди (Задача Б). За целта внедрихме конволюционни неврални мрежи (ЦНН), използвайки предварително обучени словесни вграждания (ГлoВе и ФастТекст) с 300 измерения. Нашият предложен модел е получен в задача А 0,488 и 0,696 Формула-резултат съответно за английски и испански. За задача Б CNN получи съответно 0,297 и 0,430 ЕМР за английски и испански.', 'da': 'I denne artikel beskriver vi vores tilgang til at opdage hadefulde tale mod kvinder og indvandrere på Twitter i en flersproget kontekst, engelsk og spansk. Denne udfordring blev foreslået af SemEval-2019 Task 5, hvor deltagerne bør udvikle modeller til hadefuld tale detektion, en to-klasses klassifikation, hvor systemer skal forudsige, om en tweet på engelsk eller spansk med et givet mål (kvinder eller indvandrere) er hadefuld eller ej (Task A), og om hadefuld tale er rettet mod en bestemt person eller en gruppe af individer (Task B). Til dette har vi implementeret et Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) ved hjælp af præ-trænede ord embeddings (GloVe og FastText) med 300 dimensioner. Vores foreslåede model opnået i opgave A 0,488 og 0,696 F1-score for henholdsvis engelsk og spansk. For opgave B opnåede CNN 0,297 og 0,430 EMR for henholdsvis engelsk og spansk.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel beschrijven we onze aanpak om hate speech tegen vrouwen en immigranten op Twitter te detecteren in een meertalige context, Engels en Spaans. Deze uitdaging werd voorgesteld door de SemEval-2019 Taak 5, waar deelnemers modellen moeten ontwikkelen voor haatspraakdetectie, een tweeklassenclassificatie waarbij systemen moeten voorspellen of een tweet in het Engels of in het Spaans met een bepaald doel (vrouwen of immigranten) haatdragend of niet haatdragend is (Taak A), en of de haatspraak gericht is op een specifieke persoon of een groep individuen (Taak B). Hiervoor hebben we een Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) geïmplementeerd met behulp van vooraf getrainde woord embeddings (GloVe en FastText) met 300 dimensies. Ons voorgestelde model verkregen in Task A 0.488 en 0.696 F1-score voor respectievelijk Engels en Spaans. Voor taak B behaalde het CNN respectievelijk 0.297 en 0.430 EMR voor Engels en Spaans.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo svoj pristup otkrivanju govora mržnje protiv žena i imigranta na Twitter u multijezičkom kontekstu, engleskom i španjolskom. Ovaj izazov je predložio zadatak 5. iz poluvremenog razdoblja 2019, gdje bi učesnici trebali razviti modele za otkrivanje govora mržnje, klasifikaciju dvoklase gdje sustavi moraju predvidjeti da li je tweet na engleskom ili na španjolskom jeziku s određenom ciljem (žene ili imigranti) mržna ili ne mržna (zadatak A), i da li je govor mržnje usmjeren na određenu osobu ili skupu pojedinaca (zadatak B). Za to smo proveli konvolucionalne neuronske mreže (CNN) koristeći predobučene riječi ugrađene (Glove i FastText) s 300 dimenzija. Naš predloženi model dobijen u zadatku A 0,488 i 0,696 F1-rezultat za engleski i španjolski. Za zadatak B, CNN je dobio 0,297 i 0,430 EMR za engleski i španjolski.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir unseren Ansatz zur Erkennung von Hassreden gegen Frauen und Migranten auf Twitter in einem mehrsprachigen Kontext, Englisch und Spanisch. Diese Herausforderung wurde von der SemEval-2019 Task 5 vorgeschlagen, in der die Teilnehmer Modelle zur Erkennung von Hassreden entwickeln sollten, eine Zwei-Klassen-Klassifizierung, bei der Systeme vorhersagen müssen, ob ein Tweet auf Englisch oder auf Spanisch mit einem bestimmten Ziel (Frauen oder Immigranten) hasserfüllt oder nicht hasserfüllt ist (Task A), und ob die Hassrede sich an eine bestimmte Person oder eine Gruppe von Einzelpersonen richtet (Task B). Dazu haben wir ein Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) mit vorgetrainierten Worteinbettungen (GloVe und FastText) mit 300-Dimensionen implementiert. Unser vorgeschlagenes Modell wurde in Task A 0.488 und 0.696 F1-Score für Englisch bzw. Spanisch erhalten. Für Aufgabe B erhielt die CNN 0.297 und 0.430 EMR für Englisch bzw. Spanisch.', 'id': 'Dalam koran ini, kami menggambarkan pendekatan kami untuk mendeteksi pidato kebencian terhadap wanita dan imigran di Twitter dalam konteks berbagai bahasa, Inggris dan Spanyol. This challenge was proposed by the SemEval-2019 Task 5, where participants should develop models for hate speech detection, a two-class classification where systems have to predict whether a tweet in English or in Spanish with a given target (women or immigrants) is hateful or not hateful (Task A), and whether the hate speech is directed at a specific person or a group of individuals (Task B).  Untuk ini, kami mengimplementasikan Networks Neural Konvelusional (CNN) menggunakan penerbangan kata yang terlatih-terlatih (GloVe dan FastText) dengan 300 dimensi. Model yang diusulkan kami diperoleh dalam Task A 0.488 dan 0.696 F1-skor untuk bahasa Inggris dan Spanyol, secara sesuai. Untuk Tugas B, CNN mendapatkan 0,297 dan 0,430 EMR untuk Bahasa Inggris dan Spanyol, respectively.', 'ko': '본고에서는 영어와 스페인어의 다국어 환경에서 트위터에서 여성과 이민자에 대한 증오 발언을 검출하는 방법을 묘사했다.이 도전은SemEval-2019퀘스트5에서 제기한 것으로 참가자들은 증오언론검측모델을 개발해야 한다. 이것은 2급 분류로 시스템은 영어나 스페인어의 트위터와 목표(여성 또는 이민자)가 증오(퀘스트 a)인지, 그리고 증오언론이 특정한 사람 또는 한 무리(퀘스트 B)를 대상으로 하는지 예측해야 한다.이를 위해 우리는 미리 훈련된 300차원 단어 삽입(장갑과 빠른 텍스트)을 사용해 권적신경망(CNN)을 실현했다.우리가 제시한 모델은 임무에서 영어와 스페인어의 F1 점수를 각각 0.488과 0.696으로 얻었다.임무 B의 경우 CNN의 영어와 스페인어의 EMR이 각각 0.297, 0.430이었다.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما روش خود را برای تشخیص سخنرانی از نفرت در برابر زنان و مهاجران توئیتر در یک محیط زیادی زبان، انگلیسی و اسپانیایی توصیف می کنیم. این چالش توسط Task 5 نیم Eval-2019 پیشنهاد شد، جایی که شرکتگران باید مدلهای برای شناسایی سخنرانی متنفر توسعه کنند، یک کلاس دو کلاس که سیستم ها باید پیش بینی کنند که آیا تویت به انگلیسی یا اسپانیایی با هدف داده شده (زنان یا مهاجران) متنفر است یا متنفر نیست (Task A) و آیا سخنرانی متنفر به یک شخص خاص یا گروه فردی (Task B) هدف داده می\u200cشود برای این، ما یک شبکه عصبی (CNN) را با استفاده از ابتدایی کلمه پیش آموزش (Glove and FastText) با ۳۰۰ بعدی انجام دادیم. مدل پیشنهاد ما در تابع A 0.488 و 0.696 نمونه F1 برای انگلیسی و اسپانیایی دریافت شد. برای وظیفه B، سین\u200cان\u200cان به طور مختلف 0.297 و 0.430 ایم\u200cر برای انگلیسی و اسپانیایی دریافت شد.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunaelezea namna yetu ya kutambua hotuba ya chuki dhidi ya wanawake na wahamiaji kwenye mtandao wa Twita katika muktadha wa lugha mbalimbali, Kiingereza na Kihispania. Changamoto hili lilipendekezwa na Task 5 la SemEval-2019, ambapo washiriki wanapaswa kutengeneza modeli kwa ajili ya kutambua hotuba ya chuki, darasa mbili ambapo mifumo inapaswa kutabiri kama twiti ya Kiingereza au Kihispania yenye lengo lililotolewa (wanawake au wahamiaji) ni chuki au sio chuki (Kazi A), na kama hotuba ya chuki inaongozwa kwa mtu fulani au kundi la watu binafsi (Kazi B). Kwa hili, tulitekeleza mtandao wa Neural Neural (CNN) kwa kutumia ujumbe wa maneno yaliyofunzwa kabla (GloVe na FastText) kwa upande 300. Mfano wetu wa pendekezo ulipatikana kwenye kazi A 0.488 na 0.696 F1 kwa ajili ya Kiingereza na Kihispania. Kwa kazi B, CNN ilipata 0.297 na 0.430 EMR kwa ajili ya Kiingereza na Kihispania.', 'af': "In hierdie papier beskrywe ons toegang om haat spraak teen vroue en imigrante op Twitter te beskrywe in 'n veelvuldige konteks, Engels en Spaanse. Hierdie uitdrukking is voorgestel deur die SemEval-2019 taak 5, waar deelnaders moet model vir haat spraak beskrywing ontwikkeld word, 'n twee klassifikasie waar stelsels moet voorskou of 'n tweet in Engels of in Spaanse met 'n gegewe doel (vroue of immigrante) haat of nie haat is (Taak A), en of die haat spraak op 'n spesifieke persoon of 'n groep individuele (Taak B) voorgestel word. Vir hierdie het ons 'n Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerke (CNN) geïmplementeer deur te gebruik voor-onderwerp woord inbettings (Glove en FastText) met 300 dimensies. Ons voorgestelde model in Opdrag A 0. 488 en 0. 696 F1- telling vir Engels en Spaanse, respectively. Vir taak B, het die CNN 0.297 en 0.430 EMR ontvang vir Engels en Spaanse.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz Twitter-da a ýallar we imigrantler bilen ýigrenç sözlerini tapmak üçin gurnalarymyzy bir multi dilli kontekstda, iňlisçe we ispanyýaly hasaplaýarlar. Bu kynçylyk SemEval-2019 Görevi 5-nji tarapyndan tassyklandyryldy. Şahsy wagtlar ýigrenýän çykyş tanyşmak üçin nusgala düzenlemeli bolýar, ýöne iki synp klasifikasy bilen sistemalaryň beýleki maksady bilen tweet edilýän ýa-da iňlisçe (a ýallar ýa-da imigrantler) ýigrenýän ýa-da ýigrenýän däldir. Bu üçin 300 ölçü bilen öňünde eğlenen söz integrasyny (Glove we FastText) ulanan bir şekilde çevirildik. Biziň teklip eden nusgasymyz Taýýasy A 0.488 we 0.696 F1-score bilen iňlisçe we ispanyýaly bolan. CNN görevi B üçin 0.297 we 0.430 EMR bar.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne përshkruajmë qasjen tonë për të zbuluar fjalimin e urrejtjes kundër grave dhe emigrantëve në Twitter në një kontekst shumëgjuhës, anglisht dhe spanjoll. This challenge was proposed by the SemEval-2019 Task 5, where participants should develop models for hate speech detection, a two-class classification where systems have to predict whether a tweet in English or in Spanish with a given target (women or immigrants) is hateful or not hateful (Task A), and whether the hate speech is directed at a specific person or a group of individuals (Task B).  Për këtë, ne zbatuam një rrjet nervor konvolutiv (CNN) duke përdorur përmbajtje të paratrajnuara fjalësh (GloVe dhe FastText) me 300 dimensione. Modeli ynë i propozuar përfundoi respektivisht në Task A 0.488 dhe 0.696 F1-score për anglisht dhe spanjoll. Për detyrën B, CNN mori respektivisht 0.297 dhe 0.430 EMR për anglisht dhe spanjoll.', 'am': 'በዚህ ጽሑፍ ላይ በሁለት ቋንቋ፣ እንግሊዘኛ እና ስፓኒሽ ቋንቋ እና በተዊተር ላይ የጥላቻን ንግግር ለማግኘት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ይህ ጥላቻ የሴmEval-2019 ስራ 5 ተቃዋሚዎች ለጥላቻ ንግግር ማግኘት ዓይነቶችን መዘርጋት የሚገባቸው፣ የፖለቲካዎች ትዊተር በንግግሊዝኛ ወይም በስፓኒሽ ቋንቋ (ሴት ወይም ስደተኞች) የተጠሉ ወይም የተጠሉ መሆኑን እና ጥላቻ ንግግር በተጠቃሚ ሰው ወይም የጉዳዩ ጉዳይ (ስራ B) እንዲገልጽ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ለዚህ ምክንያት፣ ቀድሞ የተጠቃሚ ቃላት (GloVe እና FastText) በመጠቀም የኮንፕሎጂል ኔural Network (CNN) አካሄድን ነበር፡፡ በስራ A.488 እና 0.696 F1-score ለኢንጂልስፓኒሽ እና ለስፓኒሽ ደረጃዎች የተገኘን ሞዴል አግኝቷል፡፡ ለስራ B CNN ለኢንጂልስፓኒሽ እና ለስፓኒሽ አግኝቷል 0.297 እና 0.430 EMR አግኝቷል።', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նկարագրում ենք մեր մոտեցումը, որպեսզի հայտնաբերենք ատելության խոսքը կանանց և միգրանտների դեմ Թվիթերում բազմալեզու կոնտեքստում, անգլերեն և իսպաներեն: Այս մարտահրավերը առաջարկել է ՍեմԵվալ 2019-ի 5-ի գործընթացը, որտեղ մասնակիցները պետք է զարգացնեն ատելության խոսքի հայտնաբերման մոդելներ, երկու դասակարգման, որտեղ համակարգերը պետք է կանխատեսեն, թե անգլերենով կամ իսպաներենով թվիթը որոշակի նպատակով (կանայք կամ միգրանտներ) ատելություն է, թե ոչ (A-ի գործընթացը), և թե ատելության խո For this, we implemented a Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) using pre-trained word embeddings (GloVe and FastText) with 300 dimensions.  Մեր առաջարկած մոդելը ստացվել է Ա-հանձնարարում 0.488 և 0.696 F1-գնահատականներով անգլերենի և իսպաներենի համար: Բ-ի հանձնարարության համար CNN-ը ստացավ 0,29 7 և 0,430 ԷՄՌ անգլերենի և իսպաներենի համար:', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo svoj pristup otkrivanju govora mržnje protiv žena i imigranta na Twitter u multijezičkom kontekstu, engleskom i španjolskom. Ovaj izazov je predložio zadatak 5. iz pola Evala-2019, gdje bi učesnici trebali razviti modele za otkrivanje govora mržnje, klasifikaciju dvoklase gdje sistemi moraju predvidjeti da li je tweet na engleskom ili na španjolskom jeziku s određenom ciljem (žene ili imigranti) mržna ili ne mržna (zadatak A), i da li je govor mržnje usmjeren na određenu osobu ili skupu pojedinaca (zadatak B). Za to smo implementirali konvolucionalne neuronske mreže (CNN) koristeći predobučene riječi ugrađenje (Glove i FastText) sa 300 dimenzija. Naš predloženi model dobijen na zadatku A 0,488 i 0,696 F1-rezultat za engleski i španjolski. Za zadatak B, CNN je dobio 0,297 i 0,430 EMR za engleski i španjolski.', 'az': "Bu kağıtda, biz Twitter'da qadınlar və imigrantlər barəsində nifrət sözlərini çoxlu dil, İngilizce və İspanyolca danışmaq üçün tərzimizi təsdiqləyirik. Bu dövləti 5. Gözəl təbliğ etdi, iştirakçilər nifrət sözlərini keşfetmək üçün modelləri düzəltməlidirlər. Sistemlərin müəyyən edilməsi üçün İngilizce və İspanyolca təbliğ edilmiş məqsəd olan tweet nifrət etməli və nifrət etməli və nifrət sözlərinin müəyyən bir kişiyə və ya bir qrupa (Task B) təbliğ etməlidirlər. Buna görə biz 300 ölçülərlə əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş sözləri (Glove and FastText) ilə Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) uyguladıq. Bizim qurduğumuz modellərimiz Özümüzdə İngiliz və İspanyol üçün 0.488 və 0.696 F1-score alındı. B işi üçün CNN İngilizce və İspanyolca üçün 0.297 və 0.430 EMR aldı.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায়, আমরা টুইটারে নারী এবং অভিবাসীদের বিরুদ্ধে ঘৃণা ভাষণ সনাক্ত করতে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ বর্ণনা করি বহুভাষায়, ইংরেজি এবং  এই চ্যালেঞ্জের প্রস্তাব ছিল সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের ৫, যেখানে অংশগ্রহণকারীদের ঘৃণা ভাষণের জন্য মডেল তৈরি করা উচিত, একটি দুই-ক্লাসের বিভাগ যেখানে ব্যবস্থা ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করা উচিত যে টুইট ই বা স্প্যানিশ ভাষায় একটি নি For this, we implemented a Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) using pre-trained word embeddings (GloVe and FastText) with 300 dimensions.  আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল অনুযায়ী ইংরেজি এবং স্প্যানিশের জন্য টাস্ক A. 488 এবং 0. 696 F1-স্কোরে পাওয়া যায়। টাস্ক বির জন্য সিএনএন অনুযায়ী ইংরেজি এবং স্প্যানিশের জন্য ০. 297 এবং 0. 430 এমআর পেয়েছে।', 'ca': "In this paper, we describe our approach to detect hate speech against women and immigrants on Twitter in a multilingual context, English and Spanish.  Aquest repte va ser proposat per la tasca 5 SemEval-2019, on els participants haurien de desenvolupar models de detecció del discurs d'odi, una classificació de dos classes on els sistemes han de predir si un tweet en anglès o espanyol amb un objectiu determinat (dones o immigrants) és odiós o no (tasca A), i si el discurs d'odi és dirigit a una persona específica o a un grup d'individus (tasca B). Per això vam implementar unes xarxes neurals de conversió (CNN) utilitzant integracions de paraules pré-entrenades (GloVe i FastText) de 300 dimensions. El nostre model proposat va obtenir en Task A 0,488 i 0,696 puntuacions F1 per anglès i espanyol, respectivament. Per a la tasca B, el CNN va obtenir 0,297 EMR per anglès i 0,430 EMR per espanyol, respectivament.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku popisujeme náš přístup k detekci nenávistných projevů vůči ženám a imigrantům na Twitteru v mnohojazyčném kontextu, angličtině a španělštině. Tuto výzvu navrhl SemEval-2019 Task 5, kde by účastníci měli vyvinout modely pro detekci nenávistné řeči, dvoutřídní klasifikaci, kde systémy musí předpovídat, zda je tweet v angličtině nebo ve španělštině s daným cílem (ženy nebo imigranti) nenávistný nebo nenávistný (Úkol A) a zda nenávistná řeč směřuje na konkrétní osobu nebo skupinu jednotlivců (Úkol B). Za tímto účelem jsme implementovali konveluční neuronové sítě (CNN) pomocí předškolených slovních vložení (GloVe a FastText) s 300 rozměry. Náš navržený model získal v úkolu A 0.488 a 0.696 F1-skóre pro angličtinu a španělštinu. Pro úkol B ČNB získala 0.297 a 0.430 EMR pro angličtinu a španělštinu.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldame oma lähenemisviisi naiste ja sisserändajate vastu suunatud vihakõne tuvastamiseks Twitteris mitmekeelses kontekstis, inglise ja hispaania keeles. Selle väljakutse pakkus välja SemEval-2019 ülesanne 5, kus osalejad peaksid välja töötama vihakõne tuvastamise mudelid, kaheklassiline klassifikatsioon, kus süsteemid peavad prognoosima, kas teatud sihtmärgiga (naised või sisserändajad) inglise või hispaania keelne säuts on vihkav või mitte (ülesanne A) ja kas vihkavõne on suunatud konkreetsele isikule või üksikisikute rühmale (ülesanne B). Selleks rakendasime konvolutsioonilisi neurovõrgustikke (CNN), kasutades 300 mõõtmetega eelnevalt väljaõpetatud sõna manustamist (GloVe ja FastText). Meie pakutud mudel sai ülesandes A vastavalt 0,488 ja 0,696 F1-skoori inglise ja hispaania keeles. Ülesande B puhul sai CNN inglise ja hispaania keeles vastavalt 0,297 EMR ja 0,430 EMR.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvailemme lähestymistapaamme havaita vihapuhetta naisiin ja maahanmuuttajiin Twitterissä monikielisessä kontekstissa, englanniksi ja espanjaksi. Tätä haastetta ehdotti SemEval-2019 Task 5, jossa osallistujien tulisi kehittää vihapuheen havaitsemiseen malleja, kaksiluokkainen luokitus, jossa järjestelmien on ennustettava, onko englanninkielinen tai espanjankielinen tweet tietyllä kohteella (naiset tai maahanmuuttajat) vihamielinen vai ei (Task A), ja onko vihapuhe suunnattu tietylle henkilölle tai ryhmälle yksilöitä (Task B). Tätä varten toteutimme konvolutional neural networks (CNN) käyttäen ennalta koulutettuja sanaupotuksia (GloVe ja FastText) 300 ulottuvuudella. Ehdotettu malli sai tehtävän A 0,488 ja 0,696 F1-pisteen englanniksi ja espanjaksi. Tehtävässä B CNN sai 0,297 EMR englanniksi ja 0,430 EMR espanjaksi.', 'sk': 'V prispevku opisujemo naš pristop k odkrivanju sovražnega govora nad ženskami in priseljenci na Twitterju v večjezičnem kontekstu, angleščini in španščini. Ta izziv je predlagala naloga 5 SemEval-2019, v kateri bi morali udeleženci razviti modele za odkrivanje sovražnega govora, dvorazredno klasifikacijo, v kateri morajo sistemi napovedati, ali je tvit v angleščini ali španščini z določenim ciljem (ženske ali priseljenci) sovražen ali ne (naloga A) in ali je sovražni govor usmerjen na določeno osebo ali skupino posameznikov (naloga B). V ta namen smo izvedli konvolucijsko nevronsko omrežje (CNN) z uporabo vnaprej usposobljenih besednih vdelav (GloVe in FastText) s 300 dimenzijami. Naš predlagani model je dobil v nalogi A 0,488 oziroma 0,696 F1-score za angleščino oziroma španščino. Za nalogo B je CNN dobila 0,297 EMR za angleščino oziroma 0,430 EMR za španščino.', 'jv': 'Nanging mapun iki, kéné rambarang nglanggar aturan awakdhéwé kanggo kebebasan langkung karo babagan karo bendhik karo in êng kuwi Tutuk ing sakjane kanggo langgar, Inggris karo Spanyola. Ombudhakan iki gunakake berarti podho kelas semi-2011 task 5, wong mesthine iso nggawe model kanggo kejahatan pangan kuwi kesempatan, kelas kuwi kelas telas telas telas nang sistem sing arep kuwi nggunakake kapan kuwi tuwit kanggo kelas (barêng-barêng) sing berarti kaya susahé awak dhéwé (task A), kaya nguasai kejahatan dhéwé apa perusahaan granas (task B). Saiki iki, kita mulai un konvolution Neral Network (MT) nggunakake pertaman embedding (Global ve lan fast tText) karo 500 dimensi. Nalika sing paling-paling nggawe barang nggo task A 0.488 lan 0.6 F1-puntuan kanggo ingkang karo Spanyola sawar. Terus task B, online sing luwih 0.247 lan 0.480 EMR kanggo Inggris lan Spanish, menehi.', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardan, Munã bayyana mataimakanmu dõmin mu gane magana ta ƙi a kan mãtã da muhãjirai da suka yi hijira a kan Twitter, a cikin muhimman mulki-harshe, Ingiriya da Isbanish. An buɗa wannan tsutarwa na Semeval-2019 Taimar 5, a inda mãsu shirin su ƙara misãlai wa kunnuwa na ƙi, wani daraja biyu wanda za'a yi shakka a cikinsa, ma'anar matsayin su ko kuma a cikin Isbanish ya zama mai ƙyãma ko kuma ba ya ƙi (Tafiyar A), kuma ko an shiryar da magana na ƙi zuwa wani mutum wanda aka ƙayyade shi ko jama'a guda na jama'a (Tafiyar B). @ info @ item Spelling dictionary @ item Spelling dictionary", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתארים את הגישה שלנו לגלות נאום שנאה נגד נשים ומגרים בטוויטר בקשר רב-שפוי, אנגלית וספרדית. האתגר הזה הציע על ידי משימה 5 SemEval-2019, שבו השתתפים צריכים לפתח דוגמנים לזהות נאום שנאה, מסווג של שתי מעמדות שבו מערכות צריכות לחזות אם טוויט באנגלית או בספרדית עם מטרה מסוימת (נשים או מהגרים) שונא או לא שונא (משימה A), ואם נאום השנאה מוביל על אדם מסוים או קבוצה של אנשים (משימה B). For this, we implemented a Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) using pre-trained word embeddings (GloVe and FastText) with 300 dimensions.  המודל המוצע שלנו השיג במשימה A 0.488 ו-0.696 F1 נקודות לאנגלית וספרדית, בהתאם. עבור משימה B, CNN השיג 0.297 ו-0.430 EMR לאנגלית ולספרדית, בהתאם.', 'bo': 'འུ་ཅག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་འདིས་བུད་མེད་ཅན་གྱི་ཕྱོགས་སྣང་བ་དང་། སྐད་ཡིག ཞུ་གཏོང་གི་དཀའ་གནད་དོན་འདི་SemEval-2019 Task 5་གིས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་སྐབས་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་དག་གི་མིག་རྣམས་གནང་འཐབ་རྣམས་ལས་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག་དགོས་པ་ཡིན། འདི་ལ་ངེད་ཚོས་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ནུས་མཐུན་གྱི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཞིག་འཇུག་བྱས་པ་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཐ་སྙད་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་བཙུགས་དུས ང་ཚོའི་གྲོས་འཆར་ཟིན་པའི་མ་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་ 0.488 དང་ 0.696 F1-score གཟུགས་ཐད་ཡིན། བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་ཡིན་པ། CNN ནི་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཨིན་ཇིའི་དང་སུར་ཤེས་ཀྱི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'LT3 at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter (hatEval)', 'fr': 'LT3 au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 5\xa0: Détection multilingue des discours de haine contre les immigrés et les femmes sur Twitter (HaTeval)', 'pt': 'LT3 na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 5: Detecção multilíngue de discurso de ódio contra imigrantes e mulheres no Twitter (hatEval)', 'ar': 'LT3 في SemEval-2019 المهمة 5: اكتشاف متعدد اللغات لخطاب الكراهية ضد المهاجرين والنساء في تويتر (hatEval)', 'es': 'LT3 en SemEval-2019 Tarea 5: Detección multilingüe del discurso de odio contra inmigrantes y mujeres en Twitter (HaTeval)', 'ja': 'LT 3 at SemEval -2019 Task 5: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech against Immigrants and Women in Twitter (hatEval)', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 टास्क 5 पर LT3: ट्विटर में आप्रवासियों और महिलाओं के खिलाफ हेट स्पीच का बहुभाषी पता लगाना (hatEval)', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019务5者LT3:多言检Twitter移民女子之仇言(hatEval)', 'ru': 'LT3 на SemEval-2019 Задача 5: Многоязычное обнаружение ненавистнических высказываний против иммигрантов и женщин в Twitter (hatEval)', 'ga': 'LT3 ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 5: Brath Ilteangach ar Fuathchaint i gCoinne Inimircigh agus Mná ar Twitter (hatEval)', 'ka': 'LT3 SemEval-2019 სამუშაო დავალება 5: მრავალენგური განსახულება სამუშაო სიტყვების განსახულება ინმიგრანტების და ქალების განსახულება Twitter-ში (hatEval)', 'hu': 'LT3 a SemEval-2019 5. feladat: A bevándorlók és nők elleni gyűlöletbeszéd többnyelvű felismerése Twitteren (hatEval)', 'el': 'Καθήκον 5: Πολυγλωσσική ανίχνευση ρητορικής μίσους κατά μεταναστών και γυναικών στο Twitter (hatEval)', 'it': 'LT3 a SemEval-2019 Task 5: Rilevazione multilingue del discorso di odio contro immigrati e donne su Twitter (hatEval)', 'kk': 'LT3 жалпы-2019 тапсырмасы 5: Твиттердегі иммигранттер және әйелдер қарсы көптілік тілдерді анықтау (hatEval)', 'lt': 'LT3 puslapyje 2019 m. 5 užduotis: Nekenčių kalbos prieš imigrantus ir moteris daugiakalbis aptikimas Twitter (hatEval)', 'mk': 'ЛТ3 на SemEval-2019 задача 5: Мултијазично откривање на говорот на омраза против имигрантите и жените на Твитер (hatEval)', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ജോലിയിലെ എല്\u200dടി3: അഭയാസികള്\u200dക്കും സ്ത്രീകള്\u200dക്കും വിരോധമായി വെറുപ്പുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും വെറുപ്പുള്ള പല', 'mt': 'LT3 f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 5: Sejbien Multilingwi ta’ diskors ta’ mibegħda kontra l-immigranti u n-nisa fuq Twitter (hatEval)', 'ms': 'LT3 di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Pengesanan berbilang bahasa Ucapan kebencian terhadap Imigrant dan Wanita dalam Twitter (HatEval)', 'mn': 'LT3 at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter (hatEval)', 'pl': 'LT3 na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 5: Wielojęzyczne wykrywanie mowy nienawiści wobec imigrantów i kobiet na Twitterze (hatEval)', 'sr': 'LT3 na semiEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (hatEval)', 'no': 'LT3 på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 5: Multispråk oppdaging av hatspråk mot imigrantar og kvinner i Twitter (hatEval)', 'si': 'LT3 at semeval-2019 Job 5: Multilanguage Detection of Hate Talk vs. Immediants and Female in Twitter (hateval)', 'so': 'LT3 at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Gariirka luqadaha badan ee hat hadal Against dadka dalka u soo guuray iyo dumarka Twitterka (hatal)', 'sv': 'LT3 på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 5: Flerspråkig upptäckt av hattal mot invandrare och kvinnor på Twitter (hatEval)', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணியில் LT3: குடியாளர்கள் மற்றும் பெண்களுக்கு எதிரான வெறுப்பு பேச்சின் பல மொழி கண்டுபிடிப்பு', 'ur': 'LT3 ٹویٹر میں مہاجرین اور عورتوں کے مقابلہ میں بہت سی زبان کی تلاش ہے۔', 'ro': 'LT3 la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 5: Detectarea multilingvă a discursului de ură împotriva imigranților și femeilor pe Twitter (hatEval)', 'uz': "5. SemEval-2019 vazifa LT3: Twitterda Muhammadlar va ayollar (hatal) haqida ko'p tilni aniqlash", 'vi': 'L3 tại Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-2009 5: phát hiện ngôn ngữ nhiều lời nói về thù ghét con người nhập cư và phụ nữ trên Twitter.', 'bg': 'Задача 5: Многоезично откриване на реч на омразата срещу имигранти и жени в Туитър', 'nl': 'LT3 op SemEval-2019 Taak 5: Meertalige detectie van haatspraak tegen immigranten en vrouwen in Twitter (hatEval)', 'hr': 'LT3 na semiEval-2019 zadatak 5: Multilingual Detection of hate speech against Immigrants and Women in Twitter (hatEval)', 'ko': 'LT3 Sem Eval-2019 퀘스트 5: 다국어 트위터에서 이민과 여성에 대한 증오 발언(hat Eval)', 'da': 'LT3 på SemEval-2019 Opgave 5: Flersproget opdagelse af hadtale mod indvandrere og kvinder på Twitter (hatEval)', 'id': 'LT3 di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Deteksi Multilingual of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women on Twitter (HatEval)', 'de': 'LT3 bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 5: Mehrsprachige Erkennung von Hassreden gegen Einwanderer und Frauen in Twitter (hatEval)', 'sw': 'LT3 katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 5: Uthibitisho wa lugha nyingi wa Hotuba ya Hati dhidi ya Wahamiaji na Wanawake kwenye mtandao wa Twita (hata)', 'tr': 'LT3 at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter (hatEval)', 'af': 'LT3 by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 5: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter (hatEval)', 'sq': 'LT3 në SemEval-2019 Task 5: Gjetja shumëgjuhëse e fjalëve të urrejtjes kundër imigrantëve dhe grave në Twitter (hatEval)', 'fa': 'LT3 در پایین اول-۲۰۱۹ کار ۵: شناسایی سخنرانی متنفر به مهاجران و زنان توئیتر (hatEval)', 'am': 'LT3 በሴmEval-2019 ስራ 5: በተዊተር ስደተኞች እና ሴቶችን ላይ የጥል ንግግር ላይ በብዙ ቋንቋ ማውጣት (hatal)', 'hy': 'LT3-ը 2019 թվականի կիսագնդի 5-րդ հանձնարարության ժամանակ. Թվիթերում հայտնաբերում է անգամ անգամ անգամ և կանանց դիմաց ատելության բացահայտումը', 'az': 'LT3 at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter (hatEval)', 'bn': 'এলটি৩ সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের ৫: টুইটারে অভিবাসী এবং নারীদের বিরুদ্ধে ঘৃণার বিরুদ্ধে মাল্টিভাষায় ঘৃণা ভাষণের সনাক্তি', 'ca': 'LT3 a SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women on Twitter (HatEval)', 'bs': 'LT3 na semiEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Detection of hate speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter (hatEval)', 'cs': 'LT3 na SemEval-2019 Úkol 5: Vícejazyčná detekce nenávistné řeči proti přistěhovalcům a ženám na Twitteru (hatEval)', 'fi': 'LT3 SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 5: Maahanmuuttajien ja naisten vihapuheen monikielinen havaitseminen Twitterissä (hatEval)', 'et': 'LT3 SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 5: Sisserändajate ja naiste vihakõne mitmekeelne avastamine Twitteris (hatEval)', 'jv': 'LT3 nang seminval-2011 task 5: Multilanguage detection', 'ha': 'LT3 at SemEl-2019 Tafiyar 5: Multura Finishment of Hate Spelling against Imrants and mãtã in Twitter (hatal)', 'sk': 'LT3 na SemEval-2019 Naloga 5: Večjezično odkrivanje sovražnega govora proti priseljencem in ženskam v Twitterju (hatEval)', 'he': 'LT3 ב-SemEval-2019 משימה 5: חשיפה רבת-שפתית של נאום שנאה נגד המגירים ונשים בטוויטר (HatEval)', 'bo': 'LT3 at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter (hatEval)'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our contribution to the SemEval-2019 Task 5 on the detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (hatEval). We considered a supervised classification-based approach to detect hate speech in English tweets, which combines a variety of standard lexical and syntactic features with specific features for capturing offensive language. Our experimental results show good classification performance on the training data, but a considerable drop in recall on the held-out test set.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة مساهمتنا في SemEval-2019 Task 5 حول الكشف عن خطاب الكراهية ضد المهاجرين والنساء في تويتر (hatEval). اعتبرنا نهجًا قائمًا على التصنيف خاضعًا للإشراف للكشف عن الكلام الذي يحض على الكراهية في التغريدات الإنجليزية ، والذي يجمع بين مجموعة متنوعة من الميزات المعجمية والنحوية القياسية مع ميزات محددة لالتقاط اللغة الهجومية. تُظهر نتائجنا التجريبية أداءً جيدًا في التصنيف على بيانات التدريب ، ولكن انخفاضًا كبيرًا في الاستدعاء في مجموعة الاختبار التي تم تعليقها.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre contribution à la tâche 5 de SEMEVAL-2019 sur la détection des discours de haine contre les immigrés et les femmes sur Twitter (HaTeval). Nous avons envisagé une approche supervisée basée sur la classification pour détecter les discours haineux dans les tweets en anglais, qui combine une variété de caractéristiques lexicales et syntaxiques standard avec des fonctionnalités spécifiques pour capturer le langage offensant. Nos résultats expérimentaux montrent de bonnes performances de classification sur les données d'entraînement, mais une baisse considérable du rappel sur l'ensemble de tests en attente.", 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestra contribución a la Tarea 5 de SemEval-2019 sobre la detección del discurso de odio contra los inmigrantes y las mujeres en Twitter (HaTeval). Consideramos un enfoque supervisado basado en la clasificación para detectar el discurso de odio en los tuits en inglés, que combina una variedad de características léxicas y sintácticas estándar con funciones específicas para capturar el lenguaje ofensivo. Nuestros resultados experimentales muestran un buen rendimiento de clasificación en los datos de entrenamiento, pero una disminución considerable en la recuperación del conjunto de pruebas realizadas.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nossa contribuição para a Tarefa 5 do SemEval-2019 sobre a detecção de discurso de ódio contra imigrantes e mulheres no Twitter (hatEval). Consideramos uma abordagem baseada em classificação supervisionada para detectar discurso de ódio em tweets em inglês, que combina uma variedade de recursos lexicais e sintáticos padrão com recursos específicos para capturar linguagem ofensiva. Nossos resultados experimentais mostram um bom desempenho de classificação nos dados de treinamento, mas uma queda considerável no recall no conjunto de teste mantido.', 'ja': '本稿では、Twitter （ hatEval ）における移民や女性に対するヘイトスピーチの検出に関するSemEval -2019タスク5への貢献について説明します。私たちは、英語のツイートでヘイトスピーチを検出するための監視された分類ベースのアプローチを検討しました。これは、さまざまな標準的な語彙的および構文的特徴と、攻撃的な言語をキャプチャするための特定の特徴を組み合わせています。当社の実験結果は、トレーニングデータに良好な分類性能を示していますが、ホールドアウト試験セットのリコールはかなり減少しています。', 'zh': '本文述SemEval-2019职5献,其任5及Twitter(hatEval)中检核移民女性之仇言。 臣等思督分类之法以检英语推文中之仇言,其法将诸格词汇与句法特徵与获犯性语言特定功能相合。 臣等实验结果显示,训练数有善类,但存试集者召率大幅降。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर ट्विटर (hatEval) में आप्रवासियों और महिलाओं के खिलाफ नफरत भरे भाषण का पता लगाने पर SemEval-2019 टास्क 5 में हमारे योगदान का वर्णन करता है। हमने अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स में नफरत भरे भाषण का पता लगाने के लिए एक पर्यवेक्षित वर्गीकरण-आधारित दृष्टिकोण पर विचार किया, जो आक्रामक भाषा पर कब्जा करने के लिए विशिष्ट विशेषताओं के साथ विभिन्न मानक लेक्सिकल और वाक्यात्मक सुविधाओं को जोड़ता है। हमारे प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम प्रशिक्षण डेटा पर अच्छा वर्गीकरण प्रदर्शन दिखाते हैं, लेकिन आयोजित-आउट परीक्षण सेट पर याद में काफी गिरावट आई है।', 'ru': 'В этом документе описывается наш вклад в задачу 5 SemEval-2019 по выявлению ненавистнических высказываний против иммигрантов и женщин в Twitter (hatEval). Мы рассмотрели контролируемый классификационный подход к обнаружению ненавистнических высказываний в английских твитах, который сочетает в себе множество стандартных лексических и синтаксических особенностей со специфическими особенностями для захвата оскорбительного языка. Наши экспериментальные результаты показывают хорошую классификационную эффективность на данных обучения, но значительное снижение отзыва на удерживаемом тестовом наборе.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an méid a chuireamar le Tasc 5 SemEval-2019 maidir le fuathchaint in aghaidh inimirceach agus ban a bhrath ar Twitter (hatEval). Rinneamar machnamh ar chur chuige aicmiú-bhunaithe maoirsithe chun fuathchaint a bhrath i dtvuíteanna Béarla, a chomhcheanglaíonn éagsúlacht de ghnéithe caighdeánacha foclóireachta agus comhréire le gnéithe sainiúla chun teanga maslach a ghabháil. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí turgnamhacha dea-fheidhmíocht aicmithe ar na sonraí oiliúna, ach titim shuntasach san aisghairm ar an tsraith tástála a coinníodh amach.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει τη συμβολή μας στο έργο SemEval-2019 5 για την ανίχνευση ρητορικής μίσους κατά μεταναστών και γυναικών στο Twitter (hatEval). Εξετάσαμε μια εποπτική προσέγγιση βασισμένη στην ταξινόμηση για τον εντοπισμό της ομιλίας μίσους στα αγγλικά tweets, η οποία συνδυάζει μια ποικιλία τυπικών λεξικών και συντακτικών χαρακτηριστικών με συγκεκριμένα χαρακτηριστικά για την καταγραφή προσβλητικής γλώσσας. Τα πειραματικά μας αποτελέσματα δείχνουν καλή απόδοση ταξινόμησης στα δεδομένα προπόνησης, αλλά σημαντική μείωση της ανάκλησης στο δοκιμαστικό σετ.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი ჩვენი დამატება SemEval-2019 დავალების 5-ზე განახსნა მპატის საუკუმენტის საუკუმენტის საუკუმენტის და ქალებს Twitter-ში (hatEval). ჩვენ ვფიქრობდით სტანდარტული კლასიფიკაციის დაბათებული პროგრამა, რომელიც ინგლისური ტივიტებში წარმოადგენს წარმოადგენისთვის, რომელიც სტანდარტული ლექსიკალური და სინტაქტიური ფუნ ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები კარგი კლასიფიკაციის კონფიკაციაცია მონაცემებზე, მაგრამ მნიშვნელოვანი წარმოდგენა შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემ', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2019 5. feladathoz való hozzájárulásunkat a bevándorlók és nők elleni gyűlöletbeszéd felismeréséről Twitteren (hatEval). Felügyelt osztályozáson alapuló megközelítést vettünk figyelembe a gyűlöletbeszéd felismerésére angol tweetekben, amely a különböző szabványos lexikai és szintaktikus funkciókat ötvözi a sértő nyelv rögzítésére szolgáló speciális funkciókkal. Kísérleti eredményeink jó osztályozási teljesítményt mutatnak az edzési adatok alapján, de jelentős visszahívást mutatnak a kitartott tesztkészleten.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il nostro contributo al SemEval-2019 Task 5 sulla rilevazione di discorsi di odio contro immigrati e donne su Twitter (hatEval). Abbiamo considerato un approccio supervisionato basato sulla classificazione per rilevare il discorso d'odio nei tweet inglesi, che combina una varietà di funzionalità lessicali e sintattiche standard con caratteristiche specifiche per catturare il linguaggio offensivo. I nostri risultati sperimentali mostrano buone prestazioni di classificazione sui dati di allenamento, ma un notevole calo del richiamo sul set di test tenuto-out.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinamas mūsų indėlis į 2010 m. puslapio vertinimo 5 užduotį dėl neapykantos kalbos prieš imigrantus ir moteris nustatymo Twitter (hatEval). Mes svarstėme prižiūrėtą klasifikavimo metodą, skirtą neapykantos kalbos aptikimui anglų tweetuose, kuris derina įvairias standartines leksikines ir sintaktines savybes su konkrečiomis savybėmis, skirtomis užfiksuoti offensinę kalbą. Mūsų eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo gerus mokymo duomenų klasifikavimo rezultatus, tačiau gerokai sumažėjo atmetimas iš išlaikyto bandymo rinkinio.', 'mk': 'Овој документ го опишува нашиот придонес за Семевал 2019 задачата 5 за откривање на говорот на омраза против имигрантите и жените на Твитер (HatEval). Сметавме надгледуван пристап базиран на класификација за детектирање на говорот на омраза на англиски твитови, кој комбинира различни стандардни лексикални и синтактички карактеристики со специфични карактеристики за заземање на навреден јазик. Нашите експериментални резултати покажуваат добра класификација на податоците за обука, но значителен пад на сеќавањето на задржаниот тест сет.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің Твиттердегі иммигранттер мен әйелдерге (hatEval) қарсы жек сөйлейтінің тапсырмасының 5- шегіміне қатынасызды анықтайды. Біз ағылшын tweets тілінде қарсылық сөйлесуді табу үшін басқаруға негізделген классификациялық тәртібін ойладық. Бұл әртүрлі стандартты лексикалық және синтактикалық қасиеттерді қарсылық тілді Тәжірибелік нәтижелеріміз оқыту деректерінде жақсы классификациялық әрекеттерді көрсетеді, бірақ соңғы сынақтардың еске салуы үлкен.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan kontribusi kami ke SemEval-2019 Task 5 mengenai pengesan ucapan kebencian terhadap imigran dan wanita di Twitter (HatEval). Kami mempertimbangkan pendekatan berdasarkan klasifikasi yang diawasi untuk mengesan ucapan kebencian dalam tweet Inggeris, yang menggabungkan pelbagai ciri-ciri leksikal dan sintaktik piawai dengan ciri-ciri khusus untuk menangkap bahasa serangan. Our experimental results show good classification performance on the training data, but a considerable drop in recall on the held-out test set.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ പങ്ക് സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2019 ടാസ്ക് 5 ന്ന് വിവരിക്കുന്നു. കുടുംബങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വെറുപ്പുള്ള സംസാരം തിരിച്ചറ ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു നടപടിയാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിചാരിച്ചത നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഡേറ്റായി നല്ല ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷെ കൈകാ', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь бидний SemEval-2019-ийн 5 даалгаварын тухай Твиттерийн хөдөлгөөнүүд болон эмэгтэйчүүдийн (hatEval) эсрэг үзэн ядуурлын яриаг олж мэдэх талаар ярьдаг. Бид Англи хэл дээр үзэн ядах илтгэлийг олж мэдэхийн тулд удирдлагатай ангилалын төвөгтэй арга зам гэж үзсэн. Энэ нь олон стандарт лексик болон синтактикийн төвөгтэй зүйлсийг холбоотой. Бидний туршилтын үр дүнд сургалтын өгөгдлийн талаар сайн ангилалын үйл ажиллагааг харуулдаг. Гэхдээ туршилтын туршилтын талаар маш их дурсамж байна.', 'mt': 'This paper describes our contribution to the SemEval-2019 Task 5 on the detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (hatEval).  Ikkunsidrajna approċċ superviż ibbażat fuq il-klassifikazzjoni biex jinstabu diskors ta’ mibegħda fit-tweets Ingliżi, li jikkombina varjetà ta’ karatteristiċi lexiċi u sintetiċi standard ma’ karatteristiċi speċifiċi għall-qbid ta’ lingwa offensiva. Ir-riżultati sperimentali tagħna juru prestazzjoni tajba tal-klassifikazzjoni fuq id-dejta tat-taħriġ, iżda tnaqqis konsiderevoli fit-tfakkir fis-sett tat-test miżmum.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz wkład w zadanie SemEval-2019 5 dotyczące wykrywania mowy nienawiści wobec imigrantów i kobiet na Twitterze (hatEval). Rozważyliśmy podejście oparte na nadzorowanej klasyfikacji do wykrywania mowy nienawiści w angielskich tweetach, które łączy różnorodne standardowe funkcje leksykalne i składniowe ze specyficznymi funkcjami przechwytywania obraźliwego języka. Nasze wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują dobrą wydajność klasyfikacji danych treningowych, ale znaczny spadek odwoływania się do wytrzymanego zestawu testowego.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver vårt bidrag til semiEval-2019 oppgåva 5 om oppdaging av hatespråk mot imigrantar og kvinner i Twitter (hatEval). Vi har sett opp ein oversikt klassifikasjonsbasert tilnærming for å finna hatespråk i engelsk tweet, som kombinerer mange standardklassiske og syntaktiske funksjonar med spesifikke funksjonar for å henta offensiv språk. Eksperimentale resultatet våre viser godt klassifiseringsfunksjon på opplæringsdata, men ein betydelig nedgang i oppløysing på testsettet.', 'sr': 'Ovaj novinar opisuje naš doprinos zadatku 5 za semiEval-2019 o otkrivanju govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena u Twitter (hatEval). Smatrali smo nadzorni pristup klasifikaciji za otkrivanje govora mržnje na engleskim tweetima, koji kombinuje razne standardne leksičke i sintaktičke karakteristike sa specifičnim karakteristikama za uhvatanje ofanzivnog jezika. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju dobru klasifikaciju podataka o obuci, ali značajan pad sjećanja na određenom testu.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie contribuția noastră la SemEval-2019 Task 5 privind detectarea discursului de ură împotriva imigranților și femeilor pe Twitter (hatEval). Am luat în considerare o abordare supravegheată bazată pe clasificare pentru detectarea discursului la ură în tweeturile în limba engleză, care combină o varietate de caracteristici lexicale și sintactice standard cu caracteristici specifice pentru captarea limbajului ofensator. Rezultatele noastre experimentale arată performanțe bune de clasificare pe datele de antrenament, dar o scădere considerabilă a rechemarii pe setul de teste reținut.', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran ku saabsan ku saabsan aqoonsashada hadalka nacaybka ee dadka dalka u soo guuray iyo dumarka Twitterka (hatEval). Waxaannu ka fiirsannay qaab ku saabsan fasalka si loo soo ogaado hadalka nacaybka ee ku qoran afka Ingiriiska, kaas oo ku soo bandhigaa noocyo kala duduwan oo la xiriira qalabka caadiga ah ee leksikada iyo sintaktika ah oo ay leeyihiin tayooyin gaar ah oo ku saabsan luqada caafimaadka ah. Imtixaankayada waxaa lagu muujiyaa sameynta fasaxa wanaagsan ee ku saabsan macluumaadka waxbarashada, laakiin xasuusta lagu xusuusto marka lagu jiro sameynta imtixaanka lagu dhameeyey.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ සම්වේල්-2019 වැඩේ 5 ගැන විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විස්තර කරනවා තවුරුවන් සහ ගැහැණුවන්ගේ විරුද්ධ කතාව අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ට්වීට් වල විශේෂ කතාවක් හොයාගන්න බලාපොරොත්තු විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ සහ සංකේෂික විශේෂ ස අපේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණයේ හොඳ විශේෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්, ඒත් ප්\u200dරත', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt bidrag till SemEval-2019 Task 5 om detektering av hatpropaganda mot invandrare och kvinnor på Twitter (hatEval). Vi övervägde ett övervakat klassificeringsbaserat tillvägagångssätt för att upptäcka hatpropaganda i engelska tweets, som kombinerar en mängd vanliga lexikala och syntaktiska funktioner med specifika funktioner för att fånga stötande språk. Våra experimentella resultat visar på bra klassificeringsresultat på träningsdata, men en avsevärd minskning av återkallelsen på den hållna testuppsättningen.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval-2019 செயல் 5 க்கு எங்கள் பங்கை விவரிக்கிறது குறிப்பிடுகிறது எதிர்பார்ப்பு பேச்சுகள் மற்றும் தொடர்பு பெண நாங்கள் ஆங்கிலத்தில் வெறுப்பு பேச்சை கண்டுபிடிக்க ஒரு பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்பட்ட வகுப்பு அடிப்படையான முறையில் கருத்தினோம், அது நிரந்தரமான லெக எங்கள் சோதனை முடிவு', 'ur': 'This paper describes our contribution to the SemEval-2019 Task 5 on the detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (hatEval). ہم نے انگلیسی ٹویٹوں میں دشمنی کی بات تلاش کرنے کے لئے ایک تحت نظر کی تقویت کی طریقہ سمجھ لیا ہے، جو بہت سی استاندارڈ لکسیکل اور سینٹاکیسی ویٹیوں کو مختلف ویٹیوں کے ساتھ جمع کرتا ہے۔ ہمارے آزمائش نتیجے ٹرینگ ڈیٹے پر اچھی کلاسپیٹ کے کام دکھاتے ہیں، لیکن ہلک-آئٹ ٹیسٹ کے ذریعے ایک بہت اضافہ ڈوب ہے.', 'uz': "Бу саҳифа, SemEval-2019 Tashqi 5 (hatEval) ga муҳожирлар ва ayollar (hatEval) bilan yolg'onni aniqlashni anglatuvchi qanday narsalarni anglatadi. Biz ingliz twitlarda kuch tilini aniqlash uchun taʼminlovchi darajalashga asosiy tilni anglatdik. Bu bir xil to ʻgʻri leksikal va syntactik xususiyatlarini birlashtirish mumkin. Bizning tajriba natijalarimiz taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlarda yaxshi darajalashtirish bajarishini ko'rsatadi, lekin tashqi sinov sohasida ko'rib chiqarish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Bài báo này mô tả sự đóng góp của chúng ta vào Nhiệm vụ Semkhai-99 về việc phát hiện ngôn ngữ thù ghét đối với người nhập cư và phụ nữ trên Twitter. Chúng tôi đã xem một phương pháp cấp bậc được giám sát để phát hiện ngôn ngữ thù ghét trên Twitter, nó kết hợp nhiều tính năng ngôn ngữ ngôn ngữ ngôn ngữ ngôn ngữ ngôn ngữ ngôn ngữ ngôn ngữ ngôn ngữ. Kết quả thử nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy hiệu quả phân loại tốt trên dữ liệu huấn luyện, nhưng cũng có một sự giảm bớt đáng kể trong bộ thử ra.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores bidrag til SemEval-2019 Task 5 om afsløring af hadefulde tale mod indvandrere og kvinder på Twitter (hatEval). Vi overvejede en overvåget klassifikationsbaseret tilgang til at detektere hadefulde tale i engelske tweets, som kombinerer en række standard leksikske og syntaktiske funktioner med specifikke funktioner til at fange krænkende sprog. Vores eksperimentelle resultater viser god klassificeringspræstation på træningsdata, men et betydeligt fald i tilbagekaldelse på det holdte testsæt.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft onze bijdrage aan de SemEval-2019 Taak 5 over de detectie van haatspraak tegen immigranten en vrouwen in Twitter (hatEval). We overwogen een begeleide classificatiegebaseerde benadering om haatspraak in Engelse tweets te detecteren, die een verscheidenheid aan standaard lexicale en syntactische functies combineert met specifieke functies voor het vastleggen van aanstootgevende taal. Onze experimentele resultaten tonen goede classificatieprestaties op de trainingsgegevens, maar een aanzienlijke terugval van de terugroepactie op de uitgestelde testset.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва нашия принос към Задача 5 за откриване на речта на омразата срещу имигранти и жени в Туитър. Обмислихме надзорен, базиран на класификация подход за откриване на речта на омразата в английски туитове, който съчетава различни стандартни лексикални и синтактични характеристики със специфични характеристики за улавяне на обиден език. Нашите експериментални резултати показват добра класификация на данните от обучението, но значителен спад на отзоваването на проведените тестове.', 'hr': 'Ovaj novinar opisuje naš doprinos zadatku 5 za semiEval-2019 o otkrivanju govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena na Twitter (hatEval). Smatrali smo nadzorni pristup klasifikaciji za otkrivanje govora mržnje na engleskim tweetima, koji kombinira razne standardne leksičke i sintaktičke karakteristike sa specifičnim karakteristikama za uhvaćenje ofanzivnog jezika. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju dobru klasifikaciju podataka o obuci, ali značajan pad sjećanja na određenom testu.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan kontribusi kami ke SemEval-2019 Task 5 tentang deteksi pidato kebencian terhadap imigran dan wanita di Twitter (HatEval). Kami mempertimbangkan pendekatan berdasarkan klasifikasi yang diawasi untuk mendeteksi pidato kebencian dalam tweet Inggris, yang menggabungkan berbagai macam karakteristik standar lexik dan sintaks dengan karakteristik khusus untuk menangkap bahasa offensive. Hasil percobaan kami menunjukkan prestasi klasifikasi yang baik pada data pelatihan, tapi kurangnya ingatan pada set ujian yang ditahan.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unseren Beitrag zur SemEval-2019 Task 5 zur Erkennung von Hassreden gegen Immigranten und Frauen in Twitter (hatEval). Wir haben einen überwachten klassifizierungsbasierten Ansatz zur Erkennung von Hassreden in englischen Tweets in Betracht gezogen, der eine Vielzahl von lexikalischen und syntaktischen Standardfunktionen mit spezifischen Funktionen zur Erfassung anstößiger Sprache kombiniert. Unsere experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen eine gute Klassifikationsleistung auf den Trainingsdaten, aber einen erheblichen Rückgang des Rückrufs auf den ausgehaltenen Testsatz.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ توصیف می\u200cکند که کمک ما به ماموریت پنجم سال ۲۰۱۹ در مورد کشف سخنرانی ناخوشایند در برابر مهاجران و زنان توئیتر (hatEval) است. ما به نظر گرفتیم که یک روش تحت نظر بررسی بر اساس تجزیه\u200cبندی برای شناسایی سخنرانی ناخوشایند در تویت\u200cهای انگلیسی، که مختلف ویژه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی و سنتاکتیک استاندارد را با ویژه\u200cهای خاص برای گرفتن زبان\u200cهای ناخوشایند ترکیب نتایج آزمایش ما اجرای راهنمایی خوب در اطلاعات آموزش را نشان می دهد، ولی یک کم بزرگی در یادآوری در مجموعه آزمایش خارج شده است.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-2019 미션5에 대한 우리의 공헌을 묘사하고 미션5는 트위터에서 이민과 여성에 대한 증오언론(hatEval)을 검출하는 것이다.우리는 감독 분류를 바탕으로 영어 추문의 증오 언론을 검출하는 방법을 고려했다. 이 방법은 각종 표준 어휘와 문법 특징을 공격적인 언어를 포획하는 특정한 특징과 결합시켰다.우리의 실험 결과는 훈련 데이터에서 매우 좋은 분류 성능을 보였지만, 테스트 집합을 유지하는 데 있어서 리콜률이 상당히 떨어졌다.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaelezea mchango wetu wa kazi ya SemEval-2019 kuhusu kutambua hotuba ya chuki dhidi ya wahamiaji na wanawake kwenye mtandao wa Twita (hatEval). Tulichukulia mbinu inayofuatiliwa na kutambua hotuba ya chuki katika twiti za Kiingereza, ambayo inaunganisha vipengenezo vingi vya hali ya kawaida vya lexico na ushirikiano na vipengele maalum kwa kutafuta lugha ya kudhalilisha. Matokeo yetu ya majaribio yanaonyesha ufanisi mzuri wa kutangaza takwimu za mafunzo, lakini kupunguza kwa kiasi kikubwa katika kituo cha majaribio kilichofanyika.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe ons bydraai aan die SemEval-2019 Opdrag 5 oor die opdekking van haat spreek teen imigrante en vroue in Twitter (hatEval). Ons het aangesien 'n ondersoekte klasifikasie-gebaseerde toegang om haat spreek in Engelske tweets te ontdek, wat 'n verskillende standaard leksiese en sintaksiese eienskappe kombinieer met spesifieke eienskappe vir ontvang van offensivele taal. Ons eksperimentele resultate vertoon goeie klasifikasie uitvoering op die opvoering data, maar 'n aansienlike afval in rekening op die gehou-uit toets stel.", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የስምEval-2019 ስራ 5 ለስደተኞች እና በተዊተር ላይ ሴቶች ላይ የጥላቻን ንግግር ማግኘት የሚያሳውቃለን፡፡ በንግግሊዝኛ ትዊተሮች የጥል ንግግርን ለማግኘት የተደረገውን የክፍለ ሥርዓት አሰብተናል፡፡ ፈተና ፍሬዎቻችን የድምፅ ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም መልካም ትክክል ማድረግ ያሳያል፤ ነገር ግን በተጨማሪው ፈተና ማድረግ ላይ የሚያሳስብ ጥቅም ነው፡፡', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz SemEval-2019-nji Görevi 5-nji göçmenleriň we aýallaryň Twitter (hatEval) tarapynda ýigrenýän çykyşlygyny tapmaklygymyzy tassyklaýar. Biz iňlis tweetlerde ýigrenç sözlerini tanamak üçin nähili taýýarlanma taýýarlanma ýagdaýynda pikir etdik. Bu iňlis tweetlerde birnäçe standart lektik we sintaktik sözlerini offensive dilini ýazmak üçin düzümler bilen birleşýär. Biziň synagymyz netijelerimiz okuw maglumatynda gowy klasifikasyýa etkinlik ukyplaryny görkezýär, ýöne çykyp durmuş testiň düzümlerinde örän köp taýýarlanmagy ukyp edýär.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր ներդրումը ՍեմԵվալ 2019 թվականի 5-րդ հանձնարարության վրա, որը վերաբերում է ատելության խոսքերի հայտնաբերմանը միգրանտների և կանանց դեմ Թվիթերում (ատելության Եվալ): Մենք դիտարկեցինք անգլերենի թվիթերում ատելության խոսքի հայտնաբերելու վերահսկված դասակարգման հիմնված մոտեցում, որը համադրում է բազմաթիվ ստանդարտ լեքսիկական և սինտակտիկ հատկություններ հատուկ հատկությունների հետ հատուկ հատկությունների հետ,  Մեր փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս լավ դասակարգման արդյունքներ ուսումնասիրության տվյալների վրա, բայց նշանակալի նվազում է հիշողությունը հեռացված փորձարկումների համակարգում:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt, həmçin in İmləçilərin və qadınların Twitter (hatEval) əleyhinə nifrət sözlərini keşfetməsi barəsində SemEval-2019 Task 5-ə qarşılaşdığımızı təsdiqləyir. İngilizce tweetlərdə nifrət sözlərini keçmək üçün nəzarət edilmiş klasifikasiya tabanlı bir tərzim qəbul etdik. Bu, bir çox standart leksik və sintaktik xüsusiyyətləri olaraq offensiv dili tutmaq üçün müxtəlif xüsusiyyətlərlə birləşdirir. Müxtəlif sonuçlarımız təhsil məlumatlarında yaxşı klasifikasiya performansını göstərir, amma müəyyən edilmiş sınama qurğusunda çox çəkilir.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan kontributin tonë në SemEval-2019 Task 5 mbi zbulimin e fjalimit të urrejtjes kundër emigrantëve dhe grave në Twitter (hatEval). We considered a supervised classification-based approach to detect hate speech in English tweets, which combines a variety of standard lexical and syntactic features with specific features for capturing offensive language.  Rezultatet tona eksperimentale tregojnë rezultate të mira klasifikuese në të dhënat e trainimit, por një rënie konsideruese në kujtimin e grupit të testit të mbajtur.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি টুইটারে অভিবাসী এবং নারীদের বিরুদ্ধে ঘৃণা ভাষণ সনাক্ত করার ব্যাপারে আমাদের সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের প্রতি আমাদের অব আমরা ইংরেজী টুইটে ঘৃণা ভাষণ সনাক্ত করার জন্য একটি পর্যবেক্ষণভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি বিবেচনা করেছি, যা বিভিন্ন ধরনের স্বাভাবিক লেক্সিক এবং সিন্ট্যা আমাদের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্যে ভালো ক্লাস্ফিকেশন প্রদর্শন করে, কিন্তু আটকানো পরীক্ষার সেটে একটি বেশী কমে যায়', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu la nostra contribució a la tasca 5 SemEval-2019 sobre la detecció de discurs d'odi contra immigrants i dones a Twitter (HatEval). Vam considerar un enfocament basat en la classificació supervisada per detectar el discurs d'odi en tweets anglesos, que combina una varietat de característiques lècsiques i sinàctiques estàndard amb característiques específiques per capturar un llenguatge ofensiu. Els nostres resultats experimentals mostren bons resultats de classificació en les dades d'entrenament, però una disminució considerável de recordació en el conjunt d'exàmens retenus.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš příspěvek k SemEval-2019 Task 5 na detekci nenávistné řeči proti imigrantům a ženám na Twitteru (hatEval). Zvažovali jsme přístup založený na sledované klasifikaci k detekci nenávistné řeči v anglických tweetech, který kombinuje řadu standardních lexikálních a syntaktických funkcí se specifickými funkcemi pro zachycení urážlivého jazyka. Naše experimentální výsledky ukazují dobrý klasifikační výkon na tréninkových údajích, ale značný pokles stavu na vydržené testovací sadě.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš doprinos zadatku 5 na poluvremenom razdoblju 2019 o otkrivanju govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena u Twitter (hatEval). Smatrali smo nadzorni pristup klasifikacije za otkrivanje govora mržnje na engleskim tweetima, koji kombinira razne standardne leksičke i sintaktičke karakteristike sa specifičnim karakteristikama za uhvaćenje ofanzivnog jezika. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju dobru klasifikaciju podataka o treningu, ali značajan pad sjećanja na određenom testu.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse meie panust SemEval-2019 ülesandesse 5 sisserändajate ja naiste vastu suunatud vihakõne avastamiseks Twitteris (hatEval). Me kaalusime järelevalvealust klassifikatsioonipõhist lähenemisviisi vihakõne tuvastamiseks inglise säutsides, mis ühendab erinevad standardsed leksikaalsed ja süntaktilised omadused eriomadustega solvava keele jäädvustamiseks. Meie eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad treeningu andmetel head klassifitseerimistulemused, kuid märkimisväärset tagasikutsumise vähenemist läbiviidud katsekomplektis.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan osuuttamme SemEval-2019 Task 5 -hankkeeseen maahanmuuttajiin ja naisiin kohdistuvan vihapuheen havaitsemisesta Twitterissä (hatEval). Harkitsimme valvottua luokitteluun perustuvaa lähestymistapaa vihapuheen havaitsemiseksi englanninkielisissä tweeteissä, jossa yhdistyvät erilaiset vakiosanastot ja syntaktiset ominaisuudet loukkaavan kielen kaappaamiseen. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että harjoitusaineisto on luokiteltu hyvin, mutta palautuksen määrä on vähentynyt huomattavasti.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki dipunangé awakdhéwé kanggo nyenengaké sampek tanggal seminval-2011 task 5 banjuré nggawe barang ngregani uwong karo perkaran-uwong sing nyenengaké é in êngé karo sapa-uwong sing nyenengaké Tom (haal). Two Rejalekan winih dhéwé ngerasakno ana ing rak perusahaan dhéwé, njuk kesempatan kanggo ngerasakno ujian sisan', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את התרומה שלנו לסימוול-2019 משימה 5 על גילוי נאום שנאה נגד מהגרים ונשים בטוויטר (HatEval). חשבנו גישה מבוססת על מסווג מבוססת על השגחה כדי לגלות נאום שנאה בטוויטים אנגליים, אשר משלב מגוון של תכונות לקסיות וסינטקטיקות סטנדרטיות עם תכונות ספציפיות לתפוס שפה פגיעה. התוצאות הניסיוניים שלנו מראות ביצועים מסווגים טובים על נתוני האימונים, אבל ירידה משמעותית של זיכרון על קבוצת המבחן המנוע.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana fassarar da aikin mu zuwa na Semeval-2019 a kan gane magana na ƙeta a kan muhimmin da mãtã a Twitter (hateval). Mun ƙaddara wani hanyoyi mai tsaro ga gane magana na takaici a cikin littattafan Ingiriya, wanda ke haɗa wasu masu tsari na taƙaitaccen leksisi da syntactic da ke da haske masu tsari ga gane harshe na ƙetare. Matarinmu na jarraba, za'a nuna mai kyau ga fasalin danne na ƙidãya, kuma amma wani rabo mai girma da za'a tuna a kan tsarin jarrabai da aka samu.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naš prispevek k nalogi SemEval-2019 5 o odkrivanju sovražnega govora proti priseljencem in ženskam v Twitterju (hatEval). Razmislili smo o nadzorovanem klasifikacijskem pristopu za odkrivanje sovražnega govora v angleških tweetih, ki združuje različne standardne leksikalne in sintaktične značilnosti s specifičnimi značilnostmi za zajemanje žaljivega jezika. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo dobro klasifikacijsko uspešnost pri podatkih o treningu, vendar precejšnji padec odpoklica pri izvedenem testnem kompletu.', 'bo': 'ཤོག ང་ཚོས་དབྱིབས་དམིགས་འཛིན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དང་བཅས་ཀྱི་ཕྱོགས་སྣང་ཚུལ་མཐུན་ཐབས་ཤིག་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གི་གྲུབ'}
{'en': 'MineriaUNAM at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Detecting Hate Speech in Twitter using Multiple Features in a Combinatorial Framework', 'ar': 'MineriaUNAM في SemEval-2019 المهمة 5: الكشف عن خطاب الكراهية في Twitter باستخدام ميزات متعددة في إطار اندماج', 'es': 'MineriaUNAM en SemEval-2019 Tarea 5: Detectar el discurso de odio en Twitter mediante múltiples funciones en un marco combinatorio', 'pt': 'MineriaUNAM no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 5: Detectando discurso de ódio no Twitter usando vários recursos em uma estrutura combinatória', 'fr': "MineriaUnam au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 5\xa0: Détecter les discours haineux sur Twitter à l'aide de fonctionnalités multiples dans un cadre combinatoire", 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のMineriaUNAMタスク5 ：コンビナトリアルフレームワークの複数の機能を使用したTwitterでのヘイトスピーチの検出', 'zh': 'MineriaUNAM在SemEval-2019务5:合框架以多功检Twitter仇言', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 5 पर MineriaUNAM: एक संयुक्त फ्रेमवर्क में एकाधिक सुविधाओं का उपयोग कर चहचहाना में नफरत भाषण का पता लगाना', 'ru': 'MineriaUNAM на SemEval-2019 Задача 5: Обнаружение ненавистнической речи в Twitter с использованием нескольких функций в комбинаторной структуре', 'ga': 'MineriaUNAM ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 5: Fuathchaint ar Twitter a Bhrath ag Úsáid Ilghnéithe i gCreat Comhcheangailte', 'hu': 'MineriaUNAM a SemEval-2019 5. feladat: Gyűlöletbeszéd felismerése Twitteren több funkció használatával kombinált keretrendszerben', 'el': 'Εργασία 5: Ανίχνευση της ομιλίας μίσους στο Twitter χρησιμοποιώντας πολλαπλά χαρακτηριστικά σε ένα Συνδυαστικό Πλαίσιο', 'it': 'MineriaUNAM a SemEval-2019 Task 5: Rilevare il discorso di odio su Twitter utilizzando più funzionalità in un framework combinato', 'lt': 'MineriaUNAM 5 uždavinys „SemEval-2019“: neapykantos kalbos nustatymas Twitter naudojant daugelį požymių derinamoje sistemoje', 'kk': 'MineriaUNAM at semiEval-2019 Task 5: Detecting Hate Speech using a Multiple Features in a Combinative Framework', 'mk': 'MineriaUNAM на SemEval-2019 задача 5: Детектирање на говорот за омраза на Твитер користејќи повеќе карактеристики во комбинационална рамка', 'ms': 'MineriaUNAM di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Mengesan Ucapan Kebencian dalam Twitter menggunakan Ciri-ciri Berbilang dalam kerangka Kombinasional', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 5-ല്\u200d മൈനേരിയുനാമ്: ഒരു കോമ്ബിനറിയല്\u200d ഫ്രെമിമോര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d വെറുപ്പുള്ള വിശേഷത്തില്\u200d വെറുപ്പു', 'mt': 'MineriaUNAM f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 5: L-identifikazzjoni ta’ diskors ta’ mibegħda fuq Twitter bl-użu ta’ Karatteristiċi Multipli f’Qafas Kombinatorju', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Task 5: Twitter-д Hate Speech-г олон Features in a Combination Framework ашиглаж олон Features Detecting', 'no': 'MineriaUNAM på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 5: Oppdaging av hatspråk i Twitter med fleire funksjonar i ei kombinasjonal rammeverk', 'ro': 'MineriaUNAM la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 5: Detectarea discursului de ură în Twitter folosind mai multe caracteristici într-un cadru combinatorial', 'pl': 'MineriaUNAM na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 5: Wykrywanie mowy nienawiści na Twitterze przy użyciu wielu funkcji w ramach kombinatorowych', 'ka': 'Name', 'si': 'මිනිරියානම් සම්වේල්-2019 වැඩක් 5: ට්විටර් වල හිත කතාව හොයාගන්න බොහොම විශේෂතාවක් භාවිත කරන්න', 'sr': 'MineriaUNAM na semiEval-2019 zadatak 5: otkrivanje govora mržnje na Twitter koristeći višestruke funkcije u kombinacijskom okviru', 'so': 'MineriaUNAM at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Detecting Hate Speech in Twitter using Multiple Features in a Combinatorial Framework', 'ta': 'Я«џЯ»єЯ««Я»ЇEval- 2019 Я«фЯ«БЯ«┐', 'sv': 'MineriaUNAM på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 5: Att upptäcka hattal i Twitter med hjälp av flera funktioner i ett kombinerat ramverk', 'ur': 'سیم ایولی-2019 ٹاکس ۵ میں مینیرییونام: ٹویٹر میں دشمنی سخنچی تلاش کرنا', 'uz': '5. Vazifani SemEval- 2019 bilan MineriaUNAM: Kombinatorial Framework bilan bir nechta foydalanuvchi foydalanuvchini aniqlash', 'vi': 'MineriaUNAM tại SemEvl-209 Task 5: Việc trinh sát ghe qua Twitter bằng nhiều đặc trưng trong hệ thống kết hợp.', 'bg': 'Задача 5: Откриване на речта на омразата в Туитър с помощта на множество функции в комбинаторна рамка', 'da': 'MineriaUNAM på SemEval-2019 Opgave 5: Opdagelse af had tale i Twitter ved hjælp af flere funktioner i en kombineret ramme', 'nl': 'MineriaUNAM op SemEval-2019 Taak 5: Het detecteren van haatspraak in Twitter met behulp van meerdere functies in een gecombineerd kader', 'hr': 'MineriaUNAM na semiEval-2019 zadatak 5: otkrivanje govora mržnje na Twitter koristeći višestruke funkcije u kombinacijskom okviru', 'id': 'MineriaUNAM di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Deteksi Bicara Kebencian di Twitter menggunakan Multiple Features in a Combinatorial Framework', 'ko': 'MineriaUNAM, SemEval-2019에서의 퀘스트 5: 그룹 프레임워크에서 다양한 기능으로 트위터의 증오 발언 탐지', 'de': 'MineriaUNAM auf der SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 5: Erkennung von Hassreden in Twitter mithilfe mehrerer Funktionen in einem kombinierten Framework', 'fa': 'MineriaUNAM در کار ۲۰۱۹: شناسایی سخنرانی دشمنی در توئیتر با استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای متعدد در یک چشمه\u200cبندی', 'sw': 'MiriaUNAM kwenye SemEval-2019 Task 5: Kuchunguza Hotuba ya Hati kwenye mtandao wa Twita kwa kutumia Tamko nyingi katika Mipango ya Kikombinatorial', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'MineriaUNAM në SemEval-2019 Task 5: Detecting Hate Speech on Twitter using Multiple Features in a Combinatorial Framework', 'tr': 'MineriaUNAM at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Detecting Hate Speech in Twitter using Multiple Features in a Combinative Framework', 'am': 'የሳምEval-2019 ስራ 5: ጥል ቃላትን በትዊተር በመጠቀም በብዛት ፍትርዓት በተጠቃሚ የጥል ንግግር ማረጋገጥ', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের মিনেরিয়ানাম ৫: টুইটারে ঘৃণা কথা সনাক্ত করা হচ্ছে এক কম্বানিটোরিয়াল ফ্রেমের মাধ্যমে বহুবিধ বৈশিষ্ট', 'bs': 'MineriaUNAM na semiEval-2019 zadatak 5: otkrivanje govora mržnje na Twitter koristeći višestruke funkcije u kombinacijskom okviru', 'hy': 'UNAMon on Hale-2019 Mission 5: Discovering ատելության ելույթը Twitter-ում օգտագործելով բազմաթիվ առանձնահատկություններ', 'az': "MineriaUNAM at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Twitter'da nefret sözlərini birlikdə çoxlu Features qullanır", 'cs': 'MineriaUNAM na SemEval-2019 Úkol 5: Detekce nenávistné řeči na Twitteru pomocí více funkcí v kombinačním rámci', 'et': 'MineriaUNAM SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 5: Vihakõne tuvastamine Twitteris mitme funktsiooni abil kombineeritud raamistikus', 'fi': 'MineriaUNAM SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 5: Vihanpuheen havaitseminen Twitterissä useiden ominaisuuksien avulla yhdistelmäkehyksessä', 'ca': 'MineriaUNAM a SemEval-2019 Task 5: Detecting Hate Speech on Twitter using Multiple Features in a Combinatorial Framework', 'jv': 'MineriaUNAM at semi-2011 task 5', 'he': 'MineriaUNAM at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Detecting Hate Speech in Twitter using Multiple Features in a Combinatorial Framework', 'ha': 'MiriaUNAM at SemEal-2019 Tafiyar 5: Find Hate Spelling in Twitter by uses multiple Features in a Combinory Frame', 'sk': 'MineriaUNAM na SemEval-2019 Naloga 5: Zaznavanje sovražnega govora v Twitterju z uporabo več funkcij v kombinacijskem okvirju', 'bo': 'MineriaUNAM at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Detecting Hate Speech in Twitter using Multiple Features in a Combinatorial Framework'}
{'en': 'This paper presents our approach to the Task 5 of Semeval-2019, which aims at detecting hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter. The task consists of two sub-tasks, in Spanish and English : (A) detection of hate speech and (B) classification of hateful tweets as aggressive or not, and identification of the target harassed as individual or group. We used linguistically motivated features and several types of n-grams (words, characters, functional words, punctuation symbols, POS, among others). For task A, we trained a Support Vector Machine using a combinatorial framework, whereas for task B we followed a multi-labeled approach using the Random Forest classifier. Our approach achieved the highest F1-score in sub-task A for the Spanish language.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة مقاربتنا للمهمة 5 في Semeval-2019 ، والتي تهدف إلى الكشف عن خطاب الكراهية ضد المهاجرين والنساء في تويتر. تتكون المهمة من مهمتين فرعيتين ، باللغتين الإسبانية والإنجليزية: (أ) الكشف عن الكلام الذي يحض على الكراهية و (ب) تصنيف التغريدات البغيضة على أنها عدوانية أم لا ، وتحديد المستهدف الذي تم التحرش به كفرد أو مجموعة. استخدمنا الميزات ذات الدوافع اللغوية وأنواع عديدة من n-grams (الكلمات والأحرف والكلمات الوظيفية ورموز الترقيم ونقاط البيع وغيرها). بالنسبة للمهمة أ ، قمنا بتدريب آلة متجه الدعم باستخدام إطار عمل اندماجي ، بينما بالنسبة للمهمة B ، اتبعنا نهجًا متعدد العلامات باستخدام مصنف Random Forest. حقق نهجنا أعلى درجة في F1 في المهمة الفرعية A للغة الإسبانية.', 'fr': "Cet article présente notre approche de la tâche 5 de Semeval-2019, qui vise à détecter les discours de haine contre les immigrés et les femmes sur Twitter. La tâche comprend deux sous-tâches, en espagnol et en anglais\xa0: (A) la détection des discours haineux et (B) la classification des tweets haineux comme agressifs ou non, et l'identification de la cible harcelée en tant qu'individu ou groupe. Nous avons utilisé des caractéristiques linguistiques et plusieurs types de n-grammes (mots, caractères, mots fonctionnels, symboles de ponctuation, points de vente, entre autres). Pour la tâche A, nous avons formé une machine à vecteurs de support à l'aide d'un cadre combinatoire, tandis que pour la tâche B, nous avons suivi une approche multi-étiquettes utilisant le classificateur Random Forest. Notre approche a obtenu le score F1 le plus élevé dans la sous-tâche A pour la langue espagnole.", 'es': 'Este artículo presenta nuestro enfoque de la Tarea 5 de Semeval-2019, que tiene como objetivo detectar el discurso de odio contra los inmigrantes y las mujeres en Twitter. La tarea consta de dos subtareas, en español e inglés: (A) detección del discurso de odio y (B) clasificación de los tuits de odio como agresivos o no, e identificación del objetivo acosado como individuo o grupo. Utilizamos funciones de motivación lingüística y varios tipos de n-gramas (palabras, caracteres, palabras funcionales, símbolos de puntuación, PDV, entre otros). Para la tarea A, entrenamos a una máquina de vectores de soporte utilizando un marco combinatorio, mientras que para la tarea B seguimos un enfoque de múltiples etiquetas utilizando el clasificador de bosque aleatorio. Nuestro enfoque logró la puntuación F1 más alta en la subtarea A para el idioma español.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta nossa abordagem à Tarefa 5 do Semeval-2019, que visa detectar discursos de ódio contra imigrantes e mulheres no Twitter. A tarefa consiste em duas subtarefas, em espanhol e inglês: (A) detecção de discurso de ódio e (B) classificação de tweets de ódio como agressivos ou não, e identificação do alvo assediado como indivíduo ou grupo. Utilizamos recursos motivados linguisticamente e diversos tipos de n-grams (palavras, caracteres, palavras funcionais, símbolos de pontuação, POS, entre outros). Para a tarefa A, treinamos uma Support Vector Machine usando uma estrutura combinatória, enquanto para a tarefa B seguimos uma abordagem multi-rotulada usando o classificador Random Forest. Nossa abordagem alcançou a pontuação F1 mais alta na subtarefa A para o idioma espanhol.', 'ja': '本稿では、Twitterにおける移民や女性に対するヘイトスピーチの検出を目的としたSemeval -2019のタスク5へのアプローチを紹介する。このタスクは、スペイン語と英語の2つのサブタスクで構成されています。(A)ヘイトスピーチの検出、および(B)攻撃的であるか否かの憎悪的なツイートの分類、および嫌がらせを受けたターゲットを個人またはグループとして識別します。言語的に動機づけられた特徴といくつかの種類のnグラム（単語、文字、機能単語、句読点記号、POSなど）を使用しました。タスクAについては、組み合わせフレームワークを使用してサポートベクターマシンをトレーニングしましたが、タスクBについては、ランダムフォレスト分類子を使用してマルチラベル化アプローチを行いました。私たちのアプローチは、スペイン語のサブタスクAで最高のF 1スコアを達成しました。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर सेमेवल -2019 के टास्क 5 के लिए हमारे दृष्टिकोण को प्रस्तुत करता है, जिसका उद्देश्य ट्विटर में आप्रवासियों और महिलाओं के खिलाफ नफरत भरे भाषण का पता लगाना है। इस कार्य में स्पेनिश और अंग्रेजी में दो उप-कार्य शामिल हैं: (ए) घृणा स्पीच का पता लगाना और (बी) आक्रामक या नहीं के रूप में घृणित ट्वीट्स का वर्गीकरण, और व्यक्ति या समूह के रूप में परेशान किए गए लक्ष्य की पहचान। हमने भाषाई रूप से प्रेरित विशेषताओं और कई प्रकार के एन-ग्राम (शब्द, वर्ण, कार्यात्मक शब्द, विराम चिह्न, पीओएस, दूसरों के बीच) का उपयोग किया। कार्य ए के लिए, हमने एक संयुक्त ढांचे का उपयोग करके एक समर्थन वेक्टर मशीन को प्रशिक्षित किया, जबकि कार्य बी के लिए हमने रैंडम फॉरेस्ट क्लासिफायर का उपयोग करके एक बहु-लेबल दृष्टिकोण का पालन किया। हमारे दृष्टिकोण ने स्पेनिश भाषा के लिए उप-कार्य ए में उच्चतम एफ 1-स्कोर हासिल किया।', 'ru': 'В этом документе представлен наш подход к задаче 5 Semeval-2019, которая направлена на обнаружение ненавистнических высказываний против иммигрантов и женщин в Twitter. Задача состоит из двух подзадач на испанском и английском языках: (A) выявление ненавистнических высказываний и (B) классификация ненавистнических твитов как агрессивных или нет и идентификация объекта преследования как отдельного лица или группы. Мы использовали лингвистически мотивированные признаки и несколько типов n-грамм (слова, символы, функциональные слова, знаки пунктуации, POS и другие). Для задачи A мы обучили машину опорного вектора, используя комбинаторную структуру, тогда как для задачи B мы следовали многоуровневому подходу, используя классификатор случайных лесов. Наш подход достиг наивысшего балла F1 в подзадаче A для испанского языка.', 'zh': '本文引Semeval-2019务5之道,宜在检测Twitter中,以移民女性之仇言。 凡西班牙语、英语二子:(A)检仇言(B)以仇推文类攻击性或非侵略性,及以骚扰为团体。 语言动机,与数体之n-gram(单词,字符,功能词,标点符号,POS等)。 其于任 A也,吾以组框架练向量机,而于事 B,吾以随林类器循多标法。 吾道在西班牙语子A中得至F1分。', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair ár gcur chuige i leith Thasc 5 de Semeval-2019, a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige caint fuatha in aghaidh inimirceach agus ban a bhrath ar Twitter. Tá dhá fhothasc i gceist leis an tasc, i Spáinnis agus i mBéarla: (A) fuathchaint a bhrath agus (B) tweets fuatha a rangú mar ionsaitheach nó nach bhfuil, agus sainaithint na sprice a ciapadh mar dhuine aonair nó mar ghrúpa. D’úsáideamar gnéithe spreagtha ó thaobh na teanga de agus roinnt cineálacha n-gram (focail, carachtair, focail fheidhmiúla, siombailí poncaíochta, POS, i measc daoine eile). Le haghaidh tasc A, chuireamar oiliúint ar Mheaisín Veicteoir Tacaíochta ag baint úsáide as creat cumaisc, ach le haghaidh tasc B leanamar cur chuige illipéadaithe ag baint úsáide as an aicmitheoir Random Forest. Bhain ár gcur chuige an scór F1 is airde amach i bhfo-thasc A don Spáinnis.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a Semeval-2019 5. feladatának megközelítését, amely célja a bevándorlók és nők elleni gyűlöletbeszéd felismerése a Twitteren. A feladat két alfeladatból áll, spanyolul és angolul: (A) a gyűlöletbeszéd felismerése és (B) a gyűlöletveszélyes tweetek agresszív vagy nem minősítése, valamint a zaklatott célpont egyéni vagy csoportos azonosítása. Nyelvtanilag motivált funkciókat és többféle n-grammot használtunk (szavak, karakterek, funkcionális szavak, írásjelek, POS, stb.). Az A feladathoz kombinációs keretrendszer segítségével képeztünk támogató vektorgépet, a B feladathoz pedig a Random Forest osztályozóval többcímkézett megközelítést követtünk. Megközelítésünk elérte a legmagasabb F1 pontszámot a spanyol nyelvű "A" alcsoportban.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει την προσέγγισή μας στο έργο 5 του Semeval-2019, το οποίο στοχεύει στην ανίχνευση ρητορικών μίσους κατά μεταναστών και γυναικών στο Twitter. Το έργο αποτελείται από δύο υπο-εργασίες, στα ισπανικά και στα αγγλικά: (Α) ανίχνευση ρητορικής μίσους και (Β) ταξινόμηση των μίσους tweets ως επιθετικά ή όχι, και αναγνώριση του στόχου που παρενοχλείται ως άτομο ή ομάδα. Χρησιμοποιήσαμε γλωσσικά υποκινούμενα χαρακτηριστικά και διάφορους τύπους γραμμάτων (λέξεις, χαρακτήρες, λειτουργικές λέξεις, σύμβολα στίξης, μεταξύ άλλων). Για την εργασία Α, εκπαιδεύσαμε μια μηχανή διανυσματικής υποστήριξης χρησιμοποιώντας ένα συνδυασμένο πλαίσιο, ενώ για την εργασία Β ακολουθήσαμε μια προσέγγιση πολλαπλών ετικετών χρησιμοποιώντας τον ταξινομητή τυχαίων δασών. Η προσέγγισή μας πέτυχε την υψηλότερη βαθμολογία F1 στην υποεργασία Α για την ισπανική γλώσσα.', 'it': 'Questo articolo presenta il nostro approccio al Task 5 di Semeval-2019, che mira a rilevare i discorsi di odio contro immigrati e donne su Twitter. Il compito consiste in due sotto-compiti, in spagnolo e inglese: (A) rilevamento del discorso di odio e (B) classificazione dei tweet odiosi come aggressivi o meno, e identificazione del bersaglio molestato come individuo o gruppo. Abbiamo utilizzato funzionalità motivate linguisticamente e diversi tipi di n-grammi (parole, caratteri, parole funzionali, simboli di punteggiatura, POS, tra gli altri). Per il compito A, abbiamo addestrato una macchina vettoriale di supporto utilizzando un framework combinatorio, mentre per il compito B abbiamo seguito un approccio multi-etichettato utilizzando il classificatore foresta casuale. Il nostro approccio ha ottenuto il punteggio F1 più alto nella sottomissione A per la lingua spagnola.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი ჩვენი დახმარებას ჩემი სამუშაო წლის 2019-ს დავალების 5-ზე, რომელიც მიზეზიან განვიხმარება მპატის საუკუმენტის საუკუმენტის საუკუმენტი პარამეტრები იყოს ორი საკუთარი პარამეტრები, სპანელი და ინგლისური: A) წარმოადგენების სიტყვას და B) კლასიფიკაციის წარმოადგენების კლასიფიკაცია, როგორც ადრესიური ან არა, და მიზეზის ინდივებული ან ჯგუ ჩვენ ენგუფისტიკურად მოტივირებული ფუნქციები და n-გრამის რამდენიმე ტიპები გამოყენეთ (სიტყვები, სიტყვები, ფუნქციური სიტყვები, პონქტუაციის სიმ A-ის დავალებისთვის, ჩვენ დამხმარებელი გვექტორის მაქსინის გამოყენება, როგორც B-ის დავალებისთვის, ჩვენ მრავალური მაქსინის მიღება გამოყენებული Random Forest კლასიფიკაციის გამოყენება. ნაქთწრ ოპთლთფაი ეჲჟრигნალ ნაი-გთჟჲკთწრ F1-ოჲეკსპ გ ოჲეპაბჲრა A ჱა ჟოანჟკთწ ენვჟ.', 'mk': 'This paper presents our approach to the Task 5 of Semeval-2019, which aims at detecting hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter.  Оваа задача се состои од две подзадачи, на шпански и англиски: (A) откривање на говорот на омраза и (B) класификација на омразни твитови како агресивни или не, и идентификација на метата која ја малтретираат како индивидуална или група. Користевме јазички мотивирани карактеристики и неколку видови на n-грами (зборови, ликови, функционални зборови, точни симболи, POS, меѓу другите). За задачата А, трениравме векторна машина за поддршка користејќи комбинаторна рамка, додека за задачата Б следевме мултиозначен пристап користејќи го класификаторот на случајни шуми. Нашиот пристап го постигна највисокиот резултат Ф1 во подзадачата А за шпанскиот јазик.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2019 жылдың жарым-жарым тапсырмасының 5-ші тапсырмасын көрсетеді. Бұл Твиттердегі иммигранттер мен әйелдерге қарсы жарықтық сөйлесуді табуға мақсат еті Тапсырма - испан және ағылшын тілінде екі ішкі тапсырмалардан (A) жек сөйлейтін және (B) жек сөйлейтін тапсырмаларды агрессивне не емес деп тапсырмаларды анықтау және жеке не топ ретінде қарсылған нақты анықтау. Біз лингвистикалық мотивациялық мүмкіндіктерді және бірнеше түрлі n- граммаларды қолдандық (сөздер, таңбалар, функциялық сөздер, таңбашалар, POS және басқалардың арасында). A тапсырмасы үшін біз қолдау векторының машинасын комбинациялық фреймін қолданады. Бірақ B тапсырмасына Кездейсоқ орман классификаторын қолдану үшін көп жарлық жарлық тәртібін қалдық Біздің тәсіліміз Испан тілінің A- тапсырманың ең жоғары F1- нәтижесін жеткізді.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatomas mūsų požiūris į 2019 m. pusmečio 5 užduotį, kuria siekiama nustatyti neapykantos kalbą prieš imigrantus ir moteris Twitter. Šią užduotį sudaro dvi užduotys, ispanų ir anglų kalbomis: A) neapykantos kalbos aptikimas ir B) neapykantos tweetų klasifikavimas agresyviais ar ne, ir tikslo, kurį priekabiavo asmenys ar grupė, identifikavimas. Naudojome kalbomis motyvuotus požymius ir kelis n-gramų tipus (žodžiai, simboliai, funkciniai žodžiai, taško simboliai, POS, be kita ko). A užduoties atveju apmokėme paramos vektorių mašiną naudojant kombinacinę sistemą, o B užduoties atveju ėmėmės taikyti daugiametį metodą naudojant atsitiktinį miškų klasifikatorių. Our approach achieved the highest F1-score in sub-task A for the Spanish language.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta l-approċċ tagħna għall-Kompitu 5 tas-Semeval-2019, li għandu l-għan li jidentifika diskors ta’ mibegħda kontra l-immigranti u n-nisa fuq Twitter. Il-kompitu jikkonsisti f’żewġ sottokompiti, bl-Ispanjol u bl-Ingliż: (A) detezzjoni ta’ diskors ta’ mibegħda u (B) klassifikazzjoni ta’ tweets mibegħda bħala aggressivi jew le, u identifikazzjoni tal-mira fastidjata bħala individwu jew grupp. Użajna karatteristiċi motivati lingwistikament u diversi tipi ta’ n-grammi (kliem, karattri, kliem funzjonali, simboli ta’ puntwazzjoni, POS, fost oħrajn). Għall-kompitu A, a ħna mħarrġin Makkinarju tal-Vetturi ta’ Appoġġ bl-użu ta’ qafas kombinatorju, filwaqt li għall-kompitu B segwejna approċċ b’ħafna tikketti bl-użu tal-klassifikatur tal-Foresti Random. L-approċċ tagħna kiseb l-ogħla punteġġ F1 fis-sottokompitu A għall-lingwa Spanjola.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan pendekatan kita kepada Tugas 5 Semeval-2019, yang bertujuan untuk mengesan ucapan kebencian terhadap imigran dan wanita di Twitter. Tugas ini terdiri dari dua sub-tugas, dalam bahasa Sepanyol dan Inggeris: (A) pengesan ucapan kebencian dan (B) klasifikasi tweet kebencian sebagai agresif atau tidak, dan pengenalan sasaran yang diganggu sebagai individu atau kumpulan. Kami menggunakan ciri-ciri motivasi secara bahasa dan beberapa jenis n-gram (perkataan, aksara, perkataan berfungsi, simbol punctuasi, POS, antara lain). Untuk tugas A, kami melatih Mesin Vektor Sokongan menggunakan kerangka kombinatorial, sementara untuk tugas B kami mengikuti pendekatan berlipat-berbilang menggunakan klasifikasi Hutan Rawak. pendekatan kita mencapai skor F1 tertinggi dalam sub-tugas A untuk bahasa Sepanyol.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь 2019 оны зууны үеийн 5 дахь ажил дээр бидний хандлагыг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь хөдөлгөөнтүүд болон эмэгтэйчүүдийн Твиттерийн эсрэг үзэн ядах яриаг олох зорилготой. Энэ ажил нь Испан болон Англи хэлний хоёр суб-даалгавартай: А) үзэн ядуурлын яриаг олох ба (B) үзэн ядуурлын tweets хуваалтыг агуу эсвэл биш гэж нэрлэж, хувилбар эсвэл бүлэг гэдэг зорилгоог тодорхойлох юм. Бид хэл хэлний урам зориулсан бөгөөд хэдэн төрлийн n-грамм ашиглаж байсан. Бид A-ын ажлын тулд нэгтгэх хэлбэрийг ашиглан тусламжтай вектор машиныг суралцаж өгсөн. Гэхдээ B-ийн ажлын тулд бид Random Forest classifier ашиглан олон хэлбэртэй аргыг дагасан. Бидний арга зам нь Испан хэлний А суб-даалгаварын хамгийн өндөр F1 оноо гарч ирсэн.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser tilnærminga vårt til oppgåva 5 av halvåld 2019, som målet å finna hatspråk mot imigrantar og kvinner i Twitter. Oppgåva inneheld to underoppgåver, i spansk og engelsk: A) oppdaging av hatespråk og B) klassifikasjon av hatende tweeter som aggressiv eller ikkje, og identifikasjon av målet som vert påverka som individuell eller gruppe. Vi brukte språkstisk motiverte funksjonar og fleire typar n-gram (ord, teikn, funksjonelle ord, punktsymboler, POS, blant andre). For oppgåve A treng vi ein støtte vektormaskin med ein kombinasjonalt rammeverk, mens for oppgåve B følgja vi ei fleire merkelige tilnærming med tilfeldig skogsklassifisering. Tilnærminga vårt fikk den høgste F1- poeng i underoppgåva A for spansk språk.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ സെമെവാല്\u200d -2019ലെ ജോലിയിലേക്ക് നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തുനില്\u200dക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യത്തില്\u200d വെറുപ്പുകള്\u200dക സ്പാനിഷും ഇംഗ്ലീഷും രണ്ട് സബ് ജോലികളില്\u200d ഉള്ള രണ്ട് ഉപാധികള്\u200d ഉണ്ട്: (A) വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതും വെറുപ്പുള്ള ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200d ആക്രമണവും അല ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രോഗ്രാമില്\u200d നിന്നും കുറച്ചു തരം n-ഗ്രാമുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരുന്നു (വാക്കുകള്\u200d, അക്ഷരങ്ങള്\u200d, പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന ജോലി A-ന് വേണ്ടി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന വെക്റ്റര്\u200d യന്ത്രം പരിശീലിപ്പിച്ചു. ഒരു കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dന്ന ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് ഉപയോഗിച്ച്,  സ്പാനിഷ് ഭാഷയ്ക്കുള്ള ഉപാധി A-ല്\u200d ഏറ്റവും ഉയര്\u200dന്ന F1-സ്കോര്\u200d എത്തി.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă abordarea noastră față de Sarcina 5 a Semeval-2019, care vizează detectarea discursului de ură împotriva imigranților și femeilor pe Twitter. Sarcina constă în două subsarcini, în limba spaniolă și engleză: (A) detectarea discursului de ură și (B) clasificarea tweeturilor pline de ură ca agresive sau nu, și identificarea țintei hărțuite ca individ sau grup. Am folosit caracteristici motivate lingvistic și mai multe tipuri de n-grame (cuvinte, caractere, cuvinte funcționale, simboluri de punctuație, POS, printre altele). Pentru sarcina A, am instruit o mașină vectorială de suport folosind un cadru combinatorial, în timp ce pentru sarcina B am urmat o abordare multi-etichetată folosind clasificatorul Random Forest. Abordarea noastră a obținut cel mai mare scor F1 în subsarcina A pentru limba spaniolă.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono nasze podejście do zadania 5 Semeval-2019, którego celem jest wykrywanie mowy nienawiści wobec imigrantów i kobiet na Twitterze. Zadanie składa się z dwóch podzadań, w języku hiszpańskim i angielskim: (A) wykrywania mowy nienawiści oraz (B) klasyfikacji nienawiści tweetów jako agresywnych lub nie oraz identyfikacji docelowych nękanych jako indywidualnych lub grupowych. Wykorzystaliśmy motywowane językowo cechy i kilka rodzajów n-gramów (m.in. słowa, znaki, słowa funkcjonalne, symbole interpunkcji, POS). W przypadku zadania A szkoliliśmy wsparcie wektorowe maszyny przy użyciu frameworku kombinatorowego, natomiast w przypadku zadania B stosowaliśmy podejście wieloznakowane przy użyciu klasyfikatora Random Forest. Nasze podejście osiągnęło najwyższy wynik F1 w podzadaniu A dla języka hiszpańskiego.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja naš pristup zadatku 5. polovičnog 2019. godine, koji je cilj otkrivanja govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena u Twitter. Taj zadatak se sastoji od dva podzadataka, na španjolskom i engleskom jeziku: A) otkrivanje govora mržnje i B) klasifikacije mržnjih tweeta kao agresivne ili ne, i identifikacije meta koja je uznemirena kao individualna ili grupa. Koristili smo jezički motivisane karakteristike i nekoliko vrsta n-grama (reči, likovi, funkcionalne reči, simboli tačke, POS, među drugima). Za zadatak A, trenirali smo podršku vektorskoj mašini koristeći kombinacijski okvir, dok smo za zadatak B slijedili višeoznačeni pristup koristeći Random Forest klasifikator. Naš pristup je postigao najviši rezultat F1 u podzadatku A za španjolski jezik.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar vårt förhållningssätt till uppgiften 5 i Semeval-2019, som syftar till att upptäcka hatpropaganda mot invandrare och kvinnor på Twitter. Uppgiften består av två underuppgifter, på spanska och engelska: (A) upptäckt av hatpropaganda och (B) klassificering av hatiska tweets som aggressiva eller inte, och identifiering av målet som trakasseras som individ eller grupp. Vi använde språkligt motiverade funktioner och flera typer av n-gram (ord, tecken, funktionella ord, skiljetecken, POS, etc.). För uppgift A utbildade vi en Support Vector Machine med hjälp av ett kombinatoriskt ramverk, medan vi för uppgift B följde ett flermärkt tillvägagångssätt med Random Forest klassificering. Vårt tillvägagångssätt uppnådde högsta F1-poäng i deluppgift A för det spanska språket.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය පෙන්වන්නේ අවුරුදු වලින් 2019 වලින් කාර්ය 5 වලින්, ඒකෙන් අදහස් කරලා තියෙන්නේ අවුරුද්ධ ස්පැනිස් සහ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වල සාප්තාන්ත වැඩක් දෙකක් තියෙන්නේ: (A) වෛර කතාවක් හා (B) විශ්වාස කරන්න බැරි ට්විට් වල විශ්වාස කරනවා විශේෂ අපි භාෂාවික විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂය සහ n-gram වර්ගයක් භාවිත කරනවා. A වැඩ සඳහා අපි සහය වෙක්ටර් මැෂින් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා, ඒත් B වැඩ සඳහා අපි ක්\u200dරියාවෙන් විශේ අපේ විදිහට ස්පැනිශ් භාෂාවෙන් ඉහළම F1-ස්කෝර් එකේ සුබ-කාර්ය A වලින් උපස්සම් විදියට පත්', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu keenaa qaabilaadayada shaqada 5 ee Semeval-2019, kaas oo ku talo gala in la caddeeyo hadal nacayb ah oo ka gees ah dadka dalka u soo guuray iyo dumarka Twitterka. Shaqooyinka waxaa ka mid ah labo sub-shaqo, Isbanish iyo Ingiriis: (A) aqoonsashada hadalka nebcaalka iyo (B) qeyb-qabsashada tweetka nacayb oo ah aggressive ama aan ahayn, iyo aqoonsiga loogu talagalay sida qof ama koox loo isticmaalay. Waxaynu isticmaalnay xarumo luqada lagu hagaajiyo iyo noocyo kale oo n-gram ah (erayo, xaraf, erayo shaqo, calaamado punctuug, POS, qaar kale). Shaqo A, waxaynu ku tababarinnay Mashine kaalmo ah oo ku isticmaalaya qashinka kooxaha ah, laakiin shaqo B ayaannu u raacnay qaab badan oo la isticmaalayo fasax kooxaha Forenta Random. Dhaqdhaheenna waxay gaadheen heerka ugu sarreeya afka Isbanishka.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் செம்வால்-2019 வேலைக்கு எங்கள் வழிமுறையை அளிக்கிறது, இது குடிப்புகள் மற்றும் குடியினர் மற்றும் பெண்களுக இந்த செயல் இரண்டு துணை பணிகள், ஸ்பானிஷ் மற்றும் ஆங்கிலத்தில் உள்ளது: (A) வெறுப்பு பேச்சை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் மற்றும் (B) வெறுப்பு தேவையான tweets வகைப்படுத் @ info செயல் A க்கு, நாங்கள் ஒரு துணை வெக்டார் இயந்திரத்தை ஒரு இணைப்பு சட்டத்தை பயன்படுத்தி பயிற்சி செய்தோம், ஆனால் செயல் B க்கு நாம் குறிப்பி எங்கள் அணுகாரணம் ஸ்பானிஷ் மொழிக்கு துணை செய்ய அதிக F1- புள்ளியை அடைந்தது.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ہماری تقریبا توئیٹر میں ہجرت کرنے والوں اور عورتوں کے مقابلہ میں ہونے کا ارادہ ہے۔ اس کام میں دو سو-ٹاکس ہیں، اسپانیایی اور انگلیسی میں: (A) نفرت کی بات اور (B) ناپسندیدہ ٹیوٹوں کی قسم کا اضطراری یا نہیں، اور نشانی کی شناسایی جو شخص یا گروپ کے طور پر اضطراری کی گئی ہے۔ ہم نے زبان کے ذریعہ مہربانی کے فرصت اور چند نوع n-گرم استعمال کیا (کلمات، شخصیٹ، فعالیت کی کلمات، نقطہ سیم، POS، دوسرے کے درمیان). ہم نے ایک کمینٹریال فرم کے مطابق ایک حمایت ویکتور ماشین کی تعلیم دی ہے، حالانکہ ہم نے دنیا B کے لئے رنڈم جنگل کلاسیر کے مطابق ایک متعدد لیبل طریقہ کی پیروی کی ہے. ہمارا طریقہ اسپانیایی زبان کے لئے سب سے بلند F1-score پہنچا گیا۔', 'uz': "Бу саҳифа, Semeval-2019 Vazifaning 5 vazifasini namoyishga ega beradi. Bu xabar Twitterda муҳожирлар ва аёлларга нисбатан kuch aytishni anglatadi. Bu vazifa Ispanchadan ingliz tilida ikkita sub-vazifalar bor: (A) Hat tilni aniqlash va yolg'on Twitterlarni aniqlash (B) haqida hisoblashtirish va oddiy yoki guruh sifatida harakat qilingan qanday vazifalarni aniqlash. We used linguistically motivated features and several types of n-grams (words, characters, functional words, punctuation symbols, POS, among others).  Vazifani A uchun, biz bir kombinasjol freym bilan qoʻllanmalar vektor mashinasini o'rganib ko'rsatdik. Vazifa B uchun biz Tasodifiy Forest darajasini yordamida ko'plab qo'llab qo'llanmagan bir ko'plab qo'llangan usulni ishlatib chi Bizning tilimiz Ispaniya tili uchun eng yuqori F1 qiymatga erishilgan.", 'vi': 'Bài báo này đưa ra cách tiếp cận của chúng ta đến Nhiệm vụ năm của Semeval-xứng đáng, nhằm phát hiện giọng nói ghét đối với người nhập cư và phụ nữ trên Twitter. Nhiệm vụ gồm hai nhiệm vụ phụ thuộc vào tiếng Tây Ban Nha và Tiếng Anh: A) phát hiện tiếng nói ghét bỏ và B) phân tích những tweet hận thù có tấn công hay không, và xác định mục tiêu bị quấy rối là cá nhân hay nhóm. Chúng tôi sử dụng các tính n ăng ngôn ngữ và nhiều loại n-g (từ, ký tự, từ chức, biểu tượng dấu chấm, POS, trong số những loại khác). Đối với nhiệm vụ A, chúng tôi đã đào tạo một cỗ máy cung cấp hỗ trợ sử dụng một bộ khung kết hợp, trong khi đối với nhiệm vụ B, chúng tôi đã theo một phương pháp đa nhãn dùng phân loại Rừng Ngẫu nhiên. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi đạt điểm F1 cao nhất trong tiểu nhiệm vụ A cho ngôn ngữ Tây Ban Nha.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя нашия подход към Задача 5 на Семевал-2019, която има за цел откриване на речта на омразата срещу имигранти и жени в Туитър. Задачата се състои от две подзадачи, на испански и английски език: (А) откриване на речта на омразата и (Б) класификация на омразните туитове като агресивни или не, и идентифициране на тормозената мишена като индивид или група. Използвахме лингвистично мотивирани характеристики и няколко вида н-грами (думи, символи, функционални думи, пунктуационни символи, ПОС и др.). За задача А обучихме Поддържаща Векторна Машина, използвайки комбинаторна рамка, докато за задача Б следвахме многозначен подход, използвайки класификатора на случайни гори. Нашият подход постигна най-висок резултат в подзадача А за испанския език.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja naš pristup zadatku 5. polovičnog 2019. godine, koji je cilj otkrivanja govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena na Twitter-u. Taj zadatak sastoji od dva podzadataka, na španjolskom i engleskom jeziku: A) otkrivanje govora mržnje i B) klasifikacije mrznih tweeta kao agresivne ili ne, te identifikacije mete ozlijeđenog kao pojedinačna ili grupa. Koristili smo jezički motivirane karakteristike i nekoliko vrsta n-grama (riječi, likovi, funkcionalne riječi, simbole točke, POS, među drugima). Za zadatak A, vježbali smo podršku vektorskom stroju koristeći kombinacijski okvir, dok smo za zadatak B slijedili višeoznačeni pristup koristeći Random Forest klasifikator. Naš pristup je postigao najviši rezultat F1 u podzadatku A za španjolski jezik.', 'nl': 'Deze paper presenteert onze aanpak van de Taak 5 van Semeval-2019, die gericht is op het opsporen van haatspraak tegen immigranten en vrouwen op Twitter. De taak bestaat uit twee deeltaken, in het Spaans en Engels: (A) detectie van haatspraak en (B) classificatie van haatdragende tweets als agressief of niet, en identificatie van het doelwit dat wordt lastiggevallen als individu of groep. We gebruikten taalkundig gemotiveerde functies en verschillende soorten n-grammen (woorden, tekens, functionele woorden, interpunctiesymbolen, POS, onder andere). Voor taak A hebben we een Support Vector Machine getraind met behulp van een combinatorisch framework, terwijl we voor taak B een multi-labeled aanpak hebben gevolgd met behulp van de Random Forest classificator. Onze aanpak behaalde de hoogste F1-score in deeltaak A voor de Spaanse taal.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer vores tilgang til opgave 5 af Semeval-2019, som har til formål at afsløre hadefulde tale mod indvandrere og kvinder på Twitter. Opgaven består af to underopgaver, på spansk og engelsk: (A) påvisning af hadefuld tale og (B) klassificering af hadefulde tweets som aggressive eller ej, og identifikation af målet chikaneret som individuel eller gruppe. Vi brugte sprogligt motiverede funktioner og flere typer n-grams (ord, tegn, funktionelle ord, tegnsætningssymboler, POS, blandt andre). Til opgave A trænede vi en Support Vector Machine ved hjælp af en kombinatorisk ramme, mens vi for opgave B fulgte en multi-label tilgang ved hjælp af Random Forest klassificeringen. Vores tilgang opnåede den højeste F1-score i underopgave A for det spanske sprog.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag stellt unseren Ansatz für die Aufgabe 5 von Semeval-2019 vor, die darauf abzielt, Hassreden gegen Immigranten und Frauen in Twitter aufzudecken. Die Aufgabe besteht aus zwei Teilaufgaben, in spanischer und englischer Sprache: (A) Erkennung von Hassreden und (B) Klassifizierung hasserfüllter Tweets als aggressiv oder nicht und Identifizierung des belästigten Ziels als Einzelperson oder Gruppe. Wir verwendeten linguistisch motivierte Features und verschiedene Arten von n-Gramm (Wörter, Zeichen, Funktionswörter, Interpunktionssymbole, POS u.a.). Für Aufgabe A trainierten wir eine Support Vector Machine mit einem kombinatorischen Framework, während wir für Aufgabe B einen mehrmarkierten Ansatz mit dem Random Forest Klassifikator verfolgten. Unser Ansatz erzielte die höchste F1-Punktzahl in Teilaufgabe A für die spanische Sprache.', 'id': 'Kertas ini memperlihatkan pendekatan kita ke Tugas 5 Semeval-2019, yang bertujuan untuk mendeteksi pidato kebencian terhadap imigran dan wanita di Twitter. Tugas ini terdiri dari dua sub-tugas, dalam bahasa Spanyol dan Inggris: (A) deteksi pidato kebencian dan (B) klasifikasi tweet kebencian sebagai agresif atau tidak, dan identifikasi sasaran terganggu sebagai individu atau kelompok. We used linguistically motivated features and several types of n-grams (words, characters, functional words, punctuation symbols, POS, among others).  Untuk tugas A, kami melatih Mesin Vektor dukungan menggunakan kerangka kombinatorial, sementara untuk tugas B kami mengikuti pendekatan multi-labeled menggunakan Klasifikator Hutan Random. pendekatan kita mencapai skor F1 tertinggi dalam sub-tugas A untuk bahasa Spanyol.', 'ko': '본고는 트위터에서 이민과 여성을 겨냥한 증오 발언을 탐지하기 위한 Semeval-2019 미션 5의 방법을 소개한다.이 임무는 스페인어와 영어 두 개의 하위 임무로 구성된다. (A) 증오 발언을 탐지하고, (B) 증오 트윗을 공격적인 트윗이나 비공격적인 트윗으로 분류하며, 소란을 피우는 목표를 개인이나 단체로 식별한다.우리는 언어 동기의 특징과 몇 가지 유형의 n-gram(단어, 문자, 허사, 문장부호, 어성 등)을 사용했다.퀘스트 A에 대해 우리는 조합 프레임워크 훈련을 사용하여 벡터기를 지원하고 퀘스트 B에 대해서는 무작위 삼림분류기를 사용하여 다중 표기 방법을 사용한다.우리의 방법은 스페인어의 하위 임무 A에서 가장 높은 F1 점수를 얻었다.', 'sw': 'This paper presents our approach to the Task 5 of Semeval-2019, which aims at detecting hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter.  Kazi hiyo ni ya kazi mbili za Uhispania na Kiingereza: Kugundua hotuba ya chuki na (B) kutangazwa kwa twiti za chuki kama wenye kibaguzi au si, na kutambua lengo linalodhalilishwa kama binafsi au kikundi. Tulitumia vipengele vinavyohamasishwa kwa lugha na aina kadhaa za n-gram (maneno, wahusika, maneno ya kazi, alama za uchunguzi, POS, miongoni mwa wengine). Kwa kazi A, tulimfundisha mashine ya mkono kwa kutumia mfumo wa pamoja, wakati kwa kazi B tulifuatilia mbinu mbalimbali kwa kutumia mchanganyiko wa misitu. Hatua yetu ilifikia vipindi vya F1 vya juu katika kazi A kwa lugha ya Kihispania.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ دستور ما را به کار ۵ دهه و ۲۰۱۹ نشان می دهد که هدف دارد به کشف سخنرانی ناخوشایند در برابر مهاجران و زنان توئیتر باشد. این وظیفه از دو کار زیر اسپانیایی و انگلیسی است: A) شناسایی سخنرانی ناخوشایند و (B) classification of hateful tweets as aggressive or not, و شناسایی هدف که به عنوان یک فرد یا گروه زخمی شده است. ما از ویژه\u200cهای انگیزه زبانی و چند نوع n-گرم استفاده کردیم (کلمات، شخصیت\u200cها، کلمات فعالیت، نشانه\u200cهای نقطه\u200cگذاری، POS، بین دیگر). برای وظیفه A، ما یک ماشین پشتیبانی ویکتور را با استفاده از یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها دستور ما بالاترین امتیاز F1 در زیر کار A برای زبان اسپانیایی رسید.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz biziň 2-nji ýylda 2019-nji ýylda göçmenler we aýallar bilen ýigrenç sözlerini tapmaklygymyzy tassyklaýar. Bu zadyň iki sub-zady, Ispanýol we Iňlis dilinde: (A) ýigrenýän sözlerini tanamak we (B) ýigrenýän tweetlerin (ýigrenýän sözlerini) agressiv ýa-da däldir we hasaplanýan maksadyň belli edilmesi. Biz dillerden n äçe hilli hatlary we näçe hilli n-gramlary ulandyk A täblisasy üçin, bir kombinatorial fraým ulanan bir Support Vector Makiny öwrendirdik. Bu üçin B täblisasy üçin Random Forest klasifikatyny ulanyp bir multi-etiket taýýarlanýan approach diýipdik. Biziň ýaryşymyz espanyol dilinde A sub-işinde iň ýokary F1-score ýetdi.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet qasjen tonë ndaj Çështjes 5 të Gjysmës-2019, e cila synon të zbulojë fjalimin e urrejtjes kundër emigrantëve dhe grave në Twitter. Detyra përbëhet nga dy nëndetyra, në spanjoll dhe anglisht: (A) zbulimi i fjalimit të urrejtjes dhe (B) klasifikimi i tweeteve të urrejtura si agresive apo jo dhe identifikimi i objektivit të ngacmuar si individ apo grup. Ne përdorëm karakteristika gjuhësore të motivuara dhe disa lloje n-gram (fjalë, karaktere, fjalë funksionale, simbole piktimi, POS, midis të tjerëve). Për detyrën A, kemi trajnuar një Makinë Vektorore të Mbështetjes duke përdorur një kuadër kombinatori, ndërsa për detyrën B kemi ndjekur një qasje me shumë etiketa duke përdorur klasifikuesin e pyllit të rastësishëm. Përqasja jonë arriti rezultatin më të lartë F1 në nëndetyrën A për gjuhën spanjolle.', 'am': 'ይህም ገጾች የስሜቪል-2019 ስራ 5 ወደሚደረገው ስራችን ያቀርባል፤ ይህም በተዊተር ላይ በተሰደዱት እና ሴቶች ላይ የጥል ንግግርን ለማግኘት ነው፡፡ ስራ በስፓኒሽ እና እንግሊዘኛ ውስጥ ሁለት ደብዳቤዎችን በመቀበል ነው:(A) የጥል ንግግር እና (B) የጥላቻ Twitteets እንደ ተቃውሞ ወይም እንዳይሆን መግለጫ እና የአንድ ሰው ወይም ጉዳይ እንደተቃወሙ የሚደረገውን ጉዳዩ ማረጋገጥ ነው፡፡ ቋንቋ እና ብዙ ዓይነት የn-gram (ቃላት፣ ፊደሎችን፣ የሥራ ቃላት፣ የግንኙነት ግንኙነት፣ የፖএস እና ሌሎች) ለስራ አ፣ የድጋፍ ሜክሪን በመጠቀም አስተማርነው ነበር፡፡ የስፓኒሽ ቋንቋ አካባቢ ሀገር ሀገር አ ደረሰ፡፡', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel ons toegang aan die taak 5 van die semievaal-2019, wat doel om haat spreek teen imigrante en vroue in Twitter te ontdek. Die taak bestaan van twee sub-opdragte, in Spaanse en Engels: (A) opdekking van haatspraak en (B) klasifikasie van haatste tweete as aggressief of nie, en identifikasie van die doel wat as individuele of groep verdruk is. Ons het lingwisieslik motiveer funksies en verskeie tipe n-grame gebruik (woorde, karakters, funksionele woorde, punktuasie simbole, POS, onder ander). Vir taak A, het ons 'n ondersteunde vektor masjien opgelei met 'n kombinasieële raamwerk, terwyl vir taak B gevolg ons 'n multi-etiketeerde toegang gebruik die Lukrake woestklassifiseerder. Ons toegang het die hoogste F1-telling in subtaak A vir die Spaanse taal bereik.", 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը ներկայացնում է մեր մոտեցումը 2019 թվականի կեսնամյակի 5-ի հանձնարարությանը, որի նպատակով է հայտնաբերել ատելության խոսքերը ներգրավողների և կանանց դեմ Թվիթերում: The task consists of two sub-tasks, in Spanish and English: (A) detection of hate speech and (B) classification of hateful tweets as aggressive or not, and identification of the target harassed as individual or group.  Մենք օգտագործեցինք լեզվաբանական մոտիվացված առանձնահատկություններ և n-գրամ բազմաթիվ տեսակներ (բառեր, հերոսներ, ֆունկցիոնալ բառեր, կետավորման սիմվոլներ, POS, մյուսների թվում): Ա-ի առաջադրանքի համար մենք ուսուցանեցինք աջակցության մեքենա օգտագործելով համադրական շրջանակ, մինչդեռ B-ի առաջադրանքի համար մենք հետևեցինք բազմաթիկված մոտեցումներին՝ օգտագործելով պատահական անտառի դասակարգչին: Our approach achieved the highest F1-score in sub-task A for the Spanish language.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt 2019-in yarısının 5-ci Misasına yaxınlaşmağımızı göstərir ki, Twitter-də göçənlərə və qadınlara qarşı nifrət sözlərini keçirmək nifrətindən söhbət edir. Bu iş İspanyolca və İngilizce dilində iki sub-task içərisindədir: A) nifrət sözlərini tanıma və (B) nifrət twetlərini agresif və ya yoxdur, və individu ya da grup olaraq təhlükəsizlənmiş məqsədini tanıma. Biz dilində motivatlı fəaliyyətlər və n-gramların bir neçə n övü istifadə etdik. A işi üçün, birləşdirilmiş bir çarşıq vasitəsilə birləşdirilmiş bir Support Vector Makinesi təhsil etdik, amma B işi üçün Random Forest klasifikatı vasitəsilə çoxlu etiketli bir approach uyduq. Bizim tərəfimiz İspanyol dilində A sub-task üçün ən yüksək F1-score qəbul etdi.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা সেমেভাল-২০১৯-এর কাজের ৫টি কাজে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ উপস্থাপন করেছে, যার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে টুইটারে অভিবাসী এবং নারীদের বির স্প্যানিশ ও ইংরেজি ভাষায় দুটি সাব-কাজ রয়েছে: এ) ঘৃণা বাক্য এবং (বি) ঘৃণাকারী টুইটের বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন ব্যক্তি অথবা গ্রুপ হিসেবে ঘৃণাকারী হিসে আমরা ভাষাভাষায় উৎসাহিত বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং বেশ কয়েকটি ধরনের n-গ্রাম ব্যবহার করেছি (শব্দ, চরিত্র, কার্যকর শব্দ, প্রতীক, পোস, অন্যান্ কাজ A এর জন্য আমরা একটি সমর্থন ভেক্টর মেশিনের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণ দিয়েছি একটি মিনিটেটরিয়াল ফ্রেম ব্যবহার করে, কিন্তু কাজ বি-এর জন্য আমরা অনুসরণ করেছ আমাদের পদক্ষেপ স্প্যানিশ ভাষার জন্য সাব-কাজ A এর সর্বোচ্চ F1-স্কোর অর্জন করেছে।', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja naš pristup zadatku 5 polovičnog 2019. godine, koji je cilj otkrivanja govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena na Twitter-u. Taj zadatak se sastoji od dva podzadataka, na španjolskom i engleskom jeziku: A) otkrivanje govora mržnje i B) klasifikacije mrznih tweeta kao agresivne ili ne, te identifikacija meta koja je napadnuta kao individualna ili grupa. Koristili smo jezički motivirane karakteristike i nekoliko vrsta n-grama (riječi, likovi, funkcionalne riječi, simboli točke, POS, među drugima). Za zadatak A, vježbali smo motor podrške Vektora koristeći kombinacijski okvir, dok smo za zadatak B slijedili višeoznačeni pristup koristeći Random Forest klasifikator. Naš pristup je postigao najviši rezultat F1 u podzadatku A za španjolski jezik.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis tutvustatakse meie lähenemisviisi Semeval-2019 ülesandele 5, mille eesmärk on tuvastada sisserändajate ja naiste vihakõne Twitteris. Ülesanne koosneb kahest alamülesandest, hispaania ja inglise keeles: (A) vihkamiskõne tuvastamine ja (B) vihkamiskõnede liigitamine agressiivseks või mitte ning ahistatava sihtmärgi identifitseerimine individuaalse või grupina. Kasutasime keeleliselt motiveeritud funktsioone ja mitut tüüpi n-gramme (sõnad, tähemärgid, funktsionaalsed sõnad, kirjavahemärgid, POS jne). Ülesande A puhul koolitasime tugivektorimasinat kombinaatorilise raamistiku abil, ülesande B puhul aga juhusliku metsa klassifikaatori abil kasutasime mitmemärgistatud lähenemisviisi. Meie lähenemine saavutas Hispaania keele alamülesandes A suurima F1-skoori.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään lähestymistapamme Semeval-2019 -hankkeen tehtävään 5, jonka tavoitteena on tunnistaa maahanmuuttajiin ja naisiin kohdistuva vihapuhe Twitterissä. Tehtävä koostuu kahdesta osatehtävästä, espanjaksi ja englanniksi: (A) vihapuheen havaitseminen ja (B) vihatwiittien luokittelu aggressiiviseksi tai ei-aggressiiviseksi ja ahdisteltavan kohteen tunnistaminen yksilöksi tai ryhmäksi. Käytimme kielellisesti motivoituneita ominaisuuksia ja useita n-grammoja (esim. sanoja, merkkejä, toiminnallisia sanoja, välimerkkejä, POS). Tehtävässä A koulutimme tukivektorikoneen kombinatorisella kehyksellä, kun taas tehtävässä B noudatimme monimerkkistä lähestymistapaa Random Forest -luokituksella. Lähestymistapamme saavutti korkeimmat F1-pisteet osatehtävässä A espanjan kielellä.', 'ca': "Aquest paper presenta el nostre enfocament a la tasca 5 del Semeval-2019, que mira a detectar discurs d'odi contra immigrants i dones a Twitter. La tasca consisteix en dues subtasques, en espanyol i anglès: (A) detecció del discurs d'odi i (B) classificació dels tweets odiosos com agressius o no, i identificació del objectiu assetjat com a individu o grup. We used linguistically motivated features and several types of n-grams (words, characters, functional words, punctuation symbols, POS, among others).  Per a la tasca A, vam formar una màquina de suport amb un marc combinatori, mentre que per a la tasca B vam seguir un enfocament multietiquetat fent servir el classificador Random Forest. El nostre enfocament va aconseguir la puntuació F1 més alta en la subtasca A per al llenguatge espanyol.", 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje náš přístup k úkolu 5 Semeval-2019, jehož cílem je odhalení nenávistných projevů proti imigrantům a ženám na Twitteru. Úkol se skládá ze dvou dílčích úkolů, ve španělštině a angličtině: (A) detekce nenávistné řeči a (B) klasifikace nenávistných tweetů jako agresivních či nikoli a identifikace cíle obtěžovaného jako jednotlivce nebo skupiny. Použili jsme jazykově motivované prvky a několik typů n-gramů (slova, znaky, funkční slova, interpunkční symboly, POS atd.). Pro úlohu A jsme vycvičili Support Vector Machine pomocí kombinatorického frameworku, zatímco pro úlohu B jsme použili víceznačkový přístup pomocí klasifikátoru Random Forest. Náš přístup dosáhl nejvyššího skóre F1 v podúkolu A pro španělský jazyk.', 'jv': 'Perintah sing berarti nggawe gerara tanggal 5 (task 5) ning semi-2011, iki dadi kanggo ngilanggar tarjamahan kanggo ngilanggar kuwi tindakan kejahatan karo perkaraan-perkaraan kanggo nyungangge kuwi etiket online. Ombudhakan langkung durung apa-task, Spanish karo Perancis (A) Anyone Er task A, we derangit un Help vector Device nggambar sistem combining, perusahaan kanggo task B we sewis banter un multi-label method nggambar gambar Paused Nalika dhéwé kuwi wis ngerasai kanggo kelas F1-uwong sing paling dhéwé ning pangan A kanggo kelas Spanish.', 'ha': "This paper presents our approach to the Task 5 of Semeval-2019, which aims at detecting hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter.  Kayan aikin da ke ƙunsa da task õki biyu, cikin Isbanish da Ingiriya: (A) za'a gane magana na ƙeta kuma (B) mai classified na Twitter masu ƙiyayya kamar kibana ko kuma ba, kuma an gane goan da aka haramta su kamar jama'a ko jama'a. Mun yi amfani da wasu irin na n-gram (magana, characters, words, journin aiki, symboli masu bastarwa, PoS, da wasu). Ga aikin A, muka kõre wani mashine na Support Tayiyinmu ya isa mafiya kyauta F1 cikin aikin A kan harshen Isbanish.", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מציג את הגישה שלנו למשימה 5 של חצי ימי 2019, המטרה לגלות נאום שנאה נגד מהגרים ונשים בטוויטר. המשימה מורכבת משני משימות תת-משימות, בספרדית ואנגלית: (A) גילוי נאום שנאה (B) מסווג של טוויטים שנאה כאגרסיביים או לא, וזהוי של המטרה המוטרד כאדם או קבוצה. השתמשנו בתוכניות מוטיבציות שפתית וכמה סוגים של n-גרם (מילים, דמויות, מילים פונקציונליות, סמלים נקודה, POS, בין אחרים). למשימה א, אימנו מכונת קטור תמיכה באמצעות מסגרת קומבינטורית, בעוד למשימה ב עקבנו אחרי גישה עם תווים רבים באמצעות מסגרת יער אקראי. הגישה שלנו השיגה את נקודת F1 הגבוהה ביותר בתפקיד א של השפה הספרדית.', 'sk': 'Prispevek predstavlja naš pristop k nalogi 5 Semeval-2019, katere cilj je odkrivanje sovražnega govora proti priseljencem in ženskam v Twitterju. Naloga je sestavljena iz dveh podnalog, v španščini in angleščini: (A) odkrivanje sovražnega govora in (B) klasifikacija sovražnih tweetov kot agresivne ali ne ter identifikacija nadlegovanega tarče kot posameznika ali skupine. Uporabili smo jezikovno motivirane značilnosti in več vrst n-gramov (besede, znaki, funkcionalne besede, ločilni simboli, POS, med drugim). Za nalogo A smo usposobili podporni vektorski stroj z uporabo kombinatorskega okvira, za nalogo B pa smo sledili večoznačenemu pristopu z uporabo klasifikatorja Random Forest. Naš pristop je dosegel najvišjo oceno F1 v podnalogi A za španski jezik.', 'bo': 'དེ་གིས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ལ་ང་ཚོའི་གོ་སྐབས་ལྔའི་ལོ་རྒྱལ་བཞིན་པའི་དུས་ལྔའི་ནང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ང་ཚ བྱ་ཚིག་ནང་དུ་སྒེར་གྱི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་གཉིས་ལས་གནོད་བཀོད་གྱི་ནང་། We used linguistically motivated features and several types of n-grams (words, characters, functional words, punctuation symbols, POS, among others). For task A, we trained a Support Vector Machine using a combinatorial framework, whereas for task B we followed a multi-labeled approach using the Random Forest classifier. In addition, we followed a multi-labeled approach using the Random Forest classifier. ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་གཅིག་གི་ནང་དུ་F1-རིམ་པ་གཙོ་ཤིག་ཡོད་པ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'STUFIIT at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Multilingual Hate Speech Detection on Twitter with MUSE and ELMo Embeddings', 'fr': 'STUFIIT au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 5\xa0: Détection des discours haineux multilingues sur Twitter avec MUSE et ElMo Embeddings', 'ar': 'STUFIIT في SemEval-2019 المهمة 5: اكتشاف الكلام الذي يحض على الكراهية متعدد اللغات على Twitter باستخدام MUSE و ELMo Embeddings', 'es': 'STUFIIT en la Tarea 5 de SemEval-2019: Detección multilingüe de discursos de odio en Twitter con incrustaciones de MUSE y eLMO', 'pt': 'STUFIIT no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 5: Detecção de Discurso de Ódio Multilíngue no Twitter com Embeddings MUSE e ELMo', 'ja': 'SEMEval -2019のSTUFIITタスク5 ： MUSEとELMoの埋め込みによるTwitterでの多言語ヘイトスピーチ検出', 'zh': 'STUFIIT在SemEval-2019务5:用MUSE与ELMo嵌Twitter多言仇言', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 टास्क 5 पर STUFIIT: MUSE और ELMo एम्बेडिंग के साथ ट्विटर पर बहुभाषी हेट स्पीच डिटेक्शन', 'ru': 'STUFIIT на SemEval-2019 Задача 5: Многоязычное обнаружение ненавистнической речи в Twitter с MUSE и ELMo Embeddings', 'ga': 'STUFIIT ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 5: Brath Cainte Ilteangacha ar Fuath ar Twitter le Leabú MUSE agus ELMo', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εργασία 5: Πολυγλωσσική ανίχνευση ομιλίας μίσους στο Twitter με ενσωμάτωση MUSE και ELMo', 'hu': 'STUFIT a SemEval-2019 5. feladat: Többnyelvű gyűlölet beszédfelismerés Twitteren MUSE és ELMo Embeddings segítségével', 'it': "STUFIT a SemEval-2019 Task 5: Rilevamento multilingue del discorso d'odio su Twitter con MUSE ed ELMo Embeddings", 'kk': 'STUFIIT at semiEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Hate Speech Detection on Twitter with MUSE and ELMo Embeddings', 'mk': 'СтУФИТ на SemEval-2019 задача 5: Детектирање на мултијазички говор на омраза на Твитер со МУСЕ и ЕЛМО вградувања', 'lt': '5 užduotis: Daugiakalbis neapykantos kalbos aptikimas Twitter su MUSE ir ELMo įranga', 'ms': 'STUFIIT di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Pengesanan Ucapan Kebencian Berbahasa dalam Twitter dengan MUSE dan ELMo Embeddings', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 5-ല്\u200d സ്റ്റുഫിള്റ്', 'mt': 'STUFIIT f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 5: Sejbien ta’ diskors multilingwi ta’ mibegħda fuq Twitter ma’ MUSE u ELMo Embeddings', 'mn': 'STUFIIT at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Hate Speech Detection on Twitter with MUSE and ELMo Embeddings', 'no': 'STUFIIT på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 5: Multilingual Hate Speech Detection on Twitter with MUSE and ELMo Embeddings', 'pl': 'Zadanie 5: Wielojęzyczne wykrywanie mowy nienawiści na Twitterze z wbudowaniami MUSE i ELMo', 'ro': 'STUFIT la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 5: Detectarea discursului multilingv de ură pe Twitter cu MUSE și ELMo Embeddings', 'sr': 'STUFIIT na semiEval-2019 zadatak 5: otkrivanje višejezičkih govora mržnje na Twitter sa MUSE i ELMo integracijama', 'si': 'STUFIIT at semeval-2019 Job 5: Multilanguage Hate Talk Detection on Twitter with MUSE and ELMo Embeading', 'so': 'STUFIIT at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Neceb Speech Detection of Luqad badan Hatay Speech on Twitter with MUSE and ELMo Embeds', 'sv': 'STUFIT på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 5: Flerspråkig hattalsdetektering på Twitter med MUSE och ELMo Embeddings', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 5: MUSE மற்றும் ELMo Embeddings உடன் பல மொழி வெறுப்பு பேச்சு கண்டுபிடி', 'ur': 'STUFIIT at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Hate Speech Detection on Twitter with MUSE and ELMo Embeddings', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifani 5: MUSE va ELMo Emblemalari bilan bir nechta tilni aniqlash', 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu tại Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-2009 5: phát hiện ngôn ngữ căm ghét đa dạng trên Twitter cùng với Các hoạt động của MUTO và ElMo.', 'bg': 'Задача 5: Многоезично откриване на реч на омразата в Туитър с вграждания на МУСЕ и ЕЛМО', 'da': 'STUFIT på SemEval-2019 Opgave 5: Flersproget Hade Speech Detection på Twitter med MUSE og ELMo Embeddings', 'hr': 'STUFIIT na semiEval-2019 zadatak 5: otkrivanje višejezičkih govora mržnje na Twitter s MUSE i ELMo uključenim', 'nl': 'STUFILT op SemEval-2019 Taak 5: Meertalige haatspraakdetectie op Twitter met MUSE en ELMo Embeddings', 'de': 'STUFILT auf der SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 5: Mehrsprachige Hate Speech Detection auf Twitter mit MUSE und ELMo Embeddings', 'ko': 'Stufit의 SemEval-19 작업 5: MUSE와 ELMo를 사용하여 트위터에 삽입된 다중 언어 증오 음성 검사', 'id': 'STUFIIT di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Deteksi Bicara Kebencian Berbahasa Berbahasa di Twitter dengan MUSE dan ELMo Embeddings', 'fa': 'STUFIIT در ماموریت ۲۰۱۹ کار ۵: کشف سخنرانی متنفر زبان\u200cهای زیادی روی توئیتر با استخراج MUSE و ELMo', 'sw': 'STUFIIT kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 5: Utafiti wa Hotuba ya Kilugha Kuchukia lugha nyingi kwenye mtandao wa Twita na Mazungumzo ya MUSE na ELMo', 'tr': 'STUFIIT at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Hate Speech Detection on Twitter with MUSE and ELMo Embeddings', 'af': 'STUFIIT by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 5: Multilingual Hate Speech Detection on Twitter with MUSE and ELMo Embeddings', 'sq': 'STUFIIT në SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Hate Speech Detection on Twitter with MUSE and ELMo Embeddings', 'am': 'ስራ 5:', 'hy': 'ՍՏUFIIT-ը ՍեմԷվալ 2019 թվականին 5. հանձնարարությունը. բազմալեզու ատելության խոսքի հայտնաբերումը Թվիթերի վրա, ՄուՍԵ և ԷԼՄՕ ներգրավման միջոցով', 'az': 'STUFIIT at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Hate Speech Detection on Twitter with MUSE and ELMo Embeddings', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কার্যক্রম ৫-এ স্টুফেল্ট: মাউসি এবং এলমো এমবেডিং দিয়ে টুইটারে বহুভাষায় ঘৃণা ভাষণের অভিযোগ গ গ্রহণ করা হয়েছে।', 'bs': 'STUFIIT na semiEval-2019 zadatak 5: otkrivanje višejezičkih govora mržnje na Twitter sa MUSE i ELMo integracijama', 'cs': 'Úkol 5: Vícejazyčná detekce nenávistné řeči na Twitteru s vložením MUSE a ELMo', 'ca': 'STUFIIT a SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Hate Speech Detection on Twitter with MUSE and ELMo Embeddings', 'et': 'STUFIIT SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 5: Mitmekeelse vihkamise kõne tuvastamine Twitteris MUSE ja ELMo manustamisega', 'fi': 'STUFIIT SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 5: Monikielinen vihapuheen havaitseminen Twitterissä MUSE- ja ELMo-upotusten avulla', 'jv': 'stop', 'sk': 'STUFIIT na SemEval-2019 Naloga 5: Večjezično zaznavanje sovražnega govora na Twitterju z vdelavami MUSE in ELMo', 'he': 'STUFIIT ב SemEval-2019 משימה 5: גילוי נאום שונא רבות שפתיים בטוויטר עם MUSE ו ELMo Embeddings', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'bo': 'STUFIIT at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Hate Speech Detection on Twitter with MUSE and ELMo Embeddings'}
{'en': 'We present a number of models used for hate speech detection for Semeval 2019 Task-5 : Hateval. We evaluate the viability of multilingual learning for this task. We also experiment with adversarial learning as a means of creating a multilingual model. Ultimately our multilingual models have had worse results than their monolignual counterparts. We find that the choice of word representations (word embeddings) is very crucial for deep learning as a simple switch between MUSE and ELMo embeddings has shown a 3-4 % increase in accuracy. This also shows the importance of context when dealing with online content.', 'ar': 'نقدم عددًا من النماذج المستخدمة لاكتشاف الكلام الذي يحض على الكراهية في Semeval 2019 Task-5: Hateval. نقوم بتقييم جدوى التعلم متعدد اللغات لهذه المهمة. نجرب أيضًا التعلم العدائي كوسيلة لإنشاء نموذج متعدد اللغات. في النهاية ، حققت نماذجنا متعددة اللغات نتائج أسوأ من نظيراتها أحادية اللغة. لقد وجدنا أن اختيار تمثيل الكلمات (تضمين الكلمة) أمر بالغ الأهمية للتعلم العميق حيث أظهر التبديل البسيط بين تضمين MUSE و ELMo زيادة في الدقة بنسبة 3-4٪. يوضح هذا أيضًا أهمية السياق عند التعامل مع المحتوى عبر الإنترنت.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un certain nombre de modèles utilisés pour la détection des discours haineux pour Semeval 2019 Task-5\xa0: Hateval. Nous évaluons la viabilité de l'apprentissage multilingue pour cette tâche. Nous expérimentons également l'apprentissage contradictoire comme moyen de créer un modèle multilingue. En fin de compte, nos modèles multilingues ont obtenu de moins bons résultats que leurs homologues monolingues. Nous trouvons que le choix des représentations de mots (intégrations de mots) est très important pour le deep learning, car le simple passage entre les intégrations MUSE et ElMo a montré une augmentation de 3 à 4% de la précision. Cela montre également l'importance du contexte lorsqu'il s'agit de contenu en ligne.", 'es': 'Presentamos una serie de modelos utilizados para la detección del discurso de odio para la Tarea 5 de Semeval 2019: Hateval. Evaluamos la viabilidad del aprendizaje multilingüe para esta tarea. También experimentamos con el aprendizaje contradictorio como medio de crear un modelo multilingüe. En última instancia, nuestros modelos multilingües han tenido peores resultados que sus homólogos monolingües. Descubrimos que la elección de las representaciones de palabras (incrustaciones de palabras) es muy importante para el aprendizaje profundo, ya que un simple cambio entre las incrustaciones de MUSE y eLMO ha mostrado un aumento de 3-4% en la precisión. Esto también demuestra la importancia del contexto cuando se trata de contenido en línea.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos vários modelos usados para detecção de discurso de ódio para o Semeval 2019 Task-5: Hateval. Avaliamos a viabilidade da aprendizagem multilíngue para esta tarefa. Também experimentamos a aprendizagem adversária como meio de criar um modelo multilíngue. Em última análise, nossos modelos multilíngues tiveram resultados piores do que seus equivalentes monolíngues. Descobrimos que a escolha das representações de palavras (incorporação de palavras) é muito crucial para o aprendizado profundo, pois uma simples alternância entre as incorporações MUSE e ELMo mostrou um aumento de 3-4% na precisão. Isso também mostra a importância do contexto ao lidar com conteúdo online.', 'ja': '私たちは、Semeval 2019 Task -5: Hatevalのヘイトスピーチ検出に使用されるいくつかのモデルを提示します。私たちは、この課題のための多言語学習の実行可能性を評価します。また、多言語モデルを作成する手段として対抗学習を試みています。最終的に、私たちの多言語モデルは、単一言語のモデルよりも悪い結果をもたらしました。単語表現（単語埋め込み）の選択は、MUSEとELMo埋め込みの単純な切り替えにより、精度が3 ～ 4 ％向上したため、ディープラーニングにとって非常に重要であることがわかりました。これはまた、オンラインコンテンツを扱う際のコンテキストの重要性を示しています。', 'zh': '为Semeval 2019 Task-5:Hateval多仇言检测。 评多言学之可行性。 尝试以对抗性学为多言模样。 终于多言模形者,甚于单一。 臣按:单词言(单词嵌)之选,于深学为重,盖MUSEELMo之间切换已见准确性增3-4%也。 此亦见在线上下文之要也。', 'hi': 'हम सेमेवल 2019 टास्क -5 के लिए हेट स्पीच डिटेक्शन के लिए उपयोग किए जाने वाले कई मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं: हेटवल। हम इस कार्य के लिए बहुभाषी सीखने की व्यवहार्यता का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हम एक बहुभाषी मॉडल बनाने के साधन के रूप में प्रतिकूल सीखने के साथ भी प्रयोग करते हैं। अंततः हमारे बहुभाषी मॉडल के पास उनके मोनोलिगन्यूअल समकक्षों की तुलना में बदतर परिणाम हैं। हम पाते हैं कि शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व (शब्द एम्बेडिंग) का विकल्प गहरी शिक्षा के लिए बहुत महत्वपूर्ण है क्योंकि MUSE और ELMo एम्बेडिंग के बीच एक साधारण स्विच ने सटीकता में 3-4% की वृद्धि दिखाई है। यह ऑनलाइन सामग्री से निपटने के दौरान संदर्भ के महत्व को भी दर्शाता है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем ряд моделей, используемых для обнаружения ненавистнических высказываний для задачи 5 Semeval 2019: Hateval. Мы оцениваем жизнеспособность многоязычного обучения для этой задачи. Мы также экспериментируем с состязательным обучением как средством создания многоязычной модели. В конечном итоге наши многоязычные модели дали худшие результаты, чем их монолингвистические аналоги. Мы обнаружили, что выбор словопрезентаций (вложений слов) очень важен для глубокого обучения, поскольку простой переход между вложениями MUZE и ELMo показал увеличение точности на 3-4%. Это также показывает важность контекста при работе с онлайн-контентом.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair roinnt samhlacha a úsáidtear chun fuathchaint a bhrath le haghaidh Tasc-5: Fuath-chaint Semeval 2019. Déanaimid measúnú ar inmharthanacht na foghlama ilteangacha don tasc seo. Déanaimid tástáil freisin ar fhoghlaim sháraíochta mar mhodh chun samhail ilteangach a chruthú. Ar deireadh thiar bhí torthaí níos measa ag ár múnlaí ilteangacha ná a gcomhghleacaithe aonteangacha. Faighimid amach go bhfuil rogha na n-ionadaíochtaí focal (leabú focal) an-ríthábhachtach don fhoghlaim dhomhain mar tá méadú 3-4% tagtha ar chruinneas aistriú simplí idir leabaithe MUSE agus ELMo. Léiríonn sé seo freisin an tábhacht a bhaineann le comhthéacs agus tú ag déileáil le hábhar ar líne.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ გამოყენებთ რამდენიმე მოდელები, რომლებიც გამოყენებულია მპანელი სიტყვების განახლებისთვის 2019 წლის სამუშაო დავალებისთვის: Hateval. ჩვენ მრავალენგური სწავლების ცხოვრებელობას ამ დავალებისთვის გავამუშავებთ. ჩვენ ასევე ექსპერიმენტირებით განსაკუთრებული სწავლებით, როგორც მრავალენგური მოდელის შექმნა. საბოლოოდ ჩვენი მრავალენგური მოდელები იყო უკეთესი წარმოდგენებისგან მათი მონოლიგური კონტრები. ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ, რომ სიტყვის გამოსახულებების (სიტყვის გამოსახულებების) გამოყენება ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანია ძალიან გასაკეთებელი სიტყვის, როგორც მუშაობა და ELMo-ის გამოსახულებების შორის გა ეს კონტექსტის მნიშვნელობა ასევე ჩვენებს, როდესაც ინტერნეტის შესახებ.', 'hu': 'A Semeval 2019 feladat-5: Hateval számos gyűlöletbeszéd felismerésére használt modellt mutatunk be. Ennek érdekében értékeljük a többnyelvű tanulás életképességét. Az ellenséges tanulással is kísérletezünk, mint egy többnyelvű modell létrehozásának eszköze. Végül is többnyelvű modelleink rosszabb eredményeket értek el, mint monolignuális társaik. Úgy találjuk, hogy a szóreprezentációk (szóbeágyazások) kiválasztása nagyon fontos a mélytanulás szempontjából, mivel a MUSE és ELMo beágyazások közötti egyszerű váltás 3-4%-os pontosságot mutatott. Ez azt is mutatja, hogy milyen fontos a kontextus az online tartalmakkal való foglalkozás.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια σειρά μοντέλων που χρησιμοποιούνται για την ανίχνευση ρητορικής μίσους για το έργο Εργασία-5: Χατεβάλ. Αξιολογούμε τη βιωσιμότητα της πολύγλωσσης μάθησης για το έργο αυτό. Επίσης πειραματιζόμαστε με την αντικρουστική μάθηση ως μέσο δημιουργίας ενός πολύγλωσσου μοντέλου. Τελικά τα πολύγλωσσα μοντέλα μας είχαν χειρότερα αποτελέσματα από τα μονογλωσσικά ομόλογά τους. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι η επιλογή των αναπαραστάσεων λέξεων (ενσωμάτωση λέξεων) είναι πολύ σημαντική για τη βαθιά μάθηση καθώς μια απλή εναλλαγή μεταξύ ενσωμάτωσης και ενσωμάτωσης έχει δείξει 3-4% αύξηση στην ακρίβεια. Αυτό δείχνει επίσης τη σημασία του πλαισίου όταν ασχολείται με διαδικτυακό περιεχόμενο.', 'it': "Presentiamo una serie di modelli utilizzati per il rilevamento del discorso d'odio per Semeval 2019 Task-5: Hateval. Valutiamo la fattibilità dell'apprendimento multilingue per questo compito. Sperimentiamo anche l'apprendimento avversario come mezzo per creare un modello multilingue. In definitiva i nostri modelli multilingue hanno avuto risultati peggiori rispetto ai loro omologhi monolignali. Troviamo che la scelta delle rappresentazioni di parole (embedding di parole) è molto cruciale per il deep learning in quanto un semplice passaggio tra embedding MUSE e ELMo ha mostrato un aumento del 3-4% in accuratezza. Ciò dimostra anche l'importanza del contesto quando si tratta di contenuti online.", 'kk': 'Біз 2019 жылдың жарым-жарым тапсырманы анықтау үшін қолданатын бірнеше моделдерді таңдаймыз. Бұл тапсырма үшін бірнеше тілді оқыту мүмкіндігін бағалаймыз. Біз басқа қарсы оқыту үшін көп тіл үлгісін құру үшін тәжірибелеріміз. Соңында біздің көптілік үлгілеріміздің монолингуналық партнерінен артық нәтижелері болды. Біз сөздерді таңдау (сөздерді ендіру) үшін қарапайым оқыту үшін көңіл ауыстыру үшін МУС және ELMo ендіру арасындағы қарапайым ауыстыру үшін 3-4% деген дұрыстығын көрсетті. Бұл сондай-ақ онлайн мазмұнымен қатынау үшін контекстің маңыздысын көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome keletą modelių, naudojamų neapykantos kalbų aptikimui 2019 m. pusmečio užduotis-5: Hateval. Vertiname daugiakalbio mokymosi gyvybingumą šioje užduotyje. Taip pat eksperimentuojame su priešingu mokymusi kaip daugiakalbio modelio kūrimo priemone. Galiausiai mūsų daugiakalbiai modeliai turėjo blogesnių rezultatų nei jų monoligniniai kolegos. Mes manome, kad žodžių atstovavimų pasirinkimas (žodžių įterpimas) labai svarbus giliam mokymuisi, nes paprastas keitimas tarp MUSE ir ELMo įterpimo parodė 3–4 % tikslumo padidėjimą. Tai taip pat rodo konteksto svarbą, kai kalbama apie internetinį turinį.', 'mk': 'Презентираме голем број модели кои се користат за детекција на говор на омраза за половекот 2019 задача 5: Хатевал. Ја проценуваме животноста на мултијазичкото учење за оваа задача. Исто така експериментираме со противно учење како начин за создавање мултијазичен модел. Најпосле нашите мултијазични модели имаат полоши резултати од нивните монолигнуални колеги. Најдовме дека изборот на репрезентации на зборови (вложување на зборови) е многу клучен за длабоко учење, бидејќи едноставниот прекин помеѓу вложувањето на МУСЕ и ЕЛМО покажа зголемување на прецизноста од 3 до 4 отсто. This also shows the importance of context when dealing with online content.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan beberapa model yang digunakan untuk pengesan ucapan kebencian untuk Semeval 2019 Task-5: Hateval. Kami menilai kemampuan pembelajaran berbilang bahasa untuk tugas ini. Kami juga eksperimen dengan pembelajaran musuh sebagai cara untuk mencipta model berbilang bahasa. Akhirnya, model berbilang bahasa kami mempunyai hasil yang lebih buruk daripada rekan-rekan monolignal mereka. Kami mendapati bahawa pilihan perwakilan perkataan (penyembelihan perkataan) sangat penting untuk belajar dalam sebagai tukar sederhana antara penyembelihan MUSE dan ELMo telah menunjukkan peningkatan kepekatan 3-4%. Ini juga menunjukkan kepentingan konteks bila berurusan dengan kandungan online.', 'ml': 'സെമെവാല്\u200d 2019 ടാസ്ക്-5: ഹാറ്റെവേല്\u200d. ഈ ജോലിക്കുള്ള പല ഭാഷ പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ജീവിതം നമ്മള്\u200d വിലയിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. നമ്മളും വിരോധമായ പഠനത്തില്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു പല ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കാനുള്ള വഴിയാണ്. അവസാനം നമ്മുടെ പല ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് അവരുടെ രാജ്യത്തെക്കാള്\u200d മോശമായ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടായിരുന്നു. വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നത് (വാക്കുകള്\u200d അകത്തേക്ക് വരുന്നത്) ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്നതിന് വളരെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണെന്ന് നമു ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d വിഭവങ്ങളുമായി കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുമ്പോള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട കോണ്\u200dട്ടെക്സ്റ്റോക', 'mn': 'Бид 2019 оны хагас зууны үеийн яриаг нээхэд хэрэглэгдсэн олон загваруудыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид үүнийг олон хэл суралцах чадварыг үнэлдэг. Бид мөн эсрэг суралцаж олон хэл загварыг бүтээх арга хэмжээнд туршилт хийдэг. Эцэст нь бидний олон хэл загварууд монолингнуудын эсрэг хүмүүсээс илүү муу үр дүнтэй. МUSE болон ELMo-ын хоорондын энгийн өөрчлөлт нь 3-4% нь зөв байдлыг нэмэгдүүлсэн. Энэ нь мөн онлайн contentioудтай хамтрах үед нөхцөл байдлын чухал зүйлийг харуулдаг.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw għadd ta’ mudelli użati għall-individwazzjoni tad-diskors tal-mibegħda għas-Semeval 2019 Task-5: Hateval. Nivvalutaw il-vijabbiltà tat-tagħlim multilingwi għal dan il-kompitu. Aħna wkoll qed ninsperimentaw bit-tagħlim avversarju bħala mezz għall-ħolqien ta’ mudell multilingwi. Fl-aħħar mill-aħħar il-mudelli multilingwi tagħna kellhom riżultati agħar mill-kontropartijiet monolingwi tagħhom. Aħna nsibu li l-għa żla tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kliem (inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem) hija kruċjali ħafna għat-tagħlim fil-fond bħala bidla sempliċi bejn l-inkorporazzjonijiet MUSE u ELMo wriet żieda ta’ 3-4 % fil-preċiżjoni. This also shows the importance of context when dealing with online content.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer fleire modeller som brukar for å oppdaga hatespråk for halvåld 2019 Task-5: Hateval. Vi evaluerer fleirspråk læring for denne oppgåva. Vi eksperimenterer også med negativ læring som ein måte å laga ein fleirspråk modell. Til slutt har våre fleirspråk modeller hadde verre resultat enn dei monoligne trekantane sine. Vi finn at valet av ordrepresentasjonar (ordinnbygging) er svært viktig for dypt læring som ein enkel bytt mellom MUSE og ELMo-innbygging har vist eit 3-4% økt i nøyaktighet. Dette viser også viktigheten for kontekst når det gjer betre med nettinnhaldet.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm o serie de modele folosite pentru detectarea discursului de ură pentru Semeval 2019 Task-5: Hateval. Evaluăm viabilitatea învățării multilingve pentru această sarcină. De asemenea, experimentăm cu învățarea adversară ca mijloc de a crea un model multilingv. În cele din urmă, modelele noastre multilingve au avut rezultate mai rele decât omologii lor monolignuali. Considerăm că alegerea reprezentărilor de cuvinte (încorporarea cuvintelor) este foarte crucială pentru învățarea profundă, deoarece o simplă trecere între încorporarea MUSE și ELMo a arătat o creștere de 3-4% a preciziei. Acest lucru arată, de asemenea, importanța contextului atunci când se ocupă de conținutul online.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo broj modela koji se koristi za otkrivanje govora mržnje za polavek 2019. Task-5: Hateval. Procjenjujemo životinju multijezičkog učenja za ovaj zadatak. Takođe eksperimentiramo protivno učenje kao sredstvo stvaranja multijezičkog model a. Na kraju, naši multijezički modeli su imali gore rezultate od njihovih monolignih kolega. Mi smatramo da je izbor predstavljanja riječi (reči ugrađenja) veoma važan za duboko učenje kao jednostavan prekidač između MUSE i ELMo ugrađenja pokazao je povećanje tačnosti od 3-4%. To takođe pokazuje važnost konteksta kada se bavi internetskim sadržajem.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy szereg modeli wykorzystywanych do wykrywania mowy nienawiści dla Semeval 2019 Zadanie-5: Hateval. Oceniamy możliwość wielojęzycznego uczenia się do tego zadania. Eksperymentujemy również z uczeniem się przeciwników jako sposobem tworzenia modelu wielojęzycznego. Ostatecznie nasze wielojęzyczne modele osiągnęły gorsze rezultaty niż ich monoligroczne odpowiedniki. Uważamy, że wybór reprezentacji słów (osadzenia słów) jest bardzo kluczowy dla głębokiego uczenia, ponieważ proste przełączenie pomiędzy osadzeniami MUSE i ELMo wykazało 3-4% wzrost dokładności. Pokazuje to również znaczenie kontekstu przy zajmowaniu się treściami online.', 'si': 'අපි පෙන්වන්නේ වෛර කතාව හොයාගන්න භාවිත විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් අංක අංක අංක අංක අපි මේ වැඩේ ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරනවා. අපි විරෝද්ධ භාෂාවක් නිර්මාණයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. අන්තිමේදී අපේ විශාල භාෂාවක් මොඩල් විද්\u200dයාවක් තියෙන්නේ ඔවුන්ගේ මොනෝලින්ජුල් ප්\u200dරතිකා අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් වචනයේ තෝරණය (වචනය ඇම්බෙන්ඩින්ස්) ගොඩක් ලොකු ඉගෙනගන්න ගොඩක් වැදගත් විදියට MUSE සහ ELMo ඇම්බෙන්ඩින්ස මේක වගේම පෙන්වන්නේ අන්ලයින් සාමාව සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සංවේද', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett antal modeller som används för detektering av hattal för Semeval 2019 Task-5: Hateval. Vi utvärderar livskraften av flerspråkigt lärande för denna uppgift. Vi experimenterar också med kontradiktoriskt lärande som ett sätt att skapa en flerspråkig modell. I slutändan har våra flerspråkiga modeller fått sämre resultat än deras monolignuella motsvarigheter. Vi finner att valet av ordrepresentationer (ordinbäddningar) är mycket avgörande för djupinlärning eftersom en enkel övergång mellan MUSE och ELMo inbäddningar har visat en 3-4% ökning i noggrannhet. Detta visar också betydelsen av sammanhang när det gäller onlineinnehåll.', 'so': 'Waxaan keenaynaa tusaalooyin badan oo loo isticmaalay baaritaanka hadalka nacayb ee Semeval 2019 Task-5: Hateval. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa awoodda waxbarashada luuqadaha kala duduwan. Sidoo kale waxaynu ku jirrabnaa barashada cadaawayaasha ah sida qaab aan u sameyno model luuqad kala duduwan. Ugu dambaysta modelalka luuqadaha kala duduwan waxay lahaayeen midho ka xunxun saaxiibbadooda dowladda ah. Waxaynu ognahay in doorashada qaabilaadda hadalka (hadalka ka soo baxa) ay muhiim u tahay waxbarashada moolka dheer sida bedelka fudud ee u dhexeeya muusikada muUSE iyo ELMo waxay muuqatay kordhiska saxda 3-4% . Taas waxaa sidoo kale ka muuqata muhiimka daboolka marka aad ka baaraandegto waxyaabaha internetka ah.', 'ta': 'நாம் வெறுப்பு பேச்சு கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட சில மாதிரிகளை காண்பிக்கிறோம் அமைப்பு நாம் இந்த பணிக்கு பல மொழி கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் தன்மையை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். பல மொழி மாதிரியை உருவாக்கும் வழியாக நாம் எதிர்பார்த்த கற்றத்தைக் கொண்டு பரிசோதிக்கிறோம். இறுதியில் எங்கள் பல மொழி மாதிரிகளுக்கு மோசமான விளைவுகள் இருந்தன. வார்த்தை குறிப்பிடும் தேர்வு (வார்த்தை குறிப்பிடும்) ஆழம் கற்றுக்கு மிகவும் முக்கியமானது என்று நாம் கண்டுபிடி இதும் இணைய உள்ளடக்கத்தை கொண்டு பார்க்கும்போது முக்கியத்தைக் காட்டுகிறது.', 'ur': 'ہم نے بہت سی موڈل پیش کیے ہیں جو نصف سال 2019 ٹاکس-5: Hateval کے لئے نفرت بولنے کے لئے استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں. ہم اس کام کے لئے بہت سی زبان کی تعلیم کے قابلیت کا ارزش کرتے ہیں۔ ہم بھی مخالف تعلیم کے ساتھ ایک بہت سی زبان مدل بنانے کے لئے آزمائش کرتے ہیں۔ بالآخر ہمارے بہت سی زبان مدلکوں نے ان کے منولینیوں سے بدترین نتیجے پائے ہیں۔ ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ کلمات کی انتخاب (word embeddings) عمیق تعلیم کے لئے بہت ضروری ہے جیسے MUSE اور ELMo انڈینگ کے درمیان ساده سوئیچ کے طور پر ایک 3-4% دقیق افزایش دکھائی ہے۔ یہ بھی آنلاین منصوبات کے بارے میں مشغول ہونے کے موقعیت کا اہم دکھاتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Biz bir necha modellarni sevval 2019 Vazifa-5: Hateval uchun ishlatiladigan. Biz bu vazifaning bir necha tillar o'rganishning hayotini qiymatmiz. Biz ko'pchilik tilning modelini yaratish usuli deb o'rganimiz. Bizning ko'pchilik modellarimiz o'zgarishga o'xshash natijalaridan yomon natijalari bor edi. Biz o'ylaymiz, so'zlar tashkilotlarini (so'zlar bo'lishi) o'rganishga juda muhim, MUSE va ELMo quyidagi oddiy o'rganishni o'rganish uchun oddiy o'rganish uchun juda muhimdir. 3-4% tashkilotni tasdiqlashni ko'rsatadi. @ info: whatsthis", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một số mẫu được dùng để phát hiện ngôn ngữ ghét đối với Semeval 2009 Task-5: Hateval. Chúng tôi đánh giá khả năng học ngôn ngữ nhiều cho nhiệm vụ này. Chúng tôi cũng thử nghiệm việc học theo đối thủ như một phương tiện tạo ra một mô hình ngôn ngữ. Cuối cùng, các mô hình đa dạng của chúng ta đã có kết quả tệ hơn so với so sánh. Chúng tôi thấy sự lựa chọn các diễn viên từ (sự nhúng ghép từ) rất quan trọng cho việc học sâu thành công đơn giản như một công tắc giữa MUTO và ElMo đã cho thấy độ chính xác cao 3-4=. Điều này cũng cho thấy tầm quan trọng của ngữ cảnh khi xử lý nội dung trực tuyến.', 'bg': 'Представяме редица модели, използвани за откриване на реч на омразата за Задача-5: Хетевал. Ние оценяваме жизнеспособността на многоезичното обучение за тази задача. Експериментираме и с противоречивото обучение като средство за създаване на многоезичен модел. В крайна сметка нашите многоезични модели са имали по-лоши резултати от техните монолинггодишни колеги. Намираме, че изборът на думи (вграждания на думи) е много важен за дълбокото учене, тъй като простият превключвател между вгражданията показва 3-4% увеличение на точността. Това показва и значението на контекста при работа с онлайн съдържание.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en række modeller, der bruges til hadefuld tale detektering til Semeval 2019 Task-5: Hateval. Vi vurderer levedygtigheden af flersproget læring til denne opgave. Vi eksperimenterer også med modstridende læring som et middel til at skabe en flersproget model. I sidste ende har vores flersprogede modeller haft dårligere resultater end deres monolignuelle modstykker. Vi finder ud af, at valget af ord repræsentationer (ord embeddings) er meget afgørende for dyb læring, da en simpel skift mellem MUSE og ELMo embeddings har vist en 3-4% stigning i nøjagtighed. Dette viser også vigtigheden af sammenhæng, når det drejer sig om onlineindhold.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo broj modela korištenih za otkrivanje govora mržnje za polovični 2019 Task-5: Hateval. Procjenjujemo životinju multijezičkog učenja za ovaj zadatak. Također eksperimentiramo protivno učenje kao sredstvo stvaranja multijezičkog model a. Na kraju su naši multijezički modeli imali gore rezultate od njihovih monolignuh kolega. Nalazimo da je izbor predstavljanja riječi (uključenje riječi) vrlo važan za duboko učenje kao jednostavan prekidač između MUSE i ELMo uključenja pokazao je povećanje točnosti od 3-4%. To također pokazuje važnost konteksta u odnosu na online sadržaj.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een aantal modellen die worden gebruikt voor haatspraakdetectie voor Semeval 2019 Taak-5: Hateval. We evalueren de haalbaarheid van meertalig leren voor deze taak. We experimenteren ook met tegenstrijdig leren als middel om een meertalig model te creëren. Uiteindelijk hebben onze meertalige modellen slechtere resultaten gehad dan hun monolignuale tegenhangers. We vinden dat de keuze van woordrepresentaties (woord embeddings) zeer cruciaal is voor deep learning omdat een eenvoudige switch tussen MUSE en ELMo embeddings een 3-4% toename in nauwkeurigheid heeft aangetoond. Dit toont ook het belang van context bij het omgaan met online content.', 'de': 'Wir stellen eine Reihe von Modellen vor, die zur Erkennung von Hassreden für Semeval 2019 Task-5: Hateval verwendet werden. Wir bewerten die Tragfähigkeit des mehrsprachigen Lernens für diese Aufgabe. Wir experimentieren auch mit dem adversarialen Lernen als Mittel zur Erstellung eines mehrsprachigen Modells. Letztendlich hatten unsere mehrsprachigen Modelle schlechtere Ergebnisse als ihre monolignualen Pendants. Wir finden, dass die Wahl der Wortrepräsentationen (Word Embeddings) sehr wichtig für Deep Learning ist, da ein einfacher Wechsel zwischen MUSE und ELMo Embeddings eine 3-4% Erhöhung der Genauigkeit gezeigt hat. Dies zeigt auch die Bedeutung des Kontexts beim Umgang mit Online-Inhalten.', 'ko': '우리는 Semeval 2019 퀘스트 5:Hateval에 원한 음성 검출에 사용되는 많은 모델을 제공합니다.우리는 이 임무에서 다국어 학습의 타당성을 평가했다.우리는 또한 대항적 학습을 다언어 모델을 만드는 수단으로 삼으려고 시도했다.결국 우리의 다중 언어 모델의 결과는 단일 언어 모델의 결과보다 더 나쁘다.우리는 단어 표징(단어 삽입)의 선택이 깊이 있는 학습에 매우 관건적이라는 것을 발견했다. 왜냐하면 MUSE와 ELMo 삽입 사이의 간단한 전환은 3-4%의 정확성이 향상되었기 때문이다.이는 온라인 콘텐츠를 처리할 때 언어 환경의 중요성을 나타낸다.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan beberapa model yang digunakan untuk deteksi pidato kebencian untuk Semeval 2019 Task-5: Hateval. Kami menilai kemampuan belajar berbagai bahasa untuk tugas ini. Kami juga eksperimen dengan belajar musuh sebagai cara untuk menciptakan model berbagai bahasa. Akhirnya model berbeda bahasa kita memiliki hasil yang lebih buruk dari rekan monolignal mereka. Kami menemukan bahwa pilihan reprezentasi kata (penyampilan kata) sangat penting untuk belajar dalam sebagai tombol sederhana antara penyampilan MUSE dan ELMo telah menunjukkan peningkatan akurasi 3-4%. Ini juga menunjukkan penting konteks ketika berurusan dengan konten online.', 'fa': 'ما تعدادی از مدل\u200cهای استفاده برای شناسایی سخنرانی متنفر برای پایان دهه\u200cای ۲۰۱۹ تابع-۵: Hateval را نشان می\u200cدهیم. ما قابلیت یادگیری چندین زبان را برای این کار ارزیابی می کنیم. ما همچنین با یادگیری دشمنی به عنوان وسیله ایجاد یک مدل چند زبان آزمایش می کنیم. بالاخره مدل های زیادی زبان ما نتایج بدتری از همکاران monolignual آنها داشته اند. ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که انتخاب نمایش\u200cهای کلمه (عبارت کلمه) برای یادگیری عمیق به عنوان یک تغییر ساده بین استفاده\u200cهای MUSE و ELMo به عنوان افزایش دقیق ۳-۴ درصد نشان داده است. این همچنین موضوع اهمیت محیط را نشان می دهد وقتی با محتوای آنلاین درگیر می شود.', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha mifano kadhaa iliyotumika kwa ajili ya kutambua hotuba ya chuki mnamo Septemba 2019 Kazi-5: Hateval. Tunatathmini uwezekano wa kujifunza lugha mbalimbali kwa kazi hii. Tunajaribu pia kujifunza tofauti kama njia ya kutengeneza muundo wa lugha nyingine. Hatimaye mifano yetu ya lugha mbalimbali imekuwa na matokeo mabaya zaidi ya wenzao wa kifalme. Tunafikiri kuwa chaguo la uwakilishi wa maneno (maneno yanayoingia) ni muhimu sana kwa kujifunza kwa kina kama kubadilisha mabadiliko rahisi kati ya mabango ya MUSE na ELMo imeonyesha kuongezeka kwa asilimia 3-4 kwa usahihi. Hii pia inaonyesha umuhimu wa muktadha unapohusiana na maudhui ya mtandaoni.', 'tr': '2019 Task-5: Hateval. Biz bu zada üçin köp dilli öwrenmeniň täsirini deňleýäris Biz hem täsirli öwrenmek bilen bir multi dil nusgasyny bejermek üçin synanyşýarys. Iň soňunda biziň multi dil nusgalarymyz monolignuz çarpartlaryndan köp netijede bolup geçdi. Biz kelime ifadelerinin seçimi (embedding) derin öğrenmek için çok önemli olduğunu buluyoruz. MUSE ile ELMo ortamları arasındaki basit bir değişiklik şeklinde 3-4% doğruluk artmasını gösteriyor. Bu hem internetde meýdançalary bilen çykyş wagtynda kontekst wajyplygyny görkezýär.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n aantal modele wat gebruik word vir haat spraak beskrywing vir Semevaal 2019 Opdrag-5: Hateval. Ons evalueer die lewendigheid van multilinglike leer vir hierdie taak. Ons het ook eksperimenteer met teëstandige leer as 'n betekening om 'n multitaal model te skep. Eindelik het ons multitaalse modele verder resultate gehad as hulle monolignuale kunstenaars. Ons vind dat die keuse van woord verteenwoordes (woord inbêding) is baie belangrik vir diep leer as 'n eenvoudige wissel tussen MUSE en ELMo inbêding het 'n 3-4% vergroot in presisiteit vertoon. Hierdie wys ook die belangrikheid van konteks wanneer met aanlyn inhoud verwerk word.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një numër modelesh të përdorura për zbulimin e fjalimit të urrejtjes për Gjysmë-vjetorin 2019 Task-5: Hateval. Ne vlerësojmë aftësinë e mësimit shumëgjuhësor për këtë detyrë. We also experiment with adversarial learning as a means of creating a multilingual model.  Në fund modelet tona shumëgjuhësore kanë patur rezultate më të këqija se homologët e tyre monolignorë. Ne zbulojmë se zgjedhja e përfaqësimeve të fjalëve (përfshirje të fjalëve) është shumë vendimtare për mësimin e thellë si një ndërhyrje e thjeshtë midis përfshirjeve të MUSE dhe ELMo ka treguar një rritje prej 3-4% në saktësi. Kjo tregon gjithashtu rëndësinë e kontekstit kur merret me përmbajtjen online.', 'am': 'ለጠል ንግግር ማግኘት የተጠቃሚ ብዙዎችን አቀረብናለን ለስራ-5: Hateval ለዚህ ስራ የብዙ ቋንቋ ትምህርት መግለጫ እናስተውላለን፡፡ በተቃዋሚ ትምህርት የብዙ ቋንቋ ምሳሌ መፍጠር ማድረግ እንሞክራለን፡፡ በመጨረሻው የብዙልዩ ቋንቋዎች ምሳሌዎቻችን ከሀብት ተቃዋሚዎቹ ይልቅ የከፋ ፍሬዎች ነበሩት፡፡ የንግግር መልዕክቶች (የቃላት አካባቢ) መምረጥ በሙሽይና በኤሌምዩም አካባቢዎች መካከል ቀላል ትምህርት መሆኑን ለጥልቅ ትምህርት በጣም ያስፈልጋል ብለን እናገኛለን፡፡ ይህም ደግሞ የመረጃ መረጃ ማቀናጃ በተደረገ ጊዜ የግንኙነቱን ውጤት ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': 'Biz 2019-in yarısı çəkilmək üçün istifadə edilən bir neçə modeli göstəririk. Task-5: Hateval. Biz bu işin çoxlu dil öyrənməsini təmin edirik. Biz də münafiqli öyrənmək üçün çoxlu dil modeli yaratmaq vasitəsi olaraq təcrübə edirik. Sonunda çoxlu dil modellərimiz monolignuz müşriklərindən daha pis sonuçları vardır. Biz sözlərin imzalamalarının seçimi, MUSE və ELMo in şalları arasındakı basit dəyişiklik üçün çox vacib olduğunu görürük ki, 3-4% ədaləti artırdı. Bu da onlayn məzmunları ilə çəkindikdə məlumatların vacibətini göstərir.', 'bn': 'সেমেভাল ২০১৯ সালের কাজ-৫: হ্যাটেভেল। আমরা এই কাজের জন্য বহুভাষা শিক্ষার ব্যাপারে মূল্যায়ন করি। আমরা বিরোধী শিক্ষার সাথে পরীক্ষা করি বহুভাষার মডেল তৈরি করার উপায় হিসেবে। অবশেষে আমাদের বহুভাষার মডেল তাদের রাজতন্ত্রের প্রতিপক্ষের চেয়ে খারাপ ফলাফল পেয়েছে। আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বের (শব্দ প্রতিনিধিত্ব) বেছে নেওয়া গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ব্যাপার যে গভীর শিক্ষার জন্যে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ,  এছাড়াও অনলাইন বিষয়বস্তুর সাথে বিচার করার সময় প্রসঙ্গীতির গুরুত্বপূর্ণ প্রদর্শন করে।', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo broj modela korišćenih za otkrivanje govora mržnje za poluvekovno 2019 Task-5: Hateval. Procjenjujemo životinju multijezičkog učenja za ovaj zadatak. Također eksperimentiramo protivno učenje kao sredstvo stvaranja multijezičkog model a. Na kraju su naši multijezički modeli imali gore rezultate od njihovih monolignih kolega. Nalazimo da je izbor predstavljanja riječi (riječi ugrađenja) vrlo važan za duboko učenje kao jednostavan prekidač između MUSE i ELMo ugrađenja pokazao je povećanje točnosti od 3-4%. To također pokazuje važnost konteksta u odnosu na online sadržaj.', 'ca': "Presentam una sèrie de models utilitzats per la detecció del discurs d'odi al Semeval 2019 Task-5: Hateval. Evaluam la viabilitat de l'aprenentatge multilingüe per a aquesta tasca. També experimentem amb l'aprenentatge adversari com a mitjà de crear un model multilingüe. Finalment, els nostres models multilingües han tingut resultats pitjors que els seus homologues monolignals. Trobem que l'elecció de representacions de paraules (incorporacions de paraules) és molt crucial per a l'aprenentatge profund com un canvi senzill entre incorporacions MUSE i ELMo ha mostrat un increment de 3-4%. Això també demostra l'importància del context quan tractem de continguts en línia.", 'cs': 'Představujeme řadu modelů používaných pro detekci nenávistné řeči pro Semeval 2019 Task-5: Hateval. Hodnotíme životaschopnost vícejazyčného učení pro tento úkol. Experimentujeme také s adversariálním učením jako prostředek k vytvoření vícejazyčného modelu. Nakonec naše vícejazyčné modely měly horší výsledky než jejich monolignární protějšky. Zjišťujeme, že volba slovních reprezentací (vložení slov) je velmi důležitá pro hluboké učení, protože jednoduchý přepínání mezi vložením MUSE a ELMo ukázal 3-4% zvýšení přesnosti. To také ukazuje důležitost kontextu při zacházení s online obsahem.', 'et': 'Tutvustame mitmeid vihkamise kõne tuvastamiseks kasutatavaid mudeleid Semeval 2019 Task-5: Hateval. Hindame mitmekeelse õppe elujõulisust selle ülesande jaoks. Eksperimenteerime ka vastastikust õppimist kui vahendit mitmekeelse mudeli loomiseks. Lõppkokkuvõttes on meie mitmekeelsetel mudelitel olnud halvemaid tulemusi kui nende ühe-aastastel mudelitel. Leiame, et sõnade esituste valik (sõnade manustamine) on sügavõppe jaoks väga oluline, sest lihtne vahetus MUSE ja ELMo manustamiste vahel on näidanud 3–4% suuremat täpsust. See näitab ka konteksti tähtsust veebisisuga tegelemisel.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme useita vihapuheen havaitsemiseen käytettyjä malleja Semeval 2019 Task-5: Hateval. Arvioimme monikielisen oppimisen toteuttamiskelpoisuutta tähän tehtävään. Kokeilemme myös vastakkainasettelua keinona luoda monikielinen malli. Monikieliset mallimme ovat viime kädessä tuottaneet huonompia tuloksia kuin yksikieliset mallit. Mielestämme sanaesitysten valinta (sanaupotukset) on erittäin tärkeää syväoppimisen kannalta, sillä yksinkertainen vaihto MUSE- ja ELMo-upotusten välillä on osoittanut 3–4 prosentin tarkkuuden parantuneen. Tämä osoittaa myös kontekstin merkityksen verkkosisältöä käsiteltäessä.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի շարք մոդելներ, որոնք օգտագործվում են ատելության խոսքի հայտնաբերման համար 2019 թվականի կեսնամյակի 5. հանձնարարության համար. We evaluate the viability of multilingual learning for this task.  Մենք նաև փորձում ենք հակառակ սովորելու միջոցով, որպեսզի ստեղծենք բազլեզու մոդել: Վերջ ի վերջո մեր բազմալեզու մոդելները ավելի վատ արդյունքներ են ունեցել, քան իրենց մոնիգլիանյա գործընկերները: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ բառերի ներդրումների ընտրությունը շատ կարևոր է խորը սովորելու համար, քանի որ պարզ փոխակերպումը ՄուԶ-ի և ELMo-ի ներդրումների միջև ցույց է տալիս ճշգրտության 3-4 տոկոսի աճ: Սա ցույց է տալիս նաև կոնտեքստի կարևորությունը առցանց պարունակության հետ կապված գործի ընթացքում:', 'jv': 'We present a number of modeles used for refreshing words detection for semi-2000task-5: Hadeschal. Awak dhéwé ngejaraké karo akeh bantuan kanggo kelangen langgar kanggo nggawe iki. Awak dhéwé éntuk éntukno karo pakan-pakan seneng sawar kuwi nggawe modèl karo akeh luwih. Banyak, lak model sing akeh multi-lengkang dadi wis rampung ditambah manut karo perangkaran langgar. Awak dhéwé ngerti Iki mungkane ngomong kudu nggawe kontèks seneng nggawe barang online.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מספר דוגמנים שימשים לזהות נאום שנאה עבור חצי ימי 2019 Task-5: Hateval. אנו מעריכים את היציאות של לימוד רב-שפתי למשימה זו. אנחנו גם מנסים עם לימוד יריבי כדרך ליצור מודל רב-שפתי. בסופו של דבר, לדוגמאות רבות לשונות שלנו היו תוצאות גרועות יותר מהשותפים המונוליגניים שלהם. We find that the choice of word representations (word embeddings) is very crucial for deep learning as a simple switch between MUSE and ELMo embeddings has shown a 3-4% increase in accuracy.  זה גם מראה את חשיבות הקשר כשמתמודד עם תוכן באינטרנט.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da wasu misãlai waɗanda aka yi amfani da wa'anar magana na ƙi wa Semewal 2019 Tashin-5: Hateval. Munã ƙaddara wa'anar mulki na'ura wa wannan aikin. Kayya, Munã jarraba da sanar da masu motsi da ke motsi kamar wani misali na'asar mulki. Ga ƙarshen misalinmu masu mulki sun sami matsala mafi sharri daga abõkan mutane na tamki. Tuna gane cewa zaɓen masu tsari da maganar (da aka shigar da magana) yana da muhimu ga sanar da inuwa kamar sauri mai sauƙi a tsakanin MUSU da shirin ELMo ya nuna ƙara tsakanin asilimin 3-4. Wannan yana nuna muhimmin muhimmin muhimmada a lokacin da ke yi husũma da maɓallin akwatin Online.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo številne modele, ki se uporabljajo za odkrivanje sovražnega govora za nalogo Semeval 2019-5: Hateval. Ocenjujemo izvedljivost večjezičnega učenja za to nalogo. Eksperimentiramo tudi kontradiktorsko učenje kot sredstvo za ustvarjanje večjezičnega modela. Naši večjezični modeli so imeli slabše rezultate kot njihovi enoletni modeli. Ugotavljamo, da je izbira besednih predstavitev (besedne vdelave) zelo ključnega pomena za globoko učenje, saj je preprost preklop med vdelavami MUSE in ELMo pokazal 3-4% večjo natančnost. To kaže tudi pomen konteksta pri obravnavi spletnih vsebin.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་དུས་རབས་པའི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་ལྟར་བསམ་བྱུང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཅིག 2019 Task-5: Hateval. ང་ཚོས་བྱ་འགུལ་འདིའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཤེས་ཚད་ལྡན་གྱི་རིམ་པ་གཟུགས་རྩིས་བཏོན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་དབང་ཆ་སྙན་ཐབས་ཤིག་གིས་སྐད་རིགས་དབྱིབས་ཆེ་བ་ཞིག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་ཐབས་ཤིག་ མཐའ་མར་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་རེད། We find that the choice of word representations (word embeddings) is very important for deep learning as a simple switch between MUSE and ELMo embeddings has shown a 3-4% increase in accuracy. དེ་ལ་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ནང་དོན་དང་བྱ་བ་ཐད་སྐབས་ཁོར་ཡུག་གི་གལ་ཆེན་དག་ལ་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'The binary trio at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Multitarget Hate Speech Detection in Tweets', 'fr': 'Le trio binaire au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 5\xa0: Détection multicible des discours haineux dans les tweets', 'ar': 'الثلاثي الثنائي في SemEval-2019 المهمة 5: اكتشاف كلام الكراهية متعدد الأغراض في التغريدات', 'pt': 'O trio binário no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 5: Detecção de Discurso de Ódio Multialvo em Tweets', 'es': 'El trío binario en la Tarea 5 de SemeVal-2019: Detección de discursos de odio multiobjetivo en tuits', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019务5者二进制三重奏:推文多仇言检', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 5 में बाइनरी तिकड़ी: Tweets में Multitarget हेट स्पीच डिटेक्शन', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019タスク5のバイナリトリオ：ツイートでの多目標ヘイトスピーチ検出', 'ru': 'Бинарное трио на SemEval-2019 Задача 5: Многоцелевое обнаружение ненавистнической речи в твитах', 'ga': 'An tríréad dhénártha ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 5: Brath Cainte Il-sprioc ar Fuath in Tweets', 'ka': 'ბიუნარი ტრიო semiEval-2019 დავალება 5: მრავლელი სამყარო სიტყვების განსახულება Tweets-ში', 'el': 'Το δυαδικό τρίο στο έργο 5: Ανίχνευση ομιλίας μίσους πολλαπλών στόχων σε tweets', 'hu': 'A bináris trió a SemEval-2019 5. feladatán: Többcélú gyűlölet beszédfelismerése tweetekben', 'it': "Il trio binario a SemEval-2019 Task 5: Rilevazione di discorsi d'odio multitarget nei tweets", 'kk': 'Жарым- 2019 тапсырмасының бинарлық трионы 5- тапсырмасы: Көп- мақсатты ненавистік сөйлейтін тапсырмаларды табу', 'lt': 'Dvigubasis trio SemEval-2019 5 uždavinys: Daugiatikslinis neapykantos kalbos aptikimas Tweetuose', 'mk': 'Бинарното трио на SemEval-2019 задача 5: Детектирање на мултиметарен говор на омраза на Твитови', 'mt': 'It-trio binarju f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 5: Detezzjoni ta’ diskors ta’ mibegħda b’ħafna miri fit-Tweets', 'ms': 'Trio binari pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Pengesanan Ucapan Kebencian Bersasaran dalam Tweets', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 5-ലെ ബൈനറി ട്രിയോ: ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d പല ലക്ഷ്യം വെറുപ്പുള്ള വാക്ക് ഡിറ്റീഷന്\u200d', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019-н хоёр дахь гурав дахь ажил 5: Многоон зорилго Харамсалтай яриаг Твитт дээр мэдэх', 'no': 'Binær trio på halvEval-2019 oppgåve 5: Multitarget Hate Speech Detection in Tweets', 'pl': 'Trójkąt binarny w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 5: Wielostronne wykrywanie mowy nienawiści w tweetach', 'ro': 'Trio binar la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 5: Detectarea discursului de ură multițintă în Tweets', 'sr': 'Binarni trio na semiEval-2019 zadatak 5: otkrivanje reči mržnje u Tweets', 'so': 'Shaqooyinka SemEval-2019 5: Gariirka hadalka aad nebcaatay ee luqada badan ee Tweets', 'si': 'සේම්වේල්-2019 වැඩක් 5: ගොඩක් ලක්ෂිත විරෝධ කතාව හොයාගන්න', 'sv': 'Den binära trio på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 5: Multitarget Hate Speech Detection i Tweets', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணியில் இருநிலை முயற்சி', 'ur': 'SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multitarget Hate Speech Detection in Tweets', 'vi': 'Bộ ba nhị phân tại SemEvl-209 Task 5: Phát hiện Căm ghét đa mục trong Tweet', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifa 5: Twitterda Multitarget Hat Speech Detection', 'nl': 'Het binaire trio bij SemEval-2019 Taak 5: Multitarget Hate Speech Detection in Tweets', 'hr': 'Binarni trio na pola izvještaja 2019. zadatak 5: otkrivanje višeciljnih govora mržnje u Tweets', 'bg': 'Двойното трио на Задача 5: Откриване на речта на омразата в туитове с множество цели', 'da': 'Den binære trio på SemEval-2019 Opgave 5: Multitarget Hade Speech Detection i Tweets', 'de': 'Das binäre Trio bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 5: Multitarget Hate Speech Detection in Tweets', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019 퀘스트 5: 트위터의 다목적 증오 음성 검사', 'id': 'Trio binari di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Deteksi Bicara Kebencian Multitarget dalam Tweets', 'fa': 'سه نفر دومین در شهر ۲۰۱۹ کار ۵: کشف سخنرانی متنفر چند هدف در Tweets', 'sw': 'Tatizo la pili katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 5: Utafiti wa Hotuba ya Hati ya Ki-Ki-Ki-Kipindi katika Twita', 'tr': 'İkinci üç at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multitarget Hate Speech Detection in Tweets', 'sq': 'Trio binar në SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multitarget Detection of Hate Speech in Tweets', 'af': 'Die binêre trio by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 5: Multitarget Hate Speech Detection in Tweets', 'am': 'የሳምEval-2019 ስራ 5 የሁለተኛ የጥል ንግግር ማውጣት በTweets', 'hy': 'The binary trio at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multitarget Hate Speech Detection in Tweets', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multitarget Hate Speech Detection in Tweets', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের বাইনারি ট্রিও: টুইটে অনেক ঘৃণা ভাষণের তথ্য', 'ca': 'El trio binari de SemEval-2019 tasca 5: Detecció de discursos de odi multiobjectiu a Tweets', 'bs': 'Binarni trio na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 5: otkrivanje razgovora o mržnji u Tweets', 'et': 'Binaartrio SemEval-2019 ülesanne 5: mitme sihtmärgi vihkamise kõne tuvastamine tweetides', 'cs': 'Binární trio na SemEval-2019 Úkol 5: Multitarget detekce nenávisti řeči v tweetech', 'fi': 'Kaksinkertainen kolmikko SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 5: Useiden kohteiden vihapuheen tunnistus twieteissä', 'jv': 'Samsul', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis', 'he': 'השלישי הבינרי ב SemEval-2019 משימה 5: גילוי נאום שונא Multitarget', 'sk': 'Binarni trio na SemEval-2019 Naloga 5: Zaznavanje sovražnega govora z več cilji v tweetih', 'bo': 'The binary trio at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multitarget Hate Speech Detection in Tweets'}
{'en': 'The massive growth of user-generated web content through blogs, online forums and most notably, social media networks, led to a large spreading of hatred or abusive messages which have to be moderated. This paper proposes a supervised approach to hate speech detection towards immigrants and women in English tweets. Several models have been developed ranging from feature-engineering approaches to neural ones.', 'ar': 'أدى النمو الهائل لمحتوى الويب الذي ينشئه المستخدمون من خلال المدونات والمنتديات عبر الإنترنت وعلى الأخص شبكات التواصل الاجتماعي ، إلى انتشار واسع للكراهية أو الرسائل المسيئة التي يجب الإشراف عليها. تقترح هذه الورقة مقاربة خاضعة للإشراف للكشف عن خطاب الكراهية تجاه المهاجرين والنساء في التغريدات الإنجليزية. تم تطوير العديد من النماذج بدءًا من مناهج هندسة الميزات إلى الأساليب العصبية.', 'es': 'El crecimiento masivo del contenido web generado por los usuarios a través de blogs, foros en línea y, sobre todo, las redes sociales, llevó a una gran difusión de mensajes de odio o abuso que deben moderarse. Este artículo propone un enfoque supervisado para la detección del discurso de odio hacia inmigrantes y mujeres en tuits en inglés. Se han desarrollado varios modelos que van desde enfoques de ingeniería de características hasta enfoques neuronales.', 'fr': "La croissance massive du contenu Web généré par les utilisateurs via les blogs, les forums en ligne et, plus particulièrement, les réseaux sociaux, a conduit à une large diffusion de messages haineux ou abusifs qui doivent être modérés. Ce document propose une approche supervisée de la détection des discours haineux envers les immigrants et les femmes dans les tweets en anglais. Plusieurs modèles ont été développés, allant des approches d'ingénierie des caractéristiques aux approches neuronales.", 'pt': 'O crescimento maciço do conteúdo da web gerado pelo usuário por meio de blogs, fóruns online e, principalmente, redes de mídia social, levou a uma grande disseminação de mensagens de ódio ou abusivas que precisam ser moderadas. Este artigo propõe uma abordagem supervisionada para detecção de discurso de ódio contra imigrantes e mulheres em tweets em inglês. Vários modelos foram desenvolvidos, desde abordagens de engenharia de recursos até abordagens neurais.', 'ja': 'ブログ、オンラインフォーラム、特にソーシャルメディアネットワークを通じてユーザーが作成したウェブコンテンツの大規模な成長は、憎悪や罵倒的なメッセージを大規模に拡散させ、それを緩和する必要があります。この論文は、英語のツイートにおける移民や女性に対するヘイトスピーチ検出に対する監視されたアプローチを提案している。特徴工学的アプローチから神経工学的アプローチまで、いくつかのモデルが開発されている。', 'hi': 'ब्लॉग, ऑनलाइन मंचों और सबसे विशेष रूप से, सोशल मीडिया नेटवर्क के माध्यम से उपयोगकर्ता-जनित वेब सामग्री के बड़े पैमाने पर विकास ने नफरत या अपमानजनक संदेशों के बड़े पैमाने पर प्रसार का नेतृत्व किया, जिन्हें नियंत्रित किया जाना है। यह पेपर अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स में आप्रवासियों और महिलाओं के प्रति नफरत भाषण का पता लगाने के लिए एक पर्यवेक्षित दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करता है। फीचर-इंजीनियरिंग दृष्टिकोण से लेकर तंत्रिका लोगों तक कई मॉडल विकसित किए गए हैं।', 'zh': '用户以博客、在线论坛,尤社交媒体网络生网络之大长,而仇诟大传,必加缓和。 本文有监督之法,施于英语推文中检测移民女性之仇言。 已发数模,自特征至神经法。', 'ru': 'Массовый рост пользовательского веб-контента через блоги, онлайн-форумы и, что наиболее важно, социальные сети привел к широкому распространению ненависти или оскорбительных сообщений, которые должны быть модерированы. В этой статье предлагается контролируемый подход к обнаружению ненавистнических высказываний по отношению к иммигрантам и женщинам в твитах на английском языке. Было разработано несколько моделей, начиная от функционально-инженерных подходов и заканчивая нейронными.', 'ga': 'Mar gheall ar an bhfás ollmhór ar ábhar gréasáin a ghintear le húsáideoirí trí bhlaganna, fóraim ar líne agus go háirithe, líonraí meáin shóisialta, scaipeadh mór fuath nó teachtaireachtaí maslach nach mór a mhaolú. Molann an páipéar seo cur chuige maoirsithe maidir le fuathchaint a bhrath i leith inimirceach agus ban i dtvuíteanna Béarla. Forbraíodh go leor samhlacha ó chur chuige gné-innealtóireachta go dtí cinn néaracha.', 'ka': 'მომხმარებლის შექმნილი საბოლოგის, ინტერნეტურომის ფორმებით და მნიშვნელოვანად, საზოგადომი მედიატური ქსელების დიდი გაფარდება, რომლებიც უნდა მომედირებულიან შეტყობინებების გა ამ დოკუნტის შესაძლებელია მონაცემებული პროგორმა, რომელსაც მპარებელი სიტყვების განახსნა იმიგრანტებისთვის და ქალებს ინგლისური tweets-ში. რამდენიმე მოდელები განვითარებულია, რომელიც განვითარებულია ფუნქციების ინეზინერიის მიღებებიდან ნეიროლის მიღებებიდან.', 'el': 'Η μαζική ανάπτυξη του διαδικτυακού περιεχομένου που δημιουργείται από τους χρήστες μέσω ιστολογίων, διαδικτυακών φόρουμ και κυρίως των δικτύων κοινωνικών μέσων, οδήγησε σε μεγάλη διάδοση μίσους ή καταχρηστικών μηνυμάτων τα οποία πρέπει να μετριαστούν. Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει μια εποπτευμένη προσέγγιση για την ανίχνευση ρητορικών μίσους έναντι μεταναστών και γυναικών στα αγγλικά tweets. Έχουν αναπτυχθεί αρκετά μοντέλα που κυμαίνονται από προσεγγίσεις μηχανικής χαρακτηριστικών έως νευρικές.', 'hu': 'A felhasználók által létrehozott webes tartalom jelentős növekedése blogokon, online fórumokon és különösen a közösségi média hálózatokon keresztül, a gyűlölet és a visszaélések nagy terjedéséhez vezetett, amelyeket moderálni kell. Ez a tanulmány felügyelt megközelítést javasol a bevándorlókkal és nőkkel szembeni gyűlöletbeszéd felismerésére angol tweeteken. Számos modellt fejlesztettek ki, a funkciómérnöki megközelítésektől a neurális megközelítésekig.', 'it': "La massiccia crescita di contenuti web generati dagli utenti attraverso blog, forum online e, in particolare, reti di social media, ha portato a una grande diffusione di messaggi di odio o abusi che devono essere moderati. Questo articolo propone un approccio supervisionato alla rilevazione del discorso d'odio nei confronti di immigrati e donne in tweet inglesi. Diversi modelli sono stati sviluppati che vanno dagli approcci feature-engineering a quelli neurali.", 'kk': 'Пайдаланушылар жасалған веб-мазмұнын блогтар, онлайн форумдар және әсіресе, социалдық медиа желілері арқылы көпшілік жұмыс істеу үшін көпшілікті немесе жеңілді хаттарды өзгерт Бұл қағаз ағылшын тійтіндегі иммигранттер және әйелдер тійтіндегі сөйлерді таңдау үшін бақылау тәсілін ұсынады. Бірнеше модель, функциялық инженерлік инженерліктерінен невралдық түрде жасалған.', 'lt': 'Didelis vartotojų sukurto interneto turinio augimas per blogus, internetinius forumus ir visų pirma socialinių žiniasklaidos tinklus lėmė didelį neapykantos ar piktnaudžiavimo žinių sklaidą, kurią reikia sumažinti. Šiame dokumente siūlomas prižiūrimas požiūris į neapykantos kalbos nustatymą imigrantų ir moterų atžvilgiu anglų kalbomis. Buvo sukurti keli modeliai, skirti nuo savybių inžinerijos metodų iki nervinių metodų.', 'mk': 'Масивниот раст на веб-содржината генерирана од корисниците преку блогови, онлајн форуми и особено, социјалните медиумски мрежи, доведе до големо ширење на омраза или злоупотребни пораки кои мора да бидат модерирани. Овој документ предлага надгледуван пристап за детекција на говорот на омраза кон имигрантите и жените на англиски твитови. Неколку модели се развиени кои се движат од пристапи на инженерска карактеристика до нервни.', 'ms': 'Pertumbuhan besar kandungan web yang dihasilkan oleh pengguna melalui blog, forum online dan terutamanya, rangkaian media sosial, menyebabkan penyebaran besar kebencian atau mesej yang melampaui batas yang perlu ditetapkan. Kertas ini mencadangkan pendekatan yang diawasi untuk mengesan ucapan kebencian terhadap imigran dan wanita dalam tweet Inggeris. Beberapa model telah dikembangkan berlangsung dari pendekatan teknik-fitur kepada yang saraf.', 'ml': 'ബ്ലോഗ്, ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d ഫോര്\u200dമുകളിലൂടെയും, ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സാമൂഹ്യ മെഡിയയുടെ നെറ്ററുകളിലൂടെയുള്ള ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ഉള്ളിലുള്ള വെ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d അഗസ്ഥികള്\u200dക്കും സ്ത്രീകള്\u200dക്കും ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d വെറുപ്പുള്ള സംസാരം കണ്ടുപിടിക് കുറച്ചു മോഡലുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രിഫിഷന്\u200d എഞ്ചിനീയറിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ അടുത്തേക്ക', 'mn': 'Блог, онлайн форумууд, ихэнхдээ, нийгмийн медиа сүлжээнд хэрэглэгчдийн агуулсан веб-содержалуудын том өсөлт нь ихэнхдээ үзэн ядах эсвэл хүчирхийллэх захирамжуудыг нэмэгдүүлсэн. Энэ цаас Англи хэлний tweets дээр ирсэн хүмүүс болон эмэгтэйчүүдийг үзэн ядах илтгэлийн нээлттэй удирдлагатай арга замыг сануулдаг. Ихэнх загварууд нь шинжлэх ухаанаас сэтгэл хөдлөл руу шилжих боломжтой.', 'pl': 'Ogromny wzrost treści internetowych generowanych przez użytkowników poprzez blogi, fora online, a w szczególności sieci mediów społecznościowych doprowadził do dużego rozprzestrzeniania się nienawiści lub obraźliwych wiadomości, które należy moderować. Niniejszy artykuł proponuje nadzorowane podejście do wykrywania mowy nienawiści wobec imigrantów i kobiet w angielskich tweetach. Opracowano kilka modeli, począwszy od podejść inżynierii funkcji po podejścia neuronowe.', 'no': 'Den massive veksten av nettinnhaldet generert av brukarar gjennom blogar, nettforum og spesielt, sosiale medianettverk, førte til ein stor spreiding av hatt eller abusive meldingar som må vera moderert. Denne papiret foreslår ein oversikt tilnærming til å hatera taleoppdaging mot imigrantar og kvinner i engelske tweeter. Dei fleire modeller er utvikla frå funksjonsengineering tilnærmingar til neirale.', 'mt': 'It-tkabbir massiv tal-kontenut tal-internet iġġenerat mill-utenti permezz ta’ blogs, forums onlajn u l-aktar, netwerks tal-midja soċjali, wassal għal tixrid kbir ta’ messaġġi mibegħda jew abbużivi li jridu jiġu moderati. Dan id-dokument jipproponi approċċ sorveljat għall-individwazzjoni tad-diskors ta’ mibegħda lejn l-immigranti u n-nisa fuq it-twitter bl-Ingliż. Ġew żviluppati diversi mudelli li jvarjaw minn approċċi ta’ inġinerija tal-karatteristiċi għal dawk newrali.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙන් නිර්මාණය කරපු වෙබ් සාමාන්ත්\u200dරයක් බ්ලෝග්, ඇන්ලයින් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් සහ සාමාජික මිඩියාව ජාලය, විශාල වි මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කතාව හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ටුයිට් වල ඉන්න අයිමින විශේෂතාවක් ඉංජිනියාර්ගිනියාර්ගින් අවස්ථානයෙන් නියරුල් අවස්ථානයෙන් විසින් වි', 'ro': 'Creșterea masivă a conținutului web generat de utilizatori prin intermediul blogurilor, forumurilor online și, mai ales, rețelelor de socializare, a condus la o răspândire largă a mesajelor de ură sau abuzive care trebuie moderate. Această lucrare propune o abordare supravegheată a detectării discursului la ură față de imigranți și femei în tweet-uri în limba engleză. Au fost dezvoltate mai multe modele variind de la abordări de inginerie a caracteristicilor la cele neurale.', 'so': 'Koritaanka waxyaabaha badan ee internetka ee isticmaalayaasha ku qoran bogagga, jardiinada shabakada internetka iyo si gaar ah shabakadaha shabakada bulshada ayaa sababtay kala firaajinta cadownimo ama warqado isticmaalaya oo waajibka ah in la kordhiyo. Warqaddaas wuxuu soo jeedaa qaab ilaaliya ah oo loo baahdo hadal nebcaad oo loogu soo jeedo dadka dalka u soo guuray iyo dumarka ku qoran Tweetka Ingiriiska. Waxaa la hormariyey tusaalooyin badan oo ka soo baxay qaababka qalabka wax lagu sameeyo oo u soo dhowaaday neurada.', 'sv': 'Den massiva tillväxten av användargenererat webbinnehåll via bloggar, onlineforum och framför allt sociala medier ledde till en stor spridning av hat eller kränkande meddelanden som måste modereras. Denna uppsats föreslår ett övervakat tillvägagångssätt för detektering av hattal mot invandrare och kvinnor på engelska tweets. Flera modeller har utvecklats allt från funktionstekniska tillvägagångssätt till neurala.', 'sr': 'Masivni rast internetskog sadržaja koji su stvorili korisnike kroz blogove, online forume i najposebnije, društvene medijske mreže, doveo je do velikog širenja mržnje ili nasilnih poruka koje moraju biti moderirane. Ovaj papir predlaže nadzoran pristup otkrivanju govora mržnje prema imigrantima i ženama na engleskim tweetima. Razvijene su nekoliko modela od pristupa funkcionalnim inžinjerima do neuronskih.', 'ta': 'Blogs, online forums மற்றும் மிக குறிப்பாக, சமூக ஊடக வலைப்பிணையங்கள் மூலம் பயனர் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட வலைப்பின் உள்ளடக்கங்களின் பெரிய வளர்ச்சி பார்த்தது, பெ This paper proposes a supervised approach to hate speech detection towards immigrants and women in English tweets.  குணங்கள்- பொறியியல் அணுகுகளிலிருந்து வரையில் சில மாதிரிகள் உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது.', 'ur': 'بلاگ، آنلاین فورمز اور سب سے زیادہ، سوسیل میڈیا نیٹورک کے ذریعہ، کارساز کے پیدا کئے ہوئے ویب منصوبات کی بڑی بڑی بڑائی کی وجہ سے ہوئی ہے، جن کے ذریعہ متوسط ہونے کی ضرورت ہے. اس کاغذ نے انگلیسی ٹویٹ میں ہجرت کرنے والوں اور عورتوں کے بارے میں ناپسندیدہ بات شناسایی کے لئے ایک نظارت کی طرح پیش کیا ہے. بہت سی موڈلیاں پیدا کیے گئے ہیں جن کی فکرت-انجینریاں سے نئورل کے پاس آتے ہیں۔', 'uz': 'Name Бу саҳифа муҳожирлар ва муҳожирлар аёлларга нисбатан қизиқлик кўришини кўриб чиқиш учун тўп-тўқнашган усулни кўрсатади. Bir nechta modellar hodisa muhandiya murakkablaridan neyralik tilidagi bir necha modellar yaratildi.', 'vi': 'Sự phát triển mạnh của các nội dung mạng từ các người dùng qua blogs, các diễn đàn trên mạng và nhất là các mạng xã hội, đã dẫn đến một sự lan rộng của hận thù hay thông điệp lạm dụng cần phải giảm bớt đi. Tờ giấy này đề xuất một phương pháp giám sát việc phát hiện ghét ngôn ngữ đối với người nhập cư và phụ nữ trên Twitter. Các mô hình đã được phát triển, từ các thuật to án đặc trưng đến hệ thần kinh.', 'bg': 'Масивното нарастване на генерираното от потребителите уеб съдържание чрез блогове, онлайн форуми и най-вече социалните мрежи доведе до голямо разпространение на омраза или злоупотребяващи съобщения, които трябва да бъдат модерирани. Настоящата статия предлага надзорен подход за откриване на реч на омразата към имигранти и жени в туитове на английски език. Разработени са няколко модела, вариращи от подходи за инженерство на функции до невронни.', 'nl': 'De enorme groei van door gebruikers gegenereerde webinhoud via blogs, online fora en vooral sociale medianetwerken leidde tot een grote verspreiding van haat of misbruik die gemodereerd moest worden. Dit artikel stelt een begeleide aanpak voor om haatspraakdetectie tegen immigranten en vrouwen in Engelse tweets te detecteren. Verschillende modellen zijn ontwikkeld variërend van feature-engineering benaderingen tot neurale benaderingen.', 'hr': 'Veliki rast internetskog sadržaja proizvedenog korisnika kroz blogove, internetske forume i najposebnije društvene medijske mreže, doveo je do velikog širenja mržnje ili nasilnih poruka koje moraju biti umjerene. Ovaj papir predlaže nadzoran pristup otkrivanju govora mržnje prema imigrantima i ženama na engleskim tweetima. Razvijene su nekoliko modela od pristupa funkcionalnim inžinjerima na neurone.', 'da': 'Den massive vækst af brugergenereret webindhold gennem blogs, online fora og især sociale medier netværk førte til en stor spredning af had eller misbrug af budskaber, som skal modereres. Denne artikel foreslår en overvåget tilgang til afsløring af hadefulde taler over for indvandrere og kvinder på engelske tweets. Flere modeller er blevet udviklet lige fra feature-engineering til neurale tilgange.', 'de': 'Das massive Wachstum von nutzergenerierten Webinhalten durch Blogs, Online-Foren und vor allem soziale Netzwerke führte zu einer großen Verbreitung von Hass oder missbräuchlichen Nachrichten, die moderiert werden müssen. Dieses Papier schlägt einen überwachten Ansatz zur Erkennung von Hassreden gegenüber Einwanderern und Frauen in englischen Tweets vor. Es wurden mehrere Modelle entwickelt, die von Feature-Engineering-Ansätzen bis hin zu neuronalen Ansätzen reichen.', 'id': 'The massive growth of user-generated web content through blogs, online forums and most notably, social media networks, led to a large spreading of hatred or abusive messages which have to be moderated.  Kertas ini mengusulkan pendekatan yang diawasi untuk deteksi pidato kebencian terhadap imigran dan wanita dalam tweet Inggris. Beberapa model telah dikembangkan berlangsung dari pendekatan teknik-fitur ke yang saraf.', 'fa': 'رشد بزرگی از محتوای وب تولید شده از طریق بلوگ، فورم\u200cهای آنلاین و بیشتر، شبکه\u200cهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی، به وسیله\u200cی گسترش بزرگی از نفرت یا پیام\u200cهای تجاوز که باید متوسط باشند، به وسیله\u200cی آن رشد کرد. این کاغذ پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که یک روش تحت نظر قرار گرفته برای تشخیص سخنرانی با مهاجران و زنان در tweets انگلیسی متنفر باشد. چند مدل توسعه شده از طریق مهندسی ویژه\u200cهای مهندسی به نقل\u200cهای عصبی.', 'ko': '블로그, 온라인 포럼과 가장 현저한 소셜 미디어 네트워크를 통해 사용자가 생성한 인터넷 내용이 대량으로 증가하여 증오나 학대 정보가 대량으로 전파되기 때문에 반드시 통제해야 한다.본고는 영어 추문에서 이민과 여성에 대한 증오의 음성을 측정하는 감독적인 방법을 제시했다.특징 공학 방법부터 신경 네트워크 방법까지 다양한 모델을 개발했다.', 'sw': 'Ukubwa mkubwa wa maudhui yaliyotengenezwa na watumiaji wa mtandao kupitia blogu, majukwaa ya mtandaoni na hasa, mitandao ya kijamii, ulisababisha kusambaza kwa chuki au ujumbe wa matumizi yanayopaswa kuboreshwa. This paper proposes a supervised approach to hate speech detection towards immigrants and women in English tweets.  Mifano kadhaa imetengenezwa kutokana na mbinu za ubunifu zinazotumika na ubunifu.', 'af': "Die groot groei van gebruiker genereerde web inhoud deur blogs, online forums en mees bepaalde, sosiale media netwerke, het gelei tot 'n groot verspreiding van haat of abusive boodskappe wat moet modereer word. Hierdie papier voorstel 'n ondersoekte toegang om praat ontdekking te haat teen immigrante en vroue in Engelske tweets. Verskeie modele is ontwikkeld vanaf funksie-inženiering toegang tot neurale.", 'tr': 'Ullançylar tarapyndan bolan web maksadynyň kän uly ösümi bolup bloglar, online forumlar bilen iň bellenen, sosyal medýýatlar netgeleri bilen ýigrenýän ýa-da ýigrenýän mesajlary döwletlendirdi. Bu kagyz Iňlisçe tweets ýüzünde göçmenler we a ýallary ýigrenýän çykyşyny ýigrenýän bir gollaşdyrma teklip edýär. Birnäçe nusga näme enjiniýanyň nusgalaryndan näme üçin guruldy.', 'sq': 'Rritja masive e përmbajtjes së internetit të gjeneruar nga përdoruesit nëpërmjet blogeve, forumeve online dhe veçanërisht rrjeteve të mediave sociale, çoi në një përhapje të madhe të urrejtjes apo mesazheve abuzive që duhet të moderohen. Ky dokument propozon një qasje të mbikqyrur për zbulimin e fjalimit të urrejtjes ndaj emigrantëve dhe grave në tweetet angleze. Disa modele janë zhvilluar që shkojnë nga metodat e inxhinierisë së funksioneve deri në ato neuronale.', 'hy': 'Օգտագործողների կողմից ստեղծված վեբ-պարունակության զանգվածային աճը բլոգերի, առցանց ֆորմերի և հատկապես սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների ցանցերի միջոցով հանգեցրեց ատելության կամ չարաշահույթի մեծ տարածմանը, որը պետք է չափազանց չափա Այս թղթին առաջարկում է անգլերենի թվիթերում անգլերենի ազատության խոսքի հայտնաբերման վերահսկված մոտեցում: Several models have been developed ranging from feature-engineering approaches to neural ones.', 'am': 'በጦማሮች፣ በመረብ ፎርማቶች እና በተለየ ማኅበራዊ አውታር መረጃዎች ላይ የበለጠ የጥላቻ ወይም የጥላቻ መልዕክቶች መዘርጋት አቀረበ፡፡ ይህም ገጽ በተሰደዱት እና በንግግሊዝኛ ትዊተሮች ላይ የጠል ንግግርን ለማግኘት የተጠበቀውን መንገድ ያሳልፋል፡፡ የፊርቨር-ኢንጂንጂንጂንጂን ወደ ነጥብ ደረጃዎች የሚለዩ ብዙዎች ሞዴላዎች ተዘጋጅተዋል፡፡', 'az': 'İstifadəçilərin web məlumatını bloglar, online forumlar vasitəsilə və ən qüvvətli, sosyal media a ğları vasitəsilə artırmaq məlumatının böyük nifrəti və həddi aşmaq lazımdır. Bu kağıt İngilizci tweetlərdə göçənlər və qadınlar barəsində nifrət sözlərini keşfetmək üçün gözətli bir tərəf təklif edir. Bir neçə modellər fərqli-inženjeri tərəfindən nöral tərəflərinə qədər təşkil edilmişdir.', 'bn': 'ব্লগ, অনলাইন ফোরাম এবং বিশেষ করে সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যম নেটওয়ার্কের মাধ্যমে ব্যবহারকারীদের বিশাল বিষয়বস্তু ব্যবহারকারীদের উৎপাদনের বিশাল এই প্রবন্ধে অভিবাসী এবং ইংরেজী টুইটে নারীদের প্রতি ঘৃণা করার জন্য একটি পর্যবেক্ষনীয় উপায় প্রস্তাব করেছে। বেশ কয়েকটি মডেল উন্নয়ন করা হয়েছে যারা বৈশিষ্ট্য-ইঞ্জিনিয়ান প্রবেশের কাছ থেকে নিউরেলের কাছ থেকে।', 'et': 'Kasutajate loodud veebisisu massiline kasv blogide, veebifoorumite ja eelkõige sotsiaalmeedia võrgustike kaudu viis viha ja kuritarvitavate sõnumite laialdase leviku, mida tuleb modereerida. Käesolevas töös pakutakse välja järelevalvealase lähenemisviisi immigrantide ja naiste vihakõne tuvastamiseks inglise keeles. On välja töötatud mitmeid mudeleid alates funktsionaalsetest tehnilistest lähenemisviisidest kuni neuraalseteni.', 'ca': "El creixement massiu del contingut web generat pels usuaris a través de blogs, fòrums on-line i, sobretot, xarxes de mitjans socials, va portar a una gran difusió de missatges d'odi o abusos que han de ser moderats. Aquest paper propon un enfocament supervisat de detecció d'odi en relació a les emigrants i les dones en tweets anglesos. S'han desenvolupat varis models que van des d'enfocaments d'enginyeria de característiques fins a enfocaments neuronals.", 'cs': 'Masivní růst webového obsahu generovaného uživateli prostřednictvím blogů, online fór a zejména sociálních sítí vedl k velkému šíření nenávisti nebo urážlivých sdělení, které je třeba moderovat. Tento článek navrhuje kontrolovaný přístup k detekci nenávistné řeči vůči imigrantům a ženám v anglických tweetech. Bylo vyvinuto několik modelů od přístupů inženýrství funkcí až po neuronové.', 'fi': 'Käyttäjien luoman verkkosisällön massiivinen kasvu blogeissa, verkkofoorumeissa ja erityisesti sosiaalisen median verkostoissa johti vihan ja väärinkäytösten laajaan leviämiseen, jota on hillittävä. Tässä työssä ehdotetaan valvottua lähestymistapaa maahanmuuttajien ja naisten vihapuheen havaitsemiseen englanninkielisissä tweeteissä. Useita malleja on kehitetty ominaisuuksien suunnittelusta neuroihin.', 'bs': 'Ogromni rast internetskog sadržaja koji su stvorili korisnike kroz blogove, online forume i najposebnije, socijalne medijske mreže, doveo je do velikog širenja mržnje ili nasilnih poruka koje moraju biti moderirane. Ovaj papir predlaže nadgledan pristup otkrivanju govora mržnje prema imigrantima i ženama na engleskim tweetima. Razvijene su nekoliko modela od pristupa funkcionalnom inženjerstvu do neuronskih.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing memperbudhakan web seneng pisan ing budhakan, dialog online lan ijol-ijolan, tambah media e ssomero sing wis ngerasah kanggo ngerasahan akeh dolanan luwih kanggo ngerasahan seneng ngregani uwong. Awak iki supoyo nganggep kuwi nglanggar tarjamahan kanggo ngilanggar kuwi kesempatan kanggo ngilanggar tarjamahan karo winih kanggo tuwit Inggris. Language', 'sk': 'Obsežna rast spletnih vsebin, ki jih ustvarjajo uporabniki prek blogov, spletnih forumov in predvsem družbenih omrežij, je privedla do velikega širjenja sovraštva ali zlorabljajočih sporočil, ki jih je treba moderirati. Prispevek predlaga nadzorovan pristop k odkrivanju sovražnega govora do priseljencev in žensk v angleških tweetih. Razvitih je bilo več modelov, ki segajo od pristopov funkcijskega inženiringa do nevronskih.', 'ha': "Kidan ƙaranci da aka haifa maɓallin wanda ya yi amfani da shi na samun mutane na gidaɓa, wurãren garwaya da masu haske da mitandai masu jamii, sun led to widespread ƙiyayya ko haske da message masu abuse da za'a iya moderate. Wannan karatun yana bukãtar da wani matsayi wanda aka tsare wa'anin hotuba zuwa muhãjiri da mãtã cikin Ingiriya. An develope wasu misãlai masu tsawo daga matofatin-muhalli zuwa neura.", 'he': 'הגידול המאסיבי של תוכן אינטרנט שנוצר ע"י משתמשים דרך בלוגים, פורמים באינטרנט ובמיוחד, רשתות תקשורת חברתית, הוביל להפיצה גדולה של שנאה או הודעות מתעללות שעליהן להיות מוצפות. העיתון הזה מציע גישה מבוקרת לגלות נאום שנאה כלפי מהגרים ונשים בטוויטים אנגליים. פיתחו מספר דוגמנים שמגיעים מגישות הנדסה של תכונות לאותם עצביים.', 'bo': 'ལག་ལེན་པ་ཞིག་གི་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཆེན་སྐྱེས་པ་ཡིན།བློག་ཆེན་དང་དྲ་བ་མང་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡོད། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ལྟ་རྟོག་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ལ་བསམ་བྱེད་པའི་སྐད་འགན་སྣང་ཚུལ་དང་། ཨིན་ཡིག་གི་འགོད་ཐོག Several models have been developed ranging from feature-engineering approaches to neural ones.'}
{'en': 'The Titans at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter', 'ar': 'The Titans في SemEval-2019 Task 5: الكشف عن خطاب الكراهية ضد المهاجرين والنساء في تويتر', 'fr': 'The Titans at SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 5\xa0: Détection des discours de haine contre les immigrés et les femmes sur Twitter', 'pt': 'Os Titãs no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 5: Detecção de discurso de ódio contra imigrantes e mulheres no Twitter', 'es': 'Tarea 5 de los Titanes en SemEval-2019: Detección de discursos de odio contra inmigrantes y mujeres en Twitter', 'ja': 'THE TITANS at SemEval -2019タスク5 ： Twitterにおける移民と女性に対するヘイトスピーチの検出', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019务5泰坦:见Twitter移民女子之仇言', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 टास्क 5 में टाइटन्स: ट्विटर में आप्रवासियों और महिलाओं के खिलाफ नफरत भरे भाषण का पता लगाना', 'ru': 'Титаны на SemEval-2019 Задача 5: Обнаружение ненавистнических высказываний против иммигрантов и женщин в Twitter', 'ga': 'The Titans ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 5: Caint fuatha in aghaidh inimirceach agus ban a bhrath ar Twitter', 'ka': 'ტიტანები semiEval-2019 დავალება 5: მპატის სიტყვების გამოყენება იმიგრანტებზე და ქალებზე Twitter-ში', 'hu': 'A Titánok a SemEval-2019 5. feladat: A bevándorlók és nők elleni gyűlöletbeszéd felismerése Twitteren', 'it': "I Titani a SemEval-2019 Task 5: Rilevazione di discorsi d'odio contro immigrati e donne su Twitter", 'el': 'Οι Τιτάνες στο έργο 5: Ανίχνευση ρητορικής μίσους κατά μεταναστών και γυναικών στο Twitter', 'kk': 'Твиттердегі иммигранттер мен әйелдерге қарсы жек сөйлесуді табу', 'mk': 'Титаните на SemEval-2019 задача 5: Детектирање на говорот на омраза против имигрантите и жените на Твитер', 'ms': 'The Titans at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Detection of hate speech against immigrants and women on Twitter', 'lt': 'Titanai per 2019 m. pusmetį 5 užduotis: neapykantos kalbos prieš imigrantus ir moteris nustatymas Twitter', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2019 ജോലിയിലെ ടൈറ്റന്മാര്\u200d 5: കൂട്ടുകാര്\u200dക്കും സ്ത്രീകള്\u200dക്കും വെറുപ്പുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും വ', 'mt': 'It-Titani f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 5: Sejbien ta’ diskors ta’ mibegħda kontra l-immigranti u n-nisa fuq Twitter', 'no': 'Titanene på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 5: Oppdaging av hatespråk mot imigrantar og kvinner i Twitter', 'mn': '2019 оны SemEval-ын Тайтанууд 5-р ажил: хөдөлгөөнүүд болон эмэгтэйчүүдийн эсрэг үзэн ядуурлын яриаг', 'ro': 'Titanii la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 5: Detectarea discursului de ură împotriva imigranților și femeilor în Twitter', 'pl': 'Zadanie 5: Wykrywanie mowy nienawiści wobec imigrantów i kobiet na Twitterze', 'sr': 'Titani na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 5: otkrivanje govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena u Twitter-u', 'si': 'සේම්වල්-2019 වැඩේ තියාටින්ස් 5: ප්\u200dරමාණකයන්ට සහ ගැහැණියන්ට විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ', 'sv': 'Titanerna på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 5: Upptäckt av hattal mot invandrare och kvinnor i Twitter', 'so': 'Tiriyiinta ee Shaqada SemEval-2019 5: Shaqada nacaybka ee dadka dalka u soo guuray iyo dumarka Twitterka ku qoran', 'ta': 'செம்Eval-2019 பணியில் உள்ள டைட்டான்ஸ்', 'ur': 'ٹویٹر میں مہاجرین اور عورتوں کے مقابلے میں نفرت کی بات تلاش کی', 'vi': 'Nhóm Titan tại SemEvl-209 Task 5: phát hiện ngôn ngữ căm ghét người nhập cư và phụ nữ trên Twitter.', 'uz': '5 Vazifani SemEval-2019 yillarda Titlar: Twitterda muhandillar va ayollar haqida kuch aytishni aniqlash', 'hr': 'Titani na zadatku 5: otkrivanje govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena u Twitter-u', 'da': 'Titanerne på SemEval-2019 Opgave 5: Afsløring af hadefulde tale mod indvandrere og kvinder på Twitter', 'bg': 'Титаните в Задача 5: Откриване на речта на омразата срещу имигранти и жени в Туитър', 'de': 'Aufgabe 5: Aufdeckung von Hassreden gegen Immigranten und Frauen in Twitter', 'nl': 'Taak 5: Detectie van haatuitingen tegen immigranten en vrouwen in Twitter', 'id': 'The Titans at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Deteksi pidato kebencian terhadap imigran dan wanita di Twitter', 'sw': 'Watu wa Tita katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 5: Kugundua hotuba ya chuki dhidi ya wahamiaji na wanawake kwenye mtandao wa Twita', 'ko': 'Sem Eval-2019의 타이탄 미션 5: 트위터에서 이민과 여성에 대한 증오 발언 탐지', 'fa': 'Titans at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter', 'sq': 'Titanët në SemEval-2019 Task 5: zbulimi i fjalimit të urrejtjes kundër emigrantëve dhe grave në Twitter', 'am': 'The Titans at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter', 'az': 'Yarım Eval-2019 Gözəl 5: İçkilərə və qadınlara qarşı nifrət sözlərini Twitter-da keçirmək', 'tr': "Titanlar SemEval-2019 Görev 5: Göçmenlere we aýallara Twitter'da ýigrenýän sözlerini tapylýar", 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯-এর টাইটনারীরা কাজ ৫: অভিবাসী এবং টুইটারে নারীদের বিরুদ্ধে ঘৃণার বিরুদ্ধে ঘৃণা ভাষণের সনা', 'af': 'Die Titans by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 5: Opdekking van haatspraak teen imigrante en vroue in Twitter', 'bs': 'Titani na pola Evala-2019. zadatak 5: otkrivanje govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena u Twitter-u', 'ca': 'The Titans at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter', 'cs': 'Titáni na SemEval-2019 Úkol 5: Odhalování nenávistných projevů proti imigrantům a ženám na Twitteru', 'fi': 'Titaanit SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 5: Maahanmuuttajien ja naisten vihapuheen havaitseminen Twitterissä', 'et': 'Titaanid SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 5: Sisserändajate ja naiste vihakõne avastamine Twitteris', 'hy': '2019 թվականի "Սեմեվալ-2019" 5-րդ հանձնարարության "Տիտանսները": Թվիթերում հայտնաբերվում է ատելության խոսքի հայտնաբերումը միգրանտների և կանանց դեմ', 'jv': 'Titan nganggo semi-2011 task 5', 'he': 'הטיטאנים בסמיוול-2019 משימה 5: גילוי נאום שנאה נגד מהגרים ונשים בטוויטר', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་སེལ་ལ་(SemEval-2019)ནང་གི་ཚོང་ཁག་པ་ཚོའི་ལས་འགུལ་ལྡན་༥：ཌིས་ཌིར་ནང་སྐྱེན་པ་དང་བུད་མེད', 'ha': 'The Titanis at SemEal-2019 Tafiyar 5: Garment of Hatin magana against immigrants and mãtã in Twitter', 'sk': 'Titani na SemEval-2019 Naloga 5: Odkrivanje sovražnega govora proti priseljencem in ženskam v Twitterju'}
{'en': 'This system paper is a description of the system submitted to SemEval-2019 Task 5 Task B for the English language, where we had to primarily detect hate speech and then detect aggressive behaviour and its target audience in Twitter. There were two specific target audiences, immigrants and women. The language of the tweets was English. We were required to first detect whether a tweet is containing hate speech. Thereafter we were required to find whether the tweet was showing aggressive behaviour, and then we had to find whether the targeted audience was an individual or a group of people.', 'ar': 'تعد ورقة النظام هذه وصفًا للنظام المقدم إلى المهمة ب "SemEval-2019 Task 5" للغة الإنجليزية ، حيث كان علينا اكتشاف خطاب الكراهية بشكل أساسي ثم اكتشاف السلوك العدواني والجمهور المستهدف في Twitter. كان هناك جمهوران مستهدفان محددان ، المهاجرون والنساء. كانت لغة التغريدات هي الإنجليزية. طُلب منا أولاً اكتشاف ما إذا كانت إحدى التغريدات تحتوي على كلام يحض على الكراهية. بعد ذلك ، طُلب منا معرفة ما إذا كانت التغريدة تُظهر سلوكًا عدوانيًا ، ومن ثم كان علينا معرفة ما إذا كان الجمهور المستهدف فردًا أم مجموعة من الأشخاص.', 'pt': 'Este documento do sistema é uma descrição do sistema submetido à Tarefa B ”SemEval-2019 Task 5” para o idioma inglês, onde tivemos que detectar principalmente discurso de ódio e depois detectar comportamento agressivo e seu público-alvo no Twitter. Havia dois públicos-alvo específicos, imigrantes e mulheres. O idioma dos tweets era o inglês. Fomos obrigados a detectar primeiro se um tweet contém discurso de ódio. Depois disso, fomos obrigados a descobrir se o tweet estava mostrando comportamento agressivo e, em seguida, tivemos que descobrir se o público-alvo era um indivíduo ou um grupo de pessoas.', 'fr': "Ce document système est une description du système soumis à la tâche B «\xa0SEMEVAL-2019 Task 5\xa0» pour la langue anglaise, où nous devions principalement détecter les discours haineux, puis les comportements agressifs et leur public cible sur Twitter. Il y avait deux publics cibles spécifiques, les immigrants et les femmes. La langue des tweets était l'anglais. Nous devions d'abord détecter si un tweet contient des propos haineux. Par la suite, nous avons dû déterminer si le tweet affichait un comportement agressif, puis nous avons dû déterminer si le public visé était un individu ou un groupe de personnes.", 'es': 'Este documento del sistema es una descripción del sistema presentado a la «Tarea 5 de SemeVal-2019» Tarea B para el idioma inglés, donde tuvimos que detectar principalmente el discurso de odio y luego detectar el comportamiento agresivo y su público objetivo en Twitter. Había dos públicos destinatarios específicos, inmigrantes y mujeres. El idioma de los tuits era el inglés. Se nos pidió que primero detectáramos si un tuit contiene incitación al odio. A partir de entonces, se nos pidió que averigüemos si el tuit mostraba un comportamiento agresivo, y luego teníamos que averiguar si el público objetivo era un individuo o un grupo de personas.', 'ja': 'このシステム論文は、主にヘイトスピーチを検出し、攻撃的な行動とそのターゲット層をTwitterで検出する必要があった、英語のための「SemEval -2019 Task 5」タスクBに提出されたシステムの説明です。具体的な対象者は移民と女性の2人であった。ツイートの言語は英語でした。まず、ツイートにヘイトスピーチが含まれているかどうかを検知する必要がありました。その後、ツイートが攻撃的な行動を示しているかどうかを調べる必要があり、対象者が個人かグループかを調べる必要がありました。', 'hi': 'यह सिस्टम पेपर अंग्रेजी भाषा के लिए "SemEval-2019 Task 5" टास्क बी में सबमिट की गई प्रणाली का विवरण है, जहां हमें मुख्य रूप से हेट स्पीच का पता लगाना था और फिर ट्विटर में आक्रामक व्यवहार और इसके लक्षित दर्शकों का पता लगाना था। दो विशिष्ट लक्षित दर्शक, आप्रवासियों और महिलाओं थे। ट्वीट की भाषा अंग्रेजी थी। हमें पहले यह पता लगाने की आवश्यकता थी कि क्या एक ट्वीट में नफरत भरे भाषण शामिल हैं। इसके बाद हमें यह पता लगाने की आवश्यकता थी कि क्या ट्वीट आक्रामक व्यवहार दिखा रहा था, और फिर हमें यह पता लगाना था कि लक्षित दर्शक एक व्यक्ति या लोगों का एक समूह था या नहीं।', 'zh': '本系统论文述交SemEval-2019 Task 5之任B,施于英语,必须主检雠言,然后检Twitter之攻击性行及受众。 有二受众者,移民妇女也。 推文语英语。 先检推文仇言。 然后求推文见攻击性行为,然后必得其所受众犹群也。', 'ru': 'Этот системный документ представляет собой описание системы, представленной на «SemEval-2019 Task 5» Task B для английского языка, где мы должны были в первую очередь обнаружить ненавистнические высказывания, а затем обнаружить агрессивное поведение и его целевую аудиторию в Twitter. Имеются две конкретные целевые аудитории - иммигранты и женщины. Языком твитов был английский. Мы должны были сначала определить, содержит ли твит ненавистнические высказывания. После этого мы должны были выяснить, демонстрирует ли твит агрессивное поведение, а затем мы должны были выяснить, является ли целевая аудитория индивидуумом или группой людей.', 'ga': 'Is éard atá sa pháipéar córais seo ná cur síos ar an gcóras a cuireadh faoi bhráid “SemEval-2019 Task 5” Tasc B don Bhéarla, áit a raibh orainn fuathchaint a bhrath go príomha agus ansin iompar ionsaitheach agus a lucht éisteachta sprice a bhrath ar Twitter. Bhí dhá spriocghrúpa ar leith ann, inimircigh agus mná. Béarla teanga na tweets. Ceanglaíodh orainn a bhrath ar dtús an bhfuil fuathchaint i dtvuít. Ina dhiaidh sin ceanglaíodh orainn a fháil amach an raibh iompar ionsaitheach á léiriú ag an tweet, agus ansin bhí orainn a fháil amach an raibh an lucht éisteachta spriocdhírithe ina dhuine aonair nó ina ghrúpa daoine.', 'ka': "ეს სისტემის წერტილი არის სისტემის გამოსახულება, რომელიც 'SemEval-2019 Task 5' დავაკეთებულია ანგლისური ენაზე, სადაც ჩვენ უნდა წარმოადგენოთ წარმოადგენის სიტყვა და შემდეგ აგრესიური ქცევა და მისი მისაღების აუ ორი განსაკუთრებული მიზეზი აუდიტორია, იმიგრანტები და ქალები იყო. Tweets-ის ენაა ინგლისური იყო. ჩვენ უნდა პირველად განვიცნოთ თუ არა რაიმეტი ცხოვრებული საუკუნო. შემდეგ ჩვენ დაგვჭირდება, რომ ვიპოვოთ თუ არა ტივიტი აგრესიური მოქმედება, და შემდეგ ჩვენ უნდა ვიპოვოთ თუ უფრო მიდგომარებული აუდიტორია individuული ან ადამიანების ჯგუფი.", 'hu': 'Ez a rendszer tanulmány az angol nyelvre benyújtott "SemEval-2019 Task 5" Task B feladathoz benyújtott rendszer leírása, ahol elsősorban a gyűlöletbeszédet kellett felismernünk, majd az agresszív viselkedést és annak célközönségét kellett felismernünk a Twitteren. Két konkrét célközönség volt: bevándorlók és nők. A tweetek nyelve angol volt. Először fel kellett derítenünk, hogy egy tweet tartalmaz-e gyűlöletbeszédet. Ezt követően meg kellett találnunk, hogy a tweet agresszív viselkedést mutat-e, majd meg kellett találnunk, hogy a célzott közönség egyéni vagy embercsoport volt-e.', 'el': 'Αυτή η εργασία συστήματος είναι μια περιγραφή του συστήματος που υποβλήθηκε στην εργασία "SemEval-2019 Task 5" για την αγγλική γλώσσα, όπου έπρεπε πρωτίστως να ανιχνεύσουμε τη ρητορική μίσους και στη συνέχεια να εντοπίσουμε επιθετική συμπεριφορά και το κοινό-στόχο της στο Twitter. Υπήρχαν δύο συγκεκριμένα ακροατήρια-στόχοι, μετανάστες και γυναίκες. Η γλώσσα των tweets ήταν η αγγλική. Χρειάστηκε να εντοπίσουμε πρώτα αν ένα tweet περιέχει ρητορικά μίσους. Στη συνέχεια, έπρεπε να βρούμε αν το tweet έδειχνε επιθετική συμπεριφορά, και στη συνέχεια έπρεπε να βρούμε αν το στοχευμένο κοινό ήταν ένα άτομο ή μια ομάδα ανθρώπων.', 'lt': 'Šis sistemos dokumentas yra sistemos, pateiktos "SemEval-2019 Task 5" B uždaviniui anglų kalba, aprašymas, kuriame pirmiausia turėjome aptikti neapykantos kalbą ir tada aptikti agresyvų elgesį ir jos tikslinę auditoriją Twitter. There were two specific target audiences, immigrants and women.  Tweetų kalba buvo anglų kalba. Pirmiausia turėjome nustatyti, ar tweete yra neapykantos kalbos. Thereafter we were required to find whether the tweet was showing aggressive behaviour, and then we had to find whether the targeted audience was an individual or a group of people.', 'it': "Questo documento di sistema è una descrizione del sistema presentato a 'SemEval-2019 Task 5' Task B per la lingua inglese, dove abbiamo dovuto rilevare principalmente il discorso di odio e quindi rilevare comportamenti aggressivi e il suo pubblico target su Twitter. C'erano due destinatari specifici, immigrati e donne. La lingua dei tweet era l'inglese. Ci è stato chiesto prima di scoprire se un tweet contiene discorsi di odio. Successivamente ci è stato chiesto di scoprire se il tweet mostrava comportamenti aggressivi, e poi abbiamo dovuto scoprire se il pubblico target era un individuo o un gruppo di persone.", 'mk': 'Оваа системска хартија е опис на системот поднесен на „SemEval-2019 Task 5“ Task B за англискиот јазик, каде што моравме првенствено да детектираме говор на омраза и потоа да детектираме агресивно однесување и нејзината целна публика на Твитер. Имаше две специфични метни публики, имигранти и жени. Јазикот на твитовите беше англиски. Требаше прво да откриеме дали твитот содржи говор за омраза. Потоа моравме да дознаеме дали твитот покажува агресивно однесување, а потоа моравме да дознаеме дали целната публика е индивидуална или група луѓе.', 'ml': "This system paper is a description of the system submitted to 'SemEval-2019 Task 5' Task B for the English language, where we had to primarily detect hate speech and then detect aggressive behaviour and its target audience in Twitter.  രണ്ടു പ്രത്യേക ലക്ഷ്യം കാണിക്കുന്നവരും അഗസ്ഥികളും സ്ത്രീകളും ഉണ്ടായിരുന്നു. ടൂട്ടുകളുടെ ഭാഷ ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ആയിരുന്നു. നമുക്ക് ആദ്യം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കേണ്ടതുണ്ടായിരുന്നു വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരം ഉണ്ടോ എന്ന്. അതിനുശേഷം ട്വീറ്റ് അക്രമമായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുകയാണോ എന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തേണ്ടതായിരുന്നു. പിന്നെ ലക്", 'ms': "Kertas sistem ini adalah keterangan sistem yang dihantar ke 'SemEval-2019 Task 5' Task B untuk bahasa Inggeris, di mana kita terpaksa mendeteksi ucapan kebencian dan kemudian mengesan perilaku agresif dan penonton sasarannya di Twitter. Ada dua penonton sasaran spesifik, imigran dan perempuan. Bahasa tweet adalah bahasa Inggeris. Kami diperlukan untuk mengesan pertama sama ada tweet mengandungi ucapan kebencian. Kemudian kami diperlukan untuk mencari sama ada tweet menunjukkan perilaku agresif, dan kemudian kami terpaksa mencari sama ada penonton sasaran adalah individu atau kumpulan orang.", 'mt': "Dan id-dokument tas-sistema huwa deskrizzjoni tas-sistema ppreżentata lill-'SemEval-2019 Task 5' Task B għall-lingwa Ingliża, fejn kellna primarjament niskopru diskors ta' mibegħda u mbagħad niskopru mġiba aggressiva u l-udjenza fil-mira tagħha fuq Twitter. There were two specific target audiences, immigrants and women.  Il-lingwa tat-tweets kienet l-Ingliż. Kienu meħtieġa li l-ewwel niżvelaw jekk tweet kienx fih diskors ta’ mibegħda. Minn hemm 'il quddiem irridu nsibu jekk it-tweet kienx qed juri mġiba aggressiva, u mbagħad irridu ssibu jekk l-udjenza mmirata kinitx individwu jew grupp ta' nies.", 'no': 'Denne systempapiret er ei skildring av systemet som vert sendt til oppgåva B «semiEval-2019 oppgåve 5» for engelsk språk, der vi måtte oppdaga hovedsakelig hatspråk og så oppdaga aggressiv oppførsel og målpublikumet på Twitter. Det var to spesifikke målpublikum, imigrantar og kvinner. Språket på tweetene var engelsk. Vi må først finna om ein tweet inneheld hatespråk. Deretter var vi nødvendig for å finna om tweeten viste aggressiv atferd, og så måtte vi finna om målgjenesten var ein individuell eller ein gruppe menneske.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł systemowy jest opisem systemu przesłanego do zadania "SemEval-2019 Task 5" B dla języka angielskiego, w którym musieliśmy przede wszystkim wykrywać mowę nienawiści, a następnie wykrywać agresywne zachowania i jej odbiorców docelowych na Twitterze. Były dwie konkretne grupy docelowe: imigranci i kobiety. Językiem tweetów był angielski. Najpierw musieliśmy wykryć, czy tweet zawiera mowę nienawiści. Następnie musieliśmy sprawdzić, czy tweet wykazywał agresywne zachowanie, a następnie musieliśmy sprawdzić, czy docelową odbiorcą była osoba indywidualna czy grupa osób.', 'mn': "Энэ системийн цаас бол 'SemEval-2019 Task 5' Англи хэл дээр тавигдсан системийн тодорхойлолт бөгөөд бид англи хэл дээр үзэн ядах илтгэлийг олж мэдэх хэрэгтэй байсан бөгөөд дараа нь хүчирхийллийн үйл явдал, зориулагч нарыг Twitter-д олж мэдэх хэрэгтэй. Хоёр тодорхой зорилготой сонсогч, хөдөлгөөнт, эмэгтэйчүүд байлаа. Tweets-ын хэл нь Англи хэл байсан. Бид эхлээд tweet нь үзэн ядах илтгэлийг агуулдаг эсэхийг мэдэх хэрэгтэй байсан. Дараа нь бидэнд tweet нь агуу үйл явдлыг харуулж байгаа эсэхийг олж мэдэх хэрэгтэй байсан. Тэгээд бид зориулсан сонсогчид хэн нэгэн эсвэл хэн нэгэн хүн байсан эсэхийг олж мэдэх хэрэгтэй байсан.", 'ro': 'Această lucrare de sistem este o descriere a sistemului trimis la Task B "SemEval-2019 Task 5" pentru limba engleză, unde a trebuit să detectăm în primul rând discursul de ură și apoi să detectăm comportamentul agresiv și publicul țintă pe Twitter. Au existat două audiențe specifice, imigranții și femeile. Limba tweeturilor era engleza. Am fost obligați să detectăm mai întâi dacă un tweet conține discursuri de ură. După aceea, am fost obligați să aflăm dacă tweetul arată un comportament agresiv, iar apoi a trebuit să aflăm dacă publicul vizat era un individ sau un grup de oameni.', 'so': "Qoraalkan nidaamkan waa tilmaam nidaamka loo soo dhiibay shaqo 5 ee luuqada ingiriisiga ah oo loo soo dhiibay 'SemEval-2019 Task 5' kaas oo aan ugu horeyn u baahnay inaan ogaano hadalka nebcaada kadibna aan cadaynayno tababar xadgudub ah iyo dhaqaalaha waxqabadka la jeedo ee Twita. Waxaa jiray laba dhalinyara oo gaar ah, dadka dalka u soo guuray iyo dumar. Luqada Tweetiga waa Ingiriis. Waxaa nala baahan jiray marka hore in la ogaado in twiti uu ku jiro hadalka nebcaalka. Dabadeedna waxaa nala baahan jiray inaan ogaano in twitteriga uu muujiyo dabeecado xadgudub ah, kadibna waa inaan ogaano in dhegaha la hagaajiyey ay tahay mid gaar ah ama koox dad ah.", 'sv': "Detta systemarbete är en beskrivning av systemet som skickats in till 'SemEval-2019 Task 5' Task B för det engelska språket, där vi i första hand var tvungna att upptäcka hatpropaganda och sedan upptäcka aggressivt beteende och dess målgrupp på Twitter. Det fanns två specifika målgrupper, invandrare och kvinnor. Twitternas språk var engelska. Vi var tvungna att först upptäcka om en tweet innehåller hattal. Därefter var vi tvungna att ta reda på om tweeten visade aggressivt beteende, och sedan var vi tvungna att ta reda på om målgruppen var en individ eller en grupp människor.", 'kk': "Бұл жүйелік қағазды ағылшын тілінің 'semiEval-2019 Task 5' тапсырмасына жіберілген жүйеңіздің сипаттамасы. Бұл жерде негізгі сөздерді анықтау керек, содан кейін агрессивні қасиеттерді және оның мақсатты аудиториясын Екі нақты аудитория, иммигранттер және әйелдер болды. Твиттердің тілі ағылшынша. Біз біріншіден tweet сөйлейтін сөйлейтін белгісін анықтау керек. Содан кейін, tweet агрессивні әрекетті көрсету керек болды. Содан кейін, мақсатты аудиторияның бөлігі не топ адамдар екенін анықтау керек болды.", 'sr': "Ovaj sistemski papir je opis sustava podignut zadatku B 'SemEval-2019 Task 5' za engleski jezik, gde smo prvenstveno morali otkriti govor mržnje i onda otkriti agresivno ponašanje i ciljnu publiku na Twitter. Postoje dve posebne mete publike, imigrante i žene. Jezik tweeta je bio engleski. Trebali smo prvi put da otkrijemo da li tweet sadrži govor mržnje. Onda smo trebali da nađemo da li je tweet pokazivao agresivno ponašanje, a onda smo morali da nađemo da li je ciljana publika individualna ili grupa ljudi.", 'ta': "இந்த கணினி தாள் 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 5' ஆங்கிலத்திற்கான பணி B கொடுக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பின் விவரமாகும், அங்கு நாம் முதன்மையாக வெறுப்பு பேச்சை கண்டறிய வேண்டும இரண்டு குறிப்பிட்ட இலக்கு காட்சிகள், குடியாளிகள், பெண்கள். தொடர்புகளின் மொழி ஆங்கிலத்தில் இருந்தது. ஒரு தொடர் வெறுப்பு பேச்சு இருக்கிறதா என்று முதலில் கண்டறிய வேண்டும். பின்னர் தேவைப்பட்டது தேவைப்பட்டிருந்தால், இந்த tweet aggressive நடத்தையை காண்பிக்கிறதா என்பதை கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும். பின்னர் இலக்கு", 'si': "මේ පද්ධති පත්තුව තමයි 'සෙම්වෙල්-2019 වැඩක් 5' වැඩක් B වලින් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂාව සඳහා පද්ධතියේ විස්තරයක්, අපිට ප්\u200dරධාන විරෝධ කතාව හොයා විශේෂ ලක්ෂණ දෙකක් තියෙනවා ප්\u200dරධානකයෝ, ග්\u200dරාහකයෝ සහ ගැනියෝ. ට්විට්ට්ගේ භාෂාව තමයි ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ. අපිට මුලින්ම දැනගන්න ඕනේ ට්විට් එකක් වෛර කතාවක් තියෙන්නේ නැද්ද කියලා. ඊට පස්සේ අපිට අවශ්\u200dය වුනා ට්විට් එක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්නේ නැද්ද කියලා, ඊට පස්සේ අපිට ලක්කුණු ප්\u200dරධානකයා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක", 'ur': "یہ سیسٹم کاغذ اس سیسٹم کا سفارش ہے جو انگلیسی زبان کے لئے 'SemEval-2019 Task 5' ٹاکس ب کے لئے پیش کیا گیا ہے، جہاں ہمیں ابتدا دشمنی سخنرانی شناسایا ہونا چاہیے اور اس کے بعد اضطراری رفتار اور اس کی تابع اڈیونس کو ٹویٹر میں تلاش کرنا دو مخصوص موقع حاضر کرنے والے، مہاجرین اور عورتیں تھے۔ ٹویٹوں کی زبان انگلیسی تھی۔ ہمیں پہلی بار معلوم کرنے کی ضرورت تھی کہ ایک ٹویٹ میں نفرت کی بات ہے. اس کے بعد ہم کو تلاش کی ضرورت تھی کہ ٹویٹ بڑے سخت رفتار دکھاتا ہے اور پھر ہم کو معلوم ہونا چاہتا تھا کہ ہدایت دینے والے ایک شخص یا ایک گروہ آدمی تھے", 'uz': "Bu tizim gazeti ingliz tili uchun 'SemEval-2019 Vazifa 5' tizimga joʻnatilgan vazifa B' tizimning taʼrifiидир. Bu tilda biz yolg'on gapiruvni aniqlash kerak va keyin Twitterda qandaydir amalni aniqlash kerak edi. Икки махсус аъзолар, муҳожирлар ва аёллар бор. The language of the tweets was English.  Bizga birinchi xabar yolg'onligini aniqlash kerak edi. Keyin biz Twitterda kuchli xuddi ko'rsatadi deb o'rganish kerak, va keyin eng qanday maqsadlar shaxsiy yoki bir guruhi bo'lishi kerak.", 'vi': 'Tờ báo hệ thống này là một mô tả hệ thống được gửi đến Nhiệm vụ "Semkhai-thẩm 99" Nhiệm vụ B cho ngôn ngữ Anh Quốc, nơi chúng tôi phải phát hiện tiếng nói căm ghét và sau đó phát hiện hành vi hung hăng và khán giả của nó trên Twitter. Có hai khán giả đặc biệt, nhập cư và phụ nữ. Ngôn ngữ trên Twitter là tiếng Anh. Chúng tôi được yêu cầu trước tiên phát hiện rằng Twitter có chứa ngôn ngữ căm ghét hay không. Sau đó, chúng tôi được yêu cầu phải tìm ra hành vi tích cực của tweet, và sau đó chúng tôi phải tìm hiểu xem có phải là một cá nhân hay một nhóm người không.', 'bg': 'Този системен доклад е описание на системата, подадена на задача Б за английския език, където трябваше основно да открием речта на омразата и след това да открием агресивното поведение и целевата му аудитория в Туитър. Имаше две специфични целеви аудитории - имигранти и жени. Езикът на туитовете беше английски. Трябваше първо да открием дали туитът съдържа реч на омразата. След това трябваше да разберем дали туитът показва агресивно поведение, а след това трябваше да разберем дали целевата аудитория е индивид или група хора.', 'nl': "Deze systeempaper is een beschrijving van het systeem dat is ingediend bij 'SemEval-2019 Taak 5' Taak B voor de Engelse taal, waarbij we voornamelijk haatspraak moesten detecteren en vervolgens agressief gedrag en zijn doelgroep op Twitter moesten detecteren. Er waren twee specifieke doelgroepen, immigranten en vrouwen. De taal van de tweets was Engels. We moesten eerst detecteren of een tweet haattoespraak bevat. Daarna moesten we uitzoeken of de tweet agressief gedrag vertoonde, en vervolgens moesten we uitzoeken of de doelgroep een individu of een groep mensen was.", 'da': "Dette system papir er en beskrivelse af det system, der blev indsendt til 'SemEval-2019 Task 5' Task B for det engelske sprog, hvor vi primært skulle opdage hadefulde tale og derefter opdage aggressiv adfærd og målgruppe på Twitter. Der var to specifikke målgrupper, indvandrere og kvinder. Twitternes sprog var engelsk. Vi skulle først opdage, om en tweet indeholder hadefulde tale. Derefter blev vi nødt til at finde ud af, om tweetet viste aggressiv adfærd, og så måtte vi finde ud af, om målgruppen var et individ eller en gruppe mennesker.", 'hr': "Ovaj sistemski papir je opis sustava podnošenog zadatku B 'SemEval-2019 Task 5' za engleski jezik, gdje smo prvenstveno morali otkriti govor mržnje i onda otkriti agresivno ponašanje i ciljnu publiku na Twitteru. Bilo je dva određena ciljna publika, imigranta i žena. Jezik tweets je bio engleski. Trebali su nam prvi put otkriti je li tweet sadrži govor mržnje. Onda smo trebali naći da li je tweet pokazivao agresivno ponašanje, a onda smo morali naći da li je ciljana publika individualna ili grupa ljudi.", 'id': "Kertas sistem ini adalah deskripsi sistem yang dikirim ke 'SemEval-2019 Task 5' Task B untuk bahasa Inggris, di mana kita harus terutama mendeteksi pidato kebencian dan kemudian mendeteksi perilaku agresif dan target penonton di Twitter. Ada dua target penonton spesifik, imigran dan wanita. Bahasa tweet adalah bahasa Inggris. We were required to first detect whether a tweet is containing hate speech.  Kemudian kami dibutuhkan untuk menemukan apakah tweet menunjukkan perilaku agresif, dan kemudian kami harus menemukan apakah penonton yang ditujukan adalah individu atau kelompok orang.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم توصیف سیستم\u200cای است که برای زبان انگلیسی "ماده\u200cی ۲۰۱۹ تابع ۵" فرستاده شده است، جایی که ما مجبور بودیم پیش از این سخنرانی از نفرت را شناسایی کنیم و بعد رفتاری agresively و تماشاگران هدف\u200cاش را در توئیتر شناسایی کنیم. دو تا تماشاگر هدف خاص، مهاجران و زنان وجود داشتند. زبان tweets انگلیسی بود. ما باید اولین بار بفهمیم که توئیت دارد یا نه. سپس ما نیاز داشتیم تا پیدا کنیم که آیا توئیت رفتار وحشتناک را نشان می دهد، و سپس ما باید پیدا کنیم که آیا تماشاگران هدف یافته یک فرد یا گروهی از مردم است.', 'sw': "Gazeti hili la mfumo ni maelezo ya mfumo uliotolewa kwa 'SemEval-2019 Kazi 5' ya kazi B kwa lugha ya Kiingereza, ambapo ilipaswa kugundua hotuba ya chuki na kisha kugundua tabia za kibaguzi na hadhira yake kwa lengo la Twita. Kulikuwa na hadhira wawili maalumu, wahamiaji na wanawake. Lugha ya twita ilikuwa ni Kiingereza. Tulihitaji kwanza kutambua kama twiti inahusu hotuba ya chuki. Kisha tulihitaji kutafuta ikiwa twita ilionyesha tabia za kibaguzi, na kisha tulipaswa kutambua kama hadhira ya lengo lililolengwa ni mtu au kundi la watu.", 'de': 'Dieses System Paper ist eine Beschreibung des Systems, das bei "SemEval-2019 Task 5" Task B für die englische Sprache eingereicht wurde, bei dem wir primär Hassreden erkennen und dann aggressives Verhalten und seine Zielgruppe in Twitter erkennen mussten. Es gab zwei spezifische Zielgruppen, Einwanderer und Frauen. Die Sprache der Tweets war Englisch. Wir mussten zuerst feststellen, ob ein Tweet Hassreden enthält. Danach mussten wir herausfinden, ob der Tweet aggressives Verhalten zeigte, und dann mussten wir herausfinden, ob die Zielgruppe eine Einzelperson oder eine Gruppe von Personen war.', 'ko': "이 시스템 파일은 영어'SemEval-2019 퀘스트 5'퀘스트 B에 제출된 시스템을 설명하고 있으며, 그 중에서 우리는 먼저 원한 발언을 검측한 다음에 트위터의 공격 행위와 목표 시청자를 검측해야 한다.이민자와 여성 두 명의 특정한 목표 시청자가 있다.트위터의 언어는 영어다.우리는 트위터에 증오 발언이 담겨 있는지 먼저 검사해 달라는 요청을 받았다.이후 트위터가 공격적인 행동을 했는지 찾아내야 한다. 그리고 목표 시청자가 개인인지 한 무리인지 찾아내야 한다.", 'af': "Hierdie stelsel papier is 'n beskrywing van die stelsel wat aan 'SemEval-2019 Taak 5' Taak B vir die Engels taal ingestuur is, waar ons moet eerste haat spreek ontdek en dan aggressiewe gedrag en sy doel publiek in Twitter ontdek. Daar was twee spesifieke doel publiekers, immigrante en vroue. Die taal van die tweets was Engels. Ons was benodig om eerste beskry of 'n tweet haat woord bevat. Daarna het ons nodig om te vind of die tweet aggressiewe gedrag vertoon het, en dan het ons moet vind of die doeltyd publiek 'n individueel of 'n groep van mense was.", 'am': 'ይህ ሲስተም ፕሮግራም ለኢንግሊዝኛ ቋንቋ "SemEval-2019 ስራ 5" የሚደረገውን የስርዓት B መግለጫ ነው፡፡ ሁለት የተለያዩ አዳኞች፣ ስደተኞች ሴቶችም ነበሩ፡፡ የTweets ቋንቋ እንግሊዘኛ ነው:: የጥል ንግግር መሆኑን አስቀድመን ማወቅ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ Thereafter we were required to find whether the tweet was showing aggressive behaviour, and then we had to find whether the targeted audience was an individual or a group of people.', 'az': "Bu sistem kağıdı İngilizce dili üçün 'SemEval-2019 Task 5' işin ə göndərilmiş sistemin təfsiləsidir. Bu sistem kağıdı ilk dəfə nifrət sözlərini keşfetmeliyimiz və sonra agresif davranışlarını və məqsədilərini Twitter içində keşfetmeliyimiz yerdir. İki müəyyən məqsəd auditorisi, imigrantlər və qadınlar idi. Tövtlərin dili İngilizdir. Bizə ilk dəfə tweet nifrət sözləri barəsində olmadığını öyrənmək lazımdı. Sonra tweet agresif davranışı göstərdiyini öyrənmək lazım oldu. Sonra məqsədilə görənlərin individu və ya bir grup insan olduğunu öyrənmək lazım oldu.", 'tr': "Bu sistem kagyzy 'SemEval-2019 Görevi 5' Iňlisçe dilinde berilen sistemiň bir waspy. Biz bu sistemiň ýigrenç sözlerini tanamak zorundaydyk we soňra agressiv zadyny we netijesini Twitter'da tanamak zorundaydyk. Iki sany beýleki maksady seçgisi, göçmenler we aýallar bar. Tweets dili iňlisçe boldy. Biz ilkinji gezek tweet ýigrenýän çykyşynyň bardygyny tanamalydyk. Soňra tweet gijesi agresif davranışy görkezýändigini tapmalydyk we soňra maksadyň bir adam ýa-da bir topar adamdygyny tapmalydyk.", 'bn': "This system paper is a description of the system submitted to 'SemEval-2019 Task 5' Task B for the English language, where we had to primarily detect hate speech and then detect aggressive behaviour and its target audience in Twitter.  দুই নির্দিষ্ট টার্গেট শ্রোতা, অভিবাসী এবং নারী ছিল। টুইটের ভাষা ইংরেজী ছিল। আমাদের প্রথমে বুঝতে হবে যে একটি টুইট ঘৃণা ভাষণ আছে কিনা। এরপর আমাদের খুঁজে বের করতে হবে টুইট কি আক্রমণের আচরণ দেখাচ্ছে কিনা, আর তারপর আমাদের খুঁজে বের করতে হবে যে লক্ষ্যবস্তুরা ব্যক্তি অথবা কোন দলের", 'bs': "Ovaj sistemski papir je opis sustava podignut zadatku B 'SemEval-2019 Task 5' za engleski jezik, gdje smo prvenstveno morali otkriti govor mržnje i onda otkriti agresivno ponašanje i ciljnu publiku na Twitter. Bilo je dvije posebne ciljne publike, imigrante i žene. Jezik tweeta je bio engleski. Trebali smo prvi put da otkrijemo da li tweet sadrži govor mržnje. Onda smo trebali naći da li je tweet pokazivao agresivno ponašanje, a onda smo morali naći da li je ciljana publika individualna ili grupa ljudi.", 'hy': 'Այս համակարգի աշխատանքը համակարգի նկարագրություն է, որը ներկայացված է Անգլերենի լեզվի «ՍեմԵվալ-2019 Պատասխան 5» Պատասխանին Բ, որտեղ մենք ստիպված էինք գտնել ատելության խոսքերը և հետո հայտնաբերել ագրեսիվ վարքագիծը և դրա նպատակային հանդիսատես Կան երկու հատուկ նպատակային հանդիսատես, միմիգրանտներ և կանայք: Թվիթերի լեզուն անգլերեն էր: Առաջին հերթին մեզ հարկավոր էր հայտնաբերել, թե արդյոք թվիթը պարունակում է ատելության խոսք: Հետո մենք ստիպված էինք պարզել, արդյոք թվիթերը ցույց են տալիս ագրեսիվ վարքագծը, և հետո մենք ստիպված էինք պարզել, արդյոք նպատակային հանդիսատեսը անհատ է, թե մարդկանց խումբ:', 'sq': "Ky dokument i sistemit është një përshkrim i sistemit të paraqitur në 'SemEval-2019 Task 5' Task B për gjuhën angleze, ku ne duhej kryesisht të zbulonim fjalimin e urrejtjes dhe pastaj të zbulonim sjelljen agresive dhe publikun e saj në Twitter. Ishin dy publikë të caktuar, emigrante dhe gra. Gjuha e tweeteve ishte angleze. Na duhej të zbulonim së pari nëse një tweet përmban fjalimin e urrejtjes. Thereafter we were required to find whether the tweet was showing aggressive behaviour, and then we had to find whether the targeted audience was an individual or a group of people.", 'et': 'Käesolev süsteemitöö kirjeldab süsteemi, mis esitati inglise keele ülesandele SemEval-2019 Task 5, kus me pidime peamiselt tuvastama vihakõne ning seejärel tuvastama agressiivse käitumise ja selle sihtrühma Twitteris. Konkreetseid sihtrühmi oli kaks: sisserändajad ja naised. Säutsude keel oli inglise keel. Me pidime esmalt avastama, kas säutsu sisaldab vihakõnet. Seejärel pidime otsima, kas säuts näitab agressiivset käitumist, ja seejärel pidime otsima, kas sihtrühm on üksikisik või inimrühm.', 'cs': 'Tento systémový příspěvek je popisem systému předloženého na úlohu "SemEval-2019 Task 5" B pro anglický jazyk, kde jsme museli primárně detekovat nenávistnou řeč a následně detekovat agresivní chování a jeho cílové publikum na Twitteru. Byly zde dvě specifické cílové skupiny, imigranti a ženy. Jazyk tweetů byl angličtina. Byli jsme povinni nejprve zjistit, zda tweet obsahuje nenávistnou řeč. Poté jsme museli zjistit, zda tweet vykazuje agresivní chování, a pak jsme museli zjistit, zda je cílovým publikem jednotlivec nebo skupina lidí.', 'ca': "Aquest paper del sistema és una descripció del sistema submetit a 'SemEval-2019 Task 5' Task B per a la llengua anglesa, on havíem de detectar primàriament el discurs d'odi i després detectar comportament agressiu i el seu públic alvo a Twitter. Hi havia dos públics específics, immigrants i dones. El llenguatge dels tweets era anglès. Ens va obligar primer a detectar si un tweet conté un discurs d'odi. Després vam ser obligats a descobrir si el tweet mostrava comportament agressiu, i llavors vam haver de descobrir si el públic mirat era un individu o un grup de persones.", 'fi': 'Tämä järjestelmäraportti on kuvaus englanninkieliseen SemEval-2019 Task 5 -tehtävään B toimitetusta järjestelmästä, jossa meidän piti ensisijaisesti havaita vihapuhe ja sen jälkeen havaita aggressiivinen käyttäytyminen ja sen kohdeyleisö Twitterissä. Kohderyhmää oli kaksi, maahanmuuttajat ja naiset. Twiittien kieli oli englanti. Meidän piti ensin havaita, sisältääkö tweet vihapuhetta. Sen jälkeen meidän piti selvittää, näkyykö twiitti aggressiivista käyttäytymistä, ja sitten meidän täytyi selvittää, oliko kohdeyleisö yksilö vai ihmisryhmä.', 'ha': "Wannan takardar na'urar-na'ura, yana da misãlin tsarin da aka saka shi zuwa 'SemEl-2019 Tafiyar 5' wa harshen Ingiriya, inda ya kamata mu gane magana na ƙeta, kuma ka gane aikin bayani da sauraransa da ake amfani da shi a Twitter. Kun da saurãre biyu masu amfani da, muhamata da mãtã. Harshen Twitter ta kasance Ingiriya. An buƙata mu kwanza a gane, shin, wani Twitter yana da magana mai ƙyãma. Sa'an nan kuma aka buƙata mu gane cewa shin Twitter yana nũna aikin bayani, kuma sai muka buƙata mu gane musamman da za'a yi amfani da shi ko kuwa jama'a guda ko jama'a.", 'he': 'נייר המערכת הזה הוא תיאור של המערכת שנשלחה למשימה "SemEval-2019 Task 5" Task B לשפה האנגלית, שבו היינו צריכים בעיקר לגלות נאום שנאה ואז לגלות התנהגות אגרסיבית וקהל המטרה שלה בטוויטר. There were two specific target audiences, immigrants and women.  The language of the tweets was English.  נאלצנו לראשונה לגלות אם טוויט מכיל נאום שנאה. לאחר מכן נאלצנו לגלות אם הטוויט הראה התנהגות אגרסיבית, ואז נאלצנו לגלות אם הקהל המטרה היה אדם או קבוצה של אנשים.', 'bo': 'མ་ལག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིས་མ་ལག་གི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཞིག་ཡིན། འདི་རུ་སྐྱེལ་བ་དང་། བུད་མེད་གཉིས་དམིགས་འབེན་སའི་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་ཡོད། Tweets འི་སྐད་ཡིག་ནི་དབྱིན་ཡིག་རེད། ང་ཚོས་འབྲེལ་འདྲ་ཞིག་ལ་ཕྱིར་ཉེན་ཁ་དང་པོ་ཞིག་རྟོགས་དགོས་པ་མིན། དེ་རྗེས་སུ་ང་ཚོར་ལེན་དགོས་པ་ཡིན་ཡང་ན། དེའི་གྲ་ཐོག་གི་འགྲོ་སྟངས་ཧྲིལ་བ་ཡིན་མིན་ནའང་། དེ་ནས་ང་ཚོར་རྣམས་ལ་དམིགས་འབེན་', 'jv': "Perintah sistem iki dadi kelangan kelangan ning sistem sing nyeanye 'semi-2011 task 5' task B kanggo langgambar ingkang, wong awake dh챕w챕 kudu bakal dh챕w챕 ngerasakno ora ono sinakno sing nyimpen podho, lan akeh dh챕w챕 bakal dh챕w챕 basa tau karo perbudhakan kanggo nyenggawe lan ijol-ijolan sing nyengkuyung Tutor Kayan챕 awak dh챕w챕 sing nyimpen tanggal, dadi wis rambarang lan babah. Tulung tresnaning bintang kuwi Inggris. Awak dh챕w챕 kudu beraksi punika ingkang sampeyan siji ora. Murak챕 awak dh챕w챕 kudu nggawe winih dh챕w챕 kuwi iki dadi, ngono awak dh챕w챕 kudu nggawe winih sing apik dh챕w챕. Awak dh챕w챕 kudu nggawe awak dh챕w챕 kesempatan kanggo awak dh챕w챕 uwong sing bakal terus tambah ak챔h wong.", 'sk': 'Ta sistemski prispevek je opis sistema, predloženega v nalogo B "SemEval-2019 Task 5" za angleški jezik, kjer smo morali v Twitterju predvsem zaznati sovražni govor in nato zaznati agresivno vedenje in njegovo ciljno občinstvo. Posebni ciljni skupini sta bili priseljenci in ženske. Jezik tweetov je bil angleščina. Najprej smo morali ugotoviti, ali tvit vsebuje sovražni govor. Nato smo morali ugotoviti, ali tweet kaže agresivno vedenje, nato pa smo morali ugotoviti, ali je ciljna publika posameznik ali skupina ljudi.'}
{'en': 'TuEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : LSTM Approach to Hate Speech Detection in English and Spanish', 'ar': 'TuEval في SemEval-2019 المهمة 5: نهج LSTM للكشف عن الكلام الذي يحض على الكراهية باللغتين الإنجليزية والإسبانية', 'fr': 'TuEval au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 5\xa0: Approche LSTM de la détection des discours haineux en anglais et en espagnol', 'pt': 'TuEval no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 5: Abordagem LSTM para Detecção de Discurso de Ódio em Inglês e Espanhol', 'es': 'TuEval en SemEval-2019 Tarea 5: Enfoque de LSTM para la detección del discurso de odio en inglés y español', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のTuEvalタスク5 ：英語とスペイン語でのヘイトスピーチ検出へのLSTMアプローチ', 'zh': '周一在SemEval-2019务5:LSTM英语与西班牙语仇言检法', 'ru': 'TuEval на SemEval-2019 Задача 5: Подход LSTM к обнаружению ненавистнической речи на английском и испанском языках', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 5 में TuEval: अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश में हेट स्पीच डिटेक्शन के लिए LSTM दृष्टिकोण', 'ga': 'TuEval ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 5: Cur Chuige LSTM i leith Brath Cainte i mBéarla agus i Spáinnis', 'el': 'Εργασία 5: Προσέγγιση για την ανίχνευση ομιλίας μίσους στα Αγγλικά και Ισπανικά', 'hu': 'TuEval a SemEval-2019 5. feladat: LSTM megközelítés a gyűlölet beszédfelismerésére angol és spanyol nyelven', 'kk': 'TuEval at semiEval-2019 Task 5: LSTM Approach to Hate Speech Detection in English and Spanish', 'it': "TuEval al SemEval-2019 Task 5: L'approccio LSTM al rilevamento del parlato in inglese e spagnolo", 'lt': 'TuEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: LSTM Approach to Hate Speech Detection in English and Spanish', 'mk': 'TuEval на SemEval-2019 задача 5: LSTM Approach to Hate Speech Detection на англиски и шпански', 'ms': 'TuEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: LSTM Approach to Hate Speech Detection in English and Spanish', 'ka': 'TuEval semiEval-2019 პარამეტრი 5: LSTM დახმარება წარმოდგენისთვის სიტყვების განახსნა ინგლისური და სპანელი', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 5: എംഎസ്റ്റിം ഇംഗ്ലീഷും സ്പാനിഷും ഇംഗ്ലീഷും വെറുപ്പുള്ള സംസാര ഡിറ്റീഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'TuEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: LSTM Approach to Hate Speech Detection in English and Spanish', 'mn': 'TuEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: LSTM Approach to Hate Speech Detection in English and Spanish', 'no': 'TuEval ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 5: LSTM-tilnærming til hatt-taleoppdaging på engelsk og spansk', 'pl': 'Zadanie 5: Podejście LSTM do wykrywania mowy nienawiści w języku angielskim i hiszpańskim', 'ro': 'TuEval la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 5: Abordarea LSTM pentru detectarea vorbirii urâte în limba engleză și spaniolă', 'sr': 'TuEval na semiEval-2019 Task 5: LSTM pristup otkrivanju govora mržnje na engleskom i španjolskom', 'si': 'Tueval at semeval-2019 Job 5: LSTM approach to Hate Talk Detection in English and Sphere', 'so': 'TuEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: LSTM Approach to Hate Speech Detection in Ingiriis and Isbanish', 'ta': 'TuEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: LSTM Approach to Hate Speech Detection in English and Spanish', 'sv': 'TuEval på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 5: LSTM-metoden för att hata taldetektering på engelska och spanska', 'ur': 'ٹوئوئل-2019 ٹاکس 5 میں ٹوئوئل: LSTM انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی میں دشمنی بات شناسایے کے لئے تقریبا ہے', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifa 5: LSTM Approach to Hate Speech Detection Ingliz va Ispanchaga', 'vi': 'TuEval tại SemEvl-209 Task 5: LSTM tiếp cận đến ghét diễn văn bằng tiếng Anh và Tây Ban Nha', 'hr': 'TuEval na semiEval-2019 zadatak 5: LSTM pristup otkrivanju govora mržnje na engleskom i španjolskom', 'nl': 'TuEval op SemEval-2019 Taak 5: LSTM aanpak van haatspraakdetectie in het Engels en Spaans', 'da': 'TuEval på SemEval-2019 Opgave 5: LSTM tilgang til hade tale detektering på engelsk og spansk', 'bg': 'Задача 5: Подход към откриването на речта на омразата на английски и испански език', 'de': 'TuEval bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 5: LSTM Ansatz zur Hassspracherkennung in Englisch und Spanisch', 'id': 'TuEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: LSTM Approach to Hate Speech Detection in English and Spanish', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019의 TuEval 퀘스트 5: LSTM 방법으로 영어와 스페인어에서 증오의 음성을 검출', 'fa': 'TuEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: LSTM Approach to hate speech detection in English and Spanish', 'sw': 'TuEval katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 5: LSTM Kuelekea Kutambua Hotuba ya Hati kwa Kiingereza na Kihispania', 'tr': 'TuEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: LSTM Approach to Hate Speech Detection in English and Spanish', 'af': 'TuEval by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 5: LSTM toegang na Hate Speech Deteksie in Engels en Spaanse', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'sq': 'TuEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: LSTM Approach to Hate Speech Detection in English and Spanish', 'hy': 'Tuewal-ը սեմյալ 2019-ի 5. հանձնարարությունում. LSMT մոտեցումը ատելության խոսքի հայտնաբերելուն անգլերենով և իսպաներենով', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের টুইভাল: এলএসএম ইংরেজি ও স্প্যানিশ ভাষায় ঘৃণা প্রকাশের জন্য যাওয়ার পথ', 'bs': 'TuEval na semiEval-2019 Task 5: LSTM pristup otkrivanju govora mržnje na engleskom i španjolskom', 'az': 'TuEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: LSTM Approach to Hate Speech Detection in English and Spanish', 'ca': 'TuEval a SemEval-2019 tasca 5: LSTM Approach to Hate Speech Detection en anglès i espanyol', 'cs': 'Úkol 5: LSTM přístup k detekci nenávisti řeči v angličtině a španělštině', 'et': 'TuEval SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 5: LSTM lähenemine vihkamise kõne tuvastamisele inglise ja hispaania keeles', 'fi': 'TuEval SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 5: LSTM-lähestymistapa vihapuheen havaitsemiseen englanniksi ja espanjaksi', 'jv': 'Tuinval nang seminval-2011 task 5: LTT M Method to Dese Speakch detection in French and Spanish', 'ha': 'QScriptBreakpointsModel', 'sk': 'TuEval na SemEval-2019 Naloga 5: pristop LSTM k odkrivanju sovražnega govora v angleščini in španščini', 'he': 'TuEval ב SemEval-2019 Task 5: LSTM Approach to Hate Speech Detection in English and Spanish', 'bo': 'TuEval at SemEval-2019 Task 5: LSTM Approach to Hate Speech Detection in English and Spanish'}
{'en': 'The detection of hate speech, especially in online platforms and forums, is quickly becoming a hot topic as anti-hate speech legislation begins to be applied to public discourse online. The HatEval shared task was created with this in mind ; participants were expected to develop a model capable of determining whether or not input (in this case, Twitter datasets in English and Spanish) could be considered hate speech (designated as Task A), if they were aggressive, and whether the tweet was targeting an individual, or speaking generally (Task B). We approached this task by creating an LSTM model with an embedding layer. We found that our model performed considerably better on English language input when compared to Spanish language input. In English, we achieved an F1-Score of 0.466 for Task A and 0.462 for Task B ; In Spanish, we achieved scores of 0.617 and 0.612 on Task A and Task B, respectively.', 'ar': 'أصبح الكشف عن خطاب الكراهية ، لا سيما في المنصات والمنتديات عبر الإنترنت ، موضوعًا ساخنًا سريعًا حيث بدأ تطبيق تشريعات مكافحة خطاب الكراهية على الخطاب العام عبر الإنترنت. تم إنشاء مهمة HatEval المشتركة مع وضع ذلك في الاعتبار ؛ كان من المتوقع أن يطور المشاركون نموذجًا قادرًا على تحديد ما إذا كانت المدخلات (في هذه الحالة ، مجموعات بيانات Twitter باللغتين الإنجليزية والإسبانية) يمكن اعتبارها كلامًا يحض على الكراهية (تم تحديدها كمهمة أ) ، إذا كانت عدوانية ، وما إذا كانت التغريدة تستهدف فردي ، أو يتحدث بشكل عام (المهمة ب). لقد تعاملنا مع هذه المهمة من خلال إنشاء نموذج LSTM بطبقة التضمين. وجدنا أن نموذجنا كان يعمل بشكل أفضل في إدخال اللغة الإنجليزية عند مقارنته بإدخال اللغة الإسبانية. في اللغة الإنجليزية ، حققنا درجة F1 من 0.466 للمهمة A و 0.462 للمهمة B ؛ في الإسبانية ، حققنا درجات 0.617 و 0.612 في المهمة أ والمهمة ب ، على التوالي.', 'pt': 'A detecção de discurso de ódio, especialmente em plataformas e fóruns on-line, está rapidamente se tornando um tema quente à medida que a legislação anti-discurso de ódio começa a ser aplicada ao discurso público on-line. A tarefa compartilhada HatEval foi criada com isso em mente; Esperava-se que os participantes desenvolvessem um modelo capaz de determinar se a entrada (neste caso, conjuntos de dados do Twitter em inglês e espanhol) poderia ou não ser considerada discurso de ódio (designado como Tarefa A), se fosse agressivo e se o tweet tinha como alvo um indivíduo, ou falando em geral (Tarefa B). Abordamos essa tarefa criando um modelo LSTM com uma camada de incorporação. Descobrimos que nosso modelo teve um desempenho consideravelmente melhor na entrada em inglês quando comparado à entrada em espanhol. Em inglês, obtivemos um F1-Score de 0,466 para a Tarefa A e 0,462 para a Tarefa B; Em espanhol, obtivemos pontuações de 0,617 e 0,612 na Tarefa A e na Tarefa B, respectivamente.', 'es': 'La detección de la incitación al odio, especialmente en plataformas y foros en línea, se está convirtiendo rápidamente en un tema candente a medida que la legislación contra la incitación al odio comienza a aplicarse al discurso público en línea. La tarea compartida HatEval se creó con esto en mente; se esperaba que los participantes desarrollaran un modelo capaz de determinar si los aportes (en este caso, los conjuntos de datos de Twitter en inglés y español) podían considerarse discurso de odio (designado como Tarea A), si eran agresivos y si el tuit era dirigirse a una persona o hablar en general (Tarea B). Abordamos esta tarea creando un modelo LSTM con una capa de incrustación. Descubrimos que nuestro modelo tuvo un rendimiento considerablemente mejor en la entrada del idioma inglés en comparación con la entrada en español. En inglés, logramos una puntuación F1 de 0.466 para la Tarea A y 0.462 para la Tarea B; en español, logramos puntuaciones de 0.617 y 0.612 en la Tarea A y la Tarea B, respectivamente.', 'fr': "La détection des discours de haine, en particulier sur les plateformes et les forums en ligne, devient rapidement un sujet brûlant alors que la législation anti-discours de haine commence à s'appliquer au discours public en ligne. La tâche partagée HatEval a été créée dans cet esprit\xa0; les participants devaient développer un modèle capable de déterminer si les entrées (dans ce cas, les ensembles de données Twitter en anglais et en espagnol) pouvaient être considérées comme des discours haineux (désigné comme tâche A), s'ils étaient agressifs, et si le tweet était cibler un individu, ou parler de manière générale (tâche B). Nous avons abordé cette tâche en créant un modèle LSTM avec une couche d'intégration. Nous avons constaté que notre modèle fonctionnait considérablement mieux sur la saisie en anglais que sur la saisie en espagnol. En anglais, nous avons obtenu un score F1 de 0,466 pour la tâche A et de 0,462 pour la tâche B\xa0; en espagnol, nous avons obtenu des scores de 0,617 et 0,612 pour la tâche A et la tâche B, respectivement.", 'ja': 'ヘイトスピーチの検出、特にオンラインプラットフォームやフォーラムでのヘイトスピーチの検出は、ヘイトスピーチ防止法がオンラインの公開講演に適用され始めると、すぐにホットな話題になり始めています。HatEval共有タスクは、これを念頭に置いて作成されました。参加者は、入力（この場合、英語とスペイン語のTwitterデータセット）がヘイトスピーチと見なされるかどうか（タスクAとして指定）、攻撃的であるかどうか、ツイートが個人を対象としているかどうか、または一般的に話しているかどうか（タスクB ）を判断できるモデルを開発することが期待されています。埋め込みレイヤーを持つLSTMモデルを作成することで、このタスクにアプローチしました。私たちのモデルは、スペイン語入力と比較して、英語入力でかなり優れたパフォーマンスを発揮することがわかりました。英語では、タスクAで0.466、タスクBで0.462のF 1スコアを達成しました。スペイン語では、タスクAとタスクBでそれぞれ0.617、0.612のスコアを達成しました。', 'zh': '随仇立法,始用于在线公共语,仇言之检,特在在线台论坛中,速成一热门话题。 HatEval共享之务,虑及此而创之; 参与者期发一模,定输(于此,英语与西班牙语之Twitter数集)可以为仇言(指为任A),苟有攻击性,与推文为私言(任B)。 开创带嵌 LSTM 模以行之。 吾见西班牙语之输也,吾形于英语者多矣。 其在英语也,AF1分为0.466,B为0.462。 西班牙语之于事,A之于事B各得其0.6170.612之数。', 'hi': 'नफरत भाषण का पता लगाना, विशेष रूप से ऑनलाइन प्लेटफार्मों और मंचों में, जल्दी से एक गर्म विषय बन रहा है क्योंकि विरोधी नफरत भाषण कानून को ऑनलाइन सार्वजनिक प्रवचन पर लागू किया जाना शुरू हो जाता है। HatEval साझा कार्य को इस बात को ध्यान में रखते हुए बनाया गया था; प्रतिभागियों को यह निर्धारित करने में सक्षम एक मॉडल विकसित करने की उम्मीद थी कि इनपुट (इस मामले में, अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश में ट्विटर डेटासेट) को हेट स्पीच (टास्क ए के रूप में नामित) माना जा सकता है या नहीं, अगर वे आक्रामक थे, और क्या ट्वीट किसी व्यक्ति को लक्षित कर रहा था, या आम तौर पर बोल रहा था (टास्क बी)। हमने एक एम्बेडिंग परत के साथ एक एलएसटीएम मॉडल बनाकर इस कार्य से संपर्क किया। हमने पाया कि हमारे मॉडल ने स्पेनिश भाषा इनपुट की तुलना में अंग्रेजी भाषा इनपुट पर काफी बेहतर प्रदर्शन किया। अंग्रेजी में, हमने कार्य A के लिए 0.466 और कार्य B के लिए 0.462 का F1-स्कोर प्राप्त किया; स्पेनिश में, हमने टास्क ए और टास्क बी पर क्रमशः 0.617 और 0.612 का स्कोर हासिल किया।', 'ru': 'Обнаружение ненавистнических высказываний, особенно на онлайн-платформах и форумах, быстро становится горячей темой, поскольку законодательство о борьбе с ненавистническими высказываниями начинает применяться к публичному дискурсу в Интернете. Общая задача HatEval была создана с учетом этого; участники должны были разработать модель, позволяющую определить, могут ли вводимые данные (в данном случае наборы данных Twitter на английском и испанском языках) рассматриваться в качестве высказываний, разжигающих ненависть (обозначенных как Задача A), если они являются агрессивными, и нацелен ли твит на отдельного человека, или говорящих в целом (Задача B). Мы подошли к этой задаче, создав модель LSTM со слоем встраивания. Мы обнаружили, что наша модель показала значительно лучшие результаты при вводе английского языка по сравнению с вводом испанского языка. На английском языке мы достигли показателя F1 - 0,466 для задачи A и 0,462 для задачи B; На испанском языке мы достигли показателей 0,617 и 0,612 для задачи A и задачи B, соответственно.', 'ga': 'Tá braite fuathchaint, go háirithe ar ardáin agus fóraim ar líne, ag éirí go han-tapa mar ábhar mór le rá de réir mar a thosaíonn reachtaíocht cainte frith-fuath a chur i bhfeidhm ar dhioscúrsa poiblí ar líne. Cruthaíodh an tasc roinnte HatEval leis seo san áireamh; bhíothas ag súil go bhforbródh rannpháirtithe samhail a bheadh in ann a chinneadh an bhféadfaí nó nach bhféadfaí ionchur (sa chás seo, tacair sonraí Twitter i mBéarla agus i Spáinnis) a mheas mar fhuathchaint (ainmnithe mar Thasc A), má bhí siad ionsaitheach, agus an raibh an tweet dírithe ar duine aonair, nó ag labhairt go ginearálta (Tasc B). Thugamar faoin tasc seo trí mhúnla LSTM a chruthú le ciseal leabaithe. Fuaireamar amach gur fheidhmigh ár samhail i bhfad níos fearr ar ionchur Béarla i gcomparáid le hionchur sa Spáinnis. I mBéarla, bhaineamar amach Scór F1 de 0.466 do Thasc A agus 0.462 do Thasc B; Sa Spáinnis, bhaineamar scóir 0.617 agus 0.612 amach ar Thasc A agus ar Thasc B, faoi seach.', 'ka': 'სხვადასხვა მპატის სიტყვას, განსაკუთრებით ინტერნეტი პლატორმებში და ფორმებში, სწრაფად იქნება სამყარო თემა, როგორც ანტი მპატის სიტყვას საკუთარი საკუთარი ინტერ HatEval სხვადასხვა საქმე იყო შექმნა ამით. მომხმარებელი იქნება მოდელის განვითარება, რომელიც შეუძლებელია განვითარება თუ არა შეიძლებელია მოდელის შესაძლებლობა (ამ შემთხვევაში, Twitter მონაცემები ინგლისური და სპანელი) შეიძლება იყოს წინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინაწინ ჩვენ ამ სამუშაო დავიწყეთ LSTM მოდელის შექმნა, რომელიც შეიძლება დავყენება. ჩვენ მივიღეთ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი ინგლისური ენის შენახვედზე უკეთესი გავაკეთე, როდესაც სპანელი ენის შენახვედზე. ანგლისურად, ჩვენ მივიღეთ F1-Score 0.466 დავალებისთვის A და 0.462 დავალებისთვის B დავალებისთვის; სპანუალურად ჩვენ მივიღეთ 0.617 და 0.612 დავალებით A და B დავალებით.', 'hu': 'A gyűlöletbeszéd felismerése, különösen az online platformokon és fórumokon, gyorsan forró témává válik, mivel a gyűlöletbeszéd elleni jogszabályok kezdenek alkalmazni az online nyilvános diskurzusra. A HatEval megosztott feladatot ezzel szem előtt tartva hozták létre; A résztvevőktől elvárták, hogy olyan modellt dolgozzanak ki, amely meghatározza, hogy a bevitel (ebben az esetben angol és spanyol Twitter adatkészletek) gyűlöletbeszédnek tekinthető-e (A feladatként jelölt), agresszív-e, és hogy a tweet egy személyt céloz-e, vagy általánosan beszél (B feladat). Ezt a feladatot egy beágyazó réteggel ellátott LSTM modell létrehozásával közelítettük meg. Megállapítottuk, hogy modellünk jelentősen jobban teljesített az angol nyelvű bevitel tekintetében, mint a spanyol nyelvű bevitel. Angolul 1 pontszámot értünk el az A feladatnál, a B feladatnál pedig 0,462 pontszámot; Spanyolul 0,617 és 0,612 pontszámot értünk el az A és B feladaton.', 'el': 'Η ανίχνευση της ρητορικής μίσους, ειδικά σε διαδικτυακές πλατφόρμες και φόρουμ, γίνεται γρήγορα καυτό θέμα καθώς η νομοθεσία περί ρητορικής μίσους αρχίζει να εφαρμόζεται στον δημόσιο διάλογο στο διαδίκτυο. Το κοινό έργο της HatEval δημιουργήθηκε με αυτό κατά νου. Αναμένεται από τους συμμετέχοντες να αναπτύξουν ένα μοντέλο ικανό να καθορίσει αν η εισαγωγή (σε αυτή την περίπτωση, σύνολα δεδομένων Twitter στα αγγλικά και ισπανικά) θα μπορούσε να θεωρηθεί ρητορική μίσους (που ορίζεται ως εργασία Α), αν ήταν επιθετική και αν το tweet στόχευε ένα άτομο ή μιλούσε γενικά (εργασία Β). Προσεγγίσαμε αυτό το έργο δημιουργώντας ένα μοντέλο με ένα στρώμα ενσωμάτωσης. Διαπιστώσαμε ότι το μοντέλο μας αποδίδει σημαντικά καλύτερα στην εισαγωγή της αγγλικής γλώσσας σε σύγκριση με την εισαγωγή της ισπανικής γλώσσας. Στα αγγλικά, πετύχαμε έναν δείκτη F1 0.466 για την εργασία A και 0.462 για την εργασία B. Στα ισπανικά, πετύχαμε βαθμολογίες 0.617 και 0.612 για την εργασία Α και την εργασία Β αντίστοιχα.', 'it': "L'individuazione del discorso d'odio, soprattutto nelle piattaforme e nei forum online, sta rapidamente diventando un argomento caldo, poiché la legislazione anti-odio del discorso inizia ad essere applicata al discorso pubblico online. Il compito condiviso di HatEval è stato creato con questo in mente; Ci si aspettava che i partecipanti sviluppassero un modello in grado di determinare se l'input (in questo caso, i dataset di Twitter in inglese e spagnolo) potessero essere considerati discorsi di odio (designati come Task A), se fossero aggressivi, e se il tweet fosse rivolto a un individuo, o parlando in generale (Task B). Abbiamo affrontato questo compito creando un modello LSTM con un livello embedding. Abbiamo scoperto che il nostro modello ha funzionato notevolmente meglio sull'input in lingua inglese rispetto all'input in lingua spagnola. In inglese, abbiamo ottenuto un F1-Score di 0,466 per Task A e 0,462 per Task B; In spagnolo, abbiamo ottenuto punteggi di 0,617 e 0,612 rispettivamente sul Task A e sul Task B.", 'lt': 'Neapykantos kalbos aptikimas, ypač internetinėse platformose ir forumuose, greitai tampa karšta tema, nes kovos su neapykanta kalbos teisės aktai pradedami taikyti viešajai kalbai internete. HatEval bendra užduotis buvo sukurta atsižvelgiant į tai; tikėtasi, kad dalyviai parengs model į, galintį nustatyti, ar įvestis (šiuo atveju Twitter duomenų rinkiniai anglų ir ispanų kalbomis) gali būti laikomas neapykantos kalba (vadinama A užduotimi), jei jie yra agresyvūs, ir ar Twitter skirtas asmeniui, ar kalbama apskritai (B užduotis). Atlikome šią užduotį sukūrėme LSTM model į su įterpiamuoju sluoksniu. Nustatėme, kad mūsų modelis gerokai geriau atliko anglų kalbos įnašus, palyginti su ispanų kalbos įnašais. In English, we achieved an F1-Score of 0.466 for Task A and 0.462 for Task B;  Ispanų kalba pasiekėme atitinkamai 0,617 ir 0,612 rezultatų A ir B užduotyse.', 'kk': 'Жұмыс сөйлеуді, әсіресе онлайн платформаларда және форумдарда, жылдам жетістік сөйлеуді қарсы сөйлеу заң онлайн істеу үшін қолданылады. HatEval ортақ тапсырмасы оқылған. Қатысушыларға қатысушылардың келтірілмегенін анықтауға мүмкіндік беретін үлгісін жасау үшін күту болды (бұндай болса, Twitter деректер қорлары ағылшын және испан тілінде) қатысу сөзі (A тапсырма ретінде анықталған), егер олар агрессивне болса, және Біз осы тапсырманы ендіру қабатты LSTM үлгісін құрып келдік. Біз үлгіміздің ағылшын тілінің келтіріміне сәйкес Испан тілінің келтіріміне салыстырып жатыр деп ойладық. Ағылшын тілінде, B тапсырмасына A және 0,462 тапсырма үшін F1-Score жеткіздік. Испан тілінде Б тапсырмасында 0,617 және 0,612 нәтижелерін жеткіздік.', 'mk': 'Детектирањето на говорот за омраза, особено на онлајн платформи и форуми, брзо станува жешка тема бидејќи легислативата против омразата почнува да се применува на јавниот дискурс онлајн. Со ова беше создадена заедничката задача на HatEval; учесниците се очекуваа да развијат модел кој може да одреди дали влогот (во овој случај, датотеките на Твитер на англиски и шпански) може да се смета за говор на омраза (назначен како задача А), ако бил агресивен, и дали твитот бил насочен кон индивидуал или зборувал генерално (задача Б). Се приближивме до оваа задача со создавање на LSTM модел со вграден слој. Најдовме дека нашиот модел успеа значително подобро на влогот на англискиот јазик во споредба со влогот на шпанскиот јазик. На англиски, постигнавме F1-Score од 0,466 за задачата А и 0,462 за задачата Б; На шпански, постигнавме оценки од 0,617 и 0,612 за задачата А и задачата Б, односно.', 'ms': 'Pengesanan ucapan kebencian, terutama dalam platform dan forum online, cepat menjadi topik yang panas kerana undang-undang ucapan anti-kebencian bermula untuk dilaksanakan pada diskors awam online. Tugas berkongsi HatEval dicipta dengan ini dalam fikiran; peserta dijangka untuk mengembangkan model yang mampu menentukan sama ada input (dalam kes ini, set data Twitter dalam bahasa Inggeris dan Sepanyol) boleh dianggap pidato kebencian (ditentukan sebagai Tugas A), jika mereka agresif, dan sama ada tweet adalah sasaran individu, atau bercakap secara umum (Tugas B). Kami mendekati tugas ini dengan mencipta model LSTM dengan lapisan penyembedding. Kami mendapati bahawa model kami dilakukan jauh lebih baik pada input bahasa Inggeris apabila dibandingkan dengan input bahasa Sepanyol. Dalam bahasa Inggeris, kita mencapai nilai F1 0.466 untuk Tugas A dan 0.462 untuk Tugas B; Dalam bahasa Sepanyol, kami mencapai skor 0.617 dan 0.612 pada Tugas A dan Tugas B, berdasarkan itu.', 'ml': 'വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത്, പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമുകളിലും ഫോര്\u200dമുകളിലും പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് ചൂടുള്ള വിഷയത്തിലാ ഹാറ്റെവാല്\u200d പങ്കാളിയുള്ള ജോലി ഇതിന്\u200dറെ മനസ്സില്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു; participants were expected to develop a model capable of determining whether or not input (in this case, Twitter datasets in English and Spanish) could be considered hate speech (designated as Task A), if they were aggressive, and whether the tweet was targeting an individual, or speaking generally (Task B).  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ ജോലിയിലേക്ക് എത്തിയപ്പോള്\u200d ഒരു എംഎസ്റ്റം മോഡല്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നത് കൊണ്ടാണ്. സ്പാനിഷ് ഭാഷ ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടിനെക്കുറിച്ച് താല്\u200dപ്പര്യമായി ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഭാഷ അകത്തില്\u200d വളരെ നല്ലത് പ ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു എഫ്\u200c1-സ്കോര്\u200d നേടിയെടുത്തു. ടാസ്ക് ബിന് വേണ്ടി ടാസ്ക് A എന്നും 0.462 എന്നിവയ്ക്കും; സ്പാനിഷില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെട്ട സ്കോര്\u200d 0.617, 0.612 ടാസ്ക് A, ടാസ്ക് ബിയില്\u200d എത്തി.', 'mt': 'Is-sejba tad-diskors tal-mibegħda, speċjalment fil-pjattaformi u l-forums onlajn, qed issir malajr suġġett sħun hekk kif il-leġiżlazzjoni kontra d-diskors tal-mibegħda tibda tiġi applikata għad-diskors pubbliku onlajn. The HatEval shared task was created with this in mind;  il-parteċipanti kienu mistennija jiżviluppaw mudell li jkun kapaċi jiddetermina jekk l-input (f’dan il-każ, settijiet ta’ dejta Twitter bl-Ingliż u bl-Ispanjol) jistax jitqies bħala diskors ta’ mibegħda (magħżul bħala Task A), jekk dawn kienu aggressivi, u jekk it-tweet kienx immirat lejn individwu, jew jitkellmu b’mod ġenerali (Task B). Aċċettajna dan il-kompitu billi nħolqu mudell LSTM b’saff ta’ inkorporazzjoni. Instabna li l-mudell tagħna sar konsiderevolment aħjar fuq l-input tal-lingwa Ingliża meta mqabbel mal-input tal-lingwa Spanjola. Bil-Ingliż, inkisbu Punteġġ F1 ta’ 0.466 għal Kompitu A u 0.462 għal Kompitu B; Bl-Ispanjol, kisbu punteġġi ta’ 0.617 u 0.612 fuq il-Kompitu A u l-Kompitu B, rispettivament.', 'mn': 'Харамсалтай яриаг олох нь, ялангуяа онлайн платформ болон форумууд, хурдан үзэн ядуурлын ярианы эсрэг хууль нь нийтийн ярианы онлайн үеэр хэрэглэгдэх болно. HatEval-ын хуваалтын ажил үүнийг бодолд бий болгосон. Хэрэв оролцогчдын оролцогчдын оролцогчдын оролцоог тодорхойлох боломжтой загвар хөгжүүлэхийг хүсэж байлаа (энэ тохиолдолд Твиттер өгөгдлийн сангууд Англи болон Испан хэлний хэлний хэлний хэлний үзэн ядах хэлний хэлний хэлний хэлний хэлний хэлний хэлбэр Бид үүнийг LSTM загвар бий болгож ойртсон. Бид өөрсдийн загварын загвар Испанийн хэлний оролцоос харьцуулахад Англи хэлний оролцоонд маш сайн ажиллаж байгааг олж мэдсэн. Англи хэлний хэлээр бид Task A болон 0.462 Task B-д F1-Score хүртлээ. Испанид бид 0.617, 0.612 Task A болон Task B-ийн тоонуудыг олсон.', 'no': 'Oppdaging av hatespråk, spesielt i nettplattformar og forummer, er raskt å bli eit vart tema, sidan anti-hatespråk-lovgivnaden begynner å bli brukt på offentlige diskursar på nettet. HatEval delt oppgåve vart oppretta med dette i sinn. Forventa deltakarar å utvikle eit modell som kan bestemme om inndata (i dette tilfellet kan Twitter- datasett i engelsk og spansk) bli kalla som hatspråk (designert som oppgåve A), dersom dei var aggressiv, og om tweetet målet på ein individuell eller snakket vanlegvis (oppgåve B). Vi har nærmet denne oppgåva ved å laga eit LSTM-modell med eit innebygd lag. Vi fann at modellen vårt utførte mykje bedre på inndata av engelsk språk når det sammenlignet med inndata frå spansk språk. I engelsk oppnådd vi eit F1-poeng med 0,466 for oppgåve A og 0,462 for oppgåve B; I spansk oppnådd vi poeng 0,617 og 0,612 om oppgåve A og oppgåve B.', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie mowy nienawiści, zwłaszcza na platformach internetowych i forach, szybko staje się gorącym tematem, ponieważ ustawodawstwo dotyczące mowy nienawiści zaczyna być stosowane w dyskursie publicznym online. Wspólne zadanie HatEval zostało stworzone z myślą o tym; Oczekiwano, że uczestnicy opracowali model zdolny do określenia, czy wejście (w tym przypadku zbiory danych Twittera w języku angielskim i hiszpańskim) można uznać za mowę nienawiści (określoną jako zadanie A), czy były agresywne i czy tweet był skierowany do osoby, czy mówiąc ogólnie (zadanie B). Podejśliśmy do tego zadania tworząc model LSTM z warstwą osadzania. Stwierdziliśmy, że nasz model działał znacznie lepiej na wprowadzeniu języka angielskiego w porównaniu z wprowadzeniem języka hiszpańskiego. W języku angielskim osiągnęliśmy wynik F1 0.466 dla zadania A i 0.462 dla zadania B; W języku hiszpańskim osiągnęliśmy wyniki 0.617 i 0.612 odpowiednio w zadaniu A i zadaniu B.', 'ro': 'Detectarea discursului la ură, în special în platformele și forumurile online, devine rapid un subiect fierbinte, deoarece legislația anti-ură începe să fie aplicată discursului public online. Sarcina comună HatEval a fost creată având în vedere acest lucru; Se aștepta ca participanții să dezvolte un model capabil să determine dacă introducerea (în acest caz, seturile de date Twitter în limbile engleză și spaniolă) ar putea fi considerate discursuri la ură (desemnate ca sarcina A), dacă acestea erau agresive și dacă tweetul viza o persoană sau vorbea în general (sarcina B). Am abordat această sarcină prin crearea unui model LSTM cu un strat de încorporare. Am constatat că modelul nostru a performat considerabil mai bine la introducerea limbii engleze în comparație cu introducerea limbii spaniole. În limba engleză, am obținut un scor F1 de 0,466 pentru Task A și 0,462 pentru Task B; În limba spaniolă, am obținut scoruri de 0,617 și 0,612 la Task A și, respectiv, Task B.', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje govora mržnje, posebno na internetskim platformama i forumima, brzo postaje vruća tema jer se zakonodavstvo o govoru protiv mržnje počinje primjenjivati na javne diskursije na internetu. HatEval je podijeljen zadatak stvoren na umu s tim; Očekivalo se da će sudionici razviti model sposoban za određivanje da li ulaz (u ovom slučaju, Twitter podaci na engleskom i španjolskom jeziku) mogli biti smatrani govorem mržnje (izraženim kao Task A), ako su agresivni, i da li je tweet ciljao pojedincu ili govoreći općenito (Task B). Prišli smo ovom zadatku stvarajući LSTM model sa ugrađenim slojem. Pronašli smo da je naš model mnogo bolji u odnosu na engleski jezik u usporedbi sa španjolskim jezikom. Na engleskom jeziku, postigli smo F1-Score od 0,466 za zadatak A i 0,462 za zadatak B; Na španjolskom smo postigli rezultate 0,617 i 0,612 na zadatku A i zadatku B.', 'si': 'විශේෂයෙන් ඉන්ලයින් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනයේ විශේෂ කතාවක් හොයාගන්න, ඉක්මනින් වේගයෙන් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරවේශයක් වෙනවා  Hateval කොටස් එක්ක මේක මතකයෙන් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙනවා; අංශිකාරීන්ට ප්\u200dරමාණයක් හොයාගන්න බලාපොරොත්තු වුනා ප්\u200dරමාණයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් (මේ විදියට, Twitter දත්ත සේට් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ස්පැනිස් වලින්) විරෝ අපි මේ කාර්යය සම්බන්ධ කරනවා LSTM මොඩල් හදන්න. අපි හොයාගත්තා අපේ මොඩල් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂාව ඇතුලට ගොඩක් හොඳයි කියලා ස්පැනිස් භාෂාව ඇතුල ඉංග්\u200dරීසියෙන්, අපිට F1-Score of 0.466 for Job A and 0.462 for Job B; ස්පැනිස් වලින්, අපි 0.617 සහ 0.612 වැඩ A වලින් වැඩ B වලින් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලැබුනා.', 'so': 'Dhaqso u noqonaya mada kulul, sababtoo ah sharciga aan nebcaan ka jeedo ayaa laga bilaabaa in lagu codsado hadalka bulshada internetka. Shaqada HatEval la qaybsaday waxaa lagu abuuray maankan; Kuwii ka qeybqaaday waxaa la rajaynayay inuu horumariyo model awoodo inuu ogaado input ama input (taas darteed, taariikhda Twitterka ee Ingiriis iyo Isbanish) waxaa looga xisaabin karaa hadal nacayb ah (taas oo loo qoray shaqo A), haddii ay xadgudub leeyihiin iyo in twitterigu uu ku hagaajiyey mid gaar ah ama uu ku hadli karo sida caadiga ah (Task B). Waxan u dhawaaqnay sameynta model LSTM oo leh darajada burka ah. We found that our model performed considerably better on English language input when compared to Spanish language input.  Ingiriiska, waxaynu helnay qiimaha F1-scorta 0.466 ee shaqo A iyo 0.462 shaqo B; Isbanishka waxaan ku gaadhnay kooxo u eg 0.617 iyo 0.612 shaqo A iyo shaqo B.', 'sv': 'Upptäckten av hatpropaganda, särskilt i onlineplattformar och forum, håller snabbt på att bli ett hett ämne eftersom anti-hatpropaganda lagstiftning börjar tillämpas på offentlig debatt på nätet. HatEval delade uppgift skapades med detta i åtanke; Deltagarna förväntades utveckla en modell som kunde avgöra om inmatning (i detta fall Twitter-dataset på engelska och spanska) kunde betraktas som hatpropaganda (benämnd som uppgift A), om de var aggressiva, och om tweeten riktade sig till en individ eller talade generellt (uppgift B). Vi närmade oss denna uppgift genom att skapa en LSTM-modell med ett inbäddningslager. Vi fann att vår modell presterade betydligt bättre på engelska språkinput jämfört med spanska språkinput. På engelska uppnådde vi en F1-poäng på 0,466 för uppgift A och 0,462 för uppgift B; På spanska uppnådde vi poäng på 0,617 respektive 0,612 på uppgift A respektive uppgift B.', 'ta': 'வெறுப்பு பேச்சை கண்டுபிடிப்பது, குறிப்பாக இணைய தளங்களில் மற்றும் தளங்களில், விரைவாக ஒரு சூடான தலைப்பாடு ஆகிவிடுகிறது, ஏனெனில் வெறுப HatEval பகிர்ந்த பணி இந்த மனதில் உருவாக்கப்பட்டது; பங்கீட்டாளர்கள் ஒரு மாதிரி உருவாக்க வேண்டும் என்று எதிர்பார்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளார்கள் (இந்த நிலையில், ஆங்கிலம் மற்றும் ஸ்பானிஷ் மொழியில் இருந்த Twitter தரவுத்தளங்கள்) வெறுப் நாங்கள் இந்த செயலை அணுகின்றோம் ஒரு உள்ளீட்டு அடுக்கு ஒரு LSTM மாதிரி உருவாக்கினோம். ஸ்பானிஷ் மொழி உள்ளீட்டை ஒப்பிடும்போது எங்கள் மாதிரி மொழி உள்ளீட்டில் மிகவும் நல்ல செயல்பட்டது என்பதை நா ஆங்கிலத்தில், நாங்கள் பணி A மற்றும் 0. 462 பணி B க்கு ஒரு F1- மதிப்பு அடைந்தோம். ஸ்பானிஷில், நாங்கள் வேலை A மற்றும் பணி B மீது 0.617 மற்றும் 0.612 மதிப்புகளை அடைந்தோம்.', 'ur': 'ناپسندیدہ بات کی تلاش، مخصوصاً آنلاین پلٹورم اور فورمز میں، جلد ایک گرم موضوع ہو رہی ہے جس طرح ناپسندیدہ بات کا قوانین آنلاین کی صحبت پر قائم ہوتا ہے. اس کے ذریعہ سے ہٹوئل کا کام بنایا گیا ہے شرکت کرنے والوں کی انتظار کی گئی تھی کہ ایک موڈل ایجاد کریں جس کا اختیار رکھتا تھا کہ ان کے سوال کیا جائے یا نہ ہو (اس صورت میں توئیٹ ڈاٹسٹ انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی میں) نفرت کی بات سمجھ سکتی تھی (تابع A کے نام کا نام) اگر وہ نازل ہوتی تھی، اور اگر توئیٹ ایک شخص کی هدف رکھتا تھا ہم نے اس کام کے پاس ایک ایمبڈینگ لائر کے ساتھ LSTM موڈل پیدا کر دیا۔ ہم نے پایا کہ ہمارا مدل انگلیسی زبان انپیٹ پر بہتر عمل کیا جب اسپانیایی زبان انپیٹ کے مقابلہ میں۔ انگلیسی میں ہم نے Task A اور Task B کے لئے 0.466 کی F1-Score کو پہنچا دیا۔ اسپانیایی میں ہم نے 0.617 اور 0.612 کو Task A اور Task B کے ذریعہ پہنچایا۔', 'uz': "The detection of hate speech, especially in online platforms and forums, is quickly becoming a hot topic as anti-hate speech legislation begins to be applied to public discourse online.  HatEval shu miya bilan birlashtirilgan vazifa yaratildi; Bu tilda ishlatilgan shaklni ishlatish mumkin. Bu tilda, ingliz va Ispanchada Twitterning maʼlumotlar soni aniqlash mumkin (Vazifa A deb aniqlangan) deb hisoblanadi. Biz bu vazifani eng qatlam bilan LSTM modelini yaratish bilan keldik. Bizning modelimiz Ispancha tili ichiga o'xshash tilda ingliz tili ichida juda yaxshi ishlayotgan edi. Ingliz tilida biz Vazifa B uchun 0.466 vazifasi 0.462 va 0.462 uchun F1-scori topdik; Ispanchada biz vazifa A va vazifa B bilan 0.617 va 0.612 darajalarini topdik.", 'vi': 'Việc phát hiện ngôn ngữ căm ghét, đặc biệt trong các diễn đàn trực tuyến, đang nhanh chóng trở thành một chủ đề nóng bỏng vì dự luật chống ghét ngôn ngữ bắt đầu được áp dụng vào các buổi diễn thuyết trên mạng. Đội HatEvol đã tham gia nhiệm vụ được tạo ra với ý tưởng này; Người tham dự dự sẽ phát triển một mô hình có khả năng xác định xem nội dung của Twitter (trong trường hợp này, dữ liệu trên Twitter bằng tiếng Anh và tiếng Tây B an Nha) có thể được coi là biểu diễn căm ghét (được gọi là Nhiệm vụ A), nếu họ hung hăng, và rằng tweet đã nhắm vào một cá nhân, hay nói chung (Nhiệm vụ B). Chúng tôi đã tiếp cận nhiệm vụ này bằng cách tạo một mô hình LSD với một lớp nhúng. Chúng tôi thấy mẫu của chúng tôi diễn đạt tốt hơn rất nhiều trong việc nhập tiếng Anh so với nhập ngôn ngữ Tây Ban Nha. Nói tiếng Anh, chúng tôi đã đạt được một F1-Score of 0.46 for Task A và 0.46 for Task B; Ở Tây Ban Nha, chúng tôi đã đạt được điểm số 0.67 và 0.62 về Hợp đồng A và Task B.', 'bg': 'Откриването на речта на омразата, особено в онлайн платформи и форуми, бързо се превръща в гореща тема, тъй като законодателството против речта на омразата започва да се прилага към публичния дискурс онлайн. Споделената задача на ХатЕвал е създадена с това предвид; от участниците се очаква да разработят модел, който да определи дали въвеждането (в този случай набори от данни на английски и испански език) може да се счита за реч на омразата (определена като задача А), дали те са агресивни и дали туитът е насочен към индивид или говори общо (задача Б). Ние подходихме към тази задача чрез създаване на модел с вграден слой. Открихме, че нашият модел се представя значително по-добре при въвеждането на английски език в сравнение с въвеждането на испански език. На английски език постигнахме оценка от 0,466 за задача А и 0,462 за задача Б; На испански език постигнахме резултати от 0,617 и 0,612 съответно по задача А и задача Б.', 'da': 'Afsløringen af hadefulde taler, især i onlineplatforme og fora, er hurtigt ved at blive et varmt emne, da anti-hadefulde talelovgivninger begynder at blive anvendt på den offentlige diskurs online. HatEval delte opgave blev skabt med dette i tankerne; Deltagerne forventedes at udvikle en model, der kunne afgøre, om input (i dette tilfælde Twitter-datasæt på engelsk og spansk) kunne betragtes som hadefuld tale (betegnet som opgave A), om de var aggressive, og om tweetet var rettet mod en person eller generelt (opgave B). Vi nåede denne opgave ved at skabe en LSTM model med et integreringslag. Vi fandt ud af, at vores model fungerede betydeligt bedre på engelsk sproginput sammenlignet med spansk sproginput. På engelsk opnåede vi en F1-score på 0,466 for opgave A og 0,462 for opgave B; På spansk opnåede vi scorer på henholdsvis 0,617 og 0,612 på opgave A og opgave B.', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje govora mržnje, posebno na internetskim platformama i forumima, brzo postaje vruća tema jer se zakonodavstvo o govoru protiv mržnje počinje primjenjivati na javne diskursije na internetu. HatEval zajednički zadatak je stvoren na umu s tim; Očekivalo se da će učesnici razviti model sposoban za utvrđivanje da li ulaz (u tom slučaju, Twitter podaci na engleskom i španjolskom) smatrati govorem mržnje (izraženim kao zadatak A), ako su agresivni, i da li je tweet ciljao pojedincu ili govoreći općenito (zadatak B). Prišli smo ovom zadatku stvarajući LSTM model sa ugrađenim slojem. Našli smo da je naš model izvršio značajno bolje u odnosu na ulaz engleskog jezika u usporedbi s ulazom španjolskog jezika. Na engleskom jeziku postigli smo F1-Score od 0,466 za zadatak A i 0,462 za zadatak B; Na španjolskom smo postigli rezultate 0,617 i 0,612 na zadatku A i zadatku B.', 'de': 'Die Erkennung von Hassreden, insbesondere in Online-Plattformen und Foren, wird schnell zu einem heißen Thema, da Anti-Hass-Redegesetzgebung beginnt, auf den öffentlichen Diskurs online anzuwenden. Die gemeinsame Aufgabe von HatEval wurde in diesem Sinne geschaffen; Von den Teilnehmern wurde erwartet, dass sie ein Modell entwickeln, das bestimmen kann, ob Eingaben (in diesem Fall Twitter-Datensätze auf Englisch und Spanisch) als Hassrede (als Aufgabe A bezeichnet) angesehen werden können, ob sie aggressiv sind und ob der Tweet auf eine Person abzielt oder allgemein gesprochen wurde (Aufgabe B). Wir näherten uns dieser Aufgabe, indem wir ein LSTM-Modell mit einer Einbettungsebene erstellt haben. Wir fanden heraus, dass unser Modell wesentlich besser auf Englisch eingegeben wurde als auf Spanisch. Auf Englisch erreichten wir einen F1-Score von 0.466 für Aufgabe A und 0.462 für Aufgabe B; Auf Spanisch erreichten wir Punkte von 0.617 und 0.612 bei Task A bzw. Task B.', 'nl': 'Het opsporen van haatspraak, met name in online platforms en fora, wordt snel een hot topic aangezien anti-haatspraak wetgeving begint te worden toegepast op het publieke discours online. De HatEval gedeelde taak is met dit in gedachten gecreëerd; Van de deelnemers werd verwacht dat zij een model zouden ontwikkelen dat kan bepalen of invoer (in dit geval Twitter-datasets in het Engels en Spaans) als haatspraak (aangeduid als Taak A) kon worden beschouwd, of ze agressief waren en of de tweet gericht was op een individu, of in het algemeen sprak (Taak B). We benaderden deze taak door een LSTM model te maken met een embedding laag. We vonden dat ons model aanzienlijk beter presteerde op invoer in de Engelse taal in vergelijking met invoer in de Spaanse taal. In het Engels behaalden we een F1-Score van 0.466 voor Taak A en 0.462 voor Taak B; In het Spaans behaalden we scores van 0.617 en 0.612 op respectievelijk Taak A en Taak B.', 'id': 'Deteksi pidato kebencian, terutama di platform dan forum online, cepat menjadi topik panas karena undang-undang pidato anti kebencian mulai diaplikasikan pada pidato publik online. Tugas bersama HatEval diciptakan dengan ini dalam pikiran; peserta diharapkan untuk mengembangkan model yang mampu menentukan apakah input (dalam kasus ini, set data Twitter dalam bahasa Inggris dan Spanyol) dapat dianggap pidato kebencian (ditentukan sebagai Tugas A), jika mereka agresif, dan apakah tweet menargetkan individu, atau berbicara secara umum (Tugas B). Kami mendekati tugas ini dengan menciptakan model LSTM dengan lapisan penerbangan. We found that our model performed considerably better on English language input when compared to Spanish language input.  Dalam bahasa Inggris, kami mencapai nilai F1 0,466 untuk Tugas A dan 0,462 untuk Tugas B; In Spanish, we achieved scores of 0.617 and 0.612 on Task A and Task B, respectively.', 'ko': '혐오 언론 입법이 온라인 공공 언어에 적용되기 시작하면서 혐오 언론의 검측은 특히 온라인 플랫폼과 포럼에서 빠르게 화제가 되고 있다.HatEval 공유 작업은 이 점을 바탕으로 만들어진 것이다.참가자들은 입력(이 예에서 영어와 스페인어의 트위터 데이터 집합)이 증오 발언(퀘스트 a로 지정)으로 볼 수 있는지, 공격성이 있는지, 이 트위터가 개인을 겨냥했는지 아니면 동일시(퀘스트 B)로 볼 수 있는지를 확인할 수 있는 모델을 개발해야 한다.내장 레이어가 있는 LSTM 모델을 생성하여 이 작업을 완료했습니다.우리는 스페인어 입력에 비해 우리의 모델이 영어 입력에 있어서 더욱 잘 표현되는 것을 발견했다.영어에서는 미션 A의 F1 성적이 0.466이고 미션 B의 F1 성적이 0.462이다.스페인어에서는 미션 A와 미션 B에서 각각 0.617, 0.612의 점수를 받았다.', 'fa': 'کشف سخنرانی از نفرت، مخصوصا در platformهای آنلاین و فورموس، سریع به عنوان قوانین ضد نفرت سخنرانی شروع می\u200cکند که بر صحبت عمومی آنلاین کاربرد می\u200cشود. این کار را با این ذهن آفریده شده است. شرکتگران انتظار داشته بودند که یک مدل قادر به تصمیم گرفتن ورودی (در این مورد، مجموعه داده\u200cهای توئیتر به انگلیسی و اسپانیایی) سخنرانی ناخوشایند (نامیده شده به عنوان وظیفه A) را توسعه کنند، و اگر توئیت یک فرد را هدف می\u200cدهد یا در کلی صحبت می\u200cکند (وظیفه B). ما با ایجاد یک مدل LSTM با یک لایه وارد کردن به این کار نزدیک شدیم. ما فهمیدیم که مدل ما در ورودی زبان انگلیسی با ورودی زبان اسپانیایی بسیار بهتر انجام داده است. در انگلیسی، ما یک نمونه F1-از 0.466 برای وظیفه A و 0.462 برای وظیفه B رسیدیم. در اسپانیایی، به طور مستقیما امتیاز 0.617 و 0.612 در کار A و کار B رسیدیم.', 'af': "Die opdekking van haatspraak, veral in onlineplatforme en forume, word gou 'n warm onderwerp as anti-haatspraat wetgewing begin toepassing word op openbare diskursie online. Die HatEval gedeelde taak is geskep met hierdie in gedagte; Deelnaders was verwag om 'n model te ontwikkel wat moontlik is om te bepaal of nie invoer (in hierdie geval, Twitter datastelle in Engels en Spaanse) van haatspraak (as Opdrag A aangestel word), as hulle aggressief was, en of die tweet 'n individueel, of gewoonlik (Taak B) te doen. Ons het hierdie taak toegekom deur 'n LSTM model te skep met 'n inbêer laag. Ons het gevind dat ons model beter uitgevoer het op Engels taal ingevoer wanneer vergelyk word met Spaanse taal ingevoer. In Engels het ons 'n F1-Telling van 0.466 bereik vir Taak A en 0.462 vir Taak B; In Spaanse, ons het rekening 0.617 en 0.612 op Opdrag A en Opdrag B, respektief.", 'tr': 'Hat çykyşyň sözlerini tanamak, ýöne-da internet platformlarynda we forumlarda, ýüzüniň ýigrenýän sözleriniň kanunlarynyň üstine ýakynlanmasyna başlaýar. Hateval bu zady aklynda bölýän zady bilen döredildi. Sahypalar üçin girişi tanamak üçin bir nusga çykarmak üçin gözlenýärdi (şu ýagdaýda, Twitter veri setirleri iñlis we español dilinde) ýigrenýän çykyşy diýip kabul edilýärdi (görev A diýip kabul edilýärdi), eger olar agresif bolsadylar we tweet bir adama maksady bolmady ýa-da umumy(B görev). Biz bu zady içeri girişi bilen LSTM nusgasyny bejererek goll etdik. Biziň nusgymyz iňlisçe dil girişinde espaňol dil girişinde has gowy gazandygyny görerdik. Iňlisçe, biz 0.466 Taýka A we 0.462 Taýka B üçin bir F1-Score ýetip bardyk; Ispanýolça 0.617 we 0.612 hasaplaryny bar.', 'sw': 'Kugundua hotuba ya chuki, hasa kwenye majukwaa na majukwaa ya mtandaoni, kwa haraka inakuwa mada yenye moto kwani sheria ya kupinga hotuba ya chuki inaanza kutumika katika mazungumzo ya umma mtandaoni. Kazi ya HatEval ilitengenezwa kwa akili hii; Washiriki walitarajiwa kutengeneza muundo wa uwezo wa kuamua ikiwa na maandishi (kwa mukhtadha huu, seti za taarifa za Twita kwa Kiingereza na Kihispania) zinaweza kuchukuliwa kuwa hotuba ya chuki (inayotengenezwa kama Task A), kama walikuwa na kibaguzi, na kama twiti hiyo ililenga mtu binafsi au kuongea kwa ujumla (Kazi B). Tumekaribia kazi hii kwa kutengeneza Mfano wa LSTM wenye kiwango cha ndani. Tumegundua kuwa muundo wetu ulifanya vizuri zaidi kwenye input wa lugha ya Kiingereza ukilinganisha na input wa lugha ya Kihispania. Kwa Kiingereza, tulipata kiwango cha F1 cha 0.466 kwa ajili ya kazi A na 0.462 kwa ajili ya kazi B; Kwa lugha ya Kihispania, tulipata vipimo vya 0.617 na 0.612 kwenye kazi A na kazi B.', 'sq': 'Zbulimi i fjalimit të urrejtjes, veçanërisht në platforma dhe forume online, po bëhet shpejt një temë e nxehtë ndërsa legjislacioni kundër fjalimit të urrejtjes fillon të aplikohet në diskursin publik online. Detyra e përbashkët e HatEval u krijua me këtë në mendje; pjesëmarrësit priteshin të zhvillonin një model të aftë për të përcaktuar nëse input (në këtë rast, të dhënat e Twitter në anglisht dhe spanjoll) mund të konsideroheshin fjalim urrejtjeje (të caktuar si Task A), në qoftë se a to ishin agresive dhe në qoftë se tweeti ishte drejtuar në një individ apo fliste përgjithësisht (Task B). Ne iu afruam kësaj detyre duke krijuar një model LSTM me një shtresë të përfshirë. Ne zbuluam se modeli ynë u bë më mirë në hyrjen e gjuhës angleze kur krahasohet me hyrjen e gjuhës spanjolle. Në anglisht, arritëm një F1-Score prej 0.466 për Task A dhe 0.462 për Task B; In Spanish, we achieved scores of 0.617 and 0.612 on Task A and Task B, respectively.', 'am': 'የጥል ንግግር፣ በተለይም የበይነመረብ መድረክ እና ፎርማቶች ውስጥ፣ የጥል ንግግር ሕግ በመስመር የህዝብ ንግግር ለመጠቀም ሲጀምር ፈጥኖ ትኩሳት ጉዳይ ሆነዋል፡፡ የሐቴዌል ስራ በዚህ ምክንያት ተፈጠረ፤ ተጋሪዎቹ የኢንጂልኛ እና ስፓኒሽ ቋንቋ ውስጥ የTwitter ዳታተር ቋንቋ (ስክ A) የተጠቃሚ ንግግር (ማድረግ A) ቢሆኑ፣ ትዊተር አንድ ሰው ወይም በሙሉ የሚናገር ቢሆን (ስራ B) የጥል ንግግር መሆኑን ማረጋገጥ የሚችል ምሳሌ መፍጠር ተስፋ ያደርጋል፡፡ አዲስ ደረጃን በመፍጠር የLSTM ምሳሌ አቀረብን፡፡ ምሳሌያችን ከስፓኒሽ ቋንቋ ጥያቄ በተደረገ ጊዜ በንግግሊዘኛ ቋንቋ ውስጥ እጅግ የበለጠ እንደተደረገ አግኝተናል፡፡ በንግግሊዝኛ የስራ አ እና 0.462 ለስራ B F1-ነጥብ አግኝተናል፡፡ In Spanish, we achieved scores of 0.617 and 0.612 on Task A and Task B, respectively.', 'hy': 'ատելության խոսքի հայտնաբերումը, հատկապես առցանց պլատֆորմերում և ֆորմերում, արագ դառնում է տաք թեմա, քանի որ ատելության դեմ խոսքի օրենսդրությունը սկսում է կիրառվել առցանց հանրային խոսքի համար: Հաթեվալ ընդհանուր խնդիրը ստեղծվել է այս մտքում, մասնակիցները ակնկալում էին, որ կզարգացնեն մոդել, որը կկարողանա որոշել, թե արդյոք ներմուծը (այս դեպքում Թվիթերի տվյալների համակարգերը անգլերենում և իսպաներեն) կարելի է համարվել ատելության ելույթ (որը կոչվում է Ա-ի առաջադրանք), եթե նրանք ագրեսիվ են, և արդյոք Թվիթերը նպատակ Մենք մոտեցանք այս խնդիրը ստեղծելով LSMT մոդել ներգրավված շերտի հետ: Մենք հայտնաբերեցինք, որ մեր մոդելը շատ ավելի լավ էր աշխատում անգլերեն լեզվի ներմուծների վրա, համեմատած իսպաներեն լեզվի ներմուծների վրա: Անգլերենում մենք հասանք 0.466-ի F1-գնահատականի A-ի և 0.462-ի B-ի համար: Իսպաներեն մենք հասանք 0,617 և 0,612 գնահատականների A և B խնդիրներում:', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje govora mržnje, posebno na internetskim platformama i forumima, brzo postaje vruća tema jer se zakonodavstvo o govoru protiv mržnje počinje primjenjivati na javne diskursije na internetu. HatEval je podijeljen zadatak stvoren na umu s tim; Očekivalo se da će učesnici razviti model sposoban za utvrđivanje da li ulaz (u tom slučaju, Twitter podaci na engleskom i španjolskom) mogli biti smatrani govorom mržnje (izrađenim kao Task A), ako su agresivni, i da li je tweet ciljao pojedincu ili govoreći općenito (Task B). Prišli smo ovom zadatku stvarajući LSTM model sa ugrađenim slojem. Pronašli smo da je naš model izvršio mnogo bolje u odnosu na ulaz engleskog jezika u usporedbi sa ulazom španjolskog jezika. Na engleskom jeziku, postigli smo F1-Score od 0,466 za zadatak A i 0,462 za zadatak B; Na španjolskom smo postigli rezultate 0,617 i 0,612 na zadatku A i zadatku B.', 'ca': "La detecció del discurs d'odi, especialment en plataformes i fòrums en línia, s'està convertint ràpidament en un tema calent, mentre la llei contra l'odi comença a aplicar-se al discurs públic en línia. La tasca compartida HatEval va ser creata amb això a la ment; s'esperava que els participants desenvolupin un model capaç de determinar si les entrades (en aquest cas, els conjunts de dades de Twitter en anglès i espanyol) podrien ser considerades discursos d'odi (designats com a tasca A), si eren agressives, i si la tweet mirava a un individu o parlava en general (tasca B). Vam abordar aquesta tasca creant un model LSTM amb una capa incorporadora. Vam descobrir que el nostre model va funcionar considerablement millor en l'entrada en anglès en comparació amb l'entrada en espanyol. En anglès, vam aconseguir una puntuació F1 de 0,466 per la tasca A i 0,462 per la tasca B; In Spanish, we achieved scores of 0.617 and 0.612 on Task A and Task B, respectively.", 'az': 'Nefrət sözlərinin, özlərinə də onlayn platformlarında və forumlarda, tezliklə nifrət sözlərinin qarşısındaki qanunların online sözlərinə uyğunlanmasına başladığı üçün isti bir məsəl olar. HatEval bu işi düşünüb yaratdı. İşkilərin daxil olmasını müəyyən edə biləcəyi bir modeli təmizləməsi gözlənilmişdi (bu halda, Twitter veri quruları İngilis və İspanyol dilində, İngilis və İspanyol dilində, İngilis dilində və İspanyol dilində) nifrət sözləri (A Task kimi təşkil edilmişdi), əgər təşkil edilmiş olsalar və ya tweet individu Biz bu işə yaxınlaşdıq, LSTM modeli inşa etmək üçün. Bizim modellərimiz İspanyol dili girişi ilə qarşılaşdığı zaman İngiliz dili girişində çox yaxşı işlədi. İngilizce dilində, B işi üçün A və 0.462 işi üçün F1-Score nəsib etdik. İspanyolca, işin A və Task B barəsində 0.617 və 0.612 nöqtələrini qəbul etdik.', 'bn': 'বিশেষ করে অনলাইন প্লাটফর্ম এবং ফোরামে ঘৃণা ভাষণের আবিষ্কার হচ্ছে তারা দ্রুত একটি গরম বিষয়ে পরিণত হচ্ছে যেহেতু ঘৃণা বিরোধী বক্তৃতা বিরোধী  হাটিভাল শেয়ার কর্মসূচি এই মাথায় তৈরি করা হয়েছে; অংশগ্রহণকারীদের আশা করা হয়েছিল যে একটি মডেল তৈরি করতে পারে যা সিদ্ধান্ত নির্ধারণ করতে সক্ষম হবে কিনা (এই ক্ষেত্রে টুইটার ডাটাটাসেট ইংরেজী ও স্প্যানিশ ভাষায়) ঘৃণা ভাষণ বিবেচন আমরা এলস্টিএম মডেল তৈরি করে এই কাজের কাছে এসেছিলাম, যেখানে একটি বিভিন্ন স্তর তৈরি করেছিলাম। আমরা পেয়েছি যে স্প্যানিশ ভাষার ইনপুটের তুলনায় আমাদের মডেল অনেক ভালো করেছিল। ইংরেজি ভাষায় আমরা কাজ A এবং 0.462 টাকা বির জন্য একটি F1-স্কোর অর্জন করেছি; স্প্যানিশ ভাষায় আমরা কাজ A এবং কাজ বিরুদ্ধে ০. 617 এবং 0.612 স্কোর অর্জন করেছি।', 'cs': 'Odhalování nenávistných projevů, zejména na online platformách a fórech, se rychle stává žhavým tématem, protože legislativa proti nenávistným projevům se začíná aplikovat na veřejný diskurz online. Společný úkol HatEval byl vytvořen s tímto ohledem; Od účastníků se očekávalo, že vyvinou model schopný určit, zda lze vstup (v tomto případě datové sady Twitteru v angličtině a španělštině) považovat za nenávistnou řeč (označené jako úkol A), zda jsou agresivní a zda se tweet zaměřil na jednotlivce, nebo obecně mluví (Úkol B). K tomuto úkolu jsme přistupovali vytvořením LSTM modelu s vkládací vrstvou. Zjistili jsme, že náš model vedl výrazně lepší na vstupu anglického jazyka ve srovnání se španělským jazykem. V angličtině jsme dosáhli F1 skóre 0.466 pro úkol A a 0.462 pro úkol B; Ve španělštině jsme dosáhli bodů 0.617 a 0.612 u úkolu A a úkolu B.', 'fi': 'Vihanpuheen havaitsemisesta erityisesti verkkoalustoilla ja foorumeilla on nopeasti tulossa kuuma aihe, kun vihapuheen vastaista lainsäädäntöä aletaan soveltaa julkiseen keskusteluun verkossa. HatEvalin yhteinen tehtävä luotiin tätä silmällä pitäen; Osallistujien odotettiin kehittävän malli, jolla pystytään määrittämään, voidaanko syöttöä (tässä tapauksessa Twitterin englannin- ja espanjankieliset tietoaineistot) pitää vihapuheena (nimetty tehtäväksi A), ovatko he aggressiivisia ja kohdistuuko tweetti yksilöön vai puhuuko yleisesti (tehtävä B). Lähestyimme tätä tehtävää luomalla LSTM-mallin upotuskerroksella. Havaitsimme, että mallimme suoriutui huomattavasti paremmin englannin kielen syötteessä kuin espanjan kielen syötteessä. Englanniksi saavutimme F1-pisteet 0,466 tehtävässä A ja 0,462 tehtävässä B. Espanjaksi saavutimme pisteet 0,617 tehtävässä A ja 0,612 tehtävässä B.', 'et': 'Vihakõne avastamine, eriti veebiplatvormides ja foorumites, on kiiresti muutumas kuumaks teemaks, kuna vihakõne vastu võitlevaid õigusakte hakatakse kohaldama avaliku diskursuse suhtes internetis. Seda silmas pidades loodi HatEvali jagatud ülesanne; osalejatelt oodati, et nad töötaksid välja mudeli, mis võimaldaks kindlaks määrata, kas sisestust (antud juhul Twitteri andmekogumeid inglise ja hispaania keeles) võib pidada vihakõneks (nimetatud ülesandeks A), kas nad on agressiivsed ja kas säuts on suunatud üksikisikule või räägib üldiselt (ülesanne B). Me lähenesime sellele ülesandele, luues LSTM mudeli koos manustamiskihiga. Leidsime, et meie mudel oli inglise keele sisestuses oluliselt parem kui hispaania keele sisestus. Inglise keeles saavutasime F1-skoori 0,466 ülesande A ja 0,462 ülesande B puhul; Hispaania keeles saavutasime tulemused vastavalt 0,617 ja 0,612 ülesandes A ja B.', 'jv': 'Alpha Heh, Debian nganggo perusahaan Debian kang dipun nggo kuwi iki; mengko kuwi sawalih Display brightness Awak dhéwé ngewehi nggo nggawe task iki di nggawe modèl LTT M nganggo alat sing basa batir. Awak dhéwé éntuk ono model sing paling nggambar luwih apik, yakuwis seneng nggambar tarjamahan karo ingkang spanyol. Nanging Inggris, kita wis gunakake F1-Point of 0.4x6 kanggo task A lan 0.4x2 kanggo task B; Anyone', 'sk': 'Odkrivanje sovražnega govora, zlasti na spletnih platformah in forumih, hitro postaja vroča tema, saj se začne uporabljati zakonodaja proti sovražnemu govoru na spletu. Skupna naloga HatEval je bila ustvarjena s tem v mislih; Od udeležencev se je pričakovalo, da bodo razvili model, ki bo lahko določil, ali se vnos (v tem primeru nabor podatkov Twitterja v angleščini in španščini) lahko šteje za sovražni govor (imenovan kot naloga A), ali so agresivni in ali je tvit namenjen posamezniku ali govori na splošno (naloga B). K tej nalogi smo pristopili z ustvarjanjem modela LSTM s plastjo vdelave. Ugotovili smo, da je naš model znatno boljši pri vnosu angleškega jezika v primerjavi z vnosom španskega jezika. V angleščini smo dosegli rezultat F1 0,466 za nalogo A in 0,462 za nalogo B; V španščini smo pri nalogi A dosegli oceno 0,617 oziroma 0,612 oziroma nalogi B.', 'ha': "Ana gane magana na ƙi, da haske cikin majalan da jama'a masu haske, sai yana fara zama madaidaici mai hot, kamar yadda sharciyar ta fara a Apply wa magana na jamii a kusa. An halitta aikin Hateval da aka raba shi a kan wannan. Ana ƙayyade mushirikai ya motsar wani misali wanda yake iya iya ƙayyade shi, ko kuma ba a iya iya gane (a cikin wannan case, za'a iya ƙayyade mutane ta cikin Ingiriya da Kispanish) da magana na ƙyãma (aka ƙayyade su kamar Tashin A), idan sun kasance ana yi ƙyãma, kuma idan Twitter na yi amfani da wani mutum, ko kuwa ya yi magana a jumla (Taaikin B). Mun kusantar wannan aikin da Muka sami wani misali na LSSM da wani mai shiga Mun gane cewa misalinmu ya sami mai kyau a cikin cikin harshen Ingiriya idan da aka sammenliki da tsarin harshen Isspanish. @ item Spelling dictionary Ga Isbaniya, muka sami score 0,617 da 0,612 a kan aikin A da aikin B.", 'he': 'גילוי הנאום לשנאה, במיוחד בתחנות ופורומים באינטרנט, הופך במהירות לנושא חם כאשר חוקי הנאום נגד השנאה מתחילים להתייחס לדיוח ציבורי באינטרנט. המשימה המשותפת של האטאוול נוצרה עם זה בראש; השתתפים צפו לפתח מודל מסוגל לקבוע אם תוכנית (במקרה הזה, קבוצות מידע טוויטר באנגלית וספרדית) יכולות להיחשב נאום שנאה (נקבע בתור משימה A), אם הן היו אגרסיביות, ואם הטוויטר היתה מטרה לאדם או דיברה באופן כללי (משימה B). הגענו למשימה הזו על ידי יצירת דוגמנית LSTM עם שכבה מעורבת. מצאנו שהמודל שלנו הצליח הרבה יותר טוב בהכניסה של שפה אנגלית בהשוואה להכניסה של שפה ספרדית. באנגלית השגנו נקודת F1 של 0.466 למשימה A ו-0.462 למשימה B; בספרדית, השגנו נקודות של 0.617 ו-0.612 על משימה A וממשימה B, בהתאם.', 'bo': 'དྲ་ཐོག་དང་གླེང་སྡོམ་དང་འཆར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་གཏམ་བཤེར་གྱི་རྟོགས་བཤེར་ནི་འགྱུར་མཁན་དུ་ཆགས་པ་དང་། ཁོང་གིས་ཤེས་བྱ་རྣམས་གཅིག་མཐུན་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་དེ་སེམས་སུ་འཇུག་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ཞུགས་མི་མང་གིས་གསལ་བཤད་ན་མིན་པའི་མིག་ལམ་ཞིག་དཔག་འཛིན་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་མིན་འདུག ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་མཐུད་སྒྲིག་བང་རིམ་ལ་LSTM་རྣམ་པ ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་མ་དབྱིབས་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་གི་སྐད་རིགས་ནང་བཙུགས་སྐབས་སུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། In English, we achieved an F1-Score of 0.466 for Task A and 0.462 for Task B; for Task B སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་འགྲོ་བ་ཡིན། འགྲོ་བ་དང་ལས་འགུལ་བཞིན་པའི་གྲངས་ཀ་འགྲོ་བ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Tw-StAR at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : N-gram embeddings for Hate Speech Detection in Multilingual Tweets', 'es': 'TW-Star en la Tarea 5 de SemeVal-2019: incrustaciones de N-gram para la detección de discursos de odio en tuits multilingües', 'fr': 'TW-Star au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 5\xa0: intégration de N-gram pour la détection des discours de haine dans les tweets multilingues', 'pt': 'Tw-StAR no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 5: Embeddings de N-gram para detecção de discurso de ódio em tweets multilíngues', 'ar': 'Tw-StAR في SemEval-2019 المهمة 5: حفلات الزفاف N-gram للكشف عن خطاب الكراهية في التغريدات متعددة اللغات', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のTw - Starタスク5 ：多言語ツイートにおけるヘイトスピーチ検出のためのN - gram埋め込み', 'ru': 'Tw-StAR на SemEval-2019 Задача 5: N-граммовые вставки для обнаружения ненавистнической речи в многоязычных твитах', 'zh': 'Tw-StAR at SemEval-2019 务5:以多言推文中仇言检测者N-gram嵌之', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 5 पर Tw-STAR: बहुभाषी ट्वीट्स में हेट स्पीच डिटेक्शन के लिए एन-ग्राम एम्बेडिंग', 'ga': 'Tw-StAR ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 5: Leabú N-gram le haghaidh Brath Is fuathchainte in Tweetanna Ilteangacha', 'el': 'Εργασία 5: Ενσωματώσεις Ν-γραμμάτων για την ανίχνευση ομιλίας μίσους σε πολυγλωσσικά tweets', 'it': "Tw-StAR a SemEval-2019 Task 5: Incorporazioni N-gram per il rilevamento del discorso d'odio nei tweet multilingui", 'hu': 'Tw-StAR a SemEval-2019 5. feladat: N-gramm beágyazások a gyűlölet beszédérzékeléséhez többnyelvű tweetekben', 'mk': 'Name', 'kk': 'Бірнеше тілді tweets- тізімінде қарсы сөздерді анықтау үшін N- грамм ендіру', 'ka': 'Name', 'lt': '5 užduotis: N-gram ų įdėjimai neapykantos kalbos aptikimui daugiakalbėse Tweetėse', 'ms': 'Tw-StAR pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Pembelahan N-gram untuk Pengesanan Ucapan Kebencian dalam Tweets Berbahasa', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Task 5: N-grams embedding for Hate Speech Detection in Multilingual Tweets', 'mt': 'Tw-StAR f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 5: Inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ N-gramma għad-Detezzjoni ta’ Speech ta’ Mibegħda f’Tweets Multilingwi', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 5: മിടുല്ലില്\u200d വെറുപ്പുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഡിറ്റിക്റ്റീഷന്\u200dറെ നിരീക്ഷണത്തിനായി N- ഗ്രാമിന്\u200dറെ അകത', 'no': 'Tw- StAR på semiEval- 2019 oppgåve 5: N- gram innbygging for hatt- taleoppdaging i fleirspråk tweeter', 'sr': 'Tw-StAR na semiEval-2019 Task 5: N-gram ugrađenje za otkrivanje govora mržnje u višejezičkim tweetima', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Tw-StAR på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 5: Inbäddningar av N-gram för detektering av hattal i flerspråkiga tweets', 'pl': 'Zadanie 5: osadzenia N-gramów dla wykrywania mowy nienawiści w tweetach wielojęzycznych', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி', 'so': 'Tw-StAR at SemEval-2019 Task 5: N-gram embeddings for Hate Speech Detection in Tweets', 'ro': 'Tw-StAR la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 5: Încorporări N-gram pentru detectarea vorbirii de ură în tweeturile multilingve', 'ur': 'SemEval-2019 Task 5: N-gram embeddings for Hate Speech Detection in Multilingual Tweets', 'uz': 'Tw-StAR at SemEval-2019 Task 5: N-gram embeddings for Hate Speech Detection in Multilingual Tweets', 'vi': 'Twa-Ssar at SemEvl-209 Task 5: N-gram embedding for Ghét diễn văn trong đa ngôn ngữ Tweet', 'bg': 'Задача 5: вграждания на Н-грам за откриване на реч на омраза в многоезични туитове', 'nl': 'Tw-StAR bij SemEval-2019 Taak 5: N-gram embeddings voor haatspraakdetectie in meertalige tweets', 'hr': 'Tw-StAR na semiEval-2019 zadatak 5: N-gram ugrađenje za otkrivanje govora mržnje u višejezičkim tweetima', 'da': 'Tw-StAR på SemEval-2019 Opgave 5: N-gram indlejringer til detektering af had tale i flersprogede tweets', 'id': 'Tw-StAR di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: N-gram embeddings for Hate Speech Detection in Multilingual Tweets', 'fa': 'Tw-StAR در پایگاه ۲۰۱۹ کار ۵: پیدا کردن N-گرم برای شناسایی سخنرانی دشمنی در Tweets Multilingual', 'de': 'Tw-StAR auf der SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 5: N-Gramm Einbettungen zur Hassspracherkennung in mehrsprachigen Tweets', 'sw': 'Twiti-StAR kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 5: Ujumbe wa Uzungumzo wa Hati katika twiti za lugha nyingi', 'ko': 'Tw StAR이 SemEval-2019 퀘스트 5: 다중 언어 트윗에 음성 탐지의 N-gram 삽입', 'af': 'Tw- StAR by SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 5: N- gram inbettings vir Hate Speech Deteksie in Multilingual Tweets', 'am': 'የሳምEval-2019 ስራ 5: N-gram በMultilingual Tweets ውስጥ የጥል ንግግር Detections', 'tr': 'Tw-StAR at SemEval-2019 Task 5: N-gram embeddings for Hate Speech Detection in Multilingual Tweets', 'sq': 'Tw-StAR në SemEval-2019 Task 5: N-gram embeddings for Hate Speech Detection in Multilingual Tweets', 'hy': 'Tw-Stear-ը, որը գտնվում է "Haleewal-2019"-ի 5. հանձնարարություն. N-գրամ ներդրումներ ատելության խոսքի հայտնաբերման համար բազմալեզու թվիթերում', 'az': '卥浅癡氭㈰ㄹ⁔慳欠㔺⁎ⵧ牡洠丠쎶瓃뱲泃밠參뙺泃뱫⁋旅齦整淉饳椠쎼쎧쎼渠仃뙴쎼牬쎼⁔쎶癥瑬즙爊', 'cs': 'Tw-StAR na SemEval-2019 Úkol 5: Vložení N-gramů pro detekci nenávisti ve vícejazyčných tweetech', 'bn': 'Tw-StAR at SemEval-2019 Task 5: N-gram embeddings for Hate Speech Detection in Multilingual Tweets', 'bs': 'Tw-StAR na semiEval-2019 zadatak 5: N-gram ugrađenje za otkrivanje govora mržnje u višejezičkim tweetima', 'et': 'Tw-StAR SemEval-2019 ülesanne 5: N-grammi manustamised vihkamise kõne tuvastamiseks mitmekeelsetes tweetides', 'ca': 'Tw-StAR a SemEval-2019 Task 5: N-gram embeddings for Hate Speech Detection on Multilingual Tweets', 'fi': 'Tw-StAR SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 5: N-gram-upotukset vihapuheen havaitsemiseen monikielisissä tweeteissä', 'jv': 'Tuw-stAR at semi-inval-2011 task 5: N-gram embedding for Ate Word detection in Multilanguage Two', 'sk': 'Tw-StAR na SemEval-2019 Naloga 5: N-gramske vdelave za zaznavanje sovražnega govora v večjezičnih tweetih', 'ha': 'QScriptBreakpointsModel', 'bo': 'Tw-StAR at SemEval-2019 Task 5: N-gram embeddings for Hate Speech Detection in Multilingual Tweets', 'he': 'Tw-StAR at SemEval-2019 Task 5: N-gram embeddings for Hate Speech Detection in Multilingual Tweets'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we describe our contribution in SemEval-2019 : subtask A of task 5 Multilingual detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (HatEval). We developed two hate speech detection model variants through Tw-StAR framework. While the first model adopted one-hot encoding ngrams to train an NB classifier, the second generated and learned n-gram embeddings within a feedforward neural network. For both models, specific terms, selected via MWT patterns, were tagged in the input data. With two feature types employed, we could investigate the ability of n-gram embeddings to rival one-hot n-grams. Our results showed that in English, n-gram embeddings outperformed one-hot ngrams. However, representing Spanish tweets by one-hot n-grams yielded a slightly better performance compared to that of n-gram embeddings. The official ranking indicated that Tw-StAR ranked 9th for English and 20th for Spanish.', 'es': 'En este artículo, describimos nuestra contribución en SemEval-2019: subtarea A de la tarea 5 «Detección multilingüe del discurso de odio contra inmigrantes y mujeres en Twitter (HaTeval)». Desarrollamos dos variantes del modelo de detección de incitación al odio a través del marco TW-Star. Mientras que el primer modelo adoptó ngramas de codificación one-hot para entrenar un clasificador NB, el segundo generó y aprendió incrustaciones de n-gramas dentro de una red neuronal feedforward. Para ambos modelos, los términos específicos, seleccionados mediante patrones MWT, se etiquetaron en los datos de entrada. Con dos tipos de características empleados, podríamos investigar la capacidad de las incrustaciones de n-gramas para competir con los n-gramas de un solo paso. Nuestros resultados mostraron que en inglés, las incrustaciones de n-gram superaron a los ngrams one-hot. Sin embargo, la representación de los tuits en español mediante n-gramas de un solo paso produjo un rendimiento ligeramente mejor en comparación con las incrustaciones de n-gramas. El ranking oficial indica que TW-Star ocupó el noveno puesto en inglés y el vigésimo en español.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نصف مساهمتنا في SemEval-2019: المهمة الفرعية A من المهمة 5 "الكشف متعدد اللغات عن خطاب الكراهية ضد المهاجرين والنساء في تويتر (HatEval)". قمنا بتطوير متغيرين لنموذج اكتشاف الكلام الذي يحض على الكراهية من خلال إطار عمل Tw-StAR. في حين أن النموذج الأول اعتمد ngrams ترميز واحد ساخن لتدريب مصنف NB ، فإن النموذج الثاني أنشأ وتعلم زخارف n-gram ضمن شبكة عصبية تلقائية. لكلا النموذجين ، تم تمييز المصطلحات المحددة ، التي تم اختيارها عبر أنماط MWT ، في بيانات الإدخال. باستخدام نوعين من الميزات المستخدمة ، يمكننا التحقيق في قدرة حفلات الزفاف التي تحتوي على n-gram على منافسة n-grams. أظهرت النتائج التي توصلنا إليها أنه في اللغة الإنجليزية ، تفوقت عمليات التضمين n-gram على ngrams الساخنة. ومع ذلك ، فإن تمثيل التغريدات الإسبانية بواسطة n-grams أدى إلى أداء أفضل قليلاً مقارنة بأداء حفلات الزفاف n-gram. أشار الترتيب الرسمي إلى أن Tw-StAR احتلت المرتبة 9 للغة الإنجليزية و 20 للإسبانية.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous décrivons notre contribution au SEMEVAL-2019\xa0: sous-tâche A de la tâche 5 «\xa0Détection multilingue des discours de haine contre les immigrés et les femmes sur Twitter (HaTeval)\xa0». Nous avons développé deux variantes de modèles de détection de discours haineux via le framework TW-Star. Alors que le premier modèle adoptait des ngrammes de codage à un seul instant pour entraîner un classificateur NB, le second a généré et appris des intégrations de n-grammes dans un réseau neuronal prévisionnel. Pour les deux modèles, des termes spécifiques, sélectionnés via des modèles MWT, ont été marqués dans les données d'entrée. Avec deux types de caractéristiques utilisés, nous avons pu étudier la capacité des intégrations de n-grammes à rivaliser avec les n-grammes uniques. Nos résultats ont montré qu'en anglais, les intégrations de n-grammes surpassaient les ngrammes uniques. Toutefois, la représentation des tweets espagnols par des n-grammes uniques a donné des performances légèrement meilleures que celles des intégrations de n-grammes. Le classement officiel indique que TW-Star se classe 9e pour l'anglais et 20e pour l'espagnol.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, descrevemos nossa contribuição no SemEval-2019: subtarefa A da tarefa 5 “Detecção multilíngue de discurso de ódio contra imigrantes e mulheres no Twitter (HatEval)”. Desenvolvemos duas variantes do modelo de detecção de discurso de ódio por meio do framework Tw-StAR. Enquanto o primeiro modelo adotou ngrams de codificação one-hot para treinar um classificador NB, o segundo gerou e aprendeu embeddings de n-grams dentro de uma rede neural feedforward. Para ambos os modelos, termos específicos, selecionados por meio de padrões MWT, foram marcados nos dados de entrada. Com dois tipos de recursos empregados, poderíamos investigar a capacidade de embeddings de n-gram para rivalizar com n-grams one-hot. Nossos resultados mostraram que, em inglês, os embeddings de n-gram superaram os one-hot ngrams. No entanto, a representação de tweets em espanhol por n-grams one-hot rendeu um desempenho ligeiramente melhor em comparação com a incorporação de n-grams. O ranking oficial indicou que o Tw-StAR ficou em 9º lugar para inglês e 20º para espanhol.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2019 ：タスク5のサブタスクA「Twitterにおける移民と女性に対するヘイトスピーチの多言語検出（ HatEval ）」における私たちの貢献について説明します。Tw - StARフレームワークを通じて2つのヘイトスピーチ検出モデルバリアントを開発しました。第１のモデルは、ＮＢ分類子を訓練するためにワンホットエンコーディングｎｇｒａｍを採用したが、第２のモデルは、フィードフォワードニューラルネットワーク内でｎｇｒａｍの埋め込みを生成し、学習した。両方のモデルについて、MWTパターンを介して選択された特定の用語が入力データにタグ付けされました。2つの機能タイプを使用すると、n - gram埋め込みがワンホットn - gramに対抗する能力を調べることができます。私たちの結果は、英語では、n - gramの埋め込みがワンホットngramよりも優れていることを示しました。しかし、ワンホットなnグラムでスペイン語のツイートを表すと、nグラムの埋め込みと比較して若干パフォーマンスが向上しました。公式ランキングでは、Tw - StARは英語が9位、スペイン語が20位であった。', 'zh': '本文述SemEval-2019之献:务5子职A"多言检Twitter移民妇人之仇言(HatEval)"。 因Tw-StAR框架发两仇言检模变体。 虽一模用one-hot编码ngram以练NB器,而二模生于前馈神经网络而学n-gram嵌。 凡此二者,MWT式所择特定皆著于输数。 二者,所以究n-gram嵌一热n-gram争之力也。 吾之的结果表明,在英语中,n-gram嵌者优于one-hot ngram。 然与n-gram嵌比,以一热门之n-grams示西班牙语推文生微善。 官名显,Tw-StAR在英语中排名第9位,在西班牙语中排名第20位。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम SemEval-2019 में हमारे योगदान का वर्णन करते हैं: कार्य 5 के उप-कार्य ए "ट्विटर (HatEval) में आप्रवासियों और महिलाओं के खिलाफ नफरत भरे भाषण का बहुभाषी पता लगाना"। हमने Tw-STAR ढांचे के माध्यम से दो हेट स्पीच डिटेक्शन मॉडल वेरिएंट विकसित किए हैं। जबकि पहले मॉडल ने एक एनबी क्लासिफायर को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए एक-गर्म एन्कोडिंग एनग्राम को अपनाया, दूसरे ने फीडफॉरवर्ड तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के भीतर एन-ग्राम एम्बेडिंग उत्पन्न और सीखा। दोनों मॉडलों के लिए, एमडब्ल्यूटी पैटर्न के माध्यम से चयनित विशिष्ट शब्दों को इनपुट डेटा में टैग किया गया था। नियोजित दो फीचर प्रकारों के साथ, हम एक-गर्म एन-ग्राम प्रतिद्वंद्वी के लिए एन-ग्राम एम्बेडिंग की क्षमता की जांच कर सकते हैं। हमारे परिणामों से पता चला है कि अंग्रेजी में, एन-ग्राम एम्बेडिंग ने एक-गर्म ngrams को पछाड़ दिया। हालांकि, एक-गर्म एन-ग्राम द्वारा स्पेनिश ट्वीट्स का प्रतिनिधित्व करने से एन-ग्राम एम्बेडिंग की तुलना में थोड़ा बेहतर प्रदर्शन हुआ। आधिकारिक रैंकिंग ने संकेत दिया कि Tw-STAR अंग्रेजी के लिए 9 वें और स्पेनिश के लिए 20 वें स्थान पर है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы описываем наш вклад в SemEval-2019: подзадача A задачи 5 «Многоязычное обнаружение ненавистнических высказываний против иммигрантов и женщин в Twitter (HatEval)». Мы разработали два варианта модели обнаружения ненавистнической речи с помощью фреймворка Tw-Star. В то время как первая модель приняла одноразовые кодирующие nграммы для обучения NB-классификатора, вторая генерировала и изучала n-граммовые вложения в прямой нейронной сети. Для обеих моделей в исходных данных были отмечены конкретные термины, выбранные с помощью моделей MWT. Используя два типа признаков, мы могли бы исследовать способность вложений n-грамм соперничать с однократно горячими n-граммами. Наши результаты показали, что в английском языке n-граммовые вставки превосходят однократно горячие n-граммы. Тем не менее, представление испанских твитов по одной горячей n-грамме дало несколько лучшую производительность по сравнению с n-граммовыми вложениями. Официальный рейтинг показал, что Tw-Star занял 9-е место для английского языка и 20-е - для испанского.', 'ga': "Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid cur síos ar an méid a chuireamar le SemEval-2019: fothasc A de thasc 5 “Fuathchaint i gcoinne inimirceach agus ban a bhrath go ilteangach ar Twitter (HatEval)”. D’fhorbraíomar dhá leagan de shamhail braite fuathchainte trí chreat Tw-StAR. Cé gur ghlac an chéad mhúnla le ngramanna ionchódaithe aon-te chun aicmitheoir NB a oiliúint, ghin agus d'fhoghlaim an dara ceann leabaithe n-gram laistigh de líonra néarach réamhbhothaíochta. I gcás an dá mhúnla, rinneadh téarmaí sonracha, a roghnaíodh trí phatrúin MWT, a chlibeáil sna sonraí ionchuir. Agus dhá chineál gné in úsáid, d'fhéadfaimis imscrúdú a dhéanamh ar chumas leabaithe n-gram dul i ngleic le n-gram te aon-te. Léirigh ár dtorthaí gur sháraigh leabú n-gram i mBéarla ná ngramanna te amháin. Mar sin féin, bhí feidhmíocht beagán níos fearr ag baint le tweets Spáinneacha a léiriú le n-gram te aon-te i gcomparáid le leabú n-gram. Thug an rangú oifigiúil le fios go raibh Tw-StAR sa 9ú háit do Bhéarla agus sa 20ú háit do Spáinnis.", 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ჩვენი მიმართვის SemEval-2019-ში აღწერეთ: A-ს მიმართვის 5-ზე "მრავალური ენერგიის განახლება მპატი სიტყვას იმიგრანტებზე და ქალებზე Twitter-ში (HatEval)". ჩვენ Tw-StAR ფრამეტრის გამოყენებული ორი მპანელი სიტყვების მოდელური განვითარებით. თუმცა პირველი მოდელი ერთი-დოლე კოდირება ngrams გავაკეთება NB კლასიფიკაციაში, მეორე შექმნილი და სწავლილი n-გრამის კოდირება ნეიროლური ქსელში. ორივე მოდელებისთვის, განსაკუთრებული სიმბოლოებისთვის, მონიშნული MWT მოდელებისთვის, მონაცემების მონაცემებში მონიშნულია. ჩვენ შეგვიძლია შევხედოთ n-გრამის შესაძლებლობა ერთ-დომული n-გრამის შესაძლებლობა. ჩვენი შედეგი გამოჩვენება, რომ ანგლისურად n-გრამის ინბედინგიზები ერთ-დოლური ინგრამის გამოყენება. მაგრამ, რომელიც სპანელი ტივიტები ერთ-დომის n-გრამებით გამოყენებული იყო ცოტა უკეთესი გამოყენება, რომელიც n-გრამებით გამოყენებულია. ჲტთუთალნთწრ პვნეზთნდ ოჲკაჱა, ფვ რგჲ-ჟრAR პვნეზთპა 9-ჲრ ანდლთჟკთ თ 20-ჲრ ჟოანჟკთ.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, περιγράφουμε τη συμβολή μας στο SemEval-2019: Υποεργασία Α του έργου 5 "Πολυγλωσσική ανίχνευση ρητορικής μίσους κατά μεταναστών και γυναικών στο Twitter (HatEval)". Αναπτύξαμε δύο παραλλαγές μοντέλων ανίχνευσης φωνής μίσους μέσω του πλαισίου Tw-StAR. Ενώ το πρώτο μοντέλο υιοθέτησε ένα-καυτό κωδικοποιητικό για να εκπαιδεύσει έναν ταξινομητή ΝΒ, το δεύτερο δημιούργησε και έμαθε ενσωματώσεις σε ένα τροφοδοτικό νευρωνικό δίκτυο. Και για τα δύο μοντέλα, συγκεκριμένοι όροι, επιλεγμένοι μέσω μοτίβων MWT, επισημάνθηκαν στα δεδομένα εισόδου. Με δύο τύπους χαρακτηριστικών που χρησιμοποιούνται, θα μπορούσαμε να διερευνήσουμε την ικανότητα των ενσωμάτωσης ν-γραμμάτων να ανταγωνιστούν ένα-καυτό n-γραμμάριο. Τα αποτελέσματά μας έδειξαν ότι στα αγγλικά, οι ενσωμάτωση n-γραμμάτων ξεπερνούν τα ένα-καυτά ngrams. Ωστόσο, η εκπροσώπηση των ισπανικών tweets με ένα καυτό n-γραμμάριο έδωσε ελαφρώς καλύτερη απόδοση σε σύγκριση με εκείνη των ενσωμάτωσης n-γραμμάτων. Η επίσημη κατάταξη έδειξε ότι η Τw-StAR κατατάχθηκε 9η για τα Αγγλικά και 20η για τα Ισπανικά.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a SemEval-2019 című közreműködésünket: "A többnyelvű gyűlöletbeszéd felismerése a bevándorlók és nők ellen a Twitteren (HatEval)". Két gyűlöletbeszédfelismerő modellváltozatot fejlesztettünk ki a Tw-StAR keretrendszeren keresztül. Míg az első modell egy forró kódolási ngramot alkalmazott egy NB osztályozó kiképzésére, a második generált és tanult n-gramm beágyazásokat egy feedfront neurális hálózatba. Mindkét modell esetében a bemeneti adatokban MWT mintákon keresztül kiválasztott konkrét kifejezéseket jelöltek meg. Két funkciótípus alkalmazásával megvizsgálhatjuk, hogy az n-gramm beágyazások képesek-e versenyezni egy-forró n-grammmal. Eredményeink azt mutatták, hogy angolul az n-gram beágyazások túlléptek az egyforró ngramokat. Azonban a spanyol tweeteket egy forró n-grammmal ábrázolva kissé jobb teljesítményt eredményezett az n-grammos beágyazásokhoz képest. A hivatalos rangsor azt mutatta, hogy a Tw-StAR 9. helyen, a spanyol pedig 20. helyen áll.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазында, біз 2019 жылдың жартық қатынасымызды таңдап береміз: тапсырманың A дегенді 5- тілдегі "Твиттерде иммигранттер мен әйелдердің қарсы көп тілдегі сөйлерді таңдау" дегенді таңдап берем Біз Tw- StAR бағдарламасынан екі жас сөйлесу үлгісін анықтау үлгісін жасадық. Бірінші үлгісі NB классификаторын оқыту үшін бір- сәтті кодтамасын қолданған, екінші жасалған және оқылған n- грамм ендіру ньюралық желінде. MWT үлгілерімен таңдалған екі үлгілер үшін келтірілген деректерде тегтерді қолданылады. Екі мүмкіндік түрлері жұмыс істегенде, n-грамм ендіру мүмкіндігін бір жақын n-граммалардың қарсылығына зерттеуге болады. Біздің нәтижелеріміз ағылшын тілінде n-граммды ендіру бір жылу нграммалардан шығарылды. Бірақ испан тійттерін бір жылу n- граммдар арқылы көрсету n- граммдар ендіру сәйкестігіне салыстырып жақсы жұмыс істейді. Ағылшын және 20- ші испан тілінде 2- СтAR дегенді көрсетті.', 'it': "In questo articolo, descriviamo il nostro contributo in SemEval-2019: sottotask A del compito 5 'Rilevazione multilingue del discorso d'odio contro immigrati e donne su Twitter (HatEval)'. Abbiamo sviluppato due varianti di modelli di rilevamento del parlato di odio attraverso il framework Tw-StAR. Mentre il primo modello adottò ngram di codifica one-hot per addestrare un classificatore NB, il secondo generò e imparò incorporazioni n-gram all'interno di una rete neurale feed-forward. Per entrambi i modelli, termini specifici, selezionati tramite modelli MWT, sono stati taggati nei dati di input. Con due tipi di funzionalità impiegati, potremmo studiare la capacità delle incorporazioni n-grammi di competere con n-grammi caldi. I nostri risultati hanno mostrato che in inglese, le incorporazioni n-gram hanno superato i ngram one-hot. Tuttavia, rappresentare i tweet spagnoli con n-grammi caldi ha prodotto una prestazione leggermente migliore rispetto a quella delle incorporazioni n-gram. La classifica ufficiale ha indicato che Tw-StAR si è classificato 9° per l'inglese e 20° per lo spagnolo.", 'lt': "In this paper, we describe our contribution in SemEval-2019: subtask A of task 5 'Multilingual detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (HatEval)'.  Mes sukūrėme du neapykantos kalbos nustatymo modelio variantus per Tw-StAR sistemą. While the first model adopted one-hot encoding ngrams to train an NB classifier, the second generated and learned n-gram embeddings within a feedforward neural network.  For both models, specific terms, selected via MWT patterns, were tagged in the input data.  Naudojant dvi savybes, galėtume ištirti n-gram ų įdėjimo gebėjimą konkuruoti su vienu karštu n-gramu. Our results showed that in English, n-gram embeddings outperformed one-hot ngrams.  Vis dėlto vieno karšto n-gramo pavidalo Ispanijos tweetų rezultatai šiek tiek pagerėjo, palyginti su n-gramo įterpimo rezultatais. Oficialus klasifikavimas parodė, kad Tw-StAR yra 9-asis anglų kalbos ir 20-asis ispanų kalbos.", 'ms': "Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan kontribusi kami dalam SemEval-2019: subtask A dari tugas 5 'Pengesanan berbilang bahasa ucapan kebencian terhadap imigran dan perempuan di Twitter (HatEval)'. Kami mengembangkan dua varian model pengesan ucapan kebencian melalui kerangka Tw-StAR. Sementara model pertama mengadopsi ngrams pengekodan satu-panas untuk melatih pengeklasifikasi NB, kedua yang dijana dan belajar penyambungan n-gram dalam rangkaian saraf feedforward. Untuk kedua-dua model, terma khusus, dipilih melalui corak MWT, ditanda dalam data input. Dengan dua jenis ciri yang digunakan, kita boleh menyelidiki kemampuan n-gram embedding untuk bersaing satu-hot n-gram. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahawa dalam bahasa Inggeris, n-gram penerbangan melebihi satu-panas ngrams. However, representing Spanish tweets by one-hot n-grams yielded a slightly better performance compared to that of n-gram embeddings.  Rangkaian rasmi menunjukkan bahawa Tw-StAR Rangkaian ke-9 untuk bahasa Inggeris dan ke-20 untuk bahasa Sepanyol.", 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019-ല്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ഭാഗങ്ങളെ വിവരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു: അഗസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വെറുപ്പുള്ള സ്ത്രീകള്\u200dക്കും വിരോധമ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ട് വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിച്ചു. ഒരു NB ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫയര്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ മോഡല്\u200d ഒരു ചൂട് കോഡിങ്ങ് ഗ്രാമിനെ ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരുന്നപ്പോള്\u200d, രണ്ടാമത്തേതായി ഉല്\u200dപാദ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കും, MWT രീതികള്\u200dകൊണ്ട് തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത പ്രത്യേക വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും, ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ഡേറ്റായിട്ട് ടാഗ രണ്ടു പ്രതിഫലങ്ങളുടെ ടൈപ്പുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട്, നമുക്ക് ഒരു ചൂട് നിങ്ങളുടെ പ്രതിരോധത്തിന്റെ കഴിവ് നിരീക്ഷിക്കാം. നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു ചൂടുള്ള ഗ്രാമിനെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിച്ചിരുന്നു. എന്നാലും, ഒരു ചൂട്ട് n-ഗ്രാമിലൂടെ സ്പാനിഷ് ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നത് നിങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഗ്രാമിന്\u200dറെ അകത്തേക്ക് തുല്യമാ ഓഫീസല്\u200d റാങ്കിംഗ് സ്പാനിഷിന് വേണ്ടി ട്വൂ-സ്റ്റാര്\u200d 9ആം ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലേക്കും 20ആിലേക്കും റാങ്ങിയിര', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид SemEval-2019 онд зориулалтыг тайлбарлаж байна: 5 даалгаварын А-г "Жервэгчдийн, эмэгтэйчүүдийн Твиттерт (HatEval)-ын эсрэг үзэн ядуурлын илтгэлийг олон хэлний олон хэлний суралцах" гэ Бид хоёр үзэн ядуурлын илтгэлийн загварыг Tw-StAR хэлбэрээр хөгжүүлсэн. Эхний загвар нь NB классификаторыг сургахын тулд нэг халуун кодлонг нграмм ашигласан ч, хоёр дахь нүүрстөрөгч болон сурсан нүүрстөрөгч нүүрстөрөгчийн сүлжээнд нэг халуун кодлонг грам MWT хэлбэрээр сонгогдсон хоёр загвар, тодорхой хэлбэрүүдийн хувьд өгөгдлийн мэдээллээр тагтагдсан. Хоёр шинжлэх ухааны төрлийн ажиллагаатай бид n-граммын нэг халуун n-граммын эсрэг нөлөөлөх чадварыг судалж болно. Бидний үр дүнд Англи хэл дээр n-грамм нь нэг халуун грамм гэдгийг харуулсан. Гэхдээ нэг халуун n-грамм дээр Испанийн tweets-г илэрхийлж байгаа нь n-граммын нэвтрүүлэлтийн харьцаа бага зэрэг илүү сайн үйлдэл гаргасан. Ардчилсан цуврал нь Tw-StAR нь Англи хэл болон 20-р Испанийн хувьд 9-р цуврал гэдгийг харуулсан.', 'no': 'I denne papiret beskriver vi vårt bidrag i semiEval-2019: subtspør A av oppgåva 5 « Multispråk oppdaging av hatespråk mot imigrantar og kvinner i Twitter (HatEval)». Vi utvikla to modeller for oppdaging av hatespråk gjennom Tw StAR- rammeverket. Mens den første modellen har godtatt ein varme koding ngramme for å trena ein NB- klassifisering, den andre genererte og lærte innbygging av n- gram inne ein kjeldeforan neuralnettverk. For begge modeller, særskilde uttrykk, valde via MWT-mønsterelement, vart merkt i inndata. Med to funksjonstypar arbeida kan vi undersøke kapasiteten for innbygging av n-gram til rival med en-hot n-gram. Resultatet våre viste at med engelsk innbygging av n-gram er utført enn ein hølt gram. Men å representera spanske tweeter med ein vart n-gram førte ein litt bedre utvikling sammenlignet med innbygginga av n-gram. Den offisielle rangen viste at Tw StAR rangerte 9. for engelsk og 20. for spansk.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule opisujemy nasz wkład w SemEval-2019: podzadanie A zadania 5 "Wielojęzyczne wykrywanie mowy nienawiści wobec imigrantów i kobiet w Twitterze (HatEval)". Opracowaliśmy dwa warianty modeli wykrywania mowy nienawiści za pomocą frameworku Tw-StAR. Podczas gdy pierwszy model przyjął jedno-gorące kodowanie ngramy do treningu klasyfikatora NB, drugi generował i nauczył się osadzeń n-gramów w sieci neuronowej. Dla obu modeli w danych wejściowych oznaczono określone terminy, wybrane za pomocą wzorców MWT. Dzięki zastosowaniu dwóch typów funkcji możemy zbadać zdolność osadzeń n-gramów do konkurencji z jednym gorącym n-gramem. Nasze wyniki wykazały, że w języku angielskim osadzenia n-gramów przewyższają one-hot ngramy. Jednak reprezentowanie hiszpańskich tweetów za pomocą jednego gorącego n-gramu dało nieco lepszą wydajność w porównaniu z osadzeniami n-gramu. Oficjalny ranking wskazywał, że Tw-StAR zajęła dziewiąte miejsce dla angielskiego i XX dla hiszpańskiego.', 'sr': "U ovom papiru opisujemo svoj doprinos u semiEvalu-2019: podpitanje A od zadatka 5 'Multilingual Detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (HatEval)'. Razvili smo dva modela detekcije govora mržnje kroz okvir Tw-StAR. Dok je prvi model usvojio jedno vruće kodiranje ngrame za obuku klasifikatora NB, drugi je proizveden i naučio integraciju n-gram a unutar neuralne mreže. Za obe modele, specifični termini, odabrani putem MWT obrazaca, bili su označeni u podacima o ulazu. Sa dva vrsta zaposlenog, mogli bismo istražiti sposobnost integracije n-grama protiv jedne vruće n-grame. Naši rezultati su pokazali da na engleskom, n-gramskom integraciji nisu izvršili jednu vruću ngramu. Međutim, predstavljanje španjolskih tweeta od jedne vruće n-grame donosilo je malo bolje izvedbe u usporedbi s ugrađenjem n-gram a. Zvanični redovi ukazuju na to da je Tw-StAR 9. redovito za engleski i 20. za španjolski.", 'mk': 'Во овој весник го опишуваме нашиот придонес во SemEval-2019: подпрашање А од задачата 5 „Мултијазично откривање на говорот на омраза против имигрантите и жените на Твитер (HatEval)“. Развивме две модели за детекција на говорот на омраза преку ТВ-СтАР рамка. Додека првиот модел усвои едножешки кодирачки громови за обука на класификатор на НБ, вториот генериран и научил вградување на n-грам во нервната мрежа. За двата модели, специфичните термини, избрани преку MWT шеми, беа обележани во внатрешните податоци. With two feature types employed, we could investigate the ability of n-gram embeddings to rival one-hot n-grams.  Нашите резултати покажаа дека на англиски, вградувањата на n-грам го надминаа односниот грем. Сепак, претставувањето на шпанските твитови со еден топло n-грам доведе до малку подобра резултат во споредба со резултатот на вградувањата на n-грам. Официјалниот рангирање покажа дека Тв-СтАР се рангираше на 9-тото место за англиски и на 20-тото место за шпански.', 'mt': "F'dan id-dokument, niddeskrivu l-kontribut tagħna f'SemEval-2019: sottomistoqsija A tal-kompitu 5 'Sejbien multilingwi ta' diskors ta' mibegħda kontra l-immigranti u n-nisa fuq Twitter (HatEval)'. Żviluppajna żewġ varjanti tal-mudell tad-detezzjoni tad-diskors tal-mibegħda permezz tal-qafas Tw-StAR. Filwaqt li l-ewwel mudell adotta ngrams ta’ kodifikazzjoni ta’ sħa n a waħda biex jitħarreġ klassifikatur NB, it-tieni inkorporazzjoni n-gram iġġenerata u mgħallma fi ħdan netwerk newrali feedback. Għaż-żewġ mudelli, termini speċifiċi, magħżula permezz ta’ mudelli MWT, ġew ittikkettati fid-dejta tal-input. B’żewġ tipi ta’ karatteristiċi użati, nistgħu ninvestigaw il-kapaċità tal-inkorporazzjonijiet n-grammi li jikkompetu ma’ n-grammi sħun wieħed. Our results showed that in English, n-gram embeddings outperformed one-hot ngrams.  However, representing Spanish tweets by one-hot n-grams yielded a slightly better performance compared to that of n-gram embeddings.  Il-klassifikazzjoni uffiċjali indikat li Tw-StAR kienet id-9 għall-Ingliż u l-20 għall-Ispanjol.", 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qornaa qaybtayada ee ku qoran SemEval-2019: Shaqada A waxaa lagu sameynayaa "baaritaanka hadalka nebcaalka ah oo ku saabsan dadka dalka u soo guuray iyo dumarka Twitterka (HatEval)". Waxaan horumarinay laba qaab oo kala duwan hadalka nacayb ah oo ku qoran Tw-StAR. Intii modelkii ugu horeeyay ay uu u qaaday koox-hot encoding-rams si uu u tababariyo kooxaha NB, kii labaad ayaa dhashay oo bartay n-gram embeddings gudaha shabakadda neurada. Tusaalada labadooda waxaa lagu qoray macluumaadka input ee lagu doortay noocyada MWT. Laba nooc oo tayo ah oo la shaqeynayo, waxaynu baarayn karnaa awoodda koritaanka n-gram-ka si ay u qabsadaan hal gram oo kulul. Mataaradeenna waxay muuqatay in afka Ingiriiska ku qoran n-gram ay sameeyeen barxado kulul. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, qeyb ka dhigashada Isbanish tweeti oo ku qoran 1-gram-kulul waxay soo bandhigtay wax ka wanaagsan oo la barbardhiga qoraalka n-gram. Shaqooyiga rasmiga ah ayaa sheegay in Tw-StAR ay ku saleysay ingiriisiga iyo 20aad Isbanish.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, descriem contribuția noastră în SemEval-2019: subactivitatea A a sarcinii 5 "Detectarea multilingvă a discursului de ură împotriva imigranților și femeilor în Twitter (HatEval)". Am dezvoltat două variante de modele de detectare a discursului urât prin intermediul cadrului Tw-StAR. În timp ce primul model a adoptat engramuri de codificare la cald pentru a instrui un clasificator NB, al doilea a generat și învățat încorporări n-gram într-o rețea neurală feed-forward. Pentru ambele modele, termeni specifici, selectați prin modele MWT, au fost etichetați în datele de intrare. Cu două tipuri de caracteristici folosite, am putea investiga capacitatea încorporărilor n-gram de a rivaliza cu un n-gram fierbinte. Rezultatele noastre au arătat că în engleză, încorporările n-gram au depășit nivelul unu-hot ngrams. Cu toate acestea, reprezentarea tweet-urilor spaniole cu un n-gram fierbinte a produs o performanță ușor mai bună comparativ cu cea a încorporărilor n-gram. Clasamentul oficial indică faptul că Tw-StAR s-a clasat pe locul 9 pentru engleză și pe locul 20 pentru spaniolă.', 'ta': "இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் செம்வால்-2019-ல் எங்கள் பங்கீட்டை விவரிக்கிறோம்: இந்த பணியில் 'குடியாளர்கள் மற்றும் பெண்கள் எதிர்பார்த்த பேச் நாங்கள் இரு வெறுப்பு பேச்சு கண்டுபிடிப்பு மாதிரி மாறிகளை உருவாக்கினோம் Tw-StAR சட்டத்தை மூலம். முதல் மாதிரி NB வகுப்பாளரை பயிற்சி செய்ய ஒரு சூடான குறியீட்டான கிங்க்ராம் எடுத்த போது, இரண்டாவது உருவாக்கப்பட்டு மற்றும் கற்றுக் கொண் MWT மாதிரிகள் மூலம் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட இரு மாதிரிக்கும் குறிப்பிட்ட விளக்கங்களுக்கு, உள்ளீடு தரவி இரண்டு குணங்கள் வகைகள் வேலை செய்யப்பட்டால், நாம் n-கிராம் பொருட்கள் எதிர்பார்த்து ஒன்று சூடான n-கிராம் எதிர்ப்பு  எங்கள் முடிவுகள் ஆங்கிலத்தில் என்று காண்பித்தது ஒரு சூடான காங்கிராம் மேல் உள்ளது. எனினும், ஒரு சூடான n-கிராம் மூலம் ஸ்பானிஷ் tweets குறிப்பிடும் என்று n-கிராம் உள்ளீடுகளை ஒப்பிட்டு சிறிது சிறந்த செயல்பா தொழில்நுட்பத்திற்கு தெரிவிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது Tw-StAR ஆங்கிலத்திற்கும் 20 ஆங்கிலத்திற்கும் 9வது நிரப்", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats beskriver vi vårt bidrag i SemEval-2019: underuppgift A i uppgift 5 "Flerspråkig upptäckt av hatpropaganda mot invandrare och kvinnor i Twitter (HatEval)". Vi utvecklade två modeller för hattalsdetektering genom Tw-StAR ramverk. Medan den första modellen antog one-hot kodning ngrams för att träna en NB klassificerare, genererade den andra och lärde n-gram inbäddningar i ett feedfront neuralt nätverk. För båda modellerna märktes specifika termer, utvalda via MWT-mönster, i indatadata. Med två funktionstyper som används, kunde vi undersöka förmågan hos n-gram inbäddningar att konkurrera med en-het n-gram. Våra resultat visade att n-gram inbäddningar på engelska presterade bättre än one-hot ngrams. Att representera spanska tweets med ett hett n-gram gav dock en något bättre prestanda jämfört med n-grams inbäddningar. Den officiella rankningen indikerade att Tw-StAR rankade 9:e för engelska och 20:e för spanska.', 'si': "මේ පත්තරේදී, අපි සෙම්වල් 2019 වල අපේ සම්බන්ධය විස්තර කරනවා: A of job 5 'Multilanguage Detection of Hate Talk vs. Immediants and females in Twitter (Hateval)' කාර්යයේ A of subtask. අපි විරෝධ කතාව හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් දෙකක් විකාශ කරලා තියෙනවා Tw-StAR ක්\u200dරීමාර්ගයෙන්. පළමු මොඩේල් එක-හෝට් සංකේතනය ngrams විශ්වාස කරලා NB විශේෂකයෙක් ක්\u200dරියාන්ත කරන්න, දෙවෙනි නිර්මාණය සහ ඉගෙන ගත්තා n-ග Name ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්නෙක් සමග, අපිට පුළුවන් n-ග්\u200dරාම් ඇම්බෙන්ඩින්ග් සම්බන්ධයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ ඉංග්\u200dරේසියේ n-ග්\u200dරාම් ඇන්බුඩින්ග් එක ගෝට්රාම්ස් එකක් නැති වෙලා  නමුත්, ස්පැනිස් ට්විට් එක්කෙන් ග්\u200dරාම්ස් එක්කෙන් ස්පැනිස් ට්විට් එක්කෙන් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරනවා න්-ග්\u200dරාම සාධාරණික ප්\u200dරමාණය පෙන්වන්නේ Tw-StAR තමයි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලට 9වෙනි 20වෙනි ස්පැනිස් වලට.", 'ur': "اس کاغذ میں ہم نے نصف Eval-2019 میں اپنا حصہ بیان کرتا ہے: A کو چھوڑ کر پنج کاغذ میں چھوڑ دیتے ہیں 'مہاجرین اور عورتوں کے مقابلہ میں نفرت کی سخنرانی کا بہت سی زبان شناسایا کرتا ہے (HatEval)'. ہم نے دو نفرت بات شناسایی موڈل متفاوتوں کو Tw-StAR فرم کے ذریعہ پیدا کیا۔ جبکہ پہلی موڈل نے ایک-گرم اکنوڈینگ انگرام کو NB کلاسیر کی ترین کرنے کے لئے پکڑا تھا، دوسرا پیدا کیا اور سیکھا گیا ن-گرم نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک کے اندر. ان دونوں نمڈلوں کے لئے، مخصوص ترمیم، MWT پٹرونٹوں کے ذریعے انتخاب کئے گئے، ان کے اندر اندازے میں ٹاگ کئے گئے۔ ہم ایک گرم n گرم کے مقابلہ میں n-گرم انڈینگ کے قابل تحقیق کر سکتے ہیں. ہمارے نتیجے دکھائے گئے کہ انگلیسی میں ایک گرم انڈینگ کے ساتھ ایک گرم انگرام سے کام نہیں لیتے۔ لیکن اسپانیایی ٹیوٹوں کی نمایش ایک گرم n گرم کے ذریعہ ایک کم اچھی فعالیت پیدا ہوئی تھوڑا اچھی فعالیت ان گرم انڈینگ کے مقابلہ میں۔ رسمی رینڈنگ نے دکھایا کہ Tw-StAR انگلیسی اور 20 اسپانیایی کے لئے ۹م رینڈ تھا.", 'uz': "Bu takarda biz SemEval-2019-yilda qandaydigan qanday qilamiz: Twitterda muhandirlar va ayollar (HatEval) bilan bir necha tilni ko'plab o'zgartirish vazifasi. Biz Tw-StAR freymi orqali ikkita yomon so'zni aniqlash modelini yaratdik. Birinchi modeli NB klassifchisini o'rganish uchun bitta issiq kodlash usullarini ishlatilgan paytda, ikkinchi modeli o'rganish va o'rganishni bir necha kodlash tarmoqda. @ info: whatsthis Ikkita tashkilotlar bilan ishlaydigan, biz bir g'amning g'oyalarning qobiliyatini qidirish mumkin. Bizning natijalarimiz ingliz tilida, n-gram embedlari bir issiq g'oyalarni bajaradi. Lekin, Ispancha Twitterlarini bir issiq n-gram tomonidan tashkilotga ega bo'lgan narsa bu g'amlarga o'xshash narsa beradi. The official ranking indicated that Tw-StAR ranked 9th for English and 20th for Spanish.", 'vi': 'Trong bài viết này, chúng tôi mô tả đóng góp của chúng tôi ở Semkhai-209: Việc A của nhiệm vụ 5 "Phát hiện ngôn ngữ đa ngôn ngữ thù ghét đối với người nhập cư và phụ nữ trên Twitter (HatEvol). Chúng tôi phát triển hai biến thể phát hiện tiếng nói ghét qua cấu trúc Twa-Sstar. Trong khi mẫu thứ nhất chọn những dẫ n óng để đào tạo một mã số N.B, thứ hai được tạo ra và học được sự nhúng tay vào một mạng lưới thần kinh cung cấp. Đối với cả hai mẫu, các chữ đặc biệt, được chọn bằng các mẫu MWT, đã được đánh dấu vào dữ liệu nhập. Với hai tính n ăng được sử dụng, chúng ta có thể điều tra khả năng cấy ghép n-gram cho đối thủ ngang với một hot n-grams. Kết quả cho thấy bằng tiếng Anh, cấy ghép n-gram đã thành những engrams n óng hổi. Tuy nhiên, đại diện cho những dòng tweet của tiếng Tây Ban Nha đã có hiệu quả tốt hơn so với clip đăng nhập N-gram. Vị trí chính thức cho thấy Twa-Sstar đứng đầu tiên cho tiếng Anh và số đôi của tiếng Tây Ban Nha.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия описваме нашия принос в Подзадача А на задача 5 "Многоезично откриване на речта на омразата срещу имигранти и жени в Туитър (Многоезично откриване на речта на омразата срещу имигранти и жени в Туитър". Разработихме два варианта на модела за откриване на омраза чрез рамката. Докато първият модел приема еднократни кодиращи нграми за обучение на класификатор на НБ, вторият генерира и научава вграждания на n-грама в невронна мрежа. И за двата модела в входните данни са маркирани специфични термини, избрани чрез моделите на MWT. С два типа функции, можем да проучим способността на вграждането на n-грама да съперничат на един горещ н-грам. Резултатите ни показаха, че на английски език вгражданията на n-грама надминават еднократните нграми. Въпреки това, представянето на испански туитове с един горещ н-грам дава малко по-добра производителност в сравнение с тази на вгражданията н-грам. Официалното класиране показа, че се класира 9-то място за английски и 20-то за испански.', 'da': "I denne artikel beskriver vi vores bidrag i SemEval-2019: underopgave A af opgave 5 'Flersproget detektion af hadefulde tale mod indvandrere og kvinder i Twitter (HatEval)'. Vi udviklede to modelvarianter til hadefuld tale gennem Tw-StAR framework. Mens den første model vedtog one-hot kodning ngrams til at træne en NB klassificering, den anden genererede og lærte n-gram indlejringer i et feed-forward neuralt netværk. For begge modeller blev specifikke termer, valgt via MWT-mønstre, mærket i inputdataene. Med to funktionstyper anvendt, kunne vi undersøge evnen af n-gram indlejringer til at konkurrere en-hot n-gram. Vores resultater viste, at på engelsk, n-gram indlejringer bedre end one-hot ngrams. Men at repræsentere spanske tweets med et-hot n-gram gav en lidt bedre ydeevne sammenlignet med n-gram indlejringer. Den officielle placering viste, at Tw-StAR rangerede 9. for engelsk og 20. for spansk.", 'nl': "In dit artikel beschrijven we onze bijdrage in SemEval-2019: subtaak A van taak 5 'Meertalige detectie van haatspraak tegen immigranten en vrouwen in Twitter (HatEval)'. We ontwikkelden twee modellen voor haatspraakdetectie via Tw-StAR framework. Terwijl het eerste model één-hot codering ngrams aannam om een NB classificator te trainen, genereerde en leerde het tweede n-gram embeddings binnen een feedforward neuraal netwerk. Voor beide modellen werden specifieke termen, geselecteerd via MWT patronen, getagged in de invoergegevens. Met twee functietypen konden we onderzoeken of n-gram embeddings in staat zijn om één-hete n-gram te concurreren. Onze resultaten toonden aan dat in het Engels n-gram embeddings beter presteerden dan one-hot ngrams. Het vertegenwoordigen van Spaanse tweets met één-hete n-gram leverde echter een iets betere prestatie op dan die van n-gram embeddings. De officiële ranking gaf aan dat Tw-StAR negende werd voor Engels en 20ste voor Spaans.", 'ko': "본고에서 우리가SemEval-2019에 기여한 바를 묘사했다. 임무 5는'다국어 검측 트위터에서 이민과 여성을 대상으로 하는 증오언론(HatEval)'의 하위 임무 A이다.우리는 Tw StAR 프레임워크를 통해 두 개의 증오 음성 감지 모델 변형을 개발했다.첫 번째 모델은 열 인코딩ngrams를 이용하여 NB분류기를 훈련하고 두 번째 모델은 피드백 신경 네트워크에서 n-gram 삽입을 생성하고 학습한다.두 모델의 경우 MWT 모드에서 선택한 특정 용어가 입력 데이터에 표시됩니다.두 가지 특징 유형을 사용하면 우리는 n-gram이 하나의 열 n-gram과 상반되는 능력을 연구할 수 있다.우리의 결과는 영어에서 n-gram이 열ngram보다 잘 박혀 있다는 것을 나타낸다.그러나 n-gram 삽입에 비해 인기 있는 n-gram으로 스페인 추문의 성능이 약간 좋다는 것을 나타낸다.공식 순위에 따르면 Tw StAR 영어는 9위, 스페인어는 20위를 기록했다.", 'hr': "U ovom papiru opisujemo svoj doprinos u semiEval-2019: podpitanje A zadatka 5 'Multilingual Detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (HatEval)'. Razvili smo dva modela otkrivanja govora mržnje kroz okvir Tw-StAR. Dok je prvi model usvojio jednovruće kodiranje ngrame za obuku klasifikatora NB, drugi je proizveden i naučio integraciju n-gram a unutar neuralne mreže. Za obje modele, specifični termini, odabrani putem MWT obrazaca, bili su označeni u ulaznim podacima. S dvije osobne vrste zaposlene, mogli bismo istražiti sposobnost uključenja n-grama protiv jedne vruće n-grame. Naši rezultati su pokazali da na engleskom, n-gram ugrađenja iznosi jednu vruću ngramu. Međutim, predstavljanje španjolskih tweeta jednim vrućim n-gramima donosilo je malo bolje učinkovito u usporedbi s ugrađenjem n-gram a. Zvanični poziv ukazuje na to da je Tw-StAR 9. za engleski i 20. za španjolski.", 'de': "In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir unseren Beitrag in SemEval-2019: Subtask A der Aufgabe 5 'Mehrsprachige Erkennung von Hassreden gegen Immigranten und Frauen in Twitter (HatEval)'. Wir haben zwei Modellvarianten zur Hassrede-Erkennung mittels Tw-StAR Framework entwickelt. Während das erste Modell One-Hot Encoding ngramme zum Trainieren eines NB Klassifikators verwendete, generierte und lernte das zweite n-Gramm Einbettungen in einem feedforward neuronalen Netzwerk. Für beide Modelle wurden spezifische Begriffe, die über MWT-Muster ausgewählt wurden, in den Eingabedaten markiert. Mit zwei verwendeten Merkmalstypen konnten wir die Fähigkeit von n-Gramm Einbettungen untersuchen, mit einem heißen n-Gramm zu konkurrieren. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigten, dass die Einbettungen von n-Gramm im Englischen One-Hot-ngrams übertrafen. Die Darstellung spanischer Tweets durch ein heißes N-Gramm ergab jedoch eine etwas bessere Leistung im Vergleich zu n-Gramm Einbettungen. Das offizielle Ranking ergab, dass Tw-StAR neun für Englisch und 20th für Spanisch belegte.", 'sw': "Katika karatasi hii, tunaelezea mchango wetu katika SemEval-2019: Ujumbe wa kazi 5 'Kugundua hotuba ya chuki dhidi ya wahamiaji na wanawake kwenye mtandao wa Twita (HatEval)'. Tumeunda muundo wa kutambua hotuba mbili za chuki kupitia mfumo wa Tw-StAR. Wakati modeli ya kwanza ilichukua viungo vya kodi moja kwa moja ili kuwafundisha mwandishi wa chama cha NB, kipindi cha pili kilizaliwa n a kujifunza matumizi ya gram ndani ya mtandao wa neura unaoendelea. Kwa mifano yote, vipengele maalum, vilichaguliwa kupitia miundo mbinu ya MWT, waliwekwa alama katika taarifa za input. Kwa aina mbili zilizotumika, tunaweza kuchunguza uwezo wa kuingia kwenye vifaa vya vifaa vya vifaa vinavyopinga vifaa vinavyojitokeza. Our results showed that in English, n-gram embeddings outperformed one-hot ngrams.  Hata hivyo, wakiwakilisha twiti za Kihispania n a gram moja yenye moto ilileta maonyesho bora zaidi kuliko ilivyolinganishwa na matukio ya gram. Matukio ya rasmi yalionyesha kuwa Tw-StAR imekuwa na rangi ya 9 kwa ajili ya Kiingereza na 20 kwa ajili ya Kihispania.", 'tr': "Bu kagyzda, biz SemEval-2019-njy tarapynda öz goşuşymyzy bardyk: subtask A of task 5 'Multilingual Detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (HatEval)'. Biz 2 iň ýigrenýän çykyş tanyş nusgasyny Tw-StAR çerýädä üýtgedik. Ilkinji nusga NB klasifikatyny öwrenmek üçin bir yst kodleme ngramlary kabul etdi. Ikinji nusga döredildi we öwrendirildi n-gramlary feer netijesinde. MWT nusgalary bilen saýlanan iki nusga üçin, belli terjime üçin, girdi maglumaty içine etildi. Iki özellik hili işe yaranan hiller bilen, we gramlaryň 1-hot n-gramlaryň döwürmegi barlap bilerdik. Biziň netijelerimiz iňlisçe,n-gramlaryň içine bir-ýüz ýokary çekilýändigini görkezilýär. Ýöne, yssy n-gramlaryň arasyndaky espaňol tweetlerini üýtgetmek üçin bir az gowy ukyp bardy. Resmi satyrlamak üçin Tw-StAR Iňlisçe we 20-nji satyrlamak üçin 9-nji satyrlamagyny görkezildi.", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما توصیف کرده\u200cایم که توسط نیمه\u200cای-۲۰۱۹: پایین\u200cپرس A از کار ۵ «شناسایی زیادی زبان\u200cهای سخنرانی ناخوشایند علیه مهاجرین و زنان توئیتر (HatEval)». ما دو مدل شناسایی سخنرانی متنفر را از طریق چهارچوب Tw StAR توسعه دادیم. در حالی که اولین مدل یک رمز رمز کردن گرم برای آموزش کردن یک راهنمایی NB پذیرفت، دومین ساخته و یاد گرفته شده است که n-گرم در یک شبکه عصبی به سمت feeds forward. برای هر دو مدل، شرایط خاص، انتخاب از طریق الگوهای MWT، در داده\u200cهای ورودی نشان داده شده\u200cاند. با دو نوع خصوصی استخدام می\u200cکنیم، می\u200cتوانیم توانایی وارد کردن n-گرم برای رقابت یک n-گرم داغ تحقیق کنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان داده\u200cاند که در انگلیسی، انگلیسی\u200cها، انگلیسی\u200cهای n-گرم\u200cها بیشتر از یک انگلیسی گرم\u200cها انجام داده\u200cاند. با این حال، نمایش توئیت اسپانیایی با یک n گرم داغ، یک عملکرد کمی بهتر در مقایسه با انبوه\u200cهای n گرم به وجود آورد. صفحه رسمی نشان داد که Tw-StAR برای انگلیسی و بیست صفحه اسپانیایی است.', 'id': "In this paper, we describe our contribution in SemEval-2019: subtask A of task 5 'Multilingual detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (HatEval)'.  Kami mengembangkan dua varian model deteksi pidato kebencian melalui bingkai Tw-StAR. Sementara model pertama mengadopsi satu-hot encoding ngrams untuk melatih klasifikasi NB, kedua yang dihasilkan dan belajar n-gram embedding dalam jaringan saraf feedforward. Untuk kedua model, istilah spesifik, dipilih melalui pola MWT, ditanda dalam data input. With two feature types employed, we could investigate the ability of n-gram embeddings to rival one-hot n-grams.  Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa dalam bahasa Inggris, n-gram embedding melebihi satu-hot ngrams. Namun, mewakili tweet Spanyol dengan satu n-gram panas memberikan prestasi yang sedikit lebih baik dibandingkan dengan penerbangan n-gram. Rangkaian resmi menunjukkan bahwa Tw-StAR kedudukan ke-9 untuk bahasa Inggris dan ke-20 untuk bahasa Spanyol.", 'sq': "Në këtë letër, ne përshkruajmë kontributin tonë në SemEval-2019: nënpyetje A e detyrës 5 'Zbulimi shumëgjuhësor i fjalimit të urrejtjes kundër emigrantëve dhe grave në Twitter (HatEval)'. Kemi zhvilluar dy variante modeli për zbulimin e fjalimit të urrejtjes nëpërmjet kuadrit Tw-StAR. Ndërsa modeli i parë miratoi ngrams një-hot kodimi për të trajnuar një klasifikues NB, i dyti gjeneroi dhe mësoi n-gram përfshirje brenda një rrjeti nervor feedback. Për të dy modelet, termat specifike, të zgjedhur nëpërmjet modeleve MWT, u shënuan në të dhënat e hyrjes. Me dy lloje karakteristike të punësuara, ne mund të hetojmë aftësinë e përfshirjeve n-gram për të rivalizuar një-hot n-gram. Rezultatet tona treguan se n ë anglisht, n-gram përfshirjet më tepër se një ngram të nxehtë. Megjithatë, përfaqësimi i tweeteve spanjolle me një n-gram të nxehtë dha një performancë pak më të mirë krahasuar me atë të përfshirjeve n-gram. The official ranking indicated that Tw-StAR ranked 9th for English and 20th for Spanish.", 'am': 'በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የሴምEval-2019 ድጋሜያችንን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በTw-StAR ፍሬም ውስጥ ሁለት የጥላቻን ንግግር ማግኘት ሞዴል አካሄድን፡፡ የመጀመሪያው ሞዴል የNB ክፍተኛውን ለማስተማር አንዲት ሐሙር የኮድ መስኮት አውራዎች በተወሰደ ጊዜ፣ ሁለተኛው ትውልድ እና የ-ግራም ክፍተቶችን በመጠቀም በጸጥተኛ መረብ ውስጥ ተማረ፡፡ For both models, specific terms, selected via MWT patterns, were tagged in the input data.  With two feature types employed, we could investigate the ability of n-gram embeddings to rival one-hot n-grams.  ፍሬዎቻችን በንግግሊዝኛ፣ የ-ግራም ውጤቶች አንዲት ትኩሳት ግንቦችን ያሳየዋል፡፡ ነገር ግን የስፓኒሽ ትዊተቶችን በአንድ ትኩሳት በ-ግራም በሚያሳየው ከ-ግራም አካባቢዎች የተደረገውን ትንሽ የበለጠ የድምፅ ውጤት አቀረበ፡፡ ባለሥልጣኑ ማዘጋጀት የTw-StAR ዘጠኝኛው ለኢንጂልኛ እና 20ኛ ለስፓኒሽ መስመር እንዳደረገ አስታውቆታል፡፡', 'af': 'In hierdie papier, beskrywe ons bydraag in SemEval-2019: subtask A van taak 5 "Multilingual opdecking van haatspraak teen imigrante en vroue in Twitter (HatEval)". Ons het twee haat spraak beskikbaar model variante ontwikkel deur Tw- StAR raamwerk. Terwyl die eerste model een- hot enkodering ngrame aangeneem het om \'n NB klassifiseerder te trein, die tweede genereer en leer n- gram inbêdings binne \'n voerde neuralnetwerk. For both models, specific terms, selected via MWT patterns, were tagged in the input data. Name Met twee funksie tipes wat gebruik is, kan ons die moontlikheid van n-gram inbêding ondersoek om een-hot n-grame te rival. Ons resultate het vertoon dat in Engels, n-gram inbettings uitgevoer het een-warm ngrame. Maar die verteenwoordigheid van Spaanse tweets deur een-hot n-grame het \'n bietjie beter uitvoering gegee in vergelyking met die n-gram inbettings. Die offisiele rangering het aandui dat Tw-StAR 9de rang vir Engels en 20 vir Spaanse.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায় আমরা সেমইভাল-২০১৯-এ আমাদের অংশগ্রহণ বর্ণনা করি: টুইটারে অভিবাসী এবং নারীদের বিরুদ্ধে ঘৃণার বিরুদ্ধে মাল্টিভাষা বাক্যের বি টুইট-স্টার ফ্রেমের মাধ্যমে আমরা দুটি ঘৃণা বক্তৃতা আবিষ্কার মডেল বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন যখন প্রথম মডেল একটি এনবি ক্লাসিফারের প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য এক গরম এনকোডিংগ্রাম গ্রহণ করেছিল, তখন দ্বিতীয় মডেল তৈরি করেছিল এবং শিখেছিলেন ফিফারওয়ার্ উভয় মডেলের জন্য MWT প্যাটারের মাধ্যমে নির্বাচিত মোডেলের জন্য ইনপুটের তথ্যে ট্যাগ করা হয়েছে। দুই বিশেষ ধরনের ব্যবহার কর্মীদের সাথে আমরা এক গরম n-গ্রামের প্রতিদ্বন্দ্বিতার ক্ষমতার তদন্ত করতে পারি। আমাদের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে ইংরেজি ভাষায় এন-গ্রাম বিভিন্ন এক গরম গ্রামের বাইরে প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে। However, representing Spanish tweets by one-hot n-grams yielded a slightly better performance compared to that of n-gram embeddings.  অফিসিয়াল র\u200d্যাঙ্কিং নির্দেশ দিয়েছে যে টুইট-স্টার ইংরেজী এবং ২০ থেকে স্প্যানিশের জন্য ৯ টার রান্ন', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նկարագրում ենք մեր ներդրումը ՍեմԵվալ-2019 թվականին. 5-ի «Հատելության խոսքի բազմալեզու հայտնաբերումը միգրանտների և կանանց դեմ Թվիթերում (Հաթեվալ)» խնդրի A-ը: Մենք զարգացրեցինք երկու մոդել ատելության խոսքի հայտնաբերման միջոցով Tw-Star շրջանակի միջոցով: Մինչդեռ առաջին մոդելը ընդունեց մեկ տաք կոդավորման համակարգեր ՆԲ դասակարգիչը վարժեցնելու համար, երկրորդը ստեղծեց և սովորեց n-գրամ ներդրումներ արտաքին նյարդային ցանցի մեջ: Երկու մոդելների համար MW-ի կաղապարների միջոցով ընտրված որոշակի տերմինները նշված էին մուտքագրման տվյալներում: Երկու հատկանիշ տեսակի օգտագործման դեպքում մենք կարող ենք հետազոտել n-գրամ ներդրման ունակությունը մրցակցելու մեկ տաք n-գրամը: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց տվեցին, որ անգլերենում n-գրամ ներգրավումները գերազանցեցին մեկ տաք նգլեր: However, representing Spanish tweets by one-hot n-grams yielded a slightly better performance compared to that of n-gram embeddings.  Ապաշտոնական դասակարգը ցույց տվեց, որ Tw-Stear-ը իննգ դասակարգված է անգլերենի համար, իսկ 20-ը՝ իսպաներենի համար:', 'bs': "U ovom papiru opisujemo svoj doprinos u semiEvalu-2019: podpitanje A od zadatka 5 'Multilingual Detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (HatEval)'. Razvili smo dva modela otkrivanja govora mržnje kroz okvir Tw-StAR. Dok je prvi model usvojio jedno vruće kodiranje ngrame za obuku klasifikatora NB, drugi je proizveden i naučio integraciju n-gram a unutar neuralne mreže. Za obje modele, specifični termini, odabrani putem MWT obrazaca, bili su označeni u podacima o ulazu. Sa dva vrsta zaposlenog, mogli bismo istražiti sposobnost integracije n-grama protiv jedne vruće n-grame. Naši rezultati su pokazali da na engleskom, n-gramskom integraciji nisu izvršili jednu vruću ngramu. Međutim, predstavljanje španjolskih tweeta jednim vrućim n-gramima donosilo je malo bolje učinkovito u usporedbi s ugrađenjem n-gram a. Zvanični redovi ukazuju na to da je Tw-StAR 9. redovito za engleski i 20. za španjolski.", 'az': 'Bu kağıtda, biz semiEval-2019-də qismətimizi təsdiq edirik: 5-ci task A\'nin "İncillərə və qadınlara qarşı nifrət sözlərinin çoxlu dil keşfetməsini Twitter\'da (HatEval) aparmaq üçün "A\'nin çoxlu təsdiqlənməsini" təsdiqləyirik. Biz Tw-StAR framework ü vasitəsilə iki nifrət sözlərini keşfetmə modeli dəyişikliklərini təhsil etdik. İlk modeli NB klasifikatın ı təhsil etmək üçün bir isti kodlama ngramlarını qəbul etdikdə, ikinci nB klasifikatı təhsil etdi və öyrəndi n-gram inbinglərini feed üçün nöral a ğ içində təhsil etdi. İki modellər üçün, MWT modelləri vasitəsilə seçilmiş müəyyən şəkillər üçün, girdi məlumatlarında etiket edildi. İki fərqli n övlər istifadə edilmiş, n-gram inbadinglərinin bir n-gram müqabiliyyətini incidib edə bilərik. Sonuçlarımız İngilizce dilində n-gram in şalları bir ngramdan daha istidir. Ancaq İspanyolca tweetləri bir-sıcak n-gram ilə göstərmək n-gram inbinglərinin qarşısında biraz daha yaxşı performans yaratdı. Resmi səviyyədə Tw-StAR İngilizce və 20-ci İspanyolca səviyyədə 9-ci səviyyədə olduğunu göstərdi.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldame oma panust teemas SemEval-2019: ülesande 5 "Sisserändajate ja naiste vihakõne mitmekeelne avastamine Twitteris (HatEval)". Töötasime välja kaks vihakõne tuvastamise mudeli varianti Tw-StAR raamistiku kaudu. Kui esimene mudel võttis NB klassifikaatori koolitamiseks kasutusele ühe kuuma kodeerimise ngrammid, siis teine genereeris ja õppis n-grammi manustamist edasises neurovõrgus. Mõlema mudeli puhul märgiti sisendandmetesse spetsiifilised terminid, mis valiti MWT mustrite kaudu. Kasutades kahte funktsioonitüüpi, võiksime uurida n-grammi manustamise võimet konkureerida ühe kuuma n-grammi. Meie tulemused näitasid, et inglise keeles ületas n-grammi manustamine ühe kuuma ngrammi. Hispaania säutsude esitamine ühe kuuma n-grammi abil andis siiski veidi parema jõudluse võrreldes n-grammi manustamisega. Ametlik edetabel näitas, et Tw-StAR oli inglise keeles 9. ja hispaania keeles 20. kohal.', 'ca': "En aquest paper, descrivim la nostra contribució a SemEval-2019: subtanya A de la tasca 5 'Detecció multilingüe de discurs d'odi contra immigrants i dones a Twitter (HatEval)'. Vam desenvolupar dues variants del model de detecció del discurs d'odi a través del marc Tw-StAR. Mentre que el primer model va adoptar ngrams de codificació única per formar un classificador NB, el segon va generar i aprendre incorporacions n-gram dins una xarxa neuronal feedback. Per ambdós models, termes específics, seleccionats a través de patrons MWT, estaven etiquetats en les dades d'entrada. Amb dos tipus de característiques empleats, podríem investigar l'habilitat d'incorporacions n-gram a competir amb n-grams d'un calor. Els nostres resultats van demostrar que en anglès, l'incorporació n-gram va superar els ngrams d'una sola calor. Tanmateix, representar els tweets espanyols per un n-gram calient va produir un rendiment una mica millor en comparació amb el d'incorporacions en n-gram. La classificació oficial indicava que Tw-StAR es va classificar en nou per anglès i en vint per espanyol.", 'cs': "V tomto článku popisujeme náš příspěvek v SemEval-2019: podúkol A úkolu 5 'Vícejazyčná detekce nenávistné řeči proti imigrantům a ženám na Twitteru (HatEval)'. Vyvinuli jsme dvě varianty modelu detekce nenávistné řeči prostřednictvím frameworku Tw-StAR. Zatímco první model přijal jednoho horkého kódování ngramů pro trénink NB klasifikátoru, druhý generoval a naučil se n-gramové vložení do zpětné neuronové sítě. U obou modelů byly ve vstupních datech označeny konkrétní termíny vybrané pomocí MWT vzorů. S použitím dvou typů funkcí bychom mohli zkoumat schopnost vložení n-gramů konkurovat s jedním horkým n-gramem. Naše výsledky ukázaly, že v angličtině vkládání n-gramů předčilo jednoho horkého ngramu. Nicméně reprezentace španělských tweetů jedním horkým n-gramem přinesla o něco lepší výkon ve srovnání s n-gramovými vloženími. Oficiální hodnocení naznačuje, že Tw-StAR místo devátého pro angličtinu a dvacátého pro španělštinu.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvailemme osuuttamme SemEval-2019: alatehtävä A tehtävän 5 "Monikielinen vihapuheen havaitseminen maahanmuuttajia ja naisia vastaan Twitterissä (HatEval)". Kehitimme kaksi vihapuheentunnistusmallivarianttia Tw-StAR-kehyksen kautta. Ensimmäisessä mallissa otettiin käyttöön yhden kuuman koodausngrammit NB-luokituksen kouluttamiseksi, kun taas toisessa mallissa luotiin ja opittiin n-gram-upotuksia syöttöhermoverkossa. Molempien mallien kohdalla syötetietoon merkittiin MWT-mallien kautta valitut termit. Kahdella ominaisuustyypillä voitiin tutkia n-gramman upotusten kykyä kilpailla yhden kuuman n-gramman kanssa. Tuloksemme osoittivat, että englanniksi n-gramman upotukset ylittivät yhden kuuman ngrammin. Espanjalaisten twiittien esittäminen yhden kuuman n-gramman avulla tuotti kuitenkin hieman paremman suorituskyvyn kuin n-gramman upotusten. Virallinen sijoitus osoitti, että Tw-StAR sijoittui yhdeksänneksi englanniksi ja 20. espanjaksi.', 'jv': "Nang pentungé iki, kéné raké tanggal nggawe nang semebal-2011: hak-haké A mengko task 5 'Multilanguage detection of maling awak dhéwé kuwi tindakan karo perusahaan karo muladhi sing nyelarane gambar nglanggar-uwong i nyelarane ning Monday Genjer model perusahaan dumateng kota-hot TODO Ddialog Rejalaké awak dhéwé ngomong nik nggambar nggambar, n-gram sing menggo-ngrams sing uwis barang. Ngubah, tho nglanggar Spanish kuwi nggambar 1-hot n-gram kuwi nyimpen ngerasah barang kelas telu nyimpen karo bingo n-gram. Awak dhéwé sing resmi dipoleh onlanggar sawetara iki-stAR awak dhéwé basa tanggal 9 kanggo inggiles lan 12 kanggo Spanish.", 'sk': 'V prispevku opisujemo naš prispevek v SemEval-2019: podnaloga A naloge 5 "Večjezično odkrivanje sovražnega govora proti priseljencem in ženskam v Twitterju (HatEval)". V okviru Tw-StAR smo razvili dve različici modela za odkrivanje sovražnega govora. Medtem ko je prvi model sprejel enega vročega kodiranja ngramov za usposabljanje klasifikatorja NB, drugi je ustvaril in se naučil vgradnje n-gramov znotraj vmesnega živčnega omrežja. Za oba modela so bili v vhodnih podatkih označeni posebni izrazi, izbrani prek vzorcev MWT. Z uporabo dveh vrst funkcij smo lahko raziskali sposobnost vgradnje n-gramov, da se primerjajo z enim vročim n-gramom. Naši rezultati so pokazali, da so v angleščini vdelave n-gramov presegle enovroče ngrame. Vendar pa je predstavljanje španskih tweetov z enim vročim n-gramom prineslo nekoliko boljšo zmogljivost v primerjavi z vdelavami n-gramov. Uradna lestvica je pokazala, da se je Tw-StAR uvrstila na 9. mesto za angleščino in 20. mesto za španščino.', 'he': "בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתארים את התרומה שלנו בסמיוול-2019: תתשאל א של משימה 5 'גילוי רבות שפות של נאום שנאה נגד מהגרים ונשים בטוויטר (HatEval)'. פיתחנו שני שינויים דוגמני זיהוי נאום שנאה דרך סגרת Tw-StAR. While the first model adopted one-hot encoding ngrams to train an NB classifier, the second generated and learned n-gram embeddings within a feedforward neural network.  עבור שני הדוגמנים, תווים ספציפיים, שנבחרו באמצעות דפוסים MWT, היו מסומנים במידע הכניסה. עם שני סוגי תכונות משומשים, אנחנו יכולים לחקור את היכולת של n-גרם תוספות להתחרות n-גרם חם אחד. התוצאות שלנו הראו שבאנגלית, התקפות n-גרם עברו מערכות אחת חם. However, representing Spanish tweets by one-hot n-grams yielded a slightly better performance compared to that of n-gram embeddings.  הדרגה הרשמית הצביעה שטו-סטאר מדרגה 9 לאנגלית ו-20 לספרדית.", 'ha': 'Ga wannan takardan, Munã bayyana fassararmu a cikin SemEal-2019: Sub-aikin A\'a "Kunnufi na\'ura da hoton ƙarya a kan muhimmani da mãtã a Twitter (Hateval)". Mun buɗe misalin abun magana biyu wanda aka ƙi a cikin firam-12-StR. A lõkacin da motel n a farko ya zãɓi kodi kode-hoto ko-rams dõmin ya sanar da wani na NB-classifiser, na ƙarshen ya zaɓi kuma ya sanar n-gram embeddinga cikin wata jerin neural. @ info: whatsthis Da wasu irin biyu na\'ura da aka yi aikin shi, za\'a iya tambayar abincin n-gram da za\'a yi taƙaita zuwa na-gram guda. MataryinMu na n ũna cewa, a cikin Ingiriya, na-gram na sami sauri guda. A lokacin da aka wakilisha n a-spanish ta hoto na n-gram, ya ga wani abu mai kyau sammenlikin da na-gram-embedded. Rankin mai rasmi ya nuna cewa, Twitter-StR ya ranki na 9 na Ingiriya da 20 na Kispanish.', 'bo': 'འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་SemEval-2019 ནང་གི་གོ་སྐབས་ང་ཚོའི་གོ་སྐབས་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་Tw-StAR གཞུང་ཐོག་ལས་ཉེན་བརྗོད་བྱ་ཚིག་རྟོགས་པའི་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱས། While the first model adopted one-hot encoding ngrams to train a n NB classifier, the second generated and learned n-gram embeddings in a feedforward neural network. For both models, specific terms, selected via MWT patterns, were tagged in the input data. With two feature types employed, we could investigate the ability of n-gram embeddings to rival one-hot n-grams. ང་ཚོའི་མཐོང་འབྲས་མངོན་གསལ་བྱུང་བའི་ཨིན་ཇིའི་ནང་དུ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ་ལས་ཕན་ཚུན་ཐུབ་སྐྱེས་བ་རེད། འོན་ཀྱང་། སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་གཅིག་ལས་དྲགས་པའི་n-gram རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་ལས་ཉུང་བའི་སྐྱེས་སྐར་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གཞུང་འབྲེལ་གྱི་སྐོར་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་གྲངས་ཀྱིས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་དང་སྒེར་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་༢༠་ཅན་རེད།'}
{'en': 'UA at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Setting A Strong Linear Baseline for Hate Speech Detection', 'ar': 'UA في SemEval-2019 المهمة 5: إعداد خط أساس قوي لاكتشاف الكلام الذي يحض على الكراهية', 'es': 'UA en la Tarea 5 de SemEval-2019: Establecer una base de referencia lineal sólida para la detección del discurso de odio', 'fr': 'UA au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 5\xa0: Établir une base linéaire solide pour la détection des discours haineux', 'pt': 'UA na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 5: Definir uma linha de base linear forte para detecção de discurso de ódio', 'ja': 'UA at SemEval -2019 Task 5:ヘイトスピーチ検出のための強力な線形ベースラインの設定', 'zh': 'UA在SemEval-2019务5:仇言检设强线性基线', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 5 पर यूए: हेट स्पीच डिटेक्शन के लिए एक मजबूत रैखिक बेसलाइन सेट करना', 'ru': 'UA на SemEval-2019 Задача 5: Установка сильной линейной базовой линии для обнаружения ненавистнической речи', 'ga': 'UA ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 5: Bunlíne Láidir Líneach a Shocrú le hAghaidh Bhrath Fuath Urlabhra', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'UA a SemEval-2019 5. feladat: Erős lineáris alapvető vonal beállítása a gyűlölet beszédérzékeléséhez', 'el': 'Καθήκον 5: Καθορισμός μιας ισχυρής γραμμικής βάσης για την ανίχνευση ομιλίας μίσους', 'lt': '5 užduotis: nustatyti tvirtą linijinę bazę neapykantos kalbos aptikimui', 'kk': 'UA жалғыз- 2019 тапсырмасының 5- тапсырмасы: Жұмыс сөздерді анықтау үшін күшті сызық негізгі сызықты орнату', 'it': "UA a SemEval-2019 Task 5: Impostare una linea di base lineare forte per il rilevamento del discorso d'odio", 'mk': 'UA at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Setting A Strong Linear Baseline for Hate Speech Detection', 'ms': 'UA pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Mentetapkan Garis Asas Linear Kuat untuk Pengesanan Ucapan Kebencian', 'no': 'UA på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 5: Sett ein sterk linjerbaseline for å finna hatspråk', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 5- ലെ യുഎ: വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരം ഡിറ്റീഷന്\u200d', 'mn': 'UA at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Setting a Strong Linear Baseline for Hate Speech Detection', 'sr': 'UA na semiEval-2019 Task 5: Postavljanje snažne linijske osnovne linije za otkrivanje govora mržnje', 'ro': 'UA la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 5: Stabilirea unei linii de referință puternice pentru detectarea vorbirii de ură', 'si': 'UA at HalfEvel-2019 Job 5: Seting a Strength Linear baseline for Hate Talk Detection', 'mt': 'UA f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 5: L-istabbiliment ta’ Linja Bażi Lineari b’saħħitha għad-Detezzjoni ta’ Speech ta’ Mibegħda', 'so': 'UA at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Setting A Strong Linear Baseline for Hate Speech Detection', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 5: வெறுப்பு பேச்சு கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான ஒரு வலிமை கோடு அடிப்படையை அமைக்கிறது', 'pl': 'UA na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 5: Ustanowienie silnej liniowej liniowej liniowej linii wykrywania mowy nienawiści', 'sv': 'UA på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 5: Ställa in en stark linjär baslinje för detektering av hattal', 'ur': 'UA at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Setting a Strong Linear Baseline for Hate Speech Detection', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifani 5: Hat Speech Detection uchun Strong Line Baseline', 'vi': 'Phát hiện kênh UA tại SemEvl-209 Task 5: Contact pinning', 'bg': 'Задача 5: Задаване на силна линейна базова линия за откриване на речта на омразата', 'nl': 'UA op SemEval-2019 Taak 5: Het instellen van een sterke lineaire basislijn voor haatspraakdetectie', 'da': 'UA på SemEval-2019 Opgave 5: Indstilling af en stærk lineær basislinje til detektering af had tale', 'hr': 'UA na semiEval-2019 zadatku 5: Postavljanje snažne linijske početne linije za otkrivanje govora mržnje', 'de': 'UA auf der SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 5: Festlegung einer starken linearen Basis für Hassredenerkennung', 'id': 'UA di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Menetapkan garis dasar linear yang kuat untuk Deteksi Bicara Kebencian', 'ko': 'UA의 SemEval-2019에서의 퀘스트 5: 원한 음성 검출을 위한 강선형 기선 설정', 'sw': 'UA kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 5: Kuweka msingi wa simu yenye nguvu kwa ajili ya Kugundua Hotuba ya Hati', 'tr': 'UA at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Set A Strong Linear Baseline for Hate Speech Detection', 'sq': 'UA në SemEval-2019 Task 5: vendosja e një linje bazë të fortë lineare për zbulimin e fjalimit të urrejtjes', 'fa': 'UA در پایین اول-۲۰۱۹ کار ۵: تنظیم یک خط بنیادی قوی برای شناسایی سخنرانی دشمنی', 'af': "UA by SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 5: Opstelling 'n Strong Linear Basislien vir Hate Speech Deteksie", 'hy': 'UA-ը՝ 2019 թվականի կիսագնդի 5. հանձնարարությունը. ատելության խոսքի հայտնաբերման ուժեղ գծային հիմքի սահմանումը', 'az': 'UA at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Set up a Strong Linear Baseline for Hate Speech Detection', 'ca': "UA a SemEval-2019 tasca 5: Establecer una línia de base linear forta per la detecció del discurs d'odi", 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'bn': 'UA at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Setting A Strong Linear Baseline for Hate Speech Detection', 'fi': 'UA SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 5: Vahvan lineaarisen lähtökohdan asettaminen vihapuheen havaitsemiselle', 'bs': 'UA na semiEval-2019 zadatku 5: Postavljanje snažne linijske početne linije za otkrivanje govora mržnje', 'cs': 'Úkol 5: Nastavení silné lineární základny pro detekci nenávistné řeči', 'et': 'UA SemEval-2019 ülesanne 5: tugeva lineaarse lähtejoone seadmine vihkamise kõne tuvastamiseks', 'jv': 'Name', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'he': 'UA ב SemEval-2019 משימה 5: להקים קו בסיסי קוני חזק לגילוי נאום שנאה', 'sk': 'UA na SemEval-2019 Naloga 5: Nastavitev močne linearne osnovne linije za zaznavanje sovražnega govora', 'bo': 'UA at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Setting A Strong Linear Baseline for Hate Speech Detection'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the system developed at the University of Alicante (UA) for the SemEval 2019 Task 5 : Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate. The purpose of this work is to build a strong baseline for hate speech detection, using a traditional machine learning approach with standard textual features, which could serve in a near future as a reference to compare with deep learning systems. We participated in both task A (Hate Speech Detection against Immigrants and Women) and task B (Aggressive behavior and Target Classification). Despite its simplicity, our system obtained a remarkable F1-score of 72.5 (sixth highest) and an accuracy of 73.6 (second highest) in Spanish (task A), outperforming more complex neural models from a total of 40 participant systems.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة النظام الذي تم تطويره في جامعة أليكانتي (UA) لمهمة SemEval 2019 5: المهمة المشتركة حول الكشف متعدد اللغات عن الكراهية. الغرض من هذا العمل هو بناء أساس قوي للكشف عن الكلام الذي يحض على الكراهية ، باستخدام نهج التعلم الآلي التقليدي مع الميزات النصية القياسية ، والتي يمكن أن تعمل في المستقبل القريب كمرجع للمقارنة مع أنظمة التعلم العميق. شاركنا في كل من المهمة أ (الكشف عن كلام الكراهية ضد المهاجرين والنساء) والمهمة ب (السلوك العدواني والتصنيف المستهدف). على الرغم من بساطته ، حصل نظامنا على درجة F1 رائعة تبلغ 72.5 (سادس أعلى) ودقة 73.6 (ثاني أعلى) باللغة الإسبانية (المهمة أ) ، متفوقًا على النماذج العصبية الأكثر تعقيدًا من إجمالي 40 نظامًا مشاركًا.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve o sistema desenvolvido na Universidade de Alicante (UA) para a Tarefa 5 do SemEval 2019: Tarefa Compartilhada de Detecção Multilíngue de Ódio. O objetivo deste trabalho é construir uma linha de base forte para detecção de discurso de ódio, usando uma abordagem tradicional de aprendizado de máquina com recursos textuais padrão, que poderá servir em um futuro próximo como referência para comparação com sistemas de aprendizado profundo. Participamos tanto da tarefa A (Detecção de Discurso de Ódio contra Imigrantes e Mulheres) quanto da tarefa B (Comportamento Agressivo e Classificação de Alvos). Apesar de sua simplicidade, nosso sistema obteve um notável F1-score de 72,5 (sexto maior) e uma precisão de 73,6 (segundo maior) em espanhol (tarefa A), superando modelos neurais mais complexos de um total de 40 sistemas participantes.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe el sistema desarrollado en la Universidad de Alicante (UA) para la Tarea 5 de SemEval 2019: Tarea Compartida sobre Detección Multilingüe del Odio. El propósito de este trabajo es crear una base sólida para la detección del discurso de odio, utilizando un enfoque tradicional de aprendizaje automático con características textuales estándar, que podría servir en un futuro próximo como referencia para comparar con los sistemas de aprendizaje profundo. Participamos tanto en la tarea A (Detección de discurso de odio contra inmigrantes y mujeres) como en la tarea B (Comportamiento agresivo y clasificación de objetivos). A pesar de su simplicidad, nuestro sistema obtuvo una notable puntuación F1 de 72.5 (sexto más alto) y una precisión de 73.6 (segundo más alto) en español (tarea A), superando a los modelos neuronales más complejos de un total de 40 sistemas participantes.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le système développé à l'Université d'Alicante (UA) pour le SemEval 2019 Task 5\xa0: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate. Le but de ce travail est de construire une base solide pour la détection des discours haineux, en utilisant une approche traditionnelle d'apprentissage automatique avec des fonctionnalités textuelles standard, qui pourrait servir de référence dans un avenir proche pour la comparaison avec les systèmes d'apprentissage profond. Nous avons participé à la fois à la tâche A (détection du discours haineux contre les immigrants et les femmes) et à la tâche B (comportement agressif et classification des cibles). Malgré sa simplicité, notre système a obtenu un score F1 remarquable de 72,5 (sixième plus élevé) et une précision de 73,6 (deuxième plus élevé) en espagnol (tâche A), surpassant les modèles neuronaux plus complexes sur un total de 40 systèmes participants.", 'ja': '本稿では、2019年SemEval Task 5: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hateのためにアリカンテ大学（ UA ）で開発されたシステムについて説明する。この研究の目的は、標準的なテキスト機能を備えた従来の機械学習アプローチを使用して、ヘイトスピーチ検出のための強力なベースラインを構築することであり、近い将来、ディープラーニングシステムと比較するための参照として役立つ可能性がある。私たちは、タスクA （移民と女性に対するヘイトスピーチ検出）とタスクB （攻撃的行動とターゲット分類）の両方に参加しました。その単純さにもかかわらず、当社のシステムは、スペイン語（タスクA ）で72.5 （ 6番目に高い）、73.6 （ 2番目に高い）の驚異的なF 1スコアを得て、合計40の参加者システムからより複雑なニューラルモデルを上回りました。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval 2019 कार्य 5 के लिए Alicante विश्वविद्यालय (UA) में विकसित प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है: नफरत के बहुभाषी पता लगाने पर साझा कार्य। इस काम का उद्देश्य हेट स्पीच डिटेक्शन के लिए एक मजबूत आधार रेखा का निर्माण करना है, मानक पाठ्य सुविधाओं के साथ एक पारंपरिक मशीन लर्निंग दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग करके, जो निकट भविष्य में गहरी सीखने की प्रणालियों के साथ तुलना करने के लिए एक संदर्भ के रूप में काम कर सकता है। हमने दोनों कार्य ए (आप्रवासियों और महिलाओं के खिलाफ नफरत भाषण का पता लगाने) और कार्य बी (आक्रामक व्यवहार और लक्ष्य वर्गीकरण) में भाग लिया। इसकी सादगी के बावजूद, हमारे सिस्टम ने 72.5 (छठा उच्चतम) का एक उल्लेखनीय एफ 1-स्कोर और स्पेनिश (कार्य ए) में 73.6 (दूसरा उच्चतम) की सटीकता प्राप्त की, जो कुल 40 प्रतिभागी प्रणालियों से अधिक जटिल तंत्रिका मॉडल से अधिक प्रदर्शन कर रहा है।', 'zh': '本文引阿利坎特大学(UA)为SemEval 2019务5开统:仇多言检。 所以然者,用文本之旧机器学术,为仇言检建强基线,可以不久参之以深学也。 吾与于事A(移民与妇人之仇言而检)B(攻击性行与期)。 虽其简易,而西班牙语(之统A)得72.5(第六高)之F1得分,与73.6(第二高)之准确率,优于凡40参与者系统之神经。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается система, разработанная в Университете Аликанте (UA) для задачи 5 SemEval 2019: Совместная задача по многоязычному обнаружению ненависти. Целью этой работы является построение сильной основы для обнаружения ненавистнической речи, используя традиционный подход машинного обучения со стандартными текстовыми функциями, которые могут служить в ближайшем будущем в качестве отправной точки для сравнения с системами глубокого обучения. Мы участвовали как в задаче A (Обнаружение ненавистнических высказываний в отношении иммигрантов и женщин), так и в задаче B (Агрессивное поведение и Классификация целей). Несмотря на свою простоту, наша система получила поразительную оценку F1 72,5 (шестая самая высокая) и точность 73,6 (вторая самая высокая) на испанском языке (задача A), превосходя более сложные нейронные модели из в общей сложности 40 систем участников.', 'ga': "Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcóras a forbraíodh in Ollscoil Alicante (UA) le haghaidh Tasc 5 SemEval 2019: Tasc Comhroinnte ar Bhrath Ilteangach fuatha. Is é cuspóir na hoibre seo bonnlíne láidir a thógáil do bhrath fuathchaint, ag baint úsáide as cur chuige meaisínfhoghlama traidisiúnta le gnéithe caighdeánacha téacs, a d'fhéadfadh fónamh go luath amach anseo mar thagairt chun comparáid a dhéanamh le córais domhainfhoghlama. Ghlacamar páirt i dtasc A (Brath Caint Fuath in aghaidh Inimircigh agus Mná) agus tasc B (Iompar Ionsaitheach agus Aicmiú Sprice). In ainneoin a simplíochta, fuair ár gcóras scór iontach F1 de 72.5 (an séú háit is airde) agus cruinneas 73.6 (an dara ceann is airde) sa Spáinnis (tasc A), rud a d’fheidhmigh níos fearr ná múnlaí néaracha níos casta ó 40 córas rannpháirtí san iomlán.", 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტის შესახებ სისტემა, რომელიც ალისანტის (UA) университетში განვითარებულია 2019 წლის სამუშაო დავალებისთვის 5: მრავალური სამუშაო სამუშაო განვითარებაზე გა ამ სამუშაოს მიზეზი არის ძალიან ძალიან ფესტური ხაზი განახლებისთვის გამოყენება საშუალებელი მაქსინური სწავლების მიზეზით, რომელიც სტანდარტულ ტექსტულ ფესტურებით, რომელიც შე ჩვენ ორივე სამუშაო A-ში (თმიგრანტები და ქალების განსაკუთრებით) და B-ში (Aggressive behavior and Target Classification). ჩვენი სისტემმა უფრო მარტივია იყო 72,5-ის (შვიდი უფრო მეტი) და 73,6-ის (მეორე უფრო მეტი) სისპანელი (რაოდენობა A) სისპანელი (რაოდენობა A) სისტემში, რომლებიც უფრო კომპლექსი ნეირალური მოდელები გა', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα που αναπτύχθηκε στο Πανεπιστήμιο του Αλικάντε (ΑΕ) για την εργασία 5: Κοινή εργασία για την πολύγλωσση ανίχνευση μίσους. Σκοπός της παρούσας εργασίας είναι η δημιουργία μιας ισχυρής βάσης για την ανίχνευση ρητορικής μίσους, χρησιμοποιώντας μια παραδοσιακή προσέγγιση μηχανικής μάθησης με τυπικά χαρακτηριστικά κειμένου, τα οποία θα μπορούσαν να χρησιμεύσουν στο εγγύς μέλλον ως αναφορά για σύγκριση με συστήματα βαθιάς μάθησης. Συμμετείχαμε τόσο στο έργο Α (Ανίχνευση Λόγου μίσους κατά Μεταναστών και Γυναικών) όσο και στο έργο Β (Επιθετική Συμπεριφορά και Ταξινόμηση Στόχου). Παρά την απλότητά του, το σύστημά μας απέκτησε αξιοσημείωτη βαθμολογία 72,5 (έκτη υψηλότερη) και ακρίβεια 73.6 (δεύτερη υψηλότερη) στα ισπανικά (εργασία Α), ξεπερνώντας τα πιο σύνθετα νευρωνικά μοντέλα από συνολικά 40 συμμετεχόντων συστήματα.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il sistema sviluppato presso l'Università di Alicante (UA) per il SemEval 2019 Task 5: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate. Lo scopo di questo lavoro è quello di costruire una solida base di riferimento per il rilevamento del discorso d'odio, utilizzando un approccio tradizionale di apprendimento automatico con caratteristiche testuali standard, che potrebbe servire in un prossimo futuro come riferimento per confrontare con i sistemi di deep learning. Abbiamo partecipato sia al compito A (Detection of Hate Speech against Immigrants and Women) che al compito B (Comportamento aggressivo e Classificazione target). Nonostante la sua semplicità, il nostro sistema ha ottenuto un notevole punteggio F1 di 72,5 (sesto più alto) e una precisione di 73,6 (secondo più alto) in spagnolo (compito A), superando modelli neurali più complessi da un totale di 40 sistemi partecipanti.", 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az Alicante Egyetem (UA) által a SemEval 2019 feladat 5: Megosztott feladat a gyűlölet többnyelvű felismerésére. A munka célja, hogy erős alapot építsen a gyűlöletbeszéd felismeréséhez, egy hagyományos gépi tanulási megközelítés alkalmazásával, standard szövegfunkciókkal, amelyek a közeljövőben referenciaként szolgálhatnak a mélytanulási rendszerekkel való összehasonlításhoz. Részt vettünk mind az A feladatban (Gyűlöletbeszéd detektálás bevándorlók és nők ellen), mind a B feladatban (Aggresszív viselkedés és célosztályozás). Egyszerűsége ellenére rendszerünk figyelemreméltó F1-pontszámot ért el 72,5 (hatodik legmagasabb) és 73,6 (második legmagasabb) pontosságot spanyolul (A feladat), amely összesen 40 résztvevő rendszerből több összetett neurális modellt teljesített.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma sistema, sukurta Alikanto universitete (UA) 2019 m. pusmečio vertinimo 5 uždaviniui „Bendra užduotis daugiakalbio neapykantos nustatymo srityje“. Šio darbo tikslas – sukurti tvirtą neapykantos kalbos aptikimo pagrindą, taikant tradicinį mašininio mokymosi metodą su standartinėmis tekstinėmis savybėmis, kuris artimiausioje ateityje galėtų padėti palyginti su gilaus mokymosi sistemomis. Mes dalyvavome A užduotyje (Nekenčiamos kalbos nustatymas imigrantams ir moterims) ir B užduotyje (agresyvus elgesys ir tikslinis klasifikavimas). Despite its simplicity, our system obtained a remarkable F1-score of 72.5 (sixth highest) and an accuracy of 73.6 (second highest) in Spanish (task A), outperforming more complex neural models from a total of 40 participant systems.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2019 жылы жарым-жарым тапсырма үшін Алисант университетінде жасалған жүйені таңдайды. Бірнеше тілдік жетістікті анықтау үшін бөлшектелген тапсырма. Бұл жұмысының мақсаты - қарсы сөздерді анықтау үшін күшті негізгі сызық құру, стандартты мәтіндік мүмкіндіктермен әдеттегі машина оқыту арқылы, ол жақын болашақта тұтас үйрену жүйелерімен салы Біз A тапсырмасында (иммигранттер және әйелдерге қарсы жек сөйлейтін) және B тапсырмасында қатынасыз. Қарапайымдылығына қарамастан, біздің жүйеміз 72,5 (алтынші жоғары) және 73,6 (екінші жоғары) испандық (тапсырма А) деген (тапсырма А) дегенде, 40 қатысушылардың жалпы комплексті невралдық моделдерінен артық болды.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem yang dikembangkan di Universiti Alicante (UA) untuk SemEval 2019 Tugas 5: Tugas Berkongsi untuk Pengesanan Kebencian Berbahasa. Tujuan kerja ini adalah untuk membina dasar yang kuat untuk pengesan ucapan kebencian, menggunakan pendekatan pembelajaran mesin tradisional dengan ciri-ciri teks piawai, yang boleh berkhidmat dalam masa depan yang dekat sebagai rujukan untuk membandingkan dengan sistem pembelajaran dalam. Kami berpartisipasi dalam kedua-dua tugas A dan tugas B. Walaupun kesederhanaannya, sistem kita mendapat skor F1 yang luar biasa 72.5 (Keenam tertinggi) dan ketepatan 73.6 (Kedua tertinggi) dalam bahasa Sepanyol (tugas A), melebihi model saraf yang lebih kompleks dari total 40 sistem peserta.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ വിവരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്ന സെമ്മെവാല്\u200d 2019 ജോലി 5: വെറുപ്പിനുള്ള പല ഭാഷ ഡിറ്റിക്റ്റീഷനില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dത്ത പണി ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d ശക്തിയുള്ള ബെസ്ലൈന്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതാണ്. സാധാരണ പഠിക്കുന്ന സിസ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ട് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിലും പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്നു (അഭയാര്\u200dത്ഥികള്\u200dക്കും സ്ത്രീകള്\u200dക്കും വിരോധമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d വെറുപ്പുണ്ടായ അതിന്റെ എളുപ്പത്തില്\u200d തന്നെയാണെങ്കിലും നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d 72.5 (ആറാമത്തേതില്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dന്ന) സ്പാനിഷില്\u200d 73. 6 (രണ്ടാമത്തേതില്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dന്ന) ഒരു സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട് ലഭിച്ചു.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet utvikla i Universiteten av Alicante (UA) for semiEval 2019 oppgåva 5: Delt oppgåve om fleirspråk oppdaging av hatt. Målet for denne arbeiden er å bygge ein sterk baseline for å oppdaga hatespråk, ved å bruka ein tradisjonell maskinelæringstilnærming med standardtekstensivne funksjonar, som kan gjere i ein nær framtid som referanse til å samanlikne med dype læringssystemar. Vi delta på begge oppgåve A (Hate Speech Detection against Immigrants and Women) og oppgåve B (Aggressive oppførsel og målklassifikasjon). Til tross sine enkelte, har vårt systemet fått eit merkelig F1-poeng med 72,5 (sekste høgste) og eit nøyaktighet med 73,6 (andre høgste) på spansk (oppgåve A), som utfører meir komplekse neiralmodeller frå totalt 40 deltakarsystemer.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema żviluppata fl-Università ta’ Alicante (UA) għas-SemEval 2019 Kompitu 5: Kompitu Konġunt dwar id-Detezzjoni Multilingwi tal-Mibegħda. L-għan ta’ dan ix-xogħol huwa li tinbena linja bażi qawwija għad-detezzjoni tad-diskors tal-mibegħda, bl-użu ta’ approċċ tradizzjonali ta’ tagħlim bil-magni b’karatteristiċi testwali standard, li jista’ jservi f’futur qrib bħala referenza biex jitqabbel mas-sistemi ta’ tagħlim profond. A ħna pparteċipajna fiż-żewġ kompiti A (Detezzjoni ta’ diskors ta’ mibegħda kontra l-Immigranti u n-Nisa) u fil-kompitu B (imġiba aggressiva u Klassifikazzjoni fil-Mira). Minkejja s-sempliċità tagħha, is-sistema tagħna kisbet punteġġ F1 notevoli ta’ 72.5 (is-sitt l-ogħla) u preċiżjoni ta’ 73.6 (it-tieni l-ogħla) fi Spanjol (kompitu A), li qabeż mudelli newrali aktar kumplessi minn total ta’ 40 sistema parteċipanti.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас 2019 оны SemEval (UA) Их Сургуульд хөгжигдсэн системийг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ ажлын зорилго нь үзэн ядах яриаг олох хүчтэй суурь шугам бий болгох, уламжлалтай машин суралцах арга баримтуудтай ашиглаж, ойролцоогоор ирээдүйд гүн суралцах системтэй харьцуулахад тусалж чадна. Бид A-ын ажил хоёулаа (Их Сургуульд, Эмэгтэйчүүдийн эсрэг Hate Speech Detection) болон B-ийн ажил (Aggressive Behaviour, Target Classification). Үүний энгийн байдлыг харахад бидний систем 72.5 (6 дахь хамгийн өндөр) болон 73.6 (2 дахь хамгийн өндөр) испанский (ажил А) хэмээн зөвхөн илүү нарийн мэдрэлийн загварыг 40 оролцогчдын нийтлэл дээр гаргасан.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje system opracowany na Uniwersytecie Alicante (UA) dla SemEval 2019 Task 5: Wspólne zadanie na temat wielojęzycznego wykrywania nienawiści. Celem niniejszej pracy jest zbudowanie silnej bazy podstawowej do wykrywania mowy nienawiści, wykorzystując tradycyjne podejście do uczenia maszynowego ze standardowymi cechami tekstowymi, które mogłyby służyć w najbliższej przyszłości jako odniesienie do porównania z systemami głębokiego uczenia. Uczestniczyliśmy zarówno w zadaniu A (Wykrywanie Mowy Nienawiści wobec Imigrantów i Kobiet) jak i zadaniu B (Zachowanie agresywne i Klasyfikacja Celu). Pomimo swojej prostoty, nasz system uzyskał niezwykły wynik F1 72,5 (szósty najwyższy) i dokładność 73.6 (drugi najwyższy) w języku hiszpańskim (zadanie A), przewyższając bardziej złożone modele neuronowe z łącznie 40-systemów uczestniczących.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul dezvoltat la Universitatea din Alicante (UA) pentru SemEval 2019 Task 5: Shared Task on Multilingv Detection of Ure. Scopul acestei lucrări este de a construi o bază puternică pentru detectarea discursului la ură, folosind o abordare tradițională de învățare automată cu caracteristici textuale standard, care ar putea servi într-un viitor apropiat ca referință pentru a compara cu sistemele de învățare profundă. Am participat atât la sarcina A (Detectarea discursului de ură împotriva imigranților și femeilor), cât și la sarcina B (Comportament agresiv și Clasificarea țintelor). În ciuda simplității sale, sistemul nostru a obținut un scor F1 remarcabil de 72,5 (al șaselea cel mai mare) și o precizie de 73,6 (al doilea cel mai mare) în limba spaniolă (sarcina A), depășind modele neurale mai complexe dintr-un total de 40 de sisteme participante.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува системот развиен на Универзитетот на Аликанте (УА) за полуевал 2019 задача 5: Соделена задача за мнографско откривање на омразата. The purpose of this work is to build a strong baseline for hate speech detection, using a traditional machine learning approach with standard textual features, which could serve in a near future as a reference to compare with deep learning systems.  Учествувавме во задачата А (Детектирање на говорот на омраза против имигрантите и жените) и задачата Б (Агресивно однесување и класификација на метите). И покрај нејзината едноставност, нашиот систем доби извонредна оценка F1 од 72,5 (шест највисок) и точност од 73,6 (втор највисок) на шпански (задача А), надминувајќи покомплексни нервни модели од вкупно 40 системи учесници.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ඇලිස්ටෝන්ට් විශ්වාසික (UA) විද්\u200dයාලයේ පද්ධතිය විස්තර කරනවා 2019 වැඩේ 5: බොහොම භාෂාවික හොයාගන්න විද්\u200dය මේ වැඩේ හැකියාව තමයි වෛර කතා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ශක්තිමත් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, ස්ථානික පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණ අපි කාර්ය A දෙන්නම සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සැකසුම් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් සහ B කාර්ය. අපේ පද්ධතියේ සාමාන්\u200dයතාවට නමුත්, අපේ පද්ධතිය 72.5 (හතරවෙනි උත්සත්) සහ 73.6 (දෙවෙනි උත්සත්) ස්පැනිස් වල (වැඩ A) කිරීමක් තියෙනවා, සංශ්\u200dය න්\u200dයුරල් මොඩේල්', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval 2019 செயல் 5: வெறுப்பின் பல மொழி கண்டுபிடிப்பில் பகிர்ந்த பணி இந்த வேலையின் குறிப்பு என்னவென்றால் வெறுப்பு பேச்சு கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான ஒரு வலிமையான அடிப்படையாளத்தை உருவாக்குவதற்கு, ஒரு பாரம்பரிய இயந்திரம் கற்று நாங்கள் இரண்டு பணியிலும் A (புறப்பாடுகள் மற்றும் பெண்களுக்கு எதிரான பேச்சு கண்டுபிடிப்பு) மற்றும் செயல் B (கிராமப்பாட் இது எளிமையாக இருந்தாலும், எங்கள் கணினியில் 72.5 (6 உயரம்) ஒரு பெரிய புள்ளிய F1- score மற்றும் ஸ்பானிஷில் 73. 6 (இரண்டாவது உயரம்) சரியான மதிப்பு பெற்றது, மொத்தமாக 40 பங்கீடாளர', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka lagu soo kordhiyey jaamacadda Alicante (UA) ee shaqada SemEval 2019 Shaqada 5: Shaqooyinka lagu sharciyey garsoorida luqadaha badan ee hat. Ujeedada shaqadaas waa in la dhiso qoraal xoog leh oo la barto hadal nacayb ah, isticmaalo qaabab waxbarasho oo asal ah oo la xiriira qalabka qoraalka ee caadiga ah, kaas oo ku adeegi kara mustaqbalka u dhow si loo barbarto nidaamka waxbarashada mool dheer. Waxaannu ka qeybqaadanay shaqada A (xuquuqda hadalka ka geesta dadka dalka u soo guuray iyo dumarka) iyo shaqada B (tababar horumar ah iyo fasaxa goal). Inta kastoo ay fudud tahay, nidaamkayagii wuxuu helay koox F1 oo aad u fiican oo ah 72.5 (6 meelood u sarreeya) iyo saxda 73.6 (labaad ee ugu sarreeya) Isbanishka (shaqo A), wuxuuna sameynayay modelyo adag oo neurada ah oo ka mid ah dhammaan 40 nidaam ka qayb qaata.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver det system som utvecklats vid universitetet i Alicante (UA) för SemEval 2019 Task 5: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate. Syftet med detta arbete är att bygga en stark baslinje för hattalsdetektering, med hjälp av en traditionell maskininlärningsmetod med standardtextfunktioner, som inom en snar framtid kan fungera som referens för att jämföra med djupinlärningssystem. Vi deltog i både uppgift A (Hate Speech Detection against Immigrants and Women) och uppgift B (Aggressivt beteende och målklassificering). Trots sin enkelhet fick vårt system en anmärkningsvärd F1-poäng på 72,5 (sjätte högsta) och en noggrannhet på 73,6 (näst högsta) på spanska (uppgift A), vilket överträffade mer komplexa neurala modeller från totalt 40 deltagarsystem.', 'ur': 'This paper describes the system developed at the University of Alicante (UA) for the SemEval 2019 Task 5: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate. اس کام کا مطابق یہ ہے کہ نفرت کی بات شناسایی کے لئے ایک قوی بنسس لین بنانا ہے، اس کے مطابق استاندارڈ ٹیکسٹل کے متعلق ایک سنتی ماشین سکونت کی طریقہ سے استعمال کرتا ہے، جو ایک نزدیک آینده میں عمیق تعلیم سیستموں کے مقابلہ میں اور ہم نے ان دونوں کاموں میں شریک ہوا اس کی سادگی کے بغیر، ہماری سیستم نے 72.5 (چھٹی بالا) کی ایک اثر F1-اسکور اور 73.6 (دوسری بالا) اسپانیایی (تابع A) کی دقیقیق حاصل کی، 40 مشرکین سیسٹموں سے زیادہ پیچیدہ نئورل مدلکوں سے کام لیا۔', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem razvijen na Univerzitetu Alicante (UA) za pola Evala 2019. zadatak 5: podeljeni zadatak o multijezičkom otkrivanju mržnje. Svrha ovog rada je izgraditi jaku osnovnu liniju za otkrivanje govora mržnje, koristeći tradicionalni pristup učenja mašine sa standardnim tekstualnim karakteristikama, koji bi u bliskoj budućnosti mogao služiti kao referent u usporedbi sa dubokim učenjskim sistemima. Učelili smo u oba zadatka A (detekcija govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena) i zadatka B (Aggresivno ponašanje i klasifikacija ciljeva). Uprkos njenoj jednostavnošću, naš sistem je dobio izvanredan rezultat F1 od 72,5 (šesti najviši) i tačnost 73,6 (drugi najviši) na španjolskom (zadatku A), nadmaženje složenijih neuralnih modela od ukupnog 40 sustava učesnika.', 'uz': "Бу саҳифа SemEval 2019 вазифаси 5: Koʻproq tillar qidirish uchun bir necha qidirilgan vazifani anglatadi. Bu ishning maqsadi, hate tilni aniqlash uchun katta asboblarni yaratish, oddiy mashina o'rganish usulini ishlatish mumkin. Bu bir necha kelajada o'rganish tizim bilan o'rganish mumkin. We participated in both task A (Hate Speech Detection against Immigrants and Women) and task B (Aggressive behavior and Target Classification).  O'zgaruvchi bo'lsa, bizning tizimmiz butun 40 bir qismi tizimdan juda murakkab neyrolik modellarini boshlaydi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống phát triển tại Đại học Alicante (UA) về nhiệm vụ Semkhai ly 209. Nhiệm vụ "Chia sẻ Nhiệm vụ trinh sát ngôn ngữ đa số của thù ghét". Mục đích của công việc này là xây dựng một cơ sở trường vững chắc để phát hiện tiếng nói ghét bỏ, sử dụng một phương pháp học máy truyền thống với các tính chất kết cấu thông thường, mà có thể phục vụ trong một tương lai gần như một phương pháp để so sánh với hệ thống học sâu. Chúng tôi tham gia cả nhiệm vụ A (trinh sát ghét ngữ đối với người nhập cư và phụ nữ) và nhiệm vụ B (hành vi hung hãn và phân tích mục tiêu). Mặc cho nó đơn giản, hệ thống của chúng tôi đã đạt được một số lượng lớn F1 của 72.5 (thứ sáu cao nhất) và độ chính xác của 73.6 (thứ hai cao nhất) ở Tây Ban Nha (nhiệm vụ A), thoát khỏi các mô hình thần kinh phức tạp từ tỉ hệ thống liên hợp 40 tham gia.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver det system, der er udviklet på University of Alicante (UA) til SemEval 2019 Task 5: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hade. Formålet med dette arbejde er at opbygge en stærk baseline for hadefuld tale detektering ved hjælp af en traditionel maskinlæring tilgang med standard tekstfunktioner, som i en nær fremtid kan tjene som reference til at sammenligne med deep learning systemer. Vi deltog i både opgave A (Hate Speech Detection against Immigrants and Women) og opgave B (Aggressive Adfærd and Target Classification). På trods af sin enkelhed opnåede vores system en bemærkelsesværdig F1-score på 72,5 (sjette højeste) og en nøjagtighed på 73,6 (næsthøjeste) på spansk (opgave A), hvilket oversteg mere komplekse neurale modeller fra i alt 40 deltagersystemer.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва системата, разработена в Университета в Аликанте (УА), за задача 5: Споделена задача за многоезично откриване на омраза. Целта на тази работа е да се изгради силна база за откриване на речта на омразата, използвайки традиционен подход за машинно обучение със стандартни текстови характеристики, който може да послужи в близко бъдеще като референция за сравнение със системите за дълбоко обучение. Участвахме както в задача А (Откриване на говора на омразата срещу имигранти и жени), така и в задача Б (Агресивно поведение и целева класификация). Въпреки простотата си, нашата система получи забележителен резултат от 72,5 (шести най-висок) и точност от 73,6 (втори най-висок) на испански (задача А), надминавайки по-сложните невронни модели от общо 40 участващи системи.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sustav razvijen na Univerzitetu Alicante (UA) za pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 5: zajednički zadatak o multijezičkom otkrivanju mržnje. Svrha ovog rada je izgraditi jaku osnovnu liniju za otkrivanje govora mržnje, koristeći tradicionalni pristup učenja strojeva sa standardnim tekstualnim karakteristikama, koji bi u bliskoj budućnosti mogli služiti kao referent u usporedbi s dubokim sustavima učenja. Učinili smo se obje zadatke A (otkrivanje govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena) i zadatke B (Aggresivno ponašanje i klasifikacija cilja). Unatoč njenoj jednostavnosti, naš sustav je dobio izvanredniji rezultat F1 od 72,5 (šesti najviši) i preciznost 73,6 (drugi najviši) na španjolskom (zadatku A), nadmaženje složenijih neuralnih modela iz ukupnog 40 sustava učesnika.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft het systeem dat is ontwikkeld aan de Universiteit van Alicante (UA) voor de SemEval 2019 Taak 5: Gedeelde Taak over Meertalige Detectie van Haat. Het doel van dit werk is om een sterke basis te bouwen voor haatspraakdetectie, met behulp van een traditionele machine learning benadering met standaard tekstuele kenmerken, die in een nabije toekomst als referentie kunnen dienen om te vergelijken met deep learning systemen. We hebben deelgenomen aan zowel taak A (Hate Speech Detection tegen Immigranten en Vrouwen) als taak B (Agressief gedrag en Target Classification). Ondanks zijn eenvoud behaalde ons systeem een opmerkelijke F1-score van 72.5 (zesde hoogste) en een nauwkeurigheid van 73.6 (tweede hoogste) in het Spaans (taak A), die complexere neurale modellen van in totaal 40 deelnemende systemen overtrof.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem yang dikembangkan di Universitas Alicante (UA) untuk SemEval 2019 Task 5: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate. Tujuan pekerjaan ini adalah membangun dasar yang kuat untuk deteksi pidato kebencian, menggunakan pendekatan belajar mesin tradisional dengan ciri-ciri teks standar, yang dapat melayani di masa depan dekat sebagai referensi untuk membandingkan dengan sistem belajar dalam. Kami berpartisipasi dalam kedua tugas A dan tugas B. Meskipun kesederhanaannya, sistem kita mendapat nilai F1 yang luar biasa 72,5 (keenam tertinggi) dan akurasi 73,6 (kedua tertinggi) dalam bahasa Spanyol (tugas A), melebihi model saraf yang lebih kompleks dari total 40 sistem peserta.', 'ko': '본고는 알리칸트대학(UA)이 SemEval 2019 퀘스트 5: 다중 언어 증오 검출 공유 퀘스트를 개발하는 시스템을 묘사한다.이 작업의 목적은 표준 텍스트 특징을 가진 전통적인 기계 학습 방법을 사용하여 증오 음성 검측에 강력한 기선을 구축하는 것이다. 이것은 머지않아 심도 있는 학습 시스템과 비교할 수 있는 참고가 될 것이다.우리는 임무 A(이민자와 여성에 대한 증오 언어 검사)와 임무 B(공격 행위와 목표 분류)에 참여했다.간단하지만 우리 시스템은 스페인어(퀘스트 a)에서 72.5점(6위)의 F1 성적과 73.6점(2위)의 정확도를 얻어 40개 참여자 시스템에서 더 복잡한 신경모델보다 우수하다.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt das an der Universität Alicante (UA) entwickelte System für die SemEval 2019 Task 5: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate. Das Ziel dieser Arbeit ist es, eine starke Basis für die Erkennung von Hassreden zu schaffen, indem ein traditioneller maschineller Lernansatz mit Standard-Textmerkmalen verwendet wird, der in naher Zukunft als Referenz für den Vergleich mit Deep Learning Systemen dienen könnte. Wir beteiligten uns sowohl an der Aufgabe A (Hate Speech Detection against Immigrants and Women) als auch an der Aufgabe B (Aggressives Verhalten und Target Classification). Trotz seiner Einfachheit erzielte unser System eine bemerkenswerte F1-Punktzahl von 72.5 (sechsthöchste) und eine Genauigkeit von 73.6 (zweithöchste) auf Spanisch (Aufgabe A), die komplexere neuronale Modelle von insgesamt 40-Teilnehmersystemen übertraf.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo uliotengenezwa katika Chuo Kikuu cha Alicante (UA) kwa ajili ya kazi ya SemEval 2019 5: Tamko la kushirikiana katika Utafiti wa Lugha nyingine wa Hati. Lengo la kazi hii ni kutengeneza msingi wa nguvu kwa ajili ya kutambua hotuba ya chuki, kwa kutumia mbinu za kujifunza za kitamaduni na vipengele vya msingi, ambavyo vinaweza kutumika katika siku za karibu kama maana ya kulinganisha na mfumo wa kujifunza za ndani. Tumeshiriki katika kazi zote A (Utafiti wa Hotuba dhidi ya Wahamiaji na Wanawake) na kazi B (tabia za kimaguzi na Utangazaji wa Tarehe). Pamoja na urahisi wake, mfumo wetu ulipata kiwango cha F1 cha 72.5 (cha sita zaidi) na sahihi ya 73.6 (ya pili juu) nchini Uhispania (kazi A), kuonyesha mifano ya kiserikali zaidi ya neura kutoka kwenye mfumo wa jumla ya washiriki 40.', 'tr': 'Bu käze 2019-njy SemEval Uniwersitesinde gelinýän sistemany beýleki maksady 5: Ýüklenýän netijesi bardyr. Bu işiň maksady - ýigrenýän çykyş tanyşmak üçin güýçli baseline gurulmak, düzenli tekst çykyşlary bilen düzenli maşynyň öwrenmesi golaýyny ulanmakdyr. Bu golaýda çykyş öwrenme sistemalary bilen karşılaştyrmak üçin bir görnüş bolar. Biz hem işe A (Göçmenler we aýallar ýakynda nefret sözlerini) we B işe goşuldyk. Aslyklygyna rağmen, sistemamyz 72.5 (alty ýokary) we 73.6 (ikinji ýokary) español (zady A) düýbünden has karmaşık näralar modellerini çykardy.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم توسعه شده در دانشگاه آلیسانت (UA) برای کار نیمه سال ۲۰۱۹ توسعه می\u200cکند: کار مشترک در مورد شناسایی دشمنی چندین زبان. هدف این کار این است که یک خط بنیادی قوی برای شناسایی سخنرانی متنفر ساخته شود، با استفاده از روش یادگیری ماشین سنتی با ویژه های متن استاندارد، که می تواند در آینده نزدیک به عنوان مرتبط برای مقایسه با سیستم یادگیری عمیق خدمت کند. ما در هر کاری A (کشف سخنرانی دشمنی در برابر مهاجران و زنان) و کار B (دسته\u200cی گروه\u200cگران و دسته\u200cهای هدف) شرکت کردیم. با وجود ساده\u200cاش، سیستم ما یک نمونه فوق\u200cالعاده\u200cای از 72.5 (بالاترین) و دقیق 73.6 (بالاترین دوم) در اسپانیایی (کار A) گرفته است، که از مدل\u200cهای عصبی پیچیده\u200cتر از سیستم\u200cهای 40 شرکتگر انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan sistemin e zhvilluar në Universitetin e Alicante (UA) për SemEval 2019 Task 5: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate. Qëllimi i kësaj pune është të ndërtojë një bazë të fortë për zbulimin e fjalimit të urrejtjes, duke përdorur një qasje tradicionale mësimi i makinave me karakteristika tekstuale standarde, e cila mund të shërbejë në një të ardhme të afërt si një referim për të krahasuar me sistemet e mësimit të thellë. Ne morëm pjesë në të dy detyrat A dhe B. Megjithë thjeshtësinë e saj, sistemi ynë mori një rezultat F1 të shquar prej 72.5 (më të gjashtën më të lartë) dhe një saktësi prej 73.6 (më të lartë të dytë) në spanjoll (detyrë A), duke kaluar modelet më komplekse nervore nga një total prej 40 sistemesh pjesëmarrës.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ለSemEval 2019 ስራ 5: በጣዖት ላይ የተለየ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ አጣራጭ ስራዎችን ይናገራል፡፡ የዚህ ሥራ ስራ የጥል ንግግርን ለማግኘት ብርቱ መደገፊያ ለመሥራት ነው፣ የባሕላዊ መሣሪያን ለመማር ሥርዓት በተቀረበ ቀላል የጽሑፍ ምርጫዎች ለመጠቀም፣ ከጥልቅ ትምህርት ስርዓት ጋር ለማስተካከል ይችላል፡፡ በሁለቱም ስራ A (ስደተኞች እና ሴቶችን ላይ የተጠሉ የንግግር አወቅት) እና ስራ B (የጉዳይ ሁኔታ እና የዕድል ክፍል) ተጋጠመን፡፡ ከቀላልነት ምንም እንኳ፣ የስፓኒሽ (ስምንት) የ73.6 (ሁለተኛ ከፍተኛ) እና የስፓኒሽ (ስራ A) ብዛት የሚቆጠሩ የናቡር ዓይነቶች በሙሉ 40 ተካባሪዎች ሲስተካከል አግኝቷል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է համակարգը, որը զարգացել է Ալիկանտե համալսարանում 2019 թ. կիսագնդի 5. հանձնարարությունը՝ ատելության բազմալեզու հայտնաբերման հանձնարարությունը: Այս աշխատանքի նպատակն է ստեղծել ուժեղ հիմք ատելության խոսքի հայտնաբերման համար, օգտագործելով ավանդական մեքենային ուսումնասիրության մոտեցում ստանդարտ տեքստոլային հատկություններով, որը կարող է օգտագործել մոտ ապագայում որպես համեմատություն խորը ուսումնա We participated in both task A (Hate Speech Detection against Immigrants and Women) and task B (Aggressive behavior and Target Classification).  Չնայած իր պարզությանը, մեր համակարգը ստացավ 72.5 (վեցերորդ ամենաբարձր) F1-գնահատականը և 73.6 (երկրորդ ամենաբարձր) ճշգրիտությունը իսպաներեն (A-ի խնդիր), որոնք ավելի բարդ նյարդային մոդելներ էին արտադրում 40 մասնակիցների համակարգում:', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die stelsel ontwikkeld by die Universiteit van Alicante (UA) vir die SemEval 2019 taak 5: Gedeelde taak op veelvuldige taak ontdekking van Hatte. Die doel van hierdie werk is om 'n sterk basislien te bou vir haat spraak beskrywing, gebruik 'n tradisionele masjien leer toegang met standaard tektuele funksies, wat in 'n naby toekoms kan dien as 'n verwysing om te vergelyk met diep leersystemee. Ons het gedeel in beide opdrag A (Hate Speech Detection against Immigrants and Women) en opdrag B (Aggressive gedrag en Teël Klassifikasie). Terwyl sy eenvoudigheid, het ons stelsel 'n merkelike F1-telling van 72.5 (sesde hoogste) en 'n presisie van 73.6 (tweede hoogste) in Spaanse (taak A) ontvang, wat meer komplekse neurale modele uitgevoer het van 'n totaal van 40 deelnemerstelsels.", 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el sistema desenvolupat a la Universitat d'Alicante (UA) per la tasca 5 del SemEval 2019: Task Shared on Multilingual Detection of Hate. The purpose of this work is to build a strong baseline for hate speech detection, using a traditional machine learning approach with standard textual features, which could serve in a near future as a reference to compare with deep learning systems.  Vam participar en la tasca A (Detecció de Discursos de Odie contra les Immigrants i les dones) i en la tasca B (Comportament Aggressiv i Classificació d'Objetius). Malgrat la seva simplicitat, el nostre sistema va obtenir una puntuació F1 notable de 72,5 (sexta més alta) i una precisió de 73,6 (segon més alta) en espanyol (tasca A), superant els models neurals més complexos d'un total de 40 sistemes participants.", 'bn': 'এই কাগজটি সেমইভাল ২০১৯ কাজের জন্য আলিকান্ড বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের (ইউএ) ব্যবস্থার উন্নয়নের ব্যাপারে বর্ণনা করেছে: মাল্টিভাষায় ঘৃণা  এই কাজের উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে ঘৃণা ভাষণ আবিষ্কারের জন্য একটি শক্তিশালী মেশিন নির্মাণ করা, একটি ঐতিহ্যবাহী মেশিন ব্যবহার করে স্বাভাবিক টেক্সচুয়াল বৈশিষ্ট্য আমরা উভয় কাজ A (অভিবাসী এবং নারীদের বিরুদ্ধে ঘৃণার বিরুদ্ধে বক্তৃতা এবং কাজ B (গুরুত্বপূর্ণ আচরণ এবং লক্ষ্য বিভাগ) অংশগ্ সাধারণ সত্ত্বেও, আমাদের সিস্টেম ৭২.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem razvijen na Univerzitetu Alicante (UA) za pola Evala 2019. zadatak 5: zajednički zadatak o multijezičkom otkrivanju mržnje. Svrha ovog rada je izgraditi jaku osnovnu liniju za otkrivanje govora mržnje, koristeći tradicionalni pristup učenja mašine sa standardnim tekstualnim karakteristikama, koji bi u bliskoj budućnosti mogao služiti kao referent u usporedbi sa dubokim učenjskim sistemima. Učinili smo se obje zadatke A (otkrivanje govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena) i zadatke B (Aggresivno ponašanje i klasifikacija ciljeva). Unatoč njenoj jednostavnosti, naš sistem je dobio izvanredniji rezultat F1 od 72,5 (šesti najviši) i preciznost 73,6 (drugi najviši) na španjolskom (zadatku A), nadmaženje složenijih neuralnih modela iz ukupnog 40 sustava učesnika.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje systém vyvinutý na Univerzitě Alicante (UA) pro SemEval 2019 Task 5: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate. Cílem této práce je vytvořit silnou základnu pro detekci nenávistné řeči za použití tradičního přístupu strojového učení se standardními textovými rysy, které by mohly v blízké budoucnosti sloužit jako reference pro srovnání se systémy hlubokého učení. Účastnili jsme se jak úkolu A (Detekce nenávisti proti přistěhovalcům a ženám) tak úkolu B (Agresivní chování a Cílová klasifikace). Navzdory své jednoduchosti získal náš systém pozoruhodné F1 skóre 72,5 (šestý nejvyšší) a přesnost 73,6 (druhý nejvyšší) ve španělštině (úkol A), překonávající komplexnější neuronové modely z celkově 40 účastníků systémů.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan Alicanten yliopistossa (UA) kehitetty järjestelmä SemEval 2019 Task 5: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate. Tämän työn tarkoituksena on rakentaa vahva pohja vihapuheen havaitsemiseen käyttäen perinteistä koneoppimista, jossa on vakiotekstuaalisia ominaisuuksia, joita voitaisiin lähitulevaisuudessa verrata syväoppimisjärjestelmiin. Osallistuimme sekä tehtävään A (Vihanpuheen havaitseminen maahanmuuttajia ja naisia vastaan) että tehtävään B (Aggressiivinen käyttäytyminen ja kohdeluokitus). Yksinkertaisuudesta huolimatta järjestelmämme sai huomattavan F1-pisteen 72,5 (kuudenneksi korkein) ja tarkkuuden 73,6 (toiseksi korkein) espanjaksi (tehtävä A), mikä päihitti monimutkaisemmat hermomallit yhteensä 40 osallistujajärjestelmästä.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse Alicante Ülikoolis (UA) välja töötatud süsteemi SemEval 2019. aasta ülesandeks 5: ühine ülesanne vihkamise mitmekeelse avastamise kohta. Töö eesmärk on luua tugev lähtealus vihakõne tuvastamiseks, kasutades traditsioonilist masinõppe lähenemisviisi standardsete tekstifunktsioonidega, mida saaks lähitulevikus võrrelda sügavõppesüsteemidega. Osalesime nii ülesandes A (Vihakõne tuvastamine sisserändajate ja naiste vastu) kui ka ülesandes B (Agressiivne käitumine ja sihtklassifikatsioon). Vaatamata oma lihtsusele saavutas meie süsteem märkimisväärse F1-skoori 72,5 (kuues kõrgeim) ja täpsuse 73,6 (teine kõrgeim) hispaania keeles (ülesanne A), ületades keerukamaid närvimudeleid kokku 40 osaleja süsteemist.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt 2019 Yarım Eval üçün Alicante Üniversitesi (UA) Üniversitesində hazırlanmış sistemi 5. Gözəl: Multilingual Detection of Hate haqqında paylaşılmış iş. Bu işin məqsədi, nifrət sözlərini keşfetmək üçün qüvvətli bir sətir in şa etmək, standart textual özellikləri ilə düzgün maşna öyrənmək üçün, yaxın gələcəkdə böyük öyrənmək sistemləri ilə qarşılaşdırmaq üçün istifadə edə bilər. Biz hər ikimizin A işin ə ( İncillər və qadınlar barəsində nifrət sözləri və nifrət sözləri ) və B işinə daxil olduq. Basit olmasına rağmen, sistemimiz 72,5 (altıncı yüksək) və İspanyolca 73,6 (ikinci yüksək) dəqiqliyi qəbul etdi, daha kompleks nöral modellərdən 40 iştirakçı sistemlərindən daha çox kompleks nöral modellərdən istifadə etdi.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki diperawan sistem sing gawe ngupakan ning Universite of Aliasan (UKA) kanggo seminval 2011 task 5: share task on Multilanguage detection of Kupasa. Hehing kanggo nggawe lan saiki nggawe sistem sing nggawe aturan kanggo nguasakno kesalahan, gambar sistem sing perusahaan sistem kuwi nggambar aturan textual, sing bisa ngelarang jutian sing bisa dianggap kanggo nguasakno sistem sing apik. Awakdhéwé éntuk barêng-barêng nggawe sawian A (Kemerdekaan Kemerdekaan ingkang Inimigran lan Gambar) lan akèh B (Gewisan Njupuk lan Kemerdekaan Tarih). Nanging kabèh seneng perusahaan, sistem dhéwé wis nggawe ng dumateng F1-puntuan sing katêpakan karo 75.5 (tuatah sing susahé katêpakan) lan nganggo perusahaan tanggal sabané (segunduh sing susahé) ing kashukan (task A), iso nggawe model sing komplikasi sing berarti kudu komplikasi sing apik, nik sak sistem sing komplikasi kapan-kara sing', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מתארת את המערכת שפותחת באוניברסיטת אליקנטה (UA) עבור המשימה "SemEval 2019 Task 5: Shared Task on Multilingual Detection of Hate". המטרה של העבודה הזו היא לבנות בסיס חזק לזהות נאום שנאה, בשימוש גישה מלמדת מכונות מסורתית עם תכונות טקסטוליות סטנדרטיות, שיכולות לשרת בעתיד קרוב כהתייחס לשוואה עם מערכות הלמדה עמוקות. השתתפנו בשני משימות A (גילוי נאום שנאה נגד imigrants ונשים) ושימוש B (התנהגות אגרסיבית וסיפור מטרה). למרות הפשוטה שלה, המערכת שלנו השיגה נקודת F1 מדהימה של 72.5 (הגבוהה ביותר השישי) ודיוקת 73.6 (הגבוהה ביותר השנייה) בספרדית (משימה A), שעובדה על מודלים עצביים מורכבים יותר מכל 40 מערכות משתתפות.', 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan sistem, razvit na Univerzi v Alicanteju (UA) za nalogo 5 SemEval 2019: Skupna naloga za večjezično odkrivanje sovraštva. Namen tega dela je zgraditi močno osnovo za odkrivanje sovražnega govora s tradicionalnim pristopom strojnega učenja s standardnimi besedilnimi značilnostmi, ki bi lahko v bližnji prihodnosti služili kot referenca za primerjavo s sistemi globokega učenja. Sodelovali smo pri nalogi A (Odkrivanje sovražnega govora proti priseljencem in ženskam) in nalogi B (Agresivno vedenje in ciljna klasifikacija). Kljub svoji preprostosti je naš sistem dobil izjemno F1-oceno 72,5 (šesti najvišji) in natančnost 73,6 (drugi najvišji) v španščini (naloga A), kar je preseglo kompleksnejše nevronske modele v skupno 40 udeleženih sistemih.', 'ha': "Wannan karatun na describe the system developed at the University of Alicante (UA) for the SemEV 2019 Tafiyar 5: Shared Tafiyar on multilinguin Finding of Hate. Ganar wannan aikin, za'a samar da wani salon mai ƙarfi wa'urar wa'urar magana na ƙi, kuma a yi amfani da wata masani na lafiya da wa'anar kwamfyuta da tsarin matsayi masu daidaita, wanda yana iya amfani da a gaba gaba ɗaya kamar misalin ya sami da na'urar mafunzo na ƙari. Mun yi rabo da aikin A (Hate Spelling against Ujira da mãtan Muhammadu) da aikin B (aikin Aggressive and Classification). Babu da sauƙi, na'asarmu ya sãmu wani nau'i mai girma na F1 na cikakken jumla na F1 (takwas mafi girma) da taƙaita na 73.6 (sauka sauki) a cikin Hispanish (aikin A), ya sami wasu misãlai masu kamfata na neural daga cikakkin na'urar 40.", 'bo': 'ཤོག The purpose of this work is to build a strong baseline for hate speech detection, using a traditional machine learning approach with standard textual features, which could serve in a near future as a reference to compare with deep learning systems. ང་ཚོས་སྐྱེས་པ་དང་བུད་མེད་གཉིས་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་འཇམ་སམ་བདེ་ལྡན་མ་ཚད་ལྷག་པས། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་རིམ་པ་དེ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་པའི་F1-अོ་གྲངས་72.5 ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'UNBNLP at SemEval-2019 Task 5 and 6 : Using Language Models to Detect Hate Speech and Offensive Language', 'ar': 'UNBNLP في SemEval-2019 المهمة 5 و 6: استخدام النماذج اللغوية لكشف الكلام الذي يحض على الكراهية واللغة الهجومية', 'pt': 'UNBNLP na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 5 e 6: Usando modelos de linguagem para detectar discurso de ódio e linguagem ofensiva', 'fr': 'UNBNLP au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 5 et 6\xa0: Utiliser des modèles linguistiques pour détecter les discours haineux et les propos offensants', 'es': 'UNBNLP en la Tarea 5 y 6 de SemEval-2019: Uso de modelos de lenguaje para detectar el discurso de odio y el lenguaje ofensivo', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のUNBNLPタスク5と6 ：ヘイトスピーチと不快な言語を検出するための言語モデルの使用', 'zh': 'UNBNLP在SemEval-2019务5与6:以言检怨言犯性', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 5 और 6 पर UNBNLP: हेट स्पीच और आक्रामक भाषा का पता लगाने के लिए भाषा मॉडल का उपयोग करना', 'ru': 'UNBNLP на SemEval-2019 Задача 5 и 6: Использование языковых моделей для обнаружения языка ненависти и оскорбительного языка', 'ga': 'UNBNLP ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 5 agus 6: Múnlaí Teanga a Úsáid le Is fuath liom Caint agus Teanga Iontach a Bhrath', 'ka': 'UNBNLP semiEval-2019 დავალება 5 და 6: ენის მოდელების გამოყენება განსახულებელი სიტყვების და უფრო დამატებელი ენაში', 'el': 'Εργασία 5 και 6: Χρήση γλωσσικών μοντέλων για την ανίχνευση ρητορικής μίσους και προσβλητικής γλώσσας', 'hu': 'UNBNLP a SemEval-2019 5. és 6. feladat: Nyelvi modellek használata a gyűlöletbeszéd és a támadó nyelv észlelésére', 'kk': 'UNBNLP 5- мен 6- тапсырмасының шегінде: Жұмыс сөйлесу және тыс тілді анықтау үшін тіл үлгілерін қолдану', 'lt': 'UNBNLP 2010 m. pusmečio vertinimo 5 ir 6 uždaviniai. Kalbos modelių naudojimas neapykantos kalbai ir žalingai kalbai nustatyti', 'mk': 'УНБНЛП на SemEval-2019 задача 5 и 6: Користење јазички модели за откривање на говор на омраза и навреден јазик', 'ms': 'UNBNLP di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5 dan 6: Menggunakan Model Bahasa untuk mengesan Ucapan Kebencian dan Bahasa Meninggalkan', 'mn': 'UNBNLP at SemEval-2019 Task 5 and 6: Language Models Use to Detect Hate Speech and Offensive Language', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 5- 6- ല്\u200d യുന്\u200dബിന്\u200dഎല്\u200dപി: വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'UNBNLP at SemEval-2019 Task 5 and 6: Using Language Models to Detect Hate Speech and Offensive Language', 'no': 'UNBNLP ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 5 og 6: Bruk språk-modeller for å finna hatspråk og forskyving språk', 'ro': 'UNBNLP la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 5 și 6: Utilizarea modelelor lingvistice pentru a detecta vorbirea de ură și limbajul ofensiv', 'it': "UNBNLP a SemEval-2019 Task 5 e 6: Usare modelli linguistici per rilevare discorsi d'odio e linguaggi offensivi", 'so': 'UNBNLP at SemEval-2019 Shaqada 5 and 6: Isticmaalka Modellada Luqada si aad u ogaato Neceb Speech and Offensive Language', 'sr': 'UNBNLP na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 5 i 6: Koristenje jezičkih modela za otkrivanje govora mržnje i neposlušnog jezika', 'si': 'UNBNLP at Half-2019 Job 5 and 6: Use language Models to Detect Hate Talk and Offensive language', 'sv': 'UNBNLP på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 5 och 6: Använda språkmodeller för att upptäcka hattal och stötande språk', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 5 மற்றும் 6- ல் UNBNLP: வெறுப்பு பேச்சு மற்றும் பொதுவான மொழி மாதிரிகளை கண்டறிய பயன்படுத்துகிறது', 'pl': 'Zadanie 5 i 6: Wykorzystanie modeli językowych do wykrywania mowy nienawiści i języka obraźliwego', 'ur': 'UNBNLP at SemEval-2019 Task 5 and 6: Language Models used to detect Hate Speech and Offensive Language', 'vi': 'Trường hợp đôi tai liên bang tại SemEvl-209 Task 5 và 6: Dùng trình ngôn ngữ để phân tích ghét Ngôn ngữ và Ngôn ngữ rộng', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Задача 5 и 6: Използване на езикови модели за откриване на реч на омразата и обиден език', 'da': 'UNBNLP på SemEval-2019 Opgave 5 og 6: Brug af sprogmodeller til at registrere hadefulde tale og offensivt sprog', 'hr': 'UNBNLP na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 5. i 6. Korištenje jezičkih modela za otkrivanje govora mržnje i neposlušnog jezika', 'de': 'UNBNLP bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 5 und 6: Verwendung von Sprachmodellen zur Erkennung von Hassreden und offensiver Sprache', 'nl': 'UNBNLP op SemEval-2019 Taak 5 en 6: Taalmodellen gebruiken om haatspraak en beledigende taal te detecteren', 'id': 'UNBNLP at SemEval-2019 Task 5 and 6: Using Language Models to Detect Hate Speech and Offensive Language', 'fa': 'UNBNLP در ماموریت ۵ و ۶: استفاده از مدل زبان برای شناسایی سخنرانی دشمنی و زبان ناتوانی', 'tr': 'UNBNLP at SemEval-2019 Task 5 and 6: Using Language Models to Detect Hate Speech and Offensive Language', 'ko': 'SemEval-199년 UNBNLP 퀘스트 5와 6: 언어 모델로 증오 언론과 공격성 언어 검출', 'af': 'UNBNLP by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 5 en 6: Gebruik Taal Modelle om Hate Spraak en Offensive Taal te ontdek', 'sw': 'UNBNLP katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 5 na 6: Utumiaji wa Modeli za Lugha kwa Kugundua Hotuba ya Hati na Lugha ya Offensive', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'az': 'UNBNLP at SemEval-2019 Task 5 and 6: Dil Models Use to Detect Hate Speech and Offensive Language', 'hy': 'UNBNLP at SemEval-2019 Task 5 and 6: Using Language Models to Detect Hate Speech and Offensive Language', 'bs': 'UNBNLP na pola evaluacije 2019. zadatku 5 i 6: Koristenje jezičkih modela za otkrivanje govora mržnje i neposlušnog jezika', 'sq': 'UNBNLP at SemEval-2019 Task 5 and 6: Using Language Models to Detect Hate Speech and Offensive Language', 'cs': 'Úkol 5 a 6: Použití jazykových modelů k detekci nenávistné řeči a urážlivého jazyka', 'bn': 'SemEval-2019 কাজ ৫ এবং ৬: ঘৃণা কথা এবং অফেন্সিভ ভ ভাষা সনাক্ত করার জন্য ভাষা মডেল ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': 'UNBNLP at SemEval-2019 Task 5 and 6: Using Language Models to Detect Hate Speech and Offensive Language', 'et': 'UNBNLP SemEval-2019 ülesanne 5 ja 6: Keelemudelite kasutamine vihkamise ja solvava keele tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'UNBNLP SemEval-2019 Tehtävät 5 ja 6: Kielimallien käyttäminen vihapuheen ja loukkaavan kielen havaitsemiseen', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'jv': 'UNBNLP at semiinval-2011 task 5 and 6: Using Language Modes to detect Haye Talk and offensive Language', 'sk': 'UNBNLP na SemEval-2019 naloga 5 in 6: Uporaba jezikovnih modelov za odkrivanje sovražnega govora in napadalnega jezika', 'he': 'UNBNLP ב-SemEval-2019 משימה 5 ו-6: להשתמש במדלים שפות כדי לגלות נאום שנאה ושפה פגיעה', 'bo': 'UNBNLP at SemEval-2019 Task 5 and 6: Using Language Models to Detect Hate Speech and Offensive Language'}
{'en': 'In this paper we apply a range of approaches to language modeling   including word-level n-gram and neural language models, and character-level neural language models   to the problem of detecting hate speech and offensive language. Our findings indicate that language models are able to capture knowledge of whether text is hateful or offensive. However, our findings also indicate that more conventional approaches to text classification often perform similarly or better.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نطبق مجموعة من الأساليب لنمذجة اللغة - بما في ذلك نماذج اللغة على مستوى الكلمات n-gram واللغة العصبية ، ونماذج اللغة العصبية على مستوى الشخصية - لمشكلة اكتشاف الكلام الذي يحض على الكراهية واللغة المسيئة. تشير النتائج التي توصلنا إليها إلى أن النماذج اللغوية قادرة على معرفة ما إذا كان النص بغيضًا أم مسيئًا. ومع ذلك ، تشير النتائج التي توصلنا إليها أيضًا إلى أن الأساليب التقليدية لتصنيف النص غالبًا ما تؤدي بشكل مشابه أو أفضل.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous appliquons une gamme d'approches à la modélisation du langage — y compris les modèles de langage neuronal et de n-gramme au niveau du mot, et les modèles de langage neuronal au niveau du caractère — au problème de la détection des discours haineux et du langage offensant. Nos résultats indiquent que les modèles linguistiques sont capables de déterminer si un texte est haineux ou offensant. Cependant, nos résultats indiquent également que les approches plus conventionnelles de classification de texte donnent souvent des résultats similaires ou meilleurs.", 'es': 'En este artículo, aplicamos una variedad de enfoques al modelado del lenguaje, incluidos los modelos de lenguaje neuronal y n-gram a nivel de palabras, y los modelos de lenguaje neuronal a nivel de caracteres, al problema de detectar el discurso de odio y el lenguaje ofensivo. Nuestros hallazgos indican que los modelos lingüísticos son capaces de captar el conocimiento de si el texto es odioso u ofensivo. Sin embargo, nuestros hallazgos también indican que los enfoques más convencionales para la clasificación de textos a menudo funcionan de manera similar o mejor.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, aplicamos uma variedade de abordagens para modelagem de linguagem – incluindo n-gram em nível de palavra e modelos de linguagem neural e modelos de linguagem neural em nível de caractere – ao problema de detectar discurso de ódio e linguagem ofensiva. Nossas descobertas indicam que os modelos de linguagem são capazes de capturar o conhecimento se o texto é odioso ou ofensivo. No entanto, nossas descobertas também indicam que abordagens mais convencionais para classificação de texto geralmente têm desempenho semelhante ou melhor.', 'ja': '本稿では，ヘイトスピーチや攻撃的言語の検出問題に対して，単語レベルのn – gramやニューラル言語モデル，文字レベルのニューラル言語モデルなど，言語モデリングに幅広いアプローチを適用する．私たちの調査結果は、言語モデルが、テキストが憎悪であるか不快であるかについての知識を取り込むことができることを示しています。しかしながら、我々の発見はまた、テキスト分類に対するより従来のアプローチが同様にまたはより良いパフォーマンスを示すことが多いことを示している。', 'zh': '其在本文,以一系法用于语言建模 - 单词级n-gram与神经语言模形,及字符级神经语言模形 - 以检雠言犯性之问。 吾曹究结果表明,语言得文本仇冒。 然而,我们的研究还明白,更古文本分类常常相似或更好。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम भाषा मॉडलिंग के लिए दृष्टिकोणों की एक श्रृंखला लागू करते हैं - जिसमें शब्द-स्तर के एन-ग्राम और तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल, और चरित्र-स्तर के तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल शामिल हैं - नफरत भाषण और आक्रामक भाषा का पता लगाने की समस्या के लिए। हमारे निष्कर्षों से संकेत मिलता है कि भाषा मॉडल इस बात के ज्ञान को कैप्चर करने में सक्षम हैं कि पाठ घृणित या आक्रामक है या नहीं। हालांकि, हमारे निष्कर्ष यह भी इंगित करते हैं कि पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए अधिक पारंपरिक दृष्टिकोण अक्सर समान या बेहतर प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы применяем ряд подходов к языковому моделированию – в том числе на уровне слов n-грамм и нейронных языковых моделей, а также на уровне символов нейронных языковых моделей – к проблеме обнаружения ненавистнической речи и оскорбительного языка. Наши результаты показывают, что языковые модели способны захватывать знания о том, является ли текст ненавистническим или оскорбительным. Однако наши выводы также показывают, что более традиционные подходы к классификации текста часто работают аналогичным образом или лучше.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo cuirimid i bhfeidhm raon cur chuige maidir le samhaltú teanga – lena n-áirítear n-gram ag leibhéal na bhfocal agus múnlaí teanga néaracha, agus múnlaí néartheanga ag leibhéal carachtar – leis an bhfadhb a bhaineann le fuathchaint agus teanga maslach a bhrath. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí go bhfuil múnlaí teanga in ann eolas a fháil faoi cé acu an bhfuil an téacs fuathmhar nó maslach. Mar sin féin, tugann ár dtorthaí le fios freisin go bhfeidhmíonn cineálacha cur chuige níos traidisiúnta maidir le haicmiú téacs mar an gcéanna nó níos fearr.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ვიყენებთ რამდენიმე წარმოდგენები ენის მოდელისთვის - როგორც სიტყვების n- დრამის და ნეიროლური ენის მოდელისთვის, და სიტყვების ნეიროლური ენის მოდელისთვის - პრობლემაში, რო ჩვენი მონაცემები გვეჩვენება, რომ ენათის მოდელები შეუძლიათ გააკეთოთ ცნობიერება თუ ტექსტი ცნობიერია თუ არა ცნობიერია. მაგრამ ჩვენი შესაძლებლობები ასევე აჩვენებენ, რომ უფრო კონტრაციონალური დახმარება ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციაში ზოგიერთად იგივეა ან უფრო მეტია.', 'it': 'In questo articolo applichiamo una serie di approcci alla modellazione del linguaggio - inclusi modelli di linguaggio n-gram a livello di parola e neurale, e modelli di linguaggio neurale a livello di carattere - al problema del rilevamento del linguaggio di odio e del linguaggio offensivo. I nostri risultati indicano che i modelli linguistici sono in grado di catturare la conoscenza se il testo è odioso o offensivo. Tuttavia, i nostri risultati indicano anche che gli approcci più convenzionali alla classificazione dei testi spesso funzionano in modo simile o migliore.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente taikome įvairius požiūrius į kalbų modeliavimą - įskaitant žodžių lygio n-gram ų ir nervinių kalbų modelius, taip pat požymių lygio neuralinių kalbų modelius - neapykantos kalbos ir priešiškos kalbos aptikimo problemai. Our findings indicate that language models are able to capture knowledge of whether text is hateful or offensive.  Tačiau mūsų išvados taip pat rodo, kad paprastesni tekstų klasifikavimo metodai dažnai atliekami panašiai ar geriau.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда тілдерді моделдеу үшін бірнеше арқылы - n- грамм мен неврал тіл үлгілері және белгілер деңгейіндегі неврал тіл үлгілеріне қолданамыз - ненависті сөздерді және қарсы тілдерді анықтау мәселесіне қара Біздің іздегеніміз тіл үлгілері мәтін қарсы немесе қарсы екенін білеуге болады. Бірақ табуларымыз мәтін классификациясының көптеген әдеттегі жағдайларының ұқсас немесе жақсы жағдайды дегенді көрсетеді.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban számos megközelítést alkalmazunk a nyelvi modellezésre - beleértve a szó szintű n-gram és neurális nyelvmodelleket, valamint karakter szintű neurális nyelvmodelleket - a gyűlöletbeszéd és a sértő nyelv felismerésének problémájára. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy a nyelvi modellek képesek megragadni a tudást arról, hogy a szöveg gyűlöletes vagy sértő. Megállapításaink azonban arra is utalnak, hogy a szövegosztályozás hagyományosabb megközelítései gyakran hasonlóan vagy jobban teljesítenek.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία εφαρμόζουμε μια σειρά προσεγγίσεων για τη μοντελοποίηση γλωσσών, συμπεριλαμβανομένων μοντέλων νευρωνικής γλώσσας σε επίπεδο λέξης και νευρωνικής γλώσσας, και μοντέλων νευρωνικής γλώσσας σε επίπεδο χαρακτήρων, στο πρόβλημα της ανίχνευσης ρητορικής μίσους και προσβλητικής γλώσσας. Τα ευρήματά μας δείχνουν ότι τα γλωσσικά μοντέλα είναι σε θέση να συλλάβουν γνώση για το αν το κείμενο είναι μίσος ή προσβλητικό. Ωστόσο, τα ευρήματά μας δείχνουν επίσης ότι οι πιο συμβατικές προσεγγίσεις στην ταξινόμηση κειμένων συχνά αποδίδουν παρόμοια ή καλύτερα.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami melaksanakan julat pendekatan kepada pemodelan bahasa - termasuk n-gram aras perkataan dan model bahasa saraf, dan model bahasa saraf aras aksara - untuk masalah mengesan ucapan kebencian dan bahasa yang menyerang. Penemuan kami menunjukkan bahawa model bahasa mampu menangkap pengetahuan sama ada teks benci atau menyerang. Namun, penemuan kami juga menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan yang lebih konvensional kepada klasifikasi teks sering melakukan yang sama atau lebih baik.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument qed nagħmlu sensiela ta’ approċċi għall-mudellar tal-lingwi - inklużi mudelli tal-lingwi n-gramma tal-livell tal-kelma u n-gramma tal-lingwi newrali, u mudelli tal-lingwi newrali fil-livell tal-karattru - għall-problem a tal-identifikazzjoni tad-diskors tal-mibegħda u tal-lingwa Is-sejbiet tagħna jindikaw li l-mudelli lingwistiċi jistgħu jaqbdu l-għarfien dwar jekk it-test huwiex mibegħdi jew ofensiv. Madankollu, is-sejbiet tagħna jindikaw ukoll li approċċi aktar konvenzjonali għall-klassifikazzjoni tat-test spiss iwettqu b’mod simili jew aħjar.', 'mk': 'Во овој документ применуваме голем број пристапи кон моделирањето на јазиците - вклучувајќи ги и моделите на јазикот на зборот n-грам и нервен јазик, и моделите на нервен јазик на карактер - на проблемот со детектирање на говорот на омраза и навреден јазик. Нашите откритија покажуваат дека јазичките модели можат да го фатат знаењето дали текстот е мразен или навредлив. Сепак, нашите откритија, исто така, покажуваат дека поконвенционалните пристапи кон класификацијата на текстот честопати вршат слични или подобри резултати.', 'no': 'I denne papiret bruker vi eit rekkje tilnærmingar til språk- modellering, inkludert ordnivå n- gram og neuralspråk- modeller, og teiknivå neuralspråk- modeller, til problemet med å finna hatspråk og offensiv språk. Finningane våre tyder på at språk-modeller kan henta kunnskap om teksten er hattig eller offensiv. Finningane våre viser imidlertid også at fleire konvensjonelle tilnærmingar til tekstklassifikasjonen ofte utfører likevel eller bedre.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡലേഷനിലേക്ക് ഒരുപാട് സാധ്യതകള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. വാക്ക് നില നില N-ഗ്രാമും ന്യൂറല്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളും അക്ഷരത്തിലെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d  ഞങ്ങളുടെ കണ്ടുപിടികള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു ഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് പദാവലി വെറുപ്പുണ്ടോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ആക്രമിക്ക എന്നാലും ഞങ്ങളുടെ കണ്ടുപിടികളും കാണിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കിലും ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷനിലേക്കുള്ള കൂടുതല', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule stosujemy szereg podejść do modelowania języka językowego, w tym modele językowe na poziomie słowa n-gram i neuronowe modele językowe na poziomie znaków, do problemu wykrywania mowy nienawiści i języka obraźliwego. Nasze ustalenia wskazują, że modele językowe są w stanie uchwycić wiedzę o tym, czy tekst jest nienawiściwy czy obraźliwy. Nasze ustalenia wskazują jednak również, że bardziej konwencjonalne podejścia do klasyfikacji tekstów często działają podobnie lub lepiej.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare aplicăm o serie de abordări ale modelării limbajului - inclusiv modele de limbaj n-gram la nivel de cuvânt și neural, precum și modele de limbaj neural la nivel de caracter - problemei detectării vorbirii la ură și a limbajului ofensator. Descoperirile noastre indică faptul că modelele lingvistice sunt capabile să capteze cunoștințe despre dacă textul este urât sau ofensator. Cu toate acestea, constatările noastre indică, de asemenea, faptul că abordările mai convenționale ale clasificării textelor funcționează adesea similar sau mai bine.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэл загварын загварын олон арга барилгуудыг ашиглаж байна. n-түвшин, мэдрэлийн хэл загварууд, хариу үйлдэлийн мэдрэлийн хэл загварууд нь үзэн ядах яриа, эсрэг хэл олох асуудалд ашигладаг. Бидний олж мэдсэн зүйл нь хэл загварууд текст үзэн ядах эсвэл үзэн ядах эсэхийг ойлгох боломжтой байдаг. Гэхдээ бидний ололтууд мөн текст хуваалцааны илүү хувилбар нь ихэвчлэн адилхан эсвэл сайн ажилладаг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu ku codsanaynaa qaabab kala duduwan tusaale ahaan luuqada- sida qoraalka n-gram iyo tusaalaha afka neurada, iyo tusaalaha afka neurada ee heerka- dhibaatada ku saabsan hadalka nacaybka iyo luuqada caasinimada. Shaqooyinkayada waxay muujinayaan in qaababka luuqadu ay awoodaan inay ogaadaan in qoraalku uu nebcaado iyo in uu dembi karo. Si kastaba ha ahaatee heshiisyadeenu waxay sidoo kale ka muuqataa in qasabka farsamada warqada ah inta badan si siman ama si wanaagsan loo sameeyo.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru primjenjujemo niz pristupa jezičkom modeliranju - uključujući n-gram reči i neuralnog jezika modela, i neuralnog jezika modela karaktera - n a problem otkrivanja govora mržnje i ofanzivnog jezika. Naši nalazi ukazuju na to da su jezički modeli u stanju da uhvatimo znanje da li je tekst mržnja ili ofanzivna. Međutim, naši nalazi takođe ukazuju na to da više konvencionalnih pristupa klasifikaciji teksta često čine sličnim ili boljim.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි භාෂාව මොඩිලින්ග් විදිහට අවස්ථාවක් අවස්ථාව කරනවා - වචන ස්තූතිය n-ග්\u200dරාම් සහ න්\u200dයූරල් භාෂාව මොඩිල් වලින්, සහ අපේ හොයාගන්න පෙන්වන්නේ භාෂා මෝඩේල්ස් වලින් දැනගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පාළුවන් පාළුවන් වි නමුත්, අපේ හොයාගන්න පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වගේම පාළුවන් විශේෂණ විශේෂණයට වඩා සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂණය ස', 'ta': 'இந்த தாளில் நாம் மொழி மாதிரியை மாற்றுதலுக்கு வேறு வழிகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் - சொல்ல- நிலை n- கிராம் மற்றும் புதிய மொழி மாதிரிகள் உள்ளன, மற்றும் எழ எங்கள் கண்டுபிடிப்புகள் மொழி மாதிரிகளை பிடிக்க முடியும் என்பதை குறிப்பிடுகிறது உரை வெறுப்பாக இருக் எனினும், எங்கள் கண்டுபிடிப்புகளும் உரை வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கு மிகவும் வழக்கமான நெருங்குகளை குறிப்பிடுகிறது அதே', 'sv': 'I den här uppsatsen tillämpar vi en rad tillvägagångssätt för språkmodellering - inklusive ordnivå n-gram och neurala språkmodeller, och karaktärsnivå neurala språkmodeller - på problemet att upptäcka hattal och stötande språk. Våra resultat tyder på att språkmodeller kan fånga kunskap om huruvida text är hatisk eller stötande. Men våra resultat visar också att mer konventionella metoder för textklassificering ofta fungerar på samma sätt eller bättre.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم زبان موڈلینگ کے لئے بہت سی طریقے لازم کرتے ہیں - کلمات-سطح n-گرم اور نیورل زبان موڈل کے شامل ہوتے ہیں، اور شخصت-سطح نیورل زبان موڈل - ناپسند زبان اور ناپسند زبان کی تلاش کی مشکل پر۔ ہمارے نتیجے نشان دیتے ہیں کہ زبان نمونے کو علم حاصل کر سکتے ہیں کہ آیا پیغام ناپسند ہے یا ناپسند ہے۔ اگرچہ ہمارے نتیجے بھی نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ٹیکسٹ کلاسیفوں کے زیادہ معمولی طریقے بہت سی طرح یا بہتر عمل کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda biz tilning modelini qo'shish imkoniyatlarini qo'llayapmiz - so'zning darajasi n-gram va neyural tilning modellari, va harf darajasi neyural modellari - yolg'on tilni aniqlash va offensiv tilni ko'rsatish muammolari uchun. Bizning natijalarimiz tilning modellarini bilish mumkin, matn yomonlik yoki tortib boʻlishi mumkin. However, our findings also indicate that more conventional approaches to text classification often perform similarly or better.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy n ày, chúng tôi áp dụng một loạt các phương pháp để mềm ngôn ngữ, bao gồm cả các mô hình chữ n-gram và ngôn ngữ thần kinh, và các mô hình thần kinh của ngôn ngữ thần kinh cấp ký tự... tới vấn đề phát hiện ngôn ngữ ghét và ngôn ngữ tấn công. Những phát hiện của ta cho thấy các mô hình ngôn ngữ có khả năng nắm bắt kiến thức về văn bản ghét hay khiêu khích. Tuy nhiên, những kết quả của chúng tôi cũng cho thấy các phương pháp văn bản thông thường thường diễn ra tương tự hay tốt hơn.', 'bg': 'В тази статия ние прилагаме набор от подходи към езиковото моделиране - включително езикови модели на ниво дума-грам и невронни езикови модели, както и модели на невронни езикови модели на ниво знаци - към проблема с откриването на речта на омразата и обидните езици. Нашите констатации показват, че езиковите модели са в състояние да уловят знания за това дали текстът е омразен или обиден. Въпреки това, нашите констатации също показват, че по-конвенционалните подходи за класификация на текста често се представят еднакво или по-добре.', 'da': 'I denne artikel anvender vi en række tilgange til sprogmodellering - herunder ordniveau n-gram og neurale sprogmodeller, og karakter-niveau neurale sprogmodeller - til problemet med at detektere hadefuld tale og stødende sprog. Vores resultater indikerer, at sprogmodeller er i stand til at fange viden om, hvorvidt tekst er hadefuld eller stødende. Vores resultater viser imidlertid også, at mere konventionelle metoder til tekstklassifikation ofte fungerer på samme måde eller bedre.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel passen we een reeks benaderingen toe op taalmodellering, waaronder n-gram op woordniveau en neurale taalmodellen, en neurale taalmodellen op karakterniveau, op het probleem van het detecteren van haatspraak en aanstootgevende taal. Uit onze bevindingen blijkt dat taalmodellen in staat zijn kennis vast te leggen over of tekst haatdragend of aanstootgevend is. Uit onze bevindingen blijkt echter ook dat meer conventionele benaderingen van tekstclassificatie vaak vergelijkbaar of beter presteren.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag wenden wir eine Reihe von Ansätzen zur Sprachmodellierung an, darunter N-Gram- und neuronale Sprachmodelle auf Wortebene und neuronale Sprachmodelle auf Zeichenebene, um das Problem der Erkennung von Hassreden und anstößiger Sprache zu untersuchen. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass Sprachmodelle in der Lage sind, Wissen darüber zu erfassen, ob Text hasserfüllt oder beleidigend ist. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen aber auch, dass herkömmlichere Ansätze zur Textklassifizierung oft ähnlich oder besser funktionieren.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru primjenjujemo niz pristupa jezičkom modeliranju - uključujući n-gram riječi i modele neuralnog jezika i neuralnog jezika n a razinu karaktera - problemu otkrivanja govora mržnje i ofanzivnog jezika. Naši nalazi ukazuju na to da su jezički modeli u mogućnosti uhvatiti znanje da li je tekst mržnja ili uvredljiv. Međutim, naši nalazi također ukazuju na to da više konvencionalnih pristupa klasifikaciji teksta često čine sličnim ili boljim.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما به مشکل شناسایی سخنرانی و زبان ناراحتی کلمه n-گرم و مدل زبان عصبی، و مدل زبان عصبی در سطح شخصیت - استفاده می کنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل\u200cهای زبان می\u200cتوانند دانش را دریافت کنند که آیا متن متنفر است یا متنفر است. با این حال، نتیجه\u200cهای ما هم نشان می\u200cدهند که نزدیک\u200cهای معمولی بیشتر به فرقه\u200cبندی متن اغلب شبیه یا بهتر انجام می\u200cدهند.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii tunatumia mbinu nyingi za mifano ya lugha - ikiwa ni pamoja n a mifano ya rangi ya n-gram na mifano ya lugha ya asili, na mifano ya lugha ya kiurahisi - kwa tatizo la kutambua hotuba ya chuki na lugha ya uchochezi. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa mifano ya lugha inaweza kupata ufahamu wa kama maandishi yanachukia au yanachukia. Hata hivyo, matokeo yetu pia yanaonyesha kuwa namna nyingi za kawaida za kutanganisha maandishi mara nyingi hufanya vizuri au vizuri zaidi.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda biz dil modelleşdirmegi üçin bir topar gollaşyk uygulaýarys - söz derejesi n-gram we neural dil modellerinde we karakterleriň derejesi neural dil modellerinde - ýigrenýän sözleri we hassas dilini tanamak kynçylyga mümkin edýäris. Biziň tapylyklarymyz dil nusgalarynyň metin ýigrenýän ýa-da howpsyzdygyny bilmegi başarmagy mümkin edýär. Ýöne biziň tapylyklarymyz metin klasifikasyyna köplenç meňzeş ýa-da gowy hereket edip bilýändigini belirtýär.', 'af': "In hierdie papier toewend ons 'n reek van toegang tot taal modellering - insluitend woord- vlak n- gram en neurale taal modelles en karaktervlak neurale taal modelles - tot die probleem van ontdekking van haat spraak en offensivele taal. Ons bevestings wys dat taal modele kan kennis opneem of teks haatlik of offensiv is. Maar ons bevestings indiek ook dat meer konvensionale toegang tot teks klasifikasie dikwels gelyk of beter uitvoer.", 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 단어급 n-gram과 신경언어모델, 그리고 문자급 신경언어모델을 포함한 일련의 언어 모델링 방법을 응용하여 증오언어와 공격적인 언어를 검출했다.우리의 연구 결과에 따르면 언어 모델은 텍스트가 원한인지 무례한 지식인지 포착할 수 있다.그러나 우리의 연구 결과에 의하면 더욱 전통적인 텍스트 분류 방법은 종종 비슷하거나 더 좋은 효과를 나타낸다.', 'am': 'በዚህ ካላት ውስጥ ቃላት የ-ደረጃ n-gram እና የናውራዊ ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች እና የፊደል ደረጃ የናውራዊ ቋንቋ ዓይነቶች እና የጥል ንግግር እና አሰቃፊ ቋንቋን ለማግኘት ችግር እና መግለጫ መሆኑን እናደርጋለን፡፡ የቋንቋዎች ምሳሌዎች ጽሑፍ ጥላቻ ወይም አሰቃፊ መሆኑን ማወቅ ይችላሉ፡፡ ነገር ግን ፍላጎታችን ደግሞ የጽሑፍ መግለጫ ብዙ ጊዜ በተደጋጋገሙ ወይም በተሻሉ እንዲያደርጉ የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք կիրառում ենք լեզվի մոդելների մի շարք մոտեցումներ, ներառյալ բառի մակարդակի n-գրամը և նյարդային լեզվի մոդելները, և բնության մակարդակի նյարդային լեզվի մոդելները, ատելու խոսքի և գրավիչ լեզվի հայ Մեր հայտնաբերությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ լեզվի մոդելները կարողանում են վերցնել գիտելիքները, թե տեքստը ատելի է, թե գրավիչ: Այնուամենայնիվ, մեր հայտնաբերությունները նաև ցույց են տալիս, որ տեքստի դասակարգման ավելի ավանդական մոտեցումները հաճախ կատարվում են նման կամ ավելի լավ:', 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪzda dil modell…ôrin…ô bir √ßox yaxńĪnlńĪq uydurur - s√∂z-seviyy…ôti n-gram v…ô n √∂ral dil modell…ôri, karakter-seviyy…ôti n√∂ral dil modell…ôri - nifr…ôt s√∂zl…ôrini v…ô offensive dill…ôrini tanńĪma problem …ô istifad…ô edirik. Bizim tapńĪndńĪqlarńĪmńĪz dil modell…ôrinin m…ôtnl…ôrin nifr…ôt v…ô h…ôddi aŇümasńĪ haqqńĪnda bilgi almasńĪ m√ľmk√ľn olduńüunu g√∂st…ôrir. Ancaq tapńĪlarńĪmńĪz da bel…ô g√∂st…ôrir ki, metin klasifikasiyasńĪnńĪn daha √ßox alńĪŇükanlńĪq t…ôrzl…ôrini √ßox √ßox eyni v…ô yaxŇüńĪ iŇül…ôr edir.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru primjenjujemo niz pristupa jezičkom modeliranju - uključujući n-grame riječi i modele neuralnog jezika, i modele neuralnog jezika n a nivou karaktera - na problem otkrivanja govora mržnje i ofanzivnog jezika. Naši nalazi ukazuju na to da su jezički modeli u stanju da uhvatimo znanje da li je tekst mržnja ili ofanzivna. Međutim, naši nalazi također ukazuju na to da više konvencionalnih pristupa klasifikaciji teksta često čine sličnim ili boljim.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ভাষার মডেলিং এ বেশ কিছু উপায় প্রয়োগ করি- যার মধ্যে শব্দ এন-গ্রাম এবং নিউরাল ভাষার মডেল এবং চরিত্র-স্তরের নিউরেল ভাষা মডেল, ঘৃণা ভাষ আমাদের আবিস্কার নির্দেশ দেয়া হয়েছে যে ভাষার মডেল লেখাটি ঘৃণা বা আক্রমণ কিনা সম্পর্কে জ্ঞান পেতে পারে। তবে আমাদের আবিস্কার নির্দেশ দেয়া হয়েছে যে টেক্সট গ্রাফিকেশনের ক্ষেত্রে প্রায়শই একই বা ভালো কাজ করে।', 'ca': "En aquest paper aplicam una sèrie d'enfocaments a la modelació de llenguatges - incloent models de llenguatges n-gram a nivell de paraules i neurals, i models de llenguatges neurals a nivell de caràcter - al problema de detectar discurs d'odi i llenguatges ofensius. Els nostres descobriments indican que els models lingüístics són capaços de capturar el coneixement de si el text és odiós o ofensiu. Tot i així, els nostres descobriments també indican que els enfocaments més convencionals de la classificació de text sovint funcionen de manera similar o millor.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös rakendame erinevaid lähenemisviise keele modelleerimisele - sealhulgas sõnatasemel n-grammi- ja närvikeelemudeleid ning märgitasemel neuraalkeelemudeleid - vihakõne ja solvava keele tuvastamise probleemile. Meie tulemused näitavad, et keelemudelid suudavad jäädvustada teadmisi, kas tekst on vihatav või solvav. Meie tulemused näitavad siiski, et tavalisemad lähenemisviisid teksti klassifitseerimisele toimivad sageli sarnaselt või paremini.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku aplikujeme řadu přístupů k jazykovému modelování, včetně slovních a neuronových jazykových modelů a znakových modelů neuronového jazyka, na problém detekce nenávistné řeči a urážlivého jazyka. Naše zjištění ukazují, že jazykové modely jsou schopny zachytit znalosti o tom, zda je text nenávistný nebo urážlivý. Naše zjištění však také naznačují, že konvenčnější přístupy k klasifikaci textů často fungují podobně nebo lépe.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa sovellamme erilaisia lähestymistapoja kielimallinnukseen - mukaan lukien sanatason n-gramma- ja neurokielimallit sekä merkkitason neurokielimallit - vihapuheen ja loukkaavan kielen havaitsemiseen. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että kielimallit pystyvät vangitsemaan tietoa siitä, onko teksti vihamielistä vai loukkaavaa. Tuloksemme osoittavat kuitenkin myös, että perinteisemmät lähestymistavat tekstin luokitteluun toimivat usein samalla tavalla tai paremmin.', 'sq': 'In this paper we apply a range of approaches to language modeling - including word-level n-gram and neural language models, and character-level neural language models - to the problem of detecting hate speech and offensive language.  Our findings indicate that language models are able to capture knowledge of whether text is hateful or offensive.  However, our findings also indicate that more conventional approaches to text classification often perform similarly or better.', 'id': 'In this paper we apply a range of approaches to language modeling - including word-level n-gram and neural language models, and character-level neural language models - to the problem of detecting hate speech and offensive language.  Our findings indicate that language models are able to capture knowledge of whether text is hateful or offensive.  Namun, penemuan kami juga menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan yang lebih konvensional untuk klasifikasi teks sering melakukan hal yang sama atau lebih baik.', 'sk': 'V prispevku uporabljamo vrsto pristopov k modeliranju jezikov - vključno z besednimi n-gramskimi in nevronskimi jezikovnimi modeli ter znakovnimi nevronskimi jezikovnimi modeli - za problem odkrivanja sovražnega govora in žaljivega jezika. Naše ugotovitve kažejo, da jezikovni modeli lahko zajamejo znanje o tem, ali je besedilo sovražno ali žaljivo. Naše ugotovitve pa kažejo tudi, da bolj konvencionalni pristopi k klasifikaciji besedil pogosto delujejo podobno ali bolje.', 'ha': "cikin wannan takardan da Muke amfani da wasu hanyõyi zuwa misalin harshe - kamar misãlai n a-leveli n-gram da shiryoyin harshe na neura, da misãlai masu cikin zane-daraja na rubutu - zuwa matsalar da za'a gane magana na ƙetare da harshe na ƙetare. FantayinMu na nũna cewa misalin harshe za'a iya iya gano kan ma'anar littãfi ne mai ƙyãma ko kuma ya yi ƙiyayya. Kayya, da fassararmu, misãlai na bayana, yana nũna cewa masu haɗi zuwa fassarar matsayi, ko da yawa, su yi aiki daidai ko da mafi alhẽri.", 'jv': 'Nang pepul iki, kita kang aplikasi sistem karo akeh sampeyan kanggo model urip - gambar kelas-evel n-gram lan model kuwi nggambar, lan model kuwi nggambar kelas-usul luwih model - sampeyan nggo langa kuwi maur - iso urip kuwi cebungke nggawe usul dan langa usul. Kita mbukaké ngerti ra tindang model sing bisa nguasai nggawe ngerti apa ora seneng pisan banget. Mangkin, akeh awak dhéwé ngerasakno iki dadi, akeh susahe sakjane kanggo teks nglarakno luwih apik lan luwih apik.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྐད་རིགས་མིག་བཀོད་པའི་མཐུན་གཟུགས་ལས་ཕན་ཚུལ་མཚམས་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མཐོང་སྣང་གིས་སྐད་ཀྱི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་གེ་ཡིག་གེ་གསལ་བཤད་ནི་འགོད་ཐུབ་མིན། ཡིན་ནའང་། ང་ཚོའི་མི་ཚིག་པས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་ཡིག་གི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དང་དེ་ལྟར་བདེ་བོ་ཡོ', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנו משתמשים במגוון של גישות לדוגמאת שפות - כולל דגמאות של רמת מילים n-גרם ושפת עצבית, ודגמאות של שפת עצבית רמת אופיים - לבעיה של גילוי נאום שנאה ושפה פגיעה. הממצאים שלנו מצביעים שדוגמני שפה מסוגלים לתפוס ידע אם הטקסט שונא או מעליב. בכל אופן, הממצאים שלנו מצביעים גם כי גישות קונבנסיונליות יותר לקליסציה טקסט לעתים קרובות מבצעים באופן דומה או טוב יותר.'}
{'en': 'UTFPR at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Hate Speech Identification with Recurrent Neural Networks', 'ar': 'UTFPR في SemEval-2019 المهمة 5: تحديد الكلام الذي يحض على الكراهية باستخدام الشبكات العصبية المتكررة', 'fr': 'UTFPR au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 5\xa0: Identification des discours haineux avec des réseaux de neurones récurrents', 'es': 'UTFPR en Semeval-2019 Tarea 5: Identificación de discursos de odio con redes neuronales recurrentes', 'pt': 'UTFPR na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 5: Identificação de Discurso de Ódio com Redes Neurais Recorrentes', 'ja': 'UTFPR at SemEval -2019 Task 5: Hate Speech Identification with Recurrent Neural Networks', 'ru': 'UTFPR на SemEval-2019 Задача 5: Идентификация ненавистнической речи с рекуррентными нейронными сетями', 'zh': 'UTFPR在SemEval-20195:用递归神经网络知怨言', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 5 पर UTFPR: आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ हेट स्पीच आइडेंटिफिकेशन', 'ga': 'UTFPR ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 5: Is fuath liom Aitheantas Cainte le Líonraí Néaracha Athfhillteacha', 'el': 'Καθήκον 5: Αναγνώριση της ομιλίας μίσους με επαναλαμβανόμενα Νευρικά Δίκτυα', 'hu': 'UTFPR a SemEval-2019 5. feladat: Gyűlölet beszéd azonosítása ismétlődő ideghálózatokkal', 'lt': 'UTFPR pusEval-2019 5 užduotis: neapykantos kalbos identifikavimas su pasikartojančiais neuroniais tinklais', 'it': "UTFPR a SemEval-2019 Task 5: Identificazione del discorso d'odio con reti neurali ricorrenti", 'ms': 'UTFPR pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Pengenalan Ucapan Kebencian dengan Rangkaian Neural Berulang', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 5- ല്\u200d UTFPR: വീണ്ടും നീയുറല്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകളുമായി വാക്ക് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത', 'mt': 'UTFPR at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Hate Speech Identification with Recurrent Neural Networks', 'mk': 'UTFPR на SemEval-2019 задача 5: Идентификација на говорот на омраза со рецидентни неурални мрежи', 'kk': 'UTFPR жалғыз- 2019 тапсырмасында 5- тапсырма: қайталанатын нейралық желілерден қарсы сөздерді анықтау', 'mn': 'UTFPR at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Hate Speech Identification with Recurrent Neural Networks', 'pl': 'UTFPR w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 5: Identyfikacja mowy nienawiści z powtarzającymi się sieciami neuronowymi', 'ro': 'UTFPR la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 5: Identificarea discursului de ură cu rețelele neurale recurente', 'no': 'UTFPR ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 5: Hatt språk- identifikasjon med gjentakelige neuralnettverk', 'ka': 'UTFPR semiEval-2019 დავალება 5: მომწოდებული ნეიროლური ქსელების განსაზღვრება', 'so': 'UTFPR at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Hatay Speech Identification with Recurrent Neural Network', 'sv': 'UTFPR på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 5: Identifiering av hattal med återkommande neurala nätverk', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணியில் UTFPR 5: Recurrent Neural Network with Hate Speech Identification', 'si': 'UTFPR at Halfeval-2019 Job 5: Hate Talk ID with Reiteral neural Netwarks', 'ur': 'UTFPR نیویل-2019 ٹاکس ۵ میں: دوبارہ نیویرول نیٹورک کے ساتھ ناپسند بات شناسایی', 'sr': 'UTFPR na semiEval-2019 zadatak 5: Identifikacija reči mržnje sa ponovnim neuronskim mrežama', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifani 5: Qaytarilgan Neural Tarmoqlar bilan ishlatish uchun UTFPR', 'vi': 'UTFR ở SemEvl-2009 Task 5: Nhận diện ghét qua mạng thần kinh liên tiếp.', 'hr': 'UTFPR na semiEval-2019 zadatak 5: identifikacija govora mržnje s ponovnim neuronskim mrežama', 'bg': 'Задача 5: Идентификация на речта на омразата с повтарящи се неврални мрежи', 'da': 'UTFPR på SemEval-2019 Opgave 5: Identifikation af had med tilbagevendende neurale netværk', 'nl': 'UTFPR bij SemEval-2019 Taak 5: Hate Speech Identificatie met Recurrent Neural Networks', 'de': 'UTFPR bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 5: Hate Speech Identifikation mit wiederkehrenden neuronalen Netzwerken', 'ko': 'UTFPR이 SemEval-2019 작업 5: 역귀신경 네트워크를 사용하여 증오된 음성을 식별', 'fa': 'UTFPR در پایین Eval-2019 کار ۵: شناسایی سخنرانی متنفر با شبکه\u200cهای عصبی دوباره', 'id': 'UTFPR di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Identifikasi Bicara Kebencian dengan Rangkaian Neural Berikutnya', 'sw': 'UTFPR kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 5: Inachukia Hotuba Kutambuliwa na Mtandao wa Karibu unaoendelea', 'sq': 'UTFPR at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Hate Speech Identification with Recurrent Neural Networks', 'af': 'UTFPR by SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 5: Hate Speletjie Identifikasie met Herhaalde Neurale Netwerke', 'tr': 'UTFPR at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Hate Speech Identification with Recurrent Neural Networks', 'hy': 'Դադար', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৫-এ UTFPR: প্রত্যাবর্তন নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে ভাষণ পরিচয় ঘৃণা করে', 'az': 'UTFPR at semiEval-2019 Task 5: Repeat Neural Networks with Hate Speech Identification', 'bs': 'UTFPR na semiEval-2019 zadatak 5: identifikacija govora mržnje sa ponovnim neuronskim mrežama', 'am': 'UTFPR at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Hate Speech Identification with Recurrent Neural Networks', 'ca': 'UTFPR a SemEval-2019 Task 5: Identification of Hate Speech with Recurrent Neural Networks', 'et': 'UTFPR SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 5: Vihakõne identifitseerimine korduvate närvivõrkudega', 'cs': 'Úkol 5: Identifikace nenávistné řeči s recidivními neuronovými sítěmi', 'fi': 'UTFPR SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 5: Vihanpuheen tunnistaminen toistuvilla hermoverkoilla', 'jv': 'UTFPI nang semi-inval-2011 task 5: Kutresno Talk ID karo recurent Neral Network', 'he': 'UTFPR ב-SemEval-2019 משימה 5: זיהוי נאום שנאה עם רשתות נוירוליות מחדשות', 'ha': 'Neural Networks', 'sk': 'UTFPR na SemEval-2019 Naloga 5: Identifikacija sovražnega govora s ponavljajočimi se živčnimi mrežami', 'bo': 'UTFPR at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Hate Speech Identification with Recurrent Neural Networks'}
{'en': 'In this paper we revisit the problem of automatically identifying hate speech in posts from social media. We approach the task using a system based on minimalistic compositional Recurrent Neural Networks (RNN). We tested our approach on the SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter (HatEval) shared task dataset. The dataset made available by the HatEval organizers contained English and Spanish posts retrieved from Twitter annotated with respect to the presence of hateful content and its target. In this paper we present the results obtained by our system in comparison to the other entries in the shared task. Our system achieved competitive performance ranking 7th in sub-task A out of 62 systems in the English track.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نعيد النظر في مشكلة التعرف التلقائي على خطاب الكراهية في المنشورات من وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. نتعامل مع المهمة باستخدام نظام يعتمد على الشبكات العصبية المتكررة التركيبية (RNN). اختبرنا أسلوبنا في مهمة SemEval-2019 5: الاكتشاف متعدد اللغات لخطاب الكراهية ضد المهاجرين والنساء في Twitter (HatEval) مجموعة بيانات المهام المشتركة. تحتوي مجموعة البيانات التي أتاحها منظمو HatEval على منشورات باللغتين الإنجليزية والإسبانية تم استردادها من Twitter مشروحة فيما يتعلق بوجود محتوى يحض على الكراهية وهدفه. في هذا البحث نقدم النتائج التي حصل عليها نظامنا بالمقارنة مع الإدخالات الأخرى في المهمة المشتركة. حقق نظامنا تصنيف الأداء التنافسي السابع في المهمة الفرعية أ من 62 نظامًا في مسار اللغة الإنجليزية.', 'es': 'En este artículo revisamos el problema de la identificación automática de la incitación al odio en las publicaciones de las redes sociales. Abordamos la tarea utilizando un sistema basado en redes neuronales recurrentes (RNN) compositivas minimalistas. Probamos nuestro enfoque en el conjunto de datos de tareas compartidas Tarea 5: Detección multilingüe del discurso de odio contra inmigrantes y mujeres en Twitter (HaTeval). El conjunto de datos puesto a disposición por los organizadores de HaTeval contenía publicaciones en inglés y español recuperadas de Twitter anotadas con respecto a la presencia de contenido de odio y su objetivo. En este artículo presentamos los resultados obtenidos por nuestro sistema en comparación con las demás entradas de la tarea compartida. Nuestro sistema logró un rendimiento competitivo en el puesto 7 en la subtarea A de 62 sistemas en la vía inglesa.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous réexaminons le problème de l'identification automatique des discours haineux dans les publications des réseaux sociaux. Nous abordons la tâche à l'aide d'un système basé sur des réseaux de neurones récurrents (RNN) compositionnels minimalistes. Nous avons testé notre approche sur l'ensemble de tâches partagé SemEVAL-2019 Tâche 5\xa0: Détection multilingue du discours de haine contre les immigrants et les femmes sur Twitter (HatEval). Le jeu de données mis à disposition par les organisateurs de HatEval contenait des publications en anglais et en espagnol récupérées sur Twitter annotées concernant la présence de contenu haineux et sa cible. Dans cet article, nous présentons les résultats obtenus par notre système par rapport aux autres entrées de la tâche partagée. Notre système a obtenu des performances compétitives en se classant 7e dans la sous-tâche A sur 62 systèmes dans la filière anglaise.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo revisitamos o problema de identificar automaticamente o discurso de ódio em postagens de mídias sociais. Abordamos a tarefa usando um sistema baseado em Redes Neurais Recorrentes (RNN) de composição minimalista. Testamos nossa abordagem no conjunto de dados de tarefas compartilhadas SemEval-2019 Task 5: Detecção multilíngue de discurso de ódio contra imigrantes e mulheres no Twitter (HatEval). O conjunto de dados disponibilizado pelos organizadores do HatEval continha postagens em inglês e espanhol recuperadas do Twitter anotadas com relação à presença de conteúdo odioso e seu alvo. Neste artigo apresentamos os resultados obtidos pelo nosso sistema em comparação com as outras entradas na tarefa compartilhada. Nosso sistema alcançou o desempenho competitivo em 7º lugar na subtarefa A de 62 sistemas na faixa de inglês.', 'zh': '本文重审自动识别社交媒体帖中仇言。 吾以极简主义合递归神经网络(RNN)之统以处之。 吾于SemEval-2019务5试吾法:多言检Twitter中针移民女性之仇言(HatEval)共享其数。 HatEval组织者数集Twitter检索到英语西班牙语帖,与仇仇所在。 本文,我们将系统得到的与共享的职务中的他条目较较。 吾道之系于英语者62取竞于子职A中排名第7位。', 'ja': 'この論文では、ソーシャルメディアからの投稿でヘイトスピーチを自動的に特定する問題について再検討します。私たちは、最小構成的再帰的ニューラルネットワーク（ RNN ）に基づいたシステムを使用してタスクにアプローチします。私たちは、SemEval -2019 Task 5: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter (HatEval) shared task datasetでアプローチをテストしました。HatEval主催者が提供するデータセットには、憎悪的なコンテンツの存在とそのターゲットに関して注釈を付けたTwitterから取得した英語とスペイン語の投稿が含まれていました。本稿では、共有タスクの他の項目と比較して、システムが得た結果を提示する。当社のシステムは、競争力のあるパフォーマンスを実現し、英語トラックの62システムのうちサブタスクAで7位にランクインしました。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम सोशल मीडिया से पोस्ट में स्वचालित रूप से नफरत भरे भाषण की पहचान करने की समस्या पर फिर से विचार करते हैं। हम न्यूनतम रचनात्मक आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (RNN) पर आधारित एक प्रणाली का उपयोग करके कार्य से संपर्क करते हैं। हमने SemEval-2019 टास्क 5 पर अपने दृष्टिकोण का परीक्षण किया: ट्विटर (HatEval) साझा कार्य डेटासेट में आप्रवासियों और महिलाओं के खिलाफ हेट स्पीच का बहुभाषी पता लगाना। HatEval आयोजकों द्वारा उपलब्ध कराए गए डेटासेट में घृणित सामग्री और इसके लक्ष्य की उपस्थिति के संबंध में एनोटेट किए गए ट्विटर से पुनर्प्राप्त अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश पोस्ट शामिल थे। इस पेपर में हम साझा कार्य में अन्य प्रविष्टियों की तुलना में हमारे सिस्टम द्वारा प्राप्त परिणामों को प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हमारे सिस्टम ने अंग्रेजी ट्रैक में 62 प्रणालियों में से उप-कार्य ए में 7 वें स्थान पर प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रदर्शन रैंकिंग हासिल की।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы возвращаемся к проблеме автоматической идентификации ненавистнических высказываний в постах из социальных сетей. Подходим к задаче с использованием системы, основанной на минималистических композиционных рекуррентных нейронных сетях (РНС). Мы протестировали наш подход к задаче SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter (HatEval) shared task dataset. В наборе данных, предоставленном организаторами HatEval, содержались сообщения на английском и испанском языках, извлеченные из Twitter, с аннотациями о наличии ненавистнического контента и его цели. В этой статье мы представляем результаты, полученные нашей системой, в сравнении с другими записями в общей задаче. Наша система достигла конкурентной производительности, заняв 7-е место в подзадаче А из 62 систем на английском треке.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo féachaimid arís ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le fuathchaint a aithint go huathoibríoch i bpoist ó na meáin shóisialta. Déanaimid an tasc trí úsáid a bhaint as córas atá bunaithe ar Líonraí Néaracha Athfhillteacha comhdhéanamh íosta (RNN). Thástáil muid ár gcur chuige maidir le Tasc 5 SemEval-2019: Brath Ilteangach um Fhuathchaint i gCoinne Inimircigh agus Mná ar Twitter (HatEval). Sa tacar sonraí a chuir na heagraithe HatEval ar fáil bhí postálacha Béarla agus Spáinnise a fuarthas ó Twitter anótáilte maidir le láithreacht ábhar fuatha agus a sprioc. Sa pháipéar seo cuirimid i láthair na torthaí a fuair ár gcóras i gcomparáid leis na hiontrálacha eile sa tasc roinnte. Bhain ár gcóras feidhmíocht iomaíoch amach sa 7ú háit i bhfothasc A as 62 córas i rian Béarla.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban újra megvizsgáljuk a gyűlöletbeszéd automatikus azonosításának problémáját a közösségi médiából származó bejegyzésekben. A feladatot egy minimalista kompozíciós Recurrent Neural Networks (RNN) rendszerrel közelítjük meg. Megközelítésünket a SemEval-2019 5. feladat: a bevándorlók és nők elleni gyűlöletbeszéd többnyelvű felismerése a Twitteren (HatEval) megosztott feladat adatkészleten teszteltük. A HatEval szervezői által hozzáférhetővé tett adatkészlet angol és spanyol bejegyzéseket tartalmazott a Twitterről, amelyek a gyűlöletes tartalom jelenlétére és célpontjára vonatkoznak. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a rendszerünk által elért eredményeket a megosztott feladat többi bejegyzéséhez képest. Rendszerünk az angol pálya 62 rendszeréből 7. helyezést ért el a versenyképes teljesítményre.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία επανεξετάζουμε το πρόβλημα του αυτόματου εντοπισμού της ρητορικής μίσους σε δημοσιεύσεις από τα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Προσεγγίζουμε το έργο χρησιμοποιώντας ένα σύστημα βασισμένο σε μινιμαλιστικά σύνθετα Επαναλαμβανόμενα Νευρικά Δίκτυα (RNN). Δοκιμάσαμε την προσέγγισή μας στο έργο 5: Πολυγλωσσική ανίχνευση της ομιλίας μίσους κατά των μεταναστών και των γυναικών στο κοινό σύνολο δεδομένων εργασιών στο Twitter (HatEval). Το σύνολο δεδομένων που διατέθηκαν από τους διοργανωτές της HatEval περιείχε αγγλικές και ισπανικές δημοσιεύσεις που ανακτήθηκαν από το Twitter με σχόλια σχετικά με την παρουσία μίσους περιεχομένου και τον στόχο του. Στην παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζουμε τα αποτελέσματα που αποκτήθηκαν από το σύστημά μας σε σύγκριση με τις άλλες καταχωρήσεις στην κοινή εργασία. Το σύστημά μας πέτυχε ανταγωνιστική βαθμολογία 7ης σε υπο-εργασία Α από 62 συστήματα στην αγγλική πίστα.', 'it': "In questo articolo rivediamo il problema dell'identificazione automatica dei discorsi d'odio nei post dei social media. Approfondiamo il compito utilizzando un sistema basato su una composizione minimalista Recurrent Neural Networks (RNN). Abbiamo testato il nostro approccio sul Task 5 SemEval-2019: Rilevazione multilingue del discorso d'odio contro immigrati e donne in Twitter (HatEval). Il dataset messo a disposizione dagli organizzatori di HatEval conteneva post in inglese e spagnolo recuperati da Twitter annotati riguardo alla presenza di contenuti odiosi e al suo target. In questo articolo presentiamo i risultati ottenuti dal nostro sistema rispetto alle altre voci del compito condiviso. Il nostro sistema ha raggiunto prestazioni competitive posizionandosi settimo nella sottomissione A su 62 sistemi della pista inglese.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда социалдық медиақтардың жіберіліктерін автоматты түрде анықтау мәселесін қайталап көреміз. Біз тапсырманы минималистік композициялық қайталанатын невралдық желілер (RNN) негіздеген жүйе қолданып келеміз. Біз 2019 жылдың жарым Eval-2019 тапсырмасының 5. тапсырмасын тексердік: Твиттерде иммигранттер және әйелдердің қарсы көптілік сөйлейтін сөйлейтін көптілік сөйлейтін тапсырмаларды табу HatEval бағдарламаларының қол жеткізілген деректер жинағы Твиттерден ағылшын және Испан поштасы бар. Оның мазмұнын және мақсатына қатысты. Бұл қағазда жүйеміздің жасалған нәтижелерін ортақ тапсырманың басқа жазуларына салыстырып көрсетедік. Біздің жүйеміз ағылшын тіліндегі 62 жүйелерден 7-ші бағандағы конкурентті әрекеттерді жеткізді.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ პრობლემა, რომელიც სოციალური მედიდიაში მპატის სიტყვას ავტომატურად განვიცნობის პრობლემა. ჩვენ მივიღეთ საქმე სისტემის გამოყენება, რომელიც მინიმალური კომპოზიციალური ნეიროლური ქსელები (RNN) დაბაზიან. ჩვენ შევცვალოთ ჩვენი პროგორმა SemEval-2019 დავალების 5-ზე: მრავალენგური განახლობა იმიგრანტების და ქალების გარეშე Twitter-ში (HatEval) გაყოფილი დავალების მონაცემების შესახებ. HatEval-ის ორგანიზატორების მონაცემების კონტაქტი შეიძლება ინგლისური და სპანელი პოსტაციები Twitter-დან მიღებულია, რომლებიც შეუძლებელია, რომლებიც მისი მიხედვით მ ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ჩვენი სისტემიდან მიღებული შედეგები ჩვენი სხვა ჩანაწერების შესაბამისად ჩვენ აღწერეთ. ჩვენი სისტემა დავაკეთებდი კონტეპექტიური კონპექტიური კონტეპექტიური კონტეპექტიური პრენექტირება 7-ში A-ში 62 სისტემაში ანგლი', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയയില്\u200d നിന്നും വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരിക്കുന്ന പ്രശ്നത്തെ സ്വയം വീണ്ടും  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സിസ്റ്റം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ചെറുതായിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2019 ടാസ്ക് 5-ല്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രോഗത്തെ പരീക്ഷിച്ചു: അഭയാസികള്\u200dക്കും സ്ത്രീകള്\u200dക്കും വിരോധമായി വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരിക്കുന് ഹാറ്റെവാല്\u200d സംഘടനക്കാര്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കിയ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷും സ്പാനിഷ് പോസ്റ്റുകളും ടൂട്ടറില്\u200d നിന്നും വെറുപ്പുള്ള ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ലഭിച്ച ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്ന ജോലിയില്\u200d  ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ആഗ്ലീഷ് ട്രാക്കില്\u200d 62 സിസ്റ്റമില്\u200d നിന്ന് പ്രതിരോധിക്കുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d ഏഴാം റ', 'ms': 'In this paper we revisit the problem of automatically identifying hate speech in posts from social media.  Kami mendekati tugas menggunakan sistem berdasarkan rangkaian saraf berulang-ulang minimalistik (RNN). Kami menguji pendekatan kami pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Pengesanan berbilang bahasa Perkataan kebencian terhadap Imigrant dan Wanita dalam set tugas berkongsi Twitter (HatEval). Set data yang diberikan oleh pengatur HatEval mengandungi pos Bahasa Inggeris dan Sepanyol yang diterima dari Twitter yang dicatat mengenai kehadiran kandungan yang benci dan sasarannya. Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan keputusan yang diperoleh oleh sistem kami dibandingkan dengan masukan lain dalam tugas berkongsi. Sistem kita telah mencapai prestasi kompetitif peringkat ke-7 dalam sub-tugas A daripada 62 sistem dalam trek Inggeris.', 'mt': "F’dan id-dokument irrivedu l-problema ta’ identifikazzjoni awtomatika tad-diskors ta’ mibegħda f’karigi mill-midja soċjali. Aħna naħdmu l-kompitu billi nużaw sistema bbażata fuq Netwerks Newrali Rikorrenti (RNN) kompożittivi minimi. Ittestjna l-approċċ tagħna fuq is-SemEval-2019 Task 5: Sejbien Multilingwi ta' Diskors ta' Mibegħda kontra l-Immigranti u n-Nisa f'sett ta' kompiti kondiviżi fuq Twitter (HatEval). The dataset made available by the HatEval organizers contained English and Spanish posts retrieved from Twitter annotated with respect to the presence of hateful content and its target.  F’dan id-dokument nippreżentaw ir-riżultati miksuba mis-sistema tagħna meta mqabbla mal-entrati l-oħra fil-kompitu kondiviż. Our system achieved competitive performance ranking 7th in sub-task A out of 62 systems in the English track.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид нийгмийн хэвлэлээс үзэн ядуурлын илтгэлийг автоматаар тодорхойлдох асуудлыг шинэчлэн харуулдаг. Бид үүнийг хамгийн бага зэрэг бүтээлч сэтгэл мэдрэлийн сүлжээг ашиглан ашиглаж байна. Бид 2019 оны SemEval-ын 5 даалгаварын талаар шинжлэх ухааныг судалсан: Их Сүйгчид болон эмэгтэйчүүдийн Твиттерийн (HatEval) ажлын өгөгдлийн санааг олон хэлний хэлний яриаг олж мэдсэн. HatEval зохион байгуулагчдын гаргасан өгөгдлийн сангууд нь Англи болон Испанийг Twitter-ээс авч ирсэн мэдээллийн сангууд нь үзэн ядах бүтээгдэхүүн болон зорилготой байдлыг харуулсан. Энэ цаасан дээр бид системээс гарсан үр дүнг хуваалцсан ажлын бусад орнуудтай харьцуулахад илэрхийлж байна. Бидний систем Англи хэл дээрх 62 системээс 7-р давхар үйлдвэрлэл хийсэн.', 'pl': 'W artykule ponownie podejmujemy problem automatycznej identyfikacji mowy nienawiści w postach z mediów społecznościowych. Podchodzimy do zadania za pomocą systemu opartego na minimalistycznych kompozycyjnych sieciach neuronowych (RNN). Przetestowaliśmy nasze podejście na zadaniu SemEval-2019 5: Wielojęzyczne wykrywanie mowy nienawiści wobec imigrantów i kobiet na Twitterze (HatEval). Zestaw danych udostępniony przez organizatorów HatEval zawierał angielskie i hiszpańskie posty pozyskane z Twittera z adnotacjami dotyczącymi obecności nienawiści treści i jej celu. W artykule przedstawiamy wyniki uzyskane przez nasz system w porównaniu z innymi wpisami w zadaniu wspólnym. Nasz system osiągnął siódmy ranking wydajności konkurencyjnej w podzadaniu A z 62 systemów na torze angielskim.', 'no': 'I denne papiret gjenoppretter vi problemet med å identifisera hatspråk automatisk i postar frå sosiale media. Vi nærmer oppgåva ved å bruka eit systemet basert på minimalistisk samansett gjentaande neuralnettverk (RNN). Vi prøvde tilnærming vårt på det semiEval-2019 oppgåva 5: Multispråksoppdaging av hatspråk mot imigrantar og kvinner i Twitter (HatEval) delte oppgåvedataset. Datasettet som er tilgjengeleg av HatEval-organisatorene inneheld engelsk og spansk e-post som er henta frå Twitter med oppmerking av tilgjengeleg innhald og målet. I denne papiret viser vi resultatet som er henta av systemet vår i sammenligning med dei andre oppføringane i delt oppgåve. Sistemet vårt oppnådd rekkefølgjande rekkefølgje 7. i underoppgåve A av 62 systemer i engelsk spor.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare revizuim problema identificării automate a discursului de ură în postările de pe social media. Abordăm această sarcină folosind un sistem bazat pe rețele neurale recurente minimaliste (RNN). Am testat abordarea noastră pe sarcina SemEval-2019 5: Detectarea multilingvă a discursului de ură împotriva imigranților și femeilor în setul de date partajat de Twitter (HatEval). Setul de date pus la dispoziție de organizatorii HatEval conținea postări în limba engleză și spaniolă recuperate de pe Twitter adnotate cu privire la prezența conținutului plin de ură și ținta acestuia. În această lucrare prezentăm rezultatele obținute de sistemul nostru în comparație cu celelalte intrări în sarcina partajată. Sistemul nostru a obținut performanță competitivă pe locul 7 în subsarcina A din 62 de sisteme din pista engleză.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමයෙන් පොස්ටල් වල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාස කත අපි පද්ධතියක් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පද්ධතියක් භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න. අපි පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ සේම්වේල්-2019 වැඩේ 5: ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් පරීක්ෂා කරලා ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෝ සහ ගැහැණියෝ ට්විටර් වල සාම Hateval සංයෝජකයෙන් පිළිබඳු දත්ත සෙට් එක්ක ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ස්පැනිස් පොස්ටල් තියෙනවා ට්විටර් වලින් පිළිබඳු ව මේ පත්තරේ අපි අපේ පද්ධතියෙන් ගත්ත ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d අපේ පද්ධතියේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ පද්ධතිය 62 පද්ධතියෙන් 7වෙනි පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලැබුනා.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan ayaannu ka fiirsanaynaa dhibaatada aan si automati ah u aqoonsanayno hadalka nacaybka ee warqadaha shabakadda bulshada. We approach the task using a system based on minimalistic compositional Recurrent Neural Networks (RNN).  Shaqooyinkayada SemEval-2019 waxaa lagu imtixaamay: Shaqooyinka qasabka ee luqadaha badan ee ku saabsan dadka dalka u soo guuray iyo dumarka ee Twitterka (Hatal) ee ku saabsan. Taariikhda macluumaadka ay qabanqaabiyeen HatEval waxay ka heleen warqadaha Ingiriis iyo Isbanish oo ka soo bandhigay Twitterka oo ku qoran ku saabsan meesha ay ku jirto waxyaabaha la nacay iyo goalkeeda. Warqadan waxaan ku soo qoraynaa resultiyadii ay nidaamkayaga ka heleen si barbarbarka ah u dhigashada galayaasha kale ee shaqada wadajirka ah. Systemkanagu wuxuu gaadhay sameynta isqabashada oo ka mid ah 62 nidaam oo ku qoran barashada Ingiriiska.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats återkommer vi till problemet med att automatiskt identifiera hatpropaganda i inlägg från sociala medier. Vi närmar oss uppgiften med hjälp av ett system baserat på minimalistisk sammansättning Recurrent Neural Networks (RNN). Vi testade vårt tillvägagångssätt på SemEval-2019 Task 5: Flerspråkig upptäckt av hattal mot invandrare och kvinnor i Twitter (HatEval) delade uppgiftsdata. Datauppsättningen som gjorts tillgänglig av HatEval-arrangörerna innehöll engelska och spanska inlägg hämtade från Twitter kommenterade med avseende på förekomsten av hatiskt innehåll och dess mål. I denna uppsats presenterar vi de resultat som erhållits av vårt system jämfört med övriga poster i den delade uppgiften. Vårt system uppnådde konkurrenskraftig prestanda rankad 7:e i deluppgift A av 62 system på den engelska banan.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் தானாகவே வெறுப்பு பேச்சை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் பிரச்சனையை மீண்டும் திரும்ப @ info நாங்கள் செம்Eval-2019 பணியில் எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டை சோதித்தோம்: நாடுகள் மற்றும் பெண்களுக்கு எதிரான வெறுப்பு பேச்சு பல மொழி கண்டுபிடிப்பு  HatEval அமைப்பாளர் கிடைக்கும் தகவல் அமைப்பு ஆங்கிலம் மற்றும் ஸ்பானிஷ் குறிப்புகள் இருந்தது Twitter லிருந்து கிடைக்கப்பட்டது வெறுப்பா இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் எங்கள் கணினியில் பெற்ற முடிவு எங்கள் அமைப்பு ஆங்கிலத்தின் தடத்தில் 62 முறைமைகளில் இருந்து துணை பணியில் 7வது செயல்முறை அடைந்தது.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru pregledavamo problem automatskog identifikacije govora mržnje u postima iz društvenih medija. Približavamo se zadatku koristeći sistem baziran na minimalnoj kompoziciji ponovnih neuronskih mreža (RNN). Testirali smo svoj pristup na zadatak 5. pola Evala 2019: multijezički otkrivanje govora o mržnji protiv imigranta i žena na Twitter (HatEval) zajedničkog podataka. Podaci koje su dostupni organizatori HatEval sadržali su engleske i španjolske postavke koje su dobile iz Twittera navedene u pogledu prisustva mržnjeg sadržaja i cilja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo rezultate koji su dobili naš sistem u usporedbi sa ostalim ulazima u zajednički zadatak. Naš sistem je postigao konkurentnu funkciju 7. u podzadatku A od 62 sistema na engleskom traku.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente dar kartą aptariame neapykantos kalbos automatinio identifikavimo social in ės žiniasklaidos pareigūnuose problem ą. We approach the task using a system based on minimalistic compositional Recurrent Neural Networks (RNN).  We tested our approach on the SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter (HatEval) shared task dataset.  The dataset made available by the HatEval organizers contained English and Spanish posts retrieved from Twitter annotated with respect to the presence of hateful content and its target.  Šiame dokumente pristatome mūsų sistemos rezultatus, palyginti su kitais bendros užduoties įrašais. Mūsų sistema pasiekė 7-ąją konkurencinių rezultatų kategoriją A iš 62 sistemų anglų keliu.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник го повторуваме проблемот со автоматското идентификување на говорот на омраза на постови од социјалните медиуми. We approach the task using a system based on minimalistic compositional Recurrent Neural Networks (RNN).  Го тестиравме нашиот пристап на SemEval-2019 задачата 5: Мултијазична детективација на говорот на омраза против имигрантите и жените на Твитер (HatEval) споделена датотека за задачи. Податоците поставени на располагање од организаторите на HatEval содржеа англиски и шпански постови кои беа земени од Твитер, анотирани во врска со присуството на мразна содржина и нејзината цел. In this paper we present the results obtained by our system in comparison to the other entries in the shared task.  Our system achieved competitive performance ranking 7th in sub-task A out of 62 systems in the English track.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں سچے میڈیا کے پوسٹوں میں نفرت کی بات کی تصدیق کرنے کے مسئلہ کو دوبارہ سمجھتے ہیں۔ ہم ایک سیسٹم کے مطابق اس کام کو پہنچ رہے ہیں جو نیورال نیٹورک (RNN) پر بنیاد ہے۔ ہم نے نصف Eval-2019 ٹاکس ۵ پر اپنے طریقے کی آزمائش کی: مہاجرین اور عورتوں کے مقابلہ میں کثرت زبان کی بات تلاش کی۔ HatEval سازمان کرنے والوں نے انگلیسی اور اسپانیایی پوسٹ کو توئیٹر سے پھیرا گیا تھا جو ناپسندیدہ منصوبات اور اس کا موقع کے معاملہ میں اظہار کیا گیا تھا. ہم اس کاغذ میں اپنے سیسٹم سے ملے ہوئے نتائج کو مشترک کام کے بغیر مقابلہ میں پیش کرتے ہیں. ہماری سیستم نے انگلیسی ٹریک میں 62 سیستموں میں سے سپٹی ٹریک میں سپٹی ٹریک میں سپٹی ٹریک کے ساتھ 7م رقم پہنچا۔', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz jamiyat media postidagi yolg'onni avtomatik aniqlash muammolarini qaytadi. @ info: status Biz SemEval-2019 Vazifani 5 bilan jarayonlarimizni sinab ko'proq qildik: Twitterda Muhammadlar va ayollar (Hatal) bilan bir necha gapiradigan vazifalar maʼlumotlarini qidirish uchun ko'plab tilni aniqlash. HatEval organisatorlari uchun maʼlumotlar tarkibi ingliz va Ispanchadan foydalanilgan pochtadan Twitter yordamida olingan maʼlumotlar mavjud va qanday mavzu mavjud haqida yangilangan. Bu hujjatda biz tizimmizning boshqa vazifa bilan birlashtirilgan yozuvlarga olingan natijalarini koʻrsatimiz. Bizning tizimmiz ingliz tilidagi 62 tizimdan boshlangan 62 tizimdan 7 ta'limda rivojlanish natijasini topishdi.", 'vi': 'Trong bài báo này, chúng ta phải xem lại vấn đề về việc tự động xác định tiếng nói căm ghét trong bài phát biểu từ các phương tiện xã hội. Chúng ta tiếp cận tác vụ này bằng hệ thống dựa trên tỷ lệ phân tích tích tích tích tích tích nhỏ (RNN). Chúng tôi đã thử cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi trong nhiệm vụ SemEvol-2009 5: phát hiện ngôn ngữ đa ngôn ngữ về lời nói thù ghét với người nhập cư và phụ nữ trên Twitter (HatEvol) được chia sẻ dữ liệu nhiệm vụ. Bộ dữ liệu được sắp xếp bởi tổ chức HatEvol chứa các bài viết Anh và Tây Ban Nha được ghi chú từ Twitter về sự hiện diện của các nội dung đáng ghét và mục tiêu của nó. Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi trình bày kết quả của hệ thống so với những mục khác trong công việc chia sẻ. Hệ thống của chúng tôi đạt được vị trí kinh tế cạnh tranh số bảy trong hệ thống phụ A ở ngoài 62.', 'bg': 'В тази статия преразглеждаме проблема за автоматично идентифициране на речта на омразата в публикациите от социалните медии. Ние подхождаме към задачата чрез система, базирана на минималистични композиционни повтарящи се невронни мрежи (РНН). Изпробвахме подхода си по Задача 5: Многоезично откриване на реч на омразата срещу имигранти и жени в споделения набор от данни от задачи. Информационният набор, предоставен от организаторите на ХатЕвал, съдържа публикации на английски и испански език, извлечени от Туитър, с анотация по отношение на наличието на омразно съдържание и неговата цел. В настоящата статия представяме резултатите, получени от нашата система в сравнение с останалите записи в споделената задача. Нашата система постигна конкурентно представяне на 7-то място в подзадача А от 62 системи в английската писта.', 'da': 'I denne artikel gennemgår vi problemet med automatisk identificering af hadefuldtale i indlæg fra sociale medier. Vi nærmer os opgaven ved hjælp af et system baseret på minimalistisk kompositional Recurrent Neural Networks (RNN). Vi testede vores tilgang på SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Detection of Hade Speech Against Immigrants and Women i Twitter (HatEval) delte opgavedatasæt. Det datasæt, som HatEval-arrangørerne stillede til rådighed, indeholdt engelske og spanske indlæg hentet fra Twitter med kommentarer om tilstedeværelsen af hadefuldt indhold og dets mål. I denne artikel præsenterer vi resultaterne opnået af vores system i forhold til de øvrige poster i den delte opgave. Vores system opnåede konkurrencedygtig præstation rangering 7. i underopgave A ud af 62 systemer på den engelske bane.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel bespreken we het probleem van het automatisch identificeren van hate speech in berichten van sociale media. We benaderen de taak met behulp van een systeem gebaseerd op minimalistische compositionele Recurrent Neural Networks (RNN). We hebben onze aanpak getest op de SemEval-2019 Taak 5: Meertalige Detectie van haatspraak tegen immigranten en vrouwen in Twitter (HatEval) gedeelde taakgegevens. De dataset die beschikbaar werd gesteld door de HatEval-organisatoren bevatte Engelse en Spaanse posts die zijn opgehaald van Twitter, geannoteerd met betrekking tot de aanwezigheid van haatdragende content en het doel ervan. In dit artikel presenteren we de resultaten verkregen door ons systeem in vergelijking met de andere items in de gedeelde taak. Ons systeem behaalde concurrerende prestaties op de 7e plaats in subtaak A van 62 systemen in het Engelse circuit.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru pregledamo problem automatskog identifikacije govora mržnje u postima iz društvenih medija. Približavamo se zadatku koristeći sustav koji se temelji na minimalnoj kompoziciji ponovnih neuronskih mreža (RNN). Testirali smo svoj pristup zadatku 5. poluvremenog razdoblja 2019: multijezičko otkrivanje govora o mržnji protiv imigranta i žena na Twitter (HatEval) zajedničkog podataka. Podaci koje su dostupni organizatori HatEval sadržali su engleske i španjolske postavke koje su dobile iz Twitter-a navedene u pogledu prisustva mržnjeg sadržaja i cilja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo rezultate koji su dobili naš sustav u usporedbi s ostalim ulazima u zajednički zadatak. Naš sustav je postigao konkurentne učinke 7. u podzadatku A od 62 sustava na engleskom stazi.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag beleuchten wir das Problem der automatischen Identifizierung von Hassreden in Beiträgen aus sozialen Medien. Wir nähern uns der Aufgabe mit einem System, das auf minimalistischen kompositorischen Recurrent Neural Networks (RNN) basiert. Wir haben unseren Ansatz am SemEval-2019 Task 5: Mehrsprachige Erkennung von Hassreden gegen Immigranten und Frauen in Twitter (HatEval) geteilten Aufgabendatensatz getestet. Der Datensatz, der von den HatEval-Organisatoren zur Verfügung gestellt wurde, enthielt englische und spanische Beiträge, die von Twitter abgerufen wurden und in Bezug auf das Vorhandensein hasserfüllter Inhalte und deren Ziel kommentiert wurden. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir die Ergebnisse unseres Systems im Vergleich zu den anderen Einträgen in der gemeinsamen Aufgabe vor. Unser System erreichte in Teilaufgabe A von 62 Systemen in der englischen Strecke den siebten Platz.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 소셜미디어 게시물 중의 증오 발언을 자동으로 식별하는 문제를 다시 연구했다.우리는 이 임무를 수행하기 위해 최소 콤보 역귀신경망(RNN) 기반 시스템을 사용합니다.우리는SemEval-2019퀘스트5: 다양한 언어로 트위터(HatEval) 공유 퀘스트 데이터를 측정하여 이민과 여성에 대한 증오 발언에 집중하여 우리의 방법을 테스트했다.HatEval 조직자가 제공한 데이터 세트에는 트위터에서 검색한 영어와 스페인어 게시물이 담겨 있으며, 존재하는 증오의 내용과 목표에 대한 주석이 담겨 있다.본고에서 우리는 우리 시스템이 얻은 결과와 공유 작업 중의 다른 항목을 비교할 것이다.영어 코스의 62개 시스템 중 우리 시스템은 서브퀘스트 A에서 경쟁력을 얻어 7위에 올랐다.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kita mengulangi masalah untuk mengidentifikasi pidato kebencian secara otomatis di pos dari media sosial. Kami mendekati tugas dengan menggunakan sistem berdasarkan komposisi minimalistik Networks Neural Recurrent (RNN). Kami menguji pendekatan kami pada SemEval-2019 Task 5: Deteksi Multilingual of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter (HatEval) shared task dataset. Set data yang dibuat tersedia oleh organisasi HatEval mengandung pos bahasa Inggris dan Spanyol yang diterima dari Twitter yang dicatat mengenai kehadiran konten yang benci dan sasarannya. Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan hasil yang diperoleh oleh sistem kami dibandingkan dengan masukan lainnya dalam tugas bersama. Sistem kita mencapai prestasi kompetitif peringkat ke-7 dalam sub-tugas A dari 62 sistem di jalur Inggris.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما مشکل خودکار شناسایی سخنرانی از نفرت را از رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی بازگردانیم. ما با استفاده از یک سیستم بر اساس شبکه\u200cهای عصبی بازگشتی minimalistic compositional Recurrent (RNN) به کار می\u200cرسیم. ما روش خودمون رو در مورد تابع نيمه سال 2019 آزمايش کرديم: کشف بين زبان سخنراني از نفرت عليه مهاجران و زنان در تويتور (HatEval) اطلاعات کار مشترک کرديم. مجموعه داده\u200cها که توسط سازمان\u200cکنندگان هتل در دسترسی داده شده\u200cاند، پوست\u200cهای انگلیسی و اسپانیایی از توئیتر دریافت شده\u200cاند که در مورد حضور محتوای ناخوشایند و هدف آن است. در این کاغذ نتیجه\u200cهایی که توسط سیستم\u200cمان به مقایسه با ورودهای دیگر در کار مشترک می\u200cشوند را نشان می\u200cدهیم. سیستم ما به رقابت رقابت سطح ۷م در زیر وظیفه A از 62 سیستم در مسیر انگلیسی رسید.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii tunapitia tatizo la kutambua hotuba ya chuki katika makala za mitandao ya kijamii. Tunakaribia kazi hiyo kwa kutumia mfumo unaotengenezwa na mtandao wa Neural Re-Recur Neural (RNN). Tulijaribu hatua yetu kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 5: Utafiti wa lugha nyingi wa Hotuba ya Hati dhidi ya Wahamiaji na Wanawake katika mtandao wa Twita (Eval) ulisambaza takwimu za kazi. Taarifa zinazopatikana na waandaaji wa HatEval zilikuwa na makala za Kiingereza na Kihispania zilizowekwa kwenye mtandao wa Twita zinaonyesha kuhusiana na uwepo wa maudhui yanayochukia na lengo lake. Katika karatasi hii tunaonyesha matokeo yaliyopatikana na mfumo wetu ukilinganisha na entries nyingine katika kazi hiyo ya ushirikiano. Mfumo wetu ulipata ufanisi wa ushindani wa kufikia nafasi ya 7 katika mfumo wa chini ya kazi A kati ya mifumo 62 katika njia ya Kiingereza.', 'af': "In hierdie papier hersien ons die probleem van automaties die identifiseer van haat spreek in pos van sosiale media. Ons naby die taak te gebruik met 'n stelsel gebaseer op minimalistiese komposisiese Herhaalde Neurale Netwerke (RNN). Ons het ons toegang probeer op die SemEval-2019 Opdrag 5: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrante en Vroue in Twitter (HatEval) deel opdrag dataset. Die datastel wat deur die HatEval-organiseerders beskikbaar gemaak het het, het Engels en Spaanse-pos wat van Twitter ontvang is, aangeteken met betrekking tot die aangesig van haatlike inhoud en sy doel. In hierdie papier vertoon ons die resultate wat deur ons stelsel ontvang word in vergelyking met die ander inskrywings in die gedeelde taak. Ons stelsel het rekenaar prestasie rangering 7de in sub-taak A van 62 stelsels in die Engels snit bereik.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër ne përsërisim problem in e identifikimit automatik të fjalimit të urrejtjes në poste nga media sociale. We approach the task using a system based on minimalistic compositional Recurrent Neural Networks (RNN).  Kemi testuar qasjen tonë në detyrën e gjysmë-2019: zbulimi shumëgjuhësor i fjalimit të urrejtjes kundër imigrantëve dhe grave në Twitter (HatEval) të dhënat e përbashkëta të detyrave. Të dhënat e bërë në dispozicion nga organizatorët e HatEval përmbajtën poste angleze dhe spanjolle të marrë nga Twitter të anotuar lidhur me praninë e përmbajtjes së urrejtur dhe objektivin e saj. Në këtë letër ne paraqesim rezultatet e fituara nga sistemi ynë në krahasim me të tjerat në detyrën e përbashkët. Sistemi ynë arriti renditjen konkurruese në renditjen e 7-të në nëndetyrën A nga 62 sistemet në pistën angleze.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ የጥላቻን ንግግር ከማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ በመስመር ላይ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የሥርዓቱን ስርዓት በተመሳሳይ አካባቢ የኔural መረብ (RNN) በመጠቀም እናቀርባለን፡፡ የሳምEval-2019 ስራ 5 ላይ ደረጃችንን ሞከርን፤ በተዊተር ስደተኞች እና ሴቶችን ላይ የጥላቻ ቋንቋ አነጋገርን (Hatal) የስራ ዳታ ማዕከላዊ ቋንቋ ማረጋገጫ ነው፡፡ የተጠቃሚ content እና ተቃውሞ በማግኘት ከTwitterKingi እና ስፓኒሽ ጽሑፎች የተገኘውን የሐጢአዊ አካባቢዎች የዳታተር ጽሑፎች አግኝተዋል፡፡ በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ በተካፈለው ስራ ላይ ከሌሎቹ ግንኙነቶችን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ስርዓታችን በንግግሊዝኛ ግንኙነት ውስጥ 62 ስርዓቶች ውስጥ የችሎታዊ ስርዓት 7ኛ ደረጃ አግኝቷል፡፡', 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪzda, sosyal media m…ôlumatńĪndan nifr…ôt s√∂zl…ôrini avtomatik t…ôŇükil etm…ôk problemini yenid…ôn d…ôyiŇüdiririk. Biz minimalistik kompoziciyanńĪn yenid…ôn N√∂ral Netikl…ôrinin (RNN) sistemini istifad…ô ed…ôr…ôk iŇü…ô yaxńĪnlaŇüńĪrńĪq. Biz halńĪmńĪzńĪ T√∂vratdakńĪ ńįml…ôrin v…ô qadńĪnlarńĪn qarŇüńĪsńĪnda bir √ßoxlu dil s√∂zl…ôrini tanńĪdńĪq. HatEval organizatorlarńĪn istifad…ô etdiyi veril…ônl…ôr Twitter-d…ôn ńįngilizce v…ô ńįspanyol m…ôktublarńĪ il…ô nifr…ôt m…ôlumatńĪnńĪn v…ô m…ôqs…ôdil…ôrinin yanńĪna g…ôlm…ôsi haqqńĪnda bildiril…ôn m…ôlumatlarńĪ i√ß…ôrildi. Bu kańüńĪzda sistemimizin qazandńĪńüńĪ sonu√ßlarńĪnńĪ paylaŇüńĪb paylaŇüńĪlan iŇül…ôrin baŇüqa giriŇüiml…ôrl…ô karŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪrńĪq. Sistemimiz ńįngiliz…ô yolundaki 62 sisteml…ôrd…ôn 7-ci s…ôviyy…ôd…ô m√ľ…ôllif performans s…ôviyy…ôsin…ô yetiŇüdi.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায় আমরা সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের পোস্ট থেকে ঘৃণা ভাষণের বিষয়টি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে চিহ্নিত করা আমরা একটি সিস্টেম ব্যবহার করে নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক (RNN) ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক করে কাজের কাছে যাচ্ছি। আমরা সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের প্রতি আমাদের পদক্ষেপ পরীক্ষা করেছি: টুইটারে অভিবাসী এবং নারীদের বিরুদ্ধে ঘৃণার বিরুদ্ধে বহুভাষায় অভিবাসী ভা হাটিভাল প্রতিষ্ঠাতাদের প্রতিষ্ঠানগুলোতে পাওয়া ডাটাসেটের মধ্যে ইংরেজী ও স্প্যানিশ পোস্ট থেকে টুইটার থেকে উদ্ধার করা হয়েছ In this paper we present the results obtained by our system in comparison to the other entries in the shared task.  আমাদের সিস্টেম ইংরেজি ট্র্যাকের ২২ টি সিস্টেমের মধ্যে সাব-কাজের ৭তম রেঙ্গে প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতা কর', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda sosyal medýdanlaryň ýerlerinde ýigrenýän sözlerini otomatik bilen tanyşdyrmak üçin meseläni üýtgedýäris. Biz bu zady minimalistik bir compositional Nural Networks (RNN) üzerinde tabanly bir sisteme ulanýarys. Biz halkara 2019-njy SemEval-2019 Taýgyzynda çykyşymyzy bardyk: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women in Twitter (HatEval) günlerini paýlaşdyk. HatEval düzenleyicileriniň meňzeşleýän veri sahypalarynda Twitter'dan alınan iňlis we ispanyýaly poçtalar bardyr. Bu kagyzda sistemamyzyň netijesini paylaşdyrylýan işiň başga girişi bilen görä çykýarys. Biziň sistemamyz Iňlis dilinde 62 sistemalardan 7-nji derejä çykyşlygy başardy.", 'ca': "En aquest article revisem el problema d'identificar automàticament el discurs d'odi en publicacions dels mitjans socials. Aproximem la tasca utilitzant un sistema basat en xarxes neurals recurrents (RNN) de composició mínima. Vam provar el nostre enfocament en la tasca 5 de SemEval-2019: Detecció multilingüe de discurs de odi contra immigrants i dones a Twitter (HatEval). El conjunt de dades disponible pels organitzadors de HatEval contenia publicacions angleses i espanyols obtingudes de Twitter anotats en relació a la presença de continguts odiosos i el seu objectiu. En aquest paper presentem els resultats obtenits pel nostre sistema en comparació amb les altres entrades de la tasca compartida. El nostre sistema va aconseguir un rendiment competitiu de 7ª posició en la subtasca A de 62 sistemes de la pista anglesa.", 'bs': 'U ovom papiru pregledavamo problem automatskog identifikacije govora mržnje u postima iz društvenih medija. Približavamo se zadatku koristeći sistem baziran na minimalnoj kompoziciji povratnih neuronskih mreža (RNN). Testirali smo svoj pristup na zadatku 5. polovičnog ispitivanja: multijezičko otkrivanje govora o mržnji protiv imigranta i žena na Twitter (HatEval) zajedničkog podataka. Podaci koje su dostupni organizatori HatEval sadržali su engleske i španjolske položaje koje su dobile iz Twitter-a navedene u pogledu prisustva mržnjeg sadržaja i cilja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo rezultate koji su dobili naš sistem u usporedbi s ostalim ulazima u zajednički zadatak. Naš sistem je postigao konkurentni učinkoviti 7. u podzadatku A od 62 sistema na engleskom stazi.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis vaatame uuesti läbi probleemi, mis on seotud vihakõne automaatse tuvastamisega sotsiaalmeedia postitustes. Läheneme ülesandele minimalistlikel kompositsioonilistel korduvatel neurovõrkudel (RNN) põhineva süsteemi abil. Testisime oma lähenemisviisi SemEval-2019 ülesandel 5: Immigrantide ja naiste vihakõne mitmekeelne avastamine Twitteris (HatEval) jagatud ülesannete andmekogumis. HatEvali korraldajate poolt kättesaadavaks tehtud andmekogum sisaldas Twitterist saadud inglise ja hispaania postitusi, milles oli märgitud vihkava sisu olemasolu ja selle sihtmärgi kohta. Käesolevas töös esitame meie süsteemi saadud tulemusi võrreldes teiste kirjetega jagatud ülesandes. Meie süsteem saavutas konkurentsivõimelise tulemuslikkuse 7. koha alamülesandes A 62 süsteemist Inglise rajal.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku se zabýváme problematikou automatické identifikace nenávistné řeči v příspěvcích ze sociálních médií. K úkolu přistupujeme pomocí systému založeného na minimalistických kompozičních recidivních neuronových sítích (RNN). Testovali jsme náš přístup na úkolu SemEval-2019 5: Vícejazyčná detekce nenávistné řeči proti přistěhovalcům a ženám na Twitteru (HatEval) sdíleném datovém souboru úkolů. Datová sada zpřístupněná organizátory HatEvalu obsahovala anglické a španělské příspěvky načtené z Twitteru s anotacemi ohledně přítomnosti nenávistného obsahu a jeho cíle. V tomto článku prezentujeme výsledky získané naším systémem ve srovnání s ostatními záznamy ve sdíleném úkolu. Náš systém dosáhl konkurenčního výkonu sedmého v podúkolu A z 62 systémů v anglické trati.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք վերադառնում ենք ատելության խոսքի ավտոմատ հայտնաբերման խնդիրը սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների գրքերում: Մենք մոտենում ենք խնդրին՝ օգտագործելով մի համակարգ, որը հիմնված է մինիմալիստական կառուցվածքային ռեկտունվող նյարդային ցանցերի (ՌՆՆ) վրա: Մենք փորձարկեցինք մեր մոտեցումը 2019 թվականի կիսագույն հանձնարարության հինգերորդ հանձնարարության վրա, որը նշանակում է Թվիթերի (Հաթեվալ) միջոցով հավաքված հանձնարարությունների բազմալեզու հայտնաբերում ատելության խոսքերի մասին: Հաթեվալ կազմակերպողների կողմից հասանելի տվյալների համակարգը պարունակում էր անգլերեն և իսպաներեն Twitter-ից ստացված գրքեր, որոնք գրված էին ատելու պարունակության և դրա նպատակի առկայության մասին: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեր համակարգով ստացված արդյունքները համեմատած հանրային խնդրի մյուս գրություններին: Մեր համակարգը հասավ մրցակցության արդյունավետության 7-րդ դասակարգին անգլերենում գտնվող 62 համակարգից A-ի ենթախնդրի մեջ:', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa tarkastelemme uudelleen vihapuheen automaattista tunnistamista sosiaalisen median viesteissä. Lähestymme tehtävää käyttäen minimalistiseen kompositiiviseen RNN:ään perustuvaa järjestelmää. Testasimme lähestymistapaamme SemEval-2019 Task 5: Multilingual Detection of Hate Speech Against Immigrants and Women Twitterissä (HatEval). HatEvalin järjestäjien saataville asettama aineisto sisälsi Twitteristä haettuja englannin- ja espanjankielisiä viestejä, joissa oli huomautuksia vihamielisen sisällön esiintymisestä ja sen kohdesisällöstä. Tässä työssä esittelemme järjestelmämme tulokset verrattuna muihin jaettuun tehtävään tehtyihin merkintöihin. Järjestelmämme saavutti kilpailullisen suorituskyvyn 7. sijalla osatehtävässä A 62 järjestelmästä Englannin radalla.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan da Muke karatun mataimaki na gane magana na ƙeta farat ɗaya a cikin posten da ke cikin mitandan jamii. @ info: whatsthis Mun jarraba hanyarmu a kan aikin Semeval-2019 5: Kullum lugha na'ura da ake yi wa maganar Hati Agar Imrantai da mãtã a Twitter (Hatal) da aka raba fassarar aikin da suka yi rabo. Garet da aka samar da shi daga Hateval na ƙunsa da takardar Ingiriya da spanish aka samu daga Twitter da aka sanar da su ga presence da tsarin abin da ke ƙi da goarsa. Ga wannan takardan, Munã bãyar da matsala wanda ya sãmu na'urarmu da sami da wasu entries cikin aikin da ke raba shi. Yafukanmu ya sami aikin da za'a sami karatun 7 a cikin shawarar-aikin A, daga shaidar Ingiriya.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנחנו חוזרים על הבעיה של זיהוי אוטומטי נאום שנאה בתפקידים ממדיה חברתית. We approach the task using a system based on minimalistic compositional Recurrent Neural Networks (RNN).  בדקנו את הגישה שלנו על משימה 5 של SemEval-2019: גילוי רבות שפויות של נאום שנאה נגד הנהגרים ונשים בטוויטר (HatEval). המערכת המידע שהופכת על ידי המארגנים של HatEval הכילה משימות אנגליות וספרדית שנאספו מטוויטר שנעטפו בנוגע לנוכחות תוכן שנאה והמטרה שלה. בעיתון הזה אנחנו מציגים את התוצאות שנקבלו על ידי המערכת שלנו בהשוואה לכתבים האחרים במשימה המשותפת. המערכת שלנו השיגה ביצועים תחרותיים מדרגה 7 בתא-משימה A מתוך 62 מערכות במסלול האנגלית.', 'jv': 'Nang pemilih iki, kita ngubah perusahaan kanggo ngilangno kuwi mau sing automatik kanggo ngilangno langgar tarjamahan ing panjenengan liyo sing mengko media sithik Awak dhéwé nganggo nggunakaé sistem sing basa ning komposisi minimal Awakdhéwé wis testing hal dadi nggunakake seminval-2011 task 5: Multilanguage detection Sampeyan dataset sing ngewehke ngubah penunggal-ingkang karo penyutan pangan-ingkang karo Google Nyong ngomong barêng-barêng iki ning, kita sampek sistem iki dadi tanggap ning karo input karo nggawe barang sing nyimpen Sistem awak dhéwé iso nglanggar aturan sing paling beraksi sing wis pitik sabên neng segala sing katêpakan karo segala 75.', 'sk': 'V prispevku ponovno obravnavamo problem samodejnega prepoznavanja sovražnega govora v objavah iz družbenih omrežij. Pri nalogi pristopamo s sistemom, ki temelji na minimalističnih kompozicijskih ponovnih živčnih omrežjih (RNN). Naš pristop smo preizkusili pri nalogi 5 SemEval-2019: Večjezično odkrivanje sovražnega govora proti priseljencem in ženskam v skupnem naboru opravil Twitterja (HatEval). Podatkovni nabor, ki so ga dali na voljo organizatorji HatEval, je vseboval angleške in španske objave, pridobljene iz Twitterja, z oznakami glede prisotnosti sovražnih vsebin in njenih ciljev. V prispevku predstavljamo rezultate našega sistema v primerjavi z drugimi vnosi v skupni nalogi. Naš sistem je dosegel konkurenčno uspešnost na 7. mestu v podnalogi A od 62 sistemov na angleški progi.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཐོག ང་ཚོས་དུས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་མ་ལག་ཞིག་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རྩོལ་བ་འདིར་མཐུན་བཟོས་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་པ་ནི་(SemEval-2019)ལས་ཀ་ལྡན་གཞན་གྱི་ནང་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཡོད། HatEval དོ་དམ་པ་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་སྒྲུང་ཐོག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཉར་ཡོད་པའི་མགོ་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་ ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བ་དང་མ་ལག ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་གླེང་སྐབས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་འགྲུལ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་འགྲོ་སྟངས་ལྡོག་འགོད་བཞིན་པའི་སྐྱེས་སྐར་མཐ'}
{'en': 'YNU NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 5 : Attention and Capsule Ensemble for Identifying Hate Speech', 'ar': 'YNU NLP في SemEval-2019 Task 5: الاهتمام وكبسولة لتحديد خطاب الكراهية', 'es': 'PNL de YNU en Semeval-2019 Tarea 5: Conjunto de atención y cápsula para identificar el discurso de odio', 'fr': "YNU NLP au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 5\xa0: Ensemble d'attention et de capsule pour identifier le discours de haine", 'pt': 'YNU NLP no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 5: Atenção e Conjunto de Cápsulas para Identificar Discurso de Ódio', 'ja': 'YNU NLP at SemEval -2019 Task 5: Attention and Capsule Ensemble for Identifying Hate Speech', 'hi': 'सेमेवल-2019 टास्क 5 पर YNU NLP: हेट स्पीच की पहचान करने के लिए ध्यान और कैप्सूल एनसेम्बल', 'zh': 'YNU NLP在SemEval-2019务5:识仇言之意与胶囊合奏', 'ru': 'YNU NLP на SemEval-2019 Task 5: Attention and Capsule Ensemble for Identification Hate Speech', 'ga': 'YNU NLP ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 5: Aird agus Ensemble Capsúil chun Fuathchaint a Aithint', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εργασία 5: Συγκρότημα προσοχής και κάψουλας για τον εντοπισμό της ομιλίας μίσους', 'hu': 'YNU NLP a SemEval-2019 5. feladat: Figyelem és kapszula együttes a gyűlölet beszédének azonosítására', 'mk': 'YNU NLP на SemEval-2019 задача 5: Внимание и капсула Ensemble за идентификување на говорот за омраза', 'kk': 'YNU NLP жарым- 2019 тапсырмасының 5- тапсырмасы: Құпия сөйлемесін анықтау үшін тәртіпсіздік және капсулы', 'it': 'YNU NLP al SemEval-2019 Task 5: Attenzione e Capsule Ensemble per identificare il discorso di odio', 'lt': 'YNU NLP pusevalyje 2019 m. 5 užduotis: dėmesys ir kapsulės, skirtos neapykantos kalbai identifikuoti', 'ms': 'YNU NLP di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Perhatian dan Capsule Ensemble untuk mengenalpasti Ucapan Kebencian', 'mt': 'YNU NLP f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 5: Attenzjoni u Kapsula Ensemble għall-Identifikazzjoni ta’ Speech ta’ Mibegħda', 'ml': 'വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരം തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനും ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുക', 'mn': 'YNU NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Attention and Capsule Ensemble for Identifying Hate Speech', 'no': 'YNU NLP ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 5: Attention and Capsule Ensemble for identifisering av hatspråk', 'pl': 'YNU NLP na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 5: Zespół uwagi i kapsuły do identyfikacji mowy nienawiści', 'ro': 'PNL YNU la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 5: Atenție și ansamblu de capsule pentru identificarea discursului de ură', 'si': 'YNu NLP at Half-2019 Job 5: Attension and Capsule Ensemble for ID Hate Talk', 'so': 'YNU NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Attention and Capsule Ensemble for Identification Hate Speech', 'sv': 'YNU NLP på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 5: Uppmärksamhet och kapselensemble för att identifiera hattal', 'sr': 'YNU NLP na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 5: Pažnja i kapsula za identifikaciju govora mržnje', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 5: வெறுப்பு பேச்சை அடையாளமாக்குவதற்கு கவனம் மற்றும் காப்ஸூல் ஒப்பிடுதல்', 'ur': 'YNU NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Attention and Capsule Ensemble for Identifying Hate Speech', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'YNGU Nchọc dò tại SemEvl-209 Task 5: Chú ý và Capsule Ensemble để nhận diện lời nói căm ghét', 'bg': 'Задача 5: Ансамбъл за внимание и капсули за идентифициране на речта на омразата', 'da': 'YNU NLP ved SemEval-2019 Opgave 5: Opmærksomhed og kapselensemble til identificering af hadefuld tale', 'nl': 'YNU NLP bij SemEval-2019 Taak 5: Attentie en Capsule Ensemble voor Identificatie Hate Speech', 'de': 'YNU NLP bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 5: Aufmerksamkeits- und Kapselensemble zur Identifizierung von Hassreden', 'hr': 'YNU NLP na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 5: privlačenje pažnje i kapsule za identifikaciju govora mržnje', 'id': 'YNU NLP di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5: Perhatian dan Capsule Ensemble untuk Identifikasi Bicara Kebencian', 'ko': 'YNU NLP가SemEval-19 미션5: 증오언론을 식별하는 주의력과 캡슐 집합', 'sw': 'YNU NLP kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 5: Tamko la kusikiliza na Capsule kwa kutambua Hotuba ya Hati', 'fa': 'YNU NLP در نیمه Eval-2019 Task 5: Attention and Capsule Ensemble for Identifying hate speech', 'tr': 'YNU NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Attention and Capsule Ensemble for Identifying Hate Speech', 'af': 'YNU NLP by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 5: Aansig en Kapsul Ensemble vir identifiseer Hate Spraak', 'sq': 'YNU NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Attention and Capsule Ensemble for Identifying Hate Speech', 'am': 'ስራ 5:', 'hy': 'Ynu-ն ՆԼՊ-ը, 2019-ի "Սեմեվալ"-ի 5. հանձնարարությունը. ուշադրություն և կապուլլային համակարգ ատելության ելույթի հայտնաբերելու համար', 'az': 'YNU NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Attention and Capsule Ensemble for Identifying Hate Speech', 'bn': 'YNU NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Attention and Capsule Ensemble for Identifying Hate Speech', 'cs': 'YNU NLP na SemEval-2019 Úkol 5: Pozornost a kapsle Ensemble pro identifikaci nenávistné řeči', 'bs': 'YNU NLP na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 5: privlačnost pažnje i kapsule za identifikaciju govora mržnje', 'ca': 'YNU NLP a SemEval-2019 Task 5: Attention and Capsule Ensemble for Identifying Hate Speech', 'et': 'YNU NLP SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 5: Tähelepanu ja kapslite ansambel vihkamiskõne tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'YNU NLP SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 5: Huomio- ja kapseliryhmä vihapuheen tunnistamiseksi', 'jv': 'YNU NLP at semi-2011 task 5', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacter', 'sk': 'NLP YNU na SemEval-2019 Naloga 5: Komplet pozornosti in kapsul za prepoznavanje sovražnega govora', 'he': 'YNU NLP ב SemEval-2019 משימה 5: תשומת לב וקפסולה Ensemble לזהות נאום שנאה', 'bo': 'YNU NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 5: Attention and Capsule Ensemble for Identifying Hate Speech'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the system submitted to SemEval 2019 Task 5 : Multilingual detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (hatEval). Its main purpose is to conduct hate speech detection on Twitter, which mainly includes two specific different targets, immigrants and women. We participate in both subtask A and subtask B for English. In order to address this task, we develope an ensemble of an attention-LSTM model based on HAN and an BiGRU-capsule model. Both models use fastText pre-trained embeddings, and we use this model in both subtasks. In comparison to other participating teams, our system is ranked 16th in the Sub-task A for English, and 12th in the Sub-task B for English.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة النظام المقدم إلى SemEval 2019 Task 5: الكشف متعدد اللغات عن خطاب الكراهية ضد المهاجرين والنساء في تويتر (hatEval). والغرض الرئيسي منه هو الكشف عن خطاب الكراهية على تويتر ، والذي يتضمن بشكل أساسي هدفين مختلفين محددين ، المهاجرون والنساء. نشارك في كل من المهمة الفرعية أ والمهمة الفرعية ب للغة الإنجليزية. من أجل معالجة هذه المهمة ، قمنا بتطوير مجموعة من نموذج الانتباه LSTM استنادًا إلى HAN ونموذج كبسولة BiGRU. يستخدم كلا النموذجين حفلات الزفاف المدربة مسبقًا على FastText ، ونستخدم هذا النموذج في كلتا المهمتين الفرعيتين. بالمقارنة مع الفرق المشاركة الأخرى ، يحتل نظامنا المرتبة 16 في المهمة الفرعية أ للغة الإنجليزية والمرتبة 12 في المهمة الفرعية ب للغة الإنجليزية.', 'es': 'Este documento describe el sistema presentado a la Tarea 5 de SemEval 2019: Detección multilingüe del discurso de odio contra inmigrantes y mujeres en Twitter (HaTeval). Su objetivo principal es llevar a cabo la detección del discurso de odio en Twitter, que incluye principalmente dos objetivos diferentes específicos, inmigrantes y mujeres. Participamos tanto en la subtarea A como en la subtarea B para inglés. Para abordar esta tarea, desarrollamos un conjunto de un modelo Attention-LSTM basado en HAN y un modelo de cápsula BigRu. Ambos modelos utilizan incrustaciones previamente entrenadas de FastText, y utilizamos este modelo en ambas subtareas. En comparación con otros equipos participantes, nuestro sistema ocupa el puesto 16 en la subtarea A para inglés y 12 en la subtarea B para inglés.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2019 Task 5: Multilingual detection of hate speech against immigrant and women in Twitter (hatEval)に提出されたシステムについて述べる。その主な目的は、主に移民と女性の2つの特定の異なるターゲットを含むTwitterでヘイトスピーチ検出を行うことです。英語のサブタスクAとサブタスクBの両方に参加します。この課題に取り組むために、HANモデルとBiGRUカプセルモデルに基づく注意- LSTMモデルのアンサンブルを開発します。両方のモデルは、fastText事前にトレーニングされた埋め込みを使用し、両方のサブタスクでこのモデルを使用します。他の参加チームと比較して、当社のシステムは、英語のサブタスクAで16位、英語のサブタスクBで12位です。', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve o sistema submetido ao SemEval 2019 Tarefa 5: Detecção multilíngue de discurso de ódio contra imigrantes e mulheres no Twitter (hatEval). Seu principal objetivo é realizar a detecção de discurso de ódio no Twitter, que inclui principalmente dois alvos específicos diferentes, imigrantes e mulheres. Participamos tanto da subtarefa A quanto da subtarefa B para inglês. Para resolver esta tarefa, desenvolvemos um conjunto de um modelo de atenção-LSTM baseado em HAN e um modelo de cápsula BiGRU. Ambos os modelos usam embeddings pré-treinados do fastText e usamos esse modelo em ambas as subtarefas. Em comparação com outras equipes participantes, nosso sistema está classificado em 16º na Subtarefa A para inglês e 12º na Subtarefa B para inglês.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le système soumis à SemEval 2019 Task 5\xa0: Multilingual detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (HatEval). Son objectif principal est de détecter les discours haineux sur Twitter, qui inclut principalement deux cibles différentes spécifiques, les immigrés et les femmes. Nous participons à la fois à la sous-tâche A et à la sous-tâche B pour l'anglais. Afin de répondre à cette tâche, nous avons développé un ensemble d'un modèle Attention-LSTM basé sur HAN et un modèle de capsule BigRu. Les deux modèles utilisent des intégrations préentraînées FastText, et nous utilisons ce modèle dans les deux sous-tâches. Comparé aux autres équipes participantes, notre système est classé 16e dans la sous-tâche A pour l'anglais et 12e dans la sous-tâche B pour l'anglais.", 'zh': '本文述交SemEval 2019务5之统:多言检Twitter移民女子之仇言(hatEval)。 其要在Twitter上仇言检测,两特定异趣,移民女性。 吾与英语子职 A 与子 B。 为此者,发HAN与BiGRU胶囊合LSTM。 两模皆用 fastText 预练者嵌之,我两子皆用之。 比之他参赛团队,系于英语子务A中排名第16位,在英语子任B中排名第12位。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval 2019 टास्क 5 में प्रस्तुत की गई प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है: ट्विटर (hatEval) में आप्रवासियों और महिलाओं के खिलाफ नफरत भरे भाषण का बहुभाषी पता लगाना। इसका मुख्य उद्देश्य ट्विटर पर हेट स्पीच डिटेक्शन करना है, जिसमें मुख्य रूप से दो विशिष्ट अलग-अलग लक्ष्य, आप्रवासियों और महिलाओं को शामिल किया गया है। हम अंग्रेजी के लिए सबटास्क ए और सबटास्क बी दोनों में भाग लेते हैं। इस कार्य को संबोधित करने के लिए, हम एचएएन और एक BiGRU-कैप्सूल मॉडल के आधार पर एक ध्यान-LSTM मॉडल का एक पहनावा विकसित करते हैं। दोनों मॉडल fastText पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करते हैं, और हम दोनों उप-कार्यों में इस मॉडल का उपयोग करते हैं। अन्य भाग लेने वाली टीमों की तुलना में, हमारी प्रणाली अंग्रेजी के लिए उप-कार्य ए में 16 वें स्थान पर है, और अंग्रेजी के लिए उप-कार्य बी में 12 वें स्थान पर है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается система, представленная SemEval 2019 Task 5: Multilingual detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (hatEval). Его основная цель заключается в выявлении ненавистнических высказываний в сети "Твиттер", которая в основном включает в себя две конкретные цели - иммигрантов и женщин. Мы участвуем как в подзадаче A, так и в подзадаче B для английского языка. Для решения этой задачи мы разрабатываем ансамбль модели attention-LSTM на основе HAN и BiGRU-капсульной модели. Обе модели используют предварительно обученные вставки fastText, и мы используем эту модель в обеих подзадачах. По сравнению с другими участвующими командами наша система занимает 16-е место в подзадаче A для английского языка и 12-е место в подзадаче B для английского языка.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcóras a cuireadh faoi bhráid SemEval 2019 Tasc 5: Brath ilteangach cainte fuatha in aghaidh inimirceach agus ban ar Twitter (hatEval). Is é a phríomhchuspóir ná braite fuathchaint ar Twitter, lena n-áirítear go príomha dhá sprioc shainiúla éagsúla, inimircigh agus mná. Glacaimid páirt i bhfothasc A agus i bhfothasc B don Bhéarla. Chun dul i ngleic leis an tasc seo, forbróimid ensemble de mhúnla aird-LSTM bunaithe ar HAN agus samhail BiGRU-capsule. Úsáideann an dá mhúnla leabaithe réamhoilte fastText, agus úsáidimid an tsamhail seo sa dá fhothasc. I gcomparáid le foirne rannpháirteacha eile, tá ár gcóras sa 16ú háit san Fhothasc A don Bhéarla, agus sa 12ú háit san Fhothasc B don Bhéarla.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2019 5. feladathoz benyújtott rendszert: A bevándorlók és nők elleni gyűlöletbeszéd többnyelvű felismerése Twitteren (hatEval). Fő célja a gyűlöletbeszéd felismerése a Twitteren, amely elsősorban két különböző célpontot foglal magában: a bevándorlókat és a nőket. Részt veszünk mind az A, mind a B altfeladatban angolul. Ennek érdekében kifejlesztünk egy HAN alapú figyelem-LSTM modellt és egy BiGRU-kapszula modellt. Mindkét modell a fastText előre képzett beágyazást használja, és ezt a modellt mindkét alcsoportban használjuk. A többi résztvevő csapattal összehasonlítva rendszerünk a 16. helyen áll az angol nyelvű "A" alcsoportban, az angol nyelvű "B" alcsoportban pedig a 12. helyen.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα που υποβλήθηκε στο έργο 5: Πολυγλωσσική ανίχνευση ρητορικής μίσους κατά μεταναστών και γυναικών στο Twitter (hatEval). Κύριος σκοπός της είναι η διενέργεια ανίχνευσης ρητορικών μίσους στο Twitter, το οποίο περιλαμβάνει κυρίως δύο συγκεκριμένους διαφορετικούς στόχους, μετανάστες και γυναίκες. Συμμετέχουμε τόσο στην υποταγή Α όσο και στην υποταγή Β για τα αγγλικά. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το έργο, αναπτύσσουμε ένα σύνολο ενός μοντέλου προσοχής-βασισμένου στο HAN και ενός μοντέλου κάψουλας BiGRU. Και τα δύο μοντέλα χρησιμοποιούν προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις και χρησιμοποιούμε αυτό το μοντέλο και στις δύο δευτερεύουσες εργασίες. Σε σύγκριση με άλλες συμμετέχουσες ομάδες, το σύστημά μας κατατάσσεται 16η στην Υποεργασία Α για Αγγλικά και 12η στην Υποεργασία Β για Αγγλικά.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტის შესახებ სისტემა, რომელიც 2019 წლის SemEval-ში დაეტვირულია რაოდენობა 5: მრავალენგური განახლობა სიტყვას იმიგრანტების და ქალების გარეშე Twitter-ში (hatEva მისი მნიშვნელოვანი მიზეზი არის გავაკეთება მპატიური სიტყვების განსახულება Twitter-ში, რომელიც საკუთარ მნიშვნელოვანია ორი განსხვავებული მიზეზი, იმიდრანტებ ჩვენ ვიყავით ანგლისურად A და B სტკითხვაში. ამ დავალების მისაღებისთვის, ჩვენ განვითარებთ დაახლოებით LSTM მოდელს HAN და BiGRU-კაპსულის მოდელზე. ორივე მოდელები გამოყენებენ FastText- ს წინ შესწავლა შესწავლა, და ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ეს მოდელს ორივე საკუთხეში. ჩვენი სისტემა 16-ში ანგლისური A-ზე და 12-ზე ანგლისური B-ზე.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il sistema presentato a SemEval 2019 Task 5: Rilevazione multilingue di discorsi d'odio contro immigrati e donne su Twitter (hatEval). Il suo scopo principale è quello di condurre il rilevamento dei discorsi d'odio su Twitter, che comprende principalmente due obiettivi specifici diversi, immigrati e donne. Partecipiamo sia alla sottomissione A che alla sottomissione B per l'inglese. Per affrontare questo compito, sviluppiamo un insieme di un modello attenzione-LSTM basato su HAN e un modello BiGRU-capsule. Entrambi i modelli utilizzano incorporazioni pre-addestrate FastText e utilizziamo questo modello in entrambe le sottoattività. Rispetto ad altre squadre partecipanti, il nostro sistema è classificato 16° nella sottomissione A per l'inglese e 12° nella sottomissione B per l'inglese.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinama sistema, pateikta 2019 m. SemEval 5 uždaviniui „HatEval“ daugiakalbis neapykantos kalbų prieš imigrantus ir moteris nustatymas Twitter. Pagrindinis jos tikslas yra nustatyti neapykantos kalbą Twitter, kuriame daugiausia yra du konkretūs skirtingi tikslai – imigrantai ir moterys. Dalyvaujame tiek A paklausoje, tiek B paklausoje anglų kalba. Siekdami išspręsti šią užduotį, parengiame dėmesio-LSTM modelio, pagrįsto HAN ir BiGRU kapsulių modeliu, rinkinį. Abu modeliai naudoja greitText iš anksto apmokytus įterpimus, ir mes naudojame šį model į abiejose paklausose. Palyginti su kitomis dalyvaujančiomis komandomis, mūsų sistema klasifikuojama 16-ojoje A poskyryje anglų kalba, o 12-ojoje B poskyryje anglų kalba.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2019 жыл бөліміне тапсырма 5- тапсырмасына берілген жүйені таңдайды: Твиттерде иммигранттер мен әйелдердің (hatEval) қарсы көптілік сөйлесуді анықтау. Оның негізгі мақсаты - Твиттерде қарсылық сөйлерді анықтау, бұл негізінде екі түрлі мақсатты, иммигранттер және әйелдер бар. Біз "A" және "B" ішкі сұрағына қатынасыз. Бұл тапсырманы шешу үшін біз HAN және BiGRU-капсуль үлгісіне негізделген назар-LSTM үлгісін құрамыз. Екі үлгілер FastText алдын- ала оқылған ендіруді қолданып, бұл үлгісін екі жағында қолданамыз. Басқа қатысушылық топтардың салыстыру үшін, біздің жүйеміз ағылшын тілінде A-ның ішкі тапсырмасында 16-нші ретінде және B-ның ағылшын тілінде 12-нші ретінде.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem yang dihantar ke SemEval 2019 Tugas 5: Pengesanan berbilang bahasa ucapan kebencian terhadap imigran dan perempuan di Twitter (HatEval). Tujuan utamanya ialah mengesan ucapan kebencian di Twitter, yang terutamanya termasuk dua sasaran yang berbeza, imigran dan perempuan. We participate in both subtask A and subtask B for English.  Untuk mengatasi tugas ini, kami mengembangkan kumpulan model LSTM perhatian berdasarkan HAN dan model kapsul BiGRU. Kedua-dua model menggunakan penyembedding pre-terlatih teks pantas, dan kami menggunakan model ini dalam kedua-dua subtasks. Dalam perbandingan dengan pasukan yang lain yang berpartisipasi, sistem kita ditangkap ke-16 dalam Sub-tugas A untuk bahasa Inggeris, dan ke-12 dalam Sub-tugas B untuk bahasa Inggeris.', 'mk': 'This paper describes the system submitted to SemEval 2019 Task 5: Multilingual detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (hatEval).  Неговата главна цел е да се спроведе детекција на говорот на омраза на Твитер, кој главно вклучува две специфични различни цели, имигранти и жени. Ние учествуваме во подпрашањето А и подпрашањето Б на англиски. За да ја решиме оваа задача, развиваме ансембл на модел на внимание-ЛСТМ базиран на ХАН и модел на капсула БиGRU. Двајцата модели користат брзи претренирани вградувања на текст, и го користиме овој модел во двете потпрашања. Во споредба со другите тимови кои учествуваат, нашиот систем е рангиран на 16-тото место во подзадачата А за англиски, а на 12-тото место во подзадачата Б за англиски.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ടാസ്ക് 5 കൊടുത്ത സിസ്റ്റം വിവരിക്കുന്നു അതിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഉദ്ദേശം ടൂട്ടറില്\u200d വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാനാണ്. അതില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട രണ്ടു വ ഇംഗ്ലീഷിനു വേണ്ടി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സബ്ബ് ജോലിയില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. ഈ ജോലി സംസാരിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, ഹാന്\u200d എനിക്കും ബിജിആര്\u200dയൂ ക്യാപ്സുള്\u200d മോഡലിനും അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഒരു ശ്രദ്ധ-LSTM മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ ഒരു മെ ടെസ്റ്റ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d രണ്ടും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നുText pre- trained embeddings, and we use this model in both subtasks. മറ്റു പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന ഗ്രൂപ്പുകളോടൊപ്പം നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പതിനാമത്തേതാണ് ഇംഗ്ലീഷിനുവേണ്ടി സബ് ജോലിക്', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema ppreżentata lil SemEval 2019 Task 5: Sejbien multilingwi ta’ diskors ta’ mibegħda kontra l-immigranti u n-nisa fuq Twitter (hatEval). Its main purpose is to conduct hate speech detection on Twitter, which mainly includes two specific different targets, immigrants and women.  A ħna qed jipparteċipaw kemm fis-sottotalba A kif ukoll fis-sottotalba B għall-Ingliż. Sabiex nindirizzaw dan il-kompitu, niżviluppaw ensemble ta’ mudell ta’ attenzjoni-LSTM ibbażat fuq HAN u mudell ta’ kapsula BiGRU. Iż-żewġ mudelli jużaw inkorporazzjonijiet imħarrġa minn qabel ta’ FastText, u aħna nużaw dan il-mudell fiż-żewġ sottomistoqsijiet. Meta mqabbel ma’ timijiet parteċipanti oħra, is-sistema tagħna hija kklassifikata fis-16-il fis-Subkompitu A għall-Ingliż, u t-12-il fis-Subkompitu B għall-Ingliż.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet som er sendt til semiEval 2019 Oppgåve 5: Multispråk oppdaging av hatespråk mot imigrantar og kvinner i Twitter (hatEval). Den hovudmålene er å gjera hatt-taleoppdaging på Twitter, som hovudsakelig inneheld to spesifikke ulike mål, imigrantar og kvinner. Vi deltar på både underspørjingar A og subtspørjingar B for engelsk. For å handtera denne oppgåva, utviklar vi eit ensemble av ein attention-LSTM-modell basert på HAN og ein BiGRU-kapsulmodell. Begge modeller brukar FastText- føretrained innbygging, og vi brukar denne modellen i begge underspørjingar. I sammenligning med andre deltakende grupper er systemet vårt 16. i Sub-oppgåva A for engelsk, og 12. i Sub-oppgåva B for engelsk.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano system przesłany do SemEval 2019 Zadanie 5: Wielojęzyczne wykrywanie mowy nienawiści wobec imigrantów i kobiet na Twitterze (hatEval). Jej głównym celem jest wykrywanie mowy nienawiści na Twitterze, który obejmuje głównie dwa konkretne cele: imigranty i kobiety. Uczestniczymy zarówno w podzadaniu A, jak i podzadaniu B dla angielskiego. Aby sprostać temu zadaniu, opracowujemy zespół modelu uwagi-LSTM opartego na HAN oraz modelu kapsuły BiGRU. Oba modele używają wstępnie przeszkolonych osadzeń fastText, a my używamy tego modelu w obu podzadaniach. W porównaniu z innymi uczestniczącymi zespołami, nasz system jest szesnasty w podzadaniu A dla angielskiego, a dwunastym w podzadaniu B dla angielskiego.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас 2019 оны SemEval-д тавигдсан системийг тайлбарлаж байна. Тайлбар 5: Жервэгчдийн, эмэгтэйчүүдийн Твиттерт (hatEval) эсрэг үзэн ядуурлын яриаг олон хэлний олон хэлний мэдэх. Твиттерт хамгийн гол зорилго нь үзэн ядуурлын илтгэлийг олох юм. Энэ нь ихэвчлэн хоёр төрлийн зорилго, хөдөлгөөнүүд болон эмэгтэйчүүд байдаг. Бид А доорх асуулт болон B доорх асуулт нь Англи хэлний хувьд оролцож байна. Энэ ажлыг зохиохын тулд бид HAN болон BiGRU-капсулын загварын үндсэн анхаарал-LSTM загварын загварыг бүтээж байна. Хоёр загвар хоёулаа FastText сургалтын өмнөх сургалтыг ашигладаг. Бид энэ загварыг хоёулаа сургалтын дотор ашигладаг. Бидний систем Англи хэлний A-ын суб-задалгаанд 16-р ангид, 12-р Англи хэлний B-ын суб-задалгаанд орж байна.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ සෙම්වේල් 2019 වැඩ 5 වලට පද්ධතිය පැහැදිලි කරනවා: වඩා භාෂාවක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විරුද්ධ කතාවක් සහ ට්\u200dව එයාගේ ප්\u200dරධාන අදහසක් තමයි ට්විටර් එකේ විරෝධ කතාව හොයාගන්න, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරධාන විශේෂ අරමුණ දෙකක් අ අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලට A සහ B සබ්ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්නම පාලනය කරනවා. අපි මේ වැඩේ වැඩ කරන්න, HAN සහ BiGRU-කැප්සුල් මොඩල් එකේ අවධානය-LSTM මොඩල් එකක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා. මොඩේල් දෙන්නම් FastText ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න, ඒ වගේම අපි මේ මොඩේල් පාවිච්චි කරන්නේ අඩු අනිත් අංග්\u200dරීසි කණ්ඩායම් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, අපේ පද්ධතිය ඉංග්\u200dරීසි එක්ක අංග්\u200dරීසි එක්ක අංග්\u200dරීසි එක', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul transmis SemEval 2019 Task 5: Detectarea multilingvă a discursului de ură împotriva imigranților și femeilor pe Twitter (hatEval). Scopul său principal este de a efectua detectarea discursului de ură pe Twitter, care include în principal două ținte specifice diferite, imigranții și femeile. Participăm atât la subactivitatea A, cât și la subactivitatea B pentru limba engleză. Pentru a rezolva această sarcină, dezvoltăm un ansamblu de model atenție-LSTM bazat pe HAN și un model BiGRU-capsule. Ambele modele folosesc încorporări pre-instruite FastText și folosim acest model în ambele subactivități. În comparație cu alte echipe participante, sistemul nostru se află pe locul 16 în subsarcina A pentru engleză și pe locul 12 în subsarcina B pentru engleză.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka loo soo dhiibay shaqo 5 ee SemEval 2019: Garashada hadalka nacayb oo af badan oo ku saabsan dadka dalka u soo guuray iyo dumarka Twitterka (hatEval). Ujeedkeeda ugu muhiimsan waa in la sameeyo baaritaanka hadalka nebcaada ee Twitterka, taas oo ugu horeysa waxaa ku jira laba goal oo gaar ah oo kala duduwan, dadka dalka u soo guuray iyo dumar. Waxaynu ka qeybqaadanaynaa shabakada A iyo sub-xafiiska B ee ingiriisiga. Si aan u qabsado shuqulkaas, waxaynu horumarinnay model-LSTM oo ku saleysan HAN iyo model BiGRU-kapsule. Text pre-trained embeddings, waxaynu ku isticmaalnaa qaababkan labada shaqooyin. Isbarbardhigta kooxda kale oo ka qayb-qayb-ka ah, nidaamkayaga waxaa lagu saleeyaa 16aad oo ku qoran Sub-task A Ingiriis, 12aad oo ku qoran Sub-task B Ingiriis.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval 2019 பணிக்கு வழங்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பை விளக்குகிறது: குடியாளிகள் மற்றும் பெண்களுக்கு எதிரான வெறுப்பு பேச்சு ம அதன் முதன்மையான காரணத்தின் வெறுப்பு பேச்சு கண்டுபிடிப்பது, முக்கியமாக, இரண்டு வித்தியாசமான இலக்குகள், குடியாண் ஆங்கிலத்திற்கு துணை பணி A மற்றும் துணை பணி B யிலும் பகிர்ந்து கொள்கிறோம். இந்த செயலை முகவரிப்பதற்கு, HAN மற்றும் ஒரு பிஜிஆர்- காப்சூல் மாதிரியை அடிப்படையில் ஒரு LSTM மாதிரியை உருவாக்குகிறோம். Text pre- trained embeddings, and we use this model in both subtasks. In comparison to other participating teams, our system is ranked 16th in the Sub-task A for English, and 12th in the Sub-task B for English.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver systemet som lämnats in till SemEval 2019 Task 5: Flerspråkig upptäckt av hatpropaganda mot invandrare och kvinnor på Twitter (hatEval). Dess huvudsakliga syfte är att genomföra hatpropaganda detektering på Twitter, som huvudsakligen omfattar två specifika olika mål, invandrare och kvinnor. Vi deltar i både underuppgift A och underuppgift B för engelska. För att klara denna uppgift utvecklar vi en ensemble av en uppmärksamhets-LSTM modell baserad på HAN och en BiGRU-kapselmodell. Båda modellerna använder fastText-förberedda inbäddningar, och vi använder den här modellen i båda underaktiviteterna. Jämfört med andra deltagande lag rankas vårt system 16:e i deluppgift A för engelska och 12:e i deluppgift B för engelska.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem podignut na zadatak 5. SemEval 2019: Multilingual detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (hatEval). Njezina glavna svrha je provođenje otkrivanja govora mržnje na Twitteru, koja uglavnom uključuje dve posebne različite ciljeve, imigrante i žene. Učestvujemo u podpitanju A i podpitanju B za engleski. Da bi se riješili ovaj zadatak, razvili smo kompleks pažnje-LSTM model na osnovu HAN i model BiGRU-kapsule. Obje modele koriste fastText pre-obučene integracije, i koristimo ovaj model u obje podstave. U usporedbi sa drugim sudionicima, naš sistem je 16. na podzadatku A za engleski, i 12. na podzadatku B za engleski.', 'ur': 'This paper describes the system submitted to SemEval 2019 Task 5: Multilingual detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (hatEval). اس کا اصلی هدف یہ ہے کہ توئیٹر پر ناپسند بات کا اظہار کرنا ہے، جس میں دو مختلف موجود ہیں، مہاجرین اور عورتوں میں سے۔ ہم دونوں A اور B کے سوال میں شرکت کرتے ہیں انگلیسی کے لئے۔ اس کام کے بارے میں ہم نے HAN اور BiGRU-capsule موڈل پر بنیاد رکھے ہوئے LSTM موڈل کا انتشار پیدا کیا ہے. Both models use FastText pre-trained embeddings, and we use this model in both subtasks. اور دوسرے شرکت گروہوں کے مقابلہ میں، ہماری سیسٹم انگلیسی کے لئے ساب-ٹاکس A میں 16م درجہ ہے اور 12م انگلیسی کے لئے ساب-ٹاکس B میں 12م درجہ ہے۔', 'uz': "Бу саҳифа SemEval 2019 Vazifa 5 (Xitoy) ga joʻnatilgan tizimni anglatadi: Muhammadi va Twitter (hatEval) bilan bir necha tillar o'zgarishni aniqlash mumkin. Buning asosiy maqsadi Twitterda yolg'onni aniqlash uchun foydalanish mumkin. Bu asosida ikkita foydalanuvchi maqsad, муҳожирлар ва аёллар ичида. Biz ingliz tilida sub-vazifa A va sub-vazifa B bilan murojaat qilamiz. Bu vazifani boshqarish uchun biz HAN va BiGRU- kapsler modeli asosida yaratilgan LSTM modelini yaratdik. Text pre- trained embeddings, va bu modelni ikkita sub- vazifalardan foydalanamiz. Boshqa bog'liq guruhlarga o'xshash bo'lganda, bizning tizimmiz ingliz tilidagi tub vazifa A'da 16 chi chegara, va ingliz tilida 12 chi tub vazifa B'da.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả hệ thống được gửi đến nhiệm vụ Semkhai mạc 209. Phát hiện ngôn ngữ đa ngôn ngữ về sự thù ghét đối với người nhập cư và phụ nữ trên Twitter. Mục đích chính của nó là tiến hành phát hiện tiếng nói ghét trên Twitter, nơi chủ yếu gồm hai mục tiêu khác nhau, nhập cư và phụ nữ. Chúng tôi tham gia cả phần A và phần B cho tiếng Anh. Để thực hiện nhiệm vụ này, chúng tôi đã phát triển một kết hợp của mô hình tập trung-HTTM dựa trên HAN và mô hình vỏ xe BiGRU. Cả hai mẫu đều dùng cấu ghép nhanh và được đào tạo trước, và chúng tôi dùng kiểu này trong cả hai mặt phụ đề. So với các đội khác, hệ thống của chúng ta được xếp hạng mười năm trong con chạy A cho tiếng Anh, và 12th trong con chạy phụ cho tiếng Anh.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sustav podignut na zadatak 5. semiEval 2019: multijezički otkrivanje govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena na Twitter (hatEval). Njezina glavna svrha je provođenje otkrivanja govora mržnje na Twitteru, koja uglavnom uključuje dvije određene različite ciljeve, imigrante i žene. Mi učestvujemo u podpitanju A i podpitanju B za engleski. Da bi se riješili ovaj zadatak, razvijamo kompleks pažnje-LSTM modela na temelju HAN i model BiGRU-kapsule. Obje modele koriste fastText predobučene integracije, i koristimo ovaj model u obje podstave. U usporedbi s drugim sudjelujućim timovima, naš sustav je 16. na podzadatku A za engleski, i 12. na podzadatku B za engleski.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва системата, представена на Задача 5: Многоезично откриване на речта на омразата срещу имигранти и жени в Туитър. Основната му цел е да провежда откриване на реч на омразата в Туитър, която включва основно две специфични различни цели - имигранти и жени. Участваме както в подзадача А, така и в подзадача Б за английски език. За да се справим с тази задача, разработихме ансамбъл от модел на внимание, базиран на модел на капсула. И двата модела използват предварително обучени вграждания и ние използваме този модел и в двете подзадачи. В сравнение с останалите участващи отбори, нашата система се класира на 16-то място в подзадача А за английски език и на 12-то място в подзадача Б за английски език.', 'nl': 'Deze paper beschrijft het systeem dat is ingediend bij SemEval 2019 Taak 5: Meertalige detectie van haatspraak tegen immigranten en vrouwen in Twitter (hatEval). Het belangrijkste doel is het detecteren van haatspraak op Twitter, die voornamelijk twee specifieke doelen omvat, immigranten en vrouwen. We nemen deel aan zowel subtaak A als subtaak B voor Engels. Om deze taak aan te pakken, ontwikkelen we een ensemble van een attentie-LSTM model gebaseerd op HAN en een BiGRU-capsule model. Beide modellen maken gebruik van fastText vooraf getrainde embeddings, en we gebruiken dit model in beide subtaken. In vergelijking met andere deelnemende teams staat ons systeem 16e in de Subtaak A voor Engels en 12e in de Subtaak B voor Engels.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver systemet indsendt til SemEval 2019 Opgave 5: Flersproget detektering af hadefulde tale mod indvandrere og kvinder på Twitter (hatEval). Dets hovedformål er at gennemføre hadefuldtale detektering på Twitter, som primært omfatter to specifikke forskellige mål, indvandrere og kvinder. Vi deltager i både underopgave A og underopgave B for engelsk. For at løse denne opgave udvikler vi et ensemble af en opmærksomhed-LSTM model baseret på HAN og en BiGRU-kapsel model. Begge modeller bruger fastText forududdannede indlejringer, og vi bruger denne model i begge underopgaver. Sammenlignet med andre deltagende hold er vores system rangeret 16. i underopgave A for engelsk og 12. i underopgave B for engelsk.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt das System, das SemEval 2019 Aufgabe 5: Mehrsprachige Erkennung von Hassreden gegen Immigranten und Frauen in Twitter (hatEval) eingereicht wurde. Sein Hauptzweck ist die Erkennung von Hassreden auf Twitter, die hauptsächlich zwei spezifische Ziele umfasst, Einwanderer und Frauen. Wir nehmen sowohl an Teilaufgaben A als auch an Teilaufgaben B für Englisch teil. Um dieser Aufgabe gerecht zu werden, entwickeln wir ein Ensemble aus einem Aufmerksamkeits-LSTM-Modell basierend auf HAN und einem BiGRU-Kapselmodell. Beide Modelle verwenden fastText vortrainierte Einbettungen, und wir verwenden dieses Modell in beiden Teilaufgaben. Im Vergleich zu anderen teilnehmenden Teams ist unser System in der Teilaufgabe A für Englisch und in der Teilaufgabe B für Englisch auf dem sechsten Platz.', 'ko': '본고는 SemEval 2019 미션 5에 제출된 시스템인 트위터에서 이민과 여성에 대한 증오 발언을 위한 다중 언어 검출(hatEval)을 묘사한다.트위터에서 증오 발언을 하는 것이 주요 목적인데 주로 두 가지 다른 특정 목표인 이민과 여성을 포함한다.우리는 영어의 하위 임무 A와 하위 임무 B에 참여했다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 한이의 주의를 바탕으로 하는 LSTM 모델과 BiGRU 캡슐 모델의 통합을 개발했다.두 모델 모두fastText 프리 트레이닝의 삽입을 사용합니다. 우리는 두 개의 하위 작업에서 모두 이 모델을 사용합니다.우리 시스템은 다른 참가팀에 비해 영어 서브퀘스트 A에서 16위, 영어 서브퀘스트 B에서 12위를 차지했다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم را به ماموریت ۲۰۱۹ نیز توضیح می\u200cدهد: کشف بسیاری از زبان\u200cهای متنفر سخنرانی در برابر مهاجران و زنان توئیتر (hatEval). هدف اصلی آن این است که در توئیتر کشف سخنرانی متنفر باشد، که در اصل دو هدف مختلف، مهاجران و زنان شامل است. ما در هر دو زیر سوال A و زیر سوال B برای انگلیسی شرکت می کنیم. تا این کار را حل کنیم، ما یک نمونه از مدل توجه-LSTM بر اساس HAN و یک مدل کاپسول BiGRU توسعه می کنیم. هر دو مدل از سرعت متن پیش آموزش آموزش استفاده می\u200cکند، و ما از این مدل در هر دو زیر استفاده می\u200cکنیم. در مقایسه با تیم\u200cهای دیگر شرکت می\u200cکنند، سیستم ما در زیر کار A برای انگلیسی است و ۱۲م در زیر کار B برای انگلیسی است.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem yang dihantar ke SemEval 2019 Tugas 5: Deteksi berbilang bahasa pidato kebencian terhadap imigran dan wanita di Twitter (HatEval). Tujuan utamanya adalah melakukan deteksi pidato kebencian di Twitter, yang terutama termasuk dua sasaran spesifik yang berbeda, imigran dan wanita. Kami berpartisipasi dalam kedua subtask A dan subtask B untuk bahasa Inggris. Untuk mengatasi tugas ini, kami mengembangkan sebuah ensemble dari model perhatian-LSTM berdasarkan HAN dan model kapsul BiGRU. Both models use fastText pre-trained embeddings, and we use this model in both subtasks.  Dalam perbandingan dengan tim-tim yang berpartisipasi lainnya, sistem kita ditangkap ke-16 dalam Sub-tugas A untuk bahasa Inggris, dan ke-12 dalam Sub-tugas B untuk bahasa Inggris.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo uliotolewa kwenye kazi ya SemEval 2019 5: Utambuzi wa lugha nyingi wa hotuba ya chuki dhidi ya wahamiaji na wanawake kwenye mtandao wa Twita (hatEval). Lengo lake kuu ni kutekeleza uchunguzi wa hotuba za chuki kwenye mtandao wa Twita, ambalo kwa ujumla unajumuisha malengo mawili tofauti, wahamiaji na wanawake. We participate in both subtask A and subtask B for English.  Ili kuzungumzia kazi hii, tunatengeneza mfumo wa muundo wa LSTM unaoanzishwa na HAN na modeli ya BiGRU. Viwili viwili vinatumia matokeo ya haraka yaliyofunzwa kabla, na tunatumia mtindo huu katika kazi zote mbili. Kwa kulinganisha na timu nyingine za ushiriki, mfumo wetu umekuwa na rangi ya 16 katika kazi ya Uingereza Kusini, na ya 12 katika jukumu la Uingereza B kwa ajili ya Kiingereza.', 'sq': 'This paper describes the system submitted to SemEval 2019 Task 5: Multilingual detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (hatEval).  Qëllimi kryesor i saj është të kryejë zbulimin e fjalëve të urrejtjes në Twitter, i cili përfshin kryesisht dy objektiva specifike të ndryshme, emigrantët dhe gratë. We participate in both subtask A and subtask B for English.  Për të trajtuar këtë detyrë, ne zhvillojmë një komplet të një modeli vëmendjeje-LSTM bazuar në HAN dhe një model BiGRU-kapsule. Të dy modelet përdorin përfshirje të shpejta të paratrajnuara nga Texti, dhe ne përdorim këtë model në të dy subtasket. Në krahasim me ekipe të tjera pjesëmarrëse, sistemi ynë është renditur i 16-të në Subdetyrën A për anglisht dhe i 12-të në Subdetyrën B për anglisht.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ለስምEval 2019 ስራ 5 የሚሰጠውን ድምፅ ይናገራል፤ በተዊተር ስደተኞች እና ሴቶች ላይ የጥል ንግግር የቋንቋ ቋንቋ አግኝቷል (hatEval) ይናገራል፡፡ የጥል ንግግር አግኝቷን በትዊተር ላይ ማድረግ ነው፡፡ አ እና አዲስ ስራ B ለመንግልዝኛ እናጋራለን፡፡ ይህንን ስራ ለመግለጽ፣ በሐና እና በቢGRU-ካምፓሊስ ሞዴል ላይ የተመሳሳይ የLSTM ሞዴል ምሳሌ እናደርጋለን፡፡ Text pre-trained embeddings, እና ይህንን model በሁለቱ ደብዳቤዎች ውስጥ እንጠቀምጣለን፡፡ ሌሎችን ተካያፊዎች ቡድን በሚተያክል፣ ስርዓታችን አሥር ስርዓት በንግግሊዝኛ አቅራቢያ እና አሥራ 12ኛ በ ደብዳቤ B ለመንግሊዝኛ ነው፡፡', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz 2019-nji ýylyň SemEval aýynyň 1-nji Görevi 5: Ýyglançylar we aýallar Twitter (hatEval) bilen ýigrenýän sözlerini tapylýar. Onuň esasy maksady Twitter-da ýigrenýän sözlerini tapmak, olaryň esasy iki dürli maksady, göçmenler we aýallary bar. Biz hem A subt soragyna hem B subt soragyna hem Iňlisçe gabat geldik. Bu zady çözmek üçin, HAN we BiGRU-kapsula nusgasyna daýan bir üns-LSTM nusgasyny çykarýarys. Her iki nusga täze tekst öňünden eğlenen ködlemeleri ulanýar we bu nusgany ikimiz de süýtgede ulanýarys. Başga toparlara karşılaşykda biziň sistemamyz Iňlisçe Sub-zada A we Iňlisçe Sub-zada B-de 12-nji derejesi bardyr.', 'af': 'Hierdie papier beskrywe die stelsel wat na SemEval 2019-taak 5 ingestuur is: Multilingual opslag van haatspraak teen imigrante en vroue in Twitter (hatEval). Sy hoofdoel is om haat spraak ontdekking op Twitter te doen, wat heeltemal twee spesifieke verskillende doels, immigrante en vroue insluit. Ons deel bymekaar in subvraag A en subvraag B vir Engels. In order to address this task, we develop an ensemble of an attention-LSTM model based on HAN and an BiGRU-capsule model. Beide modele gebruik fastText pre- trained embedding, en ons gebruik hierdie model in beide subtaske. In vergelyking met ander deelnadeerde teams is ons stelsel 16de in die Sub-taak A vir Engels, en 12de in die Sub-taak B vir Engels.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল ২০১৯ কাজের প্রতি প্রদান করা সিস্টেমের ব্যাখ্যা করছে: অভিবাসী এবং নারীদের বিরুদ্ধে ঘৃণার বিরুদ্ধে বহ তার প্রধান উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে টুইটারে ঘৃণা ভাষণ আবিষ্কার করার জন্য, যার মধ্যে মূলত দুটি বিশেষ লক্ষ্য, অভিবাসী এবং নারীর মধ আমরা ইংরেজীর জন্য সাবকাজ A এবং সাবকাজ B-এ অংশগ্রহণ করি। এই কাজের কথা বলার জন্য আমরা হানান এবং বিজিআরউ-ক্যাপ্সুল মডেলের ভিত্তিক একটি এলসিএম মডেলের একটি প্রতিষ্ঠান তৈরি করি। উভয় মডেলটি দ্রুত ট্রেনিং ব্যবহার করে, এবং আমরা এই মডেল উভয় সাবট্যাক্সে ব্যবহার করি। অন্যান্য অংশগ্রহণকারী দলের সাথে তুলনায়, আমাদের সিস্টেম ইংরেজীর জন্য সাব-কাজ A-এ ১৬তম রান্না হয়েছে এবং ইংরেজি জন্য সাব-কা', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է համակարգը, որը ներկայացվել է 2019 թվականին "Սեմեվալ 2019" 5. հանձնարարությամբ. ատելության խոսքի բազմալեզու հայտնաբերումը ներգրավողների և կանանց դեմ Թվիթերում: Նրա հիմնական նպատակը Թվիթերի վրա ատելության խոսքերի հայտնաբերումն է, որը հիմնականում ներառում է երկու կոնկրետ տարբեր նպատակներ՝ միգրանտներ և կանայք: Մենք մասնակցում ենք անգլերենի A-ի և B-ի ենթահարցերին: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք ստեղծում ենք ուշադրության-LSMT մոդելի համակարգ, որը հիմնված է HAN-ի և բիGRU-կապուլսի մոդելի վրա: Երկու մոդելները օգտագործում են արագ տեքստի նախապատրաստված ներդրումներ, և մենք օգտագործում ենք այս մոդելը երկու ենթահարցերում: Համեմատելով այլ մասնակցում գտնվող թիմերի հետ, մեր համակարգը 16-րդ դասակարգվում է անգլերենի A ենթախնդրի մեջ, իսկ 12-րդ՝ անգլերենի B ենթախնդրի մեջ:', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem podignut na zadatak 5. semiEval 2019: multijezičko otkrivanje govora mržnje protiv imigranta i žena na Twitter (hatEval). Njezina glavna svrha je provođenje otkrivanja govora mržnje na Twitteru, koja uglavnom uključuje dvije određene različite ciljeve, imigrante i žene. Mi učestvujemo u podpitanju A i podpitanju B za engleski. Da bismo se riješili ovog zadatka, razvili smo kompleks pažnje-LSTM model na osnovu HAN i model BiGRU-kapsule. Obje modele koriste fastText pre-obučene integracije, i koristimo ovaj model u oba podmetaka. U usporedbi sa drugim sudjelujućim timovima, naš sistem je 16. na podzadatku A za engleski, i 12. na podzadatku B za engleski.', 'az': "Bu kağıt 2019-ci SemEval Task 5-ə göndərilmiş sistemi təsbiq edir: İncillərə və qadınlara qarşı nifrət sözlərinin çoxlu dilləri keşfetməsi Twitter-də (hatEval). Onun ən böyük məqsədi, Twitter'da nifrət sözlərini keşfetmək və bu iki müxtəlif məqsədi, imigrantlər və qadınlar içərisində olmaq idi. Biz hər ikimizin A subtask və B subtask üçün İngilizce dilinə katılırıq. Bu işi çəkmək üçün, HAN və BiGRU-kapsul modelinin səbəbi olan LSTM modelini təşkil edirik. İkisi modellər FastText öyrənmiş təhsil edilmiş inbingləri istifadə edir, və bu modeli ikimiz də aparmaqlarda istifadə edirik. Digər iştirak ekipleri ilə qarşılaşdığımızda, sistemimiz İngilizə A Sub-task'də 16-ci dərəcədə, İngilizə B Sub-task'də 12-ci dərəcədə.", 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el sistema submetit a SemEval 2019 Task 5: Multilingual detection of hate speech against immigrants and women on Twitter (hatEval). El seu propòsit principal és fer la detecció del discurs d'odi a Twitter, que inclou principalment dos objectius específics, immigrants i dones. Participem en la subterrània A i la subterrània B per anglès. Per abordar aquesta tasca, desenvolupem un conjunt de model LSTM d'atenció basat en HAN i un model de càpsula BiGRU. Ambdós models utilitzen incorporacions de text ràpids, i utilitzem aquest model en ambdues subtaskes. En comparació amb altres equips participants, el nostre sistema es classe 16ª a la Subtasca A per anglès, i 12ª a la Subtasca B per anglès.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje systém předložený SemEvalu 2019 Task 5: Vícejazyčná detekce nenávistné řeči proti imigrantům a ženám na Twitteru (hatEval). Jeho hlavním účelem je provádět detekci nenávistných řečí na Twitteru, která zahrnuje především dva specifické různé cíle, imigranty a ženy. Účastníme se jak podúkolu A, tak podúkolu B pro angličtinu. Za účelem řešení tohoto úkolu jsme vyvinuli soubor pozornostního LSTM modelu založeného na HAN a BiGRU kapsle modelu. Oba modely používají předškolené vložení fastText a tento model používáme v obou dílčích úkolech. Ve srovnání s ostatními zúčastněnými týmy je náš systém šestnáctý v podúkolu A pro angličtinu a dvanáctý v podúkolu B pro angličtinu.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse SemEval 2019 ülesandele 5: immigrantide ja naiste vihakõne mitmekeelne avastamine Twitteris (hatEval). Selle peamine eesmärk on läbi viia vihakõne tuvastamine Twitteris, mis hõlmab peamiselt kahte konkreetset erinevat sihtmärki, sisserändajaid ja naisi. Osaleme nii alamülesandes A kui alamülesandes B inglise keeles. Selle ülesande täitmiseks töötasime välja HAN-il põhineva tähelepanu-LSTM mudeli ansambli ja BiGRU-kapsli mudeli. Mõlemad mudelid kasutavad eelõpetatud fastTexti manustamist ja me kasutame seda mudelit mõlemas alamülesandes. Võrreldes teiste osalevate meeskondadega on meie süsteem 16. kohal alamülesandes A inglise keeles ja 12. kohal alamülesandes B inglise keeles.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan SemEval 2019 Task 5: Monikielinen maahanmuuttajiin ja naisiin kohdistuvan vihapuheen havaitseminen Twitterissä (hatEval). Sen päätarkoituksena on vihapuheen havaitseminen Twitterissä, johon kuuluu pääasiassa kaksi erityistä kohdetta, maahanmuuttajat ja naiset. Osallistumme sekä alatehtävään A että alatehtävään B englanniksi. Tämän tehtävän hoitamiseksi kehitimme HAN- ja BiGRU-kapselimalliin perustuvan huomio-LSTM-mallin kokonaisuuden. Molemmat mallit käyttävät fastText-esikoulutettuja upotuksia, ja käytämme tätä mallia molemmissa alitehtävissä. Muihin osallistuviin joukkueisiin verrattuna järjestelmämme sijoittuu 16. sijalle osatehtävässä A englanniksi ja 12. sijalle osatehtävässä B englanniksi.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki diperawan sistem sing nyimpen kanggo seminval 2011 task 5: Rasané é awak dhéwé kesempatan kanggo nganggo alam kuwi mrabagané lan ceni nêmên tuytir (hasebal). Rasané awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe pancening kuwi kesempatan kanggo tatara awak dhéwé nang Google, sing sumulakno akèh éwé cilik, dadi wis alèh karo bendhik. Awakdhéwé menyang pisan nganggoleh basa A lan basa B iki bangsané Inggris Digawe nggo ngerasakno iki, kita ditambah akeh simbol sing nggawe modèl atens-SLT, sing basa karo HAN lan model BigreU-capsule model Ngomparahan karo kelompok sing wis nambah, sistem dhéwé wis rak 16 ing Sub-task A kanggo Inggris, lan 12 ing Sub-task B kanggo Inggris.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana tsarin da aka saka shi zuwa aikin Semeval 2019 Taimar 5: Kunna'ura masu yawa na'ura wa hoton ƙarya a kan immigranta da mãtã a Twitter (hateval). Ganarsa babban kammala shi ne ya sami gane hoton takaici a Twitter, wanda ke ƙunsa da goalin biyu masu ƙayyadadde, immigranta da mãtã. Munã tãrayyar da dukansu cikin aikin A da bincike B wa Ingiriya. Dõmin in faɗar wannan aikin, mu buɗe wani misali na-LStM kan muhalli a kan hasN da wani misali na BiGRU-capsule. Text pre-introduced embeddings, kuma mu yi amfani da wannan motel cikin duk taskõki. Yana samfani da waɗansu jama'a masu haɗa, na'asarmu yana ranar da 16th a cikin Sub-aikin A wa Ingiriya, kuma na 12th a cikin Sub-aikin B sabõda Ingiriya.", 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan sistem, predložen SemEval 2019 naloga 5: Večjezično odkrivanje sovražnega govora proti priseljencem in ženskam v Twitterju (hatEval). Njegov glavni namen je izvajanje odkrivanja sovražnega govora na Twitterju, ki vključuje predvsem dva posebna različna cilja, priseljence in ženske. Sodelujemo v podnalogi A in podnalogi B za angleščino. Za reševanje te naloge smo razvili ansambel modela pozornosti-LSTM na osnovi HAN in BiGRU-kapsule. Oba modela uporabljata fastText vnaprej usposobljene vdelave, ta model pa uporabljamo v obeh podopravilih. V primerjavi z ostalimi sodelujočimi ekipami je naš sistem uvrščen na 16. mesto v podnalogi A za angleščino in 12. mesto v podnalogi B za angleščino.', 'he': 'This paper describes the system submitted to SemEval 2019 Task 5: Multilingual detection of hate speech against immigrants and women in Twitter (hatEval).  מטרתו העיקרית היא לבצע זיהוי נאום שנאה בטוויטר, אשר כולל בעיקר שתי מטרות שונות ספציפיות, מהגרים ונשים. אנו משתתפים בשני תחת השאלה A ו תחת השאלה B לאנגלית. כדי להתמודד עם המשימה הזאת, אנחנו מפתחים אסמבל של מודל LSTM תשומת לב מבוסס על HAN ומודל BiGRU-קפסולה. שני הדוגמנים משתמשים באמצעות טקסט מהירים מאומנות מראש, ואנחנו משתמשים בדוגמא הזאת בשני תת-שאלות. In comparison to other participating teams, our system is ranked 16th in the Sub-task A for English, and 12th in the Sub-task B for English.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལྟར་2019ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་འཇིག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ལྡན་པ་༡༥： Its main purpose is to conduct hate speech detection on Twitter, which mainly includes two specific targets, immigrants and women. ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་དབྱིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་subtask A དང་subtask B་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྣོད། To address this task, we develop an ensemble of an attention-LSTM model based on HAN and an BiGRU-capsule model. རྣམ་གྲངས་གཉིས་པོ་བརྟག་པར་སྔོན་གྱིས་འཛུགས་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་སྔོན་གྱིས་འཛུགས་པའི་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཚན་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་བེད་སྤྱོད ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་དབར་ཆ་གཞན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཕན་ཚུན་བྱེད་པའི་དབར་ཆ་གཞན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་སྟེ། འོག་གི་མ་ལག་གི་ཐོག་ལས་དབྱིན་ཡིག'}
{'en': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : Detecting Offensive Language Using BERT model', 'ar': 'فريق BNU-HKBU UIC NLP 2 في SemEval-2019 المهمة 6: اكتشاف اللغة الهجومية باستخدام نموذج BERT', 'es': 'El Equipo 2 de PNL de la UIC de la BNU-HKBU en la Tarea 6 de SemEval-2019: Detección del lenguaje ofensivo mediante el modelo BERT', 'pt': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Detectando linguagem ofensiva usando o modelo BERT', 'fr': "BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: Détection du langage offensant à l'aide du modèle BERT", 'ja': 'BNU - HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 at SemEval -2019タスク6 ： BERTモデルを使用した攻撃的言語の検出', 'hi': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP टीम 2 SemEval-2019 कार्य 6 पर: BERT मॉडल का उपयोग करके आक्रामक भाषा का पता लगाना', 'zh': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 at SemEval-2019 еЉЎ6:з”ЁBERTжЈЂе†’иЁЂ', 'ru': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Обнаружение оскорбительного языка с использованием модели BERT', 'ga': 'Foireann NLP UIC BNU-HKBU 2 ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Teanga Iontach a Bhrath Ag Úsáid Múnla BERT', 'ka': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP ჯგუფი 2 SemEval-2019 სამუშაო დავალება 6: ბერტის მოდულის გამოყენება განახლება', 'el': 'Ομάδα 2 στο έργο 6: Ανίχνευση προσβλητικής γλώσσας χρησιμοποιώντας μοντέλο ΒΡΤ', 'hu': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 a SemEval-2019 6. feladat: Támadó nyelv felismerése BERT modell használatával', 'it': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Individuare il linguaggio offensivo utilizzando il modello BERT', 'kk': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP тобы 2 - SemEval- 2019 6- тапсырмасында: BERT үлгісін қолдану үлгісін табу', 'lt': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP 2 komanda pusevalyje 2019 m. 6 užduotis: pažeidžiamos kalbos nustatymas naudojant BERT model į', 'mk': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP тим 2 на SemEval-2019 задача 6: Детектирање на навредлив јазик користејќи го моделот BERT', 'ms': 'Pasukan NLP BNU-HKBU UIC 2 di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Mengesan Bahasa Tersinggung menggunakan model BERT', 'mt': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 f’SemEval-2019 Task 6: Detezzjoni ta’ Lingwa Offensiva bl-Użu tal-mudell BERT', 'mn': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP баг 2 SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Detecting BERT model Using', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6-ല്\u200d BNU- HKBU UIC NLP ടീം 2: ബെര്\u200dടി മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഓഫെന്\u200dസിവ് ഭാഷ തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നു', 'no': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP-gruppe 2 på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 6: Finn forskyvne språk ved bruk av BERT-modell', 'pl': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 6: Wykrywanie języka obraźliwego za pomocą modelu BERT', 'ro': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: Detectarea limbajului ofensiv folosind modelul BERT', 'sr': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 na semiEval-2019 Task 6: Otkrivanje službenog jezika korištenje modela BERT', 'si': 'BNO-HKBU UIC NLP කණ්ඩායම් 2 සම්වෙල්-2019 වැඩ 6 වෙනුවෙන් වැඩ 6: අධික භාෂාව පරීක්ෂා කරන්න BERT මොඩල් භාවිතා කරන්න', 'so': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Detecting Offensive language using BERT model', 'sv': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: Att upptäcka offensivt språk med hjälp av BERT-modellen', 'ta': 'BNU- HKBU UIC NLP குழு 2 செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 6: BERT மாதிரியை பயன்படுத்தி தெரியும் மொழி கண்டறிதல்', 'ur': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Detecting BERT model using BERT', 'uz': '6 Vazifani SemEval- 2019 bilan BNU-HKBU UIC NLP jamoasi 2: BERT modeldan foydalanish ofensive tilni aniqlash', 'vi': 'Độ sâu của BND-HKBU UC NLP Team 2 tại SemEvl-209 Task 6: Việc trinh sát Ngôn ngữ tàn bạo sử dụng kiểu BERT.', 'bg': 'Екип 2 на НЛП на БНУ-ХНБУ УИК в Задача 6: Откриване на офанзивен език с помощта на модел БЕРТ', 'nl': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 bij SemEval-2019 Taak 6: Detecteren van offensieve taal met behulp van BERT model', 'hr': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 na zadatku 6: otkrivanje neovisnog jezika korištenje modela BERT', 'da': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 på SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: Opdagelse af offensivt sprog ved hjælp af BERT-modellen', 'de': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 6: Erkennung offensiver Sprache mit BERT-Modell', 'id': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 di SemEval-2019 Task 6: Detektif Bahasa Tersinggung menggunakan model BERT', 'ko': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP 팀 2에서SemEval-2019 작업 6: BERT 모델로 공격성 언어 탐지', 'fa': 'تیم NLP ۲ BNU-HKBU UIC در کار ۶: شناسایی زبان ناتوانی با استفاده از مدل BERT', 'sw': 'Team 2 wa BNU-HKBU UIC NLP katika SemEval-2019 Task 6: Kuchunguza Lugha Huru kwa kutumia modeli ya BERT', 'tr': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Topary 2 at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Detecting Offensive Language Using BERT model', 'sq': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 në SemEval-2019 Task 6: Detecting Offensive Language Using BERT model', 'am': 'ስራ 6: Detecting Offensive language using BERT model', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'BNU-HKOU Uic-ի ՆԼՊ թիմը 2-ը ՍեմԷվալ-2019-ի 6-րդ հանձնարարությունում. հայտնաբերել զգայուն լեզուն BER մոդելի օգտագործելով', 'az': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Takımı 2-si SemEval-2019 Gözmü 6: BERT modelini istifadə etmək üçün çox qüvvətli Dili keşfetmek', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের ৬-এ বিএনউ-হাকেবিউ ইউজিক এনএলপি দল ২: বার্টি মডেল ব্যবহার করা অফেনসেভ ভ ভাষা সনাক্ত করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 na pola Evala-2019 Task 6: Otkrivanje neposlušnog jezika Koristeći model BERT', 'ca': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Detecting Offensive Language Using BERT model', 'cs': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 na SemEval-2019 Úkol 6: Detekce útočného jazyka pomocí BERT modelu', 'et': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP meeskond 2 SemEval-2019 ülesanne 6: ründava keele tuvastamine BERT mudeli abil', 'fi': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 SemEval-2019 Teht채v채 6: Hy철kk채채v채n kielen havaitseminen BERT-mallin avulla', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'jv': 'BNU-HkbU ID NLP Group 2 at semiinval-2011 task 6: detecting offensive Language Using BERT model', 'sk': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 na SemEval-2019 Naloga 6: Odkrivanje napadalnega jezika z uporabo modela BERT', 'bo': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team 2 at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Detecting Offensive Language Using BERT model', 'he': 'BNU-HKBU UIC NLP צוות 2 ב SemEval-2019 משימה 6: גילוי שפה פגיעה בשימוש מודל BERT'}
{'en': 'In this study we deal with the problem of identifying and categorizing offensive language in social media. Our group, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, use supervised classification along with multiple version of data generated by different ways of pre-processing the data. We then use the state-of-the-art model Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers, or BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), to capture linguistic, syntactic and semantic features. Long range dependencies between each part of a sentence can be captured by BERT’s bidirectional encoder representations. Our results show 85.12 % accuracy and 80.57 % F1 scores in Subtask A (offensive language identification), 87.92 % accuracy and 50 % F1 scores in Subtask B (categorization of offense types), and 69.95 % accuracy and 50.47 % F1 score in Subtask C (offense target identification). Analysis of the results shows that distinguishing between targeted and untargeted offensive language is not a simple task. More work needs to be done on the unbalance data problem in Subtasks B and C. Some future work is also discussed.', 'ar': 'نتناول في هذه الدراسة مشكلة تحديد وتصنيف اللغة المسيئة في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. تستخدم مجموعتنا ، BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2 ، التصنيف الخاضع للإشراف جنبًا إلى جنب مع نسخة متعددة من البيانات التي تم إنشاؤها بواسطة طرق مختلفة للمعالجة المسبقة للبيانات. ثم نستخدم نموذجًا حديثًا تمثيلات التشفير ثنائية الاتجاه من المحولات ، أو BERT (Devlin et al ، 2018) ، لالتقاط الميزات اللغوية والنحوية والدلالية. يمكن التقاط التبعيات طويلة المدى بين كل جزء من الجملة بواسطة تمثيلات BERT ثنائية الاتجاه. تظهر نتائجنا دقة 85.12٪ و 80.57٪ من نقاط F1 في Subtask A (تحديد لغة هجومية) و 87.92٪ دقة و 50٪ F1 في Subtask B (تصنيف أنواع الجرائم) و 69.95٪ دقة و 50.47٪ F1 في Subtask C (تحديد هدف الجريمة). يوضح تحليل النتائج أن التمييز بين اللغة الهجومية المستهدفة وغير المستهدفة ليس بالمهمة السهلة. هناك المزيد من العمل الذي يتعين القيام به بشأن مشكلة البيانات غير المتوازنة في المهمتين الفرعيتين "ب" و "ج". كما تمت مناقشة بعض الأعمال المستقبلية.', 'es': 'En este estudio abordamos el problema de identificar y categorizar el lenguaje ofensivo en las redes sociales. Nuestro grupo, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, utiliza la clasificación supervisada junto con múltiples versiones de datos generados por diferentes formas de preprocesamiento de los datos. Luego utilizamos el modelo de vanguardia Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers, o BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), para capturar características lingüísticas, sintácticas y semánticas. Las representaciones codificadoras bidireccionales de BERT pueden capturar dependencias de largo alcance entre cada parte de una oración. Nuestros resultados muestran un 85,12% de precisión y un 80,57% de puntajes de F1 en la subtarea A (identificación de lenguaje ofensivo), un 87,92% de precisión y un 50% de puntajes de F1 en la subtarea B (categorización de los tipos de ataque), y un 69,95% de precisión y un 50,47% de puntaje de F1 en la subtarea C (identificación El análisis de los resultados muestra que distinguir entre lenguaje ofensivo dirigido y no dirigido no es una tarea sencilla. Se necesita trabajar más en el problema de desequilibrio de datos en las subtareas B y C. También se discute algún trabajo futuro.', 'fr': "Dans cette étude, nous abordons le problème de l'identification et de la catégorisation du langage offensant dans les médias sociaux. Notre groupe, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, utilise la classification supervisée ainsi que plusieurs versions des données générées par différentes méthodes de prétraitement des données. Nous utilisons ensuite le modèle de pointe Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers, ou BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), pour capturer les caractéristiques linguistiques, syntaxiques et sémantiques. Les dépendances à longue portée entre chaque partie d'une phrase peuvent être capturées par les représentations bidirectionnelles de l'encodeur BERT. Nos résultats montrent une précision de 85,12\xa0% et des scores F1 de 80,57\xa0% dans la sous-tâche A (identification du langage offensant), 87,92\xa0% de précision et 50\xa0% de scores F1 dans la sous-tâche B (catégorisation des types d'infractions), et 69,95\xa0% de précision et 50,47\xa0% de score F1 dans la sous-tâche C (identification de la cible d'infraction). L'analyse des résultats montre qu'il n'est pas facile de faire la distinction entre un langage offensant ciblé et non ciblé. Il reste encore beaucoup à faire sur le problème du déséquilibre des données dans les sous-tâches B et C. Certains travaux futurs sont également discutés.", 'pt': 'Neste estudo lidamos com o problema de identificar e categorizar a linguagem ofensiva nas mídias sociais. Nosso grupo, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, usa classificação supervisionada junto com várias versões de dados gerados por diferentes formas de pré-processamento dos dados. Em seguida, usamos o modelo de última geração Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers, ou BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), para capturar características linguísticas, sintáticas e semânticas. Dependências de longo alcance entre cada parte de uma frase podem ser capturadas pelas representações do codificador bidirecional do BERT. Nossos resultados mostram 85,12% de precisão e 80,57% de pontuação F1 na subtarefa A (identificação de linguagem ofensiva), 87,92% de precisão e 50% de pontuação F1 na subtarefa B (categorização de tipos de ofensa) e 69,95% de precisão e 50,47% de pontuação F1 na subtarefa C (identificação do alvo da ofensa). A análise dos resultados mostra que distinguir entre linguagem ofensiva direcionada e não direcionada não é uma tarefa simples. Mais trabalho precisa ser feito no problema de desbalanceamento de dados nas subtarefas B e C. Alguns trabalhos futuros também são discutidos.', 'ja': '本研究では、ソーシャルメディアにおける不快な言葉の識別と分類の問題を扱います。 当社のグループであるBNU - HKBU UIC NLPチーム2は、データの事前処理のさまざまな方法によって生成された複数のバージョンのデータと共に、監視された分類を使用します。 次に、最先端のモデルであるBidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers、またはBERT （ Devlin et al, 2018 ）を使用して、言語的、構文的、および意味的特徴をキャプチャします。 文の各部分間の長距離依存性は、BERTの双方向エンコーダ表現によって取り込むことができる。 私たちの結果は、サブタスクA （オフェンス言語の識別）で85.12 ％の精度と80.57 ％のF 1スコア、サブタスクB （オフェンスタイプの分類）で87.92 ％の精度と50 ％のF 1スコア、サブタスクC （オフェンスターゲットの識別）で69.95 ％の精度と50.47 ％のF 1スコアを示しています。 結果の分析は、ターゲットを絞った攻撃的言語とターゲットを絞っていない攻撃的言語を区別することが単純な作業ではないことを示しています。 サブタスクBおよびCのアンバランスデータ問題については、さらに作業が必要です。今後の作業についてもいくつか説明します。', 'ru': 'В этом исследовании мы рассмотрим проблему идентификации и категоризации оскорбительных выражений в социальных сетях. Наша группа, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, использует контролируемую классификацию наряду с несколькими версиями данных, сгенерированных различными способами предварительной обработки данных. Затем мы используем современную модель двунаправленных представлений кодировщика от трансформаторов, или BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), для захвата лингвистических, синтаксических и семантических особенностей. Зависимости большой дальности между каждой частью предложения могут быть захвачены двунаправленными представлениями кодера БЕРТА. Наши результаты показывают 85,12% точность и 80,57% F1 баллов в подзадаче A (идентификация оскорбительного языка), 87,92% точность и 50% F1 баллов в подзадаче B (категоризация типов правонарушений), и 69,95% точность и 50,47% F1 баллов в подзадаче C (идентификация цели правонарушения). Анализ результатов показывает, что различие между таргетированным и не таргетированным оскорбительным языком не является простой задачей. Необходимо проделать дополнительную работу по проблеме несбалансированности данных в рамках подзадач В и С. Обсуждается также некоторая будущая работа.', 'zh': '于此论之,知类社交媒体犯性言语。 臣等之小组,BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2用督分及预处理数生数。 然后用Transformers、BERT先进之双向编码器以示(Devlin等,2018)以获言,句法与语义。 句之长距离恃BERT双向编码器而得之。 吾之的结果显示,子职A(进攻性言知)之准确率为85.12%,F1分为80.57%,子职B(攻类)之准确率为87.92%,F1分为50%,子职C(攻知)之准确率为69.95%,F1得分为50.47%。 其分析表明,分针对性非针对性犯性语言非一务也。 子职 B C ,平衡数事。 又论后事。', 'hi': 'इस अध्ययन में हम सोशल मीडिया में आपत्तिजनक भाषा की पहचान करने और वर्गीकृत करने की समस्या से निपटते हैं। हमारा समूह, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, डेटा को पूर्व-प्रसंस्करण के विभिन्न तरीकों से उत्पन्न डेटा के कई संस्करणों के साथ पर्यवेक्षित वर्गीकरण का उपयोग करता है। फिर हम भाषाई, वाक्यात्मक और शब्दार्थ विशेषताओं को पकड़ने के लिए ट्रांसफॉर्मर, या BERT (Devlin et al, 2018) से अत्याधुनिक मॉडल द्विदिश एन्कोडर प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग करते हैं। एक वाक्य के प्रत्येक भाग के बीच लंबी दूरी की निर्भरता को BERT के द्विदिश एन्कोडर प्रतिनिधित्व द्वारा कैप्चर किया जा सकता है। हमारे परिणाम 85.12% सटीकता और Subtask A (आक्रामक भाषा पहचान) में 80.57% F1 स्कोर दिखाते हैं, 87.92% सटीकता और Subtask B (अपराध प्रकारों का वर्गीकरण) में 50% F1 स्कोर, और 69.95% सटीकता और Subtask C (अपराध लक्ष्य पहचान) में 50.47% F1 स्कोर। परिणामों के विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि लक्षित और अलक्षित आक्रामक भाषा के बीच अंतर करना एक सरल कार्य नहीं है। Subtasks B और C में असंतुलित डेटा समस्या पर अधिक काम करने की आवश्यकता है। भविष्य के कुछ कामों पर भी चर्चा की जाती है।', 'ga': "Sa staidéar seo pléimid an fhadhb a bhaineann le teanga ionsaitheach a aithint agus a chatagóiriú sna meáin shóisialta. Úsáideann ár ngrúpa, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, aicmiú faoi mhaoirseacht mar aon le leagan iolrach de shonraí a ghintear trí bhealaí éagsúla chun na sonraí a réamhphróiseáil. Bainimid úsáid ansin as an tsamhail úrscothach, Léiriúcháin Ionchódóra Déthreo ó Chlaochladáin, nó BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), chun gnéithe teanga, comhréire agus séimeantaice a ghabháil. Is féidir spleáchais fadraoin idir gach cuid d'abairt a ghabháil le huiríll déthreoracha ionchódóra BERT. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí 85.12% cruinneas agus 80.57% scóir F1 i bhFothasc A (aitheantas teanga maslach), cruinneas 87.92% agus scóir F1 50% i bhFothasc B (catagóiriú cineálacha cionta), agus 69.95% cruinneas agus 50.47% scór F1 i bhFothasc C. (sprioc-sprioc cionta a shainaithint). Léiríonn anailís ar na torthaí nach tasc simplí é idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir teanga ionsaitheach spriocdhírithe agus teanga neamhdhírithe. Ní mór tuilleadh oibre a dhéanamh ar fhadhb na sonraí éagothroime i bhFotascanna B agus C. Pléitear roinnt oibre amach anseo freisin.", 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban a sértő nyelvek azonosításának és kategorizálásának problémájával foglalkozunk a közösségi médiában. Csoportunk, a BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2 felügyelt osztályozást alkalmaz az adatok előzetes feldolgozásának különböző módjai által generált adatok több verziójával együtt. Ezt követően a legkorszerűbb modellt használjuk a transzformátorok kétirányú kódoló-reprezentációi (BERT) (Devlin et al, 2018) nyelvi, szintaktikai és szemantikai jellemzőinek rögzítésére. Egy mondat minden része közötti hosszú távú függőségeket a BERT kétirányú kódoló reprezentációi rögzíthetik. Eredményeink 85,12% pontosságot és 80,57% F1 pontszámot mutatnak az A. alfeladatban (offenzív nyelv azonosítás), 87,92% pontosságot és 50% F1 pontszámot mutatnak a B. alfeladatban (támadástípusok kategorizálása), 69,95% pontosságot és 50,47% F1 pontszámot mutatnak a C. alfeladatban (támadási cél azonosítás). Az eredmények elemzése azt mutatja, hogy nem egyszerű feladat megkülönböztetni a célzott és a célzott sértő nyelv között. További munkát kell végezni a B. és C. alcsoport kiegyensúlyozatlansági problémájával kapcsolatban. Néhány jövőbeli munka is megvitatásra kerül.', 'ka': 'ამ კვლევაში ჩვენ სოციალური მედიაში გავაკეთებთ პრობლემების იდენტიფიკაცია და კატეგორიზაცია სატუნქციური ენაზე. ჩვენი ჯგუფი, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, გამოყენება მონაცემებული კლასიფიკაციას და მრავალ ვერსია მონაცემების განსხვავებული გზითით, რომელიც მონაცემების წინასწორება. შემდეგ ჩვენ გამოყენებთ მსგავსი მოდელის ორდირექციონალური ინფორმაციის რესპენტერების გამოყენება ტრანფორმაციებიდან, ან BERT (Devlin et al, 2018) სინტექტიკური, სინტაქტიკური და ჟენმანტიკური ფუნქ სიტყვის ყველა ნაწილის შორის დრო განსაზღვრება შეიძლება BERT-ის მეორექციონალური კოდერის გამოსახულებებით შეიძლება გადატანა. ჩვენი წარმოდგენები გამოჩვენება 85.12% წარმოდგენება და 80.57% F1 წარმოდგენება Subtask A (offensive language identification), 87.92% წარმოდგენება და 50% F1 წარმოდგენება Subtask B (offense types categorization), 69.95% წარმოდგენება და 50.47% F1 წარმოდგენება Subtask C (offense target identification). წარმოდგენების ანალიზაციაში გამოჩვენება, რომ მინიშვნელოვანი და უცნობილი სატუნქციური ენაზე განსხვავება არ არის მარტივი რაოდენობა. მეტი სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო B და C პრობლემაში უნდა გავაკეთოთ. მომავალე სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშ', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα μελέτη ασχολούμαστε με το πρόβλημα του εντοπισμού και της κατηγοριοποίησης προσβλητικής γλώσσας στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Η ομάδα μας, η ομάδα μας, χρησιμοποιεί εποπτευόμενη ταξινόμηση μαζί με πολλαπλές εκδόσεις δεδομένων που παράγονται με διαφορετικούς τρόπους προεπεξεργασίας των δεδομένων. Στη συνέχεια, χρησιμοποιούμε το σύγχρονο μοντέλο αμφίδρομης αναπαραστάσεων κωδικοποιητή από μετασχηματιστές ή για να συλλάβουμε γλωσσικά, συντακτικά και σημασιολογικά χαρακτηριστικά. Εξαρτήσεις μεγάλης εμβέλειας μεταξύ κάθε μέρους μιας πρότασης μπορούν να συλληφθούν από τις αμφίδρομες αναπαραστάσεις κωδικοποιητή του BERT. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ακρίβεια 85.12% και βαθμολογία 80.57% στην Υποεργασία Α (αναγνώριση προσβλητικής γλώσσας), ακρίβεια 87.92% και βαθμολογία 50% στην Υποεργασία Β (κατηγοριοποίηση τύπων επίθεσης), ακρίβεια 69.95% και βαθμολογία 50.47% στην Υποεργασία Γ (αναγνώριση στόχου επίθεσης). Η ανάλυση των αποτελεσμάτων δείχνει ότι η διάκριση μεταξύ στοχευμένης και μη στοχευμένης προσβλητικής γλώσσας δεν είναι απλή υπόθεση. Πρέπει να γίνουν περισσότερες εργασίες σχετικά με το πρόβλημα της ανισορροπίας δεδομένων στις Υποεργασίες Β και Γ. Επίσης συζητούνται κάποιες μελλοντικές εργασίες.', 'it': "In questo studio affrontiamo il problema dell'identificazione e della categorizzazione del linguaggio offensivo nei social media. Il nostro gruppo, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, utilizza la classificazione supervisionata insieme a versioni multiple dei dati generati da diversi modi di pre-elaborazione dei dati. Usiamo quindi il modello all'avanguardia Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers, o BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), per catturare caratteristiche linguistiche, sintattiche e semantiche. Le dipendenze a lungo raggio tra ogni parte di una frase possono essere catturate dalle rappresentazioni bidirezionali dell'encoder BERT. I nostri risultati mostrano precisione dell'85,12% e punteggi F1 dell'80,57% nel Sottocompito A (identificazione del linguaggio offensivo), precisione dell'87,92% e punteggi F1 del 50% nel Sottocompito B (categorizzazione dei tipi di attacco), precisione del 69,95% e punteggio F1 del 50,47% nel Sottocompito C (identificazione del bersaglio offensivo). L'analisi dei risultati mostra che distinguere tra linguaggio offensivo mirato e non mirato non è un compito semplice. Occorre lavorare ulteriormente sul problema dei dati di squilibrio nei sottocompiti B e C. Vengono inoltre discussi alcuni lavori futuri.", 'kk': 'Бұл зерттеулерде социаллық медиақтардың тілдерін анықтау және санаттарын баптау мәселелерімен айналыстық. Біздің тобыбыз, BNU- HKBU UIC NLP Team2, деректерді алдын- ала өңдеу арқылы құрылған бірнеше деректердің нұсқаларымызды басқару үшін қарастырылған классификациясын қолданыңыз. Содан кейін біз түрлендірушілерден немесе BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), лингвистикалық, синтактикалық және семантикалық мүмкіндіктерді алу үшін қолданамыз. Сөздің әрбір бөлігі арасындағы ұзын ауқымдық тәуелдіктері BERT- тың екі директорлық кодтарының түрінде алады. Біздің нәтижелеріміз 85, 12% дұрыс және 80, 57% F1 нәтижесін A- тапсырмасында көрсетіледі (қарсы тілді идентификациясы), 87, 92% дұрыс және 50% F1 нәтижесін Subtask B (қарсы түрлері категориясы), 69, 95% дұрыс және 50, 47% F1 нәтижесін sub task C (қарсы иденти Нәтижелердің анализациясы мақсатталған және бөлексіз тіл арасындағы айырмашылығы қарапайым тапсырма емес дегенді көрсетеді. B және C ішінде балансы жоқ деректер мәселесінде бірнеше жұмыс істеу керек. Кейбір келесі жұмыс мәселесінде де талқылады.', 'mk': 'Во оваа студија се справуваме со проблемот на идентификување и категоризирање на офанзивниот јазик во социјалните медиуми. Нашата група, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP тим, користи надгледувана класификација заедно со повеќето верзии на податоци генерирани од различни начини за преобработување на податоците. Потоа го користиме најсовремениот модел Бидирекционален кодер претставувања од Трансформерите, или БЕРТ (Devlin et al, 2018), за да ги фатиме јазичните, синтактичките и семантичните карактеристики. Зависностите од долго растојание помеѓу секој дел од реченицата можат да бидат зафатени од претставувањата на БЕРТ на двоправниот кодер. Нашите резултати покажуваат 85,12 отсто прецизност и 80,57 отсто резултати на Ф1 во Субзадачата А (идентификација на навреден јазик), 87,92 отсто прецизност и 50 отсто резултати на Ф1 во Субзадачата Б (категоризација на типовите на навредени), 69,95 отсто прецизност и 50,47 отсто резултати на Ф1 во Субзад Анализата на резултатите покажува дека разликата помеѓу насочениот и ненасочениот офанзивен јазик не е едноставна задача. Треба да се направи повеќе работа за проблемот со небалансираните податоци во подзадачите Б и Ц. Исто така, се дискутира и некоја идна работа.', 'lt': "Šiame tyrime sprendžiame problem ą, susijusią su priešiškos kalbos nustatymu ir klasifikavimu social in ėje žiniasklaidoje. Mūsų grupė, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP komanda, naudoja prižiūrėtą klasifikaciją kartu su įvairiomis duomenų versijomis, gautomis įvairiais išankstinio duomenų apdorojimo būdais. Tuomet naudojame naujausią model į „dvikrypčių kodų atstovavimai iš transformatorių“ arba „BERT“ (Devlin et al., 2018 m.), kad gautume kalbines, sintaktines ir semantines savybes. Long range dependencies between each part of a sentence can be captured by BERT's bidirectional encoder representations.  Mūsų rezultatai rodo 85,12 % tikslumą ir 80,57 % F1 taškų A papunktyje (užpuolimo kalbos identifikavimas), 87,92 % tikslumą ir 50 % F1 taškų B papunktyje (nusikaltimų tipų klasifikavimas), 69,95 % tikslumą ir 50,47 % F1 tašką C papunktyje (nusikaltimų tikslo identifikavimas). Iš rezultatų analizės matyti, kad tikslinės ir nenurodytos offensinės kalbos skirtumas nėra paprasta užduotis. Reikia dėti daugiau pastangų dėl B ir C pakomitečių duomenų pusiausvyros problemos. Taip pat aptariamas tam tikras būsimas darbas.", 'ms': 'Dalam kajian ini kita berurusan dengan masalah mengenali pengenalan dan kategorisasi bahasa serangan dalam media sosial. Kumpulan kami, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, menggunakan klasifikasi yang diawasi bersama dengan versi berbilang data yang dijana oleh cara yang berbeza untuk memproses data. Kemudian, kita gunakan Model Model Kecanggihan Pengekod Biarah dari Transformers, atau BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), untuk menangkap ciri-ciri bahasa, sintaktik dan semantik. Dependensi julat panjang antara setiap bahagian kalimat boleh ditangkap oleh perwakilan pengekod bidireksi BERT. Hasil kita menunjukkan 85.12% akurat dan 80.57% skor F1 dalam Subtugas A (pengenalan bahasa serangan), 87.92% akurat dan 50% skor F1 dalam Subtugas B (pengenalan jenis serangan), dan 69.95% akurat dan 50.47% skor F1 dalam Subtugas C (pengenalan sasaran serangan). Analisi keputusan menunjukkan bahawa perbezaan antara bahasa serangan yang ditujukan dan tidak ditujukan bukanlah tugas sederhana. Lebih banyak kerja perlu dilakukan pada masalah data tidak seimbang dalam Subtugas B dan C. Beberapa kerja masa depan juga dibahas.', 'ml': "ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയയില്\u200d ആക്രമണഭാഷ തിരിച്ചറിയുകയും വിഭാഗിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്ന പ്രശ ഞങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP ടീം 2, വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മുന്\u200dപ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള മുന്\u200dപ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക് പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫോര്\u200dമാരില്\u200d നിന്നും ബെര്\u200dട്ടില്\u200d നിന്നും സാധാരണ മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ സ്റ്റേറ്റ് സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സ്റ്റേറ്റ്, സിനിട്ടാക്കിക Long range dependencies between each part of a sentence can be captured by BERT's bidirectional encoder representations.  ഞങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് 85. 12% ശരിയാണെന്നും 80. 57% എഫ്1 സ്കോര്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. സുബ്ബട്ട് സിയില്\u200d നിന്നും 87. 92% ശരിയാണ്, 50% എഫ്1 സ്കോര്\u200d സുബ്ബട്ട് ബിയില്\u200d നിന്നും (കുറ്റകൃത്യങ്ങളുട ഫലത്തിന്റെ അന്വേഷണം കാണിക്കുന്നു ലക്ഷ്യമാക്കുന്നതും അപരിഷ്കരിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത അക്രമത്തിന്റെ ഭാഷ വേര്\u200dപെടുത സബ്ട്ടോസ് ബിയും സിയിലും അസാധാരണമില്ലാത്ത വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രശ്നത്തില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ജോലി ചെയ്യേണ്ടതുണ്ട്. ഭാവി", 'mn': 'Энэ судалгаанд бид нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчдийн хэлэг тодорхойлох, хуваалцах асуудлыг тодорхойлдог. Бидний бүлэг, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, мэдээллийн өмнө ажиллах аргаар олон төрлийн өгөгдлийн хувилбарыг ашиглаж байна. Дараа нь бид хэлний, синтактик болон semantic тодорхойлолтуудыг авахын тулд хоёр багын кодчуудын төлөвлөгөө, эсвэл BERT (Devlin et al, 2018) дээр ашигладаг. БЕРТ-ын хоёр хэсэг бүрийн хоорондох урт хэмжээний хамааралтай байдал нь BERT-ийн хоёр хэмжээний кодчуудын илэрхийлэл дээр барьж болно. Манай үр дүн нь Subtask A-д 85.12% зөв болон 80.57% F1 оноо үзүүлдэг (ихэвчлэн хэлний тодорхойлолт), 87.92% зөв болон 50% F1 оноо Subtask B-д (ихэвчлэн буруу төрлийн тодорхойлолт), 69.95% зөв болон 50.47% F1 оноо үзүүлдэг. Үр дүн шинжилгээний талаар зориулагдсан, тэмцэхгүй хэл хоорондын ялгаа нь энгийн ажил биш. Илүү олон ажил хийх хэрэгтэй Subtasks B болон C-д өгөгдлийн бодлого бусад баланслал хийх хэрэгтэй. Зарим ирээдүйн ажил ч мөн ярилцдаг.', 'mt': 'F’dan l-istudju nindirizzaw il-problema tal-identifikazzjoni u l-kategorizzazzjoni tal-lingwa offensiva fil-midja soċjali. Il-grupp tagħna, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, juża klassifikazzjoni sorveljata flimkien ma’ verżjoni multipla ta’ dejta ġġenerata b’modi differenti ta’ pproċessar minn qabel tad-dejta. Imbagħad nużaw il-mudell l-aktar avvanzat tar-Rappreżentanzi tal-Kodifikatur Bidirezzjonali mit-Trasformaturi, jew BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), biex inqabdu karatteristiċi lingwistiċi, sintetiċi u semantiċi. Id-dipendenzi fuq medda twila bejn kull parti ta’ sentenza jistgħu jinqabdu mir-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kodifikatur bidirezzjonali tal-BERT. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru 85.12% preċiżjoni u 80.57% punteġġi F1 fis-Subkompitu A (identifikazzjoni tal-lingwa offensiva), 87.92% preċiżjoni u 50% punteġġi F1 fis-Subkompitu B (kategorizzazzjoni tat-tipi ta’ reati), u 69.95% preċiżjoni u 50.47% punteġġ F1 fis-Subkompitu C (identifikazzjoni tal-mira ta’ reati). L-analiżi tar-riżultati turi li d-distinzjoni bejn il-lingwa offensiva mmirata u dik mhux immirata mhijiex kompitu sempliċi. Jeħtieġ li jsir aktar xogħol dwar il-problema ta’ żbilanċ fid-dejta fis-Subkompiti B u C. Xi ħidmiet futuri huma diskussi wkoll.', 'no': 'I denne studien gjer vi problemet med å identifisera og kategorisera offensivspråk i sosiale media. Gruppet vårt, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, bruk overvakt klassifikasjon saman med fleire versjonar av data laga av ulike måtar å forhandtera data. Vi bruker derfor modellen for kunsten for å ta opp linguistiske, syntaktiske og semantiske funksjonar frå transformerande, eller BERT (Devlin et al, 2018). Lang område avhengighet mellom kvar del av eit setning kan henta av BERT sin bidireksjonal koderingsrepresentasjonar. Resultatet våre viser nokså 85,12% nøyaktighet og 80,57% F1- poeng i Subtask A (offensiv språk identifikasjon), 87,92% nøyaktighet og 50% F1- poeng i Subtask B (kategorisasjon av offensivtypar), og 69,95% nøyaktighet og 50,47% F1- poeng i Subtask C (offensiv mål identifikasjon). Analysering av resultatene viser at forskjelling mellom målet og ubegrensa offensivspråk er ikkje ein enkel oppgåve. Meir arbeid må vera gjort på den ulike dataproblemet i underoppgåver B og C. Noen framtidige arbeid er også diskutert.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym opracowaniu zajmujemy się problemem identyfikacji i kategoryzacji języka obraźliwego w mediach społecznościowych. Nasza grupa, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, wykorzystuje klasyfikację nadzorowaną wraz z wieloma wersjami danych generowanymi różnymi sposobami wstępnego przetwarzania danych. Następnie używamy najnowocześniejszego modelu reprezentacji kodera dwukierunkowego z Transformers lub BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), aby przechwytywać cechy językowe, składniowe i semantyczne. Zależności o dużym zasięgu między każdą częścią zdania mogą być uchwycone przez dwukierunkowe reprezentacje kodera BERT. Nasze wyniki pokazują dokładność 85,12% i wyniki 80,57% F1 w Podzadaniu A (identyfikacja języka obraźliwego), dokładność 87,92% i wyniki 50% F1 w Podzadaniu B (kategoryzacja typów przestępstw) oraz dokładność 69,95% i wynik 50,47% F1 w Podzadaniu C (identyfikacja celu ataku). Analiza wyników pokazuje, że rozróżnienie języka obraźliwego od ukierunkowanego nie jest prostym zadaniem. Należy wykonać więcej prac nad problemem nierównowagi danych w podzadaniach B i C. Omówiono również niektóre przyszłe prace.', 'ro': 'În acest studiu abordăm problema identificării și clasificării limbajului ofensator în rețelele de socializare. Grupul nostru, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, utilizează clasificarea supravegheată împreună cu mai multe versiuni de date generate prin diferite moduri de pre-procesare a datelor. Apoi, folosim modelul de ultimă generație de reprezentare a codorului bidirecțional de la Transformers sau BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), pentru a capta caracteristici lingvistice, sintactice și semantice. Dependențele de rază lungă între fiecare parte a unei propoziții pot fi capturate de reprezentările codificatoarelor bidirecționale BERT. Rezultatele noastre arată o acuratețe de 85,12% și 80,57% punctaje F1 în Subsarcina A (identificarea limbajului ofensator), o acuratețe de 87,92% și scoruri F1 50% în Subsarcina B (clasificarea tipurilor de infracțiune) și o acuratețe de 69,95% și un scor F1 50,47% în Subsarcina C (identificarea țintei ofensatoare). Analiza rezultatelor arată că distingerea între limbajul ofensiv țintit și cel nețintit nu este o sarcină simplă. Trebuie depuse mai multe eforturi cu privire la problema dezechilibrului datelor din subsarcinile B și C. Se discută, de asemenea, unele lucrări viitoare.', 'sr': 'U ovoj studiji rješavamo problem identifikacije i kategorije ofanzivnog jezika u društvenim medijima. Naša grupa, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, koristi nadzornu klasifikaciju zajedno sa višestrukom verzijom podataka koji su stvorili različitim načinama predobrađivanja podataka. Potom koristimo model umetnosti za dvosmjernu predstavu kodera od transformatora ili BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), kako bi uhvatili jezičke, sintaktične i semantične karakteristike. Zavisine dugog dometa između svakog dela rečenice mogu biti uhvaćene predstavljanjem BERT-ovog dvodirektivnog kodera. Naši rezultati pokazuju tačnost 85,12% i rezultate F1 od 80,57% u subtask A (identifikacija ofanzivnog jezika), tačnost 87,92% i rezultate F1 od 50% u Subtask B (kategorizacija tipa prekršaja), tačnost 69,95% i rezultat F1 od 50,47% u Subtask C (identifikacija cilja prekršaja). Analiza rezultata pokazuje da razlika između ciljanog i neodređenog offensivnog jezika nije jednostavan zadatak. Treba se obaviti još posla o problemu s nepravednošću podataka u subtaskima B i C. Takođe se raspravlja o budućem poslu.', 'si': 'මේ පරීක්ෂණයේ අපි සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න හා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ. අපේ කණ්ඩායම, BNO-HKBU UIC NLP කණ්ඩායම 2, දත්ත ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන වෙනස් වෙනස් විදියට පරික්ෂා කරපු විදියට පරික්ෂා කරපු දත්ත අපි පස්සේ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් භාෂාවිත, සංකේතික සහ සැමැන්තික අවස්ථානයක් අල්ලගන්න ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය කරන් වාක්යේ හැම කොටසක් අතර දිග විශාල විශේෂතාවක් BERT ගේ බිදිරික්ෂිත කෝඩාර් ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්ණයෙන් අල්ලගන් අපේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිය 85.12% සහ 80.57% F1 ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d ප්\u200dරතිචාරයේ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ ඉලක්කම් කරලා නැති අපරාධ භාෂාව අතර විශේෂ කරන්න සාමාන්\u200dය ව වැඩියි වැඩ කරන්න ඕනේ B සහ C සබ්ටාක්ස් වල තියෙන්නේ නැති දත්ත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි. අනාගතයේ වැඩ වගේම කතා ක', 'sv': 'I denna studie behandlar vi problemet med att identifiera och kategorisera stötande språk i sociala medier. Vår grupp, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, använder övervakad klassificering tillsammans med flera versioner av data som genereras av olika sätt att förbehandla data. Vi använder sedan den senaste modellen Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers, eller BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), för att fånga språkliga, syntaktiska och semantiska funktioner. Beroenden med lång räckvidd mellan varje del av en mening kan fångas upp med BERT:s tvåriktade kodare representationer. Våra resultat visar 85,12% noggrannhet och 80,57% F1 poäng i deluppgift A (offensiv språkidentifiering), 87,92% noggrannhet och 50% F1 poäng i deluppgift B (kategorisering av brottstyper) och 69,95% noggrannhet och 50,47% F1 poäng i deluppgift C (offensiv målidentifiering). Analys av resultaten visar att det inte är en enkel uppgift att skilja mellan målinriktat och icke målinriktat offensivt språk. Mer arbete behöver göras med problemet med obalansdata i deluppgifterna B och C. En del framtida arbete diskuteras också.', 'ta': 'இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில் நாம் சமூக ஊடகங்களில் குறைந்த மொழியை கண்டுபிடிப்பதும், வகைப்படுத்துவதும் பிரச எங்கள் குழு, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, தரவை முன் செயல்படுத்தும் முன் செயல்படுத்தும் மூலம் பல பதிப்புகளால் கண்காணிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. பிறகு நாம் மாதிரி மாதிரி மாதிரி இருதிசை குறியீட்டாளர் மாற்றுபவர் அல்லது BERT (டெப்லின் மற்றும் அல், 2018) பயன்படுத்தி மொழி மொழி, ஒத்திசைவு மற்றும் அரைம ஒரு வாக்கியத்தின் ஒவ்வொரு பகுதியிலும் இடையே நீண்ட வீச்சு சார்ந்தது BERT குறியீட்டு குறியீட்டு குறியீட்டு ப Our results show 85. 12% accuracy and 80. 57% F1 score in Subtask A (offensive language identification), 87. 92% accuracy and 50% F1 score in Subtask B (வகைகளை வகைப்படுத்துதல்) and 69. 95% accuracy and 50. 47% F1 score in Subtask C (offense target identification). @ info B மற்றும் C துணை பணிகளில் நிலையான தரவு பிரச்சனையில் மேலும் வேலை செய்ய வேண்டும். எதிர்கால வேலை சில வேலை வ', 'so': 'Waxbarashadan waxaynu ka macaamiloonaa dhibaatada aqoonsiga iyo kala qeybinaynaa luqada caafimaadka ee shabakadda bulshada. Kooxdayaga BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, waxaad isticmaaltaa fasax la ilaaliyo iyo kooxo kala duduwan oo lagu soo daabacay macluumaadka. Markaas waxaynu u isticmaalnaa asalka farshaxanka ee Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers, or BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), si aan u qabsanno luqadaha, syntactic iyo semantic. Meel dheer oo ay ku xiran tahay qeyb kasta oo kaligeed ah waxaa lagu qabsan karaa qeyb ka mid ah qoraalka qoraalka BERT. Our results show 85.12% accuracy and 80.57% F1 scores in Subtask A (offensive language identification), 87.92% accuracy and 50% F1 scores in Subtask B (categorization of offense types), and 69.95% accuracy and 50.47% F1 score in Subtask C (offense target identification).  Analyska arimaha waxaa ka muuqda in kala duwanaanta luqada dhicidda ah oo aan la hagaajinin ma aha shaqada fudud. Shaqo dheeraad ah waxaa loo baahan yahay in la sameeyo dhibaatada macluumaadka aan la simnaanayn ee Subtasooyinka B iyo C.', 'ur': 'اس مطالعہ میں ہم سوسیل میڈیا میں فساد کی زبان شناسایی اور ترکیب کی مشکل سے بحث کرتے ہیں۔ ہمارے گروپ، BNU-HKBU UIC NLP ٹیم2، ڈاکٹوں سے پہلے پردازی کرنے کے لئے مختلف طریقے سے بنائے ہوئے ڈاکٹوں کے بہت سی نسخہ کے ساتھ تحت نظر کی کلسفون استعمال کریں. اس کے بعد ہم نے ترفنسٹر سے دودہرٹیونل اکڈر کی نمونڈل کو استعمال کیا ہے، یا BERT (Devlin et al, 2018) کی زبان شناسی, سینٹکتیک اور سیمنٹیک فرضیوں کو پکڑنے کے لئے۔ ایک جماعت کی ہر قسم کے درمیان طویل مدت کے اعتبارت BERT کے دوسری اداری کوڈر کی تصویر سے پکڑ سکتے ہیں. ہمارے نتیجے 85.12% accuracy اور 80.57% F1 اسکور کو Subtask A میں (فنسی زبان شناسایی), 87.92% accuracy اور 50% F1 اسکور کو Subtask B میں (فاسق طریقوں کا تقسیم کرنا) اور 69.95% accuracy اور 50.47% F1 اسکور کو Subtask C میں (فاسق موجب شناسایی) دکھا دیتے ہیں۔ نتائج کا تحقیق دکھاتا ہے کہ موجود اور غیر متفاوت زبان کے درمیان تفریق ایک ساده کام نہیں ہے۔ Subtasks B اور C میں بہت زیادہ کام کرنے کی ضرورت ہے. بعض مستقبل کام بھی بحث کی جاتی ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu o'qituvda biz jamiyat media'da ta'sirli tillarni aniqlash va kattalashtirish muammolarini boshqaramiz. Bizning guruhimiz BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, maʼlumotni bir nechta bir nechta versiyasi bilan bir nechta qoʻllanilgan maʼlumot bilan bir nechta versiyatlaridan foydalaning. Keyin biz Shaxsiy modellar bilan bir xil kodlash qoidalaridan yoki BERT (Devlin et, 2018), tillarini, syntactic va semantik xususiyatlarni qabul qilish uchun foydalanamiz. Bogʻni oʻzgartirish Natijalamiz 85.12% аниқ va sub-vazifaning Ada 80.57% F1 qiymatlarini ko'rsatadi (shaxsiy tillar identifikati), 87.92% аниқ ва 50% F1 tub vazifa B (turlarini kattalashtirish) bilan qiymatni ko'rsatadi, 69.95% аниқ va 50.47% F1 quyidagi qiymatni ko'rsatadi. @ info Bir necha xil vazifalar B va C kabi vazifalar haqida o'xshash maʼlumot muammolarini bajarish kerak. Ba'zi vazifalar bajarildi.", 'vi': 'Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi giải quyết vấn đề nhận dạng và phân loại ngôn ngữ tấn công trong truyền thông xã hội. Nhóm của chúng tôi, BNU-HKBU UC NIchọc L2, sử dụng mật khẩu giám sát cùng với nhiều phiên bản dữ liệu được tạo ra bằng cách khác nhau để xử lý trước dữ liệu. Chúng ta sử dụng kiểu mã hóa sẵn thời đại của các robot biến hình (Devlin et al, 208) để thu thập các tính năng ngôn ngữ, cú pháp và ngữ pháp. Sự phụ thuộc lâu dài giữa mỗi phần câu nói có thể bị chiếm bởi các biểu tượng mã hóa hai trực tiếp của BERT. Kết quả của chúng ta cho thấy độ chính xác 82.12. và 80.57 F1 ghi được ghi trong Vẫn A (nhận diện ngôn ngữ tấn công), 87.92. cao và 500f1 ghi được trong Vẫn trừ B (phân loại các loại tấn công), và 69.95=. chính xác và 50.47. F1 ghi số trong Vẫn Vẫn/C (nhận diện tấn công). Phân tích kết quả cho thấy phân biệt ngôn ngữ tấn công nhắm và chưa sắc bén không đơn giản. C ần phải làm nhiều việc hơn về vấn đề không cân bằng dữ liệu trong tập đoàn Sub B và C. Một số công việc tương lai cũng được thảo luận.', 'bg': 'В това изследване се занимаваме с проблема за идентифициране и категоризиране на офанзивен език в социалните медии. Нашата група, БНУ-ХНБУ ЕИК НЛП Тим2, използва контролирана класификация заедно с множество версии на данните, генерирани от различни начини за предварителна обработка на данните. След това използваме най-съвременния модел двупосочни кодерни представи от трансформатори или за улавяне на лингвистични, синтактични и семантични характеристики. Дългообхватните зависимости между всяка част от изречението могат да бъдат уловени от двупосочните кодиращи изображения на BERT. Нашите резултати показват 85,12% точност и 80,57% резултати във Формула 1 в Подзадача А (идентифициране на обиден език), 87,92% точност и 50% резултати във Формула 1 в Подзадача Б (категоризация на типовете престъпления), 69,95% точност и 50,47% резултат във Формула 1 в Подзадача В (идентифициране на целта на престъплението). Анализът на резултатите показва, че разграничаването между целенасочен и нецеленасочен офанзивен език не е проста задача. Необходима е още работа по проблема с данните за дисбаланса в подзадачи Б и В. Разгледана е и бъдеща работа.', 'hr': 'U ovom ispitivanju rješavamo problem identifikacije i kategorizacije ofanzivnog jezika u društvenim medijima. Naša grupa, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, koristi nadzornu klasifikaciju zajedno s višestrukom verzijom podataka koji su proizvedeni različitim načinima predobrazovanja podataka. Onda koristimo model umjetnosti dvosmjerno predstavljanja kodera iz Transformera ili BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), kako bi uhvatili jezičke, sintaktične i semantične karakteristike. Ovisnost dugog raspona između svakog dijela rečenice može biti uhvaćena predstavljanjem BERT-a bidirektivnog kodera. Naši rezultati pokazuju tačnost 85,12% i rezultate F1 u podtask A (identifikacija ofanzivnog jezika), tačnost 87,92% i rezultate F1 u podtask B (kategorizacija tipa prekršaja), tačnost 69,95% i rezultat F1 u podtask C (identifikacija cilja prekršaja). Analiza rezultata pokazuje da razlika između ciljnog i neodređenog offensivnog jezika nije jednostavan zadatak. Potrebno je obaviti još posla o problemu s nepravednošću podataka u subtaskima B i C. Razgovara se i o nekim budućim poslovima.', 'da': "I denne undersøgelse beskæftiger vi os med problemet med at identificere og kategorisere stødende sprog i sociale medier. Vores gruppe, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, bruger overvåget klassificering sammen med flere versioner af data genereret af forskellige måder at forhåndsbehandle dataene på. Vi bruger derefter den avancerede model Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers, eller BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), til at fange sproglige, syntaktiske og semantiske funktioner. Afhængigheder af lang rækkevidde mellem hver del af en sætning kan indfanges af BERT's bidirektionelle koderepræsentationer. Vores resultater viser 85,12% nøjagtighed og 80,57% F1 scorer i underopgave A (offensiv sprogidentifikation), 87,92% nøjagtighed og 50% F1 scorer i underopgave B (kategorisering af forseelsestyper) og 69,95% nøjagtighed og 50,47% F1 score i underopgave C (forseelsesmål identifikation). Analyse af resultaterne viser, at skelnen mellem målrettet og ubegrænset offensivt sprog ikke er en enkel opgave. Der skal gøres mere arbejde med problemet med ubalancedata i underopgave B og C. Nogle fremtidige arbejder drøftes også.", 'nl': "In deze studie behandelen we het probleem van het identificeren en categoriseren van aanstootgevende taal in sociale media. Onze groep, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, gebruikt begeleide classificatie samen met meerdere versies van gegevens gegenereerd door verschillende manieren van voorbewerking van de gegevens. Vervolgens gebruiken we het state-of-the-art model Bidirectional Encoder Representations van Transformers, of BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), om linguïstische, syntactische en semantische kenmerken vast te leggen. Afhankelijkheden over lange afstanden tussen elk deel van een zin kunnen worden vastgelegd door BERT's bidirectionele encoderrepresentaties. Onze resultaten tonen 85,12% nauwkeurigheid en 80,57% F1 scores in Subtaak A (identificatie van offensieve taal), 87,92% nauwkeurigheid en 50% F1 scores in Subtaak B (categorisering van aanvalstypen), en 69,95% nauwkeurigheid en 50,47% F1 score in Subtaak C (identificatie van aanvalsdoelwit). Uit de analyse van de resultaten blijkt dat onderscheid maken tussen gerichte en niet-gerichte aanstootgevende taal geen eenvoudige taak is. Er moet meer werk worden gedaan aan het probleem van onevenwichtsgegevens in Subtaken B en C. Ook wordt een aantal toekomstige werkzaamheden besproken.", 'ko': '이 연구에서 우리가 처리하는 문제는 소셜 미디어의 공격적인 언어를 식별하고 분류하는 것이다.우리 팀, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2는 감시 분류와 서로 다른 예처리 방식으로 생성된 다중 버전 데이터를 사용합니다.그 다음에 우리는 Transformers나 BERT(Devlin et al, 2018)의 가장 선진적인 양방향 인코더 표시 모델을 사용하여 언어, 문법과 의미 특징을 포착한다.한 문장의 각 부분 간의 장거리 의존 관계는 버트의 양방향 인코더를 통해 포착할 수 있다.우리의 결과에 따르면 하위 임무 A(공격적 언어인식)의 정확도는 85.12%, F1의 정확도는 80.57%, 하위 임무 B(공격 유형 분류)의 정확도는 87.92%, F1의 정확도는 50%, 하위 임무 C(공격 목표 식별)의 정확도는 69.95%, F1의 정확도는 50.47%로 나타났다.결과에 대한 분석에 따르면 목표 공격성 언어와 비목표 공격성 언어를 구분하는 것은 간단한 임무가 아니다.하위 작업 B와 C의 불균형 데이터 문제는 더 많은 작업을 해야 한다. 미래의 작업도 논의했다.', 'de': 'In dieser Studie beschäftigen wir uns mit dem Problem, offensive Sprache in sozialen Medien zu identifizieren und zu kategorisieren. Unsere Gruppe, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, verwendet überwachte Klassifizierung zusammen mit mehreren Versionen von Daten, die durch verschiedene Arten der Vorverarbeitung der Daten generiert werden. Wir verwenden dann das hochmoderne Modell Bidirektional Encoder Representations von Transformers oder BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), um linguistische, syntaktische und semantische Merkmale zu erfassen. Über die bidirektionalen Encoder-Darstellungen von BERT lassen sich weitreichende Abhängigkeiten zwischen den einzelnen Satzteilen erfassen. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen 85,12% Genauigkeit und 80,57% F1 Scores in Teilaufgabe A (offensive Spracherkennung), 87,92% Genauigkeit und 50% F1 Scores in Teilaufgabe B (Kategorisierung von Angriffstypen) und 69,95% Genauigkeit und 50,47% F1 Scores in Teilaufgabe C (Offensivziel Identifikation). Die Analyse der Ergebnisse zeigt, dass die Unterscheidung zwischen gezielter und ungezielter Angriffssprache keine einfache Aufgabe ist. In den Teilaufgaben B und C muss noch mehr an dem Problem der Unbalance gearbeitet werden.', 'id': 'Dalam studi ini kita berurusan dengan masalah mengenai identifikasi dan kategorisasi bahasa serangan dalam media sosial. Kelompok kami, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, menggunakan klasifikasi yang diawasi bersama dengan versi berbilang dari data yang dihasilkan dengan cara yang berbeda untuk memproses data. Kemudian kami menggunakan model terbaik Bidirectional Encoder Representations dari Transformers, atau BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), untuk menangkap ciri-ciri bahasa, sintaksi dan semantis. Tergantung jarak panjang antara setiap bagian dari kalimat dapat ditangkap oleh representation pengekode bidireksi BERT. Hasil kami menunjukkan 85,12% akurasi dan 80,57% skor F1 dalam Subtask A (identifikasi bahasa serangan), 87,92% akurasi dan 50% skor F1 dalam Subtask B (kategorisasi tipe serangan), dan 69,95% akurasi dan 50,47% skor F1 dalam Subtask C (identifikasi target serangan). Analisi hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa perbedaan antara bahasa serangan yang ditujukan dan tidak ditujukan bukanlah tugas sederhana. Lebih banyak pekerjaan yang harus dilakukan pada masalah data yang tidak seimbang di Subtask B dan C. Beberapa pekerjaan masa depan juga dibahas.', 'sw': "Katika utafiti huu tunakabiliana na tatizo la kutambua na kutenganisha lugha ya matusi katika mitandao ya kijamii. Kundi letu, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, hutumia utangazaji wa utangazaji pamoja na toleo kadhaa la data zilizotengenezwa kwa njia tofauti za upasuaji taarifa za kabla. Kisha tunatumia Representations from Transformers, or BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), to capture lugha, syntactic and semantic. Long range dependencies between each part of a sentence can be captured by BERT's bidirectional encoder representations.  Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha wastani wa asilimia 85.12 na asilimia 80.57 ya F1 katika kazi ya Ujumbe A (utambulisho wa lugha ya ghasia), asilimia 87.92 sahihi na asilimia 50 ya F1 katika kazi ya Ujumbe B (makubaliano ya aina ya makosa), na asilimia 69.95 sahihi na asilimia 50.47 F1 score katika kazi ya Ujumbe C (utambulisho wa malengo ya makosa). Uchambuzi wa matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa tofauti kati ya lugha inayolengwa na isiyo na udhalilishaji si kazi rahisi. Kazi zaidi inahitaji kufanyika katika tatizo la taarifa zisizo na usawa katika Mipango ya Mipango B na C. Baadhi ya kazi za baadaye pia zinajadiliwa.", 'fa': 'ما در این مطالعه با مشکل شناسایی و جدول کردن زبان فساد در رسانه های اجتماعی درگیر می کنیم. گروه ما، BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2، با نسخه\u200cهای متعدد داده\u200cها توسط راه\u200cهای مختلف پیش\u200cپردازش داده\u200cها استفاده می\u200cکند. سپس از مدل هنری استفاده می\u200cکنیم نمایش\u200cهای کودهای دوچرخه\u200cای از تغییر\u200cدهندگان، یا BERT (Devlin et al, 2018) تا ویژگی\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی، سنتاکتیک و semantic را بگیریم. وابستگی\u200cهای طولانی بین هر قسمت از یک جمله می\u200cتواند توسط نمایش\u200cهای رمز\u200cکننده\u200cی دوره\u200cای BERT دستگیر شود. نتیجه\u200cهای ما دقیقات 85.12% و نمونه\u200cهای 80.57% F1 در Subtask A (شناسایی زبان\u200cهای فساد) نشان می\u200cدهند، 87.92% دقیقات و 50% نمونه\u200cهای F1 در Subtask B (تقسیم نوع فساد) و 69.95% دقیقات و 50.47% نمونه\u200cهای F1 در Subtask C (شناسایی هدف\u200cهای فساد). تحلیل نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهد که جدایی بین زبان هدف و غیر متفاوتی یک کار ساده نیست. کارهای بیشتری باید بر مشکل داده های نابرابری در زیر وظیفه B و C انجام شود. بعضی کار آینده هم در مورد بحث است.', 'tr': "Bu araşdyrmada sosial mediýalarda urylşy dili tanamak we kategoriýa etmek kynçylygyny çözýäris. Gruppamyz BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2 Sonra sanat nusgasyny terjime edenlerden, ýada BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), lingwistiki, sintaktik we semantik hasaplamak üçin ullanýarys. Sözlemiň her bölegi arasyndaky uzak arzanlyklary BERT'iň ikinji ködleme suratları tarapyndan yakalanabilir. Biziň netijelerimiz 85.12% dogrylygyny we 80.57% F1 sanlary Subtask A'da (offensive language identification), 87.92% dogrylygyny we 50% F1 sanlary Subtask B'de (category of offense types), we 69.95% dogrylygyny we 50.47% F1 sanlary Subtask C'de (offense target identification). Netijenler analysi maksady we gaýratsyz diller arasynda tapawutlandyrmak a ňsat bir gören däldir. Subtasks B we C-de birnäçe işi daňalanmaýan maglumatyň meselesinde etmeli. Käbir gelejek işi hem gürleşdirilýär.", 'af': "In hierdie studie is ons met die probleem van identifiseer en kategoriseer offensivele taal in sosiale media. Ons groep, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, gebruik ondersoekte klasifikasie saam met veelvuldige weergawe van data genereer deur verskillende maniere van voorsoek van die data. Ons gebruik dan die state-of-the-art model Bidirectional Encoder Representations van Transformers, of BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), om lingvisse, sintaktike en semantiese funksies te vang. Lang omvang afhanklikhede tussen elke deel van 'n seting kan gevang word deur BERT se bidireksjonale enkoder voorstellings. Ons resultate vertoon 85.12% presies en 80.57% F1 tellers in Subtask A (offensive language identification), 87.92% presies en 50% F1 tellers in Subtask B (kategorisasie van offense tipes), en 69.95% presies en 50.47% F1 teller in Subtask C (offense target identification). Analiseer van die resultate vertoon dat die afdeling tussen doelgemaakte en onbepaalde offensivele taal nie 'n eenvoudige taak is nie. Nog meer werk moet gedoen word op die onbalanse dataprobleme in Subtasks B en C. Sommige toekomstige werk word ook gespreek.", 'sq': 'In this study we deal with the problem of identifying and categorizing offensive language in social media.  Grupi ynë, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, përdor klasifikimin e mbikqyrur së bashku me versionin e shumëfishtë të të dhënave të gjeneruara nga mënyra të ndryshme të paraprocesimit të të dhënave. Pastaj përdorim modelin më të lartë të koduesit dydrejtues nga Transformers, ose BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), për të kapur karakteristikat gjuhësore, sintaktike dhe semantike. Varësitë e distancës s ë gjatë midis çdo pjese të një fjalie mund të kapen nga përfaqësimet e koduesit dy-drejtues të BERT. Rezultatet tona tregojnë 85.12% saktësi dhe 80.57% rezultate F1 në Subtask A (identifikimi i gjuhës ofensive), 87.92% saktësi dhe 50% rezultate F1 në Subtask B (kategorizimi i tipeve të ofensive) dhe 69.95% saktësi dhe 50.47% rezultate F1 në Subtask C (identifikimi i objektivit të ofensive). Analiza e rezultateve tregon se dallimi midis gjuhës ofensive të synuar dhe të papërcaktuar nuk është një detyrë e thjeshtë. Duhet të bëhet më shumë punë mbi problem in e paekuilibrimit të të dhënave në nëndetyrat B dhe C. Disa punë të ardhshme diskutohen gjithashtu.', 'am': "በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ውስጥ የስቃይ ቋንቋን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ቡድራችን BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2፣ ዳታውን በተለየ ልዩ ልዩ ደረጃዎች በተለየው የዳታ ክፍል በተለየ የዳታ ክፍል ተጠቀም፡፡ በኋላም የ-የ-የ-የ-አርእስት ምሳሌ የBidirectional Encoder Representatives from Transformers or BERT (Devlin et al, 2018) ለመያዝ ቋንቋstic, Syntactic and semantic features. Long range dependencies between each part of a sentence can be captured by BERT's bidirectional encoder representations.  ፍሬዎቻችን 85.12 በመቶ እርግጠኛ እና 80.57 በመቶ አፍ1 ትክክለኛ ትክክለኛለች፡፡ የፍሬዎቹ ትምህርት ግንኙነት በተመሳሳይ እና በማይለይ ቋንቋ የሚለይ ቀላል ስራ አይደለም፡፡ በበኩሉ ስራ B እና C ውስጥ የማይችሉትን የዳታ ጉዳይ ላይ የሚጨምሩ ሥራ ያስፈልጋል፤ አንዳንድ የቀድሞው ሥራ ደግሞ ተጨማሪ ነው፡፡", 'hy': 'Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք լուծում ենք սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում գրավող լեզուների հայտնաբերման և դասակարգման խնդիրը: Մեր խումբը, BNU-HKOU Uic-ի ՆԼՊ թիմ2, օգտագործում է վերահսկված դասակարգում, միասին տվյալների բազմաթիվ տարբեր տարբերակներով, որոնք ստեղծվում են տվյալների նախավերամշակման տարբեր ձևերով: Այնուհետև մենք օգտագործում ենք ամենահետաքրքիր մոդելը Երկու ուղղությամբ կոդավորող ներկայացումներ Transforme-ներից, կամ BER-ից (Devin et al, 2018), լեզվական, սինտակտիկ և սեմանտիկ առանձնահատկությունների նկարահանելու համար: Առաջին նախադասության յուրաքանչյուր մասի երկար հեռավորության կախվածությունը կարող է գրանցվել BER-ի երկու ուղղությամբ կոդերի ներկայացումներով: Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս 85.12 տոկոսի ճշգրտությունը և 80.57 տոկոսի F1 գնահատականները A-ի ենթախնդրում (վնասավոր լեզվի հայտնաբերումը), 87.92 տոկոսի ճշգրտությունը և 50 տոկոսի F1 գնահատականները B-ի ենթախնդրում (վնասավոր տեսակների խմբագրավումը), 69.95 տոկոսի ճշգրտությունը և 50. Արդյունքների վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ նպատակային և աննպատակային գրավիչ լեզուների տարբերակը պարզ խնդիր չէ: Ավելի շատ աշխատանք է պետք կատարել տվյալների անհավասարակշռության խնդիրների վրա B և C ենթախնդիրներում. որոշ ապագա աշխատանքներ նույնպես քննարկվում են:', 'az': "Bu təhsil içində sosyal media içində həddi aşma dilini tanıma və kategoriyalarının problemi ilə çəkirik. Bizim qrupumuz BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, məlumatları əvvəlcə işləmə yollarından yaratdığı çoxlu məlumatın versiyonu ilə birlikdə gözləyirli klasifikasyonu qullan. Sonra, sanat modelini Transformers'dən və ya BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), dil, sintaktik və semantik özellikləri tutmaq üçün iki yönəlli Encoder göstəricisini istifadə edirik. Sözlüyün hər bir parça s ı arasında uzun səviyyə bağlılıqları BERT'nin yarısı kodlayıcı göstəricisi ilə yakalanabilir. Sonuçlarımız Subtask A'də 85,12% ədaləti və 80,57% F1 nöqtələrini göstərir (offensive language identification), 87,92% ədaləti və 50% F1 nöqtələri Subtask B'də (offense types kategoriyası), 69,95% ədaləti və 50,47% F1 nöqtələri Subtask C'də (offense target identification). Sonuçların analizi göstərir ki, nişan edilmiş və təşkil edilməmiş offensiv dili arasında ayırmaq asan bir iş deyildir. Daha çox iş B və C Subtasks verilənlər problemində çəkilməsi lazımdır. Bazı gələcək işlər də mübahisə edilir.", 'bn': 'এই গবেষণায় আমরা সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে আক্রান্ত ভাষাকে চিহ্নিত এবং বিভক্ত করার সমস্যার সাথে চিন্তা করি। আমাদের গ্রুপ, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP দল ২, তথ্য পূর্ব প্রক্রিয়ার দ্বারা তৈরি করা বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন উপায়ে তথ্যের সংস্করণের সাথে  তারপর আমরা ট্রান্সফর্মার বা বেরেট (ডেভেলিনেট আল, ২০১৮) থেকে বাইডেডিয়াল এনকোডার প্রতিনিধি ব্যবহার করি ভাষাগত, সিন্ট্যাক্টিক এবং সেমান্টিক বৈশিষ্ বের্টের বিদ্রোহীন কোডারের প্রতিনিধিত্বে প্রত্যেক অংশের মধ্যে দীর্ঘ সীমান্ত নির্ভর করতে পারে। আমাদের ফলাফল ৮৫. ১২% সঠিকভাবে দেখাচ্ছে এবং সাবকাজ সি-এ ৮৭. ৯২% সঠিক এবং ৫০% এফ১ স্কোর দেখাচ্ছে (অপরাধের ধরনের বিভাগ) এবং ৬৯. ৯৫% সঠিকভাবে এবং ৫০. ৪৭% এফ১ স্কোর (অপরাধের লক্ষ্য পরি ফলাফলের বিশ্লেষণ দেখা যাচ্ছে যে লক্ষ্যবস্তুত এবং অসমর্থিত আক্রমণ ভাষার মধ্যে বিচ্ছিন্ন করা হচ্ছে সাধারণ কাজ নয়। More work needs to be done on the unbalance data problem in Subtasks B and C. Some future work is also discussed.', 'ca': "En aquest estudi ens ocupem del problema d'identificar i categoritzar la llengua ofensiva als mitjans socials. El nostre grup, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, utilitza la classificació supervisada juntament amb múltiples versions de dades generades de diverses maneres de pré-processar les dades. Després utilitzem el model més avançat de representacions bidireccionals del codificador dels transformadors, o BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), per capturar característiques lingüístices, sinàctiques i semàntiques. Les depències a llarg distància entre cada part d'una frase es poden capturar per representacions bidireccionals del codificador BERT. Els nostres resultats mostran un 85,12% de precisió i un 80,57% de puntuacions F1 en Subtasca A (identificació ofensiva de llenguatge), un 87,92% de precisió i un 50% de puntuacions F1 en Subtasca B (categorització de tipus ofensius), i un 69,95% de precisió i un 50,47% de puntuacions F1 en Subtasca C (identificació de mira ofensiva). L'anàlisi dels resultats mostra que la distinció entre un llenguatge ofensiu objectiu i no objectiu no és una tasca senzilla. S'ha de fer més treball sobre el problema de desequilibri de dades a les Subtasques B i C. També es discute alguna feina futura.", 'bs': 'U ovoj studiji rješavamo problem identifikacije i kategorizacije ofanzivnog jezika u društvenim medijima. Naša grupa, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, koristi nadzornu klasifikaciju zajedno sa višestrukom verzijom podataka koji su proizvedeni različitim načinima predobrazovanja podataka. Onda koristimo model umjetnosti dvosmjerno predstavljanja kodera iz Transformera ili BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), kako bi uhvatili jezičke, sintaktične i semantične karakteristike. Ovisnosti dugog dometa između svakog dijela rečenice mogu biti uhvaćene predstavljanjem BERT-ovog dvodirektivnog kodera. Naši rezultati pokazuju tačnost 85,12% i tačnost 80,57% F1 rezultata u subtask A (identifikacija ofanzivnog jezika), tačnost 87,92% i rezultate F1 u subtask B (kategorizacija tipa prekršaja), tačnost 69,95% i rezultat F1 u subtask C (identifikacija cilja prekršaja). Analiza rezultata pokazuje da razlika između ciljnog i neodređenog offensivnog jezika nije jednostavan zadatak. Treba se obaviti još posla o problemu s nepravednošću podataka u subtaskima B i C. Također se raspravlja o nekim budućim poslovima.', 'cs': 'V této studii se zabýváme problematikou identifikace a kategorizace urážlivého jazyka v sociálních médiích. Naše skupina BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2 používá dohledovanou klasifikaci spolu s více verzí dat generovaných různými způsoby předzpracování dat. K zachycení lingvistických, syntaktických a sémantických prvků pak používáme nejmodernější model reprezentace obousměrného kódování od Transformers nebo BERT (Devlin et al, 2018). Dlouhodobé závislosti mezi jednotlivými částmi věty mohou být zachyceny pomocí obousměrných snímačů BERT. Naše výsledky ukazují 85,12% přesnost a 80,57% F1 skóre v Subúkolu A (identifikace útočného jazyka), 87,92% přesnost a 50% F1 skóre v Subúkolu B (kategorizace typů útoku) a 69,95% přesnost a 50,47% F1 skóre v Subúkolu C (identifikace útočného cíle). Analýza výsledků ukazuje, že rozlišování cíleného a nezaměřeného urážlivého jazyka není jednoduchým úkolem. Je třeba více pracovat na problému nevyvážených dat v podúkolech B a C. Je také diskutována některá budoucí práce.', 'et': 'Käesolevas uuringus käsitleme solvava keele tuvastamise ja kategoriseerimise probleemi sotsiaalmeedias. Meie grupp BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2 kasutab järelevalve all klassifitseerimist koos andmete erinevate eeltöötlusviisidega genereeritud mitme versiooniga. Seejärel kasutame keeleliste, süntaktiliste ja semantiliste omaduste jäädvustamiseks kaasaegset mudelit kahesuunalised kodeerijad Transformeritest (BERT) (Devlin jt, 2018). Lause iga osa vahelisi pikaajalisi sõltuvusi saab jäädvustada BERTi kahesuunaliste kodeerijate esitustega. Meie tulemused näitavad 85,12% täpsust ja 80,57% F1 skoorid alaülesandes A (solvav keele identifitseerimine), 87,92% täpsust ja 50% F1 skoorid alaülesandes B (rünnaku tüüpide kategooriad) ning 69,95% täpsust ja 50,47% F1 skoorid alaülesandes C (rünnaku sihtmärgi identifitseerimine). Tulemuste analüüs näitab, et sihipärase ja sihipärase solvava keele eristamine ei ole lihtne ülesanne. Alaülesannetes B ja C on vaja rohkem tööd teha tasakaalustamatuse andmeprobleemiga. Arutatakse ka tulevast tööd.', 'fi': 'Tässä tutkimuksessa käsitellään loukkaavan kielen tunnistamista ja luokittelua sosiaalisessa mediassa. Ryhmämme BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2 käyttää valvottua luokitusta yhdessä useiden versioiden kanssa, jotka syntyvät eri esikäsittelytapojen avulla. Tämän jälkeen käytämme uusinta mallia Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers eli BERT (Devlin et al, 2018) kielellisten, syntaktisten ja semanttisten ominaisuuksien tallentamiseen. BERT:n kaksisuuntaiset kooderiesitykset tallentavat lauseen jokaisen osan väliset pitkän kantaman riippuvuudet. Tuloksemme osoittavat 85,12% tarkkuutta ja 80,57% F1-pisteitä osatehtävässä A (loukkaava kielen tunnistus), 87,92% tarkkuutta ja 50% F1-pisteitä osatehtävässä B (hyökkäystyyppien luokittelu) ja 69,95% tarkkuutta ja 50,47% F1-pisteitä osatehtävässä C (hyökkäystavoitteen tunnistus). Tulosten analysointi osoittaa, että kohdekielen ja kohdentamattoman loukkaavan kielen erottaminen ei ole yksinkertainen tehtävä. Alatehtävissä B ja C on tehtävä lisää työtä epätasapainotietoongelman ratkaisemiseksi. Lisäksi käsitellään joitakin tulevia töitä.', 'jv': 'Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné bakal nggawe balêng nêmên urip kanggo ngilangno karo kategori sing luwih apik lan ngêmên iki ning media sotiki. Grupus dhéwé, BNU-HkbU ID NLP Group 2 Awakdhéwé wis nambah Stat-of-the-arts model Bidirectial Ngubah gambar dipunanggé Resuloje nambarang cokot ??????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????? Tarjamahan pipilihan langkung itompok yang sumulakno itompok tarjamahan karo nggawe ujaran langkung itompok kuwi sampeyan. Mungkin obah-obahan kudu nggawe barang-obahan kanggo ngilanggar data seneng Subtasks B lan C. Perintah sing takon nggawe gerapakan.', 'sk': 'V študiji se ukvarjamo s problemom identifikacije in kategorizacije žaljivega jezika v družbenih medijih. Naša skupina, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, uporablja nadzorovano klasifikacijo skupaj z več različicami podatkov, ustvarjenih z različnimi načini predobdelave podatkov. Za zajemanje jezikovnih, sintaktičnih in semantičnih značilnosti uporabljamo najsodobnejši model dvosmernih kodirnih predstavitev iz transformatorjev ali BERT (Devlin et al, 2018). Odvisnosti dolgega razpona med vsakim delom stavka lahko zajamejo z dvosmernimi predstavitvami kodirnika BERT. Naši rezultati kažejo 85,12% točnost in 80,57% točnost F1 v podnalogi A (identifikacija žaljivega jezika), 87,92% točnost in 50% točnost F1 v podnalogi B (kategorizacija vrst napadov) ter 69,95% točnost in 50,47% točnost F1 v podnalogi C (identifikacija cilja napada). Analiza rezultatov kaže, da razlikovanje med ciljnim in neciljnim žaljivim jezikom ni preprosta naloga. V podnalogah B in C je treba opraviti več dela na področju neuravnoteženosti podatkov. Obravnavano je tudi prihodnje delo.', 'ha': "A cikin wannan littafin da Muke shawara da mataimaki ga gane da categorizi lugha turɓãya a cikin mitandai da jamii. @ info: status Sa'an nan kuma, za mu yi amfani da lissafin-mazaƙin-sanar Bi-Directive Encoder Repositions daga Transformers, ko BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), dõmin mu kãma wasu fassarar harshisiki, syntactic da semantic. Tsariya mai tsawo da tsakanin duk rabon maganar wata, za'a kãma su da tsarin koden mai ƙaranci na BERT. MataimakinMu na nuna 85.12% tabbatacce da 80.57% F1 score cikin Subaikin A (shaidar harshen na ƙyama), 87.92% tabbatacce da 50% F1 score cikin Subaikin B (categoration of nau'i), da 69.95% tabbatacce da 50.47% F1 score cikin Sub-aikin C (zane-zane-goar aikin laifi). Ana yi wa fassaran ya nuna cewa rarrabẽwa a tsakanin lugha na ƙiyaye da ba da tsari ba shi wani aikin da aka sauƙi ba. Ana ƙayyade in aikata wani aiki na dabam a kan matabbatar da data ba masu balanci a cikin Subtasks B da C. An sami wasu aikin bayani.", 'he': 'במחקר הזה אנחנו מתמודדים עם הבעיה של זיהוי וקטגוריזציה של שפה פוגעת בתקשורת חברתית. הקבוצה שלנו, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, משתמשת בהקלטה מבוקרת יחד עם גרסה מרובה של נתונים שנוצרו על ידי דרכים שונות של מעבד מראש של נתונים. ואז אנו משתמשים במודל המאודל המאודל המאודל ביכיווני מייצגים ממעברים, או BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), כדי לתפוס תכונות שפתיות, סינטקטיות וסמנטיות. תלויות לטווח ארוך בין כל חלק משפט יכולות להיתפס על ידי מייצגי הקודן השני-כיווני של BERT. התוצאות שלנו מראות מדויקת 85.12% ו-80.57% נקודות F1 בתפקיד A (זיהוי שפת פגיעה), מדויקת 87.92% ו-50% נקודות F1 בתפקיד B (קלטוריזציה של סוגי הפגיעה), מדויקת 69.95% ו-50.47% נקודות F1 בתפקיד C (זיהוי מטרה פגיעה). Analysis of the results shows that distinguishing between targeted and untargeted offensive language is not a simple task.  צריך לעשות עוד עבודה על בעיית הנתונים הלא מאוזנים בתפקידים B ו-C. יש גם דיון על עבודה עתידית.', 'bo': "In this study we deal with the problem of identifying and categorizing offensive language in social media. Our group, BNU-HKBU UIC NLP Team2, use supervised classification along with multiple version of data generated by different ways of pre-processing the data. We then use the state-of-the-art model Bidirectional Encoder Representations from Transformers, or BERT (Devlin et al, 2018), to capture linguistic, syntactic and semantic features. ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་ཆ་ཤས་རེ་རེ་རེའི་ཁྱབ་ཚད་རིང་བའི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་རྣམས་BERT's bidirectional encoder་རྟོགས་པ་ལ་འཛུགས་ཐུབ་པ ང་ཚོའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་ཆེན་85.12% accuracy་དང་། 80.57% F1 གྲངས་ཀ་ཚུ་Subtask A(offensive language identification)ཡིན་པ་ཅིན་ 87.92% accuracy་དང་། 50% F1 གྲངས་ཀ་ཚུ་Subtask B(categorization of offense types), 69.95% accuracy and 50.47% F1 གྲངས་ཀ་ཚུ་Subtask C(offense target identification)ཡིན། གནད་སྡུད་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ན་དམིགས་འབེབས་བྱས་མེད་པའི་སྐྱུར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་ཁྱད་པར་ན Subtasks B དང་C ལས་ཀ་ནང་ཡོད་པའི་ལས་འགན་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་ཞིབ་དགོས་པ་ཡིན།"}
{'en': 'ConvAI at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with Perspective and BERT', 'ar': 'ConvAI في SemEval-2019 المهمة 6: تحديد اللغة الهجومية وتصنيفها باستخدام المنظور و BERT', 'es': 'ConVai en SemEval-2019 Tarea 6: Identificación y categorización del lenguaje ofensivo con perspectiva y BERT', 'fr': 'ConVai au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: Identification et catégorisation du langage offensant avec perspective et BERT', 'pt': 'ConvAI no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Identificação e Categorização de Linguagem Ofensiva com Perspectiva e BERT', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のConvAIタスク6 ：遠近法とBERTによる攻撃的な言語の識別と分類', 'zh': 'ConvAI at SemEval-2019 任6:有透视BERT之攻击性言知类', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 6 पर ConvAI: परिप्रेक्ष्य और BERT के साथ आक्रामक भाषा पहचान और वर्गीकरण', 'ru': 'ConvAI на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Идентификация и категоризация оскорбительного языка с перспективой и BERT', 'ga': 'ConvAI ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Aithint agus Catagóiriú Teanga Ionsaitheach le Peirspictíocht agus BERT', 'ka': 'ConvAI semiEval-2019 პარამეტრი 6: უფრო უფრო უფრო განსაზღვრება და კატეგორიზაცია პერვისტებით და BERT', 'el': 'Εργασία 6: Προσθετικός γλωσσικός προσδιορισμός και κατηγοριοποίηση με προοπτική και BERT', 'hu': 'ConvAI a SemEval-2019 6. feladat: Offenzív nyelvazonosítás és kategorizálás perspektívával és BERT-vel', 'it': 'ConvAI a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identificazione e categorizzazione del linguaggio offensivo con prospettiva e BERT', 'kk': 'Артық-2019 тапсырмасында ConvAI 6- тапсырмасы: Тілді идентификациялау және Перспектива және BERT бағдарламасының санаттары', 'lt': 'ConvAI at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with Perspective and BERT', 'mk': 'ConvAI на SemEval-2019 задача 6: Идентификација и категоризација на навреден јазик со перспектива и BERT', 'ms': 'ConvAI pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Identifikasi Bahasa Serangan dan Kategori dengan Perspektif dan BERT', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6: പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതും വ്യവസ്ഥയുമായി വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mn': 'ConvAI at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with Perspective and BERT', 'mt': 'ConvAI f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6: Identifikazzjoni u Kategorizzazzjoni tal-Lingwa Offensiva bil-Perspettiva u l-BERT', 'pl': 'Zadanie 6: Identyfikacja i kategorizacja języka ofensywnego z perspektywą i BERT', 'ro': 'ConvAI la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: Identificarea și categorizarea limbilor ofensive cu perspectivă și BERT', 'sr': 'KonvAI na pola Evala-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with Perspective and BERT', 'no': 'ConvAI ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 6: Offensive språk-identifisering og kategorisering med perspektiv og BERT', 'so': 'ConvAI at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with Perspective and BERT', 'si': 'ConvAI at Half-2019 Job 6: Offensive language ID and Categorication with Percent and BERT', 'sv': 'ConvAI på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: Offensiv språkidentifiering och kategorisering med perspektiv och BERT', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 6: தனிப்பட்ட மொழி அடையாளம் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தல் பிரெட்டுடன் வகைப்படுத்தல்', 'ur': 'SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with Perspective and BERT', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifa 6: Offensive language identification and categorization with Perspective and BERT', 'vi': 'Tập trung tại Nhiệm vụ SemEvol 6: Nhận diện Ngôn ngữ Hành động và phân loại với triển vọng và BERT.', 'bg': 'Задача 6: Идентификация и категоризация на офанзивен език с перспектива и БЕРТ', 'nl': 'ConvAI bij SemEval-2019 Taak 6: Offensieve Taalidentificatie en Categorisering met Perspectief en BERT', 'hr': 'ConvAI na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 6: Offensive jezika identifikacija i kategorizacija s perspektivom i BERT', 'da': 'ConvAI på SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: Offensiv sprogidentifikation og kategorisering med perspektiv og BERT', 'fa': 'ConvAI at semiEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with Perspective and BERT', 'id': 'ConvAI at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with Perspective and BERT', 'de': 'Aufgabe 6: Offensive Sprachidentifikation und Kategorisierung mit Perspektive und BERT', 'ko': 'ConvAI가SemEval-2019에서의 임무6: 공격적 언어 식별과 분류와 시각과 시각', 'tr': 'ConvAI at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with Perspective and BERT', 'sq': 'ConvAI në SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with Perspective and BERT', 'sw': 'ConvAI katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 6: Utambulisho na Ubaguzi wa lugha rasmi kwa mtazamo na BERT', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'az': 'ConvAI at semiEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with Perspective and BERT', 'af': 'ConvAI by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 6: Offensive Taal Identifikasie en Kategoriseering met Perspektief en BERT', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bs': 'ConvAI na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 6: Offensive jezika identifikacija i kategorizacija s perspektivom i BERT', 'bn': 'ConvAI at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with Perspective and BERT', 'cs': 'Úkol 6: Offenzivní jazyková identifikace a kategorizace s perspektivou a BERT', 'et': 'ConvAI SemEval-2019 ülesanne 6: ründav keele identifitseerimine ja kategoriseerimine perspektiivi ja BERT-iga', 'fi': 'ConvAI SemEval-2019 Teht채v채 6: Hy철kk채채v채 kielen tunnistaminen ja luokittelu perspektiivin ja BERT:n avulla', 'ca': 'ConvAI a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with Perspective and BERT', 'jv': 'conVAI at semi-inval-2011 task 6: offensive Language ID and category with perspective and BERT', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'ConvAI na SemEval-2019 naloga 6: napadalna identifikacija in kategorizacija jezikov s perspektivo in BERT', 'he': 'ConvAI ב SemEval-2019 משימה 6: זיהוי שפה פגיעה וקטגוריזציה עם פרספקטיבה וברט', 'bo': 'ConvAI at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with Perspective and BERT'}
{'en': 'This paper presents the application of two strong baseline systems for toxicity detection and evaluates their performance in identifying and categorizing offensive language in social media. PERSPECTIVE is an API, that serves multiple machine learning models for the improvement of conversations online, as well as a toxicity detection system, trained on a wide variety of comments from platforms across the Internet. BERT is a recently popular language representation model, fine tuned per task and achieving state of the art performance in multiple NLP tasks. PERSPECTIVE performed better than BERT in detecting toxicity, but BERT was much better in categorizing the offensive type. Both baselines were ranked surprisingly high in the SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL competition, PERSPECTIVE in detecting an offensive post (12th) and BERT in categorizing it (11th). The main contribution of this paper is the assessment of two strong baselines for the identification (PERSPECTIVE) and the categorization (BERT) of offensive language with little or no additional training data.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة تطبيق نظامين أساسيين قويين لاكتشاف السمية وتقييم أدائهم في تحديد وتصنيف اللغة المسيئة في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. PERSPECTIVE هي واجهة برمجة تطبيقات تقدم نماذج متعددة للتعلم الآلي لتحسين المحادثات عبر الإنترنت ، بالإضافة إلى نظام الكشف عن السمية ، الذي تم تدريبه على مجموعة متنوعة من التعليقات من الأنظمة الأساسية عبر الإنترنت. BERT هو نموذج تمثيل لغوي شائع مؤخرًا ، تم ضبطه بدقة لكل مهمة وتحقيق أداء متطور في مهام معالجة اللغات الطبيعية المتعددة. كان أداء PERSPECTIVE أفضل من BERT في الكشف عن السمية ، لكن BERT كان أفضل بكثير في تصنيف النوع المسيء. تم تصنيف كلا الخطين الأساسيين بشكل مدهش في منافسة OFFENSEVAL SEMEVAL-2019 ، ومنظور في الكشف عن وظيفة هجومية (12) و BERT في تصنيفها (11). المساهمة الرئيسية لهذه الورقة هي تقييم خطين أساسيين قويين لتحديد (منظور) وتصنيف (بيرت) للغة الهجومية مع القليل من بيانات التدريب الإضافية أو بدونها.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta a aplicação de dois fortes sistemas de linha de base para detecção de toxicidade e avalia seu desempenho na identificação e categorização de linguagem ofensiva nas mídias sociais. PERSPECTIVE é uma API, que atende a vários modelos de aprendizado de máquina para o aprimoramento de conversas online, bem como um sistema de detecção de toxicidade, treinado em uma ampla variedade de comentários de plataformas da Internet. O BERT é um modelo de representação de linguagem recentemente popular, ajustado por tarefa e alcançando desempenho de última geração em várias tarefas de PNL. O PERSPECTIVE teve um desempenho melhor do que o BERT na detecção de toxicidade, mas o BERT foi muito melhor na categorização do tipo ofensivo. Ambas as linhas de base foram classificadas surpreendentemente altas na competição SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL, PERSPECTIVA na detecção de um post ofensivo (12º) e BERT na categorização (11º). A principal contribuição deste artigo é a avaliação de duas linhas de base fortes para a identificação (PERSPECTIVA) e a categorização (BERT) de linguagem ofensiva com pouco ou nenhum dado de treinamento adicional.', 'fr': "Cet article présente l'application de deux systèmes de base solides pour la détection de la toxicité et évalue leur performance dans l'identification et la catégorisation du langage offensant dans les médias sociaux. PERSPECTIVE est une API qui fournit de multiples modèles d'apprentissage automatique pour améliorer les conversations en ligne, ainsi qu'un système de détection de toxicité, formé sur une grande variété de commentaires provenant de plateformes sur Internet. BERT est un modèle de représentation linguistique récemment populaire, affiné par tâche et offrant des performances de pointe dans plusieurs tâches de PNL. PERSPECTIVE a obtenu de meilleurs résultats que le BERT dans la détection de la toxicité, mais le BERT a été bien meilleur pour catégoriser le type offensif. Les deux lignes de base ont été classées étonnamment haut dans la compétition OFFENSEVAL SEMEVAL-2019, PERSPECTIVE pour la détection d'un poteau offensif (12e) et BERT pour sa catégorisation (11e). La principale contribution de cet article est l'évaluation de deux bases solides pour l'identification (PERSPECTIVE) et la catégorisation (BERT) du langage offensant avec peu ou pas de données de formation supplémentaires.", 'es': 'Este artículo presenta la aplicación de dos sistemas de referencia sólidos para la detección de toxicidad y evalúa su desempeño en la identificación y categorización del lenguaje ofensivo en las redes sociales. PERSPECTIVE es una API que sirve para múltiples modelos de aprendizaje automático para mejorar las conversaciones en línea, así como un sistema de detección de toxicidad, entrenado en una amplia variedad de comentarios de plataformas de Internet. BERT es un modelo de representación lingüística popular recientemente, ajustado por tarea y que logra un rendimiento de vanguardia en múltiples tareas de PNL. PERSPECTIVE tuvo un mejor desempeño que BERT en la detección de toxicidad, pero BERT fue mucho mejor en la categorización del tipo ofensivo. Ambas líneas de base se clasificaron sorprendentemente altas en la competencia OFFENSEVAL SEMEVAL-2019, PERSPECTIVE en la detección de un puesto ofensivo (12º) y BERT en su categorización (11º). La principal contribución de este artículo es la evaluación de dos líneas de base sólidas para la identificación (PERSPECTIVA) y la categorización (BERT) del lenguaje ofensivo con pocos o ningún dato de entrenamiento adicional.', 'ja': '本論文では、毒性検出のための2つの強力なベースラインシステムの応用を紹介し、ソーシャルメディアにおける攻撃的言語の識別と分類におけるそれらのパフォーマンスを評価します。 PERSPECTIVEは、オンラインでの会話を改善するための複数の機械学習モデルと、毒性検出システムを提供するAPIで、インターネット全体のプラットフォームからの幅広いコメントについてトレーニングされています。 BERTは最近人気のある言語表現モデルであり、タスクごとに微調整され、複数のNLPタスクで最先端のパフォーマンスを達成します。 パースペクティブは、毒性の検出においてBERTよりも優れていたが、攻撃型の分類においてはBERTの方がはるかに優れていた。 SEMEVAL -2019 OFFENSEVALコンペティションでは、攻撃的なポストを検出する観点から（ 12位）、BERTを分類する観点から（ 11位）、どちらのベースラインも驚くほど高いランク付けとなった。 この論文の主な貢献は、追加のトレーニングデータがほとんどまたは全くない攻撃的言語の識別（視点）と分類（ BERT ）のための2つの強力なベースラインの評価である。', 'zh': '本文引二强基线系统于毒检之中,而评其识类社交媒体犯性之言。 PERSPECTIVE为一API,多给机器学模形,以善在线对,及一毒检统,当系统自互联网台上诸论习之。 BERT者,近行之语也,以事为微调,而于数NLP之最先进者也。 PERSPECTIVE善于检毒,而BERT善于攻BERT。 于SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL竞赛中,两基线皆奇地高,PERSPECTIVE检进攻性帖高(第12位),于BERT分(第11位) 时最高。 本文大要,估二强基线,以识(PERSPECTIVE)类(BERT),用于鲜本无额外训练之数。', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлено применение двух сильных базовых систем для обнаружения токсичности и оценивается их эффективность в выявлении и классификации оскорбительных формулировок в социальных сетях. PERSPECTIVE - это API, который служит нескольким моделям машинного обучения для улучшения разговоров в Интернете, а также система обнаружения токсичности, обученная по широкому спектру комментариев от платформ по всему Интернету. BERT - популярная в последнее время модель представления языка, точно настроенная для каждой задачи и достигающая современной производительности в нескольких задачах NLP. ПЕРСПЕКТИВА показала лучшие результаты, чем у БЕРТА, в обнаружении токсичности, но БЕРТ был гораздо лучше в классификации наступательного типа. Обе базовые линии были оценены на удивление высоко в соревновании SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL, ПЕРСПЕКТИВА в обнаружении наступательного поста (12-е место) и BERT в его классификации (11-е место). Основным вкладом данной работы является оценка двух сильных исходных линий для идентификации (ПЕРСПЕКТИВЫ) и категоризации (BERT) оскорбительного языка с небольшим количеством или отсутствием дополнительных обучающих данных.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर विषाक्तता का पता लगाने के लिए दो मजबूत बेसलाइन सिस्टम के आवेदन को प्रस्तुत करता है और सोशल मीडिया में आक्रामक भाषा की पहचान और वर्गीकरण में उनके प्रदर्शन का मूल्यांकन करता है। परिप्रेक्ष्य एक एपीआई है, जो ऑनलाइन बातचीत के सुधार के लिए कई मशीन लर्निंग मॉडल प्रदान करता है, साथ ही साथ एक विषाक्तता का पता लगाने वाली प्रणाली, जिसे इंटरनेट पर प्लेटफार्मों से विभिन्न प्रकार की टिप्पणियों पर प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है। BERT एक हाल ही में लोकप्रिय भाषा प्रतिनिधित्व मॉडल है, जो प्रति कार्य ठीक ट्यून किया गया है और कई एनएलपी कार्यों में कला प्रदर्शन की स्थिति प्राप्त करता है। परिप्रेक्ष्य ने विषाक्तता का पता लगाने में बर्ट की तुलना में बेहतर प्रदर्शन किया, लेकिन BERT आक्रामक प्रकार को वर्गीकृत करने में बहुत बेहतर था। दोनों बेसलाइन को SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL प्रतियोगिता में आश्चर्यजनक रूप से उच्च स्थान दिया गया था, एक आक्रामक पोस्ट (12 वें) का पता लगाने में परिप्रेक्ष्य और इसे वर्गीकृत करने में BERT (11 वां)। इस पेपर का मुख्य योगदान पहचान (परिप्रेक्ष्य) के लिए दो मजबूत बेसलाइन का मूल्यांकन है और बहुत कम या कोई अतिरिक्त प्रशिक्षण डेटा के साथ आक्रामक भाषा का वर्गीकरण (BERT)।', 'ga': "Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair feidhmiú dhá chóras bonnlíne láidre maidir le tocsaineacht a bhrath agus déanann sé meastóireacht ar a bhfeidhmíocht maidir le teanga ionsaitheach a shainaithint agus a chatagóiriú sna meáin shóisialta. Is API é PERSPECTIVE, a fhreastalaíonn ar mhúnlaí ilfhoghlama meaisín chun feabhas a chur ar chomhráite ar líne, chomh maith le córas braite tocsaineachta, atá oilte ar raon leathan tuairimí ó ardáin ar fud an Idirlín. Samhail ionadaíochta teanga a bhfuil éileamh mór air le déanaí is ea BERT, arna mhionchoigeartú in aghaidh an taisc agus ag baint amach feidhmíocht den scoth in iliomad tascanna NLP. D'fheidhmigh PEARSANTA níos fearr ná CRET maidir le tocsaineacht a bhrath, ach bhí BET i bhfad níos fearr maidir leis an gcineál maslach a chatagóiriú. Rinneadh an dá bhonnlíne a rangú thar a bheith ard sa chomórtas SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL, PERSPECTIVE maidir le post maslach a bhrath (12ú) agus BERT ina chatagóiriú (11ú). Is é príomh-ranníocaíocht an pháipéir seo measúnú ar dhá bhonnlíne láidre maidir le sainaithint (PERSPECTIVE) agus catagóiriú (BERT) teanga ionsaitheach gan mórán sonraí oiliúna breise nó gan aon sonraí oiliúna breise.", 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány két erős alapvető rendszer alkalmazását mutatja be a toxicitás detektálására, és értékeli azok teljesítményét a sértő nyelvek azonosításában és kategorizálásában a közösségi médiában. A PERSPECTIVE egy API, amely többféle gépi tanulási modellt szolgál az online beszélgetések javítására, valamint egy toxicitásérzékelő rendszert, amely az interneten keresztül érkező platformok széles választékára képzett. A BERT egy közelmúltban népszerű nyelvi reprezentációs modell, amely feladatonként finomhangolt és több NLP feladat esetében a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt ér el. A PERSPECTIVE jobban teljesített, mint a BERT a toxicitás kimutatásában, de a BERT sokkal jobb volt a támadó típus kategorizálásában. A SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL versenyen mindkét bázisvonal meglepően magas volt a rangsorolásban, a PERSPECTIVE a támadó poszt észlelésében (12.) és a BERT kategorizálásában (11.). A tanulmány fő hozzájárulása a sértő nyelv azonosításának (PERSPECTIVE) és kategorizálásának (BERT) két erős alapjának felmérése, kevés vagy semmilyen további képzési adattal.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει την εφαρμογή δύο ισχυρών συστημάτων βάσης για την ανίχνευση τοξικότητας και αξιολογεί την απόδοσή τους στον εντοπισμό και την κατηγοριοποίηση προσβλητικών γλωσσών στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Το είναι ένα που εξυπηρετεί πολλαπλά μοντέλα μηχανικής μάθησης για τη βελτίωση των συνομιλιών στο διαδίκτυο, καθώς και ένα σύστημα ανίχνευσης τοξικότητας, εκπαιδευμένο σε μια ευρεία ποικιλία σχολίων από πλατφόρμες σε όλο το Διαδίκτυο. Το BERT είναι ένα πρόσφατα δημοφιλές μοντέλο γλωσσικής αναπαράστασης, το οποίο προσαρμόζεται λεπτομερώς ανά εργασία και επιτυγχάνει απόδοση τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε πολλαπλές εργασίες. Το PERSPECTIVE πέτυχε καλύτερα από το BERT στην ανίχνευση τοξικότητας, αλλά ο BERT ήταν πολύ καλύτερος στην κατηγοριοποίηση του επιθετικού τύπου. Και οι δύο γραμμές βάσης κατατάχθηκαν εκπληκτικά ψηλά στον διαγωνισμό ΣΕΜΕΒΑΛ-2019, με προοπτική στην ανίχνευση επιθετικής θέσης (12η) και BERT στην κατηγοριοποίηση της (11η). Η κύρια συνεισφορά της παρούσας εργασίας είναι η αξιολόγηση δύο ισχυρών βασικών γραμμών για τον προσδιορισμό (ΕΠΙΠΕΛΜΑΤΙΚΗ) και την κατηγοριοποίηση (BERT) της προσβλητικής γλώσσας με ελάχιστα ή καθόλου πρόσθετα δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი გამოყენებს ორი ძალიან ბაზური სისტემის გამოყენება ტოქსიტების განახლებისთვის და გამოყენებს მათი გამოყენება სოციალური მედიაში განახლებისთვის და კატეგორი PERSPECTIVE არის API, რომელიც მრავალ მაქსინური სწავლების მოდელები ინტერნეტის კონფიგურაციების უფრო მეტირებისთვის, რომელიც ტოქსიტიური განახლების სისტემა, რომელიც ინტერნეტის სხვადასხვა კონტაქ BERT არის მხოლოდ პოლიპური ენის მოდელია, რომელიც საკუთარი დასაწყებულია და მრავალ NLP დავალების მუშაობის შესაძლებლობა. PERSPECTIVE გაკეთებულია BERT-ზე უკეთესი, მაგრამ BERT იყო ძალიან უკეთესი, როგორც გაკეთებული ტიპის კატეგორიზაციაში. ორივე ბაზი ხაზები იყო საინტერესოდ მაღალია SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL კონკრენციაში, PERSPECTIVE განაკვირთებაში საფუნქციური პოსტი (12მე) და BERT-ს კატეგორიზაციაში (11მე). ამ გვერდის მნიშვნელოვანი დამატება არის ორი ძალიან ბაზი ხაზების განსაზღვრება (PERSPECTIVE) და განსაზღვრების კატეგორიზაცია (BERT) განსაზღვრებული ენაში, რომელიც მარტივი ან არაა დამატებული განსაზ', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta l'applicazione di due solidi sistemi di base per il rilevamento della tossicità e valuta le loro prestazioni nell'identificazione e categorizzazione del linguaggio offensivo nei social media. PERSPECTIVE è un'API, che serve diversi modelli di apprendimento automatico per il miglioramento delle conversazioni online, nonché un sistema di rilevamento della tossicità, addestrato su un'ampia varietà di commenti provenienti da piattaforme su Internet. BERT è un modello di rappresentazione linguistica popolare di recente, ottimizzato per attività e ottenendo prestazioni all'avanguardia in più attività NLP. PERSPECTIVE ha ottenuto risultati migliori di BERT nel rilevare la tossicità, ma BERT è stato molto meglio nel classificare il tipo offensivo. Entrambe le linee di base sono state classificate sorprendentemente in alto nella competizione OFFENSEVAL SEMEVAL-2019, PERSPECTIVE nel rilevare un post offensivo (12°) e BERT nel categorizzarlo (11°). Il contributo principale di questo lavoro è la valutazione di due solide linee di base per l'identificazione (PERSPECTIVA) e la categorizzazione (BERT) del linguaggio offensivo con pochi o nessun dato aggiuntivo di formazione.", 'mk': 'Овој весник ја претставува апликацијата на двата силни основни системи за детекција на токсичност и ја оценува нивната резултат во идентификувањето и категоризирањето на офанзивниот јазик во социјалните медиуми. PERSPECTIVE е API, која служи на повеќето модели на машинско учење за подобрување на разговорите онлајн, како и систем за детекција на токсичност, обучен на широка разлика на коментари од платформи низ интернетот. БЕРТ е неодамна популарен модел за претставување на јазикот, фино прилагоден по задача и постигнување на најсовремени изведувања во повеќе НЛП задачи. PERSPECTIVE изврши подобро од BERT во детектирање токсичност, но BERT беше многу подобро во категоризирањето на навредниот тип. Двете основни линии беа рангирани изненадувачки високо во натпреварот SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL, PERSPECTIVE во откривањето на нападната позиција (12-ти) и BERT во категоризирањето на неа (11-ти). Главниот придонес на овој документ е проценката на две силни основни линии за идентификација (PERSPECTIVE) и категоризација (BERT) на офанзивниот јазик со малку или без дополнителни податоци за обука.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiamas dviejų tvirtų bazinių toksiškumo nustatymo sistemų taikymas ir įvertinamas jų veiksmingumas nustatant ir klasifikuojant pažeidžiamąją kalbą social in ėje žiniasklaidoje. PERSPECTIVE yra API, kuri naudoja daugelį mašininio mokymosi modelių, skirtų pagerinti pokalbius internetu, taip pat toksiškumo nustatymo sistemą, parengtą įvairiomis interneto platformų komentarais. BERT yra neseniai populiarus kalbų atstovavimo model is, gerai pritaikytas kiekvienai užduotis ir pasiektas pažangiausias rezultatas keliose NLP užduotyse. PERSPECTIVE buvo veiksmingiau nei BERT, nustatant toksinį poveikį, tačiau BERT buvo daug geriau klasifikuojant pažeidžiamąjį tipą. Abi baziniai rodikliai buvo stebimai aukšti SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL konkurse, PERSPECTIVE nustatant offensive post (12) ir BERT ją klasifikuojant (11). Pagrindinis šio dokumento indėlis yra dviejų tvirtų bazinių taškų nustatymas (PERSPEKTIVAS) ir įžeidžiančios kalbos klasifikavimas (BERT) su mažai arba be papildomų mokymo duomenų.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз токсичылық анықтау үшін екі күшті негізгі жүйелердің қолданбаларын көрсетеді және әлемдік медиақтардың тілдерін анықтау және санаттарын анықтау және санаттарын баптайды. PERSPECTIVE - интернеттегі параметрлерді жақсарту үшін бірнеше машиналық оқыту үлгілерін, сондай-ақ интернеттегі платформалардың көптеген түсініктемелері арқылы бірнеше түсініктемелерді оқыту жүйесі. BERT - жуырдағы мәліметті тілдерді көрсету үлгісі, тапсырманың әрбіріне дұрыс түзетілген және бірнеше NLP тапсырмалардың орындау күйін жеткізу үлгісі. PERSPECTIVE BERT- ден жақсы жұмыс істеді, бірақ BERT қарсы түрін бағалау үшін көп жақсы жұмыс істеді. Екі негізгі жолдар SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL конкуренциясында, PERSPECTIVE қарсы (12- ші) және BERT-ті категориясында (11- ші) анықтау үшін кейбірде жоғары болды. Бұл қағаздың негізгі қатынасы - кішкентай немесе қосымша оқыту мәліметі болмаған екі күшті негізгі жолдарды анықтау (PERSPECTIVE) және беттеу тілдің санаттарын (BERT) бағалау.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan aplikasi dua sistem asas yang kuat untuk pengesan toksik dan menilai prestasi mereka dalam pengenalan dan kategorisasi bahasa serangan dalam media sosial. PERSPECTIVE adalah API, yang melayani model pembelajaran mesin berbilang untuk peningkatan perbualan secara online, serta sistem pengesan toksik, dilatih pada pelbagai ulasan yang luas dari platform di seluruh Internet. BERT adalah model perwakilan bahasa yang baru-baru ini terkenal, ditetapkan baik per tugas dan mencapai prestasi seni dalam tugas NLP berbilang. PERSPECTIVE dilakukan lebih baik daripada BERT dalam mengesan toksik, tetapi BERT jauh lebih baik dalam kategori jenis serangan. Kedua-dua garis dasar ditetapkan secara mengejutkan tinggi dalam pertandingan SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL, PERSPECTIVE dalam mengesan pos serangan (ke-12) dan BERT dalam kategorisasinya (ke-11). kontribusi utama kertas ini adalah penilaian dua garis dasar yang kuat untuk pengenalan (PERSPECTIVE) dan kategorisasi (BERT) bahasa serangan dengan sedikit atau tiada data latihan tambahan.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ രണ്ടു ശക്തിയുള്ള ബെസ്ലൈന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയിലെ പ്രതിഫലം തിരിച്ചറിയുകയും വിഭാ പെര്\u200dസ്പെക്റ്റിവ് ഒരു എപിഐ ആണ്. അത് ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന് പല യന്ത്രങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d സേവിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ ടോക്സിക്സി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കു ബെര്\u200dട്ടി അടുത്തുതന്നെ ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ പ്രതിനിധിയുടെ മോഡലാണ്, ഒരു ജോലിക്കും നല്ല സുന്ദരമുണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന പെര്\u200dസ്പെക്ടിവ് ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയെക്കാള്\u200d നല്ലത് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രോഗ്രിസ്റ്റിയെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ബെര സെമെവാല്\u200d -2019 ഓഫെന്\u200dസെവാല്\u200d പ്രതിയോഗിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d രണ്ട് ബേസ്റ്റിലുകളും അത്ഭുതകരമായി ഉയര്\u200dന്നിരിക്കുന്നു. പെര്\u200dസ്പെക്റ്റിവ് ഒരു ആപത്താം പോസ്റ്റ് (12th) നോട ഈ പത്രത്തിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷയ്ക്കുള്ള രണ്ട് ശക്തിയുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളുടെ (പെര്\u200dസ്പെക്റ്റിവേവ്) പിന്നെ കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ വിഭ', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta l-applikazzjoni ta’ żewġ sistemi bażiċi qawwija għad-detezzjoni tat-tossiċità u jevalwa l-prestazzjoni tagħhom fl-identifikazzjoni u l-kategorizzazzjoni tal-lingwa offensiva fil-midja soċjali. PERSPETTIVA hija API, li sservi mudelli multipli ta’ tagħlim bil-magni għat-titjib tal-konverżjonijiet onlajn, kif ukoll sistema ta’ identifikazzjoni tat-tossiċità, imħarrġa fuq varjetà wiesgħa ta’ kummenti minn pjattaformi madwar l-Internet. Il-BERT huwa mudell ta’ rappreżentazzjoni tal-lingwi popolari reċentement, a ġġustat bir-reqqa għal kull kompitu u jikseb prestazzjoni avvanzata f’diversi kompiti tal-NLP. PERSPETTIVE wettaq aħjar minn BERT fl-iskoperta tat-tossiċità, iżda BERT kien ħafna aħjar fil-kategorizzazzjoni tat-tip offensiv. Iż-żewġ linji bażi kienu kklassifikati b’mod sorprendenti għoljin fil-kompetizzjoni OFFENSEVAL SEMEVAL-2019, PERSPETTIVA fl-iskoperta ta’ post offensiv (it-12) u BERT fil-kategorizzazzjoni tiegħu (il-11). Il-kontribut ewlieni ta’ dan id-dokument huwa l-valutazzjoni ta’ żewġ linji bażi b’saħħithom għall-identifikazzjoni (PERSPETTIVA) u l-kategorizzazzjoni (BERT) ta’ lingwa ofensiva bi ftit jew l-ebda dejta addizzjonali ta’ taħriġ.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser programmet til to sterke baselinjesystemer for toksisk oppdaging og evaluerer utviklinga sine i å identifisera og kategorisera offensivspråk i sosiale media. PERSPECTIVE er ein API, som tjener fleire maskinelæringsmodeller for forbetringa av samtaler på nettet, og eit toksisk oppdagingssystem, treng på ein stor variasjon av kommentarar frå plattformar over Internett. BERT er eit nyleg populært språk- representasjonsmodul, fint oppsett per oppgåve og oppnår du har tilgang til kunstfunksjonen i fleire NLP- oppgåver. PERSPECTIVE utførte bedre enn BERT i oppdaging av toksikitet, men BERT var mykje bedre i å kategorisera offensivtypen. Begge baselinjer vart rankert overraska høg i SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL-konkurransen, PERSPECTIVE i oppdaging av ein offensiv post (12) og BERT i kategorisering (11). Den viktigste bidraga til denne papiret er å vurdere to sterke baselinjer for identifikasjonen (PERSPECTIVE) og kategoriseringa (BERT) av offensivspråket med lite eller ingen fleire opplæringsdata.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono zastosowanie dwóch silnych systemów bazowych do wykrywania toksyczności oraz oceniono ich skuteczność w identyfikowaniu i kategoryzowaniu języka obraźliwego w mediach społecznościowych. PERSPECTIVE to API, które obsługuje wiele modeli uczenia maszynowego w celu poprawy konwersacji online, a także system wykrywania toksyczności, przeszkolony na szerokiej gamie komentarzy z platform w Internecie. BERT to ostatnio popularny model reprezentacji językowej, dostosowany do każdego zadania i osiągający najnowocześniejszą wydajność w wielu zadaniach NLP. PERSPECTIVE sprawdziło się lepiej niż BERT w wykrywaniu toksyczności, ale BERT był znacznie lepszy w kategoryzowaniu typu ofensywnego. Obie linie bazowe zostały zaskakująco wysokie w konkursie SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL, PERSPEKTYWNE w wykrywaniu postu ofensywnego (12) i BERT w kategoryzacji (11). Głównym wkładem niniejszego artykułu jest ocena dwóch silnych linii podstawowych do identyfikacji (PERSPECTIVE) i kategoryzacji (BERT) języka obraźliwego z małą lub brakiem dodatkowych danych treningowych.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас хоёр хүчтэй суурь тогтолцооны системийн хэрэглээ харуулж, нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглээнийг тодорхойлж, хуваалцах гэмт хэрэглээнд ажиллагааг үнэлдэг. PERSPECTIVE бол олон машин суралцах загваруудыг онлайн ярилцлагын улам сайжруулахын тулд ашигладаг API юм. BERT бол саяхан хүн төрөлхтний хэл илтгэлийн загвар юм. НЛП-ын олон ажил дээр урлагийн үйл ажиллагааны байр сууриллагааг гаргаж байна. PERSPECTIVE BERT-аас илүү сайн үйлдвэрлэсэн гэхдээ BERT-ын хувьд илүү сайн үйлдвэрлэсэн. Гэхдээ BERT-ын хувьд хэмжээний хувьд илүү сайн байсан. Хоёр суурь шугам нь SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL өрсөлдөөнд гайхамшигтай өндөртэй, ПЕРСПЕКТИВЕ (12-р) болон BERT-г категорид (11-р) байгуулахад гайхамшигтай байв. Энэ цаасны гол түвшинд нь хоёр хүчтэй суурь шугам, нэмэлт сургалтын өгөгдлийг бага эсвэл бага зэрэг багасгах өгөгдлийг тодорхойлох (PERSPECTIVE) болон буруу хэлний хуваарилалтын (BERT) хуваарилалтын то', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă aplicarea a două sisteme de bază puternice pentru detectarea toxicității și evaluează performanța acestora în identificarea și clasificarea limbajului ofensator în rețelele de socializare. PERSPECTIVE este un API, care servește mai multe modele de învățare automată pentru îmbunătățirea conversațiilor online, precum și un sistem de detectare a toxicității, instruit pe o gamă largă de comentarii de pe platforme de pe Internet. BERT este un model recent popular de reprezentare lingvistică, reglat fin pe sarcină și obținând performanțe de ultimă generație în mai multe sarcini PNL. PERSPECTIVE a performat mai bine decât BERT în detectarea toxicității, dar BERT a fost mult mai bun în clasificarea tipului ofensiv. Ambele linii de bază au fost clasate surprinzător de sus în competiția OFENSEVAL SEMEVAL-2019, PERSPECTIVE în detectarea unui post ofensiv (12) și BERT în clasificarea acestuia (11). Contribuţia principală a acestei lucrări este evaluarea a două linii de bază puternice pentru identificarea (PERSPECTIVĂ) şi clasificarea (BERT) limbajului ofensiv cu date suplimentare de formare puţine sau fără date suplimentare.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja primjenu dva jakog osnovnog sistema za otkrivanje toksičnosti i procjenjuje njihovu provedbu u identifikaciji i kategoriji ofanzivnog jezika u društvenim medijima. PERSPECTIVE je API, koji služi višestrukim modelima za učenje mašina za poboljšanje razgovora na internetu, kao i sistem za otkrivanje toksičnosti, obučen na raznim različitim komentarima iz platformi širom interneta. BERT je nedavno popularan model predstavljanja jezika, fino određen po zadatku i ostvarivanje stanja izvođenja umjetnosti u višestrukim NLP zadatkima. PERSPECTIVE je proveo bolje od BERT u otkrivanju toksičnosti, ali BERT je bio mnogo bolji u kategoriji ofanzivnog tipa. Obje osnovne linije su iznenađujuće visoke u konkurenciji SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL, PERSPECTIVE u otkrivanju ofanzivnog posta (12. i BERT) u kategoriji (11. godine). Glavni doprinos ovog papira je procena dve jake osnovne linije za identifikaciju (PERSPECTIVE) i kategoriju ofanzivnog jezika bez manjih ili bez dodatnih podataka o obuci.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුව පෙන්වන්නේ සාමාජික භාෂාව අඳුරගන්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පද්ධති දෙකක් ගැන බලාපොරොත්තු පද්ධතියේ අවස් PERSPECTIVE තමයි API එකක්, ඒකෙන් අන්තර්ජාලයේ වාර්තාවක් විශාලනය සඳහා ගොඩක් මැෂින් ඉගෙනීම් මොඩේල් සේවා කරනවා, සහ විකාශ පද්ධතියක් පරී BERT තමයි අවස්ථානයේ ලොකු භාෂාව ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනයක්, කාර්ය වෙනුවෙන් හොඳ සැකසුම් කරලා තියෙන්නේ නිල්පා ව PERSPECTIVE BERT වඩා වඩා හොඳ වැඩ කරනවා, ඒත් BERT අපරාධ වර්ගයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න හොඳයි. දෙන්නම ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධානයක් තියෙන්නේ SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL ප්\u200dරධානයක්, PERSPECTIVE හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් පොස්ට් (12th) සහ BERT එක වි මේ පත්තරේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි පරීක්ෂණය (PERSPECTIVE) සහ පරීක්ෂණය (BERT) භාෂාව පොඩ්ඩක් නැත්නම් තවත් ප්\u200dරශ්නය දත', 'so': 'Warqaddaas wuxuu soo bandhigaa codsiga laba nidaam oo xoog leh oo ku saabsan baaritaanka maandooriyaha, wuxuuna qiimeynayaa shaqooyinkooda ku qoran aqoonsashada iyo kala qeybinaya luqada dembiga ee shabakadda bulshada. PERSPECTIVE waa API, kaas oo u adeega qaabab barashada machadka kala duduwan, si loo horumariyo hadalka internetka, iyo nidaamka baaritaanka toksiska ah, oo lagu baranayo commentaro badan oo kala duduwan oo laga helay shabakadaha internetka oo dhan. BERT waa model u muuqashada luuqada ugu dhowaad ee maaruf ah, oo la xiriiray shaqo kasta iyo dhamaadka xaaladda farshaxanka ee shaqada NLP oo kala duduwan. PERSPECTIVE ayaa ka samaysay wax ka wanaagsan BERT in lagu ogaado dhibaato, laakiin BERT way ka wanaagsan tahay in lagu kala qeybiyo nooca xunxun. Labada xadhig ee aasaaska ah waa mid aad looga sareeyay iskaasha SEMEVAL-2019 OFFFENSEVAL, PERSPECTIVE ayaa laga helay boostada xadgudubka (12aad) iyo BERT si ay u kala qeybeeyaan (11aad). Qoraalkan waxaa lagu qiimeynayaa laba saldhig oo xoog leh oo aqoonsiga (PERSPECTIVE) iyo qeybinta luqada caasinimada (BERT) oo lagu qorayo macluumaad waxbarasho oo yar ama waxbarasho dheeraad ah.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar tillämpningen av två starka basgrundssystem för toxicitetsdetektering och utvärderar deras prestanda när det gäller att identifiera och kategorisera stötande språk i sociala medier. PERSPECTIVE är ett API, som tjänar flera maskininlärningsmodeller för att förbättra konversationer online, samt ett toxicitetsdetekteringssystem, tränat på en mängd olika kommentarer från plattformar över Internet. BERT är en nyligen populär språkrepresentationsmodell, finjusterad per uppgift och uppnår toppmoderna prestanda i flera NLP-uppgifter. PERSPECTIVE presterade bättre än BERT när det gällde att upptäcka toxicitet, men BERT var mycket bättre när det gällde att kategorisera den offensiva typen. Båda baslinjerna rankades förvånansvärt högt i SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL tävlingen, PERSPECTIVE när det gäller att upptäcka en offensiv post (12:e) och BERT när det gäller att kategorisera den (11:e). Huvudbidraget i denna uppsats är bedömningen av två starka baslinjer för identifiering (PERSPECTIV) och kategorisering (BERT) av stötande språk med få eller inga ytterligare träningsdata.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் இரண்டு வலிமையான அடிப்படை முறைமைகளின் பயன்பாட்டை புவியல் கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்காகவும் தொடர்ந்து சமூக ஊடகங்களில் குறைந்த மொ PERSPECTIVE ஒரு API ஆகும், அது இணையத்தில் உள்ள பேச்சை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கான பல இயந்திர கற்றி மாதிரிகளை வழங்குகிறது, மற்றும் துன்பத்தை கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான முறைமையை பய பிரெட் ஒரு சமீபத்தில் பிரபலமான மொழி குறிப்பிடும் மாதிரி, ஒவ்வொரு செயலுக்கும் நன்றாக முடிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் பல NLP பெர்ஸ்பெக்டிவ் பிரெட்டை விட சிறந்த செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டது, ஆனால் பெர்ட் தீவிரமான வகையை வகுத்தலில் மிகவும் நல்லது. SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL போர்ட்டில் இரண்டு அடிப்படை கோடுகளும் ஆச்சரியமாக உயர்ந்தது, பெரிஸ்பெக்டிவ் ஒரு செயல்படுத்தல் புதிய (12வது) மற்றும் பெர்ட் அதை வகுத்தலில் கண்ட இந்த காகிதத்தின் முக்கிய பங்கீடு சிறிய அல்லது கூடுதல் பயிற்சி தகவல் இல்லாமல் இரண்டு வலிமையான அடிப்படைக்கோடுகளின் (PERSPECTIVE) மற்றும் பிரெட் (BERT', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ دو مضبوط بنسٹلین سیستموں کی کاربری کی تعریف کرتا ہے جسمی میڈیا میں جسمی زبان کی شناسایی اور کائٹی کرتا ہے۔ PERSPECTIVE ایک API ہے، جو بہت سی ماشین سکونت کی مدل کو آنلاین کی باتوں کی improvement کے لئے خدمت کرتا ہے، اور ایک toxicity detection system، جس کو اینٹرنیٹ کے اندر پٹرومٹوں سے بہت سی مطلوبات پر آموزش دی جاتی ہے. BERT ایک اگلے ملی زبان کی نمایش موڈل ہے، ہر کام کو خوب تنظیم کر دیا گیا ہے اور بہت سے NLP کاموں میں هنر کی نمایش کا موقعیت پہنچا رہا ہے. PERSPECTIVE BERT سے بہتر عمل کرتا تھا جسم شناسایت میں، لیکن BERT بہت اچھا تھا جسم کے ٹائپ کو تقسیم کرنے میں۔ دونوں بنیاس لینٹوں کو SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL مقابلہ میں عجیب طریقے سے بلند کیا گیا تھا، ایک نافذی پوسٹ (12th) اور BERT کو اس کے کاٹی (11th) میں آگاہ کرنا (PERSPECTIVE). اس کاغذ کی اصلی حصہ یہ ہے کہ دونوں قوی بنسٹ لینوں کی تصدیق کرنا (PERSPECTIVE) اور فساد کی زبان کی تقسیم کرنا (BERT) تھوڑی تھوڑی یا کوئی اضافہ تدریس دیتا نہیں ہے۔', 'uz': "Ushbu qogʻoz toxic aniqlash uchun ikki sterk baseline tizimning dasturini koʻrsatiladi va jamiyatsiya media ichidagi offensiv tilni aniqlash va kattalashtirish natijasini qiymatlaydi. PERSPECTIVE API, bu tarmoqning bir necha mashinalarni o'rganish modellarini foydalanadi, va ko'pchilik suhbatlarni o'zgartirish, va giftik qidirish tizimi, va Internetning tarkibi platformlaridagi ko'p xil izohlardan foydalanadi. Bu yaqinda bir nechta NLP vazifalarda sanam bajarish holatini bajarish modeli. Va BERT toxiclikni aniqlashdan yaxshi bajardi, lekin BERT turini kattalashtirish uchun juda yaxshi edi. Ikkita asboblar juda ajoyib darajadagi SEMEVAL-2019 OFFFENSEVAL rivojlanishda, PERSPECTIVE (12 chi) pochta (12 chi) va BERT (11 chi) kategoriga ega bo'lgan. Bu qogʻozning asosiy qiymatlari, ID'lash (PERSPECTIVE) uchun ikki sterk asosiy asosiy (BERT) va qoʻshimcha taʼminlovchi maʼlumot yoʻq yoki qoʻshimcha maʼlumot yoʻq (BERT) tilning kategoriyati (BERT).", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này cho thấy hai hệ thống cơ bản vững chắc để phát hiện độc tố và đánh giá khả năng của chúng trong việc xác định và phân loại ngôn ngữ tấn công trong các phương tiện xã hội. Dịch nhận thức cá nhân là một API, nó phục vụ các mô hình máy móc để cải thiện các cuộc trò chuyện trên mạng, cũng như một hệ thống phát hiện độc tính, được huấn luyện trên các đài phát thanh trên Internet. BERT là một mô hình phát ngôn ngữ được phổ biến gần đây, hoàn thiện từng nhiệm vụ và đạt được thành công trình nghệ trong nhiều công việc ngọt ngào nhất. THỰC THỰC được cung cấp tốt hơn BERT trong việc phát hiện độc tố, nhưng BERT lại phân loại loại các loại tấn công tốt hơn rất nhiều. Cả hai đường hầm được xếp hạng cao đáng ngạc nhiên trong cuộc thi MEVAL-209. Tác phẩm chính của bài báo này là đánh giá hai con đường nền vững chắc để nhận dạng (PECHENTING) và phân loại ngôn ngữ tấn công (BERT) với ít hay không có dữ liệu huấn luyện bổ sung.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя прилагането на две силни базови системи за откриване на токсичност и оценява тяхната ефективност при идентифициране и категоризиране на офанзивен език в социалните медии. Перспектив е API, който обслужва множество модели за машинно обучение за подобряване на разговорите онлайн, както и система за откриване на токсичност, обучена върху голямо разнообразие от коментари от платформи в интернет. BERT е наскоро популярен модел на езиково представяне, фино настроен по задача и постигащ най-съвременни резултати в множество задачи от НЛП. Перспективен се представи по-добре от BERT в откриването на токсичност, но BERT е много по-добър в категоризирането на офанзивния тип. И двете базови линии се класираха изненадващо високо в конкурса СЕМЕВАЛ-2019, ПЕРСПЕКТИВНИ в откриването на офанзивен пост (12) и БЕРТ в категоризирането му (11). Основният принос на тази статия е оценката на две силни базови линии за идентификация (ПЕРСПЕКТИВНА) и категоризация (БЕРТ) на офанзивен език с малко или никакви допълнителни данни за обучение.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer anvendelsen af to stærke baseline-systemer til toksicitetsdetektion og evaluerer deres ydeevne i identificering og kategorisering af stødende sprog i sociale medier. PERSPECTIVE er en API, der tjener flere maskinlæringsmodeller til forbedring af samtaler online, samt et toksicitetsdetektionssystem, trænet på en bred vifte af kommentarer fra platforme på tværs af internettet. BERT er for nylig en populær sprogrepræsentationsmodel, der finjusteres pr. opgave og opnår topmoderne ydeevne i flere NLP-opgaver. PERSPECTIVE klarede sig bedre end BERT til at detektere toksicitet, men BERT var meget bedre til at kategorisere den offensive type. Begge baselines blev rangeret overraskende højt i SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL konkurrence, PERSPECTIVE i opdagelse af en offensiv post (12.) og BERT i kategorisering den (11.). Det vigtigste bidrag i denne artikel er vurderingen af to stærke basislinjer for identifikation (PERSPECTIVE) og kategorisering (BERT) af offensivt sprog med få eller ingen yderligere træningsdata.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja primjenu dva jakog početnog sustava za otkrivanje toksičnosti i procjenjuje njihovu učinku u identifikaciji i kategoriji ofanzivnog jezika u društvenim medijima. PERSPECTIVE je API, koji služi višestrukim modelima učenja strojeva za poboljšanje razgovora na internetu, kao i sustav otkrivanja toksičnosti, obučen na raznim različitim komentarima iz platformi širom interneta. BERT je nedavno popularni model predstavljanja jezika, fino određen po zadatku i ostvarivanje stanja učinka umjetnosti u višestrukim zadatkima NLP-a. PERSPECTIVE je proveo bolje od BERT u otkrivanju toksičnosti, ali BERT je bio mnogo bolji u kategoriji ofanzivnog tipa. Obje osnovne linije su iznenađujuće visoke u natjecanju SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL, PERSPECTIVE u otkrivanju ofanzivnog mjesta (12. mjesta) i BERT-a u kategoriji (11. mjesta). Glavni doprinos ovog papira je procjena dvije jake osnovne linije za identifikaciju (PERSPECTIVE) i kategorizaciju ofanzivnog jezika bez manjih ili bez dodatnih podataka o obuci.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert de toepassing van twee sterke basissystemen voor toxiciteitsdetectie en evalueert hun prestaties bij het identificeren en categoriseren van aanstootgevende taal in sociale media. PERSPECTIVE is een API, die meerdere machine learning modellen dient voor het verbeteren van online gesprekken, evenals een toxiciteitsdetectiesysteem, getraind op een breed scala aan opmerkingen van platforms over het internet. BERT is een recent populair taalrepresentatiemodel, verfijnd per taak en bereikt state-of-the-art prestaties in meerdere NLP-taken. PERSPECTIVE presteerde beter dan BERT in het detecteren van toxiciteit, maar BERT was veel beter in het categoriseren van het offensieve type. Beide baselines werden verrassend hoog gerangschikt in de SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL competitie, PERSPECTIEF in het detecteren van een offensieve post (12e) en BERT in het categoriseren ervan (11e). De belangrijkste bijdrage van dit artikel is de beoordeling van twee sterke basislijnen voor de identificatie (PERSPECTIEF) en de categorisering (BERT) van offensieve taal met weinig of geen aanvullende trainingsgegevens.', 'id': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan aplikasi dua sistem dasar yang kuat untuk deteksi toksicitas dan mengevaluasi prestasi mereka dalam mengidentifikasi dan kategorisasi bahasa offensive dalam media sosial. PERSPEKTIVE adalah API, yang melayani beberapa model mesin belajar untuk meningkatkan percakapan online, serta sistem deteksi toksicitas, dilatih pada berbagai komentar dari platform di seluruh Internet. BERT adalah model representation bahasa yang baru-baru ini populer, disesuaikan dengan baik per tugas dan mencapai prestasi seni terbaik dalam beberapa tugas NLP. PERSPEKTIVE berhasil lebih baik dari BERT dalam mendeteksi toksicitas, tapi BERT jauh lebih baik dalam kategorisasi tipe offensive. Kedua garis dasar tertinggi secara mengejutkan dalam kompetisi SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL, PERSPECTIVE dalam mendeteksi pos offensive (ke-12) dan BERT dalam kategorisasinya (ke-11). Kontribusi utama dari kertas ini adalah penilaian dua garis dasar yang kuat untuk identifikasi (PERSPEKTIVE) dan kategorisasi (BERT) bahasa offensive dengan sedikit atau tidak ada data pelatihan tambahan.', 'ko': '본고는 독성 검출에 사용되는 두 개의 강력한 기선 시스템의 응용을 소개하고 소셜 미디어를 식별하고 분류하는 데 공격적인 언어의 성능을 평가했다.PERSPECTIVE는 온라인 대화를 개선하기 위한 다양한 머신러닝 모델을 제공하는 API로, 인터넷 플랫폼에서 나온 다양한 리뷰에 따라 교육된다.BERT는 최근 유행하는 언어 표현 모델로 각 임무에 대해 미세하게 조정하였으며 여러 NLP 임무 중 가장 선진적인 성능을 실현하였다.PERSPECTIVE는 독성 검출이 BERT보다 우수하지만, BERT는 공격성 유형을 분류하는 데는 훨씬 낫다.두 베이스라인은 SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL 경기에서 예상 외로 높은 순위를 기록했고, 공격성 게시물 발견 부문에서는 12위, 분류 부문에서는 11위를 차지했다.본고의 주요 공헌은 추가 훈련 데이터가 거의 없거나 거의 없는 상황에서 공격적 언어식별(투시)과 분류(BERT)의 두 가지 강력한 기선을 평가하는 데 있다.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit stellt die Anwendung zweier starker Basissysteme zur Toxizitätserkennung vor und bewertet deren Leistungsfähigkeit bei der Identifizierung und Kategorisierung von offensiver Sprache in sozialen Medien. PERSPECTIVE ist eine API, die mehrere maschinelle Lernmodelle zur Verbesserung von Online-Konversationen dient, sowie ein Toxizitätserkennungssystem, das auf einer Vielzahl von Kommentaren von Plattformen im Internet trainiert wird. BERT ist ein seit Kurzem beliebtes Sprachrepräsentationsmodell, das pro Aufgabe fein abgestimmt ist und eine State-of-the-Art-Leistung in mehreren NLP-Aufgaben erreicht. PERSPECTIVE zeigte eine bessere Toxizität als BERT, aber BERT war viel besser in der Kategorisierung des offensiven Typs. Beide Baselines waren überraschend hoch im SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL Wettbewerb, PERSPEKTIVE in der Erkennung eines offensiven Posten (12) und BERT in der Kategorisierung (11). Der Hauptbeitrag dieser Arbeit ist die Bewertung zweier starker Baselines für die Identifizierung (PERSPEKTIVE) und die Kategorisierung (BERT) offensiver Sprache mit wenig oder gar keinen zusätzlichen Trainingsdaten.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ کاربرد دو سیستم بنیادی قوی برای شناسایی سمی را نشان می دهد و عملکرد آنها را در شناسایی و برگزیدن زبان نافرمانی در رسانه های اجتماعی ارزیابی می کند. PERSPECTIVE یک API است که مدل یادگیری چندین ماشین را برای بهترین گفتگوهای آنلاین، و سیستم شناسایی سمی، به طریق مشاهده\u200cهای مختلف از پترافات در اینترنت آموزش می\u200cدهد. BERT یک مدل نمایش زبان شناخته شده اخیرا است، که در هر کاری خوب تنظیم شده و به رسیدن وضعیت عملکرد هنری در کار های زیادی NLP است. PERSPECTIVE بهتر از BERT در کشف سمی انجام داد، ولی BERT خیلی بهتر بود در تقسیم نوع تجاوز. در مسابقه SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL، PERSPECTIVE در detecting a offensive post (12th) and BERT in categorizing it (11th). اعضای اصلی این کاغذ ارزیابی دو خط بنیادی قوی برای شناسایی (PERSPECTIVE) و تقسیم کردن (BERT) زبان فساد با کمی یا بدون داده های آموزش اضافه است.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaonyesha matumizi ya mifumo miwili yenye nguvu ya msingi kwa ajili ya kutambua ukosoaji na kutathmini utendaji wao katika kutambua na kugawanya lugha ya matusi katika mitandao ya kijamii. PERSPECTIVE ni API, ambalo hutumia mifano mingi ya kujifunza mashine kwa ajili ya kuboresha mazungumzo ya mtandaoni, pamoja na mfumo wa kutambua vibaya, umefundishwa kwa maoni mbalimbali kutoka majukwaa ya mtandaoni kote. BERT ni muundo maarufu wa uwakilishi wa lugha za hivi karibuni, unaofanywa vizuri kwa kazi na kupata hali ya utendaji wa sanaa katika kazi nyingi za NLP. PERSPECTIVE ilifanya vizuri zaidi ya BERT katika kutambua sumu, lakini BERT ilikuwa bora zaidi katika kugawanya aina ya matusi. Vyote viwili vilikuwa vyeo vya kushangaza sana katika mashindano ya SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL, PERSPECTIVE katika kugundua makala ya mashambulizi (12) na BERT katika kugawanya (11). Mchango mkuu wa gazeti hili ni tathmini ya misingi miwili yenye nguvu kwa kutambua (PERSPECTIVE) na utofauti wa lugha ya uchochezi (BERT) kwa kiasi kidogo au hakuna taarifa za mafunzo ya ziada.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel die toepassing van twee sterke basislingsstelsels voor toksikiteit-opdekking en evalueer hulle prestasie in die identifiseer en kategoriseer van offensivele taal in sosiale media. PERSPECTIVE is 'n API, wat veelvuldige masjien leer modele dien vir die verbetering van gesprekke online, asook 'n toksikiteit beskrywing stelsel, onderwerp op 'n wyde verskillende kommentaar van platforme oor die Internet. BERT is 'n onlangs populêre taal voorstelling model, fyn geïnstalleer per taak en toegang van die kunstenprestasie in veelvuldige NLP taak. PERSPECTIVE beter as BERT uitgevoer het in bespeur van toksiciteit, maar BERT was baie beter in kategoriseer die offensive tipe. Beide basisline is verwonderbaar hoog in die SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL-medelyk, PERSPECTIVE in die bespeur van 'n offensiv post (12th) en BERT in die kategoriseering van dit (11th). Die hoofbydrang van hierdie papier is die vurdering van twee sterke basisline vir die identifikasie (PERSPECTIVE) en die kategoriseering (BERT) van offensivele taal met klein of geen addisionele onderwerking data.", 'tr': "Bu kagyz toksik tanamak üçin iki güýçli baz sistemalaryň uygulamasyny görkezýär we sosyal medýýatlarda hasaplanýar we çykyşlyklaryny çykarýar. PERSPECTIVE internetden çykyşlary gelişmek üçin birnäçe maşyny öwrenmek nusgalaryny we toksiýet tanyş sistemi üçin servet edýär. BERT iň ýakynda meşhur dil temsilleme nusgasy. Görevlerde näçe NLP işinde sungat eserlerini ýetişdirýär. PERSPECTIVE toksik tanamak üçin BERT'den gowy etdi ýöne, emma BERT hili faýly kategoriýasynda has gowydy. SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL ýaryşygynda hem esasy hatlaryň ýokary derejesi ýokarynda döredildi, PERSPECTIVE offensive posty (12-nji) we BERT taýýarlamak üçin (11-nji). Bu kagyzyň esasy täsiri - PERSPECTIVE (PERSPECTIVE) we beýleki sözlerin (BERT) sanatynyň kiçi ýada başga bir bilim maglumaty ýok iki güýçli temel hatlarynyň çykarmadyr.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet aplikimin e dy sistemeve bazë të forta për zbulimin e toksicitetit dhe vlerëson performancën e tyre në identifikimin dhe kategorizimin e gjuhës ofensive në media sociale. PERSPECTIVE është një API, që shërben modele të shumta mësimi makinash për përmirësimin e bisedimeve në internet si dhe një sistem zbulimi toksike, i trajnuar në një varietet të gjerë komentesh nga platforma anembanë internetit. BERT është një model i njohur për përfaqësimin e gjuhës së fundit, i rregulluar mirë për çdo detyrë dhe arritje e shfaqjes së lartë në detyra të shumta NLP. PERSPECTIVE performed better than BERT in detecting toxicity, but BERT was much better in categorizing the offensive type.  Të dy linjat bazë u renditën befasueshëm të larta në konkurrimin SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL, PERSPECTIVE në zbulimin e një posti ofensiv (12) dhe BERT në kategorizimin e tij (11). Kontributi kryesor i këtij dokumenti është vlerësimi i dy linjave bazë të forta për identifikimin (PERSPECTIVE) dhe kategorizimin (BERT) e gjuhës ofensive me pak apo pa të dhëna shtesë trainimi.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է թունավորության հայտնաբերման երկու ուժեղ հիմնական համակարգերի կիրառումը և գնահատում է նրանց արտադրողությունը սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում հայտնաբերելու և դասակարգելու համար: ՊարSPEկտիվ է API-ը, որը ծառայում է բազմաթիվ մեքենային սովորելու մոդելներ ինտերնետային խոսակցությունների բարելավման համար, ինչպես նաև թունավորության հայտնաբերման համակարգ, որոնք պատրաստված են ինտերնետի տարբեր պլատֆորմերի բազմաթիվ մեկնաբանություններ BER-ը վերջերս հայտնի լեզվի ներկայացման մոդել է, որն ամեն խնդիր հատուկ է, և որն ունի նորագույն արտադրողականություն բազմաթիվ ՆԼՊ-ի խնդիրներում: PERSPECTIVE performed better than BERT in detecting toxicity, but BERT was much better in categorizing the offensive type.  Երկու հիմքային գծերը զարմանալիորեն բարձր էին դասակարգում SEMWEVL-2019 OFFeNSEFALL մրցակցության ժամանակ, անտեսելիորեն հայտնաբերելով մեկ անդամ (12-րդ) և ԲԵՌթը դասակարգում այն (11-րդ). Այս թղթի հիմնական ներդրումն այն է, որ երկու ուժեղ հիմքային գծեր են գնահատվում, որպեսզի սահմանափակված լեզվի բացահայտումը (ՊԵՍպեկտիվ) և բացահայտումը (BER) լինի, որպեսզի ոչ մի քիչ կամ ոչ ավելացված ուսու', 'az': "Bu kağıt zehirli tanıtmaq üçün iki güclü temel sistemlərin uyğulanmasını göstərir və sosyal medya dillərini tanıtmaq və kategoriyalarında onların performanslarını değerləşdirir. PERSPECTIVE, internetdən çoxlu maşın öyrənmə modelləri ilə müzakirə etmək üçün çoxlu maşın modelləri və toxicit keşf sistemi ilə istifadə edir. BERT yenidən məşhur dil göstəricisi modelidir, hər işin təmizlənməsi və müxtəlif NLP işlərində sanat performansının vəziyyətini başa çatması. PERSPECTIVE BERT'dan daha yaxşı təhsil etdi, amma BERT həddi aşmaq üçün daha yaxşı təhsil etdi. İkisi səhifələr SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL müqayisədə təəccüblü yüksək səhifələrdə, PERSPECTIVE təcavüzlü bir mətn (12-ci) və BERT (11-ci) kategoriya çəkildi. Bu kağızın ən böyük qisməti, kiçik və yaxşılıq təhsil məlumatları olmayan iki güclü təhsil səhifələrinin ölçüsüdür.", 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም የሁለት ኃይለኛ መሠረት ስርዓቶችን ለማግኘት እና በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ውስጥ የሚያስጨንቃዊ ቋንቋን ለማግኘት እና በማደጋጋጋጀት የሥርዓታቸውን ድምፅ ያሳያል፡፡ PERSPECTIVE፣ የኢንተርኔት ድረ-ገጾችን ለማሻሻል እና የጥቁር ግንኙነትን ለማድረግ እና በጋዜጠኞች ላይ በተለየ የጦማር ማህበረሰብ ላይ በተለየ ትምህርት ማድረግ ብዙዎችን የሞክራዊ ምርጫዎችን የሚያገለግል API ነው፡፡ BERT በአሁኑ ጊዜ የቋንቋ አካባቢ ምሳሌ ነው፣ ለስራ የተለየ መልካም እና የአርጤክስ ድረ ገጽ በብዙ NLP ስራ ውስጥ የሚያደርገው ነው፡፡ የPERSPECTIVE ብሬት በጥቃት ማግኘት የሚሻል ነው፤ ነገር ግን BERT በዓመፀኛው ዓይነት በመለያየት ይሻላል፡፡ በSEMEVAL-2019 የኦፊፍENSEVAL ትምህርት ውስጥ ሁለቱ መቀመጫዎች የበረታች ናቸው፡፡ የዚህ ደብዳቤ ዋጋ አዋጅ የሁለት ብርቱ መሠረት (PERSPECTIVE) እና የክፋት ቋንቋ (BERT) ታናሽ ወይም የበዛ ማህበረሰብ ዳታ ሳይኖር ማሰናከል ነው፡፡', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja primjenu dva jakog početnog sustava za otkrivanje toksičnosti i procjenjuje njihovu učinku u identifikaciji i kategoriji ofanzivnog jezika u društvenim medijima. PERSPECTIVE je API, koji služi višestrukim modelima učenja mašina za poboljšanje razgovora na internetu, kao i sustav otkrivanja toksičnosti, obučen na raznim različitim komentarima iz platformi širom interneta. BERT je nedavno popularni model predstavljanja jezika, fino određen po zadatku i ostvarivanje stanja učinka umjetnosti u višestrukim NLP zadatkima. PERSPECTIVE je proveo bolje od BERT u otkrivanju toksičnosti, ali BERT je bio mnogo bolji u kategoriji ofanzivnog tipa. Obje osnovne linije su iznenađujuće visoke u konkurenciji SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL, PERSPECTIVE u otkrivanju ofanzivnog mjesta (12. i BERT) u kategoriji (11. godine). Glavni doprinos ovog papira je procjena dva jake osnovne linije za identifikaciju (PERSPECTIVE) i kategoriju ofanzivnog jezika bez manjih ili bez dodatnih podataka o obuci.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা দুটি শক্তিশালী বেসাইটলাইন সিস্টেমের প্রযোজ্য উপস্থাপন করেছে ব্যথা সনাক্ত করার জন্য এবং সামাজিক মিডিয়াতে আক্রমণ ভ পের্সপেক্টিভ একটি এপিআই, যা অনলাইনে কথোপকথন উন্নতির জন্য বেশ কিছু মেশিন শিক্ষা মডেল সার্ভার করে এবং ইন্টারনেটের সারা প্ল্যাটফর্ম থেকে বিভিন্ন মন্তব্যের প বেরেটি সম্প্রতি জনপ্রিয় ভাষার প্রতিনিধিত্বের মডেল, প্রতি কাজের জন্য সুন্দর ভাষা এবং বেশ কয়েকটি এনএলপি কাজের শিল্প প প্রদর পের্সপেক্টিভ বের্টের চেয়ে ভালো কাজ করেছেন ব্যাক্সিকি খুঁজে বেরেট কিন্তু আক্রান্ত ধরনের আক্রমণের বিভাগে বিভাগের ভ সেমেভাল-২০১৯ সালের অফেনেভাল প্রতিযোগিতায় দুটি বেসার লাইন বিস্ময়কর ভাবে উচ্চতা হয়েছিল, পের্সেকেটিভ একটি আক্রমণ পোস্ট (১২) এবং বের্ট বিভাগের বিভাগে ব The main contribution of this paper is the assessment of two strong baselines for the identification (PERSPECTIVE) and the categorization (BERT) of offensive language with little or no additional training data.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään kahden vahvan lähtötason järjestelmän soveltaminen myrkyllisyyden havaitsemiseen ja arvioidaan niiden suorituskykyä loukkaavan kielen tunnistamisessa ja luokittelussa sosiaalisessa mediassa. PERSPECTIVE on sovellusliittymä, joka palvelee useita koneoppimismalleja verkkokeskustelujen parantamiseksi, sekä myrkyllisyyden tunnistusjärjestelmä, joka on koulutettu monenlaisiin kommentteihin eri alustoilta Internetissä. BERT on hiljattain suosittu kieliedustusmalli, joka on hienosäädetty tehtäväkohtaisesti ja saavuttaa huipputason suorituskykyä useissa NLP-tehtävissä. PERSPECTIVE suoriutui paremmin kuin BERT myrkyllisyyden havaitsemisessa, mutta BERT oli paljon parempi loukkaavan tyypin luokittelussa. Molemmat lähtölinjat sijoittuivat yllättävän korkealle SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL-kilpailussa, PERSPEKTIIVINEN hyökkäävän postin havaitsemisessa (12) ja BERT sen luokittelussa (11). Tämän artikkelin tärkein panos on kahden vahvan lähtökohdan arviointi loukkaavan kielen tunnistamiselle (PERSPEKTIVI) ja luokittelulle (BERT) vähäisillä tai olemattomilla koulutustiedoilla.', 'cs': 'Tento článek prezentuje aplikaci dvou silných základních systémů pro detekci toxicity a hodnotí jejich výkonnost při identifikaci a kategorizaci urážlivého jazyka v sociálních médiích. PERSPECTIVE je API, které slouží více modelů strojového učení pro zlepšení konverzací online, stejně jako systém detekce toxicity, trénovaný na široké škále komentářů z platforem po celém internetu. BERT je v poslední době populární model reprezentace jazyka, jemně vyladěný na úkol a dosahuje nejmodernějšího výkonu v několika úkolech NLP. Při detekci toxicity byl PERSPECTIVE lepší než BERT, ale BERT byl mnohem lepší v kategorizaci útočného typu. Obě základní linie byly v soutěži SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL překvapivě vysoko umístěny, PERSPEKTIVE v odhalování útočného postu (12th) a BERT v kategorizaci (11th). Hlavním příspěvkem tohoto článku je zhodnocení dvou silných základních linií pro identifikaci (PERSPECTIVE) a kategorizaci (BERT) urážlivého jazyka s malými nebo žádnými dalšími tréninkovými údaji.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustatakse kahe tugeva lähtesüsteemi rakendamist toksilisuse tuvastamiseks ja hinnatakse nende tulemuslikkust solvava keele tuvastamisel ja kategoriseerimisel sotsiaalmeedias. PERSPECTIVE on API, mis teenindab mitmeid masinõppe mudeleid internetivestluste parandamiseks, samuti toksilisuse tuvastamise süsteemi, mis on koolitatud paljude platvormide kommentaaride põhjal kogu Internetis. BERT on hiljuti populaarne keeleesindusmudel, mida peenestatakse ülesannete kaupa ja saavutatakse tipptasemel jõudlus mitmes NLP ülesandes. PERSPECTIVE oli mürgisuse tuvastamisel parem kui BERT, kuid BERT oli palju parem ründava tüübi kategooriates. Mõlemad lähtejooned olid üllatavalt kõrged SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL võistlusel, PERSPEKTIIVSED ründava posti avastamisel (12) ja BERT selle kategooriates (11). Käesoleva töö peamine panus on kahe tugeva lähtejoone hindamine solvava keele identifitseerimiseks (PERSPEKTIVNE) ja kategoriseerimiseks (BERT) vähe või puuduvad täiendavad koolitusandmed.', 'ca': "Aquest paper presenta l'aplicació de dos sistemes basals forts de detecció de toxicitat i evalua el seu rendiment en identificar i categoritzar el llenguatge ofensiu als mitjans socials. PERSPECTIVE és una API, que serveix múltiples models d'aprenentatge màquinari per millorar les converses en línia, i un sistema de detecció de toxicitat, entrenat en una gran varietat de comentaris de plataformes a través d'Internet. BERT és un model de representació de llenguatges popular recentment, ajustad fins per tasca i aconseguint el rendiment més avançat en múltiples tasques de NLP. PERSPECTIVE va fer millor que BERT en detectar toxicitat, però BERT va ser molt millor en categoritzar el tipus ofensiu. Ambdues línies de base estaven sorprenentment elevates en la competició OFFENSEVAL SEMEVAL-2019, PERSPECTIVE en detectar un post ofensiv (12ª) i BERT en categoritzar-lo (11ª). La principal contribució d'aquest paper és la valoració de dues línies de base fortes per la identificació (PERSPECTIVE) i la categorització (BERT) del llenguatge ofensiu amb poca o sense dades adicionals de formació.", 'jv': 'Awak iki nambah aplikasi sistem sing paling awak dhéwé kanggo ngerasakno kang nggunaké kesempatan karo nggawe barang nggawe gerakan kanggo ngilangno karo kategori sing perusahaan banget kanggo media sotiki. PArsPATTIVE iku Api, sing paling pengguna sistem sing sampeyan karo sistem sing nggawe tarjamahan karo penting, lan uga sistem detection toksisa sing, terus akeh sistem sing sampeyan karo permanian sing kalaayuga Komentar menyang karo Internet. BERT kuwi model sing paling populer banget, sampeyan nggawe paling nggawe gerakan sampeyan karo iso nggawe barang kanggo tukang cara nggawe NLP siji maneh. PerPLETIVE sing luwih luwih tenan karo BERT nggawe tok sing luwih hayo, nek BERT kuwi luwih apik sing luwih apik kategorisi dipun. Awak dhéwé éntuk sing ditambah sabên luwih dumadhi ngono seketeksi SEMEWAL-2011 OFHEN-SVANG sawar it éwé, perangkat-PêrspetIVE kanggo ntêpakan ipo perusahaan (12) lan BERT iso nggawe kategori (11th). Ngubah penting nggunaké pepulan iki dadi tanggal dhéwé sing luwih basa sing gawe nguasai (BERT) lan kelgoraké awak dhéwé, ingkang dipunangé awak dhéwé.', 'ha': "This paper presents the application of two strong baseline systems for toxicity detection and evaluates their performance in identifying and categorizing offensive language in social media.  PARSPAKTIV yana da wata ANI, mai amfani da misãlai masu ƙaranci masu ƙaranci ga gyãra wa mazaɓa masu haɗi a Online, da kuma an sanar da shi na zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane masu bakin Intanet. BERT wata motel ne mai popular maganar harshen, mai kyau tuned a kowace aikin kuma mai sãmun state of the art performance in wasu aikin NLP. QUnicodeControlCharacter Dukan layin biyu was ranked mai bãyar da sha'awa a cikin competitin SMEval-2019 OFFENCEV, PARSPAKTIV a kan gane wani makala (12th) da BERT cikin categorizinsa (11th). Bayan aikin wannan takarda yana ƙaddara misalin biyu masu ƙarfi wa shaidar (PARSPAKTIV) da categorization (BERT) wa lugha turɓãya da ƙarami ko kuma ba da data na ƙaranci ba.", 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציגה את ההשתמשות של שתי מערכות בסיסיות חזקות לגילוי רעילות ולעריך את ביצועיהם בזיהוי וקטגוריזציה של שפה פוגעת בתקשורת חברתית. PERSPECTIVE הוא API, שמשרה דוגמנים רבים של למידה מכונות לשיפור של שיחות באינטרנט, כמו גם מערכת גילוי רעילות, מאומנת על מגוון רחב של תגובות מפלטפורמות ברחבי האינטרנט. BERT הוא מודל מייצג שפת פופולרי לאחרונה, מתאים לכל משימה ולהשיג ביצוע מוקדם במספר משימות NLP. פרספקטיב ביצע טוב יותר מברט בלגלות רעילות, אבל ברט היה הרבה יותר טוב בהקלטוריה של הטיפוס המתקף. שני קווי הבסיס הוצבו גבוהים באופן מפתיע בתחרות סמיוול-2019 OFFENSEVAL, PERSPECTIVE בלגלות פוסט פגיעה (12) וברט בהקלטה אותו (11). התרומה העיקרית של הנייר הזה היא הערכה של שני קווי בסיס חזקים לזיהוי (PERSPECTIVE) והקטגוריזציה (BERT) של שפה פגיעה עם מעט או בלי נתונים אימונים נוספים.', 'sk': 'Prispevek predstavlja uporabo dveh močnih osnovnih sistemov za odkrivanje toksičnosti in ocenjuje njihovo učinkovitost pri prepoznavanju in kategorizaciji žaljivega jezika v družbenih omrežjih. PERSPECTIVE je API, ki služi več modelov strojnega učenja za izboljšanje spletnih pogovorov, kot tudi sistem za odkrivanje toksičnosti, usposobljen za široko paleto komentarjev platform po vsem internetu. BERT je nedavno priljubljen jezikovni model reprezentacije, ki je natančno nastavljen na nalogo in dosega najsodobnejše zmogljivosti pri več nalogah NLP. PERSPECTIVE je bil boljši od BERT pri odkrivanju toksičnosti, BERT pa je bil veliko boljši pri kategorizaciji žaljivega tipa. Obe izhodiščni liniji sta bili na tekmovanju SEMEVAL-2019 presenetljivo visoko uvrščeni, PERSPEKTIVNI pri odkrivanju napadalne točke (12.) in BERT pri kategorizaciji (11.). Glavni prispevek tega prispevka je ocena dveh močnih osnovnih linij za identifikacijo (PERSPECTIVE) in kategorizacijo (BERT) žaljivega jezika z malo ali nič dodatnih podatkov o usposabljanju.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་གསལ་བཤད་ནུས་མཐའ་དབུགས་རིས་ལ་ཉེན་རིགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཉེན་སྤྱོད་རྒྱུ་དང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་ས PERSPECTIVE ནི་API ཞིག་ཡིན། དེ་ནི་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་སློབ་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ནང་གི་མཐོ་རྐྱེན་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཚད་མང་ཙམ་ཡོད། བློ་གཏོང་དང་toxicity detection system་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་ལ་རང BERT ནི་ཉེ་ཆར་བར་ཆེ་བའི་སྐད PERSPECTIVE toxicit་དང་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བའི་BERT་ལས་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་བྱེད་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། BERT་ནི་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་རིགས SEMEVAL-2019 OFFENSEVAL འཇུག་སྡེར་གྱི་གཞི་རྟེན་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐའ་འཁོར་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། PERSPECTIVE དེ་ཚོར་བ་ཡིན་གྱི་ཤོག་བྱས་ཟིན་བྲིས་བསམ་ཞིག ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་རྩ་བའི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡིག་ཆ་ནི་ངོ་མ་བཀལ་བའི་གཞི་རྟེན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་ཞིབ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'DeepAnalyzer at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : A deep learning-based ensemble method for identifying offensive tweets', 'ar': 'DeepAnalyzer في SemEval-2019 المهمة 6: طريقة تجميع قائمة على التعلم العميق لتحديد التغريدات المسيئة', 'pt': 'DeepAnalyzer no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Um método de conjunto baseado em aprendizado profundo para identificar tweets ofensivos', 'fr': "DeepAnalyzer à SemEval-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: Une méthode d'ensemble basée sur le deep learning pour identifier les tweets offensants", 'es': 'DeepAnalyzer en la Tarea 6 de SemEval-2019: Un método de conjunto basado en el aprendizaje profundo para identificar tuits ofensivos', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のDeepAnalyzerタスク6 ：不快なツイートを識別するためのディープラーニングベースのアンサンブルメソッド', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 टास्क 6 पर DeepAnalyzer: आक्रामक ट्वीट्स की पहचान करने के लिए एक गहरी सीखने-आधारित पहनावा विधि', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019务6DeepAnalyzer:一基于深学之集成方法,以识可感之推文', 'ru': 'DeepAnalyzer на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Ансамблевый метод на основе глубокого обучения для идентификации оскорбительных твитов', 'ga': 'DeepAnalyzer ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Modh ensemble domhainfhoghlaim-bhunaithe chun tweets maslacha a aithint', 'el': 'Εργασία 6: Μια μέθοδος συνόλου βασισμένη στη βαθιά μάθηση για τον εντοπισμό προσβλητικών tweets', 'ka': 'DeepAnalyzer at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A deep learning-based ensemble method for identifying offensive tweets', 'hu': 'DeepAnalyzer a SemEval-2019 6. feladat: Mélytanuláson alapuló együttes módszer a sértő tweetek azonosítására', 'it': "DeepAnalyzer a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Un metodo di ensemble basato sull'apprendimento profondo per identificare tweet offensivi", 'kk': 'Қалыпты Analyzer at semiEval-2019 Task 6: A deep learning-based ensemble method for identifying offensive tweets', 'lt': 'DeepAnalyzer at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A deep learning-based ensemble method for identifying offensive tweets', 'mk': 'DeepAnalyzer на SemEval-2019 задача 6: Метод на ансембл заснован на длабоко учење за идентификување на офанзивни твитови', 'ms': 'Penganalisis Dalam SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Kaedah ensemble berdasarkan belajar dalam untuk mengenalpasti tweet serangan', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6-ല്\u200d ആഴത്തിലെ അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നവന്\u200d: ആക്രമിക്കുന്ന ടൂട്ടുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിന് ഒരു ആഴത്തി', 'mt': 'Analizzatur fil-fond f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6: Metodu ta’ ensemble ibbażat fuq tagħlim fil-fond għall-identifikazzjoni ta’ tweets offensivi', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Task 6: Гүн гүнзгий шинжилгээчийн арга барилгыг олох', 'pl': 'DeepAnalyzer w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 6: metoda zespołu oparta na głębokim uczeniu do identyfikacji obraźliwych tweetów', 'no': 'DeepAnalyser på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 6: ein dyp læringsbasert ensemblemmetode for identifisering av offensiv tweet', 'ro': 'DeepAnalyzer la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: O metodă de ansamblu bazată pe învățare profundă pentru identificarea tweeturilor ofensatoare', 'sr': 'DeepAnalyzer na semiEval-2019 Task 6: Duboka metoda osnovana na učenju za identifikaciju ofanzivnih tweeta', 'sv': 'DeepAnalyzer på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: En djupinlärningsbaserad ensemblemetod för att identifiera stötande tweets', 'si': 'DeepExaminer at HalfEvel-2019 Job 6: A depth learning-based ensEmble way for ID of an aggressive tweets', 'so': 'Shaqo 6:', 'ta': 'ஆழமான Analyzer at SemEval- 2019 Task 6: A deep learning- based ensemble method for identifying aggressive tweets', 'ur': 'SemEval-2019 ٹاکس 6 میں عمیق تحلیل کرنے والا: ایک عمیق سیکھنے کی بنیاد اسامبل طریقہ پہچان کرنے کے لئے', 'uz': 'Vazifani 6', 'vi': 'Deepcore ở SemEvl-209 Task 6: Một phương pháp kết hợp dựa vào học sâu để nhận diện tweets.', 'bg': 'Задача 6: Основан на дълбоко обучение ансамбъл метод за идентифициране на обидни туитове', 'da': 'DeepAnalyzer på SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: En dyb læringsbaseret ensemble metode til at identificere offensive tweets', 'hr': 'DeepAnalyzer na zadatku 6: Duboka metoda osnovana na učenju za identifikaciju ofanzivnih tweeta', 'nl': 'DeepAnalyzer bij SemEval-2019 Taak 6: Een deep learning-gebaseerde ensemblemethode voor het identificeren van aanstootgevende tweets', 'de': 'DeepAnalyzer bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 6: Eine deep learning-basierte Ensemblemethode zur Identifizierung offensiver Tweets', 'id': 'DeepAnalyzer di SemEval-2019 Task 6: Sebuah metode ensemble berdasarkan belajar dalam untuk mengidentifikasi tweet offensive', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019 퀘스트 6의 DeepAnalyzer: 공격적인 트윗을 식별하는 깊이 있는 학습 기반의 통합 방법', 'fa': 'Analyzer DeepAnalyzer at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A deep learning-based ensemble method for identifying offensive tweets', 'sw': 'Mchambuzi wa kina katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 6: Utawala wa kujifunza kwa kina zaidi kwa kutambua twiti za mashambulizi', 'tr': 'DeepAnalyzer at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A deep learning-based ensemble method for identifying offensive tweets', 'sq': 'DeepAnalyzer at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A deep learning-based ensemble method for identifying offensive tweets', 'am': 'ጠለቅ Analyzer በSemEval-2019 ስራ 6: የጥልቅ ትምህርት መሠረት የተመሳሳይ ትዊተሮችን ለማግኘት', 'hy': 'DeepAnalyzer at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A deep learning-based ensemble method for identifying offensive tweets', 'az': "SemEval-2019 Task 6'da DeepAnalyzer", 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের ৬-এ গভীর বিশ্লেষক: আক্রমণের টুইট চিহ্নিত করার জন্য গভীর শিক্ষা ভিত্তিক বিশ্লেষক', 'bs': 'DeepAnalyzer na semiEval-2019 Task 6: Duboka metoda osnovana na učenju za identifikaciju ofanzivnih tweeta', 'ca': "DeepAnalyzer a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Un mètode d'ensemble profund basat en l'aprenentatge per identificar tweets ofensius", 'et': 'Sügavanalüsaator SemEval-2019 ülesanne 6: sügavõppel põhinev ansambli meetod solvavate säutsude tuvastamiseks', 'cs': 'Úkol 6: Souborová metoda založená na hlubokém učení pro identifikaci urážlivých tweetů', 'fi': 'DeepAnalyzer SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 6: Syväoppimiseen perustuva ryhmämenetelmä loukkaavien twiittien tunnistamiseen', 'af': "DeepAnalyseer by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 6: ' n diep leer-gebaseerde ensembleem metode vir identifiseer offensivele tweets", 'jv': 'deep', 'sk': 'DeepAnalyzer na SemEval-2019 Naloga 6: metoda skupine, ki temelji na globokem učenju, za prepoznavanje žaljivih tweetov', 'ha': 'DeptAnalyser at SemEal-2019 Tafiyar 6: A jidar da aka sanar da duhu a kan iya gane jeriya', 'he': 'Analyzer עמוק ב SemEval-2019 משימה 6: שיטת אנסמבל עמוקה מבוססת ללמוד לזהות טוויטים פגיעים', 'bo': 'DeepAnalyzer at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A deep learning-based ensemble method for identifying offensive tweets'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the system we developed for SemEval 2019 on Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval-Task 6). The task focuses on offensive language in tweets. It is organized into three sub-tasks for offensive language identification ; automatic categorization of offense types and offense target identification. The approach for the first subtask is a deep learning-based ensemble method which uses a Bidirectional LSTM Recurrent Neural Network and a Convolutional Neural Network. Additionally we use the information from part-of-speech tagging of tweets for target identification and combine previous results for categorization of offense types.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة النظام الذي قمنا بتطويره لـ SemEval 2019 حول تحديد وتصنيف اللغة الهجومية في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي (OffensEval - Task 6). تركز المهمة على اللغة الهجومية في التغريدات. يتم تنظيمه في ثلاث مهام فرعية لتحديد اللغة الهجومية ؛ التصنيف التلقائي لأنواع الجرائم وتحديد هدف الجريمة. نهج المهمة الفرعية الأولى هو طريقة مجموعة قائمة على التعلم العميق تستخدم شبكة عصبية متكررة LSTM ثنائية الاتجاه وشبكة عصبية تلافيفية. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نستخدم المعلومات من علامات جزء من الكلام في التغريدات لتحديد الهدف ودمج النتائج السابقة لتصنيف أنواع الجرائم.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le système que nous avons développé pour SemEval 2019 sur l'identification et la catégorisation du langage offensant dans les médias sociaux (OffenseVal - Tâche 6). La tâche se concentre sur le langage offensant dans les tweets. Il est organisé en trois sous-tâches pour l'identification du langage offensant\xa0: la catégorisation automatique des types d'infractions et l'identification de la cible de l'infraction. L'approche de la première sous-tâche est une méthode d'ensemble basée sur l'apprentissage profond qui utilise un réseau neuronal récurrent LSTM bidirectionnel et un réseau de neurones convolutifs. De plus, nous utilisons les informations issues du balisage des parties du discours des tweets pour identifier la cible et combinons les résultats précédents pour la catégorisation des types d'infractions.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve o sistema que desenvolvemos para o SemEval 2019 sobre Identificação e categorização de linguagem ofensiva em mídias sociais (OffensEval - Tarefa 6). A tarefa se concentra na linguagem ofensiva nos tweets. Está organizado em três subtarefas para identificação de linguagem ofensiva; categorização automática dos tipos de ofensas e identificação do alvo da ofensa. A abordagem para a primeira subtarefa é um método de conjunto baseado em aprendizado profundo que usa uma Rede Neural Recorrente LSTM Bidirecional e uma Rede Neural Convolucional. Além disso, usamos as informações da marcação de parte do discurso de tweets para identificação do alvo e combinamos resultados anteriores para categorizar os tipos de ofensas.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe el sistema que desarrollamos para SemEval 2019 sobre identificación y categorización del lenguaje ofensivo en las redes sociales (OffensEval - Tarea 6). La tarea se centra en el lenguaje ofensivo en los tuits. Se organiza en tres subtareas para la identificación del lenguaje ofensivo; la categorización automática de los tipos de delitos y la identificación del objetivo del delito. El enfoque para la primera subtarea es un método de conjunto basado en el aprendizaje profundo que utiliza una red neuronal recurrente LSTM bidireccional y una red neuronal convolucional. Además, utilizamos la información del etiquetado parcial del discurso de los tuits para la identificación de objetivos y combinamos los resultados anteriores para la categorización de los tipos de delitos.', 'ja': '本稿では、ソーシャルメディアにおける不快な言語の識別と分類に関するSemEval 2019のために開発したシステム（ OffensEval - Task 6 ）について説明します。このタスクは、ツイートの不快な言葉遣いに焦点を当てています。これは、攻撃的言語の識別のための3つのサブタスク、オフェンスタイプの自動分類とオフェンスターゲットの識別に編成されています。最初のサブタスクのアプローチは、双方向LSTMリカレントニューラルネットワークと畳み込みニューラルネットワークを使用するディープラーニングベースのアンサンブルメソッドです。さらに、ターゲットの識別のためにツイートの一部の音声タグ付けから得られた情報を使用し、違反の種類の分類のために以前の結果を組み合わせます。', 'zh': '本文述SemEval 2019识类社交媒体干言(OffensEval - 务6)。 其任侧重于推文中犯性语。 其为三子,以干性言; 自分类攻类及攻攻。 首务者,深学之成也,用双向LSTM递归神经网络卷积神经网络。 以推文词性识之,合前罪之类也。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर उस प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है जिसे हमने सोशल मीडिया में आक्रामक भाषा की पहचान और वर्गीकरण पर SemEval 2019 के लिए विकसित किया था (OffensEval - कार्य 6)। यह कार्य ट्वीट्स में आपत्तिजनक भाषा पर केंद्रित है। इसे आक्रामक भाषा की पहचान के लिए तीन उप-कार्यों में व्यवस्थित किया जाता है; अपराध प्रकार और अपराध लक्ष्य पहचान का स्वचालित वर्गीकरण। पहले subtask के लिए दृष्टिकोण एक गहरी सीखने आधारित पहनावा विधि है जो एक द्विदिश LSTM आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क और एक Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग करता है। इसके अतिरिक्त, हम लक्ष्य पहचान के लिए ट्वीट्स के पार्ट-ऑफ-स्पीच टैगिंग से जानकारी का उपयोग करते हैं और अपराध प्रकारों के वर्गीकरण के लिए पिछले परिणामों को जोड़ते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается разработанная нами для SemEval 2019 система выявления и классификации оскорбительных слов в социальных сетях (OffensEval - Задача 6). Задача фокусируется на оскорбительном языке в твитах. Он состоит из трех подзадач: идентификация оскорбительного языка; автоматическая категоризация видов правонарушений и идентификация целей правонарушений. Подход для первой подзадачи представляет собой метод ансамбля на основе глубокого обучения, который использует двунаправленную рекуррентную нейронную сеть LSTM и сверточную нейронную сеть. Кроме того, мы используем информацию из тегов части речи твитов для идентификации цели и объединяем предыдущие результаты для классификации типов правонарушений.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcóras a d’fhorbair muid do SemEval 2019 maidir le Teanga Ionsaitheach a Aithint agus a Chatagóiriú sna Meáin Shóisialta (OffensEval - Tasc 6). Díríonn an tasc ar theanga maslach i dtvuíteanna. Tá sé eagraithe i dtrí fhothasc maidir le teanga maslach a aithint; catagóiriú uathoibríoch ar chineálacha cionta agus sainaithint sprice cionta. Is é an cur chuige don chéad fhothasc ná modh ensemble atá bunaithe ar fhoghlaim dhomhain a úsáideann Líonra Néarrach Athfhillteach LSTM Déthreo agus Líonra Néarrach Comhdhlúite. Ina theannta sin bainimid úsáid as an bhfaisnéis ó chlibeáil pháirteach cainte ar thíteanna le haghaidh sainaithint sprice agus le chéile torthaí roimhe seo chun cineálacha cionta a chatagóiriú.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ 2019 წლის SemEval-ის განვითარებული სისტემის განსაზღვრება და კატეგორიზაცია სოციალური მედიაში (OffensEval - Task 6). რაოდენობა გადატანქტირებულ ენაზე tweets-ში. ის სამი სამუშაო საქმედებში განსაზღვრებული ენის ინდიდენტიფიკაციისთვის დავყენება; საცნობების ტიპების და საცნობების მისაღების ინდიდენტიფიკაციის ავტომატური კატეგორიზაცია. პირველი საბეჭირო შესახებ არის ძალიან სწავლების დაბათებული ინსტემბლის მეტი, რომელიც გამოყენებს ორედირექციონალური LSTM განვითარებული ნეიროლური ქსელი და კონგულური ნეირ დამატებით ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ინფორმაციას საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო საუკეთესო ტიპების კატეგორიზ', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2019 számára kifejlesztett rendszert a sértő nyelv azonosítása és kategorizálása a közösségi médiában (OffensEval - 6. feladat). A feladat a tweetek sértő nyelvére összpontosít. A sértő nyelv azonosítására szolgáló három alfeladatra van szervezve; a bűncselekmény típusainak automatikus kategorizálása és a célpont azonosítása. Az első részfeladat megközelítése egy mély tanuláson alapuló együttes módszer, amely kétirányú LSTM ismétlődő ideghálózatot és konvolúciós ideghálózatot használ. Továbbá a tweetek beszédrészes címkézéséből származó információkat a célpont azonosítására használjuk fel, és kombináljuk a korábbi eredményeket a bűncselekmények kategorizálására.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα που αναπτύξαμε για το SemEval 2019 με θέμα τον εντοπισμό και την κατηγοριοποίηση της προσβλητικής γλώσσας στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Το έργο επικεντρώνεται στην προσβλητική γλώσσα στα tweets. Είναι οργανωμένη σε τρεις επιμέρους εργασίες για τον προσδιορισμό προσβλητικής γλώσσας. αυτόματη κατηγοριοποίηση των τύπων παραβίασης και αναγνώριση του στόχου παραβίασης. Η προσέγγιση για την πρώτη υποταγή είναι μια μέθοδος συνόλου βασισμένη στη βαθιά μάθηση που χρησιμοποιεί ένα αμφίδρομο Επαναληπτικό Νευρικό Δίκτυο και ένα Σύλληπτο Νευρικό Δίκτυο. Επιπλέον, χρησιμοποιούμε τις πληροφορίες από τη σήμανση μέρους ομιλίας των tweets για τον προσδιορισμό του στόχου και συνδυάζουμε προηγούμενα αποτελέσματα για την κατηγοριοποίηση των τύπων αδικημάτων.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il sistema sviluppato per SemEval 2019 sull'identificazione e la classificazione del linguaggio offensivo nei social media (OffensEval - Task 6). Il compito si concentra sul linguaggio offensivo nei tweet. È organizzato in tre sottocompiti per l'identificazione offensiva del linguaggio; categorizzazione automatica dei tipi di reato e identificazione del bersaglio di reato. L'approccio per la prima sottomissione è un metodo ensemble basato sull'apprendimento profondo che utilizza una rete neurale ricorrente LSTM bidirezionale e una rete neurale convoluzionale. Inoltre utilizziamo le informazioni provenienti dal tag part-of-speech dei tweet per l'identificazione del target e combiniamo i risultati precedenti per la categorizzazione dei tipi di reato.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma sistema, kurią sukūrėme 2019 m. SemEval dėl žalingos kalbos socialinėje žiniasklaidoje nustatymo ir klasifikavimo (OffensEval - Task 6). Šioje užduotyje daugiausia dėmesio skiriama įžeidžiančiai kalbai tweetuose. Ji suskirstyta į tris užduotis, susijusias su įžeidžiančių kalbų identifikavimu; automatinis nusikaltimų tipų klasifikavimas ir nusikaltimų tikslo nustatymas. Pirmojo paklausos metodas yra gilaus mokymosi pagrindu pagrįstas komplekso metodas, kuriuo naudojamas dvikryptis LSTM pakartotinis neurologinis tinklas ir konvoliucinis neurologinis tinklas. Be to, norint nustatyti tikslus naudojame informaciją, gautą iš tweetų žodžio dalies, ir deriname ankstesnius rezultatus klasifikuojant nusikaltimų tipus.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2019 жылдың жарым Eval үшін жасалған жүйені әлеуметтік медиақтардың көңіл тілді анықтау және санаттарын бағалау жүйесін (OffensEval - 6 тапсырма). Тапсырма tweets тілінде қарсы тіліне назар аударады. Тілді идентификациялау үш ішкі тапсырмалар үшін құрылады. Қате түрлерін автоматты түрде және мақсатты идентификациялау. Бірінші субсұраныстың тәсілі - қайталанатын LSTM қайталанатын нейралық желі және қайталанатын нейралық желі қолданылатын түсінік оқыту негіздеген жұмыс әдісі. Мұндай-ақ біз таңдау тізімінің бір бөлігін таңдау үшін таңдау тізімінен мәліметті қолданамыз және алдыңғы нәтижелерді қарсылық түрлерінің категориясына бірі', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува системот што го развивме за SemEval 2019 за идентификување и категоризирање на навредливиот јазик во социјалните медиуми (OffensEval - задача 6). Оваа задача се фокусира на навредлив јазик на твитови. Таа е организирана во три подзадачи за идентификација на навреден јазик; автоматска категоризација на типовите на злосторства и идентификација на целта на злосторства. Пристапот за првата подпрашање е метод на ансембл базиран на длабоко учење кој користи бидирекционална LSTM рекурентна неврална мрежа и конволуционална неврална мрежа. Покрај тоа, ги користиме информациите од одбележување на дел од говорот на твитови за идентификација на метата и ги комбинираме претходните резултати за категоризација на типовите на кривични дела.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem yang kami bangun untuk SemEval 2019 mengenai Identifikasi dan Kategorisasi Bahasa Tersinggung dalam Media Sosial (OffensEval - Task 6). Tugas ini fokus pada bahasa serangan dalam tweet. Ia diatur menjadi tiga sub-tugas untuk pengenalpasti bahasa yang menyerang; kategorisasi automatik jenis jenayah dan identifikasi sasaran jenayah. The approach for the first subtask is a deep learning-based ensemble method which uses a Bidirectional LSTM Recurrent Neural Network and a Convolutional Neural Network.  Selain itu, kami menggunakan maklumat dari tag-bahagian-ucapan tweet untuk pengenalpasti sasaran dan gabungkan keputusan terdahulu untuk kategorisasi jenis jenayah.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema li żviluppajna għas-SemEval 2019 dwar l-Identifikazzjoni u l-Kategorizzazzjoni tal-Lingwa Offensiva fil-Midja Soċjali (OffensEval - Task 6). Il-kompitu jiffoka fuq lingwa offensiva fit-tweets. Hija organizzata fi tliet sottokompiti għall-identifikazzjoni tal-lingwa offensiva; automatic categorization of offense types and offense target identification.  The approach for the first subtask is a deep learning-based ensemble method which uses a Bidirectional LSTM Recurrent Neural Network and a Convolutional Neural Network.  Barra minn hekk, aħna nużaw l-informazzjoni minn tikkettar ta’ parti mid-diskors ta’ tweets għall-identifikazzjoni tal-mira u ngħaqdu r-riżultati preċedenti għall-kategorizzazzjoni tat-tipi ta’ reati.', 'ml': 'This paper describes the system we developed for SemEval 2019 on Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval - Task 6).  ഈ ജോലി ടൂട്ടികളില്\u200d അപകടത്തില്\u200d ഭാഷ കാണിക്കുന്നു. അത് മൂന്നു സബ് ജോലികളിലേക്കാണ് സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്; തെറ്റുകളുടെ തരത്തിലുള്ള കുറ്റകൃത്യങ്ങളുടെയും തെറ്റുകളുടെ ലക്ഷ്യം തിരിച്ചറിയുക ആദ്യത്തെ സബ്ജുവിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായി പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ആഴത്തെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഒരു ആഴത്തെ രീതിയാണ്. അതിന്റെ ഒരു ബൈഡഡരിയല കൂടാതെ നമ്മള്\u200d ടൂട്ടില്\u200d നിന്നും വാക്കുകളുടെ ഭാഗം ട്രാഗിങ്ങില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ലക്ഷ്യം തിരിച്ചറിയാനും മ', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний 2019 оны SemEval-д Нийгмийн Мэдээлэл (OffensEval - Task 6) хэлний талаар хөгжүүлсэн системийг тайлбарладаг. Энэ үйл ажиллагаа tweets дээр алдааны хэл дээр төвлөрүүлдэг. Хүмүүсийн хэл танихын тулд гурван суб-даалгаврыг зохион байгуулдаг. гэмт хэргийн төрлийн автоматжуулалт, гэмт хэрэгцээний тодорхойлолт. Эхний суурь суралцах арга бол суралцах сургалтын үндсэн загвар юм. Энэ нь хоёр шугамын LSTM дахин сэтгэл мэдрэлийн сүлжээ болон Конvolution Neural Network ашигладаг. Мөн бид илтгэлийн нэг хэсэг хэсэг хэсэг хэсэг хэсэг хэсэг хэсэг хэсэг хэсэг хэсэг хэлэлцээний тухай мэдээллийг ашиглаж зорилготой тодорхойлолтын тулд зорилготой, өмнөх үр дүн', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet vi utvikla for semiEval 2019 om identifisering og kategorisering av forskjellige språk i sosiale mediar (OffensEval - oppgåve 6). Oppgåva fokuserer på offensivspråk i tweets. Det er organisert i tre underoppgåver for offensiv språk-identifikasjon; automatisk kategorisering av offentstypar og offentsmål- identifikasjon. Tilnærminga til den første underspørjinga er ein dyp læringsbasert ensemblemmetode som brukar ein rekursjonal LSTM gjentaande neuralnettverk og ein konvolusjonell neuralnettverk. I tillegg bruker vi informasjonen frå ein del av talemerking av tweeter for mål- identifikasjon og kombinerer førre resultat for kategorisering av offentlingstypar.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje system opracowany dla SemEval 2019 na temat identyfikacji i kategorizowania języka obraźliwego w mediach społecznościowych (OffensEval-Task 6). Zadanie skupia się na obraźliwym języku w tweetach. Jest on podzielony na trzy podzadania służące identyfikacji obraźliwego języka; automatyczna kategoryzacja rodzajów przestępstw i identyfikacja celu przestępstwa. Podejście do pierwszego podzadania jest metodą zespołu opartą na głębokim uczeniu, która wykorzystuje dwukierunkową sieć neuronową LSTM i sieć neuronową konwolucyjną. Dodatkowo wykorzystujemy informacje z tagowania części mowy tweetów do identyfikacji celów i łączymy poprzednie wyniki do kategoryzacji typów przestępstw.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul pe care l-am dezvoltat pentru SemEval 2019 privind identificarea și categorizarea limbajului ofensiv în rețelele sociale (OffensEval - Task 6). Sarcina se concentrează pe limbajul ofensator în tweet-uri. Este organizat în trei subsarcini pentru identificarea limbajului ofensator; clasificarea automată a tipurilor de infracțiuni și identificarea țintei infracțiunilor. Abordarea pentru prima subactivitate este o metodă de ansamblu bazată pe învățare profundă, care utilizează o Rețea Neurală Recurentă LSTM bidirecțională și o Rețea Neurală Convoluțională. În plus, folosim informațiile din etichetarea parțială a tweeturilor pentru identificarea țintei și combinăm rezultatele anterioare pentru clasificarea tipurilor de infracțiuni.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem koji smo razvili za semiEval 2019. o identifikaciji i kategorizaciji službenog jezika u socijalnim medijima (OffensEval - Task 6). Taj zadatak se fokusira na ofanzivni jezik na tweets. Organizuje se u tri podzadataka za identifikaciju ofanzivnog jezika; automatska kategorija tipa prekršaja i identifikacije mete prekršaja. Pristup za prvu podpitanje je duboka metoda osnovana na učenju ensemble koja koristi dvosmjernu LSTM ponovnu neuralnu mrežu i konvolucionu neuralnu mrežu. Osim toga, koristimo informacije iz dijelogovornog oznake tweeta za ciljnu identifikaciju i kombiniramo prethodne rezultate za kategoriju vrsta zločina.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපි 2019 විශ්වාස කරපු පද්ධතියේ සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයාත්මයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න හා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක මේ වැඩේ ට්විට් වලින් අපරාධ භාෂාවට ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා. ඒක අපරාධ භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය සබ් වැඩක් තුනක් වෙනුවෙන් සැකසුම් කරනවා; අපරාධ වර්ගයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය වර්ගයක් සහ අපරාධ කරපු ලක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණය. The approach for the first subtask is a depth learnt-based ensEmble way that use a Bidir-side LSTM recurrent neural network and a ConVoltive neural network. තවත් අපි තොරතුරු භාවිතා කරන්නේ ට්විට් කොටස් කොටස් කිරීමේ තොරතුරු ටැග් කරලා තියෙන්නේ ලක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා අ', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoraa nidaamka aan u soo hormarinay SemEval 2019 oo ku saabsan aqoonsiga iyo kalegisashada luqada sooshalka (OffensEval - Shaqo 6). Shaqadu wuxuu ku qoran yahay luqada caafimaadka ee Tweetka. Waxaa loo qabanqaabiyaa saddex shaqo oo lagu aqoonsan karo luqada dembiga ah; qaab bilowgiis ah oo ka kooban noocyada dembiga iyo aqoonsiga goalka dembiga. The approach for the first subtask is a deep learning-based ensemble method which uses a Bidirectional LSTM Recurrent Neural Network and a Convolutional Neural Network.  Sidoo kale waxaynu isticmaalnaa macluumaadka qeyb ka mid ah warqadaha ku qoran tweetka aqoonsiga goalka, waxaana lagu soo bandhigi karaa arimaha hore si loo qeybiyo noocyada dembiga.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver det system vi utvecklat för SemEval 2019 om identifiering och kategorisering av offensivt språk i sociala medier (OffensEval - Uppgift 6). Uppgiften fokuserar på stötande språk i tweets. Den är organiserad i tre underuppgifter för kränkande språkidentifiering; automatisk kategorisering av brottstyper och identifiering av brottsmål. Metoden för den första deluppgiften är en djupinlärningsbaserad ensemblemetod som använder ett dubbelriktat LSTM återkommande neuralt nätverk och ett konvulutivt neuralt nätverk. Dessutom använder vi informationen från delmärkning av tweets för identifiering av mål och kombinerar tidigare resultat för kategorisering av brottstyper.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் சேம்Eval 2019க்கான நாம் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பை விவரிக்கிறது சமூக ஊடகத்தில் அடையாளம் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தும் மொழி( OffensEval -  இந்த செயல் தேவையற்ற மொழியின் மீது கவனம் செலுத்துகிறது. மூன்று துணை பணிகளுக்கு இது நிரந்தரமான மொழி அடையாளம் அமைக்கப்பட்டது; குற்றம் வகைகள் மற்றும் குற்றம் இலக்கு அடையாளத்தை தானாகவே வகைப்படுத்தல். The approach for the first subtask is a deep learning-based ensemble method which uses a Bidirectional LSTM Recurrent Neural Network and a Convolutional Neural Network.  கூடுதலாக நாம் பேச்சு பார்ப்பு குறியீட்டில் இருந்து தகவல்களை பயன்படுத்தி இலக்கு அடையாளம் மற்றும் முந்தைய முடிவுகளை வகைப்படு', 'ur': 'This paper describes the system we developed for SemEval 2019 on Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval - Task 6). ٹویٹوں میں فساد کی زبان پر تمرکز کیا جاتا ہے۔ یہ تین سوب-ٹاکس میں تغییر کی زبان کی شناسایی کے لئے تغییر کیا جاتا ہے۔ فساد کے طریقوں اور فساد کا موقع شناسایی کے ساتھ اتمام کاٹی کرنا۔ The approach for the first subtask is a deep learning-based ensemble method that uses a Bidirectional LSTM Recurrent Neural Network and a Convolutional Neural Network. اور اضافہ یہ ہے کہ ہم ٹویٹوں کے ٹاگ میں سے اطلاعات کا استعمال کرتے ہیں تابع شناسایی کے لئے اور پہلے نتیجے کو فسق طریقوں کے تقسیم کے لئے ترکیب کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu sahifa Social Media (OffensEval - Vazifa 6) haqida SemEval 2019 uchun tuzuvchi tizimni aniqlash va kategorishingiz mumkin. Bu vazifa Twitterda ta'sirlik tilini foydalanadi. Ushbu tilni aniqlash uchun uchta sub-vazifalarga organized; @ info: whatsthis Birinchi tub vazifaning usuli - juda qiyin o'rganish asosida foydalanish usuli, bu LSTM davom etilgan Neural tarmoq va Konvolution Neural tarmoq bilan ishlatiladi. Koʻrsatilgan, biz xabarlarning bir qismdan foydalanuvchi xabarlardan foydalanamiz, target identifikatlash uchun oldingi natijalarni birlashtiramiz va ta'lim turlarini kattalashtirish uchun birlashtiramiz.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả hệ thống mà chúng tôi đã phát triển cho SemEvl 2009 về việc xác định và phân loại ngôn ngữ Hành động trên phương tiện xã hội (OffensEvl -Task 6). Nhiệm vụ tập trung vào ngôn ngữ tấn công trên Twitter. Nó được tổ chức thành ba nhiệm vụ phụ để nhận dạng ngôn ngữ tấn công. tự động phân loại các kiểu tấn công và xác định mục tiêu tấn công. Phương pháp tiếp cận cho phần đầu tiên là một phương pháp kết hợp dựa trên học sâu dùng một kênh tâm thần giao tiếp LSD và một mạng thần kinh có liên kết. Thêm nữa, chúng tôi sử dụng thông tin từ các kiểu tweet để nhận diện mục tiêu và kết hợp kết quả trước để phân loại các kiểu tấn công.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва системата, която разработихме за Идентифициране и категоризиране на офанзивен език в социалните медии (Задача 6). Задачата се фокусира върху обиден език в туитове. Тя е организирана в три подзадачи за офанзивна езикова идентификация; автоматично категоризиране на типовете престъпления и идентифициране на целта на престъплението. Подходът за първата подзадача е базиран на дълбоко обучение ансамбъл метод, който използва двупосочна повтаряща се неврална мрежа и конвелуционна неврална мрежа. Освен това използваме информацията от маркиране на част от речта на туитове за идентифициране на целта и комбинираме предишни резултати за категоризиране на типовете престъпления.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sustav koji smo razvili za pola ispitivanja 2019. godine o identifikaciji i kategorizaciji neposlušnog jezika u socijalnim medijima (OffensEval - zadatak 6). Taj zadatak se fokusira na uvredljivi jezik na tweets. Organizirana je u tri podzadataka za identifikaciju ofanzivnog jezika; automatska kategorija tipa prekršaja i ciljne identifikacije prekršaja. Pristup za prvu podpitanje je duboka osnovana na učenju ensemble metoda koja koristi dvosmjernu LSTM ponovnu neuronu mrežu i konvolucionu neuronu mrežu. Osim toga, koristimo informacije iz dijelogovornog označavanja tweeta za ciljnu identifikaciju i kombiniramo prethodne rezultate za kategoriju vrsta zločina.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft het systeem dat we voor SemEval 2019 hebben ontwikkeld over het identificeren en categoriseren van offensieve taal in sociale media (OffensEval-taak 6). De taak richt zich op aanstootgevende taal in tweets. Het is ingedeeld in drie subtaken voor aanstootgevende taalidentificatie; Automatische categorisering van type overtreding en identificatie van doelwit overtreding. De aanpak voor de eerste subtaak is een deep learning-gebaseerde ensemblemethode die gebruikmaakt van een Bidirectioneel LSTM Recurrent Neural Network en een Convolutional Neural Network. Daarnaast gebruiken we de informatie uit part-of-speech tagging van tweets voor doelidentificatie en combineren we eerdere resultaten voor categorisering van overtredingstypes.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver det system, vi har udviklet til SemEval 2019 om identificering og kategorisering af offensivt sprog i sociale medier (OffensEval - Opgave 6). Opgaven fokuserer på stødende sprog i tweets. Det er organiseret i tre underopgaver til offensiv sprogidentifikation; automatisk kategorisering af forseelsestyper og identifikation af forseelsesmålet. Tilgangen til den første underopgave er en dyb læring baseret ensemble metode, der bruger et bidirektionelt LSTM Recurrent Neural Network og et Convolutional Neural Network. Derudover bruger vi oplysningerne fra delt-of-tale tagging af tweets til identifikation af mål og kombinerer tidligere resultater til kategorisering af lovovertrædelser typer.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt das System, das wir für SemEval 2019 zur Identifizierung und Kategorisierung offensiver Sprache in sozialen Medien entwickelt haben (OffensEval-Task 6). Die Aufgabe konzentriert sich auf offensive Sprache in Tweets. Es ist in drei Unteraufgaben zur Identifizierung offensiver Sprachen unterteilt; Automatische Kategorisierung von Straftatarten und Identifizierung von Straftatzielen. Der Ansatz für die erste Teilaufgabe ist eine Deep Learning-basierte Ensemblemethode, die ein bidirektionales LSTM Recurrent Neural Network und ein Convolutional Neural Network verwendet. Zusätzlich nutzen wir die Informationen aus dem Part-of-Speech Tagging von Tweets zur Zielidentifikation und kombinieren bisherige Ergebnisse zur Kategorisierung von Straftaten.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem yang kami kembangkan untuk SemEval 2019 tentang Identifikasi dan Kategorisasi Bahasa Meninggal dalam Media Sosial (OffensEval - Task 6). Tugas ini fokus pada bahasa offensive dalam tweet. Ini terorganisir menjadi tiga sub-tugas untuk identifikasi bahasa yang menyerang; kategorisasi otomatis tipe pelanggaran dan identifikasi target pelanggaran. pendekatan untuk subtask pertama adalah metode ensemble berdasarkan belajar yang mendalam yang menggunakan jaringan neural recurrent LSTM bidireksi dan jaringan neural konvolusi. Selain itu kami menggunakan informasi dari bagian-dari-pidato tagging tweet untuk identifikasi sasaran dan menggabungkan hasil sebelumnya untuk kategorisasi jenis kejahatan.', 'ko': '본고는 우리가SemEval 2019를 위해 개발한 소셜미디어의 공격적인 언어 식별과 분류 시스템(Offenseval-퀘스트 6)을 묘사한다.이 임무의 중점은 추문 중의 무례한 언어이다.그것은 공격적인 언어 식별에 사용되는 세 개의 하위 임무로 조직되었다.공격 유형의 자동 분류와 공격 목표 식별.첫 번째 하위 임무의 방법은 딥러닝 기반의 통합 방법으로 이 방법은 쌍방향 LSTM 귀속신경망과 권적신경망을 사용한다.또한 우리는 트위터 단어성 표기 중의 정보를 사용하여 목표를 식별하고 이전의 결과와 결합하여 공격 유형을 분류한다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم را توسعه داده\u200cایم که برای نیم\u200cEval 2019 در مورد شناسایی و تقویت زبان\u200cهای فعالی در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی (OffensEval - Task 6) توسعه می\u200cدهد. این وظیفه روی زبان تجاوز توئیت تمرکز می\u200cکند. برای شناسایی زبان\u200cهای تجاوز، در سه کار زیر کار سازمان می\u200cشود. دسته\u200cهای خودکار نوع تجاوز و شناسایی هدف تجاوز. روش اولین زیر سوال یک روش زیر یادگیری است که از شبکه عصبی دورانی LSTM و شبکه عصبی معمولی استفاده می\u200cکند. اضافه از اطلاعات از قسمت سخنرانی برای شناسایی هدف استفاده می کنیم و نتایج قبلی را برای تقسیم نوع تجاوز ترکیب می کنیم.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo tulioujenga kwa ajili ya SemEval 2019 kuhusu Kutambua na Kugawanya Lugha Huru katika Mitandao ya kijamii (OffensEval - Kazi 6). Kazi hiyo inajikita kwenye lugha ya uchochezi katika twiti. Inaratibiwa katika kazi tatu za vigogo vya kutambulisha lugha ya uchochezi; Kugawanywa kwa kujitegemea aina ya makosa na kutambua lengo la makosa. Mtakatifu wa juhudi la kwanza ni njia ya kujifunza yenye msingi wa kina inayotumia Mtandao wa Neurali wa LSTM inayorudi tena kwa njia mbili na Mtandao wa Neurali wa kujitolea. Zaidi ya hayo tunatumia taarifa kutoka sehemu ya viungo vya twiti kwa ajili ya kutambulisha malengo na kuunganisha matokeo yaliyopita kwa kuchaguliwa kwa aina ya makosa.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan sistemin që zhvilluam për SemEval 2019 mbi identifikimin dhe kategorizimin e gjuhës ofensive në media sociale (OffensEval - Task 6). Detyra përqëndrohet në gjuhën ofensive në tweet. Ajo është organizuar në tre nëndetyra për identifikimin ofensiv të gjuhës; kategorizimi automatik i tipeve të ofendimit dhe identifikimi i objektivit të ofendimit. Përqasja për nënpyetjen e parë është një metodë ensemble bazuar në mësim të thellë që përdor një rrjet nervor të përsëritur në dy drejtime LSTM dhe një rrjet nervor konvolutiv. Përveç kësaj ne përdorim informacionin nga etiketa pjesë e fjalimit të tweeteve për identifikimin e objektivit dhe kombinojmë rezultatet e mëparshme për kategorizimin e llojeve të ofendimeve.', 'am': 'This paper describes the system we developed for SemEval 2019 on Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval - Task 6).  ስራው በTwitter ላይ አሰቃፊ ቋንቋ ላይ ነው፡፡ በሦስት ደብዳቤዎች ላይ ለሚያሰቃየው ቋንቋ ማውቀት ይደረጋል፤ ቦታ የመጀመሪያው ደብዳቤ ስራ መግለጫ የጥልቅ ትምህርት መሠረት የደረጃ ስፋት ነው፤ ይህም የቢዲዳይ LSTM መግለጫ የኔural መረብ እና የተመሳሳይ የኔural መረብ ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም የንግግር ተርጓሚዎችን ለመግለጽ እና የቀድሞው ፍሬዎችን ለመለያየት እናሳስባለን፡፡', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die stelsel wat ons ontwikkel het vir SemEval 2019 op identifiseer en kategoriseer offensiewe taal in sosiale media (OffensEval - Taak 6). Die taak fokus op offensive taal in tweets. Dit is organiseer in drie sub-taak vir offensivele taal-identifikasie; outomatiese kategoriseering van oortredingstipes en oortredingsdoel identifiseering. Die toegang vir die eerste subvraag is 'n diep leer-gebaseerde ensembleem metode wat gebruik 'n tweederigtinglike LSTM herhaalde neuralnetwerk en' n Konvolusielike neuralnetwerk. In addition we use the information from part-of-speech tagging of tweets for target identification and combine previous results for categorisation of offense types.", 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը նկարագրում է այն համակարգը, որը մենք զարգացրել ենք 2019 թվականի "Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում վնասավոր լեզուների հայտնաբերման և դասակարգման" համար (ՕֆենսԵվալ - առաջադրանք 6): Այս խնդիրը կենտրոնանում է թվիթերի վրա գրավող լեզուների վրա: Այն կազմակերպված է երեք ենթախնդիրներով, որոնք օգտագործվում են հակառակ լեզվի հայտնաբերման համար: automatic categorization of offense types and offense target identification.  Առաջին ենթահարման մոտեցումը խորը ուսումնասիրությամբ հիմնված համակարգչային մեթոդ է, որը օգտագործում է երկաուղղային LSMT ռեկտուրացող նյարդային ցանց և հակադարձ նյարդային ցանց: Ավելին, մենք օգտագործում ենք թվիթերի խոսքի մասի տեղեկատվությունը նպատակի հայտնաբերելու համար և համադրում ենք նախորդ արդյունքները հանցագործությունների տեսակների դասակարգման համար:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সামাজিক মিডিয়ার অফিসেন্স ভাষা পরিচিতি এবং শ্রেণীকরণের ব্যাপারে সেমইভাল ২০১৯ এর জন্য উন্নয়ন করা সিস্টেমের ব্যাখ টুইটে এই কাজের উপর আক্রান্ত ভাষার উপর মনোযোগ প্রদান করে। এটি আক্রান্ত ভাষার পরিচয়ের জন্য তিনটি সাব-কাজে আয়োজন করা হয়েছে; স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে অপরাধের ধরন এবং আক্রমণের লক্ষ্য পরিচয়পত্রের বিভাগ। প্রথম সাবকাজের জন্য প্রযুক্তি হচ্ছে গভীর শিক্ষা ভিত্তিক এক গভীর শিক্ষার মাধ্যম যা বাইডিডেল এলএসএম পুনরায় নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক এবং  এছাড়াও আমরা টুইটারের অংশের ভাষণের ট্যাগিং থেকে তথ্য ব্যবহার করি টুইটের জন্য লক্ষ্য পরিচয়ের জন্য এবং অপরাধের ধরনের বিভাগের জন্য পূর্', 'az': 'Bu kağıt 2019-ci SemEval üçün təhsil etdiyimiz sistemi Sosyal Media (OffensEval - Task 6) təşkil etdiyimiz və təhsil dilini təsdiqləndirmək haqqında təfsil edir. Bu iş tweetlərdə həddi aşan dillərə odaqlanır. Bu cürbəcür dilləri tanıtmaq üçün üç sub-tasklara təyin edilir; həddi aşma növlərinin və həddi aşma nişanələrinin avtomatik kategoriyası. İlk alt soruşma üçün yaxınlıq derin öyrənmək tabanlı ensemble metodumudur ki, iki yönəlli LSTM yenidən nöral a ğ və Convolutional Neural Network istifadə edir. Üstəlik, sözlərin bir qismindən twet etiketindən istifadə edirik ki, məqsəd kimliklənmək üçün və əvvəlki sonuçları suçlu növlərin kategoriyasiyası üçün birləşdiririk.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem koji smo razvili za semiEval 2019. godine o identifikaciji i kategorizaciji neposlušnog jezika u socijalnim medijima (OffensEval - zadatak 6). Taj zadatak se fokusira na uvredljivi jezik na tweets. Organizirana je u tri podzadataka za identifikaciju ofanzivnog jezika; automatska kategorija tipa prekršaja i identifikacije mete prekršaja. Pristup za prvu podpitanje je duboka metoda osnovana na učenju ensemble koja koristi dvosmjernu LSTM ponovnu neuralnu mrežu i konvolucionu Neuralnu mrežu. Osim toga, koristimo informacije iz dijelogovorne oznake tweeta za ciljnu identifikaciju i kombiniramo prethodne rezultate za kategoriju vrsta zločina.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el sistema que vam desenvolupar per SemEval 2019 sobre la identificació i categorització del llenguatge ofensiv als mitjans socials (OffensEval - tasca 6). La tasca es centra en la llengua ofensiva en els tweets. Està organitzat en tres subtasques per identificar una llengua ofensiva; la categorització automàtica dels tipus d'infracció i l'identificació dels objectius. L'enfocament de la primera subterrània és un mètode d'ensemble basat en l'aprenentatge profund que utilitza una xarxa neuronal recurrent bidireccional LSTM i una xarxa neuronal convolutiva. A més, utilitzem la informació d'etiquetar part-of-speech de tweets per identificar els objectius i combinam resultats anteriors per categoritzar els tipus d'infracció.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje systém, který jsme vyvinuli pro SemEval 2019 na téma Identifikování a Kategorizování útočného jazyka v sociálních médiích (OffensEval-Task 6). Úkol se zaměřuje na urážlivý jazyk ve tweetech. Je rozdělena do tří dílčích úkolů pro urážlivou identifikaci jazyka; automatická kategorizace typů trestných činů a identifikace cíle trestného činu. Přístup pro první dílčí úkol je metoda souboru založená na hlubokém učení, která využívá obousměrnou LSTM recidivní neuronovou síť a Convoluční neuronovou síť. Dále využíváme informace z části řeči tagování tweetů pro identifikaci cílů a kombinujeme předchozí výsledky pro kategorizaci typů přestupků.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse süsteemi, mille oleme välja töötanud SemEval 2019 ründava keele tuvastamiseks ja kategoriseerimiseks sotsiaalmeedias (OffensEval - ülesanne 6). Ülesanne keskendub säutsudes solvavale keelele. See on organiseeritud kolme allülesandeks solvava keele identifitseerimiseks; süüteotüüpide automaatne kategoriseerimine ja sihtmärgi tuvastamine. Esimese alamülesande lähenemine on sügavõppel põhinev ansambli meetod, mis kasutab kahesuunalist LSTM korduvat neurovõrku ja konvolutsioonilist neurovõrku. Lisaks kasutame sihtmärgi tuvastamiseks säutsude kõneosalise sildistamise teavet ja kombineerime varasemaid tulemusi kuriteotüüpide kategooriate jaotamiseks.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz 2019-nji ýylyň Semeval 2019-nji ýylyň kimligi we bellenen Taýýarlanmagy barada öwrenmegimiz sistemini soňlaýar (OffensEval - Task 6). Bu zady tweets içinde hassalan dillere üns berýär. Gürjükli dil kimligi üçin üç sub-zada düzenlenýär; Günah hilleriniň otomatik kategoriýasy we maksadyň kimligi Ilkinji alt soragy üçin gollum öwrenmek üçin bir taýýarlan metidir. Bu sistemiň bidirectional LSTM Geri Näral Network we Beýleki Näral Network ullanýar. Mundan hem gürrüň bir bölüminden tweets etiketlerinden bu maksadyň kimligi üçin ullanýarys we iň öňki netijeleri häsiýet täpleri üçin birleşdirýäris.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli kuvaa SemEval 2019:lle kehittämäämme järjestelmää loukkaavan kielen tunnistamisesta ja luokittelusta sosiaalisessa mediassa (OffensEval - Task 6). Tehtävässä keskitytään twiittien loukkaavaan kieleen. Se on jaettu kolmeen alatehtävään loukkaavan kielen tunnistamiseksi; rikkomustyyppien automaattinen luokittelu ja rikkomuksen kohteen tunnistaminen. Ensimmäisen alatehtävän lähestymistapa on syväoppimiseen perustuva ensemble-menetelmä, jossa käytetään kaksisuuntaista LSTM-toistuvaa hermoverkkoa ja konvolutionaalista hermoverkkoa. Lisäksi käytämme tweettien puheen osatagauksesta saatuja tietoja kohteen tunnistamiseen ja yhdistämme aiemmat tulokset rikostyyppien luokitteluun.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את המערכת שפיתחנו עבור SemEval 2019 על זיהוי וקטגוריזציה שפת פגיעה במדיה חברתית (OffensEval - Task 6). המשימה מתמקדת בשפה פגיעה בטוויטים. הוא מאורגן לשלושה משימות תת-משימות לזהות שפה פגיעה; הקטגוריזציה אוטומטית של סוגי עבירה וזהות מטרה עבירה. הגישה לתת השאלה הראשונה היא שיטת אנסמבל עמוקה מבוססת ללמוד אשר משתמשת ברשת נוירולית מחדשת LSTM שתי כיוונים ורשת נוירולית משתנה. בנוסף, אנו משתמשים במידע מחלק של תג הנאום של טוויטים לזהות מטרה ולשילב תוצאות קודמות לקטגוריזציה של סוגי עבירה.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje sistem, ki smo ga razvili za SemEval 2019 o identifikaciji in kategorizaciji ofenzivnega jezika v družabnih medijih (OffensEval - naloga 6). Naloga se osredotoča na žaljiv jezik v tweetih. Organiziran je v tri podnaloge za žaljivo identifikacijo jezika; samodejna kategorizacija vrst kaznivih dejanj in identifikacija tarče kaznivih dejanj. Pristop za prvo podnalogo je metoda ansambla, ki temelji na globokem učenju, ki uporablja dvosmerno LSTM ponovno živčno mrežo in konvolucijsko živčno mrežo. Poleg tega uporabljamo informacije iz označevanja dela govora tweetov za identifikacijo ciljev in združujemo prejšnje rezultate za kategorizacijo vrst kaznivih dejanj.', 'ha': "This paper describes the system we developed for SemEval 2019 on Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval - Task 6).  Kayan aiki yana da muhimmi zuwa harshen mai zartar da shi cikin Twitter. An organize shi cikin taskõki uku wa shaidar harshe na takaici; @ action: button Tsarin wa kwance wa aikin na farko, yana wata shirin fanemble mai baka ta'a da aka sani, wadda ke yi amfani da wata shirin LTRM na Recurrence Target na Neural da wata Cikakken Naural. Da ƙaranci, muna amfani da information daga tagogi na ci-rabon magana wa Twitter wa shaidar goani kuma munã haɗa matsalan da suka gabata zuwa category-nau'in-nau'i.", 'jv': 'Perintah iki diperawan sistem sing awakdhéwé nggawe kanggo Kemerdekaan karo Sampeyan 2011 banjur Iwisan karo Menu Ofensive kanggo Kemerdekaan Kasal Media (offensinval - task 6). Ombudhakan iku ana ing pancene kanggo tukang karo urip ning tuwit Ora negoro tanggal telu operasi banget kanggo nambah ingkang popolasi;  politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Ndoleh kanggo ngilanggar tualke buku kelas telu di sistem sing basa gambar n\'al sistem ensembedle sing gambar nggawe Bidirectial LTT M recurent Neral Network lan a convolution Neral Network. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་ལྟ་བ་ལ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་2019ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་འཕགས་པ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ནང་གི་དྲ་བ་ བྱ་འགུལ་འདིས་tweets ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་བྱེད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་དམིགས་བསལ་ཡོད། དེ་ནི་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པའི་ལྗོངས་གསུམ་གྱི་ཐོག་ལས་དུས་བཀོད་སྒྲིག སྐྱུན་བརྗོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་བ་དང་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་དབྱེ་རིགས། The approach for the first subtask is a deep learning-based ensemble method which uses a Bidirectional LSTM Recurrent Neural Network and a Convolutional Neural Network. In addition we use the information from part-of-speech tagging of tweets for target identification and combine previous results for categorization of offense types.'}
{'en': 'Duluth at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : Lexical Approaches to Identify and Categorize Offensive Tweets', 'ar': 'Duluth في SemEval-2019 المهمة 6: المناهج المعجمية لتحديد التغريدات المسيئة وتصنيفها', 'fr': 'Duluth au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: Approches lexicales pour identifier et catégoriser les tweets offensants', 'es': 'Duluth en la Tarea 6 de SemEval-2019: Enfoques léxicos para identificar y clasificar los tuits ofensivos', 'pt': 'Duluth no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Abordagens lexicais para identificar e categorizar tweets ofensivos', 'ja': 'ダルースat SemEval -2019タスク6 ：不快なツイートを特定して分類するための語彙的アプローチ', 'zh': '德卢斯在SemEval-2019务6:识类犯推文之词汇法', 'ru': 'Дулут на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Лексические подходы к выявлению и классификации оскорбительных твитов', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 6 पर Duluth: आक्रामक ट्वीट्स की पहचान और वर्गीकृत करने के लिए लेक्सिकल दृष्टिकोण', 'ga': 'Duluth ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Cur Chuige Foclaíochta chun Tweetanna Ionsaitheacha a Aithint agus a Chatagóiriú', 'ka': 'Duluth at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Lexical Approaches to Identify and Categorize Offensive Tweets', 'el': 'Καθήκον 6: Λεξικές προσεγγίσεις για τον εντοπισμό και την κατηγοριοποίηση προσβλητικών tweets', 'hu': 'Duluth a SemEval-2019 6. feladat: Lexikai megközelítések a támadó tweetek azonosítására és kategorizálására', 'it': 'Duluth a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Approcci lessicali per identificare e categorizzare i tweet offensivi', 'kk': 'Қосымша 2019 жылдың шегінші тапсырмасының шегінші тапсырмасы: Орнату мен санаттарды бағалау үшін лексикалық қасиеттер', 'ms': 'Duluth pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: pendekatan leksikal untuk mengenalpasti dan kategori Tweet Offensif', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6: ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d സമീപത്തുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാനും വ്യവസാനിപ്പിക്കാനും', 'lt': 'Duluth at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Lexical Approaches to Identify and Categorize Offensive Tweets', 'mk': 'Дулут на SemEval-2019 задача 6: Лексикални пристапи за идентификување и категоризирање на навредни твитови', 'mt': 'Duluth f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6: Approċċi Lessiċi għall-Identifikazzjoni u l-Kategorizzazzjoni ta’ Tweets Offensivi', 'pl': 'Zadanie 6: Leksykalne podejścia do identyfikacji i kategorizacji ofensywnych tweetów', 'sr': 'Duluth na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 6: Leksički pristup identifikaciji i kategorizaciji neposlušnih Tweets', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Task 6: Lexical Approaches to Identify and Categorize Offensive Tweets', 'no': 'Duluth ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 6: Leksiske tilnærmingar for identifisering og kategorisering av offensive tweeter', 'ro': 'Duluth la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: Abordări lexicale pentru identificarea și categorizarea tweeturilor ofensive', 'so': 'Shaqooyinka SemEval-2019 6: Lexical Approaches to Identify and Categorize Offensive Tweets', 'si': 'Duluth at HalfEvel-2019 Job 6: Lexical approach to ID and Categorise Offensive Tweets', 'sv': 'Duluth på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: Lexiska metoder för att identifiera och kategorisera offensiva tweets', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 6: நெக்சியல் அடையாளம் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்துவதற்கான துலுத்து', 'ur': 'سیم اول-2019 ٹاکس ۶ میں دولوٹ: اپنا ٹویٹ شناسایی اور کاٹی کرنا لکسیسی تقریب', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifani 6: Leksikal Approaches to identify and categorize Offensive Tweets', 'vi': 'Đáng lẽ phải báo cáo lại lần nữa. Hành động phân loại.', 'nl': 'Duluth bij SemEval-2019 Taak 6: Lexische benaderingen om offensieve tweets te identificeren en te categoriseren', 'bg': 'Задача 6: Лексикални подходи за идентифициране и категоризиране на нападателни туитове', 'da': 'Duluth på SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: Lexiske metoder til at identificere og kategorisere offensive tweets', 'hr': 'Duluth na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 6: Leksički pristup identifikaciji i kategorizaciji neodgovornih Tweets', 'fa': 'Duluth at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Lexical Approaches to Identify and Categorize Offensive Tweets', 'de': 'Aufgabe 6: Lexikale Ansätze zur Identifizierung und Kategorisierung offensiver Tweets', 'ko': '델루스가 SemEval-2019 퀘스트 6: 공격적인 트윗을 식별하고 분류하는 어휘 방법', 'id': 'Duluth di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Pendekatan Lexik untuk Identifikasi dan Kategori Tweet Offensif', 'sq': 'Duluth at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Lexical Approaches to Identify and Categorize Offensive Tweets', 'tr': 'Subroutines', 'af': 'Duluth by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 6: Leksiese toegang na identifiseer en kategoriseer offensiewe tweete', 'sw': 'Duluth katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 6: Mapema ya Lexico ya kutambua na Kugawanya Twita', 'az': '奡狄녭⁅癡氭㈰ㄹ⁇쎶牥癩‶㨠쎖竃뱬쎼⁔쎶癥瑬즙物⁋業汩얟摩牭즙欠盉餠䭡瑥杯物祡污狄녮愠污祩焠奡磄녮泄녱污爊', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের ৬: লেক্সিক্যাল অ্যাকাউন্টগুলো পরিচিতি এবং বিভিন্ন টুইট চিহ্নিত করার জন্য।', 'bs': 'Duluth na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 6: Leksički pristup identifikaciji i kategorizaciji neophodnih Tweets', 'am': 'Eval-2019 ስራ 6: Lexical Approaches to Identify and Categorize Offensive Tweets', 'hy': 'Duluth at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Lexical Approaches to Identify and Categorize Offensive Tweets', 'cs': 'Úkol 6: Lexikální přístupy k identifikaci a kategorizaci ofenzivních tweetů', 'et': 'Duluth SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 6: Lexikaalsed lähenemisviisid ründavate tweetide tuvastamiseks ja kategoriseerimiseks', 'ca': 'Duluth a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Approaches Lexical to Identify and Categorize Offensive Tweets', 'fi': 'Duluth SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 6: Lexical Approaches to Identify and Categorize Attensive Tweets', 'sk': 'Duluth na SemEval-2019 Naloga 6: Lexični pristopi za prepoznavanje in kategorizacijo napadalnih Tweets', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'jv': 'Duluh at seminval-2011 task 6: Lextaal Acceaces to ID and category offensive', 'bo': 'Duluth at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Lexical Approaches to Identify and Categorize Offensive Tweets', 'he': 'Duluth ב SemEval-2019 משימה 6: גישות לקסיות לזהות וקטגוריזת טוויטים פגיעים'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the Duluth systems that participated in SemEval2019 Task 6, Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval). For the most part these systems took traditional Machine Learning approaches that built classifiers from lexical features found in manually labeled training data. However, our most successful system for classifying a tweet as offensive (or not) was a rule-based blacklist approach, and we also experimented with combining the training data from two different but related SemEval tasks. Our best systems in each of the three OffensEval tasks placed in the middle of the comparative evaluation, ranking 57th of 103 in task A, 39th of 75 in task B, and 44th of 65 in task C.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve os sistemas Duluth que participaram da Tarefa 6 do SemEval–2019, Identificando e categorizando a linguagem ofensiva nas mídias sociais (OffensEval). Em sua maioria, esses sistemas adotaram abordagens tradicionais de aprendizado de máquina que construíam classificadores a partir de recursos lexicais encontrados em dados de treinamento rotulados manualmente. No entanto, nosso sistema mais bem-sucedido para classificar um tweet como ofensivo (ou não) foi uma abordagem de lista negra baseada em regras, e também experimentamos combinar os dados de treinamento de duas tarefas SemEval diferentes, mas relacionadas. Nossos melhores sistemas em cada uma das três tarefas OffensEval ficaram no meio da avaliação comparativa, classificando-se em 57º de 103 na tarefa A, 39º de 75 na tarefa B e 44º de 65 na tarefa C.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة أنظمة Duluth التي شاركت في SemEval-2019 Task 6 ، تحديد وتصنيف اللغة الهجومية في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي (OffensEval). بالنسبة للجزء الأكبر ، اتبعت هذه الأنظمة مناهج التعلم الآلي التقليدية التي قامت ببناء المصنفات من الميزات المعجمية الموجودة في بيانات التدريب المصنفة يدويًا. ومع ذلك ، فإن أنجح نظام لدينا لتصنيف تغريدة على أنها مسيئة (أو لا) كان نهج القائمة السوداء المستند إلى القواعد ، وقمنا أيضًا بتجربة الجمع بين بيانات التدريب من مهمتين مختلفتين ولكنهما مرتبطان ببعضهما البعض. تم وضع أفضل أنظمتنا في كل من مهام OffensEval الثلاث في منتصف التقييم المقارن ، حيث احتلت المرتبة 57 من 103 في المهمة A ، و 39 من 75 في المهمة B ، و 44 من 65 في المهمة C.', 'es': 'Este documento describe los sistemas de Duluth que participaron en la Tarea 6 de Semeval—2019, Identificación y categorización del lenguaje ofensivo en las redes sociales (OffensEval). En su mayor parte, estos sistemas adoptaron enfoques tradicionales de aprendizaje automático que construían clasificadores a partir de características léxicas que se encuentran en los datos de entrenamiento etiquetados manualmente. Sin embargo, nuestro sistema más exitoso para clasificar un tweet como ofensivo (o no) fue un enfoque de lista negra basado en reglas, y también experimentamos con la combinación de los datos de entrenamiento de dos tareas de SemEval diferentes pero relacionadas. Nuestros mejores sistemas en cada una de las tres tareas de OffensEval ubicadas en el medio de la evaluación comparativa, ocupando el puesto 57 de 103 en la tarea A, 39 de 75 en la tarea B y 44 de 65 en la tarea C.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit les systèmes Duluth qui ont participé à la tâche 6 de SEMEVAL — 2019, Identifier et catégoriser le langage offensant dans les médias sociaux (OffenseVal). Pour la plupart, ces systèmes ont adopté des approches traditionnelles d'apprentissage automatique qui créaient des classificateurs à partir de caractéristiques lexicales trouvées dans des données de formation étiquetées manuellement. Cependant, notre système le plus efficace pour classer un tweet comme offensant (ou non) était une approche de liste noire basée sur des règles, et nous avons également expérimenté la combinaison des données d'entraînement de deux tâches SemEval différentes mais liées. Nos meilleurs systèmes dans chacune des trois tâches offenseVAL placées au milieu de l'évaluation comparative, se classant 57e sur 103 dans la tâche A, 39e sur 75 dans la tâche B et 44e sur 65 dans la tâche C.", 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2019タスク6、ソーシャルメディアにおける不快な言語の識別と分類（ OffensEval ）に参加したDuluthシステムについて説明します。ほとんどの場合、これらのシステムは、手動でラベル付けされたトレーニングデータに見られる語彙機能から分類子を構築する従来の機械学習アプローチを採用しました。しかし、ツイートを攻撃的（またはそうでない）として分類するための最も成功したシステムは、ルールベースのブラックリストアプローチであり、2つの異なるが関連するSemEvalタスクからのトレーニングデータを組み合わせることも実験しました。3つのOffensEvalタスクのそれぞれで最高のシステムを比較評価の中央に配置し、タスクAの103のうち57位、タスクBの75のうち39位、タスクCの65のうち44位にランク付けしました。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर उन डुलुथ सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है जिन्होंने SemEval-2019 टास्क 6 में भाग लिया, सोशल मीडिया (OffensEval) में आक्रामक भाषा की पहचान और वर्गीकरण। अधिकांश भाग के लिए इन प्रणालियों ने पारंपरिक मशीन लर्निंग दृष्टिकोण लिया जो मैन्युअल रूप से लेबल किए गए प्रशिक्षण डेटा में पाए जाने वाले लेक्सिकल सुविधाओं से क्लासिफायरका निर्माण करते थे। हालांकि, एक ट्वीट को आक्रामक (या नहीं) के रूप में वर्गीकृत करने के लिए हमारी सबसे सफल प्रणाली एक नियम-आधारित ब्लैक-लिस्ट दृष्टिकोण थी, और हमने दो अलग-अलग लेकिन संबंधित सेमईवल कार्यों से प्रशिक्षण डेटा के संयोजन के साथ भी प्रयोग किया। तुलनात्मक मूल्यांकन के बीच में रखे गए तीन OffensEval कार्यों में से प्रत्येक में हमारी सबसे अच्छी प्रणालियां, कार्य A में 103 में से 57 वें स्थान पर, कार्य B में 75 में से 39 वें स्थान पर, और कार्य C में 65 में से 44 वें स्थान पर हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описываются системы Duluth, которые участвовали в задаче 6 SemEval-2019 «Выявление и категоризация оскорбительных формулировок в социальных сетях (OffensEval)». По большей части эти системы использовали традиционные подходы машинного обучения, которые строили классификаторы на основе лексических признаков, найденных в данных обучения, помеченных вручную. Тем не менее, наша самая успешная система для классификации твита как оскорбительного (или нет) была основана на правилах черного списка, и мы также экспериментировали с объединением обучающих данных из двух различных, но связанных задач SemEval. Наши лучшие системы в каждой из трех задач OffensEval, размещенных в середине сравнительной оценки, занимают 57-е место из 103 в задании A, 39-е из 75 в задании B и 44-е из 65 в задании C.', 'zh': '本文述参SemEval-2019务6,识别类类社交媒体犯性言语(OffensEval)德卢斯系统。 大抵统用旧机器学术,因手动标数词法特立分类器。 然吾之成功者推文归类于犯性(与不犯性)系统于规矩之黑名单法,犹试组以自异而关SemEval数。 三OffensEval之中,皆在较估之中,A中名103中第57位,在任B中列名75位中排名第39位,在任C中排名第44位。', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar na córais Duluth a ghlac páirt i dTasc 6 SemEval-2019, Teanga Ionsaitheach a Aithint agus a Chatagóiriú sna Meáin Shóisialta (OffensEval). Den chuid is mó ghlac na córais seo le cineálacha cur chuige traidisiúnta um Fhoghlaim Meaisín a thóg aicmitheoirí ó ghnéithe foclóireachta a fuarthas i sonraí oiliúna lipéadaithe de láimh. Mar sin féin, ba é an córas is rathúla a bhí againn chun tweet a rangú mar rud maslach (nó nach bhfuil) ná cur chuige liosta dubh bunaithe ar rialacha, agus rinneamar triail freisin chun na sonraí oiliúna ó dhá thasc SemEval éagsúla ach gaolmhar a chomhcheangal. Ár gcórais is fearr i ngach ceann de na trí thasc OffensEval a cuireadh i lár na meastóireachta comparáidí, ag rangú 57ú as 103 i dtasc A, 39ú as 75 i dtasc B, agus 44ú as 65 i dtasc C.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει τα συστήματα που συμμετείχαν στην εργασία 6, Αναγνώριση και κατηγοριοποίηση της προσβλητικής γλώσσας στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Ως επί το πλείστον αυτά τα συστήματα υιοθέτησαν παραδοσιακές προσεγγίσεις μηχανικής μάθησης που κατασκεύασαν ταξινομητές από λεξικά χαρακτηριστικά που βρέθηκαν σε μη αυτόματο μαρκάρισμα δεδομένων κατάρτισης. Ωστόσο, το πιο επιτυχημένο σύστημά μας για την ταξινόμηση ενός tweet ως προσβλητικό (ή όχι) ήταν μια προσέγγιση βασισμένη σε κανόνες μαύρη λίστα, και επίσης πειραματιστήκαμε με το συνδυασμό των δεδομένων κατάρτισης από δύο διαφορετικές αλλά σχετικές εργασίες SemEval. Τα καλύτερα συστήματά μας σε κάθε ένα από τα τρία καθήκοντα επίθεσης τοποθετήθηκαν στη μέση της συγκριτικής αξιολόγησης, με κατάταξη 57ης από 103 στο έργο Α, 39ης από 75 στο έργο Β και 44ης από 65 στο έργο Γ.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja azokat a Duluth rendszereket, amelyek részt vettek a SemEval-2019 Task 6, OffensEval támadó nyelv azonosítása és kategorizálása a közösségi médiában (OffensEval). Ezek a rendszerek többnyire hagyományos gépi tanulási megközelítéseket alkalmaztak, amelyek osztályozókat építettek a manuálisan jelölt képzési adatokban található lexikai funkciókból. A legsikeresebb rendszerünk azonban a tweet sértőnek (vagy sem) minősítésére egy szabályokon alapuló feketelistás megközelítés volt, és kísérleteztünk két különböző, de kapcsolódó SemEval feladat edzési adatainak kombinálásával is. Legjobb rendszereink az összehasonlító értékelés közepén elhelyezett három OffensEval feladat mindegyikében, az A feladat 103 közül 57. helyen, a B feladat 75-ből 39. helyen, a C feladat 65-ből 44. helyen állnak.', 'it': 'Questo articolo descrive i sistemi Duluth che hanno partecipato a SemEval-2019 Task 6, Identificare e Categorizzare il linguaggio offensivo nei social media (OffensEval). Per la maggior parte questi sistemi hanno adottato approcci tradizionali di Machine Learning che hanno costruito classificatori a partire da caratteristiche lessicali trovate nei dati di formazione etichettati manualmente. Tuttavia, il nostro sistema di maggior successo per classificare un tweet come offensivo (o meno) è stato un approccio basato sulle regole della lista nera, e abbiamo anche sperimentato la combinazione dei dati di allenamento di due diversi ma correlati compiti SemEval. I nostri migliori sistemi in ciascuno dei tre compiti OffensEval posti al centro della valutazione comparativa, classificandosi 57° su 103 nel compito A, 39° su 75 nel compito B e 44° su 65 nel compito C.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašomos Duluth sistemos, kurios dalyvavo 6 užduotyje „SemEval-2019“, „Nustatant ir klasifikuojant žalingą socialinės žiniasklaidos kalbą“ (OffensEval). Dauguma šių sistemų buvo naudojami tradiciniai mašininio mokymosi metodai, kuriuose klasifikatoriai buvo pagaminti iš rankiniuose mokymo duomenise pažymėtų leksinių savybių. Vis dėlto mūsų sėkmingiausia sistema, pagal kurią tweet as klasifikuojamas kaip užpuolantis (ar ne) buvo taisyklėmis pagrįstas juodasis sąrašas, taip pat eksperimentavome derinant mokymo duomenis iš dviejų skirtingų, bet susijusių SemEval užduočių. Our best systems in each of the three OffensEval tasks placed in the middle of the comparative evaluation, ranking 57th of 103 in task A, 39th of 75 in task B, and 44th of 65 in task C.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 6- шегінші тапсырмасында қатысу жүйелерін, әлеуметтік медиақтардың (OffensEval) бағалау және санаттарын анықтайды. Бұл жүйелердің көпшілігі қолмен жазылған оқыту деректерінде қалаған лексикалық мүмкіндіктерден құрылған әдетті машиналық оқыту арқылы жасады. Бірақ, tweet- тізбегін қара тізімінің (немесе емес) ретінде классификациялау үшін ең сәтті жүйесіміз қара тізімінің тәртібі болды, сондай-ақ біз екі түрлі, бірақ қатынасыз жалпы тапсырмалардан Біздің үш OffensEval тапсырмаларының ең жақсы жүйелеріміз салыстырмалы оқиғаның ортасында орналастырылған, A тапсырмасында 57- ші ретінде, B тапсырмасында 39- ші ретінде, 65- ші ретінде C тапсырмасында.', 'mk': 'This paper describes the Duluth systems that participated in SemEval-2019 Task 6, Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval).  Во најголем дел овие системи ги прифатија традиционалните пристапи за машинско учење кои изградија класификатори од лексички карактеристики пронајдени во рачно означени податоци за обука. Сепак, нашиот најуспешен систем за класификување на твитот како навредлив (или не) беше пристап на црна листа базиран на правила, и исто така експериментиравме со комбинација на податоците за обука од две различни, но поврзани SemEval задачи. Нашите најдобри системи во секоја од трите задачи на OffensEval поставени во средината на споредливата оценка, рангирајќи се на 57-тото место од 103 во задачата А, 39-тото место од 75 во задачата Б и 44-тото место од 65 во задачата Ц.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem Duluth yang berpartisipasi dalam SemEval-2019 Task 6, Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval). Sebahagian besar sistem ini mengambil pendekatan belajar mesin tradisional yang membina klasifikasi dari ciri-ciri leksik ditemui dalam data latihan yang ditabel secara manual. Namun, sistem yang paling berjaya untuk mengklasifikasikan tweet sebagai serangan (atau tidak) adalah pendekatan senarai hitam berdasarkan peraturan, dan kami juga eksperimen dengan menggabungkan data latihan dari dua tugas SemEval yang berbeza tetapi berkaitan. Our best systems in each of the three OffensEval tasks placed in the middle of the comparative evaluation, ranking 57th of 103 in task A, 39th of 75 in task B, and 44th of 65 in task C.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ജോലി 6-ല്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്ന ഡുലുത്ത് സിസ്റ്റം വിവരിക്കുന്നു, സോഷ്യല്\u200d മെഡിയയില്\u200d സോഷ്യല്\u200d മെഡിയയില്\u200d ന മിക്കവാറും ഈ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പാഠമായ മെഷീന്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന വഴികള്\u200d എടുത്തു എന്നാലും, ട്വീറ്റിനെ ആക്രമണിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഞങ്ങളുടെ ഏറ്റവും വിജയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം നിയമപരമായ ഒരു കറുത്ത പട്ടികയിലുള്ള വഴിയായിരുന്ന നമ്മുടെ എല്ലാ മൂന്ന് ഓഫെന്\u200dസ്\u200cവാല്\u200d ജോലികളിലും നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല സിസ്റ്റീമുകളും, താല്\u200dക്കാലിക വിലാസത്തിന്\u200dറെ നടുവില്\u200d വെച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. 103 ലെ', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistemi Duluth li pparteċipaw f’SemEval-2019 Task 6, Identifikazzjoni u Kategorizzazzjoni tal-Lingwa Offensiva fil-Midja Soċjali (OffensEval). Fil-biċċa l-kbira ta’ dawn is-sistemi ħadu approċċi tradizzjonali ta’ Tagħlim bil-Magni li nbnew klassifikaturi minn karatteristiċi lexiċi li jinsabu fid-dejta tat-taħriġ ittikkettata manwalment. Madankollu, is-sistema tagħna l-aktar ta’ suċċess biex tikklassifika tweet bħala offensiv (jew le) kienet approċċ ibbażat fuq ir-regoli ta’ list a sewda, u esperimentajna wkoll bil-kombinazzjoni tad-dejta tat-taħriġ minn żewġ kompiti SemEval differenti iżda relatati. L-aħjar sistemi tagħna f’kull wieħed mit-tliet kompiti OffensEval imqiegħda fin-nofs tal-evalwazzjoni komparattiva, li tikklassifika l-57 minn 103 fil-kompitu A, it-39 minn 75 fil-kompitu B, u l-44 minn 65 fil-kompitu C.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano systemy Duluth, które uczestniczyły w SemEval-2019 Task 6, Identyfikowanie i Kategorizowanie języka ofensywnego w mediach społecznościowych (OffensEval). W większości systemy te przyjęły tradycyjne metody uczenia maszynowego, które budowały klasyfikatory z funkcji leksykalnych znajdujących się w ręcznie etykietowanych danych treningowych. Jednak naszym najbardziej udanym systemem klasyfikacji tweeta jako obraźliwego (lub nie) było podejście oparte na zasadach czarnej listy, a także eksperymentowaliśmy z łączeniem danych treningowych z dwóch różnych, ale powiązanych z nimi zadań SemEval. Nasze najlepsze systemy w każdym z trzech zadań OffensEval umieszczonych w środku oceny porównawczej, w rankingu 57th z 103 w zadaniu A, 39th z 75 w zadaniu B i 44th z 65 w zadaniu C.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemele Duluth care au participat la SemEval-2019 Task 6, Identificarea și Categorizarea Limbajului ofensiv în Social Media (OffensEval). În cea mai mare parte, aceste sisteme au adoptat abordări tradiționale de Machine Learning care au construit clasificatori din caracteristici lexicale găsite în datele de instruire etichetate manual. Cu toate acestea, cel mai de succes sistem al nostru pentru clasificarea unui tweet ca ofensator (sau nu) a fost o abordare bazată pe reguli de listă neagră, și am experimentat, de asemenea, combinarea datelor de formare din două sarcini SemEval diferite, dar conexe. Cele mai bune sisteme ale noastre în fiecare dintre cele trei sarcini OffensEval plasate în mijlocul evaluării comparative, clasând 57 din 103 în sarcina A, 39 din 75 în sarcina B, și 44 din 65 în sarcina C.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sisteme Duluta koji su sudjelovali u zadatku 6. polovičnog ispitivanja 2019. godine, identifikacija i kategorizacija neposlušnog jezika u socijalnim medijima (OffensEval). Uglavnom, ovi sistemi su poduzeli tradicionalne pristupe za učenje mašina koji su izgradili klasifikatore iz leksičkih karakteristika pronađene u podacima o obuci na ruènom etiketu. Međutim, naš najuspešniji sistem za klasifikaciju tweet a kao ofanzivnog (ili ne) bio je pristup crnom listom na pravilima, a mi smo takođe eksperimentirali kombinaciju podataka o obuci iz dva različita ali povezanih polEvalnih zadataka. Naši najbolji sistemi u svakoj od tri zadataka OffensEval postavljene u sred usporedbene procjene, čineći 57. od 103 u zadatku A, 39. od 75 u zadatku B, i 44. od 65 u zadatku C.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნტის შესახებ ეულუტის სისტემებს, რომელიც SemEval-2019 დაწყვეტილი სამუშაო დავალებში, სამუშაო მედიაში განსაზღვრება და კატეგორიზაცია. უფრო დიდ ნაწილად ამ სისტემისთვის ტრადიციონალური მაქსინური სწავლების მიღება, რომლებიც ლექსიკალური ფუნქციებიდან კლასიფიკაციები შექმნა, რომლებიც მაგრამ ჩვენი ყველაზე წარმატებული სისტემა, როგორც გავაკეთებულია, როგორც გავაკეთებულია (ან არა) შავ-ლისტის პროგრამი, და ჩვენ ასევე ექსპერიმენტი გავაკეთებულია ორი განსხვავებული, მაგრა ჩვენი ყველაზე უკეთესი სისტემებში სამი OffensEval დავალება, რომელიც შესაბამისი განსაზღვრებას შუალში, რომელიც სამუშაო განსაზღვრებას 57 წლის წლის A-ში, 39წლის 75 წლის B-ში და 44 წლის C-ში.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ දුලුත් පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයාත්මක (Offenseval) වල සාමාජික භාෂාත්මක 6 වැඩේ සමාජිකයෙන් සම බොහෝ කොටසට මේ පද්ධතියේ පාරමාණික පද්ධතිය ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ලෙක්සිකල් අවශ නමුත්, අපේ විශේෂ පද්ධතිය විශේෂ විදිහට ටිවිට් එකක් අපරාධික විදිහට (නැත්නම් නැත්නම්) විදිහට අධ්\u200dයාත්මක විදිහට අධ්\u200dයාත්මක අපේ හොඳම පද්ධතිය අෆෙන්ස්වෙල් වැඩේ තුනක් වලින් අපේ හොඳම පද්ධතිය සැලසුම් වලින් සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණයේ මධ්\u200dයස්ථානයේ තියෙන්නේ, A', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver de Duluth-system som deltog i SemEval-2019 Task 6, Identifiering and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval). För det mesta använde dessa system traditionella maskininlärningsmetoder som byggde klassificerare utifrån lexikala funktioner som finns i manuellt märkta träningsdata. Vårt mest framgångsrika system för att klassificera en tweet som stötande (eller inte) var dock en regelbaserad svartlista metod, och vi experimenterade också med att kombinera träningsdata från två olika men relaterade SemEval-uppgifter. Våra bästa system i var och en av de tre OffensEval-uppgifterna placerade mitt i den jämförande utvärderingen, rankade 57:e av 103 i uppgift A, 39:e av 75 i uppgift B och 44:e av 65 i uppgift C.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver Duluth-systema som delta i halvEval-2019 oppgåve 6, identifisering og kategorisering av forskjellige språk i sosiale media (OffensEval). For dei fleste delene har desse systema brukt tradisjonelle tilnærmingar for maskinelæring som bygde klassifikatorar frå leksiske funksjonar funne i manuelt merket opplæringsdata. Dette er imidlertid vår mest suksessfulle systemet for å klassera eit tweet som offensiv (eller ikkje) er ein regelbasert svart- listetilnærming, og vi også eksperimenterte med å kombinere opplæringsdata frå to ulike, men relaterte semiEval- oppgåver. Våre beste systema i kvar av de tre OffensEval-oppgåvene plasserte i midten av sammenligninga, som rangerer 57th av 103 i oppgåve A, 39th av 75 i oppgåve B, og 44th av 65 i oppgåve C.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka Duluth ee ka qayb galay Shaqada SemEval-2019 6, ku aqoonsashada iyo ku qasbidda afka shabakada sooshalka (OffensEval). Waayo, inta badan nidaamkan waxay qaateen qaabab caadi ah oo ay ka dhiseen fasaxyo ka mid ah takhasusyada tababarida ee la qoray. Si kastaba ha ahaatee nidaamka ugu liibaansan ee ku fasaxa tweetka sida wax caasiyooba (ama aan ahayn) waxay ahayd qaab sharci ah oo lagu qoray qoraal madow ah, waxaana kaloo ku baaraandegay si aynu ugu darsameynno macluumaadka waxbarashada laba shaqo oo kala duduwan ee la xiriira SemEval. Isticmaalkanaga ugu wanaagsan ee saddexda shuqul oo dhamaantood u dhexeeya qiimeynta is-dhigidda, waxay ka sareysaa 57aad ee shaqada A, 39aad oo ka mid ah shaqada B, 44aad oo ka mid ahna 65.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нийгмийн мэдээлэл (OffensEval) дээр SemEval-2019 ажил 6-д оролцсон Duluth системийг тайлбарладаг. Ихэнх хэсэгт эдгээр системүүд гар аргаар нэрлэгдсэн суралцах өгөгдлийн хувьд нэрлэгдсэн хэлбэрээр бүтээсэн уламжлалт Машин суралцах арга зам ашигласан. Гэхдээ бидний tweet-г буруутгах хамгийн амжилттай систем нь хууль жагсаалт дээр суурилсан хар жагсаалт арга зам байсан. Мөн бид хоёр өөр, харьцуулсан SemEval-ын ажлын дасгал өгөгдлийг нэгтгэх туршилт хийсэн. ОфенсEval 3 даалгаварын хамгийн шилдэг системүүд нь харьцуулсан дүгнэлтийн дунд орсон. А даалгаварын 57, B даалгаварын 39, 65 даалгаварын 44.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval-2019 செயல் 6-ல் பங்கிடப்பட்ட ட டுலுத் அமைப்புகளை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, சமூக ஊடக மொழியில் அடையாளம் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தல் மொ பெரும்பாலாக இந்த அமைப்புகள் மரபார்ந்த இயந்திரம் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் முறைகளை எடுத்துக் கொண்டார் இருந்தாலும், எங்கள் மிகவும் வெற்றிகரமான முறைமையாக இருந்து தொடர்பு செய்யும் விதியாசமான கருப்பு பட்டியல் முறைமையாக வகுப்பிடுவதற்கான (அல்லது  ஒப்பீட்டு மதிப்பில் உள்ள மூன்று ஒப்பீட்டு வேலைகளில் எங்கள் சிறந்த அமைப்புகள், 103 ல் 57வது நிறம், பணி B ல் 75 ல் 39வதும், 65 ல் 44வதும் செயல் C ல் உள்ளது.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ دولوٹ سیستموں کی توصیف کرتا ہے جنہوں نے سیم Eval-2019 ٹاکس ۶ میں شرکت کی ہے، سوسیل میڈیا (OffensEval) میں نافذی زبان شناسایی اور کائٹی کرتی ہے۔ ان سیستموں کے اکثر حصہ کے لئے یہ سنتی ماشین یادہانی طریقے لکھ گئے ہیں جن کو لکسیکل فرصت سے کلاسیٹر بنایا گیا تھا جو ہاتھی سے لابلیٹ یادہانی میں پائی گئی تھی. لیکن ہماری بہترین موفقیت سیستمہ ایک ٹویٹ کو نافذ کرنے کے لئے (یا نہ) ایک قانون کی بنیاد سیاہ لیست کی تقریبا تھا، اور ہم نے بھی دو مختلف لیکن ارتباط کے ساتھ تدریس ڈیٹوں کو جمع کرنے کے لئے آزمائش کی۔ ہماری سب سے بہترین سیستموں میں سے ہر تین OffensEval کے کاموں میں مقایسہ ارزیابی کے درمیان رکھی گئی تھی، کام A میں سے 57 درجہ، کام B میں 75 درجہ، اور کام C میں 65 درجہ 44 درجہ.', 'uz': "Bu gaz SemEval-2019 Vazifani 6 ish bilan muruth tizimlariga ega, Social Media (OffensEval) soʻzi tillarini aniqlash va kategorishingiz mumkin. Ko'pchilik uchun bu tizimlar oddiy mashina o'rganish usullarini o'rganadi. Leksikal xususiyatlarni qoʻlbola qo'lbola'llangan taʼminlovchi maʼlumotda yaratilgan darajalarni yaratadi. Lekin, Twitterni offensiv (yoki) sifatida o'rganish uchun eng muvaffaqiyatli tizimmiz qoidadagi qora-roʻyxat usuli edi va biz ikkita boshqa lekin bog'liq SemEval vazifalarini birlashtirishga qaror qildik. Bizning har bir uchta ofensEval vazifalarning eng eng eng tizimimiz qiymatlarimiz orasidagi, 103 vazifasidagi 57inchi Ada, ish B da 75 chi 39inchi va C vazifasidagi 44inchi 44inchi.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả hệ thống Duluth đã tham gia vào nhiệm vụ Semkhai thác và phân loại Ngôn ngữ Hành động trên phương tiện xã hội (OffensEvol). Phần lớn các hệ thống này đã sử dụng các phương pháp cổ máy truyền mà đã tạo ra các phân loại từ tính năng viết tay tìm thấy trong các dữ liệu huấn luyện được đánh dấu. Tuy nhiên, hệ thống thành công nhất của chúng tôi để đánh giá các tweet là tấn công (hay không) là một phương pháp được lập trình đen, và chúng tôi cũng đã thử nghiệm bằng cách kết hợp các dữ liệu huấn luyện từ hai nhiệm vụ SemEvol khác nhau. Những hệ thống tốt nhất của chúng ta trong mỗi ba nhiệm vụ OffensEvl ở giữa bảng phân tích tương đối, xếp số 57th 103 trong nhiệm vụ A, 39th of 75 trong nhiệm vụ B, và 44th của 65 ở nhiệm vụ C.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва системите на Дулут, участвали в задача 6 "Идентифициране и категоризиране на офанзивен език в социалните медии". В по-голямата си част тези системи възприемат традиционни подходи за машинно обучение, които изграждат класификатори от лексикални характеристики, намиращи се в ръчно обозначените данни за обучение. Най-успешната ни система за класифициране на туит като обиден (или не) обаче беше подходът на черния списък, базиран на правила, и експериментирахме и с комбинирането на данните за обучение от две различни, но свързани задачи. Най-добрите ни системи във всяка от трите задачи поставени в средата на сравнителната оценка, класирайки се на 57-то място от 103 в задача А, 39-то от 75 в задача Б и 44-то от 65 в задача В.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft de Duluth systemen die deelnamen aan SemEval-2019 Taak 6, Identificatie and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval). Voor het grootste deel gebruikten deze systemen traditionele Machine Learning benaderingen die classificatoren bouwden op basis van lexicale kenmerken die gevonden werden in handmatig gelabelde trainingsgegevens. Ons meest succesvolle systeem voor het classificeren van een tweet als aanstootgevend (of niet) was echter een rule-based black list benadering, en we experimenteerden ook met het combineren van de trainingsgegevens van twee verschillende maar verwante SemEval taken. Onze beste systemen in elk van de drie OffensEval-taken geplaatst in het midden van de vergelijkende evaluatie, gerangschikt 57e van 103 in taak A, 39e van 75 in taak B, en 44e van 65 in taak C.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sustave duluta koji su sudjelovali u zadatku 6. ispola-2019, identifikaciju i kategorizaciju neposlušnog jezika u socijalnim medijima (OffensEval). Uglavnom, ovi sustavi su poduzeli tradicionalne pristupe za učenje strojeva koji su izgradili klasifikatore iz leksičkih karakteristika pronađene u podacima o ručno označavanju obuke. Međutim, naš najuspješniji sustav za klasifikaciju tweet a kao ofanzivnog (ili ne) bio je pristup crnom listu na pravilima, a mi smo također eksperimentirali kombinaciju podataka o obuci iz dva različita ali povezanih polEvalnih zadataka. Naši najbolji sustavi u svakoj od tri zadatka OffensEval postavljene u sred usporedbene procjene, čineći 57. od 103 u zadatku A, 39. od 75 u zadatku B i 44. od 65 u zadatku C.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver de Duluth-systemer, der deltog i SemEval-2019 Opgave 6, Identificering og Kategorisering Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval). For det meste anvendte disse systemer traditionelle maskinlæringsmetoder, der byggede klassificeringer ud fra leksikske funktioner, der findes i manuelt mærkede træningsdata. Vores mest succesrige system til at klassificere et tweet som stødende (eller ej) var imidlertid en regelbaseret sortliste tilgang, og vi eksperimenterede også med at kombinere træningsdata fra to forskellige, men relaterede SemEval-opgaver. Vores bedste systemer i hver af de tre OffensEval-opgaver placeret midt i den sammenlignende evaluering, rangerer 57. ud af 103 i opgave A, 39. ud af 75 i opgave B og 44. ud af 65 i opgave C.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt die Duluth-Systeme, die an SemEval-2019 Task 6 teilgenommen haben, Offensive Sprache in Social Media identifizieren und kategorisieren (OffensEval). Meistens verwendeten diese Systeme traditionelle Ansätze des maschinellen Lernens, die Klassifikatoren aus lexikalischen Merkmalen bauten, die in manuell beschrifteten Trainingsdaten gefunden wurden. Unser erfolgreichstes System zur Klassifizierung eines Tweets als offensiv (oder nicht) war jedoch ein regelbasierter Black-List-Ansatz, und wir experimentierten auch mit der Kombination der Trainingsdaten von zwei verschiedenen, aber verwandten SemEval-Aufgaben. Unsere besten Systeme in jeder der drei OffensEval-Aufgaben, die in der Mitte der vergleichenden Bewertung platziert werden, sind 57ste von 103 in Aufgabe A, 39ste von 75 in Aufgabe B und 44ste von 65 in Aufgabe C.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem Duluth yang berpartisipasi dalam SemEval-2019 Tugas 6, Identifikasi dan Kategorisasi Bahasa Meninggal dalam Media Sosial (OffensEval). Sebagian besar sistem-sistem ini mengambil pendekatan Machine Learning tradisional yang membangun klasifikasi dari ciri-ciri leksik ditemukan dalam data latihan yang ditabel secara manual. Namun, sistem kami yang paling sukses untuk mengklasifikasi tweet sebagai offensive (atau tidak) adalah pendekatan daftar hitam berdasarkan aturan, dan kami juga eksperimen dengan menggabungkan data latihan dari dua tugas SemEval yang berbeda tetapi terkait. Sistem terbaik kita dalam setiap dari tiga tugas OffensEval ditempatkan di tengah evaluasi perbandingan, tingkat 57 dari 103 dalam tugas A, 39 dari 75 dalam tugas B, dan 44 dari 65 dalam tugas C.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم\u200cهای دولوت را توصیف می\u200cکند که در ماموریت ششم سال ۲۰۱۹ شرکت می\u200cکنند، شناسایی و تقویت زبان فزونی در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی (OffensEval). برای بیشترین بخش این سیستم\u200cها دستیابی یادگیری ماشین سنتی را گرفتند که از ویژگی\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی که در داده\u200cهای آموزش دستی\u200cنامه یادگیری شده\u200cاند محرمانه ساخته شده\u200cاند. با این حال، سیستم موفقیت\u200cترین ما برای کلاس\u200cگذاری یک توئیت به عنوان تجاوز (یا نه) یک روش سیاه لیست قانونی بود، و ما همچنین با ترکیب داده\u200cهای آموزش از دو کار متفاوت ولی مربوط به نیمه\u200cای آزمایش کردیم. بهترین سیستم\u200cهای ما در هر سه از کارهای OffensEval در وسط ارزیابی مقایسه قرار داده شده، 57مین از 103 در کار A، 39مین از 75 در کار B و 44مین از 65 در کار C.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die Duluth-stelsels wat in die semiEval-2019 taak 6 gedeel het, identifiseer en kategoriseer van offensive taal in sosiale media (OffensEval). Vir die meeste deel het hierdie stelsels tradisionele masjien leer toegange geneem wat klassifiseerders gebou het van leksiese funksies gevind in hand gemerkte onderwerp data. Maar ons mees suksesvolle stelsel vir klassifiseer van 'n tweet as offensiv (of nie) was 'n reël-gebaseerde swart-lys toegang, en ons het ook eksperimenteer met die kombinasie van die onderwerking data van twee verskillende maar verwante SemEval-taak. Ons beste stelsels in elke van die drie OffensEval-opdragte wat in die middel van die vergelykbare evaluering gestel is, rangering 57de van 103 in opdrag A, 39de van 75 in opdrag B en 44de van 65 in opdrag C.", 'ko': '본고는 델루스시스템회사가SemEval-2019 임무6에 참여하여 소셜미디어에서의 공격적인 언어(Offenseval)를 식별하고 분류하는 것을 묘사한다.대다수 상황에서 이런 시스템은 전통적인 기계 학습 방법을 채택하여 인공적으로 표시된 훈련 데이터 중의 어휘 특징에 따라 분류기를 구축한다.그러나 트위터를 공격적(또는 비공격적)으로 분류하는 데 가장 성공한 시스템은 규칙에 기반한 블랙리스트 방법이다. 우리는 서로 다르지만 관련된SemEval 임무에서 나온 두 개의 훈련 데이터를 결합시키려고 시도했다.우리는 세 가지 실례적인 임무 중 가장 좋은 시스템이 모두 비교 평가의 중간에 있다. 임무 A에서 우리는 103개 항목 중 57위, 임무 B에서 75개 항목 중 39위, 임무 C에서 우리는 65개 항목 중 44위를 차지했다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wa Duluth ambao ulishiriki katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 6, Kutambua na Kugawa Lugha Huli katika mitandao ya kijamii (OffensEval). Kwa upande mwingi huu, mfumo huu ulichukua mbinu za Kimashini za kitamaduni za Kufunza zilizojenga wataalamu kutoka kwenye vipengele vya lexico vilivyopatikana katika takwimu za mafunzo kwa mikononi. Hata hivyo, mfumo wetu wa mafanikio zaidi wa kutangaza twiti kama matusi (au la) ulikuwa ni mbinu yenye msingi wa listi nyeusi, na pia tulijaribu kuunganisha takwimu za mafunzo kutoka katika kazi mbili tofauti lakini zinazohusiana na SemEval. Mifumo yetu bora katika kila moja ya kazi tatu za OffensEval iliwekwa katikati ya utafiti wa kulinganisha, yenye rangi ya 57 ya 103 katika kazi A, 39 ya 75 katika kazi B, na 44 ya 65 katika kazi C.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz semi-Eval-2019 Taýýasy 6-nji zada goşulan Dulut sistemlerini, Sosyal Maglumatyň (OffensEval) bellenilýär. Bu sistemler köp bölüminde elimden etiket edilen okuw maglumatynda klassifirler in şa eden maşynyň öwrenmesi golaýlaryny aldy. Ýöne tweet diýip klasifikasynda iň üstünlikli sistemamyz (ýöne bolsa ýöne bolmadyk) kara listlerde bir nusgadyr we hem 2 üýtgeşik we SemEval işinden bilim maglumatyny birleşdirmek üçin synanyşdyrdyk. Bizim üç OffensEval görevlerindeki en iyi sistemlerimiz, karşılaştırma değerlendirmelerinin ortasında yerleştirildi. A görevinde 57'i 103'i, 75'i B görevinde ve 65'in in 44'i C görevinde yerleştirildi.", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ በሳምEval-2019 ስራ 6 ላይ የተጋጠሙትን Duluth ድምጾችን ያሳውራል፤ በማኅበራዊ አውታር ቋንቋ ማሳየት እና ክፍተቶችን ያሳያል፡፡ በብዙ ክፍሎች እነዚህ ስርዓቶች የባሕላዊ መኪን ትምህርት መግለጫ ይይዛሉ፤ ከሌክሲካዊ ምርጫዎች በተገኘው እጃቸው ተማሪ ዳታዎችን ያስተካክሉ፡፡ ነገር ግን በትዊተሩን እንደ አሰቃሚ (ወይም ባይሆን) መግለጫ የሥርዓት ጥቁር-ዝርዝር ሥርዓት ነው፡፡ በሦስቱ የፎኒስEval ስርዓቶች ሁሉ በሚስተካከል ትልቁ ስርዓታችን፣ 103 የ57ኛ ስራ A፣ ስራ B የ75ኛ 39ኛ እና ስራ ሲ 44ተኛ 65.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է Դուլյութի համակարգերը, որոնք մասնակցել են ՍեմԵվալ-2019-ի 6-ի «Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում վնասավոր լեզուների բացահայտումներին և դասակարգումներին» (ՕֆենսԵվալ)։ For the most part these systems took traditional Machine Learning approaches that built classifiers from lexical features found in manually labeled training data.  Այնուամենայնիվ, մեր ամենահաջողակ համակարգը թվիթերի դասավորման որպես գրավիչ (կամ ոչ) կանոններով հիմնված սևամորթ ցանկի մոտեցում էր, և մենք նաև փորձեցինք համադրել կրթության տվյալները երկու տարբեր, բայց կապված ՍեմԵվալ խնդիրներից: Մեր լավագույն համակարգերը երեք "ՕֆենսԵվալ" խնդիրներից յուրաքանչյուրին, որոնք տեղադրված են համեմատական գնահատման կենտրոնում, որոնք գտնվում են A խնդիրների 57-րդ մասում, 75-րդ մասում B խնդիրների 39-րդ մասում, 65-րդ մասում C խնդիրների 44', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজে অংশগ্রহণ করা দুলুথ সিস্টেম, সামাজিক মিডিয়া (অফিনসেভাল) চিহ্নিত এবং শ্রেণীতিগত ভাষাকে পরিচিতি  বেশীরভাগ অংশের জন্য এই ব্যবস্থাগুলো ঐতিহ্যবাহী মেশিন শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করেছে যা লেক্সিকাল বৈশিষ্ট্য থেকে বিশ্লেষকদের নির্ তবে আমাদের টুইট ব্যবহারের সবচেয়ে সফল ব্যবস্থা ছিল কালো তালিকার উপায় হিসেবে (বা না) হিসেবে (বা না) হিসেবে টুইট করার জন্য, আর আমরা দুটি ভিন্ন কিন্তু স তুলনামূল্যের মধ্যে আমাদের প্রত্যেক তিনটি অফিনসেভাল কাজের মধ্যে আমাদের সেরা সিস্টেম, ১০৩ এর ৫৭তম রেঙ্গ, কাজ B-এ ৭৫ থেকে ৩৯তম এবং কাজ সি-এর ৪৪৫তম।', 'az': 'Bu kağıt, SemEval-2019 Görevi 6, Sosyal Medya (OffensEval) içində çox qüvvətli Dili tanıyır və Kategorizirlən Duluth sistemlərini tanıyır. Bu sistemlərin əksəriyyəti üçün əl etiketli təhsil məlumatlarında tapılan leksik özelliklərindən klassifikləri in şa edilən təhsil öyrənmə metodlarını alırdı. Lakin, tweet olaraq dəyişdirmək üçün ən müvəffəqiyyətli sistemimiz hökmlü siyah liste tərzidir və biz də iki müxtəlif, amma əlaqəsi olan SemEval tərzindən təhsil verilən məlumatları birləşdirmək üçün təhsil etdik. Bu üç OffensEval işində olan ən yaxşı sistemlərimiz, saldırıcı değerlendirmənin ortasında yerləşdirilmiş, A işində 103-in 57-ini, B işində 75-in 39-ini və C işində 65-in 44-ini.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sisteme Dulutha koji su sudjelovali u zadatku 6. polovičnog ispitivanja 2019. godine, identifikaciju i kategorizaciju neposlušnog jezika u socijalnim medijima (OffensEval). Uglavnom, ovi sustavi su poduzeli tradicionalne pristupe za učenje mašina koji su izgradili klasifikatore iz leksičkih karakteristika pronađene u podacima o ručno označavanju obuke. Međutim, naš najuspješniji sistem za klasifikaciju tweet a kao ofanzivnog (ili ne) bio je pristup crnom listom na pravilima, a mi smo također eksperimentirali kombinaciju podataka o obuci iz dva različita ali povezanih polEvalnih zadataka. Naši najbolji sustavi u svakoj od tri zadatka OffensEval postavljene u sred usporedbene procjene, čineći 57. od 103 u zadatku A, 39. od 75 u zadatku B i 44. od 65 u zadatku C.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje systémy Duluth, které se podílely na SemEval-2019 Task 6, Identifikace a Kategorizace útočného jazyka v sociálních médiích (OffensEval). Tyto systémy převážně využívaly tradiční přístupy strojového učení, které sestavily klasifikátory z lexikálních funkcí nalezených v ručně označených tréninkových datech. Naším nejúspěšnějším systémem pro klasifikaci tweetu jako útočného (či nikoli) byl však přístup založený na pravidlech černé listiny a experimentovali jsme také s kombinací tréninkových dat ze dvou různých, ale souvisejících úkolů SemEval. Naše nejlepší systémy v každém ze tří úkolů OffensEval umístěných uprostřed srovnávacího hodnocení, pořadí 57té z 103 v úkolu A, 39té z 75 v úkolu B a 44té z 65 v úkolu C.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse Duluthi süsteeme, mis osalesid SemEval-2019 ülesandes 6, ründava keele tuvastamine ja kategoriseerimine sotsiaalmeedias (OffensEval). Enamasti kasutasid need süsteemid traditsioonilisi masinõppe lähenemisviise, mis ehitasid klassifitseerijad käsitsi märgistatud koolitusandmetes leiduvatest leksikaalsetest omadustest. Meie kõige edukam süsteem säutsu solvavaks (või mitte) klassifitseerimiseks oli aga reeglitel põhinev must nimekiri lähenemine ning katsetasime ka kahe erineva, kuid seotud SemEvali ülesande koolitusandmete kombineerimist. Meie parimad süsteemid igas kolmes OffensEval ülesandes, mis on asetatud võrdleva hindamise keskele, on 57. kohal 103-st ülesandes A, 39. kohal 75-st ülesandes B ja 44. kohal 65-st ülesandes C.', 'sq': 'This paper describes the Duluth systems that participated in SemEval-2019 Task 6, Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval).  Në pjesën më të madhe të këtyre sistemeve u afruan metodat tradicionale të Mësimit të Makinës që ndërtuan klasifikues nga karakteristikat lexike të gjetura në të dhënat e trajnimit të etiketuara manualisht. However, our most successful system for classifying a tweet as offensive (or not) was a rule-based black-list approach, and we also experimented with combining the training data from two different but related SemEval tasks.  Our best systems in each of the three OffensEval tasks placed in the middle of the comparative evaluation, ranking 57th of 103 in task A, 39th of 75 in task B, and 44th of 65 in task C.', 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu els sistemes Duluth que van participar en SemEval-2019 Task 6, Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval). For the most part these systems took traditional Machine Learning approaches that built classifiers from lexical features found in manually labeled training data.  However, our most successful system for classifying a tweet as offensive (or not) was a rule-based black-list approach, and we also experimented with combining the training data from two different but related SemEval tasks.  Els nostres millors sistemes en cada una de les tres tasques OffensEval situades al mig de l'evaluació comparativa, al 57 de 103 a la tasca A, al 39 de 75 a la tasca B i al 44 de 65 a la tasca C.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan Duluth-järjestelmät, jotka osallistuivat SemEval-2019 Task 6, Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (OffensEval). Nämä järjestelmät rakensivat suurimmaksi osaksi perinteisiä koneoppimismenetelmiä, jotka rakensivat luokittelijoita manuaalisesti merkittyjen harjoitustietojen sanastoominaisuuksista. Onnistunein järjestelmämme twiitin luokittelemiseksi loukkaavaksi (tai ei) oli sääntöpohjainen mustan listan lähestymistapa, ja kokeilimme myös kahden eri SemEval-tehtävän harjoitusdatan yhdistämistä. Parhaat järjestelmämme kussakin kolmessa OffensEval-tehtävässä, jotka sijoittuvat vertailuarvioinnin keskelle, sijoittuvat 57. sijalle 103 tehtävässä A, 39. sijalle 75 tehtävässä B ja 44. sijalle 65 tehtävässä C.', 'ha': "Wannan karatun na bayyana the duluth system that took part in the SemEV-2019 Tafiyar 6, Ina gane and Categorize Afghafenve language in social Media (offenseval). Ga mafi yawan jama'a, wannan na'ura sun ɗauki kimar Kinikin da aka sanar da shi na tsari daga misalin leksisi da aka samu cikin data na tsarin da hannayen da aka rubuta. However, our most successful system for classifying a tweet as offensive (or not) was a rule-based black-list approach, and we also experimented with combining the training data from two different but related SemEval tasks.  MafiɗayinMu na cikin duk aikin bayani uku da aka sanya a tsakanin rabo, ranar 57th daga 103 a cikin aikin A, 39th daga 75na a cikin aikin B, da 44th daga 65 a cikin aikin C.", 'jv': 'Perintah iki rambarang kelas Duluh sistem sing ngendalikne ning semiinval-2011 task 6, ngilangno lan kelas offensive Language ing soti Media (offensinval). Banyak akèh sistem iki dadi ono nggawe sistem sistem Tradisondisikno Inggal sampeyan karo akeh basa sing larang langgambar politenessoffpolite, politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Sistem dhéwé sing luwih-luwih kanggo sabên ning acara sabên ning offensinval karo hal dadi karo nggawe gerarané, padha tanggal tuarané, sampek tanggal tuarané, kawula-tanggal sing dimulai A, tanggal-tanggal sing 75 uwèk dadi B, lan padha-tanggal sing karo section C.', 'sk': 'V prispevku so opisani sistemi Duluth, ki so sodelovali v nalogi 6 SemEval-2019, Identifikacija in kategorizacija ofenzivnega jezika v socialnih omrežjih (OffensEval). Večinoma so ti sistemi uporabljali tradicionalne pristope strojnega učenja, ki so izdelali klasifikatorje iz leksikalnih značilnosti, ki jih najdemo v ročno označenih podatkih o usposabljanju. Naš najuspešnejši sistem za razvrščanje tweeta kot žaljivega (ali ne) je bil pristop, ki temelji na pravilih, prav tako pa smo eksperimentirali tudi z združevanjem podatkov o usposabljanju iz dveh različnih, vendar sorodnih nalog SemEval. Naši najboljši sistemi pri vsaki od treh nalog OffensEval, ki so postavljeni sredi primerjalne ocene, se uvrščajo na 57. mesto od 103 v nalogi A, 39. mesto od 75 v nalogi B in 44. mesto od 65 v nalogi C.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את מערכות דולות שהשתתפו במשימה 6 SemEval-2019, זיהוי וקטגוריזציה שפה פוגעת במדיה חברתית (OffensEval). לרוב המערכות הללו לקחו גישות למלמד מכונות מסורתיות שבנו מסווגים מאפיינים לקסיים שמוצאים בנתונים אימונים מידיים. עם זאת, המערכת המצליחה ביותר שלנו להקליף טוויט כפגיעה (או לא) הייתה גישה מבוססת על חוקים רשימה שחורה, וגם ניסינו עם שילוב נתוני האימונים משני משימות SemEval שונות אבל קשורות. המערכות הטובות ביותר שלנו בכל אחד משלושת משימות OffensEval שמוקמות באמצע הערכה השוואה, מדרגה 57 מ-103 במשימה A, 39 מ-75 במשימה B, ו-44 מ-65 במשימה C.', 'bo': 'ཤོག For the most part these systems took traditional Machine Learning approaches that built classifiers from lexical features found in manually labeled training data. ཡིན་ནའང་། ང་ཚོའི་ལྟ་བུའི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡིག་གི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ནག་དེ་བཟོ་བཅོས་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་རེ་རེའི་དོན་ལྟར་OffensEval ལས་ཀ་གསུམ་ནང་གི་མཐའ་གཟུགས་རིམ་དཔྱད་པར་མཐུན་པ་དེ་ཡིན། ལས་ཀ་གསལ་བཤད་ནི་ཨིན། འགྲོ་སྟངས་ལ་འགྲོ་ཡུལ'}
{'en': 'Ghmerti at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : A Deep Word- and Character-based Approach to Offensive Language Identification', 'ar': 'Ghmerti في SemEval-2019 المهمة 6: نهج عميق قائم على الكلمات والحروف للتعرف على اللغة الهجومية', 'pt': 'Ghmerti no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Uma abordagem profunda baseada em palavras e caracteres para identificação de linguagem ofensiva', 'fr': "Ghmerti au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: Une approche approfondie basée sur les mots et les caractères pour l'identification du langage offensant", 'es': 'Ghmerti en la Tarea 6 de Semeval-2019: Un enfoque profundo basado en palabras y caracteres para la identificación del lenguaje ofensivo', 'ja': 'Ghmerti at SemEval -2019 Task 6: Deep Word and Character - based Approach to Offensive Language Identification', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 6 पर Ghmerti: आक्रामक भाषा पहचान के लिए एक गहरा शब्द- और चरित्र-आधारित दृष्टिकोण', 'zh': 'Ghmerti在SemEval-2019务6:盖单词字之犯言识别方法', 'ru': 'Ghmerti на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Глубокий словесно-символический подход к оскорбительной идентификации языка', 'ga': 'Ghmerti ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Cur Chuige Doimhin Focal agus Carachtar i leith Sainaithint Teanga Ionsaitheach', 'ka': 'დამერტი semiEval-2019 სამუშაო დავალება 6: ძალიან სიტყვების და სიტყვების დაბათებული დაეხმარება სუფლიო ენის იდენტიფიკაციისთვის', 'hu': 'Ghmerti a SemEval-2019 6. feladat: A támadó nyelv azonosításának mély szó- és karakteralapú megközelítése', 'el': 'Εργασία 6: Μια βαθιά προσέγγιση με βάση τις λέξεις και τους χαρακτήρες στην προσβλητική αναγνώριση γλωσσών', 'kk': 'Гмерти шешінші тапсырмасының шешінші шегінде: Тіпті сөз мен таңбалар негіздеген қатынау', 'lt': 'Ghmerti at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A Deep Word- and Character-based Approach to Offensive Language Identification', 'mk': 'Ghmerti на SemEval-2019 задача 6: Длабок пристап базиран на зборови и знаци за идентификација на навредливиот јазик', 'it': "Ghmerti a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Approccio profondo basato su parole e caratteri all'identificazione del linguaggio offensivo", 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6: ആഴത്തിലുള്ള വാക്ക്- അക്ഷരത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള അക്ഷരസഞ്ചയത്തിലേക്കുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനമാ', 'ms': 'Ghmerti pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: pendekatan mendalam berdasarkan perkataan dan aksara kepada Pengenalan Bahasa Meninggal', 'mt': 'Ghmerti fis-SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6: Approċċ profond ibbażat fuq il-kliem u l-karattri għall-Identifikazzjoni tal-Lingwa Offensiva', 'mn': 'Гмертийн SemEval-2019 Тапсыг 6: Гүнзгий үг болон харьцаа суурилсан Холбооны идентификацийн ойлголт', 'no': 'Ghmerti på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 6: ein dyp ord- og teiknbasert tilgang til offensive språk- identifisering', 'pl': 'Zadanie 6: Głębokie podejście oparte na słowach i znakach do identyfikacji języka ofensywnego', 'sr': 'Гмерти на полевалу-2019 задач 6: глубок приход на речи и характеру базиран на офенсивном језиковом идентификацији', 'ro': 'Ghmerti la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: O abordare profundă bazată pe cuvinte și caractere a identificării limbajului ofensiv', 'so': 'Shaqada SemEval-2019', 'si': 'ග්මෙර්ටී සම්වෙල්-2019 වැඩ 6: ගොඩක් වචන- සහ අක්ෂර- අධාරිත භාෂාව පරික්ෂණයට අවස්ථාව', 'sv': 'Ghmerti på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: Ett djupt ord- och teckenbaserat förhållningssätt till kränkande språkidentifiering', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 6: A Deep Word- and Character- based Approach to Offensive Language Identification', 'ur': 'جمرتی سیم اول-2019 ٹاکس ۶ میں: ایک عمیق کلام اور کریٹر-بنیاد اوفنسیو زبان شناسایی کے لئے تقریبا ہے', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifani 6: A Deep Word- and Character- based Approach to Offensive language identification', 'vi': 'Ghimerti at SemEvl-thẩm mỹ Task 6: A Deep Word- and character-based tiếp cận tới Biện diện Ngôn ngữ Hành động', 'bg': 'Задача 6: Дълбок подход, основан на думи и знаци, към идентифицирането на офанзивен език', 'da': 'Ghmerti på SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: En dyb ord- og tegnbaseret tilgang til offensiv sprogidentifikation', 'hr': 'Ghmerti na pola Evala-2019 zadatku 6: dubok pristup identifikaciji jezika na riječi i karakterima', 'nl': 'Ghmerti bij SemEval-2019 Taak 6: Een diepe woord- en karaktergebaseerde benadering van offensieve taalidentificatie', 'de': 'Ghmerti bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabenstellung 6: Ein tiefer wortbasierter und charakterbasierter Ansatz zur offensiven Sprachidentifikation', 'ko': 'Ghmerti가 SemEval-19 작업 6: 단어와 문자를 기반으로 하는 공격적인 언어 식별 방법', 'id': 'Ghmerti di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Sebuah pendekatan mendalam berdasarkan kata dan karakter untuk Identifikasi Bahasa Meninggal', 'fa': 'گامرتی در ماه\u200cسال-۲۰۱۹ کار ۶: یک دسترسی به شناسایی زبان عمیق و شخصیت', 'sw': 'Ghmerti kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 6: A deep Word- and Character based On On Official Language', 'af': 'Ghmerti by SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 6: 芒聙聶n Deep Woord- en Karakter- gebaseerde toegang na Offensive Taal Identifikasie', 'sq': 'Ghmerti në SemEval-2019 Task 6: A Deep Word- and Character-based Approach to Offensive Language Identification', 'am': 'Eval-2019 ስራ 6: A Deep Word- and Character-based Approach to Offensive language Identification', 'tr': 'SemEval-2019 Task 6: A Deep Word- and Character-based Approach to Offensive Language Identification', 'hy': 'Գմերթին 2019 թվականի կիսագնդի 6. հանձնարարությունը. խորը բառերի և առանձնահատկությունների հիմնված մոտեցումը', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Gözəl 6: Yerli Söz-və Karakter-tabanlı Təşkil İşkilinə Yaxınlıq', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2019 কাজ ৬: একটি গভীর শব্দ- এবং অক্ষরের ভিত্তিক অফিসেন্ট ভাষার পরিচয়ের দিকে যাওয়ার যোগাযোগ', 'bs': 'Ghmerti na semiEval-2019 zadatku 6: dubok pristup identifikaciji jezika na reči i karakterima', 'ca': 'Ghmerti at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A Deep Word- and Character-based Approach to Offensive Language Identification', 'cs': 'Ghmerti na SemEval-2019 Úkol 6: Hluboký přístup k identifikaci jazyka založený na slovech a znakách', 'et': 'Ghmerti SemEval-2019 ülesanne 6: sügav sõna- ja märgipõhine lähenemisviis ründava keele identifitseerimisele', 'fi': 'Ghmerti SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 6: Syvä sana- ja merkkipohjainen lähestymistapa loukkaavaan kielentunnistukseen', 'jv': 'Ganmerti at semi-inval-2011 task 6: A deep Word- and character-supported Method to offensive Language ID', 'sk': 'Ghmerti na SemEval-2019 Naloga 6: Globok pristop na podlagi besed in znakov k napadalni identifikaciji jezika', 'ha': 'QFontDatabase', 'he': 'Ghmerti ב SemEval-2019 משימה 6: גישה עמוקה מבוססת מילים ומסמכים לזהות שפה פגיעה', 'bo': 'Ghmerti at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A Deep Word- and Character-based Approach to Offensive Language Identification'}
{'en': 'This paper presents the models submitted by Ghmerti team for subtasks A and B of the OffensEval shared task at SemEval 2019. OffensEval addresses the problem of identifying and categorizing offensive language in social media in three subtasks ; whether or not a content is offensive (subtask A), whether it is targeted (subtask B) towards an individual, a group, or other entities (subtask C). The proposed approach includes character-level Convolutional Neural Network, word-level Recurrent Neural Network, and some preprocessing. The performance achieved by the proposed model is 77.93 % macro-averaged F1-score.', 'ar': 'تعرض هذه الورقة النماذج التي قدمها فريق Ghmerti للمهام الفرعية A و B للمهمة المشتركة OffensEval في SemEval 2019. تتناول OffensEval مشكلة تحديد وتصنيف اللغة المسيئة في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي في ثلاث مهام فرعية ؛ ما إذا كان المحتوى مسيئًا أم لا (المهمة الفرعية أ) ، سواء كان مستهدفًا (المهمة الفرعية ب) تجاه فرد أو مجموعة أو كيانات أخرى (المهمة الفرعية ج). يتضمن النهج المقترح الشبكة العصبية التلافيفية على مستوى الحرف ، والشبكة العصبية المتكررة على مستوى الكلمة ، وبعض المعالجة المسبقة. الأداء الذي حققه النموذج المقترح هو 77.93٪ متوسط درجة F1.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta os modelos apresentados pela equipe Ghmerti para as subtarefas A e B da tarefa compartilhada OffensEval no SemEval 2019. OffensEval aborda o problema de identificar e categorizar linguagem ofensiva nas mídias sociais em três subtarefas; se um conteúdo é ou não ofensivo (subtarefa A), se é direcionado (subtarefa B) a um indivíduo, grupo ou outras entidades (subtarefa C). A abordagem proposta inclui Rede Neural Convolucional em nível de caractere, Rede Neural Recorrente em nível de palavra e algum pré-processamento. O desempenho alcançado pelo modelo proposto é de 77,93% do F1-score médio macro.', 'fr': "Cet article présente les modèles soumis par l'équipe Ghmerti pour les sous-tâches A et B de la tâche partagée OffenseVal au SemEval 2019. OffenseVal aborde le problème de l'identification et de la catégorisation du langage offensant dans les médias sociaux en trois sous-tâches\xa0: si un contenu est offensant ou non (sous-tâche A), s'il est ciblé (sous-tâche B) vers un individu, un groupe ou d'autres entités (sous-tâche C). L'approche proposée comprend un réseau de neurones convolutifs au niveau des caractères, un réseau de neurones récurrent au niveau des mots et un certain prétraitement. La performance obtenue par le modèle proposé est de 77,93\xa0% de score F1 macro-moyen.", 'es': 'Este artículo presenta los modelos presentados por el equipo de Ghmerti para las subtareas A y B de la tarea compartida OffensEval en SemEval 2019. OffensEval aborda el problema de identificar y clasificar el lenguaje ofensivo en las redes sociales en tres subtareas: si un contenido es ofensivo o no (subtarea A), si está dirigido (subtarea B) a un individuo, un grupo u otras entidades (subtarea C). El enfoque propuesto incluye una Red Neural Convolucional a nivel de caracteres, una Red Neural Recurrente a nivel de palabra y algún preprocesamiento. El rendimiento alcanzado por el modelo propuesto es de una puntuación F1 macropromediada del 77,93%.', 'ja': 'この論文では、SemEval 2019でのOffensEval共有タスクのサブタスクAとBのためにGhmertiチームが提出したモデルを紹介します。OffensEvalは、3つのサブタスクでソーシャルメディアで不快な言葉を識別して分類する問題に取り組みます。コンテンツが不快であるかどうか（サブタスクA ）、個人、グループ、または他のエンティティを対象としているかどうか（サブタスクB ） （サブタスクC ）です。提案されたアプローチには、文字レベルの畳み込みニューラルネットワーク、ワードレベルの再帰ニューラルネットワーク、およびいくつかの前処理が含まれる。提案されたモデルが達成したパフォーマンスは、77.93 ％のマクロ平均F 1スコアです。', 'zh': '本文引Ghmerti团队为SemEval 2019上OffensEval共享子职者A与B交形。 OffensEval于三子之中决知类社交媒体犯性言语。 有犯(子 A),有团体有(C)。 所上法兼字符级卷积神经网络、字级递归神经网络及预处理。 所提模性能为77.93%者宏观均F1得分。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर सेमेवल 2019 में ऑफेन्सएवल साझा कार्य के उपकार्यों ए और बी के लिए घमरती टीम द्वारा प्रस्तुत मॉडल प्रस्तुत करता है। OffensEval तीन subtasks में सोशल मीडिया में आपत्तिजनक भाषा की पहचान करने और वर्गीकृत करने की समस्या को संबोधित करता है; चाहे कोई सामग्री आक्रामक है या नहीं (सबटास्क ए), चाहे वह किसी व्यक्ति, समूह, या अन्य संस्थाओं (सबटास्क सी) की ओर लक्षित (सबटास्क बी) हो। प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण में चरित्र-स्तर के Convolutional Neural Network, Word-level Recurrent Neural Network और कुछ preprocessing शामिल हैं। प्रस्तावित मॉडल द्वारा प्राप्त प्रदर्शन 77.93% मैक्रो-औसत F1-स्कोर है।', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе представлены модели, представленные командой Ghmerti для подзадач A и B совместной задачи OffensEval на SemEval 2019. OffensEval решает проблему идентификации и классификации оскорбительного языка в социальных сетях в трех подзадачах: является ли контент оскорбительным (подзадача A), является ли он целевым (подзадача B) по отношению к человеку, группе или другим сущностям (подзадача C). Предлагаемый подход включает сверточную нейронную сеть на уровне символов, рекуррентную нейронную сеть на уровне слов и некоторую предварительную обработку. Эффективность, достигаемая предлагаемой моделью, составляет 77,93% от макроусредненного показателя F1.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair na múnlaí a chuir foireann Ghmerti isteach d’fhothascanna A agus B de thasc roinnte OffensEval ag SemEval 2019. Tugann OffensEval aghaidh ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le teanga ionsaitheach a aithint agus a chatagóiriú sna meáin shóisialta i dtrí fhothasc; cibé an bhfuil nó nach bhfuil ábhar maslach (fothasc A), cibé an bhfuil sé dírithe (fothasc B) ar dhuine aonair, ar ghrúpa nó ar aonáin eile (fothasc C). Áiríonn an cur chuige atá beartaithe Líonra Néarrach Comhdhlúite ag leibhéal carachtar, Líonra Néarach Athfhillteach ar leibhéal focal, agus roinnt réamhphróiseála. Is é an fheidhmíocht atá bainte amach ag an tsamhail bheartaithe ná 77.93% macra-mheánscór F1.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a Ghmerti csapat által benyújtott modelleket a SemEval 2019 OffensEval megosztott feladatának A és B altfeladatához. Az OffensEval a sértő nyelvek azonosításának és kategorizálásának problémáját a közösségi médiában három alcsoportban foglalkozik; függetlenül attól, hogy egy tartalom sértő-e (A résztevékenység), hogy az egyénre, csoportra vagy más entitásokra irányul-e (B résztevékenység). A javasolt megközelítés magában foglalja a karakterszintű Convolucional Neural Network, a szószintű Recurrent Neural Network és néhány előfeldolgozás. A javasolt modell által elért teljesítmény 77,93% makro-átlagos F1 pontszám.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει τα μοντέλα που υποβλήθηκαν από την ομάδα Ghmerti για τις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες Α και Β της κοινής εργασίας OffensEval στο SemEval 2019. Το αντιμετωπίζει το πρόβλημα του εντοπισμού και της κατηγοριοποίησης προσβλητικής γλώσσας στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης σε τρεις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες. εάν ένα περιεχόμενο είναι προσβλητικό ή όχι (δευτερεύουσα εργασία Α), εάν στοχεύει (δευτερεύουσα εργασία Β) σε ένα άτομο, μια ομάδα ή άλλες οντότητες (δευτερεύουσα εργασία Γ). Η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση περιλαμβάνει το Σύλληπτο Νευρικό Δίκτυο σε επίπεδο χαρακτήρων, το Επαναληπτικό Νευρικό Δίκτυο σε επίπεδο λέξεων και κάποια προεπεξεργασία. Η απόδοση που επιτυγχάνεται με το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο είναι 77,93% μακρομέσου βαθμού F1.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტის მოდელები, რომლებიც დამუშავებულია დამუშავებული მოდელები, რომლებიც საშუალო 2019 წლის საშუალოდ OffensEval-ის საშუალოდ A და B საშუალოდ. OffensEval addresses the problem of identifying and categorizing offensive language in social media in three subtasks; ცხოვრება არა ან არა (A-სკითხვა) განსაზღვრებულია თუ არა (B-სკითხვა) განსაზღვრებულია განსაზღვრებულია, ჯგუფი ან სხვა ინტერტიები (C-სკითხვა). პროგრამეტრების შესაძლებელი პროგრამის შესაძლებელია სიმბოლოების დონე კონტროლური ნეიროლური ქსელი, სიტყვების დონე კონტროლური ნეიროლურ პროგრამეტური მოდელზე გავაკეთებული მონაცემები 77,93% მაკრო განსაზღვრებული F1 მონაცემები.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta i modelli presentati dal team Ghmerti per le sottoattività A e B del compito condiviso OffensEval a SemEval 2019. OffensEval affronta il problema dell'identificazione e della categorizzazione del linguaggio offensivo nei social media in tre sottoattività; se un contenuto è offensivo o meno (sottoattività A), se è mirato (sottoattività B) verso un individuo, un gruppo o altre entità (sottoattività C). L'approccio proposto include la Rete Neurale Convoluzionale a livello di carattere, la Rete Neurale Recurrente a livello di parola e alcuni pre-elaborazione. La performance raggiunta dal modello proposto è pari al 77,93% di punteggio F1 macro-medio.", 'mk': 'Овој весник ги претставува моделите поднесени од тимот на Гмерти за подпрашањата А и Б на заедничката задача на OffensEval на SemEval 2019 година. OffensEval го решава проблемот со идентификувањето и категоризирањето на офанзивниот јазик во социјалните медиуми во три потпрашања; дали содржината е навредлива (субпрашање А), дали е насочена (субпрашање Б) кон индивидуал, група или други ентитети (субпрашање Ц). Предложениот пристап вклучува конволуционална неурална мрежа на ниво на карактери, рекурентна неурална мрежа на ниво на зборови и некои препроцеси. Резултатот постигнат од предложениот модел е 77,93 отсто од макро-просечниот F1-резултат.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatomi Ghmerti komandos pateikti bendros užduoties „OffensEval“ A ir B papunkčių modeliai 2019 m. SemEval. OffensEval sprendžia problem ą, susijusią su priešiškos kalbos nustatymu ir klasifikavimu social in ėje žiniasklaidoje į tris paklausimus; ar turinys yra agresyvus (A paklausimas), ar jis skirtas (B paklausimas) asmeniui, grupei ar kitiems subjektams (C paklausimas). Siūlomas metodas apima simbolių lygio konvoliucinį nervinį tinklą, žodžių lygio pakartotinį nervinį tinklą ir tam tikrą parengiamąjį procesą. Siūlomo modelio rezultatai yra 77,93 % makroekonominio vidurkio F1.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2019 жылы SemEval-де OffensEval ортақ тапсырманың A және B суреттерінің Гмерти командасының үлгілерін көрсетеді. OffensEval addresses the problem of identifying and categorizing offensive language in social media in three subtasks; and Мазмұның қарсы (A асты сұрақ), бұл (B асты сұрақ) жеке, топ немесе басқа нысандарға (C асты сұрақ) мақсат етілмейді. Келтірілген тәсілі таңбалардың деңгейіндегі Конверсионалды нейрондық желі, сөздің деңгейіндегі қайталанатын нейрондық желі және кейбір алдын- ала өткізу. Келтірілген үлгісінің істеу 77,93% макро орташа F1 нүктесі.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan model yang dihantar oleh pasukan Ghmerti untuk subtasks A dan B dari tugas terkongsi OffensEval di SemEval 2019. OffensEval mengatasi masalah mengenali pengenalan dan kategorisasi bahasa serangan dalam media sosial dalam tiga sub-tanya; sama ada kandungan adalah ofensif (subtask A), sama ada ia ditujukan (subtask B) kepada individu, kumpulan, atau entiti lain (subtask C). Pendekatan yang dicadangkan termasuk Rangkaian Neural Berubah Aras-aksara, Rangkaian Neural Berulang Aras-perkataan, dan beberapa pemprosesan. Performasi yang dicapai oleh model yang diusulkan adalah 77.93% makro-rata-nilai F1.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഗാമെര്\u200dട്ടി ടീമില്\u200d നിന്നും കൊടുത്തിരിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d സെമ്മെവാല്\u200d 2019-ല്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dത്ത ജോലിയുടെ  ഓഫെന്\u200dസ്\u200cഎവാല്\u200d മൂന്നു ഉപജോലികളില്\u200d സോഷ്യല്\u200d മെഡിയയില്\u200d അപകടത്തിലെ ഭാഷ തിരിച്ചറിയുകയും വിഭാഗിക്കുകയും ചെയ ഒരു ഉള്ളടക്കം ആക്രമിക്കുന്നതാണോ അല്ലെങ്കിലും (subtask A), ഒരു വ്യക്തിക്ക്, ഒരു കൂട്ടം, അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d മറ്റൊരു വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്ക് ലക്ഷ്യം  പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്ക്, വാക്ക്- നീറല്\u200d വീണ്ടും വീണ്ടും വരുത്തുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രദര്\u200dശനം 77. 93% മാക്രോയില്\u200d സാധാരണ എഫ്\u200c1 സ്കോര്\u200d.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь Гмерти багийнхан 2019 оны SemEval-д ОфенсEval-ын А болон B сурагчдын загварын загварыг тайлбарладаг. OffensEval нь нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчдийн хэлний тодорхойлолт, хуваалцах асуудлыг гурван асуудлын дотор харуулж байна. Бүгдээрээ агуулагдаж байгаа эсэхийг (А доогуур асуулт), хүн, бүлэг, эсвэл бусад агуулагдаж байгаа эсэхийг (B доогуур асуулт) зориулагдсан эсэхийг (С доогуур асуулт). Тайлбарласан арга барилга нь хариу түвшин-түвшин Конvolutional Neural Network, үгний түвшин дахин дахин сэтгэл хөлөг болон зарим өмнө ажиллах юм. Загварчлал дээр гарсан үйл ажиллагаа нь F1-н дундаж макро-дундаж 77.93%.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta l-mudelli ppreżentati mit-tim ta’ Ghmerti għas-sottomistoqsijiet A u B tal-kompitu kondiviż ta’ OffensEval f’SemEval 2019. OffensEval tindirizza l-problema tal-identifikazzjoni u l-kategorizzazzjoni tal-lingwa offensiva fil-midja soċjali fi tliet sottomistoqsijiet; jekk kontenut huwiex ofensiv jew le (sottomistoqsija A), jekk huwiex immirat (sottomistoqsija B) lejn individwu, grupp, jew entitajiet oħra (sottomistoqsija C). L-approċċ propost jinkludi netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali fil-livell tal-karattri, netwerk newrali rikorrenti fil-livell tal-kliem, u xi proċessi minn qabel. Il-prestazzjoni miksuba mill-mudell propost hija ta’ 77.93% punteġġ F1 makro-medju.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser modelane som er sendt av Ghmerti-gruppa for subtaskar A og B av OffensEval-delt oppgåve i semiEval 2019. OffensEval addresses the problem of identifying and categorizing offensive language in social media in three subtasks; Om ein innhald er offensiv (subtspør A), om det er målet (subtspør B) mot ein individuell, ein gruppe eller andre einingar (subtspør C). Dette første tilnærminga inneheld konvolusjonell neuralnettverk, ordnivå gjentakelig neuralnettverk, og nokre førehandsaming. Utviklinga gjennomført av den foreslåde modellen er 77,93% makro- gjennomsnittsfarge F1- poeng.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono modele zgłoszone przez zespół Ghmerti dla podzadań A i B wspólnego zadania OffensEval podczas SemEval 2019. OffensEval rozwiązuje problem identyfikacji i kategoryzacji języka obraźliwego w mediach społecznościowych w trzech podzadaniach; czy treść jest obraźliwa (podzadanie A), czy jest skierowana (podzadanie B) do osoby fizycznej, grupy lub innych podmiotów (podzadanie C). Proponowane podejście obejmuje Konwolucyjną Sieć Neuralną na poziomie znaków, Powtarzającą Sieć Neuralną na poziomie słowa oraz niektóre wstępne przetwarzanie. Wydajność osiągnięta przez proponowany model to 77,93% makro średni wynik F1.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea prezintă modelele prezentate de echipa Ghmerti pentru subactivitățile A și B ale sarcinii comune OffensEval la SemEval 2019. OffensEval abordează problema identificării și clasificării limbajului ofensator în rețelele sociale în trei subactivități; dacă un conținut este ofensator sau nu (subactivitatea A), dacă este direcționat (subactivitatea B) către o persoană, un grup sau alte entități (subactivitatea C). Abordarea propusă include Rețeaua Neurală Convoluțională la nivel de caracter, Rețeaua Neurală Recurentă la nivel de cuvânt și unele preprocese. Performanța obținută de modelul propus este de 77,93% scor F1 macro-mediu.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja modele koje je predao grupa Ghmerti za podatke A i B delnog zadatka OffensEval u semiEvalu 2019. OffensEval rješava problem identifikacije i kategorizacije ofanzivnog jezika u društvenim medijima u tri podkaza; da li je sadržaj ofanzivan (podpitaj A), da li je ciljan (podpitaj B) prema pojedincu, grupi ili drugim entitetima (podpitaj C). Predloženi pristup uključuje konvolucionu neuronu mrežu na nivou karaktera, povratnu neuronu mrežu riječi i neku preobradu. Izvrsnost postignuta predloženim modelom je 77,93% makro-srednji rezultat F1.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුව පෙන්වන්නේ ග්මෙර්ටි කණ්ඩායමෙන් පෙන්වන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය සෙම්වල් 2019 දී අෆෙන්ස්වල් වල A සහ B වලින්. Offenseval address the error of ID and category of disorder language in mobile medias in three subtask; in සාමාන්ත්\u200dරයක් අපරාධක වෙන්නේ නැත්නම් (A සබ්ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්), ඒක අලක්ෂාව (B සබ්ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්) වෙන්නේ නැත්නම්, කණ්ඩ ප්\u200dරතිශ්න විධානයේ අක්ෂර- තත්වය සම්පූර්ණ නිර්මාණ ජාලය, වචන- තත්වය ආයුත් නිර්මාණ ජාලය, සහ ප ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ලැබෙන ප්\u200dරමාණය 77.93% මැක්රෝ සාමාන්\u200dයය F1- ස්කෝර්.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu soo bandhigaa modellada ay kooxda Ghmerti u soo dhiibeen shaqada A iyo B ee OffensEval oo lagu qaybsaday SemEval 2019. OffensEval wuxuu saddex meelood ku qoran dhibaatada aqoonsiga iyo ku kala qeybinayaa luqada dembiga ee shabakadda bulshada. Inuu waxyaabaha ku jirto ama aysan aheyn wax dhib ah (sub-shaqo A), waxaa loogu talagalay mid gaar ah, koox, koox kale ama waxyaabo kale (sub-shaqo C). The proposed approach includes character-level Convolutional Neural Network, word-level Recurrent Neural Network, and some preprocessing.  Dhaqashada muusikada la soo jeedo waa 77.93% macro-average F1 score.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar de modeller som lämnats in av Ghmerti team för deluppgifterna A och B i OffensEval delade uppgift på SemEval 2019. OffensEval behandlar problemet med att identifiera och kategorisera stötande språk i sociala medier i tre underaktiviteter; om ett innehåll är stötande eller inte (underuppgift A), om det är riktat (underuppgift B) mot en individ, en grupp eller andra enheter (underuppgift C). Det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet inkluderar konvulutionellt neuralt nätverk på karaktärsnivå, återkommande neuralt nätverk på ordnivå och vissa förbehandling. Den prestanda som uppnås med den föreslagna modellen är 77,93% makro-genomsnittet F1-poäng.', 'ta': 'இந்த paper presents the models submitted by Ghmerti team for subtasks A and B of the OffensEval shared task at SemEval 2019. OffensEval addresses the problem of identifying and categorizing offensive language in social media in three subtasks;  உள்ளடக்கத்தின் உள்ளடக்கம் சுற்றுதலாக இருந்தாலும் அல்லது இல்லையா (துணை செயல்) தனியாருக்கு, ஒரு குழு, அல்லது மற்ற பொருள் (உச்செயல் C பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாடு எழுத்து- மட்டத்தில் தொகுதி நெருக்கர் வலைப்பின்னல், சொல்- நிலை மீண்டும் நியுரால் வலை பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரியால் செயல்கூறு 77. 93% மாக்ரோ- சராசரி F1- score.', 'ur': 'This paper presents the models submitted by Ghmerti team for subtasks A and B of the OffensEval shared task at SemEval 2019. OffensEval نے سوسیل میڈیا میں تین سٹسٹسٹ میں فساد کی زبان شناسایی اور ترکیب کی مسئلہ کو سمجھا ہے۔ یا کوئی موجود نافرمانی ہے یا نہ ہے، یا کسی شخص کی طرف ہدایت کی گئی ہے، ایک گروہ یا دوسرے گروہوں کی طرف، پیغمبر کی تقریبا کے ذریعے شخص-سطح کانرول نیورال نیورل نیٹ ورک، کلمات-سطح دوبارہ نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک، اور کچھ پہلے پرپرپرسس کرنے میں شامل ہے. پیشنهاد مدل کے ذریعہ پہنچ جانے والی عملکرد 77.93% مکرو متوسط F1-اسکور ہے.', 'uz': "Bu sahifa SemEval 2019 yilda qaytarilgan vazifalar A va B kabi vazifalar uchun Ghmerti guruhi modellarini koʻrsatiladi. OffensEval uchta vazifalarda sosial media ta'sirli tilni aniqlash va kattalashtirish muammolarini boshqaradi; Ikkilamchi vazifa Name Aniqlanadigan modelning bajarishi 77.93% makro- asosiy F1 scori.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này trình bày các mẫu được nhóm Ghilti gửi cho phụ đề A và B của giao dịch OffensEvl tại Semkhai Ben. OffensEvl giải quyết vấn đề nhận diện và phân loại ngôn ngữ tấn công trên phương tiện xã hội bằng ba mặt phụ; dù nội dung có bị tấn công hay không, phụ đề A, hay mục tiêu (phụ đề B) đối với một cá nhân, một nhóm hay một thực thể khác (phụ đề C). Cách tiếp cận đề nghị bao gồm gồm gồm mạng thần kinh thuyết phục, mạng tiếp tế thần kinh ở mức chữ, và một số phương pháp tạm thời. Thành quả được đạt bằng mẫu được là 77.93. Vĩ tính con số F1-điểm.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя моделите, представени от екипа на Гмерти за подзадачи А и Б от споделената задача на СемЕвал 2019. Разглежда проблема с идентифицирането и категоризирането на офанзивен език в социалните медии в три подзадачи; дали дадено съдържание е обидно или не (подзадача А), дали е насочено (подзадача Б) към физическо лице, група или други субекти (подзадача В). Предложеният подход включва конволюционна неврална мрежа на ниво символ, повтаряща се неврална мрежа на ниво дума и някои предварителни обработки. Резултатите, постигнати с предложения модел, са 77,93% макросреднени.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer de modeller, som Ghmerti team har indsendt til underopgaver A og B i OffensEval delte opgave på SemEval 2019. OffensEval adresserer problemet med at identificere og kategorisere stødende sprog i sociale medier i tre underopgaver; om et indhold er stødende (underopgave A), om det er målrettet (underopgave B) mod en person, en gruppe eller andre enheder (underopgave C). Den foreslåede fremgangsmåde omfatter karakterniveau Convolutional Neural Network, ordniveau Recurrent Neural Network og nogle forbehandling. Den præstation, der opnås af den foreslåede model, er 77,93% makro-gennemsnit F1 score.', 'nl': 'Deze paper presenteert de modellen die zijn ingediend door het Ghmerti team voor subtaken A en B van de OffensEval gedeelde taak op SemEval 2019. OffensEval behandelt het probleem van het identificeren en categoriseren van aanstootgevende taal in sociale media in drie subtaken; of een inhoud aanstootgevend is (subtaak A), of deze gericht is (subtaak B) op een individu, een groep of andere entiteiten (subtaak C). De voorgestelde aanpak omvat het Convolutional Neural Network op karakterniveau, het Recurrent Neural Network op woordniveau en wat voorbewerking. De prestaties van het voorgestelde model zijn 77,93% macro-gemiddelde F1-score.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja modele koje je Ghmerti tim podnio za podatke A i B zajedničkog zadatka OffensEval na semiEvalu 2019. godine. OffensEval rješava problem identifikacije i kategorizacije ofanzivnog jezika u društvenim medijima u tri podstavke; da li je sadržaj ofanzivan ili ne (podpitaj A), da li je ciljan (podpitaj B) prema pojedincu, grupi ili drugim subjektima (podpitaj C). Predloženi pristup uključuje konvolucionu neuronu mrežu na nivou karaktera, povratnu neuronu mrežu riječi i neku preobradu. Proizvodnja postignuta predloženim modelom je 77,93% makro-srednji rezultat F1.', 'ko': '본고는 Ghmerti팀이 2019년 SemEval 회의에서 제출한 공격 공유 임무 서브퀘스트 A와 B의 모델을 소개한다.Offenseval은 세 가지 하위 임무에서 소셜 미디어에서 공격적인 언어를 식별하고 분류하는 문제를 해결했다.내용이 공격적(하위 임무 a)인지, 개인, 그룹 또는 다른 실체(하위 임무 C)를 대상으로 하는지 여부.이 방법은 문자급 권적신경망, 문자급 귀속신경망, 그리고 일부 예처리를 포함한다.이 모델의 성능은 77.93%의 거시 평균 F1 점수에 달했다.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag werden die vom Ghmerti-Team eingereichten Modelle für Teilaufgaben A und B der gemeinsamen Aufgabe OffensEval bei SemEval 2019 vorgestellt. OffensEval befasst sich mit dem Problem der Identifizierung und Kategorisierung anstößiger Sprache in sozialen Medien in drei Teilaufgaben; ob ein Inhalt beleidigend ist (Teilaufgabe A), ob er auf eine Einzelperson, eine Gruppe oder andere Einheiten ausgerichtet ist (Teilaufgabe C). Der vorgeschlagene Ansatz umfasst Convolutional Neural Network auf Zeichenebene, Recurrent Neural Network auf Wortebene und einige Vorverarbeitung. Die mit dem vorgeschlagenen Modell erzielte Leistung beträgt 77,93% makrodurchschnittlicher F1-Score.', 'id': 'Kertas ini memperlihatkan model yang dikirim oleh tim Ghmerti untuk subtasks A dan B dari tugas yang dibagi OffensEval di SemEval 2019. OffensEval mengatasi masalah mengenai identifikasi dan kategorisasi bahasa offensive dalam media sosial dalam tiga subtasks; apakah konten offensif (subtask A) atau tidak, apakah itu ditujukan (subtask B) kepada individu, kelompok, atau entitas lain (subtask C). pendekatan yang diusulkan termasuk jaringan saraf konvolusi tingkat karakter, jaringan saraf rekurren tingkat kata, dan beberapa preproses. The performance achieved by the proposed model is 77.93% macro-averaged F1-score.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaonyesha mifano iliyotolewa na timu ya Ghmerti kwa ajili ya kazi A na B ya OffensEval ilishirikisha katika SemEval 2019. OffensEval anaelezea tatizo la kutambua na kugawanya lugha ya matusi katika mitandao ya kijamii katika majukumu matatu; Ikiwa maudhui ni uvunjifu (kazi ya chini ya A), ikiwa imelengwa (kazi ya subira B) kwa mtu binafsi, kundi, au vyombo vingine (kazi za chini ya subira C). Mfumo wa pendekezo unajumuisha Mtandao wa Kitabia wa Neural unaoandikwa, Mtandao wa Neural unaoendelea kwa maneno, na baadhi ya utaratibu. Uonyesho uliotekelezwa na muundo wa pendekezo ni asilimia 77.93 yenye wastani wa F1 kwa wastani.', 'af': 'Hierdie papier stel die modele wat deur Ghmerti-span voorgestuur word vir subtaske A en B van die OffensEval gedeelde taak by SemEval 2019. OffensEval addresses the problem of identifying and categorizing offensive language in social media in three subtasks; and of â\x80\x99n inhoud offensiv is of nie (subtask A), of dit doel is (subtask B) teenoor â\x80\x99n individueel, â\x80\x99n groep of ander entiteite (subtask C). Die voorgestelde toegang inkluit karaktervlak Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerk, woord vlak Herhaling Neurale Netwerk en sommige voorbereiding. Die prestasie wat deur die voorgestelde model bereik word is 77,93% makro-gemiddelde F1-telling.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ مدل\u200cهایی که توسط تیم جمرتی فرستاده شده\u200cاند را برای پاسپوسهای A و B از کار مشترک OffensEval در SemEval 2019 نشان می\u200cدهد. OffensEval مشکل شناسایی و تنظیم زبان تجاوز در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی در سه سوت\u200cسؤال را دریافت می\u200cکند. آیا محتوای نافرمانی است یا نه (زیر سوال A) آیا هدف (زیر سوال B) به یک فرد، یک گروه یا یک فرد دیگر (زیر سوال C) است. این دستور پیشنهاد شامل شبکه عصبی معمولی سطح شخصیت، شبکه عصبی و بعضی پیش\u200cپردازی است. عمليات توسط مدل پيشنهاد رسيده شده 77.93 درصد نقطه\u200cي F1 متوسط مکرو است.', 'am': 'ይህም ገጽ የጋሜሪት መድረክ በሴmEval 2019 የኦፎensEval ስራ አ እና B የተካፈሉትን አካባቢዎችን ያቀርባል፡፡ Eval በሦስት ደብዳቤዎች ውስጥ በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ውስጥ የሚያሳውቃትንና የሚያሳውቃትን ቋንቋን የሚያሳውቅ ጉዳይ ይታያል፡፡ ማኅበረሰብ አሰናክሎ ቢሆን (አዳዲስ ስራ B) ወደ አንድ፣ ጉባኤ ወይም ሌሎች አካላት (subtask C) ቢሆን ነው፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ጥያቄ በጽሑፍ-ደረጃው የነጥብ መረብ፣ የቃላት-ደረጃ ቀጥተኛ ኔural መረብ እና አንዳንድ ቅድሚያ ተጨማሪ ነው፡፡ በሞዴል የተደረገውን የድምፅ አርእስት 77.93 በመቶ ማክሮው የF1-score ነው።', 'tr': "Bu kagyz Ghmerti topary tarapyndan SemEval 2019-nji ýylda OffensEval'yň A we B soraglary üçin nusgalary görkezýär. Offens Mazmunlar hasaplanyşy däl bolmady (A asty soragy), hedefi bir adama, grupa ýa başga bir zata (C asty soragy). EOG Görkezilen nusga tarapyndan ýetip bolan zady 77,93% makro ortalamaly F1 अंतर.", 'sq': 'This paper presents the models submitted by Ghmerti team for subtasks A and B of the OffensEval shared task at SemEval 2019.  OffensEval trajton problem in e identifikimit dhe kategorizimit të gjuhës ofensive në media sociale në tre nënpyetje; nëse përmbajtja është ofensive (nënpyetje A), nëse është e synuar (nënpyetje B) ndaj një individ, një grupi apo njësive të tjera (nënpyetje C). Përqasja e propozuar përfshin rrjetin nervor konvolutiv të nivelit të karakterit, rrjetin nervor të përsëritur të nivelit të fjalëve dhe disa përgatitje. Performanca e arritur nga modeli i propozuar është 77.93% me makro-mesatar rezultat F1.', 'hy': 'This paper presents the models submitted by Ghmerti team for subtasks A and B of the OffensEval shared task at SemEval 2019.  ՕֆենսԵվալը լուծում է սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում գրավիչ լեզուների հայտնաբերման և դասակարգման խնդիրը երեք ենթահարցերով: թե արդյոք պարունակությունը գայթակղիչ է (A-ենթահարց), թե արդյոք այն նշանակում է (B-ենթահարց) անհատի, խմբի կամ այլ առանձին (C-ենթահարց): Առաջարկված մոտեցումը ներառում է բնորոշ նյարդային ցանց մակարդակի, բառի մակարդակի, վերադարձ նյարդային ցանց և որոշ նախամշակումներ: Առաջարկված մոդելի միջոցով ստացված արդյունքը 77.93 տոկոս է մակրոմիջին F1-գնահատականը:', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja modele koje je Ghmerti tim podnio za podatke A i B zajedničkog zadatka OffensEval u semiEvalu 2019. OffensEval rješava problem identifikacije i kategorizacije ofanzivnog jezika u društvenim medijima u tri podkaza; da li je sadržaj ofanziv ili ne (podpitaj A), da li je ciljan (podpitaj B) prema pojedincu, grupi ili drugim entitetima (podpitaj C). Predloženi pristup uključuje konvolucionu neuronu mrežu na nivou karaktera, povratnu neuronu mrežu riječi i neku preobradu. Proizvodnja postignuta predloženim modelom je 77,93% makro-srednji rezultat F1.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল ২০১৯ সালে অফিনসেনভালের সাবট্যাক্স এ এবং বির জন্য ঘামের্তি দলের প্রতি প্রদান করা মডেলের উপস্থাপন কর OffensEval addresses the problem of identifying and categorizing offensive language in social media in three subtasks;  একটি বিষয়বস্তু আক্রান্ত (সাবকাজ A) হিসেবে না থাকে কিনা। এটি ব্যক্তিকে লক্ষ্য করা হয় (সাবকাজ B), একটি গ্রুপ অথবা অন্যান্য বস্তুর প্ প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতিতে অক্ষর-স্তরের কনভোলেশন নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক, শব্দ-স্তর পুনরাবর্তন নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক এবং কিছু প্রক্রি প্রস্তাবিত মডেল দ্বারা অর্জন করেছে তা ৭৭. ৯৩% ম্যাক্রো-গড়ে F1-স্কোর।', 'ca': "Aquest paper presenta els models presentats per l'equip Ghmerti per les subtaskes A i B de la tasca compartida OffensEval a SemEval 2019. OffensEval aborda el problema de identificar i categoritzar la llengua ofensiva als mitjans socials en tres subterrànies; si un contingut és ofensiu o no (subtanya A), si està mirat (subtanya B) cap a un individu, un grup o altres entitats (subtanya C). L'enfocament proposat inclou Red Neural Convolutiva a nivell de caràcter, Red Neural Recurrent a nivell de paraules i alguns preparats. The performance achieved by the proposed model is 77.93% macro-averaged F1-score.", 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje modely předložené týmem Ghmerti pro dílčí úkoly A a B sdíleného úkolu OffensEval na SemEval 2019. OffensEval řeší problém identifikace a kategorizace urážlivého jazyka v sociálních médiích ve třech dílčích úkolech; zda je obsah urážlivý (podúkol A), zda je zaměřen (podúkol B) na jednotlivce, skupinu nebo jiné subjekty (podúkol C). Navržený přístup zahrnuje konveluční neuronovou síť na úrovni znaků, recidivní neuronovou síť na úrovni slov a některé předzpracování. Výkon dosažený navrženým modelem je 77,93% makro průměrného F1 skóre.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt, 2019-ci SemEval tərəfində OffensEval paylaşılan işlərin A və B subtaskları üçün Ghmerti takımının göndərilmiş modelleri göstərir. OffensEval üç dəstədə sosyal media içində offensiv dilini tanıma və kategoriyalarının problemini çəkir; B ütün məlumatlar günahkar olub olmadığını (A subtask), bir kişinin, bir qrupun, ya da başqa məlumatların (C subtask) tərəfindən müəyyən edilməsini istəyirsiniz. Təsdiq edilən tərzdə karakter-seviyyəti Konvolucional Nöral Ağı, sözlər-seviyyəti Yenidən Nöral Ağı və bəzi tərzdə işləmə daxilindir. Önülləşdirilmiş modellərin başarılı performansı 77,93% makro-ortalamalı F1 score idi.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustatakse Ghmerti meeskonna poolt esitatud mudeleid OffensEvali jagatud ülesande A ja B alamülesannete jaoks SemEval 2019. OffensEval käsitleb solvava keele tuvastamise ja kategoriseerimise probleemi sotsiaalmeedias kolmes alamülesandes; kas sisu on solvav või mitte (alaülesanne A), kas see on suunatud (alaülesanne B) üksikisikule, rühmale või muudele üksustele (alaülesanne C). Kavandatud lähenemisviis hõlmab märgitasemel konvolutsioonilist neurovõrku, sõnatasemel korduvat neurovõrku ja mõningat eeltöötlust. Kavandatud mudeli tulemuslikkus on 77,93% makrokeskmisest F1-skoorist.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään Ghmerti-tiimin toimittamat mallit OffensEval 2019 -tapahtuman alitehtäviin A ja B. OffensEval käsittelee sosiaalisen median loukkaavan kielen tunnistamista ja luokittelua kolmeen alatehtävään; onko sisältö loukkaavaa (alatehtävä A), onko se kohdistettu (alatehtävä B) yksilöä, ryhmää tai muita yhteisöjä kohtaan (alatehtävä C). Ehdotettu lähestymistapa sisältää merkkitason konvolutionaalisen hermoverkon, sanatason toistuvan hermoverkon ja jonkin verran esikäsittelyä. Ehdotetulla mallilla saavutettu suorituskyky on 77,93% makrokeskiarvo F1-pisteellä.', 'jv': 'Ngetongkat iki nambah model sing ngewehi nggawe ekip Ganmerti kanggo ngilangno A lan B lan mbuh cara offensinval nggawe lan seminval 2011. Language politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Laptop" and "Desktop Cutak nggawe barang nggambar maneh, 75.9% macro-Average F1', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bãyar da misãlai wanda aka aiko na Ghmeterti wa subtasks A da B wa the offenseval da aka raba aikin su a SemEV 2019. Inã addu'ar da matsalar da za'a gane da su categore lugha ɗin a cikin mitandan jamii uku; Idan wani maɓalli ya zama mai zartar da shi (subaikin A), ko da an yi amfani da shi zuwa wani mutum, jama'a, ko jama'a, ko da wasu abubuwa (subaikin C). The proposed approach includes character-level Convolutional Neural Network, word-level Recurrent Neural Network, and some preprocessing.  Tafiyar da aka samar da shi na motel wanda aka buƙata shi yana 77.93% macro-aged F1-score.", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מציג את הדוגמנים שנשלחו על ידי צוות גמרטי לתת השאלות A ו-B של המשימה המשותפת OffensEval בסימוול 2019. OffensEval מתייחס לבעיה של זיהוי וקטגוריזציה של שפה פגיעה בתקשורת חברתית בשלושה תושאות; האם התוכן מעליב או לא (תחת שאלה A), האם הוא ממוקד (תחת שאלה B) כלפי אדם, קבוצה או ישויות אחרות (תחת שאלה C). הגישה המוצעת כוללת רשת נוירולית משתנה ברמה של אופיים, רשת נוירולית משתנה ברמה של מילים, וכמה התהליך מוקדם. ההופעה שנוצאה על ידי המודל המוצע היא 77.93% נקודת F1 בממוצע מקרו.', 'sk': 'V prispevku so predstavljeni modeli ekipe Ghmerti za podnaloga A in B skupne naloge OffensEval na SemEvalu 2019. OffensEval obravnava problem prepoznavanja in kategorizacije žaljivega jezika v družbenih omrežjih v treh podnalogah; ali je vsebina žaljiva ali ne (podopravilo A), ali je usmerjena (podopravilo B) na posameznika, skupino ali druge subjekte (podopravilo C). Predlagani pristop vključuje konvolucijsko živčno mrežo na ravni znakov, ponavljajočo živčno mrežo na ravni besed in nekaj predobdelave. Uspešnost, dosežena s predlaganim modelom, je 77,93% makropovprečno F1-rezultat.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་གྲངས་དེ་གིས་སྡེབ་ཁང་གི་མིག་དཔེ་གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་ཞུགས་སྐབས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་། OffensEval ཡིས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་མཁན་གསུམ་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་བ ནང་དོན་ཡིག་གི་སྐྱོན་འགྱུར་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན་མིན་དགོས་མིན(subtask A)དམིགས་འབེབས་ཡུལ་ན། གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་ཡོད་པའི་གཟུགས་རིས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་སྐྱེལ གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཟིན་བྲིས་པའི་མ་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱིས་ཡར་རྒྱས་འགྲོ་བ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'HAD-Tbingen at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : Deep Learning Analysis of Offensive Language on Twitter : Identification and Categorization', 'ar': 'HAD-Tübingen في SemEval-2019 المهمة 6: تحليل التعلم العميق للغة الهجومية على Twitter: التعريف والتصنيف', 'es': 'HAD-Tübingen en SemEval-2019 Tarea 6: Análisis de aprendizaje profundo del lenguaje ofensivo en Twitter: identificación y categorización', 'pt': 'HAD-Tübingen no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Análise de Deep Learning de Linguagem Ofensiva no Twitter: Identificação e Categorização', 'fr': 'HAD-Tübingen au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: Analyse par apprentissage approfondi du langage offensant sur Twitter\xa0: identification et catégorisation', 'ja': 'HAD - Tübingen at SemEval -2019 Task 6: Deep Learning Analysis of Offensive Language on Twitter: Identification and Categorization', 'ru': 'HAD-Tübingen на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Глубокий анализ обучения оскорбительному языку в Twitter: идентификация и категоризация', 'zh': 'HAD-Tübingen在SemEval-2019务6:Twitter上犯性语言之深,学问分析,识别分类', 'hi': 'SEMEval-2019 कार्य 6 पर HAD-Tübingen: चहचहाना पर आक्रामक भाषा का डीप लर्निंग विश्लेषण: पहचान और वर्गीकरण', 'ga': 'HAD-Tübingen ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Anailís Dhomhainfhoghlaim ar Theanga Iontach ar Twitter: Aithint agus Catagóiriú', 'hu': 'HAD-Tubingen a SemEval-2019 6. feladat: Támadó nyelv mélytanulási elemzése a Twitteren: azonosítás és kategorizálás', 'el': 'Εργασία 6: Ανάλυση βαθιάς μάθησης της προσβλητικής γλώσσας στο Ταυτοποίηση και κατηγοριοποίηση', 'kk': 'HAD-Tubingen at semiEval-2019 Task 6: Deep Learning Analysis of Offensive Language on Twitter: Identification and Categorization', 'it': 'HAD-Tubingen a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Analisi approfondita del linguaggio offensivo su Twitter: Identificazione e categorizzazione', 'lt': 'HAD-Tubingen at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Deep Learning Analysis of Offensive Language on Twitter: Identification and Categorization', 'mk': 'HAD-Tubingen at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Deep Learning Analysis of Offensive Language on Twitter: Identification and Categorization', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6-ല്\u200d ഹാഡി- ടുബിന്\u200dജെന്\u200d: ടൂട്ടറില്\u200d ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷയുടെ അന്വേഷണം: Identification and categorization', 'mn': 'HAD-Tubingen at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Deep Learning Analysis of Offensive Language on Twitter: Identification and Categorization', 'no': 'HAD-Tubingen på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 6: Deep Learning Analysis of Offensive Language on Twitter: Identification and Categorization', 'pl': 'Zadanie 6: Analiza głębokiego uczenia języka ofensywnego na Twitterze: Identyfikacja i kategorizacja', 'mt': 'HAD-Tubingen f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6: Analiżi ta’ Tagħlim Profond ta’ Lingwa Offensiva fuq Twitter: Identifikazzjoni u Kategorizzazzjoni', 'ro': 'HAD-Tubingen la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: Analiza profundă a limbajului ofensiv pe Twitter: Identificare și categorizare', 'ms': 'HAD-Tubingen pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Analisis Belajar Dalam Dalam Bahasa Tersinggung di Twitter: Identifikasi dan Kategori', 'sr': 'HAD-Tubingen na pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 6: Analiza dubokog učenja neposlušnog jezika na Twitter: Identifikacija i kategorizacija', 'si': 'HAD-Tubingen at Halfeval-2019 Job 6: Deep learning of Offensive language', 'so': 'HAD-Tubingen at SemEval-2019 Shaqooyinka 6: Deep Learning Analysis of Offensive language on Twitter: Identification and Categorization', 'sv': 'HAD-Tubingen på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: Deep Learning Analysis of Offensive Language på Twitter: Identifiering och kategorisering', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணியில் ஹாடி- டபின்ஜென்: தொடர்பில் ஆழமான கல்வி மொழியின் ஆழமான ஆராய்ச்சி: அடையாளம் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தல்', 'ur': 'HAD-Tubingen at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Deep Learning Analysis of Offensive Language on Twitter: Identification and Categorization', 'ka': 'HAD-Tubingen semiEval-2019 დავალება 6: ძალიან სწავლების ანალიზაცია უფრო მუშაობელი ენაზე Twitter: განსაზღვრება და კატეგორიზაცია', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'HAD-Tubiển tại SemEvl-209 Task 6: Deep Learning Analysis of Offtạp trên Twitter: Nhận diện và phân loại', 'bg': 'Задача 6: Анализ на задълбоченото учене на офанзивния език в Туитър: Идентификация и категоризация', 'hr': 'HAD-Tubingen na zadatku 6: duboka analiza učenja neposlušnog jezika na Twitter: Identifikacija i kategorizacija', 'da': 'HAD-Tubingen på SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: Deep Learning Analysis of Offensive Language på Twitter: Identifikation og Kategorisering', 'nl': 'HAD-Tubingen bij SemEval-2019 Taak 6: Deep Learning Analyse van offensieve taal op Twitter: Identificatie en categorisering', 'id': 'HAD-Tubingen di SemEval-2019 Task 6: Deep Learning Analysis of Offensive Language on Twitter: Identification and Categorization', 'ko': 'HAD Tubingen이SemEval-19 미션에 참가', 'de': 'HAD-Tubingen bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabenstellung 6: Deep Learning Analyse offensiver Sprache auf Twitter: Identifikation und Kategorisierung', 'fa': 'HAD-Tubingen at semiEval-2019 Task 6: Deep Learning Analysis of Offensive Language on Twitter: Identification and Categorization', 'sw': 'HAD-Utafiti katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 6: Uchambuzi wa Kikuu cha Lugha Huli kwenye mtandao wa Twita: Kutambuliwa na Kugawanywa', 'af': 'HAD-Tubingen by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 6: Deep Leer Analyseer van Offensive Taal op Twitter: Identifikasie en Kategoriseering', 'tr': 'HAD-Tubingen at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Deep Learning Analysis of Offensive Language on Twitter: Identification and Categorization', 'sq': 'HAD-Tubingen at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Deep Learning Analysis of Offensive Language on Twitter: Identification and Categorization', 'am': 'ስራ 6', 'hy': 'HAD-Tubingen at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Deep Learning Analysis of Offensive Language on Twitter: Identification and Categorization', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯-এর কাজ ৬: টুইটারে গভীর শিক্ষা বিশ্লেষণ: পরিচয় এবং বিভাগ', 'az': 'HAD-Tubingen at semiEval-2019 Task 6: Deep Learning Analysis of Offensive Language on Twitter: Identification and Categorization', 'bs': 'HAD-Tubingen na pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 6: Analiza dubokog učenja neposlušnog jezika na Twitter: Identifikacija i kategorizacija', 'ca': 'HAD-Tubingen a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Deep Learning Analysis of Offensive Language on Twitter: Identification and Categorization', 'cs': 'Úkol 6: Deep Learning Analýza útočného jazyka na Twitteru: Identifikace a kategorizace', 'et': 'HAD-Tubingen SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 6: Ründava keele sügavõpe analüüs Twitteris: identifitseerimine ja kategoriseerimine', 'fi': 'HAD-Tubingen SemEval-2019 Teht채v채 6: Syv채oppimisen analyysi hy철kk채채v채st채 kielest채 Twitteriss채: Tunnistaminen ja luokittelu', 'jv': 'HAD-Tubingenen at semiinval-2011 task 6: deep Learning Test of offensive Language on Google: ID and category', 'sk': 'HAD-Tubingen na SemEval-2019 Naloga 6: Analiza poglobljenega učenja napadalnega jezika na Twitterju: identifikacija in kategorizacija', 'ha': 'Half-Tubingen at SemEal-2019 Tafiyar 6: Depth Learn Analyze of offisive language on Twitter: Idonation and Categorization', 'bo': 'HAD-Tubingen at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Deep Learning Analysis of Offensive Language on Twitter: Identification and Categorization', 'he': 'HAD-Tubingen at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Deep Learning Analysis of Offensive Language on Twitter: Identification and Categorization'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the submissions of our team, HAD-Tbingen, for the SemEval 2019-Task 6 : OffensEval : Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media. We participated in all the three sub-tasks : Sub-task A-Offensive language identification', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة الطلبات المقدمة من فريقنا ، HAD-Tübingen ، إلى SemEval 2019 - المهمة 6: "OffensEval: تحديد وتصنيف اللغة الهجومية في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي". شاركنا في جميع المهام الفرعية الثلاث: المهمة الفرعية أ - "تحديد اللغة الهجومية"', 'es': 'Este documento describe las presentaciones de nuestro equipo, HAD-Tübingen, para la Tarea 6 de SemEval 2019: «OffensEval: Identificar y categorizar el lenguaje ofensivo en las redes sociales». Participamos en las tres subtareas: Subtarea A: «Identificación de lenguaje ofensivo»', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve as submissões de nossa equipe, HAD-Tübingen, para o SemEval 2019 - Tarefa 6: “OffensEval: Identificando e categorizando linguagem ofensiva nas mídias sociais”. Participamos de todas as três subtarefas: Subtarefa A - “Identificação de linguagem ofensiva”', 'fr': 'Cet article décrit les soumissions de notre équipe, Had-Tübingen, pour le SemEval 2019 - Task 6\xa0: «\xa0OffenseVal\xa0: Identifier et catégoriser le langage offensant dans les médias sociaux\xa0». Nous avons participé aux trois sous-tâches\xa0: Sous-tâche A - «\xa0Identification du langage offensant\xa0»', 'ja': '本稿では、HAD - Tübingenチームが提出したSemEval 2019 - Task 6:「OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media」について説明します。3つのサブタスクすべてに参加しました。サブタスクA -「攻撃的な言語の識別」', 'zh': '本文引团队HAD-Tübingen为SemEval 2019 - 务6言:"OffensEval识类社交媒体攻击性语"。 吾与凡三子:子职A - "犯性言知"。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर हमारी टीम की प्रस्तुतियों का वर्णन करता है, HAD-Tübingen, SemEval 2019 के लिए - कार्य 6: "OffensEval: सामाजिक मीडिया में आक्रामक भाषा की पहचान और वर्गीकरण"। हमने सभी तीन उप-कार्यों में भाग लिया: उप-कार्य ए - "आक्रामक भाषा पहचान"', 'ru': 'В этом документе описываются материалы, представленные нашей командой, HAD-Tübingen, для SemEval 2019 - Задача 6: «OffensEval: Выявление и категоризация оскорбительных формулировок в социальных сетях». Мы участвовали во всех трех подзадачах: Подзадача А - «Оскорбительная идентификация языка»', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar aighneachtaí ár bhfoireann, HAD-Tübingen, don SemEval 2019 - Tasc 6: “OffensEval: Teanga Ionsaitheach a Aithint agus a Chatagóiriú ar na Meáin Shóisialta”. Ghlacamar páirt sna trí fhothasc ar fad: Fothasc A - “Aithint teanga maslach”', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტი ჩვენი ჯგუფის, HAD-Tubingen, 2019 წლის SemEval - სამუშაო დავალება 6: OffensEval: სამუშაო მედიაში სამუშაო ენის განსაცნობა და კატეგორიზაცია. ჩვენ ყველა სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო დავაწყეთ: A-ს სამუშაო სამუშაო', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a HAD-Tubingen csapatunk beadványait a SemEval 2019 - 6. feladatra: "OffensEval: Az offenzív nyelv azonosítása és kategorizálása a közösségi médiában". Mindhárom alcsoportban részt vettünk: A alcsoport – "Támadó nyelv azonosítása"', 'it': 'Questo articolo descrive i contributi del nostro team, HAD-Tubingen, per SemEval 2019 - Task 6: \'OffensEval: Identificare e Categorizzare il linguaggio offensivo nei social media\'. Abbiamo partecipato a tutti e tre i sottocompiti: Sottocompito A - "Identificazione linguistica offensiva"', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің тобымыздың, HAD-Tubingen, 2019 жылы жарым Eval үшін жіберілгенін - 6- тапсырма: "OffensEval: Оциялық медиақтар тілін анықтау және санаттарды бағалау". Біз бүкіл үш ішкі тапсырмаларда қатынасыз: A- тапсырмасының ішкі тапсырмасы - \'Түсінші тіл идентификациясы\'', 'lt': "Šiame dokumente apibūdinami mūsų komandos HAD-Tubingen 2019 m. pusmečio vertinimo (6 užduotis) „OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media“ (OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media). We participated in all the three sub-tasks: Sub-task A - 'Offensive language identification'", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει τις υποβολές της ομάδας μας, της HAD-Tubingen, για το SemEval 2019-Task 6: "Επίπτωση: Αναγνώριση και κατηγοριοποίηση προσβλητικής γλώσσας στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης". Συμμετείχαμε και στις τρεις υπο-εργασίες: Υπο-εργασία Α και "Προσθετικός προσδιορισμός γλώσσας"', 'ms': "Kertas ini menggambarkan penghantaran pasukan kita, HAD-Tubingen, untuk SemEval 2019 - Tugas 6: 'OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media'. SemEval Kami berpartisipasi dalam tiga sub-tugas: Sub-tugas A - 'Identifikasi bahasa yang melampaui batas'", 'ml': "ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ ടീമിന്\u200dറെ കീഴടങ്ങള്\u200d ഹാഡ്-ടുബിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ കീഴ്പ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 - ടാസ്ക് 6: ഓഫെന്\u200dസ്വാല്\u200d: സോഷ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d മൂന്നു സബ് ജോലികളില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്നു: Sub-task A - 'Offensive language identification'", 'mk': 'Овој весник ги опишува поднесувањата на нашиот тим, ХаД-Тубинген, за SemEval 2019 - задача 6: „OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media“. Учествувавме во сите три подзадачи: подзадача А - "Идентификација на навреден јазик"', 'mt': "Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sottomissjonijiet tat-tim tagħna, HAD-Tubingen, għas-SemEval 2019 - Task 6: 'OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media'. Parteċipajna fit-tliet sottokompiti kollha: Subkompitu A - 'Identifikazzjoni ofensiva tal-lingwa'", 'no': 'Denne papiret skildrar oppføringane av gruppa vårt HAD-Tubingen for semiEval 2019 – Oppgåve 6: OffensEval: identifisering og kategorisering av offensive språk i sosiale media. Vi delta i alle tre underoppgåver: Underoppgåve A – « Offensive language identification »', 'mn': "Энэ цаас бидний багийнхаа HAD-Tubingen, 2019 оны SemEval-ын төлөөлөө - 6 даалгавар: OffensEval: Нийгмийн мэдээлэл дээрх хүндрэлтэй хэлний тодорхойлолтыг тайлбарладаг. Бид бүх 3 суб-даалгаварт оролцсон: А суб-даалгавар - 'Үндсэн хэлний тодорхойлолт'", 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje zgłoszenia naszego zespołu HAD-Tubingen do SemEval 2019-Task 6: "OffensEval: Identyfikowanie i Kategorizowanie języka ofensywnego w mediach społecznościowych". Uczestniczyliśmy we wszystkich trzech podzadaniach: Podzadaniu A oraz "Identyfikacja języka ofensywnego"', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie propunerile echipei noastre, HAD-Tubingen, pentru SemEval 2019 - Sarcina 6: "OffensEval: Identificarea și categorizarea limbajului ofensiv în rețelele sociale". Am participat la toate cele trei subsarcini: Subsarcina A - "Identificarea limbii ofensive"', 'sr': "Ovaj papir opisuje podatke našeg tima, HAD-Tubingen, za pola evaluacije 2019 - zadatak 6: OffensEval: identifikacija i kategorizacija oficijalnog jezika u socijalnim medijima. Участили смо у свим трима подзадача: Подзадача А - 'Офинсивна идентификация језика'", 'si': "මේ පත්තේ අපේ කණ්ඩායම, HAD-Tubingen, සම්වේල 2019 - වැඩේ 6: Offenseval: සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයාත්මක භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය සහ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක කරනවා. අපි සියළුම වැඩක් තුනක් සාමාන්\u200dය වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන්: සාමාන්\u200dය වැඩක A - 'නිර්ධාරිත භාෂාව පරිශ්ච", 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் குறிப்பிடுகிறது எங்கள் குழு, HAD-Tubingen, செம்Eval 2019 - செயல் 6: OffensEval: சமூக ஊடகங்களில் தொடர்பு மொழி அடையாளம் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தல் மொழி. நாங்கள் அனைத்து மூன்று துணை பணிகளிலும் பங்கிட்டோம்:', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaa ku qoran soo diritaanka kooxda HAD-Tubingen ee SemEval 2019 - Shaqada 6: "OffensEval: Identification and categorizing luqada Offensive afka bulshada". Waxaannu ka qeybqaadanay saddexda shaqada hoose: Shaqada A - \'Aqoonsiga afka rasmi ah\'', 'sv': "Denna uppsats beskriver bidragen från vårt team, HAD-Tubingen, till SemEval 2019 - Uppgift 6: 'OffensEval: Identifiering and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media'. Vi deltog i alla tre deluppgifterna: Underuppgift A - 'Offensiv språkidentifiering'", 'ur': "This paper describes the submissions of our team, HAD-Tubingen, for the SemEval 2019 - Task 6: OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media. ہم نے تمام تین سوب-ٹاکس میں شامل کیا: Sub-task A - 'Offensive language identification'", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả những kiến nghị của nhóm chúng ta, HAD-Tubiển, cho nhiệm vụ của Semkhai mạc 209: "OffensEval: Nhận diện và phân loại Học Ngôn ngữ Hành động trên phương tiện xã hội." Chúng tôi đã tham gia ba chi nhánh: nhiệm vụ A:"Nhận diện ngôn ngữ tàn bạo"', 'uz': 'Bu sahifa SemEval 2019 - Vazifa 6: "OffensEval: Social Media\'da shaxsiy tillarni aniqlash va kategorishingiz tilini anglatadi. Biz hamma uchta sub-vazifalarga murojaat qildik: Sub-vazifa A - "Offensive language identification"', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва мненията на нашия екип, ХАД-Тубинген, за задача 6: "Определяне и категоризиране на офанзивен език в социалните медии". Участвахме и в трите подзадачи: Подзадача А - "Офанзивна езикова идентификация"', 'nl': "Deze paper beschrijft de inzendingen van ons team HAD-Tubingen voor de SemEval 2019-Taak 6: 'OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media'. We hebben deelgenomen aan alle drie de deeltaken: Subtaak A tot 'Offensieve taalidentificatie'", 'hr': "Ovaj papir opisuje podatke našeg tima, HAD-Tubingen, za pola ocjene 2019 - zadatak 6: OffensEval: identifikacija i kategorizacija neposlušnog jezika u socijalnim medijima. Učestvovali smo u svim tri podzadatka: podzadatak A - 'Offensive language identification'", 'ko': '본고는 우리 팀 HAD Tubingen이 2019년 SemEval 미션 6\'무례: 소셜미디어에서의 무례한 언어를 식별하고 분류하는 것\'에서 제출한 자료를 묘사한다.우리는 모든 세 개의 하위 임무: 하위 임무 A - "공격적 언어 식별"', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver indlæg fra vores team, HAD-Tubingen, til SemEval 2019 - Opgave 6: \'OffensEval: Identificering and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media\'. Vi deltog i alle tre underopgaver: Underopgave A - "Offensiv sprogidentifikation"', 'de': "Dieser Beitrag beschreibt die Einreichungen unseres Teams HAD-Tubingen für die SemEval 2019-Task 6: 'OffensEval: Identifizieren und Kategorisieren von Offensivsprache in Social Media'. Wir haben an allen drei Teilaufgaben teilgenommen: Teilaufgabe A bis Offensive Spracherkennung", 'sw': "Gazeti hili linaelezea ujumbe wa timu yetu, HAD-Tubingen, kwa ajili ya SemEval 2019 - Kazi 6: Utambulisho na Kugawanya Lugha Huru katika mitandao ya kijamii'. Tumeshiriki katika kazi zote tatu za subira: Ujumbe wa kazi A - 'utambulisho wa lugha isiyo rasmi'", 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die onderskrifte van ons span, HAD-Tubingen, vir die semiEval 2019 - Opdrag 6: OffensEval: Identifikasie en Kategoriseering van offensive taal in Sosiale Media. Ons het gedeel in al die drie sub-taak: Sub-taak A - 'Offensive language identification'", 'id': "This paper describes the submissions of our team, HAD-Tubingen, for the SemEval 2019 - Task 6: 'OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media'.  We participated in all the three sub-tasks: Sub-task A - 'Offensive language identification'", 'sq': "Ky dokument përshkruan paraqitjet e ekipit tonë, HAD-Tubingen, për SemEval 2019 - Task 6: 'OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media'. Ne morëm pjesë në të tre nëndetyrat: nëndetyra A - 'Identifikimi i gjuhës ofensive'", 'fa': "این کاغذ تحویل تیم ما، HAD-Tubingen، برای نیمه Eval 2019 - Task 6: OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Language Offensive in Social Media است. ما در تمام سه کارهای زیر کار شرکت کردیم: زیر کاری A - 'شناسایی زبان ناتوانی'", 'hy': "Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր թիմի HAD-Tub-ի ներկայացումները 2019 թ.-ի «Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում վնասավոր լեզուների բացահայտումը և դասավորումը»-ի համար: Մենք մասնակցեցինք բոլոր երեք ենթախնդիրներին' A ենթախնդիրներին - 'Անցածր լեզվի հայտնաբերումը'", 'bn': "এই পত্রিকাটি আমাদের দল হাড-টাবিঙ্গেন, সেমইভাল ২০১৯-এর জন্য, সেমাজিক মিডিয়ার অফিনসেভাল: সামাজিক ভাষাকে পরিচিতি এবং বিভাগের বিষয়টি বর্ণন আমরা তিনটি সাব-কাজে অংশগ্রহণ করেছি: সাব-কাজ A - 'অফিসেভ ভাষা পরিচয়'", 'tr': "Bu kagyz, HAD-Tubingen, 2019-nji ýylyň semi-Eval üçin toparymyzyň gönderilmelerini tassyýar - Görev 6: 'OffensEval: Sosyal medýýatlarynda Offensive Dilini tanamak we kategoriýa edýär'. Biz bu üç sub-işe dahil etdik: Sub-task A - 'Offensive Dil Kimligi'", 'am': "ይህም ገጽ የጭፍራችንን ሐዲ-ታቡኒን ለሴmEval 2019 - ስራ 6: ‘OffensEval: ማኅበራዊ አውታር ቋንቋን ማረጋገጥ እና በክፍተት የሚያደርገውን’ ይናገራል፡፡ በሦስቱ ደብዳቤዎች ሥራ ሁሉ ተካፈልን፡፡ አ - 'ባለሥልጣዊ ቋንቋ ግለጻ'", 'bs': "Ovaj papir opisuje podatke našeg tima, HAD-Tubingen, za pola evaluacije 2019 - zadatak 6: OffensEval: identifikacija i kategorizacija neposlušnog jezika u socijalnim medijima. Učestvovali smo u svim tri podzadatka: podzadatak A - 'Offensive language identification'", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje příspěvek našeho týmu HAD-Tubingen pro SemEval 2019-Task 6: "OffensEval: Identifikování a kategorizování urážlivého jazyka v sociálních médiích". Podíleli jsme se na všech třech dílčích úkolech: Sub-úkol A I\'Útočná jazyková identifikace\'', 'az': "Bu kağıt bizim ekibimizin, HAD-Tubingen, 2019-in yarım Eval üçün təbliğ edildiyini təsdiqləyir: OffensEval: Sosyal Mediyalarda Özür dilini təsdiqləyir və Kategoriyalarını təsdiqləyir. Bütün üç ünvanlıq işin ə katıldıq: A ünvanlıq işinə - 'Özülü dil kimliği'", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan tiimimme HAD-Tubingenin ehdotuksia SemEval 2019 - Task 6: OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media. Osallistuimme kaikkiin kolmeen osatehtävään: osatehtävä A - "Hyökkäävä kielen tunnistus"', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse meie meeskonna HAD-Tubingeni ettepanekuid SemEval 2019. aasta ülesandeks 6: "OffensEval: ründava keele tuvastamine ja kategoriseerimine sotsiaalmeedias". Osalesime kõigis kolmes alamülesandes: alamülesanne A – "Ründav keele identifitseerimine"', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu les presentacions del nostre equip, HAD-Tubingen, del SemEval 2019 - tasca 6: 'OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media'. We participated in all the three sub-tasks: Sub-task A - 'Offensive language identification'", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje prispevke naše ekipe HAD-Tubingen za SemEval 2019 – naloga 6: \'OffensEval: identifikacija in kategorizacija ofenzivnega jezika v socialnih medijih\'. Sodelovali smo pri vseh treh podnalogah: podnaloga A – "napadalna identifikacija jezika"', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את ההעברות של הצוות שלנו, HAD-Tubingen, לסמיוול 2019 - משימה 6: "OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media". השתתפנו בכל שלושת התפקידים: התפקיד א - \'זיהוי שפה פגיעה\'', 'ha': 'Wannan takardan na bayyana wasiyyar da jama\'ar mu, hasD-Tubingen, wa the Semeval 2019 - Tafiyar 6: "offenseval: Ana gane and Categorize Afssive language in Jami\'a". Mun yi raba cikin duk al\'amarin uku: Sub-aikin A - \'Shiryarwa na Lugha\'a\'', 'bo': "ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་གླེང་མོལ་HAD-Tubingen, for the SemEval 2019 - Task 6: 'OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media' ལ་གཏོང་ཞིབ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་གསུམ་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། subt-task A- 'Offensive language identification'", 'jv': "Perintah iki rambaran tanggal urip nggawe kelompok, HAD-Tubingeng, kanggo seminval 2011 - task 6: offensinval: ID og category Awak dhéwé ngewehke tanggal telu-task gawe: Sub-task A - 'Ofensive language ID'"}
{'en': 'HHU at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : Context Does Matter-Tackling Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with ELMo', 'pt': 'HHU no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Contexto é Importante - Lidando com Identificação e Categorização de Linguagem Ofensiva com ELMo', 'ar': 'HHU في SemEval-2019 المهمة 6: السياق مهم - معالجة تحديد اللغة الهجومية وتصنيفها باستخدام ELMo', 'fr': "HHU au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: Le contexte compte - S'attaquer à l'identification et à la catégorisation des langues offensantes avec ElMo", 'es': 'HHU en la Tarea 6 de SemEval-2019: El contexto sí importa: abordar la identificación y categorización del lenguaje ofensivo con eLMO', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のHHUタスク6 ：コンテキストは重要- ELMoでの攻撃的言語の識別と分類への取り組み', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 6 पर HHU: संदर्भ मायने रखता है - ELMo के साथ आक्रामक भाषा पहचान और वर्गीकरण से निपटना', 'zh': 'HHU at SemEval-2019 šĽĽ6:šłäšłčśĖáŤĮöťáć - ÁĒ®ELMoÁäĮŤ®ÄŚąęÁĪĽ', 'ru': 'HHU на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Контекст имеет значение - Решение оскорбительной идентификации языка и категоризации с помощью ELMo', 'ga': 'HHU ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Tá Tábhacht ag Comhthéacs - Dul i nGleic le hAithint agus Catagóiriú Teanga Ionsaitheach le ELMo', 'el': 'Εργασία 6: Το πλαίσιο έχει σημασία για την αντιμετώπιση της προσβλητικής γλωσσικής ταυτοποίησης και κατηγοριοποίησης με το ΕΛMo', 'hu': 'HHU a SemEval-2019 6. feladat: A kontextus számít - a támadó nyelv azonosításának és kategorizálásának leküzdése ELMo segítségével', 'ka': 'HHU SemEval-2019 დავალება 6: Context Does Matter - Tackling Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with ELMo', 'it': "HHU al SemEval-2019 Task 6: Context Does Matter - Affrontare l'identificazione e la categorizzazione del linguaggio offensivo con ELMo", 'kk': 'HHU шегінші тапсырма 6: Контекст маңызды - тіл идентификациясы және санаттары ELMo', 'lt': 'HHU 2010 m. pusmečio vertinimo metu 6 užduotis: kontekstas svarbūs – kovoti su žalingos kalbos identifikavimu ir klasifikavimu pagal ELMo', 'mk': 'HHU на SemEval-2019 задача 6: Контекстот е важен - решавање на идентификацијата и категоризацијата на навредниот јазик со ELMo', 'ms': 'HHU at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Context Does Matter - Tackling Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with ELMo', 'mt': 'HHU f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6: Il-Kuntest Jagħmel Materja - L-indirizzar tal-Identifikazzjoni u l-Kategorizzazzjoni tal-Lingwa Offensiva bl-ELMo', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6: കോണ്ടെക്സ്റ്റ് മാറ്റുന്നു', 'mn': 'HHU at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Context Does Matter - Tackling Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with ELMo', 'ro': 'HHU la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: Contextul contează - abordarea identificării și categorizării limbajului ofensiv cu ELMo', 'no': 'HHU ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 6: Kontekst gjer Matter - Tacking Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with ELMo', 'pl': 'HHU na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 6: Kontekst ma znaczenie', 'sr': 'HHU na semiEval-2019 zadatku 6: Kontekst radi materiju - obezbeđenje identifikacije i kategorizacije jezika sa ELMo', 'si': 'HHU at Halfeval-2019 Job 6: ContextIs Matter - Tackling Offensive language ID and Categorication with ELMo', 'so': 'HHU at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Context Does Matter - Tackling Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with ELMo', 'sv': 'HHU på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: Context does matter - tackla offensiv språkidentifiering och kategorisering med ELMo', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 6: Context Does Matter - Tackling Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with ELMo', 'ur': 'HHU سیم Eval-2019 Task 6: Context Does Matter - Tackling Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with ELMo', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifani 6: Context Does Matter - Tackling Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with ELMo', 'vi': 'HU tại SemEvl-209 Task 6: Contxen Does Matter- Name Name=Đánh chặn Ý thức biện rộng Hạ phương với ElMo', 'bg': 'Задача 6: Контекстът има значение - справяне с идентифицирането и категоризацията на офанзивните езици с ЕЛМО', 'nl': 'HHU op SemEval-2019 Taak 6: Context Does Matter bij het aanpakken van offensieve taalidentificatie en categorisering met ELMo', 'hr': 'HHU na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 6: Kontekst radi materiju - obraćanje identifikacije i kategorizacije neposlušnog jezika s ELMo-om', 'de': 'HHU auf der SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 6: Kontext spielt eine Rolle bei der Bekämpfung offensiver Sprachidentifikation und Kategorisierung mit ELMo', 'id': 'HHU di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Konteks Apakah Masalah - Menangani Identifikasi Bahasa Serangan dan Kategorisasi dengan ELMo', 'ko': 'HHU가SemEval-2019에서의 임무6: 언어 환경이 확실히 중요하다. - ELMo를 사용하여 공격적인 언어 식별과 분류 문제를 해결한다.', 'da': 'HHU på SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: Kontekst betyder noget - tackling af offensiv sprogidentifikation og kategorisering med ELMo', 'fa': 'HHU در پایین Eval-2019 Task 6: Context Does Matter - Tackling Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with ELMo', 'tr': 'HHU at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Context Does Matter - Tackling Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with ELMo', 'sw': 'HHU kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 6: Context Does Matter - Kutambuliwa na Utambulishaji wa lugha rasmi na Ubaguzi wa ELMo', 'af': 'HHU by SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 6: Konteks Doen Matter - Taak Offensive Taal Identifikasie en Kategoriseering met ELMo', 'sq': 'HHU në SemEval-2019 Task 6: Context Does Matter - Tackling Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with ELMo', 'am': 'Eval-2019 ስራ 6: Context Do Matter - Tackling Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with ELMo', 'az': 'HHU at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Context Does Matter - Tackling Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with ELMo', 'hy': 'HHU at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Context Does Matter - Tackling Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with ELMo', 'bs': 'HHU na semiEval-2019 zadatak 6: Kontekst radi materiju - obezbeđenje identifikacije i kategorizacije jezika s ELMo', 'ca': 'HHU a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Context Does Matter - Tackling Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with ELMo', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের ৬: Context Does Matter - Tackling Offentive Language Identifier and Categorization with ELMo', 'cs': 'HHU na SemEval-2019 Úkol 6: Kontext does matter – Řešení urážlivé identifikace a kategorizace jazyka s ELMo', 'et': 'HHU SemEval-2019 ülesanne 6: kontekst on oluline - ründava keele identifitseerimise ja kategooriate lahendamine ELMo abil', 'fi': 'HHU SemEval-2019 Teht채v채 6: Kontekstill채 on merkityst채 - hy철kk채채v채n kielen tunnistamisen ja luokittelun torjuminen ELMo:lla', 'jv': 'HHU at semiinval-2011 task 6: context does mater - Tacking offensive Language ID and category with ETMo', 'ha': 'HHU at SemEV-2019 Tafiyar 6: Content Do Mater - Tacking offssive language Idonation and Categorization with ELMo', 'he': 'HHU at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Context Does Matter - Tackling Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with ELMo', 'sk': 'HHU na SemEval-2019 naloga 6: Kontekst je pomemben - reševanje napadalne identifikacije in kategorizacije jezikov z ELMo', 'bo': 'HHU at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Context Does Matter - Tackling Offensive Language Identification and Categorization with ELMo'}
{'en': 'We present our results for OffensEval : Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (SemEval 2019-Task 6). Our results show that context embeddings are important features for the three different sub-tasks in connection with classical machine and with deep learning. Our best model reached place 3 of 75 in sub-task B with a macro F_1 of 0.719. Our approaches for sub-task A and C perform less well but could also deliver promising results.F_1 of 0.719. Our approaches for sub-task A and C perform less well but could also deliver promising results.', 'ar': 'نقدم نتائجنا لـ OffensEval: تحديد وتصنيف اللغة الهجومية في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي (SemEval 2019 - المهمة 6). تُظهر نتائجنا أن عمليات تضمين السياق هي ميزات مهمة للمهام الفرعية الثلاث المختلفة فيما يتعلق بالآلة الكلاسيكية والتعلم العميق. وصل أفضل نموذج لدينا إلى المركز 3 من 75 في المهمة الفرعية B باستخدام ماكرو F_1 يبلغ 0.719. إن مناهجنا للمهمتين الفرعيتين "أ" و "ج" تؤدي أداءً أقل جودة ولكنها يمكن أن تحقق أيضًا نتائج واعدة.', 'fr': 'Nous présentons nos résultats pour OffenseVal\xa0: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (SemEval 2019 - Task 6). Nos résultats montrent que les intégrations contextuelles sont des fonctionnalités importantes pour les trois sous-tâches différentes liées à la machine classique et au deep learning. Notre meilleur modèle a atteint la 3e place sur 75 dans la sous-tâche B avec une macro F_1 de 0,719. Nos approches pour les sous-tâches A et C sont moins performantes mais pourraient également produire des résultats prometteurs.', 'es': 'Presentamos nuestros resultados para OffensEval: Identificación y categorización del lenguaje ofensivo en las redes sociales (SemEval 2019 - Tarea 6). Nuestros resultados muestran que las incrustaciones de contexto son características importantes para las tres subtareas diferentes en relación con la máquina clásica y el aprendizaje profundo. Nuestro mejor modelo alcanzó la posición 3 de 75 en la subtarea B con una macro F_1 de 0.719. Nuestros enfoques para las subtareas A y C funcionan peor, pero también podrían ofrecer resultados prometedores.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos nossos resultados para OffensEval: Identificando e categorizando linguagem ofensiva nas mídias sociais (SemEval 2019 - Tarefa 6). Nossos resultados mostram que os embeddings de contexto são recursos importantes para as três subtarefas diferentes em conexão com a máquina clássica e com o aprendizado profundo. Nosso melhor modelo alcançou a posição 3 de 75 na subtarefa B com uma macro F_1 de 0,719. Nossas abordagens para as subtarefas A e C têm desempenho inferior, mas também podem fornecer resultados promissores.', 'ja': 'OffensEval: Identifying and Categoryizing Offensive Language in Social Media (SemEval 2019 -タスク6)の結果をご紹介します。私たちの結果は、コンテキスト埋め込みは、クラシックマシンとディープラーニングに関連する3つの異なるサブタスクにとって重要な機能であることを示しています。私たちのベストモデルは、0.719のマクロF_1でサブタスクBの75のうち3位に達しました。サブタスクAとCに対する当社のアプローチは、あまり良いパフォーマンスではありませんが、有望な結果をもたらす可能性があります。', 'zh': '吾示OffensEval:知类社交媒体中攻击性言(SemEval 2019 - 任6)。 吾之的结果表明,上下文嵌经典机器与深学相关者三人。 吾曹最在子职 B 中 75 第一 3 ,宏观F_1为 0.719。 吾于子职A与C之道不善,亦可资也。', 'hi': 'हम OffensEval के लिए अपने परिणाम प्रस्तुत करते हैं: सोशल मीडिया में आक्रामक भाषा की पहचान और वर्गीकरण (SemEval 2019 - कार्य 6)। हमारे परिणामों से पता चलता है कि संदर्भ एम्बेडिंग शास्त्रीय मशीन के संबंध में और गहरी शिक्षा के साथ तीन अलग-अलग उप-कार्यों के लिए महत्वपूर्ण विशेषताएं हैं। हमारा सबसे अच्छा मॉडल 0.719 के मैक्रो F_1 के साथ उप-कार्य बी में 75 के स्थान 3 पर पहुंच गया। उप-कार्य ए और सी के लिए हमारे दृष्टिकोण कम अच्छी तरह से प्रदर्शन करते हैं लेकिन आशाजनक परिणाम भी दे सकते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем наши результаты для OffensEval: Выявление и категоризация оскорбительных выражений в социальных сетях (SemEval 2019 - Задача 6). Наши результаты показывают, что встраивание контекста является важной особенностью для трех различных подзадач в связи с классической машиной и глубоким обучением. Наша лучшая модель достигла места 3 из 75 в подзадаче B с макросом F_1 0,719. Наши подходы для подзадачи A и C работают менее хорошо, но также могут дать многообещающие результаты.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid ár dtorthaí i láthair OffensEval: Teanga Ionsaitheach a Aithint agus a Chatagóiriú sna Meáin Shóisialta (SemEval 2019 - Tasc 6). Léiríonn ár dtorthaí gur gnéithe tábhachtacha iad neadú comhthéacs do na trí fhothasc dhifriúla a bhaineann leis an meaisín clasaiceach agus le foghlaim dhomhain. Shroich ár samhail is fearr áit 3 de 75 i bhfothasc B le macra F_1 de 0.719. Ní fheidhmíonn ár gcur chuige d’fhothasc A agus C chomh maith céanna ach d’fhéadfaidís torthaí a bhfuil gealladh fúthu a thabhairt.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk az OffensEval: Az offenzív nyelv azonosítása és kategorizálása a közösségi médiában (SemEval 2019 - 6. feladat) című eredményeinket. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy a kontextusbeágyazások fontos jellemzők a klasszikus géppel és a mélytanulással kapcsolatos három különböző alcsoporthoz. A legjobb modellünk elérte a 75. helyét a B alcsoportban a 0,719-es makróval. Az "A" és a "C" alfeladatokra vonatkozó megközelítéseink kevésbé jól teljesítenek, de ígéretes eredményeket is hozhatnak.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε τα αποτελέσματά μας για τον εντοπισμό και την κατηγοριοποίηση της προσβλητικής γλώσσας στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι η ενσωμάτωση περιβάλλοντος είναι σημαντικά χαρακτηριστικά για τις τρεις διαφορετικές επιμέρους εργασίες σε σχέση με την κλασική μηχανή και τη βαθιά μάθηση. Το καλύτερο μοντέλο μας έφτασε στη θέση 3 των 75 στην υποεργασία Β με μακροεντολή F_1 0.719. Οι προσεγγίσεις μας για τις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες Α και Γ αποδίδουν λιγότερο καλά, αλλά θα μπορούσαν επίσης να αποφέρουν ελπιδοφόρα αποτελέσματα.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენი წარმოდგენება OffensEval: სოციალური მედიაში განსაზღვრება და კატეგორიზაცია წარმოდგენება (SemEval 2019 - Task 6). ჩვენი შედეგი გამოჩვენება, რომ კონტექსტური კონტექსტური კონტექსტური კონტექსტური კონტექსტურები სამი განსხვავებული სამუშაო საქმედებისთ ჩვენი საუკეთესო მოდელეში 75-ის სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო B-ში, 0.719-ის მაკრო F_1-ზე. ნაქთრვ ოპთეყლზვნთწ ჱა ოჲეეპაბჲრა A თ C ოპაგწრ ოჲ-ეჲბპვ, ნჲ ჟყღჲ მჲზვ ეა ეჲნვჟვ ჲბვღაღთ პვჱსლრართ.', 'lt': 'Pateikiame OffensEval rezultatus: Nustatant ir klasifikuojant pažeidžiamą kalbą socialinėje žiniasklaidoje (2019 m. puslapis – 6 užduotis). Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad konteksto įtraukimas yra svarbios trijų skirtingų subužduočių, susijusių su klasikine mašina ir giliu mokymusi, ypatybės. Mūsų geriausias modelis pasiekė vietą 3 iš 75 B subužduotyje su makro F_1 0,719. Mūsų požiūris į A ir C subužduotį veikia mažiau gerai, bet taip pat galėtų duoti pažadėtinų rezultatų.', 'it': 'Presentiamo i nostri risultati per OffensEval: Identificare e Categorizzare il linguaggio offensivo nei social media (SemEval 2019 - Task 6). I nostri risultati mostrano che le incorporazioni di contesto sono caratteristiche importanti per i tre diversi sottocompiti in connessione con la macchina classica e con il deep learning. Il nostro migliore modello ha raggiunto il posto 3 di 75 nel sottocompito B con una macro F_1 di 0.719. I nostri approcci per i sottocompiti A e C funzionano meno bene, ma potrebbero anche fornire risultati promettenti.', 'mk': 'Ние ги претставуваме нашите резултати за OffensEval: идентификување и категоризирање на навредниот јазик во социјалните медиуми (SemEval 2019 - задача 6). Нашите резултати покажуваат дека контекстните вложувања се важни карактеристики за трите различни подзадачи во врска со класичната машина и длабоко учење. Нашиот најдобар модел достигна место 3 од 75 во подзадача Б со макро F_1 од 0,719. Нашите пристапи за подзадачата А и Ц работат помалку добро, но исто така би можеле да дадат ветувачки резултати.', 'kk': 'Біз OffensEval үшін нәтижелерімізді таңдаймыз: Америкалық медиақтар тілді анықтау және санаттарды бағалау (2019 жылдың бөлшегі - 6 тапсырма). Біздің нәтижелеріміз контексті ендіру үш әртүрлі ішкі тапсырмалар үшін классикалық машинамен және түсінікті оқыту үшін маңызды мүмкіндіктерді көрсетеді. Біздің ең жақсы моделіміз B- тапсырманың субтапсырмасында 3 - 75 орында 0, 719 макро F_1 болды. Біздің A және C ішкі тапсырмасының арқылы жақсы жасауға болады, бірақ сондай-ақ әлемді нәтижелерді бере алады.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan keputusan kami untuk OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (SemEval 2019 - Task 6). Keputusan kami menunjukkan bahawa penyampaian konteks adalah ciri-ciri penting untuk tiga sub-tugas yang berbeza dalam sambungan dengan mesin klasik dan dengan belajar dalam. Model terbaik kami mencapai tempat 3 daripada 75 dalam sub-tugas B dengan makro F_1 0.719. Pendekatan kami untuk sub-tugas A dan C berjalan kurang baik tetapi juga boleh memberikan hasil yang berjanji.', 'ml': 'We present our results for OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (SemEval 2019 - Task 6).  നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് ക്ലാസിക്കല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തോടും ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുമായി മൂന്നു വ്യത് ഞങ്ങളുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല മോഡല്\u200d സ്ഥാനത്ത് 75 ല്\u200d എത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ബിയില്\u200d മാക്രോ F_1 0.719 ല്\u200d ഒരു മാക്രോ F_1. ഞങ്ങളുടെ അടുത്തുചെല്ലുന്നത് A-ലും C-നും കുറച്ച് നന്നായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതാണ്. പക്ഷേ വാഗ്ദാനം ചെയ', 'mn': 'Бид OffensEval-ын үр дүнг үзүүлнэ: Нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэл дээр ажиллах болон хуваалцах хэл (SemEval 2019 - Task 6). Бидний үр дүнд орчин тойрон бий болгох нь классик машин болон гүн гүнзгий сургалтын холбоотой гурван өөр суб-даалгаварын төлөө чухал зүйл гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бидний хамгийн шилдэг загвар нь B-ийн суб-даалгаврын 3-г 0.719-ийн макро F_1-тэй хүртэл хүрсэн. Бидний A болон C суб-даалгаврын арга баримтууд бага зэрэг хийдэг ч мөн амлалтай үр дүн гаргаж чадна.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer våre resultat for OffensEval: identifisering og kategorisering av offensive språk i sosialmedia (halvEval 2019 – oppgåve 6). Resultatet våre viser at kontekstinnbygging er viktige funksjonar for dei tre ulike underoppgåva i tilkopling med klassisk maskin og med dypt læring. Det beste modellen vårt fikk plass 3 av 75 i underoppgåve B med makro F_1 av 0,719. Nærmingane våre for underoppgåve A og C utfører mindre godt, men kunne også levera forsøkende resultat.', 'pl': 'Prezentujemy nasze wyniki dla OffensEval: Identyfikowanie i Kategorizowanie języka ofensywnego w mediach społecznościowych (SemEval 2019 z zadania 6). Nasze wyniki pokazują, że osadzenia kontekstowe są ważną cechą dla trzech różnych podzadań w związku z klasyczną maszyną i głębokim uczeniem. Nasz najlepszy model osiągnął miejsce 3 od 75 w podzadaniu B z makrem F_1 0.719. Nasze podejścia do podzadań A i C sprawdzają się mniej dobrze, ale mogą również przynieść obiecujące rezultaty.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw ir-riżultati tagħna għal OffensEval: Identifikazzjoni u Kategorizzazzjoni tal-Lingwa Offensiva fil-Midja Soċjali (SemEval 2019 - Kompitu 6). Ir-riżultati tagħna juru li l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kuntest huma karatteristiċi importanti għat-tliet sottokompiti differenti b’rabta mal-magna klassika u mat-tagħlim profond. L-a ħjar mudell tagħna laħaq post 3 minn 75 fis-sottokompitu B b’makro F_1 ta’ 0.719. L-approċċi tagħna għas-sottokompitu A u C jaħdmu inqas tajjeb iżda jistgħu jwasslu wkoll għal riżultati promettenti.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm rezultatele pentru OffensEval: Identificarea și Categorizarea limbajului ofensiv în Social Media (SemEval 2019 - Sarcina 6). Rezultatele noastre arată că încorporările contextului sunt caracteristici importante pentru cele trei subsarcini diferite în legătură cu mașina clasică și cu învățarea profundă. Cel mai bun model al nostru a ajuns pe locul 3 din 75 în subsarcina B cu un macro F_1 de 0.719. Abordările noastre pentru subsarcinile A și C funcționează mai puțin bine, dar ar putea oferi, de asemenea, rezultate promițătoare.', 'so': 'We present our results for OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (SemEval 2019 - Task 6).  Abaalkayaga waxay muuqataa in qalabka kooxaha ah ay muhiim u yihiin saddexda shuqul oo kala duduwan ee la xiriira mashiinka kalkaaliska iyo waxbarashada aad u dheer. Tusaale ahaan ugu wanaagsan wuxuu gaadhay 3 ka mid ah 75 shaqo hoose B oo macro F_1 ka mid ah 0.719. Shaqooyinkayada A iyo C waxay sameyn karaan wax ka yar, laakiin waxay sidoo kale sameyn karaan resulto ballan ah.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo svoje rezultate za OffensEval: identifikacija i kategorizacija službenog jezika u socijalnim medijima (semiEval 2019 - zadatak 6). Naši rezultati pokazuju da su kontekstske integracije važne karakteristike za tri različite podzadatke u vezi sa klasičnim mašinama i dubokim učenjima. Naš najbolji model je dostigao mjesto 3 od 75 u podzadatku B sa makrom F_1 od 0,719. Naši pristupi podzadatku A i C izvršavaju manje dobro, ali bi takođe mogli donijeti obećavajuće rezultate.', 'si': 'අපි අපේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරත අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ සංවේදනය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂය තුනක් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනස් වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය අපේ හොඳම ප්\u200dරමාණය ස්ථානයක් ලැබුනා සුබ-වැඩක් B වලින් 3ක් ස්ථානයක් තියෙනවා මැක්රෝ F_1 0.719 වලින අපේ අවස්ථාවක් A සහ C වැඩකට අඩු හොඳයි, ඒත් පොරොන්දු විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර දෙන්න පුළු', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar våra resultat för OffensEval: Identifiera och Kategorisera Offensivt språk i sociala medier (SemEval 2019 - Uppgift 6). Våra resultat visar att kontextinbäddningar är viktiga funktioner för de tre olika underuppgifterna i samband med klassisk maskin och djupinlärning. Vår bästa modell nådde plats 3 av 75 i deluppgift B med ett makro F_1 på 0,719. Våra tillvägagångssätt för deluppgifter A och C presterar mindre bra men kan också ge lovande resultat.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் எங்கள் முடிவுகளை காண்பிக்கிறோம்: சமூக ஊடகத்தில் அடையாளம் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தல் மொழி( செம்வெல் 2019 - பணி 6). முடிவு எங்கள் சிறந்த மாதிரி 0.719-ல் மேக்ரோ F_ 1 உள்ள துணை செயல் B-ல் 3-ல் வந்தது. நம்முடைய துணை பணி A மற்றும் C நெருங்கி செயல்படுகிறது குறைவாக ஆனால் வாக்களிக்கப்பட்ட முடிவுகளையும் க', 'ur': 'ہم نے اپنا نتیجہ نافس Eval کے لئے پیش کیے: سوسیل میڈیا میں نافس کی زبان شناسایی اور کاٹیوجیزی کرنا (SemEval 2019 - Task 6). ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ کنٹنسٹ ایمبڈینگ تین مختلف سوب ٹاکس کے لئے اہم ہیں کلاسیک ماشین کے ساتھ اور عمیق تعلیم کے ساتھ. ہمارا بہترین موڈل سوب-ٹاکس B میں ۳ سے ۳ پہنچ گیا تھا کہ 0.719 کی مکرو F_1 کے ساتھ۔ ہماری آزمائش A اور C کے لئے کم زیادہ اچھی طریقے انجام دیتے ہیں لیکن وہ بھی وعدہ کے نتائج پہنچا سکتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Biz ofensEval uchun natijalarimizni koʻrsatimiz: Social Media (SemEval 2019 - Vazifa 6). Natijalamizning natijalarimizni ko'rsatish mumkin, bu uchta boshqa vazifalar uchun muhim xususiyatlar mumkin. Klassik uskunalar bilan o'rganish va juda o'rganish bilan. Bizning eng yaxshi modelimiz 0.719'ning 0.719 makro F_1'da, sub-vazifa B'da 75 dan 3 yoshdi. Va bizning vazifa A va C haqida yaxshi harakat qilishimiz mumkin lekin kutilgan natijalarni bajarishimiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu kết quả của chúng tôi về OffensEvl: Nhận diện và phân loại Ngôn ngữ Hành động ở phương tiện xã hội Những kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy sự nhúng tại ngữ cảnh là những yếu tố quan trọng cho ba công việc phụ khác nhau liên quan tới cổ máy và sự học sâu. Mẫu tốt nhất của chúng tôi đã đạt đến vị trí 3 của 75 trong nhiệm vụ B với một vĩ mô F u 1 of 0.719. C ách tiếp cận của chúng ta với việc phân công A và C không tốt nhưng cũng có thể cung cấp kết quả hứa hẹn.', 'bg': 'Представяме резултатите си за Идентифициране и категоризиране на офанзивен език в социалните медии (Задача 6). Нашите резултати показват, че вграждането на контекста е важна характеристика за трите различни подзадачи във връзка с класическата машина и с дълбокото обучение. Най-добрият ни модел достигна място 3 от 75 в подзадача Б с макрос F_1 от 0.719. Нашите подходи за подзадачи А и С се представят по-малко добре, но могат да доведат и до обещаващи резултати.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo naše rezultate za OffensEval: identifikacija i kategorizacija neposlušnog jezika u socijalnim medijima (pola ispitivanja 2019 - zadatak 6). Naši rezultati pokazuju da su kontekstske integracije važne karakteristike za tri različite podzadatke u vezi sa klasičnim strojem i dubokim učenjem. Naš najbolji model je dostigao mjesto 3 od 75 u podzadatku B sa makrom F_1 od 0,719. Naši pristupi podzadatku A i C čine manje dobro, ali bi također mogli donijeti obećavajuće rezultate.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer vores resultater for OffensEval: Identificering og Kategorisering af Offensivt Sprog i Sociale Medier (SemEval 2019 - Opgave 6). Vores resultater viser, at kontekst indlejringer er vigtige funktioner for de tre forskellige underopgaver i forbindelse med klassisk maskine og deep learning. Vores bedste model nåede plads 3 af 75 i underopgave B med en makro F_1 på 0,719. Vores tilgange til underopgave A og C fungerer mindre godt, men kan også levere lovende resultater.', 'nl': 'We presenteren onze resultaten voor OffensEval: Identification and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (SemEval 2019 onder Task 6). Onze resultaten tonen aan dat context embeddings belangrijke kenmerken zijn voor de drie verschillende deeltaken in verband met klassieke machine en met deep learning. Ons beste model bereikte plaats 3 van 75 in deeltaak B met een macro F_1 van 0.719. Onze benaderingen voor deeltaken A en C presteren minder goed, maar kunnen ook veelbelovende resultaten opleveren.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren unsere Ergebnisse für OffensEval: Identifizieren und Kategorisieren von Offensivsprache in Social Media (SemEval 2019 unter Task 6). Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass Kontexteinbettungen wichtige Merkmale für die drei verschiedenen Teilaufgaben im Zusammenhang mit klassischem Machine und Deep Learning sind. Unser bestes Modell erreichte Platz 3 von 75 in Teilaufgabe B mit einem Makro F_1 von 0.719. Unsere Ansätze für Teilaufgaben A und C schneiden weniger gut ab, könnten aber auch vielversprechende Ergebnisse liefern.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan hasil kami untuk OffensEval: Identifikasi dan Kategorisasi Bahasa Offensif dalam Media Sosial (SemEval 2019 - Tugas 6). Our results show that context embeddings are important features for the three different sub-tasks in connection with classical machine and with deep learning.  Model terbaik kami mencapai tempat 3 dari 75 dalam sub-tugas B dengan makro F_1 0.719. Pendekatan kami untuk sub-tugas A dan C bekerja lebih baik tapi juga bisa memberikan hasil yang berjanji.', 'fa': 'ما نتیجه\u200cهایمان را برای OffensEval نشان می\u200cدهیم: شناسایی و برگزیدن زبان نیکوکاری در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی (نیم Eval 2019 - Task 6). نتیجه\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که پیوند محیط برای سه کار زیر مختلف در ارتباط با ماشین کلاسیک و یادگیری عمیق مهم هستند. بهترین مدل ما به جای ۳ از ۷۵ در زیر وظیفه B رسید با یک ماکرو F_1 از ۰.719. دسترسی ما برای زیر کار A و C کمتر خوب انجام می\u200cدهد ولی می\u200cتواند نتیجه\u200cهای قول\u200cدهنده را هم تحویل دهد.', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha matokeo yetu kwa ajili ya OffensEval: Kutambua na Kugawanya lugha rasmi katika mitandao ya kijamii (SemEval 2019 - Kazi 6). Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kuwa mazingira ya muktadha ni vipaumbele muhimu kwa kazi hizi tatu tofauti tofauti za vigogo na mashine ya klassika na kujifunza kwa kina. Mfano wetu bora ulifika nafasi ya 3 kati ya 75 katika kazi za subira B yenye ukubwa wa F_1 wa 0.719. Matokeo yetu kwa kazi ya A na C yanafanya vizuri zaidi lakini pia inaweza kutoa matokeo yanayoahidi.', 'ko': '우리는 소셜 미디어의 공격적인 언어를 식별하고 분류하는 Offenseval의 결과를 보여 주었다(SemEval 2019-퀘스트 6).우리의 연구 결과에 의하면 언어 환경 삽입은 고전적인 기계 학습과 깊이 있는 학습의 세 가지 서로 다른 하위 임무의 중요한 특징이다.우리의 가장 좋은 모형은 하위 작업 B에서 0.719의 매크로F 1로 75분의 3에 달한다.우리는 하위 임무 A와 C에 대한 방법이 잘 집행되지 않았지만 희망적인 결과를 가져올 수도 있다.', 'af': "Ons stel ons resultate voor OffensEval: identifiseer en kategoriseer offensive taal in sosiale media (SemEval 2019 - Opdrag 6). Ons resultate vertoon dat konteks inbêding belangrik is vir die drie verskillende sub-taak in verbinding met klassieke masjien en met diep leer. Ons beste model het toegekom plek 3 van 75 in subtaak B met 'n makro F_1 van 0.719. Ons toegang vir sub-taak A en C uitvoer minder goed maar kon ook beloftende resultate berei.", 'tr': "We present our results for OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (SemEval 2019 - Task 6). Biziň netijelerimiz kontekst integrasy klasik maşyny bilen we derin öwrenmek bilen üç dürli sub-zadyň has möhüm özellikleridir. Biziň iň gowy nusgamyz 0.719-iň makro F_1'i B sub-görende 75-nji ýere ýetdi. Biziň A we C sub-task üçin golaýlarymyz azajyk gowy çykýar, ýöne we söz berjek netijelerimiz bolup biler.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim rezultatet tona për OffensEval: Identifikimi dhe kategorizimi i gjuhës ofensive në media sociale (SemEval 2019 - Task 6). Rezultatet tona tregojnë se përfshirjet e kontekstit janë karakteristika të rëndësishme për tre nëndetyrat e ndryshme në lidhje me makinën klasike dhe me mësimin e thellë. Modeli ynë më i mirë arriti vendin 3 nga 75 në nëndetyrë B me një makro F_1 prej 0.719. Përqasjet tona për nëndetyrën A dhe C bëjnë më pak mirë por mund të japin gjithashtu rezultate premtuese.', 'am': 'ውጤታችንን ለOffensEval እናቀርባለን፤ ማኅበራዊ አውታር ቋንቋዎችን ማረጋገጥ እና ክፍተቶችን እናሳውቃለን (SemEval 2019 - ስራ 6). ፍሬዎቻችን የግንኙነታችን አካባቢዎች በክላሲካዊ መሣሪያና ጥልቅ ትምህርት ጋር ለሦስቱ የተለየ የጥብቅ ስራዎችን የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡ ትልቁ ምሳሌያችን ከ.719 በማክሮው B ውስጥ 3 በ.75 ውስጥ ደረሰ፡፡ አ እና C አካባቢ ስራችንን በመልካም ማድረግ እንችላለን ግን የተስፋ ፍጥረት እና ሊሰጥ ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեր արդյունքները «ՕֆենսԵվալ»-ի համար. հասարակական լրատվամիջոցներում «ՕֆենսԵվալ»-ի համար «ՕֆենսԵվալ»-ի համար «ՕֆենսԵվալ»-ի համար «ՕֆենսԵվալ»-ի համար «Օ Մեր արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ կոնտեքստի ներգրավումները կարևոր հատկություններ են երեք տարբեր ենթախնդիրների համար, որոնք կապված են դասական մեքենայի և խորը սովորելու հետ: Մեր լավագույն մոդելը հասավ 75-ից 3-ին B-ի ենթախնդրի մեջ, 0.719-ի F_1-ի մեջ: Մեր A և C ենթախնդրի մոտեցումները ավելի քիչ լավ են աշխատում, բայց կարող են նաև խոստացնող արդյունքներ բերել:', 'az': "OffensEval üçün sonuçlarımızı göstəririk: Sosyal Medya dillərinin təşkil edilməsi və kategoriyası (SemEval 2019 - Task 6). Bizim sonuçlarımız, müxtəlif məlumatlar, klasik maşına və derin öyrənməyə bağlı üç müxtəlif apa-iş üçün mövcuddur. Ən yaxşı modellərimiz B sub-task 3 ilə 0.719'in makro F_1-si ilə 75 yerinə yetişdi. Bizim A və C aparmaq üçün yaxınlıqlarımız daha yaxşıdır, lakin və ’ d verən sonuçlarımız də olar.", 'bn': 'আমরা অফিনসেনভালের ফলাফল উপস্থাপন করছি: সামাজিক মিডিয়ায় অফিসেন্স ভাষা পরিচিত এবং বিভিন্ন ভাষা (সেমইভাল ২০১৯- কাজ ৬)। Our results show that context embeddings are important features for the three different sub-tasks in connection with classical machine and with deep learning.  আমাদের সবচেয়ে ভাল মডেলটি সাব-কাজ বিতে ৩৫ এর মধ্যে পৌঁছেছে যার ম্যাক্রো F_1 এর ম্যাক্রো. ৭১৯ এর মধ্যে। আমাদের সাব কাজ এ এবং সি কম ভালো কাজ করতে পারে, কিন্তু প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল ফলাফল প্রদান করতে পারে।', 'ca': "Presentam els nostres resultats per OffensEval: Identificar i categoritzar la llengua nociva als mitjans socials (SemEval 2019 - tasca 6). Els nostres resultats demostren que les integracions del context són característiques importants per a les tres sub-tasques en relació amb la màquina clàssica i l'aprenentatge profund. El nostre millor model va arribar al lloc 3 de 75 a la subtasca B amb una macro F_1 de 0,719. Our approaches for sub-task A and C perform less well but could also deliver promising results.", 'et': 'Tutvustame oma tulemusi teemal OffensEval: ründava keele tuvastamine ja kategoriseerimine sotsiaalmeedias (SemEval 2019 - ülesanne 6). Meie tulemused näitavad, et konteksti manustamine on olulised omadused kolme erineva alamülesande jaoks seoses klassikalise masinaga ja sügavõppega. Meie parim mudel jõudis alamülesandes B 3. kohale 75-st makroga F_1 0,719. Meie lähenemisviisid alamülesannete A ja C puhul on vähem tulemuslikud, kuid võivad anda ka paljulubavaid tulemusi.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo svoje rezultate za OffensEval: identifikacija i kategorizacija neposlušnog jezika u socijalnim medijima (semiEval 2019 - zadatak 6). Naši rezultati pokazuju da su kontekstske integracije važne karakteristike za tri različite podzadatke u vezi sa klasičnim strojem i dubokim učenjem. Naš najbolji model je dostigao mjesto 3 od 75 u podzadatku B sa makrom F_1 od 0,719. Naši pristupi podzadatku A i C čine manje dobro, ali bi takođe mogli donijeti obećavajuće rezultate.', 'cs': 'Představujeme naše výsledky pro OffensEval: Identifikace a kategorizace urážlivého jazyka v sociálních médiích (SemEval 2019 v části Úkol 6). Naše výsledky ukazují, že kontextové vložení jsou důležitými vlastnostmi pro tři různé dílčí úlohy ve spojení s klasickým strojem a s hlubokým učením. Náš nejlepší model dosáhl místa 3 z 75 v podúkolu B s makrem F_1 0.719. Naše přístupy pro dílčí úlohy A a C mají méně dobré výsledky, ale mohou také přinést slibné výsledky.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme tulokset artikkelille OffensEval: loukkaavan kielen tunnistaminen ja luokittelu sosiaalisessa mediassa (SemEval 2019 - Task 6). Tuloksemme osoittavat, että kontekstin upotukset ovat tärkeitä ominaisuuksia kolmelle eri osatehtävälle klassisen koneen ja syväoppimisen yhteydessä. Paras mallimme saavutti kohdan 3/75 alatehtävässä B makrolla F_1 0,719. Osatehtäviin A ja C liittyvät lähestymistapamme eivät toimi hyvin, mutta ne voivat myös tuottaa lupaavia tuloksia.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe punika diputêrané kanggo offensinval: Orintasi lan kelompok Ofensive Language sing di nggambar Sowulan Media (semebal 2011 9 - task 6). Rejalaké awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono akeh-sistem sing dikarepaké karo telu bener-task sing gak nggambar karo sistem tau karo akeh basa sak duluran Kita model sing paling kelas telu 75 ditambah apat-task B karo macro F_1 tahun 0.7 Rasané awakdhéwé kanggo ngilanggar apa-task A lan C kuwi isih luwih apik lan nganggep kuwi mau ngeremukake pawaran sing paling dhéwé.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da matsalayinmu wa offenseval: Ina iya gane da kategori masu offisive Lugha na Jami'a (Semeval 2019 - Tafiyar 6). MatamayinMu na nũna cewa, muhimmi ne masu cikin aikin waɗannan uku masu bin-aikin da ke haɗi da mashine mai classical da kuma a cikin sanar da masu ƙari. Our best model reached place 3 of 75 in sub-task B with a macro F_1 of 0.719.  Ga mataimakanmu na samun aikin A da C, sai yana iya samun mataimaki masu yi wa'adi.", 'he': "אנחנו מציגים את התוצאות שלנו עבור OffensEval: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media (SemEval 2019 - Task 6). התוצאות שלנו מראות שהתוכניות הקשר הן תכונות חשובות לשלושת התפקידים השונים בקשר למכונה קלאסית ובלימוד עמוק. המודל הטוב ביותר שלנו הגיע למקום 3 מ-75 בתא-משימה ב עם מקרו F_1 של 0.719. הגישות שלנו לתפקיד א' ו-סי מצליחות פחות טוב אבל יכולות גם להביא תוצאות מבטיחות.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo rezultate za OffensEval: identifikacija in kategorizacija ofenzivnega jezika v socialnih omrežjih (SemEval 2019 - naloga 6). Naši rezultati kažejo, da so kontekstne vdelave pomembne značilnosti za tri različne podnaloge v povezavi s klasičnim strojem in globokim učenjem. Naš najboljši model je dosegel 3. mesto od 75 v podnalogi B z makrom F_1 0,719. Naši pristopi za podnalogo A in C so manj uspešni, vendar bi lahko prinesli obetavne rezultate.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་OffensEval(OffensEval 2019 - Task 6) ནང་དུ་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་དང་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གནང་བ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་rezultatimiz་ཡིག་ཆ་ནང་དུ་སྐྱེས་ཡུན་བཟོ་བའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་ཡིན་པས། རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་མ་ལག་དང་ཟབ་སྦྲེལ་བའ ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་བཏང་བའི་ཚད་ལྡན་75ལས་རིམ་པ་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཚད་ལྡན་གྲངས་_1(0.719)ཞིག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་གྲོས་གཟུགས་ལས་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་འགོད་པ་དང་སྒེར་གྱི་གནད་གཤིས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ཤེས་དེ་ཉུང་མེད་པ་དང་'}
{'en': 'INGEOTEC at SemEval-2019 Task 5 and Task 6 : A Genetic Programming Approach for Text Classification', 'ar': 'INGEOTEC في SemEval-2019 Task 5 and Task 6: A Genetic Programming Approach for Text Classification', 'pt': 'INGEOTEC na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 5 e Tarefa 6: Uma Abordagem de Programação Genética para Classificação de Texto', 'es': 'INGEOTEC en SemEval-2019 Tarea 5 y Tarea 6: Un enfoque de programación genética para la clasificación de textos', 'fr': 'INGEOTEC au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 5 et Tâche 6\xa0: Approche de programmation génétique pour la classification de textes', 'ja': 'SEMEval -2019のINGEOTECタスク5とタスク6 ：テキスト分類のための遺伝子プログラミングアプローチ', 'zh': 'INGEOTEC at SemEval-2019 Śä°5šĽĽ6:śĖáśú¨ÁľĖÁ®čś≥ē', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 5 और कार्य 6 पर INGEOTEC: पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए एक आनुवंशिक प्रोग्रामिंग दृष्टिकोण', 'ru': 'INGEOTEC на SemEval-2019 Задача 5 и Задача 6: Подход к генетическому программированию для классификации текста', 'ga': 'INGEOTEC ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 5 agus Tasc 6: Cur Chuige Ríomhchláraithe Géiniteach d’Aicmiú Téacs', 'ka': 'INGEOTEC SemEval-2019 დავალება 5 და დავალება 6: ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის генეტიკური პროგრამის მიღება', 'el': 'Εργασία 5 και εργασία 6: Μια προσέγγιση γενετικού προγραμματισμού για την ταξινόμηση κειμένων', 'hu': 'INGEOTEC a SemEval-2019 5. feladat és 6. feladat: Genetikai programozási megközelítés a szövegosztályozáshoz', 'it': 'INGEOTEC al SemEval-2019 Task 5 e Task 6: Un approccio di programmazione genetica per la classificazione dei testi', 'kk': 'INGEOTEC жарым- 2019 тапсырмасы 5 және 6 тапсырмасы: Мәтін классификациясының генетикалық бағдарламаларының қатынасы', 'mk': 'ИНГЕОТЕК на SemEval-2019 задача 5 и задача 6: Генетички програмирачки пристап за класификација на текст', 'lt': 'INGEOTEC pusevaliui 2019 m. 5 užduotis ir 6 užduotis: Genetinis programavimo metodas teksto klasifikacijai', 'ms': 'INGEOTEC pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 5 dan Tugas 6: Pendekatan Program Genetik untuk Klasifikasi Teks', 'mn': 'INGEOTEC at SemEval-2019 Task 5 and Task 6: A genetic Programming Approach for Text Classification', 'mt': 'INGEOTEC f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 5 u Kompitu 6: Approċċ ta’ Programmazzjoni Ġenetika għall-Klassifikazzjoni tat-Test', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 5 ലും ജോലി 6- ല്\u200d ഇന്\u200dജോട്ടെസി: ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസിഷനിനുള്ള ഒരു ജെനിറ്റിക് പ്രോഗ്രാമിങ', 'no': 'INGEOTEC på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 5 og oppgåve 6: Ein genetisk programtilgang for tekstklassifikasjon', 'pl': 'INGEOTEC na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 5 i Zadanie 6: Podejście do programowania genetycznego do klasyfikacji tekstu', 'ro': 'INGEOTEC la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 5 și Sarcina 6: O abordare de programare genetică pentru clasificarea textelor', 'sr': 'INGEOTEC na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 5 i zadatak 6: genetski pristup programiranja za klasifikaciju teksta', 'si': 'INGEOTEC at Half-2019 Job 5 and Job 6: A genetical Application approach for Text Classified', 'so': 'Shaqada 5 iyo shaqo 6: A Genetic Programming Approach for Text Classification', 'sv': 'INGEOTEC på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 5 och Uppgift 6: En genetisk programmeringsmetod för textklassificering', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 5 மற்றும் பணி 6: உரை வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கான ஒரு ஜெனடிக் நிரல் சேர்', 'ur': 'INGEOTEC at SemEval-2019 Task 5 and Task 6: A genetic Programming Approach for Text Classification', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifa 5 va Vazifa 6: Matn classification uchun Genetic dastur Approach', 'vi': 'INTETEC at SemEvl-209 Task 5 và Task 6: A Gen programming tiếp cận cho hạng sang văn bản', 'hr': 'INGEOTEC na zadatku 5 i zadatku 6: genetski programirani pristup klasifikaciji teksta', 'bg': 'Задача 5 и задача 6: Подход на генетично програмиране за класификация на текста', 'da': 'INGEOTEC på SemEval-2019 Opgave 5 og Opgave 6: En genetisk programmeringsmetode for tekstklassifikation', 'nl': 'INGEOTEC op SemEval-2019 Taak 5 en Taak 6: Een genetische programmeringsaanpak voor tekstclassificatie', 'de': 'INGEOTEC bei SemEval-2019 Task 5 und Task 6: Ein genetischer Programmieransatz für die Textklassifikation', 'fa': 'INGEOTEC در پایین Eval-2019 Task 5 and Task 6: A genetic Programming Approach for Text Classification', 'ko': 'INGEOTEC가SemEval-2019에서의 임무 5와 임무 6: 텍스트 분류의 유전 프로그래밍 방법', 'tr': 'INGEOTEC at SemEval-2019 Task 5 and Task 6: A Genetic Programming Approach for Text Classification', 'sq': 'INGEOTEC në SemEval-2019 Task 5 dhe Task 6: A Genetic Programming Approach for Text Classification', 'id': 'INGEOTEC di SemEval-2019 Tugas 5 dan Tugas 6: Pendekatan Programasi Genetik untuk Klasifikasi Teks', 'am': 'ስራ 5 እና ስራ 6: የGenetic Programming Approach for Text Classification', 'sw': 'INGEOTEC kwenye SemEval-2019 Kazi 5 na Kazi 6: Mpango wa Kizalendo wa Kuhusu Makala', 'hy': 'Ինջեոտեքսը, 2019-ի "ՍեմԷվալ" 5-ի և 6-ի "Գենետիկ ծրագրավորման մոտեցում տեքստի դասակարգման համար"', 'az': 'INGEOTEC at SemEval-2019 Task 5 and Task 6: A genetic Programming Approach for Text Classification', 'af': 'INGEOTEC by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 5 en Opdrag 6: 芒聙聶n Geniese Programming Approach vir Teks Klassifikasie', 'bs': 'INGEOTEC na semiEval-2019 zadatak 5 i zadatak 6: genetski pristup programiranja za klasifikaciju teksta', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৫ এবং কাজ ৬-এ ইনেজেটেসি: টেক্সট ক্লাসিশনের জন্য একটি জেনেটিক প্রোগ্রামিং আগমন', 'cs': 'INGEOTEC na SemEval-2019 Úkol 5 a Úkol 6: Genetický programovací přístup pro klasifikaci textů', 'et': 'INGEOTEC SemEval-2019 ülesanne 5 ja ülesanne 6: geneetilise programmeerimise lähenemisviis teksti klassifitseerimiseks', 'ca': 'INGEOTEC a SemEval-2019 Task 5 and Task 6: A Genetic Programming Approach for Text Classification', 'fi': 'INGEOTEC SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 5 ja Tehtävä 6: Geneettinen ohjelmointi lähestymistapa tekstiluokitukseen', 'jv': 'INGEOCMP at semebal-2011 task 5 and task 6: A generic Program Method for Text', 'he': 'INGEOTEC ב SemEval-2019 משימה 5 ומשימה 6: גישה לתכנית גנטית לקlassification טקסט', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'INGEOTEC na SemEval-2019 naloga 5 in naloga 6: pristop genskega programiranja za klasifikacijo besedila', 'bo': 'INGEOTEC at SemEval-2019 Task 5 and Task 6: A Genetic Programming Approach for Text Classification'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our participation in HatEval and OffensEval challenges for English and Spanish languages. We used several approaches, B4MSA, FastText, and EvoMSA. Best results were achieved with EvoMSA, which is a multilingual and domain-independent architecture that combines the prediction of different knowledge sources to solve text classification problems.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة مشاركتنا في تحديات HatEval و OffensEval للغة الإنجليزية والإسبانية. استخدمنا عدة طرق ، B4MSA و FastText و EvoMSA. تم تحقيق أفضل النتائج مع EvoMSA ، وهي بنية متعددة اللغات ومستقلة عن المجال تجمع بين التنبؤ بمصادر المعرفة المختلفة لحل مشاكل تصنيف النص.', 'fr': 'Cet article décrit notre participation aux défis HatEval et OffenseVal pour les langues anglaise et espagnole. Nous avons utilisé plusieurs approches, B4MSA, FastText et eVOMSA. Les meilleurs résultats ont été obtenus avec eVomsa, une architecture multilingue et indépendante du domaine qui combine la prédiction de différentes sources de connaissances pour résoudre les problèmes de classification de texte.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestra participación en los desafíos HaTeval y OffensEval para los idiomas inglés y español. Utilizamos varios enfoques, B4MSA, FastText y eVomSA. Los mejores resultados se lograron con eVomSA, que es una arquitectura multilingüe e independiente del dominio que combina la predicción de diferentes fuentes de conocimiento para resolver problemas de clasificación de textos.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nossa participação nos desafios HatEval e OffensEval para os idiomas inglês e espanhol. Usamos várias abordagens, B4MSA, FastText e EvoMSA. Os melhores resultados foram alcançados com o EvoMSA, que é uma arquitetura multilíngue e independente de domínio que combina a previsão de diferentes fontes de conhecimento para resolver problemas de classificação de texto.', 'ja': 'この論文では、HatEvalとOffensEvalの英語とスペイン語の課題への参加について説明します。B 4 MSA、FastText、EvoMSAなど、いくつかのアプローチを使用しました。EvoMSAは、さまざまな知識源の予測を組み合わせてテキスト分類の問題を解決する、多言語でドメインに依存しないアーキテクチャです。', 'zh': '本文述我与HatEvalOffensEval挑战英语与西班牙语。 用数法,B4MSAFastTextEvoMSA。 EvoMSA得其效,EvoMSA多言独立之架构,合知源之占以决其类。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наше участие в конкурсах HatEval и OffensEval для английского и испанского языков. Мы использовали несколько подходов, B4MSA, FastText и EvoMSA. Наилучшие результаты были достигнуты с EvoMSA, которая является многоязычной и независимой от домена архитектурой, которая сочетает в себе предсказание различных источников знаний для решения задач классификации текста.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर अंग्रेजी और स्पेनिश भाषाओं के लिए HatEval और OffensEval चुनौतियों में हमारी भागीदारी का वर्णन करता है। हमने कई दृष्टिकोणों, B4MSA, FastText और EvoMSA का उपयोग किया। EvoMSA के साथ सर्वोत्तम परिणाम प्राप्त किए गए थे, जो एक बहुभाषी और डोमेन-स्वतंत्र वास्तुकला है जो पाठ वर्गीकरण समस्याओं को हल करने के लिए विभिन्न ज्ञान स्रोतों की भविष्यवाणी को जोड़ती है।', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár rannpháirtíocht i ndúshláin HatEval agus OffensEval don Bhéarla agus don Spáinnis. D’úsáideamar roinnt cur chuige, B4MSA, FastText, agus EvoMSA. Baineadh na torthaí is fearr amach le EvoMSA, ailtireacht ilteangach atá neamhspleách ar an bhfearann a chomhcheanglaíonn tuar foinsí éagsúla eolais chun fadhbanna aicmithe téacs a réiteach.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει τη συμμετοχή μας στις προκλήσεις για τις Αγγλικές και Ισπανικές γλώσσες. Χρησιμοποιήσαμε διάφορες προσεγγίσεις, B4MSA, FastText και EvoMSA. Τα καλύτερα αποτελέσματα επιτεύχθηκαν με το η οποία είναι μια πολυγλωσσική και ανεξάρτητη αρχιτεκτονική που συνδυάζει την πρόβλεψη διαφορετικών πηγών γνώσης για την επίλυση προβλημάτων ταξινόμησης κειμένου.', 'ka': 'ეს წიგნი აღწერს ჩვენი დაწყვეტილება HatEval-ში და OffensEval-ში გამოცდილებების ინგლისური და სპანელი ენებისთვის. ჩვენ გამოიყენეთ რამდენიმე მიღება, B4MSA, FastText და EvoMSA. უკეთესი წარმოდგენები იქნება EvoMSA-ით, რომელიც არის მრავალენგური და დიომინური განსაზღვრებული აქტიქტიქტურა, რომელიც კომბიზებს განსხვავებული მეცნიერების წარმოდგენები', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a HatEval és OffensEval kihívásokban való részvételünket angol és spanyol nyelvekre. Több megközelítést alkalmaztunk: B4MSA, FastText és EvoMSA. A legjobb eredményeket az EvoMSA-val értük el, amely egy többnyelvű és domain-független architektúra, amely ötvözi a különböző tudásforrások előrejelzését a szövegosztályozási problémák megoldására.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive la nostra partecipazione alle sfide HatEval e OffensEval per le lingue inglese e spagnolo. Abbiamo utilizzato diversi approcci, B4MSA, FastText ed EvoMSA. I migliori risultati sono stati raggiunti con EvoMSA, un'architettura multilingue e indipendente dal dominio che combina la previsione di diverse fonti di conoscenza per risolvere i problemi di classificazione del testo.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз HatEval және OffensEval тілдерінде қатынасызды таңдайды. Біз бірнеше қатынасы қолдандық, B4MSA, FastText және EvoMSA. Ең жақсы нәтижелер EvoMSA-мен жетілді, бұл - мәтін классификациясының мәселелерін шешу үшін бірнеше мәлімет көзінің және доменге тәуелсіз архитектурасы.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinami mūsų dalyvavimas HatEval ir OffensEval uždaviniuose anglų ir ispanų kalboms. Naudojome kelis metodus: B4MSA, FastText ir EvoMSA. Geriausi rezultatai pasiekti naudojant EvoMSA, kuri yra daugiakalbė ir nepriklausoma nuo srities architektūra, derinanti įvairių žinių šaltinių prognozavimą tekstų klasifikavimo problemoms spręsti.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашето учество во HatEval и OffensEval предизвиците за англиски и шпански јазици. Користевме неколку пристапи, Б4MSA, FastText и EvoMSA. Најдобрите резултати беа постигнати со EvoMSA, која е мултијазичка и независна од домените архитектура која го комбинира предвидувањето на различни извори на знаење за решавање на проблемите со класификацијата на текстот.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ പങ്കെടുക്കുന്നത് ഹാറ്റീവാലിലും ഓഫെന്\u200dസ്വാലിലും ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലും സ്പാനിഷ് ഭാഷകളി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പല വഴികളും ബി4MSA, ഫാസ്റ്റ് ടെക്സ്റ്റും എവോഎസ്എയും ഉപയോഗിച്ചു. വ്യത്യസ്ത അറിവ് സ്രോതസ്സുകളുടെ പ്രവചനം കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രവചനങ്ങളെ കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന ഒരു പല ഭാഷകളും ഡ', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan participasi kita dalam HatEval dan OffensEval cabaran untuk bahasa Inggeris dan Sepanyol. We used several approaches, B4MSA, FastText, and EvoMSA.  Hasil terbaik telah dicapai dengan EvoMSA, yang merupakan arkitektur berbilang bahasa dan bebas domain yang menggabungkan ramalan sumber pengetahuan yang berbeza untuk menyelesaikan masalah kelasukan teks.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-parteċipazzjoni tagħna f’HatEval u OffensEval sfidi għall-lingwi Ingliżi u Spanjoli. Użajna diversi approċċi, B4MSA, FastText, u EvoMSA. L-a ħjar riżultati nkisbu bl-EvoMSA, li hija arkitettura multilingwi u indipendenti mid-dominju li tgħaqqad it-tbassir ta’ sorsi differenti ta’ għarfien biex jiġu solvuti problemi ta’ klassifikazzjoni tat-test.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний HatEval болон OffensEval-д оролцоогоор Англи болон Испан хэлний төлөө зориулалтыг тайлбарладаг. Бид олон арга барилга, B4MSA, FastText, EvoMSA ашигласан. Хамгийн сайн үр дүнг EvoMSA-тай гарсан. Энэ бол олон хэл болон холбоотой тогтнолтой архитектур юм. Энэ нь өөр өөр мэдлэг эх үүсвэрүүдийн тодорхойлолтын асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд өөр өөр мэдлэг эх үүсвэр', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz udział w wyzwaniach HatEval i OffensEval dla języków angielskich i hiszpańskich. Zastosowaliśmy kilka podejść: B4MSA, FastText i EvoMSA. Najlepsze wyniki osiągnięto dzięki EvoMSA, która jest wielojęzyczną i niezależną od domeny architekturą łączącą przewidywanie różnych źródeł wiedzy w celu rozwiązania problemów klasyfikacji tekstu.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie participarea noastră la provocările HatEval și OffensEval pentru limbile engleză și spaniolă. Am folosit mai multe abordări, B4MSA, FastText și EvoMSA. Cele mai bune rezultate au fost obținute cu EvoMSA, care este o arhitectură multilingvă și independentă de domeniu, care combină predicția diferitelor surse de cunoștințe pentru a rezolva problemele de clasificare a textelor.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver vår deltakast i HatEval og OffensEval utfordringar for engelsk og spansk språk. Vi brukte fleire tilnærmingar, B4MSA, FastText og EvoMSA. Det beste resultatet er oppnådd med EvoMSA, som er ein fleirspråk og domeneuavhengig arkitektur som kombinerer forhåndsvising av ulike kunnskjelder for å løysa tekstklassifikasjonssproblemar.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše sudjelovanje u HatEval i OffensEval izazovima za engleski i španjolski jezik. Koristili smo nekoliko pristupa, B4MSA, FastText i EvoMSA. Najbolji rezultati su postignuti sa EvoMSA, što je multijezička i domena nezavisna arhitektura koja kombinuje predviđanje različitih izvora znanja kako bi rešila probleme klasifikacije teksta.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ සම්බන්ධතාව හැටෙවෙල් සහ ඔෆෙන්ස්වෙල් වල ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ස්පැනිස් භාෂාවට ප්\u200dරශ අපි කිසිම අවස්ථාවක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා, B4MSA, FastText, EvoMSA. හොඳම ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරමාණය EvoMSA එක්ක ලැබුණා, ඒක තරම් භාෂාවක් සහ', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran qayb-qaadashada noogu jira HatEval iyo OffensEval dhibaatooyinka afka Ingiriiska iyo Isbanishka. We used several approaches, B4MSA, FastText, and EvoMSA.  Waxaa la helay arimaha ugu wanaagsanaan EvoMSA, taas oo ah dhismo luuqadaha kala duduwan iyo deegaanka oo xor u ah, kaas oo isku daryeela wixii la soo sheegay noocyada aqoonta kala duduwan si ay u xalliyaan dhibaatooyin kala qaybsan.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt deltagande i HatEval och OffensEval utmaningar för engelska och spanska språk. Vi använde flera metoder, B4MSA, FastText och EvoMSA. Bästa resultaten uppnåddes med EvoMSA, som är en flerspråkig och domänoberoende arkitektur som kombinerar förutsägelse av olika kunskapskällor för att lösa textklassifikationsproblem.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் ஹாட்வால் மற்றும் OffensEval ஆங்கிலத்துக்கும் ஸ்பானிஷ் மொழிகளுக்கும் எங்கள் பங்கேட்டை  நாங்கள் பல அணுகுகளை பயன்படுத்தினோம், B4MSA, வேகமான உரையை மற்றும் EvoMSA. Best results were achieved with EvoMSA, which is a multilingual and domain-independent architecture that combines the prediction of different knowledge sources to solve text classification problems.', 'ur': 'This paper describes our participation in HatEval and OffensEval challenges for English and Spanish languages. ہم نے بہت سی طریقے استعمال کیا، B4MSA، FastText اور EvoMSA. اچھے نتیجے EvoMSA کے ساتھ پہنچ گئے ہیں، جو ایک بہت سی زبان اور ڈومین کے مستقل معماری ہے جو مختلف علم سرسولوں کی پیش بینی کو متحد کرتا ہے تاکہ متن کلاسی مشکلات کو حل کریں.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz HatEval va OffensEval ingliz tili va Ispanchaga murakkablarimizni anglatadi. Biz bir necha usuldan, B4MSA, FastText, EvoMSA va ko'pchilik usuldan foydalanamiz. @ info", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả sự tham gia của chúng ta trong thử thách HatEvol và OffensEvol dành cho ngôn ngữ Anh và Tây Ban Nha. Chúng tôi đã sử dụng nhiều phương pháp, B4MSA, FastbText, và EvoMSA. Kết quả tốt nhất là nhờ Evoo, một kiến trúc đa dạng và độc lập miền, kết hợp dự đoán của các nguồn tri thức khác nhau để giải quyết các vấn đề phân loại văn bản.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва участието ни в предизвикателствата на английски и испански език. Използвахме няколко подхода, B4MSA, FastText и EvoMSA. Най-добри резултати бяха постигнати с многоезична и независима от домейна архитектура, която съчетава прогнозирането на различни източници на знания за решаване на проблеми с класификацията на текста.', 'nl': 'Deze paper beschrijft onze deelname aan HatEval en OffensEval uitdagingen voor Engels en Spaans. We gebruikten verschillende benaderingen, B4MSA, FastText en EvoMSA. De beste resultaten werden bereikt met EvoMSA, een meertalige en domeinonafhankelijke architectuur die de voorspelling van verschillende kennisbronnen combineert om tekstclassificatieproblemen op te lossen.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores deltagelse i HatEval og OffensEval udfordringer for engelsk og spansk sprog. Vi brugte flere tilgange, B4MSA, FastText og EvoMSA. De bedste resultater blev opnået med EvoMSA, som er en flersproget og domæneafhængig arkitektur, der kombinerer forudsigelse af forskellige videnkilder for at løse tekstklassifikationsproblemer.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše sudjelovanje u HatEval i OffensEval izazovima za engleski i španjolski jezici. Koristili smo nekoliko pristupa, B4MSA, FastText i EvoMSA. Najbolji rezultati su postignuti s EvoMSA, što je multijezička i domena nezavisna arhitektura koja kombinira predviđanje različitih izvora znanja za rješavanje problema klasifikacije teksta.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unsere Teilnahme an HatEval und OffensEval Herausforderungen für Englisch und Spanisch. Wir verwendeten verschiedene Ansätze, B4MSA, FastText und EvoMSA. Die besten Ergebnisse wurden mit EvoMSA erzielt, einer mehrsprachigen und domänenunabhängigen Architektur, die die Vorhersage verschiedener Wissensquellen kombiniert, um Textklassifikationsprobleme zu lösen.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan parteċipasi kita di HatEval dan OffensEval tantangan untuk bahasa Inggris dan Spanyol. Kami menggunakan beberapa pendekatan, B4MSA, FastText, dan EvoMSA. Hasil terbaik dicapai dengan EvoMSA, yang merupakan arsitektur multibahasa dan independen domain yang menggabungkan prediksi sumber pengetahuan yang berbeda untuk memecahkan masalah klasifikasi teks.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ مشارکت ما را در HatEval و OffensEval برای زبانهای انگلیسی و اسپانیایی توصیف می کند. ما از چند دسترسی، B4MSA، FastText و EvoMSA استفاده کردیم. بهترین نتایج با EvoMSA رسیده شده است که یک معماری بسیاری از زبان\u200cها و دامنه\u200cهای مستقل است که پیش\u200cبینی منابع دانش\u200cهای مختلف را برای حل مشکلات مختلف راهنمایی متن ترکیب می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaelezea ushiriki wetu katika changamoto za HatEval na OffensEval kwa lugha za Kiingereza na Kihispania. We used several approaches, B4MSA, FastText, and EvoMSA.  Matokeo bora yalifanikiwa na EvoMSA, ambayo ni ujenzi huru wa lugha mbalimbali na ndani ambao unaunganisha utabiri wa vyanzo tofauti vya maarifa ili kutatua matatizo ya usambazaji wa maandishi.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz HatEval we OffensEval dili bilen biziň goşulyşymyzy iňlisçe we ispanyýaly diller üçin kynçylyklarymyzy tassyýar. Biz birnäçe golaýat, B4MSA, Tez Metin we EvoMSA ulandyk. EvoMSA bilen iň gowy netijeler berildi, bu multi dilli we domençy arhitektura hasaplanýar. Bu, metin klasifikasyýanyň meselelerini çözmek üçin farklı bilim çeşmeleriniň önümlerini birleştirir.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe ons gedeelte in HatEval en OffensEval uitdagings vir Engels en Spaanse tale. Ons het verskeie toegang gebruik, B4MSA, FastText en EvoMSA. Beste resultate is bereik met EvoMSA, wat is 'n veelvuldige en domeinafhanklike arkitektuur wat die voorskou van verskillende kennisbronne kombinieer om teks klassifikasie probleme te los.", 'sq': 'Kjo letër përshkruan pjesëmarrjen tonë në HatEval dhe OffensEval sfida për gjuhët angleze dhe spanjolle. Ne përdorëm disa metoda, B4MSA, FastText, dhe EvoMSA. Best results were achieved with EvoMSA, which is a multilingual and domain-independent architecture that combines the prediction of different knowledge sources to solve text classification problems.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ በሐጣዊ እና በኦፎኒስዊ ቋንቋዎች ላይ ተግባራችንን ይናገራል፡፡ ብ4MSA፣ FastText እና EvoMSA ብዙ ደረጃዎች ተጠቀምን፡፡ የትልዩ እውቀት ምንጮችን ለመለየት የጽሑፍ መሳፍንት ለመፍታት የሚችል የቋንቋ እና ዲሜን ነፃ የመዝገብ አካውንት ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին նկարագրում է մեր մասնակցությունը Հաթեվալ և ՕֆենսԵվալ մարտահրավերներում անգլերենի և իսպաներենի լեզուների համար: Մենք օգտագործեցինք բազմաթիվ մոտեցումներ՝ B4MSA, արագ տեքստ և ԵվոMSA: Ամենալավ արդյունքները ձեռք բերվեցին ԵվոՄՍԱ-ի միջոցով, որը բազլեզու և տիեզերական անկախ ճարտարապետություն է, որը համադրում է տարբեր գիտելիքի աղբյուրների կանխատեսումը տեքստի դասակարգման խնդիրների լուծման համար', 'az': 'Bu kağıt bizim HatEval və OffensEval dillərində olan İngilizce və İspanyol dilləri üçün müvəffəqiyyətimizi təsdiq edir. Biz bir neçə tərəflər, B4MSA, FastText və EvoMSA istifadə etdik. Ən yaxşı sonuçlar EvoMSA ilə başa düşdülər. Bu, məktub klasifikasiya problemlərini çəkmək üçün müxtəlif bilim mənbələrinin tədbirlərini birləşdirən çoxlu dil və domena bağımsız arhitektir.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা হাটিভাল এবং অফিনসেভাল চ্যালেঞ্জের অংশগ্রহণের ব্যাখ্যা করছে ইংরেজি এবং স্প্যানিশ ভাষার জন্য আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি উপায় ব্যবহার করেছিলাম, বি৪এমএসা, ফাস্ট টেক্সট এবং ইভোএমএসা। EvoMSA এর সেরা ফলাফল অর্জন করা হয়েছে, যা একটি বহুভাষী এবং ডোমেইন-স্বাধীন আর্কিটেক্টার যা বিভিন্ন জ্ঞানের উৎসের ভবিষ্যৎবাণী সমাধানের জন্য টেক্', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše sudjelovanje u HatEval i OffensEval izazovima za engleski i španjolski jezici. Koristili smo nekoliko pristupa, B4MSA, FastText i EvoMSA. Najbolji rezultati su postignuti s EvoMSA, što je multijezička i domena nezavisna arhitektura koja kombinuje predviđanje različitih izvora znanja za rješavanje problema klasifikacije teksta.', 'ca': 'Aquest article descriu la nostra participació en HatEval i OffensEval reptes per anglès i espanyol. Vam utilitzar diversos enfocaments, B4MSA, FastText i EvoMSA. Els millors resultats van aconseguir amb EvoMSA, una arquitectura multillengua i independent de dominis que combina la predicció de diferents fonts de coneixement per resoldre problemes de classificació de textos.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje naši účast na HatEval a OffensEval výzvách pro anglické a španělské jazyky. Použili jsme několik přístupů, B4MSA, FastText a EvoMSA. Nejlepších výsledků bylo dosaženo s EvoMSA, což je vícejazyčná a doménově nezávislá architektura, která kombinuje predikci různých zdrojů znalostí pro řešení problémů klasifikace textu.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kerrotaan osallistumisestamme HatEval- ja OffensEval-haasteisiin englannin ja espanjan kielille. Käytimme useita lähestymistapoja, B4MSA, FastText ja EvoMSA. Parhaat tulokset saavutettiin EvoMSA:lla, joka on monikielinen ja verkkotunnuksista riippumaton arkkitehtuuri, joka yhdistää eri tietolähteiden ennustamisen tekstin luokitteluongelmien ratkaisemiseksi.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie osalemist HatEvali ja OffensEvali väljakutsetes inglise ja hispaania keele jaoks. Kasutasime mitmeid lähenemisviise, B4MSA, FastText ja EvoMSA. Parimad tulemused saavutati EvoMSA-ga, mis on mitmekeelne ja domeenisõltumatu arhitektuur, mis ühendab erinevate teadmisallikate prognoosimise teksti klassifitseerimise probleemide lahendamiseks.', 'ko': '이 글은 영어와 스페인어의 Hat Eval과 Offens Eval 도전에 대한 우리의 참여를 묘사한다.우리는 몇 가지 방법을 사용했다. B4MSA,FastText, EvoMSA.EvoMSA는 다양한 언어와 영역이 독립된 아키텍처로, 다양한 지식원에 대한 예측을 결합해 텍스트 분류 문제를 해결한다.', 'jv': 'Perkara iki rambarang nggambar obah-obahan kanggo nyenengaké tanggal-obahan kanggo ngilangno ingkang karo Spanyol. Awak dhéwé nggambar akeh sampeyan, B4SMA, fast Text lan evoOSMA. Laptop" and "Desktop', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naše sodelovanje pri izzivih HatEval in OffensEval za angleške in španske jezike. Uporabili smo več pristopov, B4MSA, FastText in EvoMSA. Najboljše rezultate smo dosegli z EvoMSA, ki je večjezična in domensko neodvisna arhitektura, ki združuje napovedovanje različnih virov znanja za reševanje problemov klasifikacije besedil.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana ushurinmu na Hateval da offenseval masu cikin harshen Ingiriya da Isbanish. We used several approaches, B4MSA, FastText, and EvoMSA.  An samar da mafi kyaun matsalar da evaoM A, wanda ke da mulki-lugha da guda huru, yana koma da basĩri wa'adi na sourcen ilmi dabam-daban dõmin ya solve mataimaki masu cikin fassarar matsayi.", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את השתתפות שלנו ב HatEval ואתגרים OffensEval לשפה אנגלית וספרדית. השתמשנו בכמה גישות, B4MSA, FastText, ו EvoMSA. התוצאות הטובות ביותר הושגו עם EvoMSA, שהיא ארכיטקטורה רבת-שפותית ובעצמאית על שטח שמשולבת את התחזויות של מקורות ידע שונים כדי לפתור בעיות מסווג טקסט.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་རྣམ་པ་ལྟ་བུ་དང་ཨིན་སིའི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་བཀོལ་ནུས་པའི་ལས ང་ཚོས་B4MSA། Fast Text། EvoMSA གཟུགས་སྐོར་མང་པོ་སྤྱོད་པ་ཡིན། ཐེངས་འབྲས་མང་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡོད་པ་དེ་ནི་EvoMSA དང་གཅིག་གི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་domain-independent སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'JTML at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : Offensive Tweets Identification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'ar': 'JTML في SemEval-2019 المهمة 6: تحديد التغريدات المسيئة باستخدام الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية', 'pt': 'JTML na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Identificação de tweets ofensivos usando redes neurais convolucionais', 'fr': "JTML au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: Identification des tweets offensants à l'aide de réseaux de neurones convolutifs", 'es': 'JTML en la Tarea 6 de SemEval-2019: Identificación de tweets ofensivos mediante redes neuronales convolucionales', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のJTMLタスク6 ：畳み込みニューラルネットワークを使用した不快なツイートの識別', 'zh': 'JTML at SemEval-2019 任6:用卷积神经网络攻击性推文知', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 6 पर JTML: Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग कर आक्रामक Tweets पहचान', 'ru': 'JTML на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Идентификация оскорбительных твитов с использованием сверточных нейронных сетей', 'ga': 'JTML ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Aithint Tuiteanna Ionsaitheach ag úsáid Líonraí Néaracha Convolutional', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'JTML a SemEval-2019 6. feladat: Támadó tweetek azonosítása konvolúciós neurális hálózatokkal', 'el': 'Εργασία 6: Αναγνώριση επιθετικών tweets με τη χρήση εξελικτικών νευρωνικών δικτύων', 'it': 'JTML a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identificazione di tweet offensivi utilizzando reti neurali convoluzionali', 'lt': 'JTML pusevalyje 2019 m. 6 užduotis: Pažeidžiamų Tweetų identifikavimas naudojant konvoliucinius nervinius tinklus', 'kk': 'JTML жартық- 2019 тапсырмасында 6- тапсырма: Қосымша невралдық желілерді қолданып көңіл Tweets идентификациясы', 'mk': 'JTML на SemEval-2019 задача 6: Идентификација на навредни твитови користејќи конволуционални неурални мрежи', 'ms': 'JTML pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Pengenalan Tweet Offensif menggunakan Rangkaian Neural Konveolutional', 'mt': 'JTML f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6: Identifikazzjoni ta’ Tweets Offensivi bl-użu ta’ Netwerks Newrali Konveoluzzjonali', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6- ലെ ജെടിഎംഎല്\u200d: കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഓഫീസന്\u200dസിവ് ടൂട്', 'mn': 'JTML at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweets Identification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'no': 'JTML ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 6: Offensive Tweets Identification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'pl': 'JTML na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 6: Identyfikacja Tweetów ofensywnych przy użyciu konwolucyjnych sieci neuronowych', 'ro': 'JTML la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: Identificarea tweeturilor ofensive folosind rețelele neuronale convoluționale', 'sr': 'JTML na semiEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweets Identification koristeći Konvolucionalne Neuralne mreže', 'so': 'JTML at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweets Identification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'si': 'JTML at Halfeval-2019 Job 6: Offensive Tweets ID', 'sv': 'JTML på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: Identifiering av offensiva tweets med hjälp av konvulutionella neurala nätverk', 'ta': 'JTML at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweets Identification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'ur': 'JTML سیم اول-2019 ٹاکس ۶ میں: افنسیو ٹویٹ شناسایی Convolutional Neural Networks کے مطابق', 'uz': '6 Vazifani SemEval- 2019 bilan JTML: Konvolution Neural Tarmoqlardan foydalanish', 'vi': 'JTCL ở SemEvl-209 Task 6: Officer Bất động Tweet Nhận diện bằng mạng lưới thần kinh có liên kết', 'da': 'JTML ved SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: Identifikation af offensive tweets ved hjælp af konvulutive neurale netværk', 'hr': 'JTML na semiEval-2019 zadatak 6: Offensive Tweets Identification koristeći konvolucionalne neurone mreže', 'nl': 'JTML op SemEval-2019 Taak 6: Offensieve Tweets Identificatie met behulp van Convolutionele Neurale Netwerken', 'bg': 'Задача 6: Идентификация на нападателни туитове с помощта на конвелуционни неврални мрежи', 'de': 'JTML bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabenstellung 6: Offensive Tweets Identifikation mittels konvevolutionaler neuronaler Netzwerke', 'ko': 'JTML이 SemEval-2019 작업 6: 볼륨 신경 네트워크를 사용하여 공격적인 트윗 인식', 'id': 'JTML at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweets Identification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'sw': 'JTML kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 6: Twiti zilizo rasmi zinazotambuliwa kwa kutumia mitandao ya kijamii ya kujitolea', 'af': 'JTML by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 6: Offensive Tweets Identifikasie gebruik Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerke', 'fa': 'JTML در کار ۶: شناسایی Tweets Offensive using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'tr': 'JTML at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweets Identification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'az': 'JTML at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweets Identification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'sq': 'JTML në SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifikimi ofensiv i Tweets duke përdorur rrjetet nervore konvolutive', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৬: কনভোলেশনাল নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে অফিসেন্টিভ টুইট পরিচয় ব্যবহার করে জেটিএমএল', 'ca': 'JTML a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweets Identification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'bs': 'JTML na semiEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweets Identification koristeći Konvolucionalne neurone mreže', 'et': 'JTML SemEval-2019 ülesanne 6: ründavate tweetide identifitseerimine konvolutsiooniliste neurovõrkude abil', 'hy': 'JTML-ը Halewal-2019-ի 6. հանձնարարությունը. Անցածր թվիթերի հայտնաբերումը հակառակցող նեյրոնային ցանցերով', 'cs': 'Úkol 6: Identifikace ofenzivních tweetů pomocí konvelučních neuronových sítí', 'fi': 'JTML SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 6: Hyökkäävien twiittien tunnistaminen konvolutionaalisten hermoverkkojen avulla', 'jv': 'jtML at semi-2011 task 6: offensive', 'sk': 'JTML na SemEval-2019 naloga 6: identifikacija napadalnih tweets s konvolucijskimi živčnimi omrežji', 'bo': 'JTML at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweets Identification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'he': 'JTML ב SemEval-2019 משימה 6: זיהוי טוויטים פגיעים באמצעות רשתות נוירוליות משתנות', 'ha': 'JTML at SemEV-2019 Tafiyar 6: Optive Twitter Idonation by Conversation Neural Networks'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we propose the use of a Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) to identify offensive tweets, as well as the type and target of the offense. We use an end-to-end model (i.e., no preprocessing) and fine-tune pre-trained embeddings (FastText) during training for learning words’ representation. We compare the proposed CNN model to a baseline model, such as Linear Regression, and several neural models. The results show that CNN outperforms other models, and stands as a simple but strong baseline in comparison to other systems submitted to the Shared Task.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقترح استخدام شبكة عصبية تلافيفية (CNN) لتحديد التغريدات المسيئة ، بالإضافة إلى نوع الجريمة وهدفها. نحن نستخدم نموذجًا شاملاً (أي بدون معالجة مسبقة) ونقوم بضبط حفلات الزفاف المدربة مسبقًا (FastText) أثناء التدريب لتعلم تمثيل الكلمات. قارنا نموذج CNN المقترح بالنموذج الأساسي ، مثل الانحدار الخطي ، والعديد من النماذج العصبية. تظهر النتائج أن CNN يتفوق في الأداء على النماذج الأخرى ، ويقف كأساس بسيط ولكنه قوي مقارنةً بالأنظمة الأخرى المقدمة إلى المهمة المشتركة.', 'pt': 'Neste trabalho, propomos o uso de uma Rede Neural Convolucional (CNN) para identificar tweets ofensivos, bem como o tipo e alvo da ofensa. Usamos um modelo de ponta a ponta (ou seja, sem pré-processamento) e ajustamos embeddings pré-treinados (FastText) durante o treinamento para aprender a representação de palavras. Comparamos o modelo CNN proposto com um modelo de linha de base, como Regressão Linear, e vários modelos neurais. Os resultados mostram que a CNN supera outros modelos e se destaca como uma linha de base simples, mas forte, em comparação com outros sistemas submetidos à Tarefa Compartilhada.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous proposons l'utilisation d'un réseau neuronal convolutionnel (CNN) pour identifier les tweets offensants, ainsi que le type et la cible de l'infraction. Nous utilisons un modèle de bout en bout (c'est-à-dire sans prétraitement) et affinons les intégrations pré-entraînées (FastText) pendant la formation pour apprendre la représentation des mots. Nous comparons le modèle CNN proposé à un modèle de base, tel que la régression linéaire, et à plusieurs modèles neuronaux. Les résultats montrent que CNN surpasse les autres modèles et constitue une base de référence simple mais solide par rapport aux autres systèmes soumis à la tâche partagée.", 'es': 'En este artículo, proponemos el uso de una Red Neural Convolucional (CNN) para identificar los tuits ofensivos, así como el tipo y el objetivo de la infracción. Utilizamos un modelo integral (es decir, sin preprocesamiento) y ajustamos las incrustaciones previamente entrenadas (FastText) durante el entrenamiento para aprender la representación de las palabras. Comparamos el modelo CNN propuesto con un modelo de referencia, como Regresión Lineal, y varios modelos neuronales. Los resultados muestran que CNN supera a otros modelos y se mantiene como una base de referencia simple pero sólida en comparación con otros sistemas presentados a la tarea compartida.', 'ja': '本稿では、畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ CNN ）を使用して、不快なツイートを特定し、不快なツイートの種類とターゲットを特定することを提案します。私たちは、学習単語の表現のためのトレーニング中に、エンドツーエンドのモデル（すなわち、前処理なし）を使用し、事前にトレーニングされた埋め込み（ FastText ）を微調整します。提案されたＣＮＮモデルを、線形回帰などのベースラインモデルと、いくつかのニューラルモデルと比較する。結果は、CNNが他のモデルを上回り、共有タスクに提出された他のシステムと比較して、単純だが強力なベースラインとして立っていることを示しています。', 'zh': '本文,臣等议用卷积神经网络(CNN)以识犯推文,及犯之类。 用端到端(,无预处理)而微调预教者(FastText)以学单词。 吾将CNN与基线(如线性归)与数神经比。 结果表明,CNN优于他形,比于共事者,简而强基线也。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम आक्रामक ट्वीट्स की पहचान करने के लिए एक Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) के उपयोग का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, साथ ही साथ अपराध के प्रकार और लक्ष्य की पहचान करने के लिए। हम शब्दों के प्रतिनिधित्व को सीखने के लिए प्रशिक्षण के दौरान एक एंड-टू-एंड मॉडल (यानी, कोई प्रीप्रोसेसिंग नहीं) और फाइन-ट्यून प्री-प्रशिक्षित एम्बेडिंग (FastText) का उपयोग करते हैं। हम प्रस्तावित सीएनएन मॉडल की तुलना एक बेसलाइन मॉडल से करते हैं, जैसे कि रैखिक प्रतिगमन, और कई तंत्रिका मॉडल। परिणाम बताते हैं कि सीएनएन अन्य मॉडलों को मात देता है, और साझा कार्य में प्रस्तुत अन्य प्रणालियों की तुलना में एक सरल लेकिन मजबूत आधार रेखा के रूप में खड़ा है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы предлагаем использовать сверточную нейронную сеть (CNN) для идентификации оскорбительных твитов, а также типа и цели правонарушения. Мы используем сквозную модель (т.е. без предварительной обработки) и тонко настраиваемые предварительно обученные вставки (FastText) во время обучения для представления слов обучения. Мы сравниваем предлагаемую модель CNN с базовой моделью, такой как линейная регрессия, и несколькими нейронными моделями. Результаты показывают, что CNN превосходит другие модели и выступает в качестве простой, но сильной базовой линии по сравнению с другими системами, представленными для выполнения Совместной задачи.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid go n-úsáidfí Líonra Néarthach Comhdhlúite (CNN) chun tvuíteanna maslacha a shainaithint, chomh maith le cineál agus sprioc an chiona. Bainimid úsáid as múnla ceann go ceann (i.e. gan réamhphróiseáil) agus leabaithe réamhoilte mionchoigeartaithe (FastText) le linn na hoiliúna chun léiriú na bhfocal a fhoghlaim. Déanaimid comparáid idir an tsamhail CNN atá molta agus múnla bonnlíne, mar aischéimniú Líneach, agus roinnt samhlacha néaracha. Léiríonn na torthaí go sáraíonn CNN samhlacha eile, agus go seasann sé mar bhunlíne shimplí ach láidir i gcomparáid le córais eile a cuireadh isteach don Tasc Comhroinnte.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban javasoljuk, hogy egy Convolucional Neural Network (CNN) használatát a sértő tweetek, valamint a támadás típusa és célja azonosítására. Egy end-to-end modellt használunk (azaz nincs előfeldolgozás), és finomhangoljuk az előképzett beágyazásokat (FastText) a szavak reprezentációjának tanulása során. A javasolt CNN modellt összehasonlítjuk egy kiindulási modellel, mint például a Linear Regression, és számos neurális modellel. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a CNN más modelleket felülmúlja, és egyszerű, de erős alapként áll a megosztott feladathoz benyújtott többi rendszerhez képest.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ მინდომებით კონგულოციონალური ნეიროლური ქსელის გამოყენება (CNN) განსაზღვრებისთვის განსაზღვრება სტვირტების ტიპი და მიზეზი. ჩვენ გამოყენებთ საბოლოო დასასრულებელი მოდელი (მაგალითად საბოლოო პროცესი) და საბოლოო დასასრულებელი ინბედინგიები (FastText) სწავლებელი სიტყვების გამოყენება. ჩვენ CNN მოდელის შემდგომარებით მუშაობის მოდელისთვის, როგორც Linear Regression და რამდენიმე ნეირალური მოდელისთვის. შედეგი შედეგი ჩვენებს, რომ CNN სხვა მოდელები გავამუშავებს, და როგორც უფრო მაგრამ ძალიან მხოლოდ მხოლოდ სისტემის შესაბამისად სხვა სისტემის შესაბამისად, რომელიც გა', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε τη χρήση ενός Νευρικού Δικτύου (ΚΝΝ) για τον προσδιορισμό των προσβλητικών tweets, καθώς και του τύπου και του στόχου της επίθεσης. Χρησιμοποιούμε ένα ολοκληρωμένο μοντέλο (δηλαδή χωρίς προεπεξεργασία) και βελτιστοποιούμε τις προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις (κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης για την εκμάθηση της αναπαράστασης λέξεων. Συγκρίνουμε το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο με ένα βασικό μοντέλο, όπως η γραμμική αναδρομή, και διάφορα νευρωνικά μοντέλα. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το CNN ξεπερνά τα άλλα μοντέλα και αποτελεί μια απλή αλλά ισχυρή βάση σε σύγκριση με άλλα συστήματα που υποβάλλονται στην κοινή εργασία.', 'it': "In questo articolo, proponiamo l'utilizzo di una Rete Neurale Convoluzionale (CNN) per identificare i tweet offensivi, nonché il tipo e l'obiettivo dell'attacco. Usiamo un modello end-to-end (cioè nessun preprocessing) e finiamo incorporazioni pre-addestrate (FastText) durante la formazione per imparare la rappresentazione delle parole. Confrontiamo il modello CNN proposto con un modello di base, come Regressione Lineare, e diversi modelli neurali. I risultati mostrano che CNN supera gli altri modelli e rappresenta una base di riferimento semplice ma forte rispetto ad altri sistemi sottoposti all'attività condivisa.", 'mk': 'Во овој весник, предложуваме употреба на конволуционална неврална мрежа (CNN) за идентификување на навредни твитови, како и типот и целта на навредата. Користиме модел од крај до крај (т.е., без препроцесирање) и фино обучени вградувања (FastText) за време на обуката за учење на претставување на зборовите. Го споредуваме предложениот модел на СНН со основниот модел, како што е Линиарната регресија, и неколку нервни модели. The results show that CNN outperforms other models, and stands as a simple but strong baseline in comparison to other systems submitted to the Shared Task.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз қарсылық нейралық желі (CNN) қолдану үшін, қарсылық түрі мен мақсатын анықтау үшін қолдануға жұмыс істейміз. Біз сөздерді оқыту үшін аяқтау- аяқтау үлгісін (мысалы, алдын- процессері жоқ) және алдын- аяқталған ендіру үшін (Тез мәтін) қолданамыз. Біз CNN үлгісін Linear Regression және бірнеше неврал үлгілеріне салыстырамыз. Нәтижелер CNN басқа үлгілерді орындау және Ортақ тапсырмаға жіберілген басқа жүйелерді салыстыру үшін қарапайым, бірақ күшті негізгі сызық болады.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlome naudoti konvoliucinį neurologinį tinklą (CNN), kad būtų galima nustatyti užpuolančius tweetus, taip pat nusikaltimo tipą ir tikslą. Naudojame model į nuo pabaigos (t. y. be i šankstinio apdorojimo) ir tikslią iš anksto apmokytą įrangą (FastText) mokymosi žodžių atstovavimui. Mes palyginame siūlomą CNN model į su pradiniu modeliu, pvz., linijine regresija, ir keletu nervų modelių. Iš rezultatų matyti, kad CNN veikia geriau nei kiti modeliai ir yra paprasta, bet tvirta bazė, palyginti su kitomis bendros užduoties sistemomis.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan penggunaan Rangkaian Neural Konveolutional (CNN) untuk mengenalpasti tweet serangan, serta jenis dan sasaran serangan. Kami menggunakan model akhir-akhir (iaitu, tiada preprocessing) dan penyelesaian praselatih (FastText) semasa latihan untuk mewakili perkataan belajar. Kita membandingkan model CNN yang diusulkan dengan model dasar, seperti Regresi Linear, dan beberapa model saraf. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahawa CNN melebihi model lain, dan berdiri sebagai dasar yang mudah tetapi kuat dibandingkan dengan sistem lain yang dihantar ke Tugas Berkongsi.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുവാന്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. ആക്രമണത്തിന്റെ ടൂട വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു അവസാന മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട CNN മോഡലിനെ ബേസ്ലൈന്\u200d മോഡലിലേക്ക് തുല്യമാക്കുന്നു. ലൈന്\u200dലെയര്\u200d റെഗ്രേഷനും കുറ അതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് CNN മറ്റു മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു എന്നും, പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന മറ്റു സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид Хүмүүсийн мэдрэлийн сүлжээг (CNN) ашиглах гэмт хэрэглэх боломжтой болно. Бид үгийг суралцах үед төгсгөл-төгсгөл загварыг ашигладаг (т.е. аль боловсруулах боломжгүй) мөн арга хэмжээний суралцах үед суралцах боломжтой хөгжүүлэх загварыг ашигладаг. Бид CNN загварыг Linear Regression болон олон мэдрэлийн загвартай харьцуулдаг. Үүний үр дүнд CNN бусад загваруудыг дамжуулж, хуваалтын ажил дээр дамжуулагдсан бусад системуудыг харьцуулахад энгийн, хүчтэй суурь шугам болж байна.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, nipproponu l-użu ta’ Netwerk Newrali Konveoluzzjonali (CNN) biex jiġu identifikati tweets offensivi, kif ukoll it-tip u l-mira tal-offens. Aħna nużaw mudell minn tarf sa tarf (jiġifieri, l-ebda preproċessar) u inkorporazzjonijiet imħarrġa minn qabel (FastText) irfinati matul it-taħriġ għar-rappreżentanza tal-kliem tat-tagħlim. Aħna nqabblu l-mudell CNN propost ma’ mudell ta’ linja bażi, bħar-Regressjoni Lineari, u diversi mudelli newrali. Ir-riżultati juru li s-CNN tippreżenta mudelli oħra, u hija linja bażi sempliċi iżda b’saħħitha meta mqabbla ma’ sistemi oħra sottomessi għall-Kompitu Konġunt.', 'no': 'I denne papiret foreslår vi bruk av ein konvolusjonell neuralnettverk (CNN) for å identifisera offensiv tweet, og typen og målet av offense. Vi bruker ein slutttil sluttmodell (t.d. ingen førehandsaming) og finnstillingsførehandsaming (raskt tekst) ved opplæring av ordrepresentasjonen. Vi sammenliknar den foreslåde CNN-modellen med ein grunnlinjemodell, slik som Linear Regression og fleire neuralmodeller. Resultatet viser at CNN utfører andre modeller, og står som ein enkel, men sterk grunnlinje i sammenligning med andre systemar som er sendt til delt oppgåve.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule proponujemy wykorzystanie Konwolucyjnej Sieci Neuralnej (CNN) do identyfikacji obraźliwych tweetów, a także rodzaju i celu przestępstwa. Używamy modelu end-to-end (tzn. bez przetwarzania wstępnego) i precyzyjnie dostosowujemy wstępnie przeszkolone osadzenia (FastText) podczas szkolenia do nauki reprezentacji słów. Porównujemy proponowany model CNN z modelem bazowym, takim jak Regresja liniowa, oraz kilkoma modelami neuronowymi. Wyniki pokazują, że CNN przewyższa inne modele i stanowi prostą, ale silną bazę podstawową w porównaniu z innymi systemami zgłoszonymi do Wspólnego Zadania.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo korištenje Konvolucionalne Neuralne mreže (CNN) za identifikaciju ofanzivnih tweeta, kao i tipa i meta prekršaja. Koristimo model kraja do kraja (tj. bez preobrađivanja) i predobučene integracije (FastText) za vreme obuke za predstavljanje reči učenja. Uspoređujemo predloženi CNN model sa osnovnim modelom, kao što su Linear Regression i nekoliko neuralnih model a. Rezultati pokazuju da CNN iznosi druge modele i stoji kao jednostavna, ali jaka osnovna linija u usporedbi sa drugim sistemima podignutim Zajedničkom zadatku.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, propunem utilizarea unei Rețele Neurale Convoluționale (CNN) pentru a identifica tweeturile ofensatoare, precum și tipul și ținta infracțiunii. Folosim un model end-to-end (adică fără procesare prealabilă) și reglăm fin încorporările pre-instruite (FastText) în timpul instruirii pentru învățarea reprezentării cuvintelor. Comparăm modelul CNN propus cu un model de bază, cum ar fi Regresia Lineară, și mai multe modele neuronale. Rezultatele arată că CNN depășește alte modele și reprezintă o bază de referință simplă, dar puternică în comparație cu alte sisteme trimise la Activitatea Partajată.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa isticmaalka shabakadda neurada ee qasabka ah (CNN) si aan u caddeyno tweetka dhibaatada ah iyo sidoo kale nooca iyo waxyaabaha dembiga. Tusaale ugu dhammaad (tusaale ahaan preprocessing la’aan) iyo bandhigyo wanaagsan (FastText) xilliga waxbarashada waxbarashada u dhigashada hadalka. Waxaannu isbarbardhignaa muulleyga la soo jeeday CNN, tusaale ahaan Linear Regression iyo tusaale neural ah. Abaalku waxay muuqataa in CNN uu sameeyo qaabab kale, wuxuuna u taagan yahay sida fudud laakiin xoog badan oo u barbarbaro nidaam kale oo loo soo dhiibay shaqada shariigta ah.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் தொடர்ந்து கொள்ளும் நெருக்கிய வலைப்பின்னல் (CNN) பயன்படுத்தும் திருந்துகிறோம் குற்றம் மற்றும் குற்றம நாம் முடிவு மாதிரி மாதிரி பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் (அதாவது, முன்செயல்படுத்தல் இல்லை) மற்றும் நன்றாக முன் பயிற்சி முன் பயிற்சி உள்ளீடுகள் (வே நாம் முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட CNN மாதிரியை அடிப்படைக்கோடு மாதிரியில் ஒப்பிடுகிறோம், அதாவது Linear Regression, மற்றும் பல பு @ info: status', 'sv': 'I den här uppsatsen föreslår vi att ett konvolutionellt neuralt nätverk (CNN) används för att identifiera stötande tweets, liksom typ och mål för brottet. Vi använder en end-to-end modell (dvs. ingen förbehandling) och finjusterar förklädda inbäddningar (FastText) under träning för att lära sig ordrepresentation. Vi jämför den föreslagna CNN-modellen med en baslinje modell, såsom Linear Regression, och flera neurala modeller. Resultaten visar att CNN presterar bättre än andra modeller, och står som en enkel men stark baslinje jämfört med andra system som skickas till den delade uppgiften.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے ایک کاغذ کی مصنوعی نئورل نیٹورک (سین ان) کا استعمال کرنا پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ فساد کے ٹیوٹوں کو پہچان سکیں، اور فساد کے طریقے اور موقع کو پہچان سکیں۔ ہم نے پائن-پائن-پائن موڈل (یعنی پرپرسس نہیں کرنا) اور پائن-ٹن-ٹن-پائن-ترین ابڈینگ (FastText) کو کلمات کی تعلیم کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ ہم نے پیغمبر سنی موڈل کو بنیاس لین موڈل کے ساتھ مقایسہ کیا ہے، جیسے لینی ریگرس، اور بہت سی نیورل موڈل. نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ سین اس نے دوسرے نمڈلوں کو اضافہ کردیا ہے، اور ایک ساده لیکن قوی بنسیس لین کے طور پر ہے، جو شریک ٹاکس کے ذریعہ دوسرے سیستموں کے مقابلے میں ہے.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් (CNN) විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ක අපි ඉවරයෙන් ඉවරයෙන් ඉවරයෙන් ඉවරයෙන් මොඩල් භාවිතා කරනවා (ඉදිරියෙන්, කලින් ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාස නැහැ) සහ ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාසිත විදිහට ප අපි CNN නිර්මාණය අධාරණ ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන්, ලිනියර් ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන්, සහ නිර්මාණ ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන්. ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz tashkilotli Twittlarni aniqlashni istaysizmi, va xudding turini va qanday qanday foydalanishini talab qilamiz. Biz so'zlar taʼminlovchisini o'rganish uchun o'rganish vaqtida oxirigi modeldan foydalanamiz. Biz taʼminlovchi CNN modelini bir necha neyron modeliga kamaytamiz. @ info: status", 'vi': 'Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi đề nghị sử dụng một mạng thần kinh có liên hệ (CNN) để xác định các tweet tấn công, cũng như kiểu và mục tiêu của tấn công. Chúng tôi sử dụng phương pháp cuối cùng (không xử lý) và sửa chữa giai đoạn tốt trong khi tập huấn để phát triển các từ ngữ. Chúng tôi so sánh mô hình CNN với một mô hình cơ sở cơ bản, như phục hồi tuyến tính, và nhiều mô hình thần kinh. Kết quả cho thấy CNN vượt trội so với các mẫu khác, và đóng vai một cơ sở đơn giản nhưng mạnh so với các hệ thống khác được gửi cho "Tập đoàn"', 'da': 'I denne artikel foreslår vi brug af et Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) til at identificere krænkende tweets, samt typen og målet for overtrædelsen. Vi bruger en end-to-end model (dvs. ingen forbehandling) og finjusterer prætrænede indlejringer (FastText) under træning til at lære ord repræsentation. Vi sammenligner den foreslåede CNN model med en baseline model, såsom Linear Regression, og flere neurale modeller. Resultaterne viser, at CNN overgår andre modeller og står som en enkel, men stærk baseline i forhold til andre systemer, der indsendes til den delte opgave.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo korištenje konvolucionalne neuronske mreže (CNN) za identifikaciju ofanzivnih tweeta, kao i tipa i cilja zločina. Koristimo model kraja do kraja (tj. bez preobrađivanja) i predobučene integracije (FastText) za vrijeme obuke za predstavljanje riječi učenja. Upoređujemo predloženi CNN model s početnim modelom, poput Linearne Regresije i nekoliko neuralnih model a. Rezultati pokazuju da CNN nadmaže drugim modelima i stoji kao jednostavna, ali snažna početna linija u usporedbi s drugim sustavima podignutim zajedničkom zadatku.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel stellen we het gebruik van een Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) voor om aanvallende tweets te identificeren, evenals het type en doel van de overtreding. We gebruiken een end-to-end model (dat wil zeggen geen preprocessing) en fine-tunen vooraf getrainde embeddings (FastText) tijdens de training voor het leren van woordweergave. We vergelijken het voorgestelde CNN model met een basismodel, zoals Lineaire Regressie, en verschillende neurale modellen. De resultaten tonen aan dat CNN beter presteert dan andere modellen, en als een eenvoudige maar sterke basislijn staat in vergelijking met andere systemen die zijn ingediend voor de gedeelde taak.', 'id': "Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan penggunaan jaringan saraf konvolusi (CNN) untuk mengidentifikasi tweet offensive, serta tipe dan sasaran dari penyerangan. We use an end-to-end model (i.e., no preprocessing) and fine-tune pre-trained embeddings (FastText) during training for learning words' representation.  Kami membandingkan model CNN yang diusulkan dengan model dasar, seperti Regresi Linear, dan beberapa model saraf. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa CNN melebihi model lain, dan berdiri sebagai dasar dasar sederhana tetapi kuat dibandingkan dengan sistem lain yang dihantar ke Tugas Bersama.", 'bg': 'В настоящата статия предлагаме използването на конвелуционна неврална мрежа (ЦНН) за идентифициране на обидни туитове, както и вида и целта на престъплението. Използваме модел от край до край (т.е. без предварителна обработка) и фино настройваме предварително обучените вграждания (по време на обучението за изучаване на представянето на думи. Сравняваме предложения модел с базов модел, като линейна регресия и няколко невронни модела. Резултатите показват, че CNN превъзхожда другите модели и е проста, но силна базова база в сравнение с други системи, подадени на споделената задача.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza matumizi ya Mtandao wa Neural (CNN) wa kujitolea kutambua twiti za mashambulizi, pamoja na aina na lengo la kosa hilo. Tunatumia mifano ya mwisho (yaani hakuna utaratibu wa kabla) na vizuri vya mafunzo vizuri (FastText) wakati wa mafunzo ya kujifunza uwakilishi wa maneno. We compare the proposed CNN model to a baseline model, such as Linear Regression, and several neural models.  Matokeo yanaonyesha kwamba CNN inafanya mifano mingine, na inasimama kama msingi rahisi lakini imara ukilinganisha na mifumo mingine iliyotolewa kwenye kazi hiyo.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir die Verwendung eines Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) vor, um offensive Tweets sowie Art und Ziel des Angriffs zu identifizieren. Wir verwenden ein End-to-End-Modell (d.h. keine Vorverarbeitung) und optimieren vorgetrainierte Einbettungen (FastText) während des Trainings zum Erlernen der Wortdarstellung. Wir vergleichen das vorgeschlagene CNN-Modell mit einem Basismodell, wie der Linearen Regression, und mehreren neuronalen Modellen. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass CNN andere Modelle übertrifft und im Vergleich zu anderen Systemen, die der Shared Task unterzogen wurden, eine einfache, aber starke Basis darstellt.', 'ko': '본문에서 공격적인 트윗과 공격의 유형과 표적을 식별하기 위해 볼륨신경망(CNN)을 사용하는 것이 바람직하다.우리는 훈련 과정에서 단어의 표시를 배우기 위해 끝에서 끝까지의 모형(즉 예처리가 없음)과 마이크로스피드 트레이닝 삽입(FastText)을 사용한다.우리가 제시한 CNN 모델과 기선 모델(예를 들어 선형 회귀)과 몇 가지 신경 모델을 비교했다.그 결과 CNN은 다른 모델보다 성능이 우수하며, 임무를 공유하는 다른 시스템에 제출되는 것보다 간단하면서도 강력한 베이스라인이다.', 'sq': 'In this paper, we propose the use of a Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) to identify offensive tweets, as well as the type and target of the offense.  Ne përdorim një model nga fundi në fund (pra, pa përgatitje) dhe përmbajtje të holla të paratrajnuara (FastText) gjatë trajnimit për të mësuar përfaqësimin e fjalëve. Ne krahasojmë modelin e propozuar CNN me një model bazë, të tillë si Regresioni Linear, dhe disa modele neuronale. Rezultatet tregojnë se CNN paraqet modele të tjera dhe qëndron si një bazë e thjeshtë por e fortë në krahasim me sisteme të tjerë të paraqitur në Detyrën e Përbashkët.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم استفاده از شبکه عصبی (CNN) برای شناسایی توئیت\u200cهای تجاوز، همچنین نوع و هدف تجاوز. ما از یک مدل پایان و پایان استفاده می\u200cکنیم (که هیچ پیش\u200cپردازشی نیست) و در زمان آموزش برای نمایش کلمات یادگیری (FastText) پیش\u200cآموزش آموزش آموزش آموزش آموزش آموزش نیز استفاده می\u200cکنیم. ما مدل پیشنهاد CNN را با یک مدل بنیادی مقایسه می کنیم، مثل رژیرس لینی و چند مدل عصبی. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که سین\u200cان مدل\u200cهای دیگر را برتری می\u200cکند، و به عنوان یک خط پایین ساده اما قوی در مقایسه با سیستم\u200cهای دیگر که به کار مشترک ارائه می\u200cشوند استفاده می\u200cکند.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք օգտագործել Կենտրոնացիոն Նեյրոլային ցանց (CNN) հակառակցող թվիթերների բացահայտելու համար, ինչպես նաև հակառակցման տեսակը և նպատակը: Մենք օգտագործում ենք վերջ-վերջ մոդել (այսինքն՝ առանց նախամշակման) և լավ պատրաստված նախապատրաստված ներդրումներ (արագ տեքստ) բառերի ներկայացման սովորելու ժամանակ: Մենք համեմատում ենք CNN-ի առաջարկած մոդելը հիմնական մոդելի հետ, ինչպիսիք են գծային ռեգրեսիան և մի քանի նյարդային մոդելներ: Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ CNN-ն արտադրում է այլ մոդելներ, և կարևոր է որպես պարզ, բայց ուժեղ հիմք, համեմատելով այլ համակարգերի հետ, որոնք ներկայացվել են Միացյալ Խմբին:', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biziň höwesli Neural Network (CNN) gaýratyn tweets bolup, günäkärleriň hilini we maksadyny tanamak üçin ulanmagy maslahat berýäris. Biz sözlerin temsilini öwrenmek üçin soňra-soňra nusgasyny ulanýarys. CNN nusgasyny Liniýa Regressiýa we birnäçe nusgasy bilen çykarýarys. netijeler CNN beýleki nusgalary üstün edýändigini görkezýär we Paýlaşmaly Görevlere görkezilýän başga sistemlere görä basit we güýçli bir üýtgeşik bolup durýar.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, voorstel ons die gebruik van 'n Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerk (CNN) om offensivele tweete te identifiseer, asook die tipe en doel van die oortreding. Ons gebruik 'n einde-tot-einde model (bv. geen voorafverwerking) en fyn-tune voorafveroerende inbindings (FastText) tydens onderwerp vir onderwerp van woorde se voorstelling. Ons vergelyk die voorgestelde CNN model met 'n basis model, soos Lineêre Regresie en verskeie neurale modele. Die resultate wys dat CNN ander modele uitvoer, en staan as 'n eenvoudige maar sterk basislien in vergelyking met ander stelsels wat aan die Gedeelde Taak ingestuur word.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায় আমরা একটি কনভোলেশনাল নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক (সিএনএন) ব্যবহারের প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে তারা আক্রমণের টুইট চিহ্নিত করে এবং অপরাধের ধরন ও লক্ শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিক্ষা প্রশিক্ষণের সময় আমরা শেষ পর্যন্ত মডেল ব্যবহার করি (যেমন কোন প্রক্রিয়া নেই) এবং ভালো প্রশিক্ষিত পূর্বের প্রশিক্ষণ আমরা প্রস্তাবিত সিএনএন মডেলটিকে একটি বেসেলাইন মডেলের সাথে তুলনা করি, যেমন লাইনার রেগ্রেশন এবং বেশ কয়েকটি নিউরেল মডেল। ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে সিএনএন অন্যান্য মডেল প্রদর্শন করে এবং সাধারণ কিন্তু শক্তিশালী বেসাইন হিসেবে দাঁড়িয়ে থাকে অন্যান্য সিস্টেম', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo korištenje Konvolucionalne Neuralne mreže (CNN) za identifikaciju ofanzivnih tweeta, kao i tipa i cilja zločina. Koristimo model kraja do kraja (tj. bez preobrađivanja) i predobučene integracije (FastText) za vrijeme obuke za predstavljanje riječi učenja. Upoređujemo predloženi CNN model sa početnim modelom, kao što su Linear Regression i nekoliko neuralnih model a. Rezultati pokazuju da CNN nadmaže drugim modelima i stoji kao jednostavna, ali jaka osnovna linija u usporedbi s drugim sistemima podignutim Zajedničkom zadatku.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ፣ የነፃነት መረብ (CNN) የተጠቃሚ ትዊተቶችን እና የዓመፃ ዓይነት እና የክስ ዕቅድን እንዲያረጋግጥ እናስጀጋለን፡፡ የፍጻሜ መጨረሻ ሞዴል (ምናልባት የፊደል ክፍተት የለም) እና የፍጹም ቀዳሚ ክፍተት (FastText) ለቃላት መልዕክት ለመማር ማስተማርን እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ እንደዚ Linear Regression እና ብዙዎችን የነዌብ ሞዴል እናሳያታለን፡፡ ፍሬቶቹ CNN ሌሎችን ምሳሌዎች እንዲያሳየው እና የተሰራጨውን ስርዓት ለመተካከል ቀላል ነገር ግን ብርቱ መሳሪያ እንደሚቆም ነው፡፡', 'ca': "En aquest article, proposem l'ús d'una Red Neural Convolutiva (CNN) per identificar tweets ofensius, com també el tipus i l'objectiu de l'ofensa. Utilitzem un model de final a final (és a dir, sense preprocessos) i incorporacions pré-entrenades fins (FastText) durant l'entrenament per aprendre representació de paraules. Comparem el model CNN proposat amb un model basal, com la Regressió Linear, i varis models neuronals. Els resultats demostren que CNN supera altres models i és una base simple però forta en comparació amb altres sistemes submetits a la tasca compartida.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku navrhujeme využití Convolucionální neuronové sítě (CNN) k identifikaci urážlivých tweetů, stejně jako typ a cíl útoku. Používáme komplexní model (tj. žádné předzpracování) a jemně ladíme předškolené vložení (FastText) během tréninku pro učení se reprezentace slov. Porovnáváme navržený CNN model se základním modelem, jako je Lineární regrese, a několika neuronovými modely. Výsledky ukazují, že CNN překonává ostatní modely a je jednoduchým, ale silným základním bodem ve srovnání s ostatními systémy předloženými do Shared Task.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis teeme ettepaneku kasutada konvolutsioonilist neuraalset võrgustikku (CNN), et tuvastada solvavad säutsud, samuti kuriteo tüüp ja sihtmärk. Sõnade esitamise õppimiseks kasutame lõpust lõpuni mudelit (st eeltöötlust puudub) ja täpsustame eeltreenitud manustamist (FastText). Me võrdleme pakutud CNN mudelit algmudeliga, näiteks lineaarse regressiooni ja mitmete närvimudelitega. Tulemused näitavad, et CNN on teistest mudelitest parem ning on lihtne, kuid tugev lähtealus võrreldes teiste ühisülesandega esitatud süsteemidega.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme konvolutional neural network (CNN) käyttöä loukkaavien twiittien sekä rikoksen tyypin ja kohteen tunnistamiseen. Käytämme end-to-end-mallia (ei esiprosessointia) ja hienosäädämme esikoulutettuja upotuksia (FastText) sanojen esittämisen oppimisessa. Vertailemme ehdotettua CNN-mallia perusmalliin, kuten lineaariseen regressioon, ja useisiin neuromalleihin. Tulokset osoittavat, että CNN on muita malleja parempi ja että se on yksinkertainen mutta vahva lähtökohta verrattuna muihin jaettuun tehtävään lähetettyihin järjestelmiin.', 'az': 'Bu kağıtda, suçun türünü və hedefini təsdiqləmək üçün Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) istifadəsini təklif edirik. Biz sözləri öyrənmək üçün təhsil etdiyimiz vaxt sona-sona gələn model i (yani, əvvəlcə təhsil edilmək yoxdur) və təhsil edilmiş əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş inbingləri (FastText) istifadə edirik. Biz CNN modelini Linear Regression və bir neçə nöral modellərlə müəyyən edirik. Sonuçlar CNN başqa modellərin üstünlüyünü göstərir və paylaşılmış işlərə göndərilən başqa sistemlərlə qarşılaşdığı basit, güclü bir sətir kimi görünür.', 'jv': 'Nang mapun iki, kita mudhaya nggunakake usaha tanggal Ketokan Neral Network (MT) kanggo nambah tiket sing apik, lan soko layar lan bukane kanggo kowé nggawe tresnani. Awakdunye ngubah model end-to-end Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem unwitané, model sing dadi nggo model sing rungula, kaya ngono Regresyon Linary, lan model sing nyerune. Ngomongé-ngobrongé kuwi MT iso diagram-ngobrongé model sing wis ngerasah, lan dadi iki dadi sampeyan tambah karo sistem sing bisa diamperané Sampeyan tasks.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים להשתמש ברשת נוירולית משתנה (CNN) לזהות טוויטים פגיעים, כמו גם סוג ומטרה של הפגיעה. אנו משתמשים במודל מסוף-לסוף (כלומר, בלי התהליך) ובתוכניות מתאימות מראש (טקסט מהיר) במהלך האימונים למציגת מילים ללמוד. אנחנו משוותים את המודל המוצע של CNN למודל בסיסי, כמו Regression Linear, וכמה מודלים עצביים. The results show that CNN outperforms other models, and stands as a simple but strong baseline in comparison to other systems submitted to the Shared Task.', 'sk': 'V prispevku predlagamo uporabo konvolucijske nevronske mreže (CNN) za identifikacijo žaljivih tweetov ter vrste in cilj kaznivega dejanja. Med usposabljanjem za učenje reprezentacije besed uporabljamo model od konca do konca (tj. brez predobdelave) in natančno nastavimo vnaprej usposobljene vdelave (FastText). Predlagani model CNN primerjamo z osnovnim modelom, kot je linearna regresija, in več nevronskimi modeli. Rezultati kažejo, da CNN presega druge modele in je preprost, a močan osnovni izhodišče v primerjavi z drugimi sistemi, predloženimi opravilom v skupni rabi.', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardan, Munã buƙata amfani da Shirin Naural (CNN) zuwa a gane wasu Twitter masu kashẽwa, kamar da irin da aka yi amfani da shi. Mu yi amfani da shirin motsi na ƙari (misali, ba da aiki) kuma masu tsari mai kyau a lokacin da za'a yi amfani da tsarin maganar ta ƙara (FastText). Tuna samfane misalin CNN da aka buƙata zuwa wani misalin ƙarƙashin, kamar linje Regression, da misãlai masu ƙaranci. Mataimakin na nuna cewa CNN ke tafiyar da wasu masallatai, kuma yana tsaya kamar rubutu mai sauƙi, kuma mai ƙarfi, da sami da wasu system masu saka zuwa Tafiyar da Shared.", 'bo': "འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ནུས་མཐུན་དྲ་ཞིག་སྤྱོད་རྒྱུ་དང་། We use an end-to-end model (i.e. no preprocessing) and fine-tune pre-trained embeddings (FastText) during training for learning words' representation. ང་ཚོས་CNN་གི་མ་དབྱིབས་འདི་རྨང་གཞིའི་མ་དབྱིབས་དང་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དབྱངས་འབྲས་ནི་CNN་གི་མ་དབྱིབས་གཞན་པ་ཞིག་ལས་འཕར་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན་མིན་འདུག་པས་རྩ་གཞི་གཞི་རྩིས་གཞི་བ་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་བྱེད་པའི་མ"}
{'en': 'LaSTUS / TALN at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : Identification and Categorization of Offensive Language in Social Media with Attention-based Bi-LSTM model', 'ar': 'LaSTUS / TALN في SemEval-2019 المهمة 6: تحديد وتصنيف اللغة الهجومية في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي باستخدام نموذج Bi-LSTM القائم على الانتباه', 'pt': 'LaSTUS/TALN na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Identificação e Categorização de Linguagem Ofensiva em Mídias Sociais com modelo Bi-LSTM baseado em atenção', 'fr': "LastUS/Taln à SemEval-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: Identification et catégorisation du langage offensant dans les médias sociaux avec le modèle Bi-LSTM basé sur l'attention", 'es': 'Lastus/TALN en la Tarea 6 de SemEval-2019: Identificación y categorización del lenguaje ofensivo en las redes sociales con el modelo BI-LSTM basado en la atención', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のLaSTUS/TALNタスク6: Attention - based Bi - LSTMモデルを用いたソーシャルメディアにおける攻撃的言語の識別と分類', 'zh': 'LaSTUS/TALN at SemEval-2019 务6:用意力之双LSTM形识社交媒体类攻击性言', 'ru': 'LaSTUS/TALN на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Идентификация и категоризация оскорбительного языка в социальных сетях с помощью модели Bi-LSTM, основанной на внимании', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 6 पर LaSTUS / TALN: ध्यान-आधारित Bi-LSTM मॉडल के साथ सोशल मीडिया में आपत्तिजनक भाषा की पहचान और वर्गीकरण', 'ga': 'LaSTUS/TALN ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Teanga Iontach a Aithint agus a Chatagóiriú sna Meáin Shóisialta le Múnla Bi-LSTM Bunaithe ar Aird', 'ka': 'LaSTUS', 'hu': 'LaSTUS/TALN a SemEval-2019 6. feladat: Támadó nyelv azonosítása és kategorizálása a közösségi médiában figyelem alapú Bi-LSTM modellel', 'el': 'Εργασία 6: Αναγνώριση και κατηγοριοποίηση της προσβλητικής γλώσσας στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης με μοντέλο βασισμένο στην προσοχή', 'it': "LaSTUS/TALN a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identificazione e categorizzazione del linguaggio offensivo nei social media con il modello Bi-LSTM basato sull'attenzione", 'lt': 'LaSTUS/TALN at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identification and Categorization of Offensive Language in Social Media with Attention-based Bi-LSTM model', 'kk': 'LaSTUS/TALN жарым- 2019 тапсырмасының 6- тапсырмасы: Бақылау негізінде Bi- LSTM үлгісі бар социалдық медиақтардың көңіл тілдерін идентификациялау және санаттары', 'mk': 'LaSTUS/TALN на SemEval-2019 задача 6: Идентификација и категоризација на навредливиот јазик во социјалните медиуми со модел Би-LSTM базиран на внимание', 'ms': 'LaSTUS/TALN pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Identifikasi dan Kategori Bahasa Tersinggung dalam Media Sosial dengan model Bi-LSTM berdasarkan Perhatian', 'mn': 'LaSTUS/TALN at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identification and Categorization of Offensive Language in Social Media with Attention-based Bi-LSTM model', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6: സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയയില്\u200d സോഷ്യല്\u200d ഭാഷ തിരിച്ചറിയുകയും വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുക', 'mt': 'LaSTUS/TALN f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6: Identifikazzjoni u Kategorizzazzjoni ta’ Lingwa Offensiva fil-Midja Soċjali bil-mudell Bi-LSTM ibbażat fuq l-Attenzjoni', 'no': 'LaSTUS/TALN på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 6: Identifikasjon og kategorisering av offensive språk i sosiale mediar med oppmerksbasert bi-LSTM-modell', 'sr': 'LaSTUS/TALN na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 6: Identifikacija i kategorizacija službenog jezika u društvenim medijima sa model bi-LSTM na osnovu pažnje', 'pl': 'Zadanie 6: Identyfikacja i kategorizacja języka ofensywnego w mediach społecznościowych z modelem Bi-LSTM opartym na uwadze', 'ro': 'LaSTUS/TALN la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: Identificarea și categorizarea limbajului ofensiv în rețelele sociale cu modelul Bi-LSTM bazat pe atenție', 'si': 'LaSTUS/TALN at Half-eval-2019 Job 6: ID and Categorise of Offensive Links in Public Media with Attension-based Bi-LSTM Model', 'so': 'LaSTUS/TALN at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identification and Categorization of Offensive Language in Social Media with Attention-based Bi-LSTM model', 'sv': 'LaSTUS/TALN på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: Identifiering och kategorisering av kränkande språk i sociala medier med uppmärksamhetsbaserad Bi-LSTM-modell', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 6: சமூக ஊடகத்தில் உணர்வு மொழியின் அடையாளம் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தல் பிய- LSTM மாதிரி', 'ur': 'لاسٹوس/ٹیلن ٹاکس ۲۰۱۹ ٹاکس ۶ میں: سوسیل میڈیا میں آفانسی زبان کی شناسایی اور کاٹیوریزی کے ذریعہ دو-LSTM موڈل کے ساتھ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu Nghiên cứu Nghiên cứu và phân loại ngôn ngữ Hành động trong Phương Tây Ý có mẫu Thân chủ có căn cứ hai-HTTM', 'bg': 'Задача 6: Идентификация и категоризация на офанзивния език в социалните медии с базиран на вниманието модел', 'hr': 'LaSTUS/TALN na zadatku 6. poluvječnika 2019: Identifikacija i kategorizacija neposlušnog jezika u društvenim medijima s model bi-LSTM na temelju pažnje', 'da': 'LaSTUS/TALN på SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: Identifikation og kategorisering af offensivt sprog i sociale medier med opmærksomhedsbaseret Bi-LSTM model', 'nl': 'LaSTUS/TALN op SemEval-2019 Taak 6: Identificatie en categorisering van offensieve taal in sociale media met aandacht gebaseerd Bi-LSTM model', 'id': 'LaSTUS/TALN di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Identifikasi dan Kategorisasi Bahasa Serangan dalam Media Sosial dengan model Bi-LSTM berdasarkan perhatian', 'ko': 'Lastus/TALN이SemEval-2019에서의 임무6: 주의력 기반의Bi-LSTM 모델로 소셜미디어에서의 공격적인 언어를 식별하고 분류', 'fa': 'LaSTUS/TALN at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identification and Categorization of Offensive Language in Social Media with Attention-based Bi-LSTM model', 'de': 'LaSTUS/TALN bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 6: Identifizierung und Kategorisierung offensiver Sprache in Social Media mit aufmerksamkeitsbasiertem Bi-LSTM Modell', 'sw': 'LaSTUS/TALN katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 6: Kutambulisha na Kugawanywa lugha ya Uhuru katika Vyombo vya Habari vya Kijamii kwa mfano wa Bi-LSTM anayeishi makini', 'tr': 'LaSTUS/TALN at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identification and Categorization of Offensive Language in Social Media with Attention-based Bi-LSTM model', 'af': 'LaSTUS/TALN by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 6: Identifikasie en Kategoriseering van Offensive Taal in Sosiale Media met Aangaande-gebaseerde Bi-LSTM model', 'sq': 'LaSTUS/TALN në SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identification and Categorization of Offensive Language in Social Media with Attention-based Bi-LSTM model', 'am': 'LaSTUS/TALN at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identification and Categorization of Offensive language in Social Media with Attention-based Bi-LSTM model', 'hy': 'Լաստոս-Սոցիալ Մեդիայի ոլորտում զբաղվող լեզուների բացահայտումն ու դասակարգումն ուշադրության վրա հիմնված երկու LSMT մոդելի միջոցով', 'az': 'LaSTUS/TALN at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Attention-based Bi-LSTM modeli ilə Sosyal Media içində Özümlü Dilin Kimlik və Kategoriyası', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের ৬: সামাজিক মিডিয়ায় অফিসেন্সিভ ভ ভাষার পরিচয় এবং বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক বি এলস্টিএম মডেল দিয়ে দেখা যাচ্ছে', 'bs': 'LaSTUS/TALN na semiEval-2019 zadatku 6: Identifikacija i kategorizacija neposlušnog jezika u društvenim medijima s model bi-LSTM na temelju pažnje', 'ca': 'LaSTUS/TALN a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identification and Categorization of Offensive Language in Social Media with Attention-based Bi-LSTM model', 'et': 'LaSTUS/TALN SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 6: Ründava keele tuvastamine ja kategoriseerimine sotsiaalmeedias tähelepanupõhise Bi-LSTM mudeli abil', 'cs': 'LaSTUS/TALN na SemEval-2019 Úkol 6: Identifikace a kategorizace útočného jazyka v sociálních médiích pomocí Bi-LSTM modelu založeného na pozornosti', 'fi': 'LaSTUS/TALN SemEval-2019 Tehtﾃ､vﾃ､ 6: Hyﾃｶkkﾃ､ﾃ､vﾃ､n kielen tunnistaminen ja luokittelu sosiaalisessa mediassa huomiopohjaisella Bi-LSTM-mallilla', 'jv': 'Lastus/TaLN at semi-inval-2011 task 6: ID and category of offensive Language in Digital Media with Attance-supported bi-LTT model', 'he': 'LaSTUS/TALN ב SemEval-2019 משימה 6: זיהוי וקטגוריזציה של שפה פגיעה במדיה חברתית עם מודל Bi-LSTM מבוסס על תשומת לב', 'sk': 'LaSTUS/TALN na SemEval-2019 Naloga 6: Identifikacija in kategorizacija napadalnega jezika v socialnih omrežjih s pozornostjo temelječim Bi-LSTM modelom', 'ha': 'Lastanus/TALN at SemEV-2019 Task 6: Idonation and Categorization of offisive language in social Media with AttAttAttAttAttAttached Bi-LstuM Model', 'bo': 'LaSTUS/TALN at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identification and Categorization of Offensive Language in Social Media with Attention-based Bi-LSTM model'}
{'en': 'We present a bidirectional Long-Short Term Memory network for identifying offensive language in Twitter. Our system has been developed in the context of the SemEval 2019 Task 6 which comprises three different sub-tasks, namely A : Offensive Language Detection, B : Categorization of Offensive Language, C : Offensive Language Target Identification. We used a pre-trained Word Embeddings in tweet data, including information about emojis and hashtags. Our approach achieves good performance in the three sub-tasks.', 'ar': 'نقدم شبكة ذاكرة طويلة المدى ثنائية الاتجاه لتحديد اللغة المسيئة في تويتر. تم تطوير نظامنا في سياق مهمة SemEval 2019 6 التي تضم ثلاث مهام فرعية مختلفة ، وهي: A: اكتشاف اللغة الهجومية ، B: تصنيف اللغة الهجومية ، C: تحديد الهدف للغة الهجومية. استخدمنا Word Embeddings المُدرَّب مسبقًا في بيانات التغريدات ، بما في ذلك معلومات حول الرموز التعبيرية وعلامات التصنيف. يحقق نهجنا أداءً جيدًا في المهام الفرعية الثلاث.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma rede de memória de longo prazo bidirecional para identificação de linguagem ofensiva no Twitter. Nosso sistema foi desenvolvido no contexto da Tarefa 6 do SemEval 2019 que compreende três subtarefas diferentes, a saber: A: Detecção de Língua Ofensiva, B: Categorização de Língua Ofensiva, C: Identificação de Alvo de Língua Ofensiva. Usamos Word Embeddings pré-treinados em dados de tweets, incluindo informações sobre emojis e hashtags. Nossa abordagem alcança um bom desempenho nas três subtarefas.', 'es': 'Presentamos una red bidireccional de memoria a corto plazo para identificar el lenguaje ofensivo en Twitter. Nuestro sistema se ha desarrollado en el contexto de la Tarea 6 de SemEval 2019, que comprende tres subtareas diferentes, a saber: A: Detección de lenguaje ofensivo, B: Categorización del lenguaje ofensivo, C: Identificación de objetivos de lenguaje ofensivo. Utilizamos incrustaciones de palabras previamente entrenadas en los datos de tuits, incluida información sobre emojis y hashtags. Nuestro enfoque logra un buen desempeño en las tres subtareas.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un réseau bidirectionnel de mémoire à long et court terme pour identifier les propos offensants sur Twitter. Notre système a été développé dans le contexte de la tâche 6 du SemEval 2019 qui comprend trois sous-tâches différentes, à savoir A\xa0: Détection du langage offensant, B\xa0: Catégorisation du langage offensant, C\xa0: Identification de la cible de langage offensant. Nous avons utilisé des intégrations Word pré-entraînées dans les données des tweets, y compris des informations sur les emojis et les hashtags. Notre approche permet d'obtenir de bonnes performances dans les trois sous-tâches.", 'ja': 'Twitterで不快な言葉を識別するための双方向の長期記憶ネットワークを提示します。私たちのシステムは、SemEval 2019タスク6の文脈で開発されています。このタスクは、3つの異なるサブタスク、すなわちA ：攻撃的言語検出、B ：攻撃的言語のカテゴリ分け、C ：攻撃的言語ターゲット識別で構成されています。絵文字やハッシュタグに関する情報など、事前にトレーニングされたWord Embeddingsをツイートデータに使用しました。当社のアプローチは、3つのサブタスクで良好なパフォーマンスを実現します。', 'zh': '发一双向之长短期记网络,以识Twitter之攻击性言。 臣等统发于SemEval 2019务6背景下,其务兼三异者,曰A:犯性言检,B:犯性言语之类,C:犯性语言之识。 于推文数中用预练单词嵌,兼表情符号主题标签之信。 吾道在三子,吾道在三子。', 'hi': 'हम चहचहाना में आक्रामक भाषा की पहचान करने के लिए एक द्विदिश दीर्घकालिक स्मृति नेटवर्क प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हमारी प्रणाली को SemEval 2019 कार्य 6 के संदर्भ में विकसित किया गया है जिसमें तीन अलग-अलग उप-कार्य शामिल हैं, अर्थात् ए: आक्रामक भाषा का पता लगाना, बी: आक्रामक भाषा का वर्गीकरण, सी: आक्रामक भाषा लक्ष्य पहचान। हमने इमोजी और हैशटैग के बारे में जानकारी सहित ट्वीट डेटा में एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित वर्ड एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग किया। हमारा दृष्टिकोण तीन उप-कार्यों में अच्छा प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем двунаправленную сеть Long-Short Term Memory для идентификации оскорбительного языка в Twitter. Наша система была разработана в контексте задачи 6 SemEval 2019, которая состоит из трех различных подзадач, а именно: A: Обнаружение оскорбительного языка, B: Категоризация оскорбительного языка, C: Определение цели оскорбительного языка. Мы использовали предварительно обученные Word Embeddings в данных твитов, включая информацию об эмодзи и хэштегах. Наш подход обеспечивает хорошую производительность по трем подзадачам.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid líonra Cuimhne Fadtéarmach déthreorach i láthair chun teanga maslach a aithint ar Twitter. Forbraíodh ár gcóras i gcomhthéacs Thasc 6 SemEval 2019 a chuimsíonn trí fhothasc éagsúla, is iad sin A: Brath Teanga Ionsaitheach, B: Catagóiriú Teanga Ionsaitheach, C: Aithint Spriocanna Teanga Ionsaitheach. D’úsáideamar Leabú Focal réamhoilte i sonraí tweet, lena n-áirítear faisnéis faoi emojis agus hashtags. Baineann ár gcur chuige feidhmíocht mhaith amach sna trí fhothasc.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენ გავაჩვენოთ ბუდირექციონალური ძირითადი სიმხმარების ქსელი, რომელიც სატვირში განსაზღვრებელი ენერგიის განსაზღვრებისთვის. ჩვენი სისტემა 2019-ის SemEval-ის კონტექსტში განვითარება, რომელიც სამი განსხვავებული სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო დავალება, ანუ A: უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უ ჩვენ გამოყენეთ წინ შესწავლობული სიტყვების შებრუნებების მონაცემებში, რომლებიც ემიზების და ჰექტაგის შესახებ ინფორმაცია. ნაქთჲრ ოპთლთფ ეჲჟრთდნაგა ეჲბპა ოპაგთრვლნჲჟრ გ რპთრვ ოჲეპაბჲრთ.', 'hu': 'Kétirányú Hosszú-Rövid Távú Memória hálózatot mutatunk be a sértő nyelvek felismerésére a Twitteren. Rendszerünket a SemEval 2019 Task 6 összefüggésében fejlesztettük ki, amely három különböző alcsoportból áll, nevezetesen A: Offensive Language Detection, B: Offensive Language Categorization, C: Offensive Language Target Identification. Előre képzett Szóbeágyazásokat használtunk a tweet adataiban, beleértve az emojik és hashtag-ek információit. Megközelítésünk jó teljesítményt ér el a három alcsoportban.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα αμφίδρομο δίκτυο Μακροπρόθεσμης Μνήμης για τον εντοπισμό προσβλητικής γλώσσας στο Twitter. Το σύστημά μας έχει αναπτυχθεί στο πλαίσιο της εργασίας που περιλαμβάνει τρεις διαφορετικές επιμέρους εργασίες, δηλαδή Α: Ανίχνευση προσβλητικής γλώσσας, Β: Κατηγοριοποίηση προσβλητικής γλώσσας, Γ: Αναγνώριση στόχου προσβλητικής γλώσσας. Χρησιμοποιήσαμε μια προ-εκπαιδευμένη ενσωμάτωση λέξεων σε δεδομένα tweets, συμπεριλαμβανομένων πληροφοριών σχετικά με emoji και hashtags. Η προσέγγισή μας επιτυγχάνει καλή απόδοση στις τρεις επιμέρους εργασίες.', 'it': 'Presentiamo una rete bidirezionale di memoria a breve termine per identificare il linguaggio offensivo su Twitter. Il nostro sistema è stato sviluppato nel contesto del SemEval 2019 Task 6 che comprende tre diversi sotto-compiti, vale a dire A: Offensive Language Detection, B: Categorizzazione of Offensive Language, C: Offensive Language Target Identification. Abbiamo utilizzato un Embedding di parole pre-addestrato nei dati dei tweet, incluse informazioni su emoji e hashtag. Il nostro approccio raggiunge buone prestazioni nei tre sottocompiti.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome dvikryptį ilgalaikio prisiminimo tinklą, skirtą nustatyti užpuolančią kalbą Twitter. Mūsų sistema buvo sukurta atsižvelgiant į 2019 m. pusmečio vertinimo 6 užduotį, kurią sudaro trys skirtingos dalys, būtent A: Pažeidžiamos kalbos nustatymas, B: Pažeidžiamos kalbos kategorija, C: Pažeidžiamos kalbos tikslo nustatymas. Naudojome iš anksto apmokytus žodžių įdėjimus Twitter duomenise, įskaitant informaciją apie emodžius ir hashtagus. Mūsų požiūris pasiekia gerų rezultatų trijose subužduotyse.', 'kk': 'Біз Твиттерде жатты тілді анықтау үшін екі-дирекциялық ұзын-қысқа жады желігін таңдаймыз. Біздің жүйеміз 2019 жылдың шешінші тапсырмасының бағдарламасында жасалған. Бұл үш түрлі ішкі тапсырмаларды, мысалы А: Тілді анықтау, B: Тілді бағдарламасының категориясы, C: Тілді тапсырмаларды анықтау. Мәліметтер және хаттар туралы мәліметті қоса, tweet деректерінде алдын- ала оқылған сөзді ендіруді қолдандық. Біздің тәсіліміз үш ішкі тапсырмаларда жақсы істеу жеткізеді.', 'mk': 'Презентираме дворечна мрежа на долгорочна меморија за идентификација на навредлив јазик на Твитер. Нашиот систем е развиен во контекст на SemEval 2019 задачата 6, која сочинува три различни подзадачи, именувајќи ја А: Детектирање на навредлив јазик, Б: Категоризација на навредлив јазик, Ц: Идентификација на навредлив јазик мета. Користевме предобучени Word Embeddings во Твитер податоци, вклучувајќи информации за емоџии и хаштагови. Нашиот пристап постигнува добра изведба во трите подзадачи.', 'ml': 'ടൂട്ടരില്\u200d അപമാനകരമായ ഭാഷ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ബിഡിറ്റര്\u200dഷന്\u200d ലോങ്ങ്-ചെറുതായ മെമ്മറിയുടെ  ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6 ന്റെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് മൂന്നു വ്യത്യസ്ത ഉപാധികള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുന്നു. A: ഓഫീസ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d മുമ്പ് പരിശീലന വാക്ക് എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d ട്വീറ്റ് ഡാറ്റില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചു. ഇമോജിക്കും ഹാഷ്ട്ടാഗുകളെപ് നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തേക്ക് മൂന്ന് ഉപാധികളില്\u200d നന്നായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതാണ്.', 'mn': 'Бид Твиттерт алдагдал хэлний тодорхойлолтын тулд хоёр богино хугацааны дурсамжлагын сүлжээг тайлбарлаж байна. Бидний систем 2019 оны SemEval-ын 2019 оны 6 даалгаварын тухай хөгжүүлсэн бөгөөд 3 өөр суб-даалгаварын тухай 3 даалгавартай байдаг. Энэ нь А: Хэрэгцүүлэгч хэл мэдэх, B: Хэрэгцүүлэгч хэл, C: Хэрэгцүүлэгч хэл даалгаварын тодорхойлолт. Бид өмнө сургалтын Word Embedding-г tweet өгөгдлийн хувьд ашиглаж, emojis болон hashtag-ын тухай мэдээллийг нэмсэн. Бидний ойлголт гурван суб-даалгаварт сайн үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan rangkaian ingatan jangka pendek-panjang bidireksi untuk mengenalpasti bahasa serangan dalam Twitter. Sistem kami telah dikembangkan dalam konteks SemEval 2019 Tugas 6 yang mengandungi tiga sub-tugas yang berbeza, iaitu A: Deteksi Bahasa Meninggal, B: Kategori Bahasa Meninggal, C: Identifikasi Sasaran Bahasa Meninggal. Kami menggunakan Pencampuran Perkataan Latihan-Latihan dalam data tweet, termasuk maklumat mengenai emoji dan hashtag. Our approach achieves good performance in the three sub-tasks.', 'mt': "Aħna nippreżentaw netwerk bidirezzjonali ta' Memorja fuq medda twila ta' żmien qasira għall-identifikazzjoni ta' lingwa offensiva fuq Twitter. Is-sistema tagħna ġiet żviluppata fil-kuntest tas-SemEval 2019 Task 6 li jinkludi tliet sottokompiti differenti, jiġifieri A: Detezzjoni Offensiva tal-Lingwa, B: Kategorizzazzjoni tal-Lingwa Offensiva, C: Identifikazzjoni tal-Mira Offensiva tal-Lingwa. Użat Word Embeddings imħarreġ minn qabel fid-dejta tat-tweet, inkluża informazzjoni dwar emoji u hashtags. L-approċċ tagħna jikseb prestazzjoni tajba fit-tliet sottokompiti.", 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit bidireksjonal lang- kort minnet for å identifisera offensiv språk i Twitter. Systemet vårt er utvikla i konteksten av halvEvalen 2019 oppgåva 6 som inneheld tre ulike underoppgåver, som er A: Offensive Language Detection, B: Categorization of Offensive Language, C: Offensive Language Object Identification. Vi brukte ei føretreng tekstinnbygging i tweet data, inkludert informasjon om emojis og hashtag. Tilnærminga vårt gjer godt utvikling i dei tre underoppgåvene.', 'pl': 'Prezentujemy dwukierunkową sieć pamięci długoterminowej umożliwiającą identyfikację języka obraźliwego na Twitterze. Nasz system został opracowany w kontekście SemEval 2019 Task 6, który składa się z trzech różnych podzadań, a mianowicie A: Detekcja języka ofensywnego, B: Kategorizacja języka ofensywnego, C: Identyfikacja docelowego języka ofensywnego. Użyliśmy wstępnie przeszkolonych osadzeń Word Embeddings w danych tweetów, w tym informacji o emoji i hashtagach. Nasze podejście osiąga dobre wyniki w trzech podzadaniach.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo dvoričnu dugoročnu mrežu uspomene za identifikaciju ofanzivnog jezika na Twitter-u. Naš sistem je razvijen u kontekstu zadatka 6 od semiEvala 2019, koji uključuje tri različite podzadatke, a to je A: otkrivanje službenog jezika, B: Kategorizacija službenog jezika, C: identifikacija službenog jezika. Koristili smo predobučene Word Embedding u podacima o tweetu, uključujući informacije o emojima i hashtagama. Naš pristup postiže dobru predstavu u tri podzadatka.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm o rețea bidirecțională de memorie pe termen lung-scurt pentru identificarea limbajului ofensator pe Twitter. Sistemul nostru a fost dezvoltat în contextul SemEval 2019 Task 6, care cuprinde trei subsarcini diferite, și anume A: Detectarea limbajului ofensiv, B: Categorizarea limbajului ofensiv, C: Identificarea limbajului ofensiv. Am folosit o încorporare Word pre-instruită în datele tweet, inclusiv informații despre emojis și hashtaguri. Abordarea noastră obține performanțe bune în cele trei subsarcini.', 'so': 'Waxaannu soo bandhignaa shabakadda xasuusta waqtiga dheer-gaaban ee ku saabsan aqoonsashada luqada dagaalka ah ee Twitterka. Sirkayada waxaa la horumariyey kooxa SemEval 2019 shaqo 6 oo kooban saddex shaqo oo kala duduwan, kaasi oo ah A: Gariirka afka, B: Qaybaadinta afka rasmiga ah, C: Aqoonsiga luqada rasmiga. Waxaannu isticmaalnay macluumaad ku saabsan emojis iyo hashtagga. Dhaqdhaheenna wuxuu gaadhaa wax wanaagsan oo ku saabsan saddexda shabakad.', 'si': 'අපි ට්විටර් වලින් අපරාධ භාෂාව අඳිශ්නය කරන්න බිදිරික්ෂණ ක්\u200dරියාකාරීය ලොකු වාර්තාව මතක ජා අපේ පද්ධතිය සෙම්වේල් 2019 වැඩේ 6 වැඩේ ස්ථානයෙන් විශේෂ වෙනස් වැඩේ තුනක් තියෙනවා, මෙනුවෙන් A: Offensive language Detection, B: Categorication of Offensive language, C: Offensive language Targe ID. අපි ට්විට් දත්තේ තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරධානය කළ වචනයක් පාවිච්චි කළා, emoji සහ hashtags ගැන තොරතුරු සමග. අපේ විදිහට හොඳ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලැබෙනවා සබ් වැඩ තුන්දෙනුවෙන්.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett dubbelriktat nätverk för Long-Short Term Memory för att identifiera stötande språk i Twitter. Vårt system har utvecklats inom ramen för SemEval 2019 Task 6 som omfattar tre olika underuppgifter, nämligen A: Offensive Language Detection, B: Kategorisering av Offensive Language, C: Offensive Language Target Identification. Vi använde en förklädd Word Embeddings i tweetdata, inklusive information om emojis och hashtags. Vårt tillvägagångssätt uppnår goda resultat i de tre deluppgifterna.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் நினைவு வலைப்பின்னலைக் காண்பிக்க ஒரு பிடிவான நீண்ட காலம் குறைந்த நினைவு வலைப்பின்னலை தொடர் SemEval 2019 பணி 6 மூன்று வேறு துணை பணிகளைக் கூடிய அமைப்பு உருவாக்கப்பட்டது, அது A: Offensive Language Detection, B: Offensive Language Categorization, C: Offensive Language இலக்கு அடையாளம். நாங்கள் முன்பு பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட வார்த்தை உடைவுகளை தொடர்பு தகவலில் பயன்படுத்தினோம், emojis மற்றும் ஹாஷ்டாக் நம்முடைய அணுகல் மூன்று உப பணிகளில் நல்ல செயல்பாடு பெறுகிறது.', 'ur': 'ہم نے توئیٹر میں فساد کی زبان پہچان کرنے کے لئے ایک دوسری دئیڈریکتوری لانگ-لنگ ٹرمر میموری نیٹورک کو پیش کیا ہے. ہمارا سیستم سیم ۲۰۱۹ ٹاکس ۶ کے کنٹنس میں توسعہ کی گئی ہے جس میں تین مختلف زیب ٹاکس ہیں، یعنی ا: نافنسی زبان شناسایی، B: نافنسی زبان کا کاٹیوجیزی، C: نافنسی زبان تاریک شناسایی ہے. ہم نے ٹویٹ ڈیٹ میں ایک پیش آموزش والی ورڈ ایمبڈینگ استعمال کیا تھا، جیسے emojis اور hashtags کے بارے میں معلومات کے ساتھ۔ ہماری تقریبا تین sub-taskوں میں اچھی عملکرد پہنچتی ہے.', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mạng lưới Ký Ức Dài Hạn để nhận diện ngôn ngữ tấn công trên Twitter. Hệ thống của chúng tôi đã được phát triển trong hoàn cảnh của nhiệm vụ SemEvl 209, gồm ba nhiệm vụ khác nhau, đó là A: Phát hiện Ngôn ngữ rộng, B: phân loại của Ngôn ngữ Hành động, C: ID mục đích rộng rãi. Chúng tôi đã sử dụng nội dung lời khai trong các dữ liệu trên Twitter, kể cả thông tin về biểu tượng và dấu vân tay. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta đạt được hiệu quả tốt trong ba nhiệm vụ.', 'uz': 'Biz Twitterda offensive tilni aniqlash uchun bir necha uzun xotira tarmoqni koʻrsatimiz. Bizning tizimmiz SemEval 2019 Vazifalar 6 (SemEval 2019) muhitida yaratildi, bu uchta boshqa vazifalar esa A: Offensive Language Detection, B: Offensive Language Categorization, C: Offensive language goal identification. Biz foydalanilgan foydalanuvchi foydalanuvchi xabarlarda, emojis va hashtaglar haqida maʼlumot yordamida foydalanamiz. Biz uchta vazifalarda yaxshi bajarishmiz.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer et tovejet lang-kort-tidshukommelsesnetværk til identificering af stødende sprog på Twitter. Vores system er udviklet i forbindelse med SemEval 2019 Task 6, som omfatter tre forskellige underopgaver, nemlig A: Offensive Language Detection, B: Kategorisering af Offensive Language, C: Offensive Language Target Identification. Vi brugte en forududdannet Word Embeddings i tweetdata, herunder oplysninger om emojis og hashtags. Vores tilgang opnår gode resultater i de tre underopgaver.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo dvodirektivnu dugoročnu sjećansku mrežu za identifikaciju ofanzivnog jezika na Twitter-u. Naš sustav je razvijen u kontekstu zadatka 6. polovice 2019. koji sadrži tri različite podzadatke, a to je A: otkrivanje neovisnih jezika, B: Kategorizacija neovisnog jezika, C: identifikacija neovisnih jezika. Koristili smo predobučene uključene riječi u podatke o tweetu, uključujući informacije o emojima i hashtagama. Naš pristup postiže dobru izvršnost u tri podzadatka.', 'bg': 'Представяме двупосочна мрежа за дългосрочна краткосрочна памет за идентифициране на обиден език в Туитър. Системата ни е разработена в контекста на задача 6, която включва три различни подзадачи, а именно: Откриване на офанзивен език, Б: Категоризация на офанзивен език, В: Идентификация на целевата цел на офанзивен език. Използвахме предварително обучени вграждания на думи в данни от туитове, включително информация за емотикони и хаштагове. Нашият подход постига добри резултати в трите подзадачи.', 'nl': "We presenteren een bidirectioneel Long-Short Term Memory netwerk voor het identificeren van beledigende taal in Twitter. Ons systeem is ontwikkeld in het kader van de SemEval 2019 Task 6 die drie verschillende deeltaken omvat, namelijk A: Offensieve Taaldetectie, B: Categorisatie van Offensieve Taal, C: Offensieve Taal Target Identificatie. We gebruikten een vooraf getrainde Word Embeddings in tweetgegevens, waaronder informatie over emoji's en hashtags. Onze aanpak bereikt goede prestaties in de drie deeltaken.", 'de': 'Wir präsentieren ein bidirektionales Long-Short Term Memory Netzwerk zur Identifizierung anstößiger Sprache in Twitter. Unser System wurde im Rahmen der SemEval 2019 Task 6 entwickelt, die drei verschiedene Teilaufgaben umfasst, nämlich A: Offensive Spracherkennung, B: Kategorisierung Offensivsprache, C: Offensivsprache Target Identification. Wir haben ein vorgetrainiertes Word Embedding in Tweet-Daten verwendet, einschließlich Informationen über Emojis und Hashtags. Unser Ansatz erzielt gute Leistungen in den drei Teilaufgaben.', 'fa': 'ما شبکه حافظه\u200cی مدت طولانی کوتاه را برای شناسایی زبان\u200cهای تجاوز در توئیتر نشان می\u200cدهیم. سیستم ما در محیط عملیات ششم سال ۲۰۱۹ توسعه یافته شده است که شامل سه عملیات متفاوت است، یعنی A: شناسایی زبان ناتوانی، B: کاتوریژی زبان ناتوانی، C: شناسایی هدف زبان ناتوانی. ما از جمله اطلاعات توئیت، اطلاعات درباره emojis و hashtags استفاده کردیم. دستور ما در سه عمليات خوب پيش مياد', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan jaringan memori jangka pendek bidireksi untuk mengidentifikasi bahasa offensive di Twitter. Sistem kami telah dikembangkan dalam konteks SemEval 2019 Tugas 6 yang mengandung tiga sub-tugas yang berbeda, yaitu A: Deteksi Bahasa Meninggalkan, B: Kategorisasi Bahasa Meninggalkan, C: Identifikasi Target Bahasa Meninggalkan. Kami menggunakan Word Embeddings yang terlatih di data tweet, termasuk informasi tentang emoji dan hashtag. pendekatan kita mencapai prestasi yang baik dalam tiga tugas bawah.', 'tr': 'Twitter çe günahkar dili tanyşdyrmak üçin iki diýen bir Uzyş Taýram Aýry görkezip Biziň sistemimiz 2019-nji ýylyň semi-Eval 2019-nji Görevi 6-yň içinde döredildi. Diňe üç üýtgeşik sub-görevi bar, Adynda A: Offensive Dili tapylmak, B: Offensive Diliň kategoriýasy, C: Offensive Dili Maksady Kimligi. Tüt verilerinde öňünden eğlenmiş Kelime Girişmeleri kullandık. Emojiler ve hashtarlar hakkında bilgi dahil edildi. Biziň ýaryşymyz üç sub-işinde gowy ukyplarymyzy başarýar.', 'ko': '트위터의 공격적인 언어를 식별하기 위한 양방향 장단시간 기억 네트워크를 제시했다.우리 시스템은SemEval 2019 퀘스트 6의 배경에서 개발된 것으로 이 퀘스트는 세 가지 다른 하위 퀘스트, 즉 A: 공격성 언어 검측, B: 공격성 언어 분류, C: 공격성 언어 목표 식별을 포함한다.우리는 트위터 데이터에 표정과 라벨에 대한 정보를 포함하여 미리 훈련된 단어를 삽입했다.우리의 방법은 세 개의 하위 임무 중에서 양호한 성능을 얻었다.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n bidireksjonale lang-Term Geheue netwerk voor die identifiseer van offensivele taal in Twitter. Ons stelsel is ontwikkeld in die konteks van die SemEval 2019 taak 6 wat drie verskillende sub-taak bevat, naamlik A: Offensive Language Detection, B: Categorization of Offensive Language, C: Offensive Language Target Identifikasie. Ons gebruik 'n voorafgeleerde Woord Inbeeldings in tweet data, insluitend inligting oor emojis en hashtags. Ons toegang verkry goeie prestasie in die drie sub-taak.", 'sw': 'Tunaweza kuunganisha mtandao wa kumbukumbu ya muda mfupi wa muda mrefu kwa kutambua lugha ya matusi katika mtandao wa Twita. Mfumo wetu umeundwa katika mukhtadha wa kazi ya SemEval 2019 ambayo ina kazi tatu tofauti tofauti, namea A: Utafiti wa Lugha Huru, B: Utafiti wa Lugha Huli, C: Utafiti wa Lugha Huli. Tulitumia ujumbe wa maneno yaliyofundishwa kabla katika takwimu za twita, ikiwa ni pamoja na taarifa kuhusu viungo vya hisia na hashtag. Hatua yetu inafanikiwa kufanya kazi nzuri katika kazi tatu.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք երկու ուղղությամբ երկարաժամկետ հիշողության ցանց Թվիթերում հայտնաբերելու համար: Մեր համակարգը զարգացել է 2019 թվականի կիսագնդի 6-ի կոնտեքստում, որը կազմում է երեք տարբեր ենթախնդիրներ, հատկապես Ա. Անցածր լեզվի հայտնաբերում, Բ. Անցածր լեզվի կատեգորիզացիա, Ս. Անցածր լեզվի նպատակի հայտն Մենք օգտագործեցինք նախապատրաստված Word Embed-ները թվիթերի տվյալներում, ներառյալ տեղեկատվությունը էմոջայի և հաշտագերի մասին: Մեր մոտեցումը լավ արդյունք է ստանում երեք ենթախնդիրներում:', 'am': 'በትዊተር ውስጥ የሚያስቃወም ቋንቋን ለማግኘት የረጅም የረጅም ዘመን ማስታወሻ መረብ እናቀርባታለን፡፡ ስርዓታችን በSemEval 2019 ስራ 6 በተለየ ሦስት የደብዳቤ አድራጊዎች የሚያደርግ ነው፤ አ: የቋንቋ አጣራጭ፣ B: Categorization of Offensive language, C: Offensive language target identification. በተጠቃሚ ቃላት አቀማመጥ እና የኢሜጂ እና የሐሽታክ ማህበረሰብ በተጠቃሚ ዳታዎች ውስጥ ተጠቃሚ ነበር፡፡ በሦስቱ ደብዳቤዎች ውስጥ መልካም ሥራ እንዲደርስ አግኝቷል፡፡', 'az': 'Tövratda həddi-büluq dilini tanıtmaq üçün ikidikcə uzun-qısqa Term Memory a ğını göstəririk. Bizim sistemimiz 2019-ci SemEval Task 6-si ilə müxtəlif üç müxtəlif sub-task içərisində təşkil edildi: A: Offensive Language Detection, B: Offensive Language Categorization, C: Offensive Language Target Identification. Biz, emoji və hashtaqlar haqqında məlumatlar dahil olaraq, tweet verilənlərdə əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş Kelimi İdxalışları kullandıq. Bizim yaxınlığımız üç sub-tasklarda yaxşı performans edər.', 'bn': 'টুইটারে আক্রান্ত ভাষাকে চিহ্নিত করার জন্য আমরা একটি বিদ্রোহীন লম্বা শর্ট ট টার্ম ম মেমোরি নেটওয়ার্ক উপস্থাপন সেমইভাল ২০১৯ সালের ক্ষেত্রে আমাদের সিস্টেম উন্নয়ন করা হয়েছে যার মধ্যে তিনটি বিভিন্ন সাব-কাজ রয়েছে, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে A: অফিসেন্সিভ ভ ভাষা ডিটেকশন, বি: অফিসেন্সি আমরা টুইটারের তথ্যে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত শব্দ দূতাবিদ ব্যবহার করেছি, যার মধ্যে ইমোজিক এবং হ্যাশট্যাগ সম্পর্কে তথ্য আমাদের পদক্ষেপ তিনটি সাব কাজের মধ্যে ভালো প্রমাণ পেতে পারে।', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo dvodirektivnu dugoročnu mrežu uspomene za identifikaciju ofanzivnog jezika na Twitter-u. Naš sistem je razvijen u kontekstu zadatka 6 od semiEvala 2019, koji uključuje tri različite podzadatke, a to je A: otkrivanje neposlušnog jezika, B: Kategorizacija neposlušnog jezika, C: identifikacija neposlušnog jezika. Koristili smo predobučene Word Embedding u podacima o tweetu, uključujući informacije o emojima i hashtagama. Naš pristup postiže dobru predstavu u tri podzadatka.', 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë një rrjet të kujtesës së afatit të shkurtër për identifikimin e gjuhës ofensive në Twitter. Sistemi ynë është zhvilluar në kontekstin e SemEval 2019 Task 6 që përfshin tre nëndetyra të ndryshme, veçanërisht A: Detektimi ofensiv i gjuhës, B: Kategorizimi i gjuhës ofensive, C: Identifikimi i objektivit të gjuhës ofensive. Ne përdorëm një Word Embeddings të trajnuar para në të dhënat e tweetit, duke përfshirë informacion rreth emojis dhe hashtags. Përqasja jonë arrin performancë të mirë në tre nëndetyrat.', 'et': 'Esitame kahesuunalist pikaajalist mälu võrgustikku solvava keele tuvastamiseks Twitteris. Meie süsteem on välja töötatud SemEval 2019 ülesande 6 kontekstis, mis koosneb kolmest erinevast alamülesandest, nimelt A: ründava keele tuvastamine, B: ründava keele kategooriate määramine, C: ründava keele sihtmärgi tuvastamine. Me kasutasime säutsu andmetes eelnevalt väljaõpetatud Wordi manustamist, sealhulgas teavet emojide ja hashtagite kohta. Meie lähenemisviis saavutab kolme allülesande hea tulemuse.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme kaksisuuntaisen pitkän aikavälin muistiverkon loukkaavan kielen tunnistamiseksi Twitterissä. Järjestelmämme on kehitetty osana SemEval 2019 Task 6 -tehtävää, joka koostuu kolmesta eri osatehtävästä: A: loukkaavan kielen tunnistus, B: loukkaavan kielen luokittelu, C: loukkaavan kielen kohdetunnistus. Käytimme tweettitiedoissa ennalta koulutettuja Word Embeddingejä, mukaan lukien tiedot emojista ja hashtageista. Lähestymistapamme saavuttaa hyvän suorituskyvyn kolmessa osatehtävässä.', 'ca': "Presentam una xarxa bidireccional de memòria a curt termini per identificar un llenguatge ofensiu a Twitter. El nostre sistema s'ha desenvolupat en el contexte de la tasca 6 de SemEval 2019 que consisteix en tres subtasques diferents, a saber A: Detecció ofensiva del llenguatge, B: Categorització del llenguatge ofensiv, C: Identificació de l'objectiu de llenguatge ofensiv. Vam utilitzar un Word Embeddings pré-entrenat en dades de tweet, incloent informació sobre emoji i hashtags. Our approach achieves good performance in the three sub-tasks.", 'cs': 'Představujeme obousměrnou síť Long-Short-Term Memory pro identifikaci urážlivého jazyka na Twitteru. Náš systém byl vyvinut v rámci SemEval 2019 Task 6, který se skládá ze tří různých dílčích úkolů, jmenovitě A: Detekce urážlivého jazyka, B: Kategorizace urážlivého jazyka, C: identifikace urážlivého jazyka. Použili jsme předškolené Word Embeddings do tweetových dat, včetně informací o emoji a hashtagu. Náš přístup dosahuje dobrého výkonu ve třech dílčích úkolech.', 'jv': 'Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk kelas telas telas akeh banter Sistem dh챕w챕 wis digomokake nang kont챔ks seminval 2011 task 6 sing sumulakno telu pod-tasks, nambah A: offensive Language detection, B: category of offensive Language, C: offensive Language TarGet ID. Anyone Awakdh챕w챕 챕ntuk sing beraksi bar챗ng-bar챗ng kanggo ngerasakno telu operasi ora.', 'he': "אנחנו מציגים רשת זיכרון ארוכה-קצרה שתיים כיוונים לזהות שפה פגיעה בטוויטר. המערכת שלנו התפתחה בתוך הקשר של משימה 6 SemEval 2019 שמכילה שלושה תחת משימות שונות, כלומר A: Detection of Offensive Language, B: Categorization of Offensive Language, C: Offensive Language Target Identification. השתמשנו באמצעות מילים מאומנות מראש בנתונים טוויטים, כולל מידע על אמוג'ים והאשטגים. הגישה שלנו משיגה ביצועים טובים בשלושת התפקידים.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo dvosmerno mrežo dolgoročnega pomnilnika za prepoznavanje žaljivega jezika v Twitterju. Naš sistem je bil razvit v okviru naloge 6 SemEval 2019, ki obsega tri različne podnaloge, in sicer A: odkrivanje napadalnega jezika, B: kategorizacija napadalnega jezika, C: identifikacija ciljnega jezika napadalnega jezika. V podatkih tweetov smo uporabili vnaprej usposobljene besedne vdelave, vključno z informacijami o čustvenih in hashtagih. Naš pristop dosega dobro uspešnost v treh podnalogah.', 'ha': 'Tuna gaurar da wani jerin Naurar-Lokaci na Long-Short-Short Cire don ka gane lugha mai ƙyacẽwar a Twitter. An developed system in context the SemEal 2019 Taimar 6 which includes three taskõki daban-daban, i.e. A: Faɗaɗancive Lugha, B: Categorization of Ofistive language, C: Aiki Mun yi amfani da takardar maganar ta gabã ɗaya cikin data na Twitter, tare da information about fojis da hashtags. Kayyakanmu ya sãmu aikin ƙwarai a cikin aikin uku.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཌིས་ཌིར་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་རྩ་བ་ཐག་ཙམ་ཆེ་བའི་དྲ་བ་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ Our system has been developed in the context of the SemEval 2019 Task 6 which comprises three different sub-tasks, namely A: Offensive Language Detection, B: Categorization of Offensive Language, C: Offensive Language Target Identification. ང་ཚོས་དྲ་བརྗོད་ཐོག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་པའི་ཡིག ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་འདིས་དུས་བཀོལ་གསུམ་ལས་དོན་ཚད་ལྡན་ཡོད་པ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'LTL-UDE at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : BERT and Two-Vote Classification for Categorizing Offensiveness', 'es': 'LTL-UDE en SemEval-2019 Tarea 6: BERT y clasificación de dos votos para clasificar la ofensividad', 'ar': 'LTL-UDE في مهمة SemEval-2019 6: BERT وتصنيف ثنائي الصوت لتصنيف الهجوم', 'pt': 'LTL-UDE na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: BERT e Classificação de Dois Votos para Categorizar Ofensividade', 'fr': "LTL-UDE au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: BERT et classification à deux voix pour catégoriser l'offensivité", 'ja': 'LTL - UDE at SemEval -2019 Task 6: BERT and Two - Vote Classification for Categorizing Offensiveness', 'hi': 'LTL-UDE सेमेवल-2019 टास्क 6 पर: BERT और दो-वोट वर्गीकरण आक्रामकता को वर्गीकृत करने के लिए', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019ŤĀĆ6šłäLTL-UDE:šĽ•BERTšł§Á•®', 'ru': 'LTL-UDE на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Классификация BERT и двух голосов для классификации наступательности', 'ga': 'LTL-UDE ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: BERT agus Aicmiú Dhá Vóta chun Ionsaitheach a Chatagóiriú', 'it': "LTL-UDE al SemEval-2019 Task 6: BERT e classificazione a due voti per categorizzare l'offensiva", 'ka': 'LTL-UDE semiEval-2019 დავალება 6: BERT და 2-Vote Classification for Categorizing Offensiveness', 'hu': 'LTL-UDE a SemEval-2019 6. feladat: BERT és kétszavatos osztályozás a támadás kategorizálására', 'el': 'Καθήκον 6: Ταξινόμηση με δύο ψήφους για την κατηγοριοποίηση της προσβολής', 'kk': 'LTL-UDE жарым- 2019 6- тапсырмасында: BERT және екі- дауыс көлемі', 'lt': 'LTL-UDE 2010 m. pusmečio vertinimo 6 užduotis: BERT ir dviejų balsų klasifikavimas klasifikuojant pažeidžiamumą', 'mk': 'ЛТЛ-УДЕ на SemEval-2019 задача 6: БЕРТ и двогласна класификација за категоризирање на навредата', 'ms': 'LTL-UDE di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: BERT dan Klasifikasi Dua-Vote untuk Mengkategori Kekecerasan', 'mt': 'LTL-UDE f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6: BERT u Klassifikazzjoni b’Żewġ Voti għall-Kategorizzazzjoni tal-Offensività', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6: ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയും രണ്ട് വോട്ട് ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിഭാഗത്തിനുള്ള', 'mn': 'LTL-UDE at SemEval-2019 Task 6: BERT and Two-Vote Classification for Categorizing Offensiveness', 'no': 'LTL-UDE på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 6: BERT og to-stemmeklassifikasjon for kategorisering', 'pl': 'LTL-UDE na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 6: Klasyfikacja BERT i dwugłosowa dla kategorizacji ofensywności', 'ro': 'LTL-UDE la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: BERT și clasificarea cu două voturi pentru categorizarea ofensivității', 'sr': 'LTL-UDE na semiEval-2019 zadatak 6: BERT i dvoglasna klasifikacija za kategoriju neposlušnosti', 'si': 'LTL-UDE at HalfEvel-2019 Job 6: BERT and Two-Vote Classication for Categorise Offensiveness', 'sv': 'LTL-UDE på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: BERT och tvåröstsklassificering för kategorisering av offensivitet', 'so': 'LTL-UDE at SemEval-2019 Task 6: BERT and Two-Vote Classification for Categorizing Offensive', 'ta': 'Comment', 'ur': 'LTL-UDE at SemEval-2019 Task 6: BERT and Two-Vote Classification for Categorizing Offensiveness', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'LLLLUDE tại Semkhai-thẩm 9 Task 6: BERT và Two-Cử classification for Categorhoá Cảm động', 'bg': 'Лейтенант-СДС на СемЕвал-2019 Задача 6: БРТ и класификация на два гласа за категоризиране на нападението', 'hr': 'LTL-UDE na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 6: BERT i dvoglasna klasifikacija za kategoriziranje neposlušnosti', 'nl': 'LTL-UDE bij SemEval-2019 Taak 6: BERT en Two-Stem Classification voor het categoriseren van Offensiviteit', 'da': 'LTL-UDE ved SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: BERT og to stemmer klassificering for kategorisering af offensiv', 'de': 'LTL-UDE bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabenstellung 6: BERT und Zwei-Stimmen-Klassifikation zur Kategorisierung von Offensivität', 'id': 'LTL-UDE di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: BERT dan Two-Vote Classification for Categorizing Offensiveness', 'ko': 'LTL-UDE가SemEval-2019의 미션 6: BERT와 2표 공격 분류', 'fa': 'LTL-UDE در پایین Eval-2019 کار ۶: BERT و کلاس دو Vote برای تقسیم کردن افتخار', 'sw': 'LTL-UDE at SemEval-2019 Task 6: BERT and Two-Vote Classification for Categorizing Offensiveness', 'tr': 'LTL-UDE at SemEval-2019 Task 6: BERT and Two-Vote Classification for Categorizing Offensiveness', 'sq': 'LTL-UDE në SemEval-2019 Task 6: BERT and Two-Vote Classification for Categorizing Offensiveness', 'af': 'LTL-UDE by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 6: BERT en Twee-Voete Klassifikasie', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'hy': 'LTL-UDE at SemEval-2019 Task 6: BERT and Two-Vote Classification for Categorizing Offensiveness', 'az': 'LTL-UDE at SemEval-2019 Task 6: BERT and Two-Vote Classification for Categorizing Offensiveness', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের ৬: বের্ট এবং দুই ভোট বিভাগের জন্য বিভাগ', 'bs': 'LTL-UDE na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 6: BERT i dvoglasna klasifikacija za kategoriju neposlušnosti', 'ca': 'LTL-UDE a SemEval-2019 Task 6: BERT and Two-Vote Classification for Categorizing Offensiveness', 'cs': 'LTL-UDE na SemEval-2019 Úkol 6: BERT a dvouhlasová klasifikace pro kategorizaci ofenzivy', 'et': 'LTL-UDE SemEval-2019 ülesanne 6: BERT ja kahe hääle klassifikatsioon rünnaku kategooriaks', 'fi': 'LTL-UDE SemEval-2019 Teht채v채 6: BERT ja kahden 채채nen luokitus hy철kk채yksen luokittelussa', 'jv': 'LTL-UTE at semiinval-2011 task 6: BERT and Two-Vote', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'LTL-UDE na SemEval-2019 Naloga 6: BERT in klasifikacija dveh glasov za kategorizacijo napadalnosti', 'he': 'LTL-UDE ב SemEval-2019 משימה 6: BERT ו-Two-Vote Classification for Categorizing Offensiveness', 'bo': 'LTL-UDE at SemEval-2019 Task 6: BERT and Two-Vote Classification for Categorizing Offensiveness'}
{'en': 'We present results for Subtask A and C of SemEval 2019 Shared Task 6. In Subtask A, we experiment with an embedding representation of postings and use BERT to categorize postings. Our best result reaches the 10th place (out of 103). In Subtask C, we applied a two-vote classification approach with minority fallback, which is placed on the 19th rank (out of 65).', 'ar': 'نقدم نتائج المهمة الفرعية A و C للمهمة المشتركة 6 في SemEval 2019. أفضل نتيجة لدينا تصل إلى المركز العاشر (من 103). في Subtask C ، طبقنا نهج تصنيف صوتين مع تراجع الأقلية ، والذي تم وضعه في المرتبة 19 (من 65).', 'pt': 'Apresentamos resultados para a Subtarefa A e C da Tarefa Compartilhada 6 do SemEval 2019. Na Subtarefa A, experimentamos uma representação incorporada de postagens e usamos o BERT para categorizar as postagens. Nosso melhor resultado chega ao 10º lugar (de 103). Na Subtarefa C, aplicamos uma abordagem de classificação de dois votos com fallback minoritário, que é colocado na 19ª posição (de 65).', 'es': 'Presentamos los resultados para la Subtarea A y C de la Tarea Compartida 6 de SemEval 2019. En la subtarea A, experimentamos con una representación incrustada de publicaciones y utilizamos BERT para categorizar las publicaciones. Nuestro mejor resultado alcanza el décimo lugar (de 103). En la subtarea C, aplicamos un enfoque de clasificación de dos votos con respaldo de minoría, que se coloca en el puesto 19 (de 65).', 'fr': 'Nous présentons les résultats pour les sous-tâches A et C de la tâche partagée 6 SemEval 2019. Dans la sous-tâche A, nous expérimentons une représentation intégrée des publications et utilisons BERT pour catégoriser les publications. Notre meilleur résultat atteint la 10e place (sur 103). Dans la sous-tâche C, nous avons appliqué une approche de classification à deux voix avec repli minoritaire, qui est placée au 19e rang (sur 65).', 'ja': 'SemEval 2019共有タスク6のサブタスクAとCの結果を提示します。サブタスクAでは、投稿の埋め込み表現を実験し、BERTを使用して投稿を分類します。自己最高の成績は10位（ 103回中）。サブタスクCでは、マイナーフォールバックで2票の分類アプローチを適用し、これは19番目のランク（ 65のうち）に置かれています。', 'hi': 'हम SemEval 2019 साझा कार्य 6 के Subtask A और C के लिए परिणाम प्रस्तुत करते हैं। Subtask A में, हम पोस्टिंग के एम्बेडिंग प्रतिनिधित्व के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं और पोस्टिंग को वर्गीकृत करने के लिए BERT का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारा सबसे अच्छा परिणाम 10 वें स्थान (103 में से) तक पहुंचता है। सबटास्क सी में, हमने अल्पसंख्यक फॉलबैक के साथ दो-वोट वर्गीकरण दृष्टिकोण लागू किया, जिसे 19 वीं रैंक (65 में से) पर रखा गया है।', 'zh': '吾言SemEval 2019之所共6者,AC也。 子职 A 中,试其嵌文,以 BERT 类之。 至第10名(凡103名)。 子职 C 中,用两票分法,其少数派回退在第 19 位(凡 65 位)。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем результаты для подзадач A и C совместной задачи 6 SemEval 2019. В подзадаче А мы экспериментируем с представлением встраивания записей и используем BERT для категоризации записей. Наш лучший результат достигает 10-го места (из 103). В подзадаче C мы применили классификационный подход с двойным голосованием с резервным меньшинством, которое занимает 19-е место (из 65).', 'ga': 'Cuirimid torthaí i láthair maidir le Fothasc A agus C de Thasc Comhroinnte 6 SemEval 2019. I bhFothasc A, déanaimid tástáil ar léiriú leabú postálacha agus úsáidimid CRET chun postálacha a chatagóiriú. Sroicheann an toradh is fearr atá againn an 10ú háit (as 103). I bhFothasc C, chuireamar cur chuige aicmithe dhá vóta i bhfeidhm le cúl-tuilleamh mionlaigh, a chuirtear ar an 19ú rang (as 65).', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენ შეგვიძლია SemEval 2019-ის A და C სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო. Subtask A-ში, ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტირებით გავაკეთებთ სტატირებას გამოყენება და გამოყენებთ BERT-ს კატეგორიზაციისთვის. ჩვენი საუკეთესო შედეგი ახლა ახლა ახლა ახლა ახლა ახლა ახლა ახლა ახლა ახლა ახლა ახლა ახლა C-ში ჩვენ ორი დოსტის კლასიფიკაციის პროგრამის გამოყენება, რომელიც მინუსიტების გამოყენება, რომელიც 19-ში დავყენება (65-დან).', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk az eredményeket a SemEval 2019 Shared Task 6 A és C altfeladatához. Az A. alcsoportban kísérletezünk beágyazási ábrázolással, és a BERT segítségével kategorizáljuk a bejegyzéseket. Legjobb eredményünk a 10. helyre jut (103-ból). A C. alcsoportban kétszavazásos osztályozási megközelítést alkalmaztunk kisebbségi visszaeséssel, amely a 19. helyre kerül (65-ből).', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε αποτελέσματα για την Υποεργασία Α και Γ της Κοινής Εργασίας 6. Στην Υποεργασία Α, πειραματιζόμαστε με μια αναπαράσταση ενσωμάτωσης των δημοσιεύσεων και χρησιμοποιούμε το για την κατηγοριοποίηση των δημοσιεύσεων. Το καλύτερο αποτέλεσμα μας φτάνει στη 10η θέση (από 103). Στην Υποεργασία Γ εφαρμόσαμε μια προσέγγιση ταξινόμησης δύο ψήφων με μειονοτική οπισθοδρόμηση, η οποία τοποθετείται στην 19η θέση (από 65).', 'it': 'Presentiamo i risultati per la sottomissione A e C di SemEval 2019 Shared Task 6. In Subtask A, sperimentiamo con una rappresentazione di incorporazione dei post e usiamo BERT per categorizzare i post. Il nostro miglior risultato raggiunge il 10° posto (su 103). Nel Sottocompito C, abbiamo applicato un approccio di classificazione a due voti con ricaduta minoritaria, che si colloca al 19esimo posto (su 65).', 'kk': 'Біз 2019 жылы бөлек тапсырманың A және C ішінде нәтижелерін таңдаймыз. A- тапсырманың субтапсырмасында, жіберілген жіберілгендерді ендіру және BERT- ті беттеу үшін қолданамыз. Біздің ең жақсы нәтижеміз 10-ші орынға (103-ден тыс). С-тапсырманың субтапсырмасында, біз кішіліктердің 19-ші деңгейінде (65-ден) екі дауыс классификациясын қолдандық.', 'lt': 'Pateikiame 2019 m. pusės vertinimo A ir C dalinės užduoties 6 rezultatus. A poskirsnyje eksperimentuojame su įterpiama komandiruotės reprezentacija ir naudojame BERT komandiruotėms suskirstyti į kategorijas. Geriausias rezultatas pasiekia dešimtą vietą (iš 103). In Subtask C, we applied a two-vote classification approach with minority fallback, which is placed on the 19th rank (out of 65).', 'mk': 'Презентираме резултати за подзадачата А и Ц од SemEval 2019 заедничката задача 6. Во подзадачата А, експериментираме со вградена претстава на постови и користиме BERT за категоризирање на постови. Нашиот најдобар резултат достигнува 10 место (од 103). Во субзадачата Ц, го применивме пристапот на класификација со две гласови со малцинско одбивање, кој е ставен на 19-тиот ранг (од 65).', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan keputusan Subtask A dan C dari SemEval 2019 Shared Task 6. Dalam Subtugas A, kami eksperimen dengan mewakili penerbangan posting dan menggunakan BERT untuk kategori posting. Hasil terbaik kita mencapai tempat ke-10 (daripada 103). Dalam Subtask C, kami menerapkan pendekatan klasifikasi dua-suara dengan minoriti fallback, yang ditempatkan pada peringkat ke-19 (daripada 65).', 'mt': "A ħna nippreżentaw riżultati għas-Subkompitu A u C tas-SemEval 2019 Kompitu Konġunt 6. Fis-Subkompitu A, aħna ninsperimentaw b’rappreżentanza inkorporata tal-istazzjonamenti u nużaw BERT biex jikkategorizzaw l-istazzjonamenti. L-aħjar riżultat tagħna jilħaq l-10 post (minn 103). Fis-Subkompitu C, applikajna approċċ ta' klassifikazzjoni b'żewġ voti b'falliment minoritarju, li jitqiegħed fid-19-il grad (minn 65).", 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 പങ്കുചേര്\u200dത്ത ടാസ്ക് 6-നുള്ള സുബ്ബോസ് എ സിയും സി നിങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ച In Subtask A, we experiment with an embedding representation of postings and use BERT to categorize postings.  നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല ഫലം പത്താം സ്ഥലം എത്തുന്നു (103 ല്\u200d നിന്നും). സുബ്ബഡ് സിയില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ട് വോട്ട് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d നടപടി പ്രയോഗിച്ചു കുറച്ചു ചെറുപ്പക്കാരുടെ പിന്നില്\u200d പ്രയോഗിച്ച', 'mn': 'Бид 2019 оны SemEval-ын A, C Subtask-ын үр дүнг харуулж байна. A-ын суб-тайлбарт бид захиргааны захиргааны төлөвлөгөөтэй туршилт хийдэг. Бидний хамгийн сайн үр дүн нь 10-аар орон (103-аас) хүртэл байна. Ц-ын суурь даалгавар дээр бид хоёр сонголтын хуваалцааны арга зам ашигласан. Энэ нь 19-р хэмжээнд (65-аас) байдаг.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer resultat for Subtask A og C av semiEval 2019 delt oppgåve 6. I underoppgåve A eksperimenterer vi med ein innebygde representasjon av postar og bruk BERT for å kategorisera postar. Det beste resultatet vårt når 10. plassen (ut av 103). I underoppgåve C har vi brukt ein to-stemmeklassifikasjonsklasseringstilnærming med mindre tilbakefall, som blir plassert på 19-rekken (ut av 65).', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy wyniki podzadania A i C SemEval 2019 Shared Task 6. W Podzadaniu A eksperymentujemy z osadzoną reprezentacją postów i używamy BERT do kategoryzowania postów. Nasz najlepszy wynik osiąga dziesiąte miejsce (z 103). W podzadaniu C zastosowaliśmy podejście klasyfikacji dwóch głosów z mniejszościowym fallback, które jest umieszczone na XIX rankingu (z 65).', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm rezultatele pentru Subsarcina A și C a SemEval 2019 Shared Task 6. În Subsarcina A, experimentăm cu o reprezentare încorporată a postărilor și folosim BERT pentru a clasifica postările. Cel mai bun rezultat al nostru ajunge pe locul 10 (din 103). În Subsarcina C, am aplicat o abordare de clasificare cu două voturi cu rezervă minoritară, care este plasată pe locul 19 (din 65).', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo rezultate podzadatka A i C od semiEvala 2019. zajedničkog zadatka 6. U podzadatku A eksperimentiramo sa ugrađenim predstavljanjem poštovanja i koristimo BERT za kategoriju poštovanja. Naš najbolji rezultat stiže do desetog mesta (od 103). U podzadatku C, primjenjivali smo dvoglasni klasifikacijski pristup sa smanjenjem manjina, koji je postavljen na 19. rank (od 65).', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් දෙන්නේ සෙම්වේල් 2019 සාමාන්\u200dය වැඩක් 6 සබ් වැඩක් A සහ C සබ් වැඩක්. A සබ් වැඩේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා පොස්ටින්ග් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් සහ BERT භාවිතා කරනවා පොස්ටින්ග් වලට. අපේ හොඳම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් 10වෙනි තැනට ලැබෙනවා. සුබ් කාර්ය C වල, අපි විශ්වාස දෙකක් භාවිතා කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් අඩුව', 'so': 'We present results for Subtask A and C of SemEval 2019 Shared Task 6.  Sub-task A, waxaynu ku imtixaamaynaa mid ka mid ah warqadaha ku qoran, waxaana isticmaalnaa BERT si aan u kala qeybinno boostada. Abaalkayaga ugu wanaagsan waxay gaadhaa meesha 10aad (103 ka mida). Shaqada Sub-C ayaannu ku dalbannay qaab fasax labaad oo cod ah, waxaana la dhigay dib u dhigashada qof ka yar, taasoo lagu dhigay fasalka 19aad (65 ka mid ah).', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar resultat för deluppgift A och C i SemEval 2019 Shared Task 6. I Underuppgift A experimenterar vi med en inbäddad representation av inlägg och använder BERT för att kategorisera inlägg. Vårt bästa resultat når 10:e plats (av 103). I deluppgift C tillämpade vi en tvåröstsklassificering med minoritetsfallback, som placeras på 19:e rankningen (av 65).', 'ta': 'SemEval 2019ல் செய்யப்பட்ட பணி 6 பகிர்ந்து கொண்டிருக்கும் துணை பணி A மற்றும் C க்கு நாம் முடிவுகளை காண் In Subtask A, we experiment with an embedding representation of postings and use BERT to categorize postings.  எங்கள் சிறந்த முடிவு 10வது இடத்திற்கு (103 ல் இருந்து) அடையும். துணை பணி C-ல், நாம் இரண்டு வாக்கு வகுப்பு வழியை செயல்படுத்தி சிறியது குறைந்தவர்களுடன் பின்புறம் செயல்படுத்தினோம்.', 'ur': 'ہم نے سٹوک A اور سی کے نتیجے پیش کئے 2019 شریک ٹوک 6 کے لئے. Subtask A میں، ہم پوسٹینگ کے ایک انڈیڈنگ نمونٹ کے ساتھ آزمائش کرتے ہیں اور BERT کو استعمال کرتے ہیں پوسٹینگ کاٹیجیزوں کے لئے. ہمارا بہترین نتیجہ 10 مکان تک پہنچ جاتا ہے۔ ہم نے سٹوٹک سی میں ایک دو وٹی کلاسیفوں کی طریقہ لازم کی تھوڑی تھوڑی تھوڑی تھوڑی تھوڑی رقم پر رکھی ہے (65 سے) ۔', 'uz': "Biz SemEval 2019 sub-vazifa A va C ishlarini 6 shartlangan natijalariga yetdik. Ushbu vazifa A bilan biz postlarning qismlarini tahrirlash va BERT bandlarini kattalashga ishlatimiz. Bizning eng yaxshi natijamiz 103 muammolariga keladi. C'da, biz bir nechta kichkina qo'llanmalar bilan ikkita tovush darajasini qo'llab berdik. Bu 19 darajada (65dan boshlangan).", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi cung cấp kết quả cho Phân tích A và C của SemEvl 2009. Chúng tôi thí nghiệm với các bài đăng nhập và sử dụng BERT để phân loại các bài đăng tải. Chúng ta có kết quả tốt nhất ở vị trí 103. Chúng tôi đã áp dụng phương pháp phân hạng hai phiếu với sự thụt lùi của thiểu số, được đặt vào độ số chín lớp (ra khỏi 65).', 'bg': 'Представяме резултати по подзадача А и С на Споделена задача 6. В Подзадача А експериментираме с вграждащо представяне на публикациите и използваме за категоризиране на публикациите. Най-добрият ни резултат достига 10-то място (от 103). В подзадача В приложихме подход за класификация на два гласа с резервен резерв на малцинствата, който е поставен на 19-ти ранг (от 65).', 'nl': 'We presenteren resultaten voor Subtaak A en C van SemEval 2019 Shared Task 6. In Subtaak A experimenteren we met een inbedding representatie van postings en gebruiken we BERT om postings te categoriseren. Ons beste resultaat bereikt de 10e plaats (vanaf 103). In Subtask C hebben we een classificatiebenadering met twee stemmen toegepast met minderheden fallback, die op de 19e rang wordt geplaatst (vanaf 65).', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer resultaterne for underopgave A og C af SemEval 2019 Shared Task 6. I underopgave A eksperimenterer vi med en integrering af indlæg og bruger BERT til at kategorisere indlæg. Vores bedste resultat når 10. plads (ud af 103). I underopgave C anvendte vi en klassifikationsmetode med to stemmer med mindretalsfald, som er placeret på 19. rang (ud af 65).', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo rezultate podzadatka A i C od semiEvala 2019. zajedničkog zadatka 6. U podzadatku A, eksperimentiramo sa ugrađenim predstavljanjem postignuća i koristimo BERT za kategoriju postignuća. Naš najbolji rezultat stiže do desetog mjesta (od 103). U podzadatku C, primjenjivali smo dvoglasni klasifikacijski pristup s smanjenjem manjina, koji je stavljen na 19. redak (od 65).', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren Ergebnisse für Teilaufgabe A und C von SemEval 2019 Shared Task 6. In Unteraufgabe A experimentieren wir mit einer einbettbaren Darstellung von Buchungen und verwenden BERT, um Buchungen zu kategorisieren. Unser bestes Ergebnis erreicht den zehnten Platz (von 103). In Subtask C haben wir einen Zwei-Stimmen-Klassifizierungsansatz mit Minderheiten Fallback angewendet, der auf dem neunzehnten Rang (ab 65) platziert ist.', 'id': 'We present results for Subtask A and C of SemEval 2019 Shared Task 6.  Dalam Subtask A, kami eksperimen dengan penempatan penempatan posting dan menggunakan BERT untuk kategorisasi posting. Hasil terbaik kita mencapai tempat ke-10 (dari 103). Dalam Subtask C, kami menerapkan pendekatan klasifikasi dua suara dengan minoritas fallback, yang ditempatkan pada peringkat ke-19 (dari 65).', 'fa': 'ما نتیجه\u200cهایی را برای Subtask A و C از نیمه\u200cای ۲۰۱۹ مشترک کرده\u200cایم. در زیر وظیفه A، ما با یک نمایش جایگزینی از پست\u200cها آزمایش می\u200cکنیم و از BERT استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا پست\u200cها را برگزینیم. بهترین نتیجه ما به جای ده (از 103) رسیده است. در زیر وظیفه C، ما یک روش جدایی دو رای با کمترین کمترین افتاد، که در طبقه ۱۹م قرار می\u200cگیرد (از ۶۵).', 'ko': 'SemEval 2019 공유 임무 6의 하위 임무 A와 C의 결과가 제시되었습니다.하위 작업 A에서는 게시물의 포함 표시를 테스트하고 BERT를 사용하여 게시물을 분류합니다.우리의 최고 성적은 10위(103위)에 랭크되어 있다.하위 임무 C에서 우리는 두 표 분류법을 채택했는데 소수 민족이 뒤로 물러나 19위(총 65위)에 올랐다.', 'sw': 'We present results for Subtask A and C of SemEval 2019 Shared Task 6.  Katika Ujumbe wa A, tunajaribu kwa uwakilishi wa makala na kutumia BERT ili kugawanya makala. Matokeo yetu bora yanafikia nafasi ya 10 (kati ya 103). Katika jukumu la subira C, tulitumia mbili za usambazaji wa kura kwa ajili ya kupungua kwa wachache, ambalo linawekwa kwenye daraja la 19 (kati ya 65).', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim rezultatet për Subtask A dhe C të SemEval 2019 Task Shared 6. Në Subtask A, ne eksperimentojmë me një përfaqësim përfshirë të postimeve dhe përdorim BERT për të kategorizuar postimet. Rezultati ynë më i mirë arrin në vendin e dhjetë (nga 103). Në nëndetyrën C, ne aplikojmë një qasje klasifikimi me dy vota me pasojat e pakicës, e cila vendoset në rendin e 19-të (nga 65).', 'tr': "We present results for Subtask A and C of SemEval 2019 Shared Task 6. A Subtask'de, poçtalaryň metini görkezmek üçin synanyşýarys we BERT'i kategoriýalaşdyrmak üçin ulanýarys. En iyi sonuçlarımız 10'üne ulaşır (103'den). Subtask C'da, azynyň yzygyndan 19-nji derejede (65-den) iki ses klasifikasiýasyny guruldyk.", 'af': "Ons voorsien resultate vir Subtask A en C van SemEval 2019 Gedeelde Opdrag 6. In Subtask A, ons eksperimenteer met 'n inbêring voorstelling van posings en gebruik BERT om posings te kategoriseer. Ons beste resultaat bereik die 10de plek (uit 103). In Subtask C, het ons 'n twee-stem klassifikasie toegang aangewend met minoriteit afval, wat op die 19de rank gesit word (uit 65).", 'am': 'የሳምEval 2019 ስራውን አ እና C አቀረብን፡፡ በSubmission A፣ የድምፅ አካባቢ አካባቢ መልዕክት እናደርጋለን፡፡ የሻለቃችን ፍጻሜ ወደ አሥር ስፍራ (ከ103 ውስጥ) በበኩሉ ስራ C፣ ከ65 በላይኛው ደረጃ (ከ19th ደረጃው) የተደረገ የአንዳንዱ አነስተኛ የሁለት የድምፅ ምርጫዎችን ለመለያየት አቀረብን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք 2019 թվականի "ՍեմԵվալ"-ի "ՍեմԵվալ"-ի "ՍեմԵվալ"-ի "ՍեմԵվալ"-ի "ՍեմԵվալ" արդյունքները: Ա-ի ենթախնդիրում մենք փորձում ենք տեղադրությունների ներառման հետ և օգտագործում ենք BER-ը տեղադրությունների դասակարգելու համար: Մեր լավագույն արդյունքը հասնում է 10-րդ տեղին (ինտերնետից 10-ը): Սիբ-հանձնարարում մենք կիրառեցինք երկու քվեային դասակարգման մոտեցումը փոքրության հետ կապված հակառակը, որը տեղադրված է 19-րդ դասակարգում (65-ից):', 'bn': 'আমরা সাবকাজ এ এবং সি ২০১৯ সালের সাবভাল কাজের ফলাফল শেয়ার করেছি। সাবকাজ A-এ আমরা পোস্টের প্রতিনিধিত্বের সাথে পরীক্ষা করছি এবং পোস্টগুলো বিভাগ করার জন্য বিবেরেট ব্যবহার করি। আমাদের সবচেয়ে ভাল ফলাফল ১০ স্থানে পৌঁছায় (১০৩ থেকে)। সাবকাজ সিতে আমরা সংখ্যালঘু পতনের সাথে দুই ভোট বিভাগের ক্ষেত্রে প্রয়োগ করেছি, যা ১৯ স্তরে রাখা হয়েছে (৬৫ এর মধ্যে)।', 'az': "Biz 2019-in SemEval-in A və C Subtask-in sonuçlarını göstəririk. Subtask A'da, biz postaların imzalaması ilə imzalayırıq və BERT'i kategoriyalarını seçmək üçün istifadə edirik. Bizim ən yaxşı sonumuz 10-ci yerə çatdı. Subtask C içində, az bir qismi düşmənçiliyi ilə iki səs klasifikasiya approach uyguladıq, ki 19-ci dərəcədə yerləşdirilmişdir (65 dərəcədən).", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo rezultate podzadatka A i C semiEvala 2019. zajedničkog zadatka 6. U podzadatku A, eksperimentiramo sa ugrađenim predstavljanjem poštovanja i koristimo BERT za kategoriju poštovanja. Naš najbolji rezultat stiže do desetog mjesta (od 103). U podzadatku C, primjenjivali smo dvoglasni klasifikacijski pristup s smanjenjem manjina, koji je stavljen na 19. redak (od 65).', 'et': 'Tutvustame SemEval 2019 Shared Task 6 alamülesannete A ja C tulemusi. Alaülesandes A eksperimenteerime postituste manustamise esitamist ja kasutame BERT-i postituste kategooriate jaotamiseks. Meie parim tulemus jõuab 10. kohale (103-st). Alaülesandes C rakendasime kahe hääle klassifitseerimise lähenemisviisi vähemuste tagasihoiuga, mis asetati 19. auastmele (65-st).', 'ca': 'Presentam resultats de la Subtasca A i C de SemEval 2019 Tasca Compartida 6. A la Subtasca A, experimentem amb una representació incorporadora de publicacions i utilitzem BERT per categoritzar publicacions. El nostre millor resultat arriba al 10è lloc (de 103). A la Subtasca C, vam aplicar un enfocament de classificació de dos vots amb retrocedències minoritàries, que es posi en el 19è rangy (de 65).', 'cs': 'Představujeme výsledky pro Subúlohy A a C SemEval 2019 Shared Task 6. V podúkolu A experimentujeme s vložením reprezentace příspěvků a používáme BERT k kategorizaci příspěvků. Náš nejlepší výsledek dosáhl desátého místa (z 103). V podúkolu C jsme aplikovali dvouhlasový klasifikační přístup s menšinovým fallback, který je umístěn na devatenácté hodnotě (ze 65).', 'fi': 'Esittelemme tulokset SemEval 2019 Shared Task 6:n osatehtävistä A ja C. Alatehtävässä A kokeilemme postausten upotusesitystä ja käytämme BERT:tä postausten luokitteluun. Paras tulos saavuttaa 10. sijan (103:sta). Alatehtävässä C sovelsimme kahden äänen luokittelua vähemmistövarassa, joka sijoittuu 19. sijalle (65:stä).', 'jv': 'We present this data for Subtask A and C of semebal 2011 shared task6. In Subtask A, we énpember karo embedding representation of mail and use BERT to kategorise mail. Pametuné sing paling dhéwé dadi tanggal 10 (tanggal 1) Nang Subtask C, kita ngubah perusahaan kelas telas telas telas telas telas telas nang nguasai perusahaan batar, sing wis ana luwih bantuan 19 (telas telas telas telas)', 'ha': 'Tune halatar da matsala wa Subtas A and C of Semeval 2019 Shared Tashin 6. In Subaikin A, munã jarraba da wani mai embedded wakin posten kuma munã amfani da BERT dõmin su category posters. Babu mafi kyauta ga matsayinMu ya kai 10. A cikin Sub-aikin C, mun yi amfani da matsayin fasalin kura biyu da bakin ƙarami, wanda aka saka kan daraja na 19 (daga 65).', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים תוצאות למשימה A ו C של SemEval 2019 משימה משותפת 6. בתפקיד א, אנו מנסים עם מייצג מעורבת של הודעות ושימוש ברט כדי לקטגוריזם הודעות. התוצאה הטובה ביותר שלנו מגיעה למקום ה-10 (מתוך 103). בתפקיד סי, השתמשנו באמצעות גישה מסווג של שתי קולות, עם מעט אחורה, אשר מונח בשורה ה-19 (מתוך 65).', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo rezultate za podnalogo A in C SemEval 2019 Shared Task 6. V podnalogi A eksperimentiramo z vdelavo objav in uporabljamo BERT za kategorizacijo objav. Naš najboljši rezultat doseže 10. mesto (od 103). V podnalogi C smo uporabili pristop klasifikacije dveh glasov z manjšinskim rezervnim položajem, ki je uvrščen na 19. čin (od 65).', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ལྡན་A དང་། C(SemEval)2019ལས་མཉམ་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་གཞན་དང་། འུ་ཅག་གི་Subtask A ནང་དུ་ཡིག་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འཆར་བྱེད་པའི་བརྗོད་སྟངས་ཞིག་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་དགོས། ང་ཚོའི་འབྲུག་འབྲས་ཆེན་ཤོས་ཀྱི་འཇིག་རྟེན་དེ་བཅུ་ཐམ་པ་ལྷག་གི་རེད། ང་ཚོས་གནད་དོན་ལྡན་གྱི་བཀོད་སྤྱད་པར་དབྱེ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་འཇུག་བྱས་པ་ལས། དེ་ནི་འཛམ་གླིང་༡༩་གི་སྐར་'}
{'en': 'MIDAS at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : Identifying Offensive Posts and Targeted Offense from Twitter', 'ar': 'MIDAS في SemEval-2019 المهمة 6: تحديد المنشورات الهجومية والجرائم المستهدفة من تويتر', 'pt': 'MIDAS no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Identificando Postagens Ofensivas e Ofensas Direcionadas do Twitter', 'fr': 'MIDAS à SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: Identifier les publications offensives et les infractions ciblées à partir de Twitter', 'es': 'MIDAS en la Tarea 6 de Semeval-2019: Identificación de publicaciones ofensivas y ofensas dirigidas desde Twitter', 'ja': 'MIDAS at SemEval -2019タスク6 ： Twitterからの攻撃的な投稿とターゲットを絞ったオフェンスの特定', 'zh': 'MIDAS在SemEval-2019务6:知Twitter之进攻性帖,有针对性之攻', 'ru': 'MIDAS на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Выявление агрессивных постов и целевых правонарушений из Twitter', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 6 पर MIDAS: चहचहाना से आक्रामक पोस्ट और लक्षित अपराध की पहचान', 'ga': 'MIDAS ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Poist Ionsaitheach agus Cion Spriocdhírithe a Aithint ó Twitter', 'ka': 'MIDAS semiEval-2019 დავალება 6: განსაზღვრება სუფლიო პოსტი და მისაღები გარეშე Twitter-დან', 'hu': 'MIDAS a SemEval-2019 6. feladat: Támadó bejegyzések és célzott bűncselekmények felismerése a Twitterről', 'el': 'Εργασία 6: Εντοπισμός προσβλητικών δημοσιεύσεων και στοχευμένης προσβολής από το Twitter', 'it': 'MIDAS a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identificare post offensivi e offese mirate da Twitter', 'kk': 'MIDAS шегінші тапсырма 6: Твиттерден мақсатты және мәліметті тапсырмаларды анықтау', 'mk': 'MIDAS на SemEval-2019 задача 6: Идентификување на навредни места и насочена навреда од Твитер', 'lt': 'MIDAS per 2019 m. pusmetį 6 užduotis: Nustatyti pažeidžiamas pareigas ir tikslinį nusikaltimą iš Twitter', 'ms': 'MIDAS di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Mengenalpasti Pos Serangan dan Serangan Sasaran dari Twitter', 'mt': 'MIDAS f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6: Identifikazzjoni ta’ Karigi Offensivi u Offens immirat minn Twitter', 'mn': 'MIDAS at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying Offensive Posts and Target Offense from Twitter', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ജോലിയിലെ MIDAS 6: ടൂട്ടറില്\u200d നിന്നും അറസ്റ്റ് പോസ്റ്റുകളെ തിരിച്ചറിയുക', 'no': 'MIDAS på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 6: Identifisering av Offensive Poster og Målet Offense frå Twitter', 'pl': 'MIDAS na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 6: Identyfikowanie postów ofensywnych i ukierunkowanej ofensywy z Twittera', 'ro': 'MIDAS la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: Identificarea posturilor ofensive și a ofensivelor vizate de pe Twitter', 'sr': 'MIDAS na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 6: identifikacija neposlušnih poštara i ciljanih otkaza iz Twitter-a', 'si': 'MIDAS සම්වේල්-2019 වැඩ 6: අධික පොස්ට්ස් හා ලැක්කල් අධිකරණය Twitter වලින්.', 'so': 'MIDAS at SemEval-2019 Shaqada 6: Identification Offensive Posts and Targed Officer from Twitter', 'sv': 'MIDAS på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: Identifiera offensiva inlägg och riktade brott från Twitter', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 6: தொடர்பிலிருந்து குறிப்பிட்ட போஸ்டுகளை அடையாளம் மற்றும் குறிப்பிட்ட அலுவலகம்', 'ur': 'MIDAS ٹوئیٹر سے سیم Eval-2019 ٹاکس ۶ میں: اوفنسیف پوسٹ شناسایی اور تارکیٹ اوفنس', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifani 6: Twitterdan tashkilotni aniqlash', 'vi': 'MIDAS tại SemEvl-2009 Task 6: xác định mức tấn công cao và tấn công nhắm từ Twitter.', 'bg': 'Задача 6: Идентифициране на нападателни публикации и целенасочено нападение от Туитър', 'da': 'MIDAS på SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: Identificering af offensive indlæg og målrettet overtrædelse fra Twitter', 'nl': 'MIDAS op SemEval-2019 Taak 6: Identificeren van offensieve berichten en gerichte aanvallen van Twitter', 'hr': 'MIDAS na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 6: Identifikovanje neposlušnih postaja i ciljanog odbijanja iz Twitter-a', 'de': 'MIDAS bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 6: Offensive Beiträge und gezielte Offensive von Twitter identifizieren', 'id': 'MIDAS at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying Offensive Posts and Targeted Offense from Twitter', 'ko': 'MIDAS가SemEval-2019퀘스트6: 트위터에서 공격적인 게시물과 맞춤형 공격을 식별', 'fa': 'MIDAS در پایین Eval-2019 Task 6: Identifying Offensive Posts and Target Offense from Twitter', 'sw': 'MIDAS kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 6: Kutambua Posti Huru na Utawala wa Twita', 'af': 'MIDAS by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 6: Identifisering Offensive Posts en Teël Verspreiding van Twitter', 'tr': 'MIDAS at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying Offensive Posts and Targeted Offense from Twitter', 'sq': 'MIDAS në SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifikimi i postimeve ofensive dhe ofensive të synuara nga Twitter', 'am': 'ስራ 6:', 'az': "MIDAS'in SemEval-2019 G칬revi 6: N칬qsanl캼 Postalar캼 v톛 M칬c칲zl칲 Offense'i Twitter-d톛n tan캼ma", 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের ৬ মিডিয়াস: টুইটার থেকে অফিসিভ পোস্ট এবং টার্গেট অফিসেন্স পরিচয় করা', 'bs': 'MIDAS na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 6: identifikacija neposlušnih postaja i ciljanih otkaza iz Twitter-a', 'hy': 'MIDAS-ը, 2019 թվականի կիսագնդի 6-րդ հանձնարարությունում. Թվիթերի միջոցով հայտնաբերելով վնասավոր տեղադրություններ և նպատակային վնասավորություն', 'ca': 'MIDAS a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying Offensive Posts and Targeted Offense from Twitter', 'cs': 'MIDAS na SemEval-2019 Úkol 6: Identifikace ofenzivních příspěvků a cíleného útoku z Twitteru', 'et': 'MIDAS SemEval-2019 ülesanne 6: ründavate postituste ja sihipärase rüüteo tuvastamine Twitterist', 'fi': 'MIDAS SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 6: Hyökkäävien viestien ja kohdistettujen hyökkäysten tunnistaminen Twitteristä', 'jv': 'MDES nang seminval-2011 task 6: ID', 'he': 'MIDAS at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying Offensive Posts and Targeted Offense from Twitter', 'ha': 'Misc', 'sk': 'MIDAS na SemEval-2019 naloga 6: prepoznavanje napadalnih objav in ciljnih napadov s Twitterjem', 'bo': 'MIDAS at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying Offensive Posts and Targeted Offense from Twitter'}
{'en': 'In this paper we present our approach and the system description for Sub Task A and Sub Task B of SemEval 2019 Task 6 : Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media. Sub Task A involves identifying if a given tweet is offensive and Sub Task B involves detecting if an offensive tweet is targeted towards someone (group or an individual). Our models for Sub Task A is based on an ensemble of Convolutional Neural Network and Bidirectional LSTM, whereas for Sub Task B, we rely on a set of heuristics derived from the training data. We provide detailed analysis of the results obtained using the trained models. Our team ranked 5th out of 103 participants in Sub Task A, achieving a macro F1 score of 0.807, and ranked 8th out of 75 participants achieving a macro F1 of 0.695.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة نقدم نهجنا ووصف النظام للمهمة الفرعية أ والمهمة الفرعية ب من SemEval 2019 المهمة 6: تحديد وتصنيف اللغة الهجومية في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. تتضمن المهمة الفرعية أ تحديد ما إذا كانت تغريدة معينة مسيئة والمهمة الفرعية ب تتضمن اكتشاف ما إذا كانت تغريدة مسيئة تستهدف شخصًا ما (مجموعة أو فرد). تعتمد نماذجنا للمهمة الفرعية أ على مجموعة من الشبكة العصبية التلافيفية و LSTM ثنائية الاتجاه ، بينما بالنسبة للمهمة الفرعية ب ، نعتمد على مجموعة من الأساليب التجريبية المشتقة من بيانات التدريب. نقدم تحليلاً مفصلاً للنتائج التي تم الحصول عليها باستخدام النماذج المدربة. احتل فريقنا المرتبة الخامسة من بين 103 مشاركين في المهمة الفرعية أ ، وحققوا درجة ماكرو F1 بلغت 0.807 ، واحتلت المرتبة الثامنة من بين 75 مشاركًا وحققوا ماكرو F1 من 0.695.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons notre approche et la description du système pour la sous-tâche A et la sous-tâche B de la tâche 6 de SemEval 2019\xa0: Identifier et catégoriser le langage offensant dans les médias sociaux. La sous-tâche A consiste à identifier si un tweet donné est offensant et la sous-tâche B consiste à détecter si un tweet offensant vise quelqu'un (groupe ou individu). Nos modèles pour la sous-tâche A sont basés sur un ensemble de réseaux de neurones convolutifs et de LSTM bidirectionnel, tandis que pour la sous-tâche B, nous nous appuyons sur un ensemble d'heuristiques dérivées des données d'entraînement. Nous fournissons une analyse détaillée des résultats obtenus à l'aide des modèles formés. Notre équipe s'est classée 5e sur 103 participants dans la sous-tâche A, obtenant un score macro F1 de 0,807, et s'est classée 8e sur 75 participants avec une macro F1 de 0,695.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo apresentamos nossa abordagem e a descrição do sistema para a Sub Tarefa A e Sub Tarefa B do SemEval 2019 Tarefa 6: Identificando e Categorizando Linguagem Ofensiva em Mídias Sociais. A Subtarefa A envolve identificar se um determinado tweet é ofensivo e a Subtarefa B envolve detectar se um tweet ofensivo é direcionado a alguém (grupo ou indivíduo). Nossos modelos para a Subtarefa A são baseados em um conjunto de Rede Neural Convolucional e LSTM Bidirecional, enquanto para a Subtarefa B, contamos com um conjunto de heurísticas derivadas dos dados de treinamento. Fornecemos uma análise detalhada dos resultados obtidos usando os modelos treinados. Nossa equipe ficou em 5º entre 103 participantes na Subtarefa A, alcançando uma pontuação macro F1 de 0,807, e ficou em 8º lugar entre 75 participantes, alcançando uma macro F1 de 0,695.', 'es': 'En este artículo presentamos nuestro enfoque y la descripción del sistema para la Subtarea A y la Subtarea B de la Tarea 6 de SemEval 2019: Identificación y categorización del lenguaje ofensivo en las redes sociales. La subtarea A implica identificar si un tuit determinado es ofensivo y la subtarea B implica detectar si un tuit ofensivo está dirigido a alguien (grupo o individuo). Nuestros modelos para la subtarea A se basan en un conjunto de red neuronal convolucional y LSTM bidireccional, mientras que para la subtarea B, nos basamos en un conjunto de heurísticas derivadas de los datos de entrenamiento. Proporcionamos un análisis detallado de los resultados obtenidos utilizando los modelos entrenados. Nuestro equipo ocupó el quinto lugar de 103 participantes en la Subtarea A, alcanzando una puntuación macro de F1 de 0.807, y ocupó el octavo lugar de 75 participantes que lograron una macro F1 de 0.695.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2019 Task 6: Identifying and Categoryizing Offensive Language in Social MediaのサブタスクAとサブタスクBのアプローチとシステム説明を紹介します。サブタスクAは、特定のツイートが不快なものであるかどうかを特定することを含み、サブタスクBは、不快なツイートが誰か（グループまたは個人）を対象としているかどうかを検出することを含みます。サブタスクAのモデルは、畳み込みニューラルネットワークと双方向LSTMのアンサンブルに基づいていますが、サブタスクBでは、トレーニングデータから導出されたヒューリスティクスのセットに依存しています。訓練されたモデルを使用して得られた結果の詳細な分析を提供します。私たちのチームはサブタスクAの103人の参加者のうち5位にランクインし、マクロF 1スコアは0.807を達成し、75人の参加者のうち8位にランクインし、マクロF 1スコアは0.695を達成しました。', 'zh': '本文引SemEval 2019任6子职A与子职B之法,系统言之:识类社交媒体攻击性言。 子职 A 及知给定之推文有犯性,子职 B 及检犯推文某(组私)。 吾子之事 A 形于卷积神经网络与双向 LSTM 合,而于子务 B,吾赖于教数之启发式。 吾于用练模形得而详细分析之。 吾团队在子职A者103名参与者中排名第5位,得0.807宏观F1分数,排名第8位于75名参与者中,得0.695之宏观F1。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम अपने दृष्टिकोण और उप कार्य ए और उप कार्य बी के लिए सिस्टम विवरण प्रस्तुत करते हैं सेमेवल 2019 टास्क 6: सोशल मीडिया में आपत्तिजनक भाषा की पहचान और वर्गीकरण। उप कार्य ए में यह पहचानना शामिल है कि क्या कोई दिया गया ट्वीट आक्रामक है और उप कार्य बी में यह पता लगाना शामिल है कि क्या कोई आक्रामक ट्वीट किसी (समूह या किसी व्यक्ति) की ओर लक्षित है। उप कार्य ए के लिए हमारे मॉडल Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क और द्विदिश LSTM के एक पहनावे पर आधारित है, जबकि उप कार्य बी के लिए, हम प्रशिक्षण डेटा से व्युत्पन्न heuristics के एक सेट पर भरोसा करते हैं। हम प्रशिक्षित मॉडल का उपयोग करके प्राप्त परिणामों का विस्तृत विश्लेषण प्रदान करते हैं। हमारी टीम उप कार्य ए में 103 प्रतिभागियों में से 5 वें स्थान पर है, 0.807 का मैक्रो एफ 1 स्कोर प्राप्त कर रही है, और 0.695 के मैक्रो एफ 1 को प्राप्त करने वाले 75 प्रतिभागियों में से 8 वें स्थान पर है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем наш подход и описание системы для подзадачи A и подзадачи B задачи 6 SemEval 2019: Выявление и категоризация оскорбительного языка в социальных сетях. Подзадача A включает в себя определение того, является ли данный твит оскорбительным, а подзадача B включает в себя обнаружение того, нацелен ли оскорбительный твит на кого-либо (группу или отдельного человека). Наши модели для подзадачи A основаны на ансамбле сверточной нейронной сети и двунаправленной LSTM, тогда как для подзадачи B мы полагаемся на набор эвристики, полученный из обучающих данных. Мы предоставляем подробный анализ результатов, полученных с использованием обученных моделей. Наша команда заняла 5-е место из 103 участников в подзадаче A, получив макрос F1 0,807, и 8-е место из 75 участников, получив макрос F1 0,695.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo cuirimid i láthair ár gcur chuige agus an cur síos ar an gcóras le haghaidh Fothasc A agus Fothasc B de Thasc 6 SemEval 2019: Teanga Ionsaitheach a Aithint agus a Chatagóiriú sna Meáin Shóisialta. Is éard atá i gceist le Fothasc A a aithint an bhfuil tweet tugtha maslach agus baineann Fothasc B le fáil amach an bhfuil tweet maslach dírithe ar dhuine (grúpa nó duine aonair). Tá ár múnlaí d’fhothasc A bunaithe ar ghrúpa de Líonra Néarach Conbhlóideach agus LSTM Déthreo, ach i gcás Fothasc B, braithimid ar thacar heuristics a thagann ó na sonraí oiliúna. Cuirimid anailís mhionsonraithe ar fáil ar na torthaí a fuarthas ag baint úsáide as na samhlacha oilte. Chuir ár bhfoireann sa 5ú háit as 103 rannpháirtí i bhFo Thasc A, ag baint amach scór macrai F1 de 0.807, agus san 8ú háit as 75 rannpháirtí a ghnóthaigh macra F1 de 0.695.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban bemutatjuk a SemEval 2019 6. feladat A. és B. feladatának megközelítését és rendszerleírását: Offenzív nyelv azonosítása és kategorizálása a közösségi médiában. Az A. alfeladat azt jelenti, hogy egy adott tweet sértő-e, a B. alfeladat pedig azt jelenti, hogy észreveszi-e, hogy egy sértő tweet valaki (csoport vagy egy személy) felé irányul-e. Az A. alfeladat modelljei a Konvolúciós Neurális Hálózat és a Kétirányú LSTM együttesen alapulnak, míg a B. alfeladat esetében a képzési adatokból származó heurisztikákra támaszkodunk. A képzett modellek segítségével kapott eredmények részletes elemzését nyújtjuk. Csapatunk az A. alfeladat 103 résztvevője közül az 5. helyezést érte el, elérte a makro F1 pontszámot 0,807, a 75 résztvevő közül pedig a 8. helyezést, elérve a makro F1 0,695 pontot.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζουμε την προσέγγισή μας και την περιγραφή του συστήματος για την Υποεργασία Α και την Υποεργασία Β της εργασίας 6: Αναγνώριση και κατηγοριοποίηση της προσβλητικής γλώσσας στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Η δευτερεύουσα εργασία Α περιλαμβάνει τον προσδιορισμό εάν ένα συγκεκριμένο tweet είναι προσβλητικό και η δευτερεύουσα εργασία Β περιλαμβάνει την ανίχνευση εάν ένα προσβλητικό tweet στοχεύει σε κάποιον (ομάδα ή άτομο). Τα υποδείγματά μας για την Υποεργασία Α βασίζονται σε ένα σύνολο από Σύλληπτο Νευρικό Δίκτυο και Δικατεύθυνση ενώ για την Υποεργασία Β βασιζόμαστε σε ένα σύνολο heuristics που προέρχονται από τα δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης. Παρέχουμε λεπτομερή ανάλυση των αποτελεσμάτων που λαμβάνονται χρησιμοποιώντας τα εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα. Η ομάδα μας κατατάχθηκε 5η στους 103 συμμετέχοντες στην Υποεργασία Α, πετυχαίνοντας μακροβαθμολογία F1 0.807 και 8η στους 75 συμμετέχοντες πετυχαίνοντας μακροεντολή F1 0.695.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ჩვენი წარმოდგენა და სისტემის გამოსახულება სამუშაო დავალების A და სამუშაო დავალების B სამუშაო დავალება 2019 სამუშაო დავალება 6: სამუშაო მედიაში უფრო დავა A-ი სამუშაო დავალება შეიძლება იდენტიფიკაცია, თუ მინიშნავული სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო B სამუშაო სამუშაო დააკვირ ჩვენი მოდელები A სამუშაო სამუშაო დავალებისთვის კონტურონალური ნეიროლური ქსელის და ორდირექციონალური LSTM-ის დაბაზიან, მაგრამ სამუშაო დავალებისთვის B სამუშაო დავალებით, ჩვენ დავ ჩვენ განვითარებით განსაკუთრებული მოდელების განსაკუთრებული ანალიზია. ჩვენი ჯგუფი გადაწყვეტილია 103-დან დაწყვეტილი A სამუშაო დავალებელი, რომელიც მაკრო F1 წერტილის 0,807 წერტილია და დაწყვეტილია 8-დან 75-დან დაწყვეტილი, რომელიც 0,695 წერტილის მაკრო F1 წერტილია.', 'it': "In questo articolo presentiamo il nostro approccio e la descrizione del sistema per Sub Task A e Sub Task B di SemEval 2019 Task 6: Identificare e Categorizzare il linguaggio offensivo nei social media. La Sub Task A consiste nell'identificare se un dato tweet è offensivo e la Sub Task B consiste nel rilevare se un tweet offensivo è rivolto a qualcuno (gruppo o individuo). I nostri modelli per la Sub Task A si basano su un insieme di Rete Neurale Convoluzionale e LSTM bidirezionale, mentre per la Sub Task B, ci affidiamo a un insieme di euristiche derivate dai dati di allenamento. Forniamo analisi dettagliate dei risultati ottenuti utilizzando i modelli addestrati. Il nostro team si è classificato 5° su 103 partecipanti al Sub Task A, ottenendo un punteggio macro F1 di 0,807, e 8° su 75 partecipanti ottenendo una macro F1 di 0,695.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз біздің бағыттамыз және жүйелік тапсырманың A және B ішкі тапсырмасының бағытты тапсырмасының 6- тапсырмасының бағытты тапсырмасының сипаттамасын көрсетедік: Бағытты меди A тапсырмасының ішкі тапсырмасы келтірілген тапсырманы белгілеу және B- тапсырмасының ішкі тапсырмасының ішкі тапсырмасы біреуіне (топ немесе бір жеке) нақты тапсырмасын анықтау үші Біздің A ішкі тапсырманың үлгілеріміз Convolutional Neural Network және Екі бағытты LSTM символдарына негізделген, бірақ B ішкі тапсырма үшін біз оқыту деректерінен шығарылған heuristics жиынына сенеміз. Біз оқылған үлгілерді қолданатын нәтижелердің егжей- тегжейін анализ береміз. Біздің командамыз A тапсырмасындағы 103-ден 5-ші қатысушыларды, 0,807 макро F1 деңгейіне жеткізіп, 75-ден 8-ші қатысушыларды 0,695 макро F1 деңгейіне жеткізеді.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome savo požiūrį ir sistemos aprašymą, skirtą 2019 m. pusmečio vertinimo A ir B dalims, 6 užduotis: pažeidžiamos kalbos nustatymas ir klasifikavimas socialinėje žiniasklaidoje. A poskirsnyje nurodoma, ar tam tikras tweetas yra įžeidžiantis, o B poskirsnyje nurodoma, ar įžeidžiantis tweetas skirtas kažkam (grupei ar asmeniui). Mūsų modeliai „A“ pakopos uždaviniui grindžiami konvoliucinio neurologinio tinklo ir dvikryptinio LSTM komplektu, o „B“ pakopos uždaviniui mes remiamės heuristika, gauta iš mokymo duomenų. Pateikiame išsamią rezultatų, gautų naudojant apmokytus modelius, analizę. Mūsų komanda buvo 5-oji iš 103 A subužduoties dalyvių, pasiekusi 0,807 makrof1 rezultatą, o 8-oji iš 75 dalyvių – 0,695 makrof1 rezultatą.', 'mk': 'Во овој документ го претставуваме нашиот пристап и системскиот опис за Sub Task A и Sub Task B од SemEval 2019 Task 6: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media. Sub Task A involves identifying if a given tweet is offensive and Sub Task B involves detecting if an offensive tweet is targeted towards someone (group or an individual).  Нашите модели за субзадача А се базираат на ансембл на конволуционална неврална мрежа и дводрекционална ЛСТМ, додека за субзадача Б, ние се потпираме на сет хеористики изведени од податоците за обука. Ние обезбедуваме детална анализа на резултатите постигнати користејќи ги обучените модели. Нашиот тим се рангираше на петтото место од 103 учесници во субзадачата А, достигнувајќи макро Ф1 оценка од 0,807 и на осмиот место од 75 учесници достигнувајќи макро Ф1 од 0,695.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan pendekatan kami dan keterangan sistem untuk Sub Task A dan Sub Task B SemEval 2019 Task 6: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media. Sub Tugas A melibatkan mengenalpasti jika tweet yang diberikan adalah menyerang dan Sub Tugas B melibatkan mengesan jika tweet menyerang ditujukan kepada seseorang (kumpulan atau individu). Model kami untuk Sub Task A adalah berdasarkan kumpulan Rangkaian Neural Convolutional dan LSTM Dua Arah, sementara untuk Sub Task B, kami bergantung pada set heuristik yang dipilih dari data latihan. Kami menyediakan analisis terperinci keputusan yang diperoleh menggunakan model terlatih. Pasukan kami ditangkap ke-5 daripada 103 peserta dalam Sub Task A, mencapai skor makro F1 0.807, dan ditangkap ke-8 daripada 75 peserta mencapai makro F1 0.695.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സോഷ്യല്\u200d മെഡിയയിലെ സബ് ടാസ്ക് എ വിന്റെയും സബ് ടാസ്ക് ബിന്റെയും സിസ്റ്റം വിശദീകരണവും കാണിക്കുന്നു. കൊടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ടാസ്ക് എ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നുവോ എന്ന് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതില്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുന്നു. ഒരു ട്രൂട്ട് അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ഒരു വ്യക് ഞങ്ങളുടെ സുബ് ടാസ്ക് എ-ന്റെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്കും ബൈഡഡിയലില്\u200d എല്\u200dസ്റ്റിഎമിന്റെയും അടിസ്ഥാനത്താണ്. സുബ് ടാസ്ക് B പരിശീലന മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ലഭിച്ച ഫലങ്ങളുടെ വിശദീകരണവും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു. ഞങ്ങളുടെ ടീമില്\u200d 103 ല്\u200d പങ്കാളികളായ പങ്കാളികള്\u200d 5 ല്\u200d നിന്ന് നേടിയിട്ടുണ്ട്, 0. 807 ല്\u200d മാക്രോ എഫ്1 സ്കോര്\u200d പ്രാപിക്കുന്നു. 75 ല്\u200d പങ്കാളികള്\u200d 0. 695 ല്\u200d ഒരു', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument nippreżentaw l-approċċ tagħna u d-deskrizzjoni tas-sistema għas-Sottokompitu A u s-Sottokompitu B tas-SemEval 2019 Kompitu 6: Identifikazzjoni u Kategorizzazzjoni tal-Lingwa Offensiva fil-Midja Soċjali. Sub-Task A jinvolvi l-identifikazzjoni ta’ jekk tweet partikolari huwiex offensiv u Sub-Task B jinvolvi l-identifikazzjoni ta’ jekk tweet offensiv huwiex immirat lejn xi ħadd (grupp jew individwu). Il-mudelli tagħna għas-Sub-Task A huma bbażati fuq ensemble ta’ Netwerk Newrali Konveoluzzjonali u LSTM Bidirezzjonali, filwaqt li għas-Sub-Task B, nistrieħu fuq sett ta’ ġewristiċi derivati mid-dejta tat-taħriġ. We provide detailed analysis of the results obtained using the trained models.  It-tim tagħna kklassifika l-ħames minn 103 parteċipant fis-Sottokompitu A, li kisbu punteġġ makro F1 ta’ 0.807, u kklassifika t-tmien minn 75 parteċipant li kisbu makro F1 ta’ 0.695.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид өөрсдийнхөө ойлголт болон системийн тодорхойлолтыг нийгмийн мэдээллийн суб-Task A болон Sub Task B-ийн талаар тайлбарлаж байна. Sub Task A нь хэн нэгэн (бүлэг, хэн нэгэн) рүү зориулсан tweet гэдгийг олж мэдэх хэрэгтэй. Бидний Sub Task A-ын загвар нь Convolutional Neural Network болон Bidirectional LSTM-ын загвар дээр суурилсан байна. Гэхдээ Sub Task B-ийн загвар нь бид сургалтын өгөгдлийн үндсэн хэдэн хэмжээний хюристик хэмжээнд үндсэн. Бид сургалтын загваруудыг ашиглан гаргасан үр дүнг нарийвчлан анализ өгдөг. Бидний баг A-ын суб-Task-д 103 оролцогчдын 5-р ангид, 0.807-ын макро F1 оноо хүртсэн ба 75 оролцогчдын 8-р ангид 0.695-ын макро F1-г хүртсэн.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy nasze podejście i opis systemu dla podzadań A i podzadań B SemEval 2019 Zadanie 6: Identyfikowanie i kategorizowanie języka ofensywnego w mediach społecznościowych. Podzadanie A polega na identyfikacji, czy dany tweet jest obraźliwy, a podzadanie B polega na wykrywaniu, czy obraźliwy tweet jest skierowany do kogoś (grupy lub osoby indywidualnej). Nasze modele podzadania A opierają się na zespole Konwolucyjnej Sieci Neuralnej i Dwukierunkowej LSTM, natomiast dla podzadania B opieramy się na zestawie heurystyk wywodzących się z danych treningowych. Zapewniamy szczegółową analizę wyników uzyskanych za pomocą przeszkolonych modeli. Nasz zespół zajął piąty z 103 uczestników Sub Task A, osiągając makro F1 wyniki 0,807, a ósmy z 75 uczestników osiągających makro F1 0,695.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare prezentăm abordarea noastră și descrierea sistemului pentru Sub Task A și Sub Task B din SemEval 2019 Task 6: Identificarea și Categorizarea Limbajului Ofensiv în Social Media. Sub Task A implică identificarea dacă un anumit tweet este ofensator, iar Sub Task B implică detectarea dacă un tweet ofensator este vizat către cineva (grup sau persoană). Modelele noastre pentru Sub Task A se bazează pe un ansamblu de Rețele Neurale Convoluționale și LSTM bidirecționale, în timp ce pentru Sub Task B, ne bazăm pe un set de euristice derivate din datele de instruire. Oferim o analiză detaliată a rezultatelor obținute folosind modelele instruite. Echipa noastră s-a clasat pe locul 5 din 103 participanți la SubTask A, obținând un scor macro F1 de 0.807 și pe locul 8 din 75 participanți obținând un macro F1 de 0.695.', 'no': 'I denne papiret viser vi tilnærminga våre og systembeskrivelsen for Sub-oppgåve A og Sub-oppgåve B av semiEval 2019 Oppgåve 6: Identifikasjon og kategorisering av Offensive Språk i sosiale mediar. Sub-oppgåve A involverer identifisering om ein gitt tweet er offensiv og Sub-oppgåve B involverer oppdaging om ein offensiv tweet er målt mot nokon (gruppe eller ein individuell). Våre modeller for Sub Task A er basert på ein ensemble av Convolutional Neural Network og Bidirectional LSTM, mens for Sub Task B, vert vi tilbakekalla på eit sett heuristics derivert frå øvingsdata. Vi gjev detaljert analyse av resultatene som er fått med dei trengte modelane. Gruppen vårt rangerte femte av 103 deltakarar i Sub Task A, som oppnår eit makro F1- poeng med 0,807, og rankerte 8. av 75 deltakarar som oppnår ein makro F1 av 0,695.', 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaynu ku soo qoraynaa qaabilaada iyo tilmaamaha nidaamka shaqada A iyo Sub-shaqo B ee SemEval 2019 shaqo 6: Identification and categorizing Offensive Luqad ku qoran macluumaadka bulshada. Shaqo A waxaa ku qoran in la caddeeyo in twiti la siiyo uu yahay mid dhib ah iyo in uu ka baahan yahay shaqo hoose-shaqo B, in looga jeedo tweeti xadgudub ah (koox ama qof). Tusaale'yadayada sub-shaqo A waxay ku saleysan tahay sameynta shabakadda Neural and Bidirectional LSTM, laakiin xagga Sub-Task B, waxaynu isku hallaynaa koox heuristic ah oo ka soo baxay macluumaadka waxbarashada. Analyo gaar ah ayaannu ka siinaynaa midowyada tababarida. Kooxdayagii waxaa ka mid ahaa 5aad oo ka mid ah dadka ka qayb galay Sub-Task A, waxayna gaadheen macro F1 koox 0.807 oo ka mid ah 75aad oo ka mid ah dadka ka qayb galay macro F1 oo ka mid ah 0.695.", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi vårt tillvägagångssätt och systembeskrivning för Sub Task A och Sub Task B i SemEval 2019 Task 6: Identifiera och kategorisera offensivt språk i sociala medier. Underuppgift A innebär att identifiera om en viss tweet är stötande och Underuppgift B innebär att upptäcka om en offensiv tweet riktas mot någon (grupp eller individ). Våra modeller för Sub Task A bygger på en ensemble av Convolutional Neural Network och Bidirectional LSTM, medan vi för Sub Task B förlitar oss på en uppsättning heuristik som härrör från träningsdata. Vi ger detaljerad analys av de resultat som erhållits med hjälp av de utbildade modellerna. Vårt team rankade sig 5:e av 103 deltagare i Sub Task A, med en makro F1 poäng på 0,807, och rankade 8:e av 75 deltagare med en makro F1 på 0,695.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں اپنے طریقہ اور سیسٹم کا سپ ٹاکس A اور سپ ٹاکس B کے لئے نشان دیتے ہیں 2019 ٹاکس 6: سوسیل میڈیا میں نافسی زبان شناسایی اور کاٹیوزی کرنا۔ Sub Task A involves identifying if a given tweet is offensive and Sub Task B involves detecting if an offensive tweet is targeted to someone (group or an individual). ہمارے مدلکوں A کے لئے کانلوریشن نیورال نیٹورک اور دودئیرسیٹنی LSTM کی آزمائش پر بنی جاتی ہیں، حالانکہ Sub Task B کے لئے ہم ترکینس ڈیٹ سے آزاد ہونے والی ایک مجموعہ پر بھروسہ رکھتے ہیں. ہم تدریس کی مدل کے مطابق حاصل کئے ہوئے نتائج کا تفصیل دیتے ہیں۔ ہماری تیم نے ساب ٹاکس ا میں 103 مشرکین میں سے پانچویں مرتبہ کیا تھا، 0.807 کے مکرو F1 اسکو پہنچا رہا تھا، اور 75 مشرکین میں سے ۸م مرتبہ تھا کہ 0.695 کے مکرو F1 کو پہنچا رہا تھا.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் எங்கள் வழிமுறையையும் கணினி விவரமையையும் காண்பிக்கிறோம் செம்Eval 2019 பணியின் உப பணி B துணை பணி 6: சமூக ஊடகத்தில் தொடர் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட ஒரு துவக்க செயல் A குறிப்பிட்ட Tweet আকிழைப்பாக இருக்கிறதா என்று அறியும் மற்றும் துணை பணி B ஒரு செயல் குறிப்பிடும் ஒரு செ துணை பணி A க்கான மாதிரிகள் ஒரு தொகுதியான நெருக்கல் வலைப்பின்னல் மற்றும் இருதிசையாக LSTM மூலம் அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது, ஆனால் துணை பணி B க்கு, பயிற்சி தகவல்  நாம் பயிற்சி மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்தி கிடைக்கப்பட்ட முடிவுகளை விவரமான ஆய்வு வழங்குகிறோம். எங்கள் குழு 103 ல் பங்குக்காரர்கள் துணை பணி A ல் 5வது நிறைவேற்றப்பட்டது, 0. 807ல் மேக்ரோ F1 புள்ளியை அடைந்தது, 75 ல் 8வது பங்குக்காரர்கள் 0. 695 ல் மேக்ரோ F1 பெ', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo naš pristup i sistemski opis pod zadatak A i pod zadatak B poluvale 2019. zadatak 6: identifikacija i kategorizacija neposlušnog jezika u socijalnim medijima. Sub Task A uključuje identifikaciju da li je određeni tweet ofanzivan, a Sub Task B uključuje otkrivanje da li je ofanzivna tweet ciljana nekom (grupom ili individualnom). Naši modeli pod zadatkom A zasnovani su na kompleksu konvolucionalne neuronske mreže i dvosmjerne LSTM, dok se za pod zadatak B oslanjamo na kompleks heuristike iz podataka obuke. Mi pružamo detaljnu analizu rezultata koji su dobili koristeći obučene modele. Naš tim je bio 5. od 103 učesnika pod zadatkom A, ostvario makro F1 rezultat od 0,807, i rankirao 8. od 75 učesnika koji je ostvario makro F1 od 0,695.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ පද්ධතිය විස්තර කරන්නේ සාමාජික මිඩියාවේ සාමාජික කාර්ය A සහ සාමාජික කාර්ය B වල සාමාජික කාර්ය 6 Sub Job A සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා කියලා තියෙන්නේ ට්විට් එක අපරාධක වෙලා නම් සම්බන්ධ වැඩක් B සම්බන්ධ වැඩක් සම්බන්ධ වෙලා තියෙනවා කි අපේ මොඩල් A සබ් වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් සබ් වැඩක් සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය සහ බිදිරික්ෂිත LSTM සඳහා ආධාරණය කරනවා, ඒත් Sub වැඩක් B සඳහා අපි ප්\u200dරශ අපි විස්තර විශ්ලේෂණයක් දෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200d අපේ කණ්ඩායම් එක්ක සබ් ටාස්ක් A වලින් පස්සෙන් පස්සෙන් පස්සෙන් පස්සෙන් පස්සෙන් ඉන්නවා, මැක්රෝ F1 ස්කෝර් 0.807 වලින් ලැබුණා, සහ අංශි', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda biz qanday qilamiz va SemEval 2019 Vazifaning 6 (SemEval 2019'ning Sub-Vazifa B) va Xizmatning 6: Social Media'da shaxsiy tilni aniqlash va kategoriyat qilish. Ushbu vazifa A bilan birga xabar qo'shilgan Twitterni aniqlashga ega, Vazifa B tub vazifa haqida bog'liqchi xabar (guruhga yoki shaxsiy) qoʻllanmaganligini aniqlashga ega bo'ladi. Our models for Sub Task A is based on an ensemble of Convolutional Neural Network and Bidirectional LSTM, whereas for Sub Task B, we rely on a set of heuristics derived from the training data.  Biz taʼminlovchi modellar yordamida olingan natijalarni taʼrif bajarilamiz. Bizning guruhimizning 103 ish vazifasi Adagi 5 qismidan boshlab 0. 807dan makro F1 scorini olishga ega bo'ladi va 0. 695'ning 0.695 makro F1 (Macro F1) ga erishga 75 ta qismidan 8 qismini boshlaydi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi giới thiệu phương pháp và mô tả hệ thống cho Sub Task A và Sub Task B của SemEvl 209 Task 6: Nhận diện và phân loại Ngôn ngữ Hành động trên phương tiện xã hội. Sub Task A bao gồm việc xác định nếu một tweet được tấn công và Sub Task B bao gồm việc tìm hiểu nếu một tweet tấn công được nhắm vào ai đó (nhóm hay cá nhân). Mẫu của chúng tôi cho Sub Task A dựa trên một kết hợp của kênh thần kinh xuyên suốt và LSD hai hướng, trong khi với Sub Task B, chúng tôi dựa vào một tập hợp thần kinh bắt nguồn từ dữ liệu đào tạo. Chúng tôi cung cấp phân tích chi tiết kết quả bằng các mẫu được đào tạo. Đội của chúng tôi xếp hạng thứ năm trên 103 trong Sub Task A, đạt được một số siêu hạng F1 của 0.807, và đứng thứ 8th khỏi 75 là những người tham dự với một macro F1 of 0.695.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме нашия подход и системното описание на Подзадача А и Подзадача Б на Задача 6: Идентифициране и категоризиране на офанзивен език в социалните медии. Подзадача А включва идентифициране дали даден туит е обиден, а Подзадача Б включва откриване дали даден туит е насочен към някого (група или физическо лице). Нашите модели за подзадача А се основават на ансамбъл от конвелуционна неврална мрежа и двупосочна ЛСМ, докато за подзадача Б разчитаме на набор от евристика, получена от данните за обучение. Предоставяме подробен анализ на получените резултати с помощта на обучените модели. Екипът ни се класира на 5-о място от 103 участници в подзадача А, постигайки макро оценка от 0.807 и се класира на 8-о място от 75 участници, постигайки макро Формула 1 от 0.695.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we onze aanpak en de systeembeschrijving voor Subtaak A en Subtaak B van SemEval 2019 Taak 6: Identificeren en categoriseren van Offensieve Taal in Social Media. Subtaak A omvat het identificeren of een bepaalde tweet aanstootgevend is en Subtaak B omvat het detecteren of een aanstootgevende tweet gericht is op iemand (groep of individu). Onze modellen voor Subtaak A zijn gebaseerd op een ensemble van Convolutional Neural Network en Bidirectioneel LSTM, terwijl we voor Subtaak B vertrouwen op een reeks heuristieken die zijn afgeleid van de trainingsgegevens. Wij bieden gedetailleerde analyse van de resultaten verkregen met behulp van de getrainde modellen. Ons team werd 5e van 103 deelnemers in Sub Task A, behaalde een macro F1 score van 0.807, en achtste van 75 deelnemers behaalde een macro F1 van 0.695.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi vores tilgang og systembeskrivelse for Underopgave A og Underopgave B i SemEval 2019 Opgave 6: Identificering og Kategorisering af Offensivt Sprog i Sociale Medier. Underopgave A indebærer at identificere, om en given tweet er stødende, og Underopgave B indebærer at registrere, om en offensiv tweet er målrettet mod nogen (gruppe eller en person). Vores modeller for Sub Task A er baseret på et ensemble af Convolutional Neural Network og Bidirectional LSTM, mens vi for Sub Task B er afhængige af et sæt heuristik afledt af træningsdata. Vi leverer detaljeret analyse af de resultater, der opnås ved hjælp af de uddannede modeller. Vores team rangerede 5. ud af 103 deltagere i Sub Task A, opnåede en makro F1 score på 0,807, og rangerede 8. ud af 75 deltagere opnåede en makro F1 på 0,695.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir unseren Ansatz und die Systembeschreibung für Teilaufgabe A und Teilaufgabe B von SemEval 2019 Task 6: Identifizieren und Kategorisieren von Offensivsprache in Social Media vor. Unteraufgabe A beinhaltet die Identifizierung, ob ein bestimmter Tweet beleidigend ist und Unteraufgabe B beinhaltet die Erkennung, ob ein offensiver Tweet auf jemanden (Gruppe oder Einzelperson) gerichtet ist. Unsere Modelle für Teilaufgabe A basieren auf einem Ensemble aus Convolutional Neural Network und Bidirektional LSTM, während wir für Teilaufgabe B eine Reihe von Heuristiken verwenden, die aus den Trainingsdaten abgeleitet werden. Wir bieten eine detaillierte Analyse der mit den trainierten Modellen erzielten Ergebnisse. Unser Team rangierte fünfter von 103 Teilnehmern in Sub Task A, erreichte eine Makro F1 Punktzahl von 0.807 und achtster von 75 Teilnehmern mit einem Makro F1 von 0.695.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo naš pristup i opis sustava pod zadatak A i pod zadatak B polovične ocjene 2019. zadatak 6: identifikacija i kategorizacija neposlušnog jezika u socijalnim medijima. Pod zadatak A uključuje identifikaciju ako je određena tweet ofanzivna i pod zadatak B uključuje otkrivanje ako je napadajući tweet ciljan na nekoga (grupa ili pojedinca). Naši modeli pod zadatkom A zasnovani su na kompleksu konvolucionalne neuronske mreže i dvosmjerne LSTM, dok se za pod zadatak B oslanjamo na kompleks heuristike iz podataka obuke. Mi pružamo detaljnu analizu rezultata koji su dobili koristeći obučene modele. Naš tim je bio 5. od 103 učesnika podzadatka A, ostvario makro F1 rezultat od 0,807, i rankirao 8. od 75 učesnika koji postignu makro F1 od 0,695.', 'id': 'In this paper we present our approach and the system description for Sub Task A and Sub Task B of SemEval 2019 Task 6: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media.  Sub Task A melibatkan mengidentifikasi apakah sebuah tweet tertentu adalah offensive dan Sub Task B melibatkan mendeteksi apakah sebuah tweet offensive ditujukan kepada seseorang (kelompok atau individu). Model kami untuk Sub Task A berdasarkan sebuah ensemble dari Convolutional Neural Network dan Bidirectional LSTM, sementara untuk Sub Task B, kami bergantung pada set heuristik yang dipakai dari data latihan. We provide detailed analysis of the results obtained using the trained models.  Tim kami menandai ke-5 dari 103 peserta dalam Sub Task A, mencapai skor makro F1 0,807, dan menandai ke-8 dari 75 peserta mencapai makro F1 0,695.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval 2019 퀘스트 6: 소셜 미디어에서의 공격적인 언어를 식별하고 분류하는 하위 퀘스트 A와 하위 퀘스트 B의 방법과 시스템 설명을 소개한다.하위 임무 A는 주어진 트윗에 공격성이 있는지 식별하고, 하위 임무 B는 공격적인 트윗이 누군가(단체 또는 개인)를 겨냥했는지 탐지하는 것과 관련된다.하위 작업 A에 대해 우리의 모델은 권적 신경 네트워크와 양방향 LSTM의 통합을 바탕으로 하고 하위 작업 B에 대해 우리는 훈련 데이터에서 도출된 계발식 알고리즘에 의존한다.우리는 훈련 모델을 사용하여 얻은 결과에 대한 상세한 분석을 제공했다.우리 팀은 서브퀘스트 A의 103명 참가자 중 5위로 0.807의 거시F1 성적을 거두었고 75명의 참가자 중 8위로 0.695의 거시F1 성적을 거두었다.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii tunaonyesha mbinu yetu na maelezo ya mfumo wa Kazi Kuu A na Kazi B ya Subira ya SemEval 2019: Kutambua na Kugawanya Lugha Huli katika Vyombo vya habari vya kijamii. Kazi hiyo A inahusisha kutambua kama twiti iliyotolewa ni ya kudhalilisha na kazi ya Sub-Task B inahusisha kugundua kama twiti ya mashambulizi inalengwa dhidi ya mtu (kundi au mtu binafsi). Mifano yetu ya Kazi Kuu A inategemea kwenye mfululizo wa Mtandao wa Neurali na LSTM wa moja kwa moja, wakati kwa ajili ya Kazi Kuu B, tunategemea mfululizo wa takwimu za mafunzo. Tunatoa uchambuzi wa kina wa matokeo yaliyopata kwa kutumia mifano ya mafunzo. Timu yetu ilikuwa na rangi ya 5 kati ya washiriki 103 katika kazi ya Kusini mwa Jangwa la Taifa A, ikifikia score ya F1 yenye 0.807, na ilipata kiwango cha 8 kati ya 75 cha washiriki kufikia kiwango cha F1 cha 0.695.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما دستور و توضیح سیستم برای عملیات زیر A و زیر عملیات B از نیمه سال 2019 را نشان می دهیم: شناسایی و تقسیم زبان زیادی در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی. عملیات زیر A شامل شناسایی است که آیا توئیت داده شده نافرمانی است و عملیات زیر B شامل شناسایی است که آیا توئیت نافرمانی بر کسی هدف یافته شود (گروه یا یک فرد). مدل\u200cهای ما برای عملیات زیر A بر اساس یک شبکه عصبی و LSTM معمولی است، در حالی که برای عملیات زیر B، ما بر یک مجموعه حوریستیک از داده\u200cهای آموزش استفاده می\u200cکنیم. ما تحلیل جزئیات از نتیجه\u200cهایی که با استفاده از مدل\u200cهای آموزش یافته\u200cاند را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. تیم ما پنجمین از 103 شرکت\u200cکننده\u200cای در Sub Task A درجه گرفته بود، به مقدار مکرو F1 از 0.807 درجه رسید، و ۸م از ۷۵ شرکت\u200cکننده به مقدار مکرو F1 از 0.695 درجه رسید.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda biziň yaklaşymyzy we sistemimizi Sub Task A we Sub Task B of SemEval 2019 Görevi 6: Soýdaly Maglumatlarda Taýýarlamak we Toparlama Dilini Tarap edýäris Sub Task A munuň berilen tweet howpsyz we Sub Task B munuň beýleki tweet bir adama (grup ýa-da bir adama) maksady berilip netijesi tapylmagy mejbur edýär. Sub Task A üçin modellerimiz bolan Eýwandal Nural Network we Bidirectional LSTM sebäbi döredildi, we Sub Task B üçin, okuwçy maglumatlardan netijeli bir heuristiklere ynanýarlar. Biz eğlenen nusgalary ulanyp alan netijelerin detayly analyzasyny bererik. Biziň toparymyz Sub Task A-nyň 5-nji sany 103-nji işgäri bardyr, 0.807 sany makro F1 sany tapdyr we 75-nji tarapyndan 8-nji sany makro F1 we 0.695 sany tapdyr.', 'af': "In hierdie papier voorsien ons toegang en die stelsel beskrywing vir Sub-Taak A en Sub-Taak B van SemEval 2019 Taak 6: Identifikasie en Kategoriseering Offensive Taal in Sosiale Media. Sub-taak A involves identifying as 'n gegewe tweet is offensive en Sub-taak B involves detecting of 'n offensive tweet is doel teen iemand (groep of 'n individuele). Ons modele vir Sub Task A is gebaseer op 'n ensemble van Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerk en Bidireksionale LSTM, terwyl vir Sub Task B, ons vertrou op 'n stel heuristics afgeleide van die onderwerp data. Ons verskaf gedetale analisie van die resultate wat ontvang word deur die opgelei modele te gebruik. Ons span het 5de van 103 deelnimmers in Sub Task A rangeer, met 'n makro F1 telling van 0,807, en rankeer 8de van 75 deelnimmers tot 'n makro F1 van 0,695.", 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ የስራ አና የስራ B እና የስራ ሥራ 6: ማኅበራዊ አውታር ቋንቋን የሚያሳውቅ እና በተለያየ ቋንቋን እና መፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ Sub Task A የተሰጠ Tweet አሰናክሎ እንደ ሆነ እና የስራ B ጉዳይ አሰናፊ ትዊተር ወደ ሰው (ጉዳዩ ወይም አንድ ሰው) የተመሳሳይ እንደሆነ ማረጋገጥ ያስችላል፡፡ የደብዳቤ ስራ አ ሞዴላዎቻችን የኮንፕሎጂ ኔural Network እና Bidirectional LSTM በመሠረት ላይ ነው፡፡ እና ለSub ስራ B እና ከትምህርት ዳታዎች የተገኘውን የኦሪስቲክ ክፍል ታምነናል፡፡ የተጠቃሚ ምሳሌዎችን በመጠቀም የተገኘውን የፍሬዎቹን ማስታወቂያ እናደርጋለን፡፡ Our team ranked 5th out of 103 participants in Sub Task A, achieving a macro F1 score of 0.807, and ranked 8th out of 75 participants achieving a macro F1 of 0.695.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër ne paraqesim qasjen tonë dhe përshkrimin e sistemit për Sub Task A dhe Sub Task B të SemEval 2019 Task 6: Identifikimi dhe kategorizimi i gjuhës ofensive në media sociale. Sub Task A përfshin identifikimin nëse një tweet i caktuar është ofensiv dhe Sub Task B përfshin zbulimin nëse një tweet ofensiv është drejtuar ndaj dikujt (grupi apo një individ). Modelet tona për Sub Task A janë bazuar në një ansambel të rrjetit nervor konvolutiv dhe LSTM dy-drejtues, ndërsa për Sub Task B, ne mbështetemi në një sërë heuristikësh të nxjerrë nga të dhënat e trajnimit. Ne ofrojmë analiza të hollësishme të rezultateve të fituara duke përdorur modelet e trajnuara. Ekipi ynë renditi të pestën nga 103 pjesëmarrës në Sub Task A, duke arritur një pikë makro F1 prej 0.807 dhe renditi të tetën nga 75 pjesëmarrës duke arritur një pikë makro F1 prej 0.695.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեր մոտեցումը և համակարգի նկարագրությունը 2019 թ. Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների ենթախնդիրների A և B ենթախնդիրների 6. խնդիրների համար՝ բացահայտելը և դասակարգումը վնասավոր լեզուների մասին: Ա-հանձնարարությունը ներառում է նշել, թե արդյոք տվյալ թվիթը վնասավոր է, իսկ B-հանձնարարությունը ներառում է նշել, թե արդյոք վնասավոր թվիթը նշանակում է ինչ-որ մեկի (խմբի կամ անհատի) նկատմամբ: Մեր "Ա"-ի ենթախնդրի մոդելները հիմնված են համառուցվածքային նյարդային ցանցի և երկու ուղղությամբ LSMT-ի համառուցվածքի վրա, մինչդեռ "Բ"-ի ենթախնդրի համար մենք հիմնված ենք ուսուցման տվյալներից ստացված մի շարք հորիստիկ: Մենք տրամադրում ենք մանրամասն վերլուծություն այն արդյունքների մասին, որոնք ստացվել են օգտագործելով պատրաստված մոդելներ: Մեր թիմը դասակարգվել է հինգերորդ մասնակիցներից A-ի ենթախնդրի մասնակիցներից, ստանալով 0.807 մակարո F1 գնահատականը, և դասակարգվել է հինգերորդ մասնակիցներից, ստանալով 0.695 մակարո F1:', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা সাব কাজ A এবং সেমভাল ২০১৯ সালের সাব কাজের সাব কাজের জন্য আমাদের পদক্ষেপ এবং সিস্টেমের বর্ণনা দিয়েছি: সামাজিক মিডিয়ায় অ Sub Task A involves identifying if a given tweet is offensive and Sub Task B involves detecting if an offensive tweet is targeted towards someone (group or an individual).  সাব টাস্ক এ এর জন্য আমাদের মডেল কনভোলেশনাল নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক এবং বাইডিয়েল এলএসএমএর একটি প্রতিষ্ঠানের উপর ভিত্তি করেছে, আর সাব টাস্ক বির জন্য আমরা প্রশিক্ষণে আমরা প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল ব্যবহার করে পাওয়া ফলাফলের বিস্তারিত বিশ্লেষণ প্রদান করি। আমাদের দল সাব টাস্ক এ অংশগ্রহণকারীদের মধ্যে ১০৩ থেকে ৫ থেকে পরিচালনা করেছে, যার ফলে ম্যাক্রো এফ১ স্কোর পাওয়া যাচ্ছে এবং ৭৫ জনের মধ্যে ৭৫ জন অংশগ্রহণ', 'az': "Bu kağızda bizim yaklaşığımızı və Sistem A və Sub Task B'nin yarısı 2019 Görevi 6: Sosyal Medya dillərinin təsdiqlənməsi və Kategoriyasını göstəririk. Sub Task A: verilən tweet offensiv olduğu və Sub Task B: offensive tweet birinə (grup və ya individu) nişan edildiyi təqdirdə tanıdırmaq məqsədilə istifadə edir. Sub Task A modellərimiz Convolutional Neural Network və Bidirectional LSTM'in ensemble üzerində dayanılır. Halbuki Sub Task B üçün təhsil verilənlərdən alınan heuristik bir quruluğuna təvəkkül edirik. Biz təhsil edilmiş modellərlə alınan nəticələrin detalı analizi təmin edirik. Bizim ekibimiz A Sub Task-a 103-dən 5-ci səf çəkdi, makro F1 0,807-dən 5-ci səf çəkdi və 75-dən 8-ci səf çəkdi ki, 0,695-dən 0,695 makro F1 çatdı.", 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo naš pristup i opis sustava pod zadatak A i pod zadatak B polovice 2019. zadatak 6: identifikacija i kategorizacija neposlušnog jezika u socijalnim medijima. Pod zadatak A uključuje identifikaciju ako je određena tweet ofanzivna, a pod zadatak B uključuje otkrivanje ako je napadajući tweet ciljen na nekoga (grupa ili pojedinca). Naši modeli pod zadatkom A zasnovani su na kompleksu konvolucionalne neuronske mreže i dvosmjerne LSTM, dok se za pod zadatak B oslanjamo na kompleks heuristike iz podataka obuke. Mi pružamo detaljnu analizu rezultata dobivenih koristeći obučene modele. Naš tim je bio 5. od 103 učesnika pod zadatkom A, ostvario makro F1 rezultat 0,807, i rankirao 8. od 75 učesnika koji je ostvario makro F1 od 0,695.', 'ca': "En aquest paper presentem el nostre enfocament i la descripció del sistema per la Subtasca A i la Subtasca B de SemEval 2019 tasca 6: Identificar i categoritzar llenguatges ofensius als mitjans socials. La Subtasca A implica identificar si un tweet determinat és ofensiu i la Subtasca B implica detectar si un tweet ofensiu està dirigit cap a algú (grup o individu). Els nostres models per la Subtasca A es basan en un conjunt de Rede Neural Convolutiva i LSTM Bidireccional, mentre que per la Subtasca B, confiem en un conjunt d'heurístics derivats de les dades d'entrenament. Oferecem una anàlisi detallada dels resultats obtenits utilitzant els models entrenats. El nostre equip es va classificar en la 5ª de cada 103 participants en la Subtasca A, aconseguint una puntuació macro F1 de 0,807, i en la 8ª de cada 75 participants aconseguint una macroF1 de 0,695.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme náš přístup a popis systému pro Sub Task A a Sub Task B SemEval 2019 Task 6: Identifikace a Kategorizace Offenzivního jazyka v sociálních médiích. Podúkol A zahrnuje identifikaci, zda je daný tweet urážlivý a podúkol B zahrnuje zjištění, zda je urážlivý tweet zaměřen na někoho (skupinu nebo jednotlivce). Naše modely pro Sub Task A jsou založeny na souboru konveluční neuronové sítě a obousměrné LSTM, zatímco pro Sub Task B spoléháme na sadu heuristik odvozených z tréninkových dat. Poskytujeme detailní analýzu výsledků získaných pomocí školených modelů. Náš tým byl pátý z 103 účastníků Sub Task A, dosáhl makro F1 skóre 0,807 a osmý z 75 účastníků dosažený makro F1 0,695.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis tutvustame oma lähenemisviisi ja süsteemi kirjeldust SemEval 2019. aasta alaülesandele A ja alaülesandele B ülesanne 6: ründava keele tuvastamine ja kategoriseerimine sotsiaalmeedias. Alaülesanne A tähendab, et tuvastada, kas antud säuts on solvav ja alaülesanne B tähendab, et tuvastada, kas solvav säuts on suunatud kellelegi (rühmale või üksikisikule). Meie alamülesande A mudelid põhinevad konvolutsioonilise neurovõrgu ja kahesuunalise LSTM ansamblil, samas alamülesande B puhul tugineme treeninguandmetest tulenevatele heuristikatele. Pakume koolitatud mudelite abil saadud tulemuste üksikasjalikku analüüsi. Meie meeskond oli alaülesandes A 103 osalejast 5. kohal, saavutades makro F1 skoori 0,807 ja 75 osalejast 8. kohal, saavutades makro F1 0,695.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme lähestymistapamme ja järjestelmäkuvauksen SemEval 2019:n alatehtäviin A ja alatehtäviin B Tehtävä 6: Hyökkäävän kielen tunnistaminen ja luokittelu sosiaalisessa mediassa. Alatehtävä A tarkoittaa sitä, että tunnistetaan, onko tietty twiitti loukkaava ja alatehtävä B havaitsee, onko loukkaava twiitti kohdistettu johonkin (ryhmään tai yksilöön). Mallimme alitehtävään A perustuvat konvolutional neural network- ja bidirectional LSTM -yhdistelmään, kun taas alitehtävään B nojaudumme harjoitusdatasta johdettuihin heuristikoihin. Tarjoamme yksityiskohtaisen analyysin koulutettujen mallien avulla saaduista tuloksista. Tiimimme sijoittui viidenneksi alatehtävän A 103 osallistujasta saavuttaen makropisteen F1 0,807 ja kahdeksanneksi 75 osallistujasta saavuttaen makropisteen F1 0,695.', 'jv': 'Nang pepulan iki kita nggawe perintah akeh lan sistem nambah kanggo Sub task A lan Sub task B ning semiinval 2011 task 6: ID nggawe lan kategorising offensive Language ning sotahan Media. Sub Job A mengko urip nggunakake terêngguna kuwi wis ngerasakno karo Sub task B mengko nggawe nyimpen nek tut sing apik dhéwé (kelompok obah saben). Awak model sing kanggo Sub task A dumadhi sak batir tentang karo ingkang convolution Neral Network lan Bidirectial LTT M, supoyo nggo Sub task B, kita wis diplehake mruput heuristik sing isin dadi nyong. Awak dhéwé ngewehke ndhelik neng dadi nggawe barang nggambar model sing berarti. Awak dhéwé wis nambah 5 wis mudhun ning upak perusahaan ning Sub task A, nambah perusahaan macro F1 sing 0.487, lan uga wis arah 8 wis 75 sakjané perusahaan nambah perusahaan macro F1 sing 0.6 sing', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da hanyarmu da description of the system for Sub-Tasks A and Sub-Tasks B of Semeval 2019 Taimar 6: Idonation and Categoriing offssive language in social Media. Sub-aikin A yana da amfani da ka gane cewa, idan an gitta wani littãfi na aikin labari ya zama mai shaƙãwa kuma Sub-Tafiyar B yana haɗa a gane idan an yi amfani da wani juma (jama'a ko wani mutum). @ action: button Munã bãyar da anarrai daki-daki ga matsalan da aka samã shi da misãlai wanda aka sani. Our team ranked 5th out of 103 participants in Sub Task A, achieving a macro F1 score of 0.807, and ranked 8th out of 75 participants achieving a macro F1 of 0.695.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנו מציגים את הגישה שלנו ואת תיאור המערכת עבור Sub Task A ו Sub Task B של SemEval 2019 Task 6: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media. תוך משימה A כולל לזהות אם טוויט מסוים הוא פגיע ותתוך משימה B כולל לגלות אם טוויט פגיע ממוקד כלפי מישהו (קבוצה או אדם). הדוגמנים שלנו לתת משימה א מבוססים על אסמבל של רשת נוירולית משתנה ו LSTM ביכיווני, בעוד עבור התת משימה ב, אנו סומכים על קבוצה של היוריסטיקה שנוצאה ממידע האימונים. אנחנו מספקים ניתוח מפורט של התוצאות שנקבלו באמצעות הדוגמנים המאמנים. הצוות שלנו דיווח חמישי מתוך 103 משתתפים בתפקיד א, להשיג נקודת מקרו F1 של 0.807, ודווח שמונה מתוך 75 משתתפים להשיג מקרו F1 של 0.695.', 'sk': 'V tem prispevku predstavljamo naš pristop in opis sistema za podnalogo A in podnalogo B SemEval 2019 naloga 6: identifikacija in kategorizacija napadalnega jezika v socialnih medijih. Podnaloga A vključuje ugotavljanje, ali je določen tweet žaljiv, podnaloga B pa ugotavljanje, ali je žaljiv tweet namenjen nekomu (skupini ali posamezniku). Naši modeli za podnalogo A temeljijo na ansamblu konvolucijskega živčnega omrežja in dvosmernega LSTM, medtem ko se za podnalogo B zanašamo na niz heuristike, ki izhajajo iz podatkov o usposabljanju. Zagotavljamo podrobno analizo rezultatov, pridobljenih z uporabo usposobljenih modelov. Naša ekipa se je uvrstila na 5. mesto od 103 udeležencev v podnalogi A, dosegla je makro F1 oceno 0,807 in osmo mesto od 75 udeležencev, ki so dosegli makro F1 0,695.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོའི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་གནད་སྡུད་དང་མ་ལག་གི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལྟ་བ་དང་། རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་འཇིག་སྣོད་ནང་དུ་འཇིག་ཟད་གཞན Sub Task A involves identifying if a given tweet is offensive and Sub Task B involves detecting if an offensive tweet is targeted to someone (group or an individual). Our models for Sub Task A is based on an ensemble of Convolutional Neural Network and Bidirectional LSTM, whereas for Sub Task B, we rely on a set of heuristics derived from the training data. ང་ཚོས་ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་བྱ་རིམ་གྱི་དབྱེ་བ་ལ་གསལ་བཤད་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ekipa་གླེང་མོལ་གཅིག་ལས་འགུལ་སྡུད་མཁན་ལས་འགྲོ་ཚུལ་༡༥པ་ཡིན། གནད་དོན་གྲངས་མི F1 གྱང་ཚད་0.807 ཡིན་དང་། མཉམ་དུ་འགྲོ་ཚུལ་༡༧པ་ལས་འགྲོ་ཚུལ་'}
{'en': 'Nikolov-Radivchev at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : Offensive Tweet Classification with BERT and Ensembles', 'pt': 'Nikolov-Radivchev no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Classificação ofensiva de Tweets com BERT e Ensembles', 'es': 'Nikolov-Radivchev en la tarea 6 de Semeval-2019: Clasificación de tuits ofensivos con BERT y conjuntos', 'ar': 'Nikolov-Radivchev في SemEval-2019 المهمة 6: تصنيف التغريدات الهجومية باستخدام BERT والمجموعات', 'fr': 'Nikolov-Radivchev à SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: Classification des tweets offensifs avec BERT et ensembles', 'ja': 'Nikolov - Radivchev at SemEval -2019タスク6 ： BERTとアンサンブルによる攻撃的なツイート分類', 'ru': 'Николов-Радивчев на SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweet Classification with BERT and Ensembles', 'zh': 'Nikolov-Radivchevåœ¨SemEval-2019åŠ¡6:ç”¨BERTä¸ŽEnsemblesè¿›æ”»æ€§æŽ¨æ–‡ç±»', 'hi': 'Nikolov-Radivchev पर SemEval-2019 कार्य 6: BERT और Ensembles के साथ आक्रामक ट्वीट वर्गीकरण', 'ga': 'Nikolov-Radivchev ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Aicmiú Tweet Ionsaitheach le BERT agus Ensembles', 'ka': 'Nikolov-Radivchev at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweet Classification with BERT and Ensembles', 'hu': 'Nikolov-Radivcsev a SemEval-2019 6. feladat: Offenzív Tweet osztályozás BERT-vel és együttesekkel', 'el': 'Nikolov-Radivchev στο SemEval-2019 Εργασία 6: Ταξινόμηση επιθετικών Tweet με BERT και σύνολα', 'it': 'Nikolov-Radivchev al SemEval-2019 Task 6: Classificazione Tweet Offensiva con BERT e Ensembles', 'kk': 'Nikolov-Radivchev at semiEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweet Classification with BERT and Ensembles', 'mk': 'Николов-Радивичев на SemEval-2019 задача 6: Онавивна класификација на Твит со BERT и Ensembles', 'ms': 'Nikolov-Radivchev di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Klasifikasi Tweet Offensive dengan BERT dan Ensembles', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6-ല്\u200d നിക്കോളോവ്- റേഡിവെവ്', 'mt': 'Nikolov-Radivchev f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6: Klassifikazzjoni Offensiva tat-Tweet mal-BERT u l-Ensembles', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweet Classification with BERT and Ensembles', 'lt': 'Nikolov-Radivchev SemEval-2019 6 užduotis: Pažeidžiamas dviejų tinklų klasifikavimas su BERT ir Ensembles', 'no': 'Nikolov-Radivchev på semiEval-2019 Oppgåve 6: Offensive Tweet Classification with BERT and Ensembles', 'pl': 'Nikolov-Radiwczew na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 6: Klasyfikacja ofensywnego tweetu z BERT i zespołami', 'ro': 'Nikolov-Radivchev la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: Clasificarea Tweet ofensivă cu BERT și Ansambluri', 'sr': 'Nikolov-Radivchev na semiEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweet Classification with BERT and Ensembles', 'si': 'නිකෝලෝව්-රේඩිව්චෙව් සම්වේල්-2019 වැඩ 6: Offensive Tweet Classication with BERT and Ensemble', 'so': 'Nikolov-Radivchev at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweet classification with BERT and Ensembles', 'sv': 'Nikolov-Radivchev på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: Offensiv Tweet Klassificering med BERT och Ensembles', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 6: BERT மற்றும் Ensembles உடன் நிகோலோவ்- ரேடிவெவ்', 'ur': 'نیکولوف-راڈیو چوف SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweet Classification with BERT and Ensembles', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nikolov-radivcao tại SemEvl-209 Task 6: Tóm gọn cấp Tweet classification with BERT và Ensembles', 'bg': 'Николов-Радивчев в СемЕвал-2019 Задача 6: Офанзивна класификация на Туит с БАРТ и ансамбъли', 'nl': 'Nikolov-Radivchev bij SemEval-2019 Taak 6: Offensieve tweetclassificatie met BERT en ensembles', 'hr': 'Nikolov-Radivchev na semiEval-2019 zadatak 6: Offensive Tweet Classification with BERT and Ensembles', 'da': 'Nikolov-Radivchev ved SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: Offensiv Tweet Klassificering med BERT og Ensembles', 'de': 'Nikolov-Radivchev bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 6: Offensive Tweet Klassifizierung mit BERT und Ensembles', 'id': 'Nikolov-Radivchev at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweet Classification with BERT and Ensembles', 'ko': 'Nikolov Radivchev가SemEval-2019퀘스트6:버트와 합주로 공격적인 트위터 분류', 'fa': 'Nikolov-Radivchev at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweet Classification with BERT and Ensembles', 'sw': 'Nikolov-Radivchev katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 6: Makala ya Twita yenye ujumla na BERT na Ensembles', 'tr': 'Nikolov-Radyvşev at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweet Classification with BERT and Ensembles', 'sq': 'Nikolov-Radivçev në SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweet Classification with BERT and Ensembles', 'af': 'Nikolov-Radivchev by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 6: Offensive Tweet Klassifikasie met BERT en Ensembles', 'am': 'ስራ 6: የTwitter Classification with BERT and Ensembles', 'hy': 'Նիկոլով-Ռադիվչով, 2019 թվականի "Սեմեվալ"-ի 6-րդ հանձնարարությունը. ԲԵՌԹ-ի և Էնսեմբլերի միջոցով վիրահատուկ թվիթ դասակարգում', 'az': 'Nikolov-Radivchev at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweet Classification with BERT and Ensembles', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের ৬ টি নিকোলোভ-রেডিভেভ: বের্ট এবং এনসেম্বেলের সাথে অফিসিভ টুইট ক্লাসিকেশন', 'cs': 'Nikolov-Radivčev na SemEval-2019 Úkol 6: Ofensivní tweetová klasifikace s BERT a soubory', 'bs': 'Nikolov-Radivchev na semiEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweet Classification with BERT and Ensembles', 'ca': 'Nikolov-Radivchev a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweet Classification with BERT and Ensembles', 'et': 'Nikolov-Radivchev SemEval-2019 ülesanne 6: ründav Tweet klassifitseerimine BERTi ja ansamblitega', 'fi': 'Nikolov-Radivchev SemEval-2019 Teht채v채 6: Hy철kk채채v채 twiittiluokitus BERT:n ja Ensemblesin kanssa', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'ha': '@ item: intable Text context menu item', 'sk': 'Nikolov-Radivčev na SemEval-2019 Naloga 6: Ofenzivna klasifikacija Tweet z BERT in ansambli', 'he': 'Nikolov-Radivchev at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweet Classification with BERT and Ensembles', 'bo': 'Nikolov-Radivchev at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweet Classification with BERT and Ensembles'}
{'en': 'This paper examines different approaches and models towards offensive tweet classification which were used as a part of the OffensEval 2019 competition. It reviews Tweet preprocessing, techniques for overcoming unbalanced class distribution in the provided test data, and comparison of multiple attempted machine learning models.', 'ar': 'تبحث هذه الورقة البحثية في الأساليب والنماذج المختلفة لتصنيف التغريدات المسيئة التي تم استخدامها كجزء من مسابقة OffensEval 2019. يستعرض المعالجة المسبقة للتغريدات ، وتقنيات التغلب على التوزيع غير المتوازن للفئة في بيانات الاختبار المقدمة ، ومقارنة نماذج التعلم الآلي المتعددة التي تمت تجربتها.', 'pt': 'Este artigo examina diferentes abordagens e modelos para classificação de tweets ofensivos que foram usados como parte da competição OffensEval 2019. Ele analisa o pré-processamento de Tweets, técnicas para superar a distribuição desequilibrada de classes nos dados de teste fornecidos e a comparação de várias tentativas de modelos de aprendizado de máquina.', 'fr': "Cet article examine différentes approches et modèles de classification des tweets offensants qui ont été utilisés dans le cadre du concours OffenseVal 2019. Il passe en revue le prétraitement des Tweets, les techniques permettant de surmonter la distribution déséquilibrée des classes dans les données de test fournies et la comparaison de plusieurs modèles d'apprentissage automatique.", 'es': 'Este artículo examina diferentes enfoques y modelos para la clasificación de tuits ofensivos que se utilizaron como parte de la competencia OffensEval 2019. Revisa el preprocesamiento de Tweets, las técnicas para superar la distribución desequilibrada de clases en los datos de prueba proporcionados y la comparación de múltiples modelos de aprendizaje automático que se han intentado.', 'ja': 'この論文では、OffensEval 2019コンペティションの一環として使用された不快なツイート分類に対するさまざまなアプローチとモデルについて検討します。Tweetプリプロセッシング、提供されたテストデータの不均衡なクラス分布を克服するためのテクニック、および複数の試みられた機械学習モデルの比較をレビューします。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर आक्रामक ट्वीट वर्गीकरण की ओर विभिन्न दृष्टिकोणों और मॉडलों की जांच करता है जो ऑफेन्सएवल 2019 प्रतियोगिता के एक हिस्से के रूप में उपयोग किए गए थे। यह चहचहाना preprocessing की समीक्षा करता है, प्रदान किए गए परीक्षण डेटा में असंतुलित वर्ग वितरण पर काबू पाने के लिए तकनीक, और कई प्रयास किए गए मशीन लर्निंग मॉडल की तुलना।', 'zh': '本文治犯性推文异法与模形,以为OffensEval 2019竞之一体。 顾推文预处理克测试数据不平之术,与数试之机器学模形者较之。', 'ru': 'В этой статье рассматриваются различные подходы и модели к классификации оскорбительных твитов, которые использовались в рамках конкурса OffensEval 2019. В нем рассматривается предварительная обработка твитов, методы преодоления несбалансированного распределения классов в предоставленных тестовых данных и сравнение нескольких моделей машинного обучения.', 'ga': 'Scrúdaíonn an páipéar seo cineálacha cur chuige agus samhlacha éagsúla maidir le haicmiú tuíte maslach a úsáideadh mar chuid de chomórtas OffensEval 2019. Déanann sé athbhreithniú ar réamhphróiseáil Tweet, ar theicnící chun dáileadh ranga neamhchothromaithe a shárú sna sonraí tástála a cuireadh ar fáil, agus comparáid idir samhlacha meaisínfhoghlama iolracha.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუნტი განსხვავებული მიზეზები და მოდელები, რომლებიც გამოყენებული OffensEval 2019-ის კონკრენტების ნაწილი. ის გავაკეთებს Tweet-ს წინაპროცესი, ტექნოგიები განსაზღვრებული კლასის განსაზღვრებისთვის განსაზღვრებული ტესტის მონაცემებში და მრავალ მოცდილობული მაქინის სწავლების მოდე', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία εξετάζει διαφορετικές προσεγγίσεις και μοντέλα για την επιθετική ταξινόμηση των tweets που χρησιμοποιήθηκαν στο πλαίσιο του διαγωνισμού OffensEval 2019. Εξετάζει την προεπεξεργασία, τις τεχνικές για την υπέρβαση της ανισορροπημένης κατανομής τάξεων στα παρεχόμενα δεδομένα δοκιμών, και τη σύγκριση πολλαπλών επιχειρημένων μοντέλων μηχανικής μάθησης.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány az OffensEval 2019 verseny részeként használt offenzív tweet osztályozás különböző megközelítéseit és modelljeit vizsgálja. Áttekinti a Tweet előfeldolgozását, a rendelkezésre álló tesztadatok kiegyensúlyozatlan osztályelosztásának leküzdésére szolgáló technikákat, valamint több kísérletezett gépi tanulási modell összehasonlítását.', 'it': 'Questo articolo esamina diversi approcci e modelli verso la classificazione offensiva dei tweet utilizzati come parte del concorso OffensEval 2019. Esamina il pre-elaborazione dei Tweet, le tecniche per superare la distribuzione sbilanciata delle classi nei dati di test forniti e il confronto di più modelli di machine learning tentati.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2019 OffensEval конкурсының бөлігі ретінде қолданылатын offensive tweet классификациясының түрлі арқылы мен моделдерін тексереді. Бұл tweet алдын- ала өткізу, балансиз класс үлестірімін келтірілген сынақтар деректерінде және бірнеше әрекет оқыту үлгілерін салыстыру техникалары.', 'mk': 'Овој весник ги испитува различните пристапи и модели кон класификацијата на навредливите твитови кои беа употребени како дел од натпреварот OffensEval 2019. Истиот ги прегледува препроцесорите на Твит, техниките за надминување на небалансираната дистрибуција на класата во обезбедените тестови податоци и споредба на повеќе обиди за машинско учење.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memeriksa pendekatan dan model yang berbeza menuju kelasukan tweet yang menyerang yang digunakan sebagai sebahagian daripada pertandingan OffensEval 2019. Ia meninjau pemprosesan awal Tweet, teknik untuk mengatasi distribusi kelas tidak seimbang dalam data ujian yang diberikan, dan perbandingan model pembelajaran mesin yang berusaha berbilang.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങളും മോഡലുകളും പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഓഫെന്\u200dസ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 പ്രതിരോധികളുടെ ഭാഗമായി ഉപയോഗിക It reviews Tweet preprocessing, techniques for overcoming unbalanced class distribution in the provided test data, and comparison of multiple attempted machine learning models.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jeżamina approċċi u mudelli differenti lejn klassifikazzjoni offensiva tat-tweet li ntużaw bħala parti mill-kompetizzjoni OffensEval 2019. It reviews Tweet preprocessing, techniques for overcoming unbalanced class distribution in the provided test data, and comparison of multiple attempted machine learning models.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь 2019 оны OffensEval өрсөлдөөний нэг хэсэг болгон ашиглаж буй олон арга зам болон загваруудыг шалгаж байна. Энэ нь Твиттийн өмнө үйлдвэрлэл, баланслагүй хичээлийн хуваарилалтын техникуудыг шалгаж, олон оролдсон машин суралцах загваруудыг харьцуулдаг.', 'no': 'Denne papiret undersøker ulike tilnærmingar og modeller mot offensiv tweet- klassifikasjon som ble brukt som del av konkurransen OffensEval 2019. Den gjennomgår førehandsaming av Tweet, teknikk for å overvåka ubalansert klassefordeling i dei tilgjengelege test data, og sammenligning av fleire forsøkte maskinelæringsmodeller.', 'pl': 'W artykule przeanalizowano różne podejścia i modele do klasyfikacji ofensywnych tweetów, które zostały wykorzystane w ramach konkursu OffensEval 2019. Przegląda preprocessing Tweet, techniki przezwyciężania niezrównoważonego rozkładu klas w dostarczonych danych testowych oraz porównanie wielu prób modeli uczenia maszynowego.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare examinează diferite abordări și modele de clasificare ofensivă a tweeturilor care au fost utilizate ca parte a competiției OffensEval 2019. Acesta revizuiește preprocesarea Tweet-urilor, tehnici pentru depășirea distribuției dezechilibrate a claselor în datele de testare furnizate și compararea mai multor modele tentative de învățare automată.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente nagrinėjami skirtingi požiūriai ir modeliai į įžeidžiančių tweet ų klasifikavimą, kurie buvo naudojami kaip OffensEval 2019 konkurso dalis. It reviews Tweet preprocessing, techniques for overcoming unbalanced class distribution in the provided test data, and comparison of multiple attempted machine learning models.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir pregledava različite pristupe i modele prema klasifikaciji ofanzivnih tweet a koji su korišteni kao deo konkurencije OffensEval 2019. Preobrađuje preobrađivanje Tweet-a, tehnike za prevladavanje nepravednog distribucije klase u pruženim ispitivanjima podacima i usporedbu višestrukih pokušajnih modela učenja mašina.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ වෙනස් අවස්ථාවක් සහ මනුස්සල් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා අපරාධික ට්විට් විශේෂණය සඳහා අපරාධික විශේෂණය ඒක ට්විට් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාපනය කරන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණ දත්තේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාපනය කරන්න, පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණ පර', 'so': 'Warqaddaas wuxuu ka baaraandegayaa qaabab kala duduwan iyo qaabab kale oo u jeeda fasaxa Twitteetka waxyeellada ah, kaas oo loo isticmaalay qayb ka mid ah qayb ka qeybta competition OffensEval 2019. Waxay ka fiirisaa baaraandegista Tweetka, qalabka ku xadgudba qaybinta fasalka aan la qiimo karin, iyo tusaalayaasha waxbarashada maskaxda oo badan isku dayay.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats undersöker olika tillvägagångssätt och modeller för offensiv tweetklassificering som användes som en del av tävlingen OffensEval 2019. Den granskar Tweet förbehandling, tekniker för att övervinna obalanserad klassfördelning i de tillhandahållna testdata och jämförelse av flera försök till maskininlärningsmodeller.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் வேறு வழிகளையும் மாதிரிகளையும் சோதிக்கும் செயல்பாடுகளையும் சோதிக்கிறது செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட முறையான Twita வக இது கொடுக்கப்பட்ட சோதனை தரவுகளில் நிறைய முயற்சிக்கப்படாத வகுப்பு பங்கீட்டை வெற்றி முன்செயல்படுத்தல், தொழில்நுட்பம், மற்றும் பல முயற்ச', 'ur': 'This paper examines different approaches and models to offensive tweet classification which were used as a part of the OffensEval 2019 competition. یہ ٹویٹ پرپرپرس سنائی کرتا ہے، ٹیکنیک جن کو پیش کیا گیا تھا، پرداخت کیے گئے ٹیسٹ ڈیٹ میں نابرانگ کلاس کے تقسیم کرنے کے لئے، اور بہت سی کوشش کی ماشین یادہانی موڈل کے مقایسہ.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz boshqa usullarni va modellarni ko'rib chiqaradi. Ular OffensEval 2019 rivojlanishga ishlatilgan shaxsiy Twitterning darajasini ko'rsatadi. Name", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này xem xét các phương pháp và mẫu khác nhau về việc đăng ký tấn công Twitter được sử dụng như một phần của cuộc thi OffensEvl dùm diễn ra vượt thẩm mĩ. Nó xem xét phần xử trước Tweet, kỹ thuật để vượt qua tỷ lệ phân phối lớp không cân bằng trong dữ liệu thí nghiệm cung cấp, và so sánh các mô hình thử nghiệm máy.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir pregledava različite pristupe i modele prema klasifikaciji ofanzivnih tweet a koji su korišteni kao dio natjecanja OffensEval 2019. Preobrađuje preobrađivanje Tweet-a, tehnike za prevladavanje nepravednog distribucije klase u pruženim ispitivanjima podacima i usporedbu višestrukih pokušajnih modela učenja stroja.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия разглежда различни подходи и модели за офанзивна класификация на туитове, които бяха използвани като част от конкурса. Той разглежда предварителната обработка, техниките за преодоляване на небалансираното разпределение на класовете в предоставените тестови данни и сравняване на множество опитни модели за машинно обучение.', 'da': 'Denne artikel undersøger forskellige tilgange og modeller til offensiv tweet klassificering, som blev brugt som en del af OffensEval 2019 konkurrencen. Den gennemgår Tweet forbehandling, teknikker til at overvinde ubalanceret klassefordeling i de leverede testdata, og sammenligning af flere forsøg på maskinlæring modeller.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel onderzoekt verschillende benaderingen en modellen voor offensieve tweetclassificatie die werden gebruikt als onderdeel van de OffensEval 2019 competitie. Het bespreekt Tweet preprocessing, technieken voor het overwinnen van onevenwichtige klasverdeling in de verstrekte testgegevens en vergelijking van meerdere geprobeerde machine learning modellen.', 'id': 'Kertas ini memeriksa pendekatan dan model yang berbeda menuju klasifikasi tweet yang menyerang yang digunakan sebagai bagian dari kompetisi OffensEval 2019. Ini merevisi persiapan Tweet, teknik untuk mengatasi distribusi kelas yang tidak seimbang dalam data ujian yang diberikan, dan perbandingan dari banyak percobaan model belajar mesin.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag untersucht verschiedene Ansätze und Modelle zur offensiven Tweet-Klassifizierung, die im Rahmen des OffensEval 2019 Wettbewerbs verwendet wurden. Es behandelt die Vorverarbeitung von Tweet, Techniken zur Überwindung einer unausgewogenen Klassenverteilung in den bereitgestellten Testdaten und den Vergleich mehrerer versuchter Machine Learning Modelle.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ روش\u200cهای مختلف و مدل\u200cهای متفاوتی را به عنوان بخشی از مسابقه OffensEval 2019 تحقیق می\u200cکند. این تغییرات پیش\u200cپردازی توئیت را تحقیق می\u200cکند، تکنیک\u200cها برای تغییر تقسیم کلاس نابرابری در داده\u200cهای آزمایش داده شده، و مقایسه از مدل\u200cهای یادگیری ماشین\u200cهای چندین تلاش شده\u200cاند.', 'ko': '본고는 2019년 OffensEval 경연의 일부로 사용된 공격적인 트위터 분류의 다양한 방법과 모델을 연구했다.트위터의 사전 처리, 제공된 테스트 데이터의 불균형 분포를 극복하는 기술, 그리고 여러 시도된 기계 학습 모델의 비교를 되돌아봤다.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz OffensEval 2019 ýygnagynyň bölegi ýagdaýynda tapawut golaýlary we nusgalary bardyr. Tweet öňünden geçirmek, temiz synp daýlamagynda täze daýlamagyň teknikleri we birnäçe synanyş makine öwrenmek nusgalarynyň karşılaştyrylmagyny ahmal edýär.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linachunguza mbinu tofauti na mifano kuelekea usambazaji wa Twita unaotumika kama sehemu ya mashindano ya OffensEval 2019. Inapitia upasuaji wa Twita, mbinu za kushinda usambazaji wa darasa lisilo na usawa katika data zilizotolewa na jaribio hilo, na kulinganisha kwa modeli kadhaa za kujifunza mashine.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument shqyrton metoda dhe modele të ndryshme drejt klasifikimit ofensiv të tweetit që u përdorën si pjesë e konkurrencës së OffensEval 2019. It reviews Tweet preprocessing, techniques for overcoming unbalanced class distribution in the provided test data, and comparison of multiple attempted machine learning models.', 'af': 'Hierdie papier ondersoek verskillende toepassings en modele tot offensive tweet klasifikasie wat gebruik word as deel van die OffensEval 2019 mededinging. It reviews Tweet preprocessing, techniques for overcoming unbalanced class distribution in the provided test data, and comparison of multiple attempted machine learning models.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የኢትዮጵያ የ2019 ተቃዋሚው ክፍል ሆኖ የተጠቃሚ የTwitteet ክፍል ላይ የሚደረገውን ልዩ ልዩን አካሄድ እና ምሳሌዎችን ይፈጥራል፡፡ የTweet preprocesses, unbalanced classroom distribution techniques, providing test data for overcoming techniques, and comparison with multiple attempted machine learning models.', 'hy': 'This paper examines different approaches and models towards offensive tweet classification which were used as a part of the OffensEval 2019 competition.  Այն վերլուծում է Tweet-ի նախամշակումը, անհավասարակշռության դասարանի տարածումը հաղթահարելու մեթոդները տրամադրված փորձարկումների տվյալներում և մեքենային ուսումնասիրության բազմաթիվ մոդելների համեմատությունը', 'az': 'Bu kağıt 2019 OffensEval yarışmasının bir parças ı olaraq istifadə edilən offensiv tweet klasifikasyonunla müxtəlif tərzlərini və modellerini incidir. Bu, Tövt ön işləməsini, müəyyən edilmiş sınama məlumatlarında balansız sınıf dağıtımını üstün etmək üçün teknikləri və çoxlu çalışan maşın öyrənmə modellerinin karşılaşdırması.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি অফিনসেভাল ২০১৯-এর প্রতিযোগিতার অংশ হিসেবে ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে আক্রমণের টুইট বিভাগের প্রতি বিভিন্ন উপায় এবং  এটি টুইটারের প্রোক্রেসিং এবং প্রদান করা পরীক্ষার তথ্যে অসম্পূর্ণ ক্লাস বিতরণের ক্ষেত্রে জয়ী করার কৌশল এবং বেশ কিছু প্রচেষ্টা মেশিন শ', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir pregledava različite pristupe i modele prema klasifikaciji ofanzivnih tweet a koji su korišteni kao dio konkurencije OffensEval 2019. Preobrađuje preobrađivanje Tweet-a, tehnike za prevladavanje nepravednog distribucije klase u pruženim testnim podacima i usporedbu višestrukih pokušajnih modela učenja mašina.', 'ca': "Aquest paper examina diferents enfocaments i models cap a la classificació ofensiva de tweets que van ser utilitzats com part de la competició OffensEval 2019. Revisa la preprocessió de Tweet, les tècniques per superar la distribució de classes desequilibrada en les dades de prova proporcionades, i la comparació de múltiples models d'aprenentatge automàtic intentats.", 'cs': 'Tento článek zkoumá různé přístupy a modely k útočné klasifikaci tweetů, které byly použity v rámci soutěže OffensEval 2019. Přezkoumá předzpracování Tweet, techniky pro překonání nevyváženého rozdělení tříd v poskytnutých testovacích datech a porovnání několika pokusů o strojové učení.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis uuritakse erinevaid lähenemisviise ja mudeleid solvava säutsu klassifitseerimiseks, mida kasutati OffensEval 2019 konkursi raames. See annab ülevaate Tweet eeltöötlusest, meetoditest tasakaalustamata klassijaotuse ületamiseks esitatud testiandmetes ja mitme masinõppe katsetatud mudeli võrdlemisest.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa tarkastellaan erilaisia lähestymistapoja ja malleja loukkaavaan twiittiluokitukseen, joita käytettiin osana OffensEval 2019 -kilpailua. Siinä tarkastellaan Tweet-esikäsittelyä, tekniikoita epätasapainoisen luokkajakauman voittamiseksi annetuissa testitiedoissa ja useiden koneoppimismallien vertailua.', 'ha': 'Wannan takardan na jarraba hanyoyin daban da misãlai zuwa ga classifori na Twitter mai ƙiyayya, wanda aka yi amfani da shi kamar rabin competitin offenseval 2019. Yana canza shirin bayani na Twitter, masu buwãyi ko rabon rabon darafõfi na balanci cikin data na da aka ba da, kuma yana samfani da misãlai masu amfani da mashine masu yawa da aka yi jarraba.', 'sk': 'V prispevku so preučeni različni pristopi in modeli za ofenzivno klasifikacijo tweetov, ki so bili uporabljeni v okviru tekmovanja OffensEval 2019. Ocenjuje predobdelavo Tweet, tehnike za premagovanje neuravnotežene porazdelitve razredov v zagotovljenih testnih podatkih in primerjavo več poskusov modelov strojnega učenja.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki dadi pancene akeh sampeyan karo model sing gak bakal terus winih dhéwé tau kelas sing nyimpen karo perusahaan ning pating offensinval 2011. Rasane sing beraksi banget tuli gambar, teknik nggawe kotak tentang kanggo disimperasan kelas sing gak nggawe dadi nyong bisa tekan, karo karo perusahaan model sing bisa nguasai sistem sing apik tur angel.', 'he': 'This paper examines different approaches and models towards offensive tweet classification which were used as a part of the OffensEval 2019 competition.  הוא מבקר את התהליך הקדמי של טוויט, טכניקות להתגבר על פיצול לא מאוזן בכיתה בנתונים המבחנים המסופקים, ושוואה של דוגמנים רבים של ניסיון ללמוד מכונות.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་དྲ་རྒྱ་ནག་གིས་དྲ་རྒྱ་གར་ལ་བྱ་རིམ་མི་འདྲ་བ་དང་མིག It reviews Tweet preprocessing, techniques for overcoming unbalanced class distribution in the provided test data, and comparison of multiple attempted machine learning models.'}
{'en': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : An Ensemble Approach to Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'ar': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team في SemEval-2019 المهمة 6: نهج جماعي لتحديد وتصنيف اللغة الهجومية في Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'fr': "Nit_Agartala_NLP_Team à SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: Une approche d'ensemble pour identifier et catégoriser le langage offensant dans les corpus de médias sociaux Twitter", 'es': 'Nit_Agartala_NLP_Team en Semeval-2019 Tarea 6: Un enfoque conjunto para identificar y categorizar el lenguaje ofensivo en Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'pt': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Uma abordagem de conjunto para identificar e categorizar linguagem ofensiva no Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'ja': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_SemEval -2019のチームタスク6 ： Twitterのソーシャルメディア企業における不快な言語を特定し、分類するためのアンサンブルアプローチ', 'zh': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team在SemEval-2019务6:一在Twitter社交媒体语料库识与犯性言语合奏之法', 'ru': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Ансамблевый подход к выявлению и классификации оскорбительных слов в социальных сетях Twitter', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 6 में NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team: चहचहाना सामाजिक मीडिया निगम में आपत्तिजनक भाषा की पहचान और वर्गीकरण करने के लिए एक पहनावा दृष्टिकोण', 'ga': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Foireann ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Cur Chuige Ensemble chun Teanga Ionsaitheach a Aithint agus a Chatagóiriú ar Twitter Corpora na Meán Sóisialta', 'ka': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A Ensemble Approach to Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'hu': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team a SemEval-2019 6. feladat: Együttes megközelítés a támadó nyelv azonosítására és kategorizálására a Twitter Közösségi Média Corpora', 'el': 'Ομάδα στο έργο 6: Μια προσέγγιση συνόλου για τον εντοπισμό και την κατηγοριοποίηση της προσβλητικής γλώσσας στο Σώμα Κοινωνικών Μέσων του Twitter', 'kk': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team at semiEval-2019 Task 6: A Ensemble Approach to Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'lt': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A Ensemble Approach to Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'mk': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Ensemble Approach to Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'it': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Un approccio di gruppo per identificare e classificare il linguaggio offensivo in Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'ms': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A Ensemble Approach to Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'mt': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team at SemEval-2019 Task 6: An Ensemble Approach to Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2019 ടാസ്ക് 6-ലെ NIT_ Agartala_NLP_Team: ടൂട്ടര്\u200d സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയില്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുവാനും വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ', 'pl': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 6: Podejście zespołowe do identyfikacji i kategorizowania języka ofensywnego w korpusie mediów społecznościowych Twitter', 'mn': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team at SemEval-2019 Task 6: An Ensemble Approach to Identify and Categorizing Offensive Language in Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'no': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP', 'ro': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: O abordare ansamblă pentru identificarea și clasificarea limbajului ofensiv în Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'sr': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP', 'si': 'NIT_Agertla_NLP_team at semeval-2019 Job 6: A Ensemble approach to ID and Categorise Offensive language in Twitter Media CorPora', 'sv': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: En ensemblemetod för att identifiera och kategorisera kränkande språk i Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'so': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team at SemEval-2019 Shaqada 6: A Ensemable Approach to identify and categorize Offensive language in Twitter Corpora Social Media', 'ur': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team at SemEval-2019 Task 6: An Ensemble Approach to Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணியில் NIT_ Agartala_ NLP_ Team 6: Twitter Social Media Corpora அடையாளம் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்துவதற்கு ஒரு ஒற்றைப்படையான வழி', 'uz': 'SemEval-2019 Vazifani NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team 6: Twitter Social Media Corporiyasidan foydalanuvchi va kategori tilni aniqlash va kategorilashga yetarli', 'vi': 'NIT U AgamortaluNLP*u Team at Semkhai ly-thẩm 9 Task 6: A Ensemble tiếp cận xác định và Categorhoá Hành động Ngôn ngữ trên Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'hr': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP', 'bg': 'Задача 6: Ансамбълен подход към идентифициране и категоризиране на офанзивен език в корпора на социалните медии', 'nl': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team bij SemEval-2019 Taak 6: Een ensemblebenadering voor het identificeren en categoriseren van offensieve taal in Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'da': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team på SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: En Ensemble tilgang til identificering og kategorisering af offensivt sprog i Twitter Sociale Medier Corpora', 'id': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team di SemEval-2019 Task 6: An Ensemble Approach to Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'de': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 6: Ein Ensembleansatz zur Identifizierung und Kategorisierung offensiver Sprache in Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'ko': 'NIT Agartala NLP 팀이SemEval-2019퀘스트 6: 트위터 소셜미디어 자료 라이브러리에서 공격적인 언어를 식별하고 분류하는 통합 방법', 'fa': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team at SemEval-2019 Task 6: An Ensemble Approach to Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'tr': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A Ensemble Approach to Identify and Categorizing Offensive Language in Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'sw': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team katika kazi ya SemEval-2019: Utafiti unaoendelea kutambua na Kugawanya Lugha Huli katika Kampuni ya Mitandao ya Kijamii ya Twita', 'sq': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team në SemEval-2019 Task 6: An Ensemble Approach to Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'am': 'ስራ 6 የሳምEval-2019 ስራ የNIT_Agartala_NLP_Team: በትዊተር ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ኮሮፓ ውስጥ የሥልጣን ቋንቋ ማግኘት እና መፍጠር የሚችል ጉዳይ', 'af': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 6: ֳ¢ֲ€ֲ™n Ensemble Approach tot identifiseer en kategoriseer Offensive Taal in Twitter Sosiale Media Korpora', 'hy': 'ՆիT_Agaartala_ՆԼՊ_թիմը ՍեմԵվալ-2019-ի 6. հանձնարարությունը. Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների Կորպորայում', 'az': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A Ensemble Approach to Identify and Categorizing Offensive Language in Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'bn': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team at SemEval-2019 Task 6: An Ensemble Approach to Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'ca': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team a SemEval-2019 Task 6: An Ensemble Approach to Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language at Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'cs': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team na SemEval-2019 Úkol 6: Souborový přístup k identifikaci a kategorizaci útočného jazyka v Twitteru Sociálních médií', 'bs': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP', 'et': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team SemEval-2019 ülesanne 6: Ensembli lähenemisviis ründava keele tuvastamiseks ja kategoriseerimiseks Twitteris Sotsiaalmeedia korporatsioonis', 'fi': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team SemEval-2019 Task 6: Ensemble Approach to Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'jv': 'NIT_Anartala_NLP', 'he': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team at SemEval-2019 Task 6: An Ensemble Approach to Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Twitter Social Media Corpora', 'sk': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team na SemEval-2019 Naloga 6: Ensemblen pristop k prepoznavanju in kategorizaciji ofenzivnega jezika v Twitterju Korporacija družbenih omrežij', 'ha': 'Taimar 6', 'bo': 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team at SemEval-2019 Task 6: An Ensemble Approach to Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Twitter Social Media Corpora'}
{'en': 'The paper describes the systems submitted to OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Task 6) on ‘Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media’ by the ‘NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team’. A Twitter annotated dataset of 13,240 English tweets was provided by the task organizers to train the individual models, with the best results obtained using an ensemble model composed of six different classifiers. The ensemble model produced macro-averaged F1-scores of 0.7434, 0.7078 and 0.4853 on Subtasks A, B, and C, respectively. The paper highlights the overall low predictive nature of various linguistic features and surface level count features, as well as the limitations of a traditional machine learning approach when compared to a Deep Learning counterpart.', 'ar': 'تصف الورقة الأنظمة المقدمة إلى OffensEval (SemEval 2019 ، المهمة 6) بشأن "تحديد وتصنيف اللغة الهجومية في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي" من قبل فريق NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team. تم توفير مجموعة بيانات مشروحة على Twitter مؤلفة من 13240 تغريدة باللغة الإنجليزية من قبل منظمي المهام لتدريب النماذج الفردية ، مع الحصول على أفضل النتائج باستخدام نموذج المجموعة المكون من ستة مصنفات مختلفة. أنتج نموذج المجموعة درجات F1 بمتوسط الماكرو 0.7434 و 0.7078 و 0.4853 في المهام الفرعية A و B و C على التوالي. تسلط الورقة الضوء على الطبيعة التنبؤية المنخفضة الإجمالية لمختلف الميزات اللغوية وميزات حساب مستوى السطح ، بالإضافة إلى قيود نهج التعلم الآلي التقليدي عند مقارنته بنظيره في التعلم العميق.', 'fr': "L'article décrit les systèmes soumis à OffenseVal (SemEval 2019, Task 6) sur «\xa0Identifier et catégoriser le langage offensant dans les médias sociaux\xa0» par «\xa0Nit_Agartala_NLP_Team\xa0». Un ensemble de données annoté Twitter de 13 240 tweets en anglais a été fourni par les organisateurs de tâches pour former les modèles individuels, avec les meilleurs résultats obtenus en utilisant un modèle d'ensemble composé de six classificateurs différents. Le modèle d'ensemble a produit des scores F1 macro-moyens de 0,7434, 0,7078 et 0,4853 pour les sous-tâches A, B et C, respectivement. L'article met en évidence la faible nature prédictive globale de diverses caractéristiques linguistiques et caractéristiques de comptage au niveau de la surface, ainsi que les limites d'une approche traditionnelle d'apprentissage automatique par rapport à une approche de Deep Learning homologue.", 'es': "El documento describe los sistemas presentados a OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Tarea 6) sobre «Identificación y categorización del lenguaje ofensivo en las redes sociales» por el `Nit_Agartala_NLP_Team'. Los organizadores de la tarea proporcionaron un conjunto de datos anotado en Twitter de 13 240 tuits en inglés para entrenar a los modelos individuales, y los mejores resultados se obtuvieron utilizando un modelo de conjunto compuesto por seis clasificadores diferentes. El modelo de conjunto produjo puntuaciones F1 macropromediadas de 0.7434, 0.7078 y 0.4853 en las subtareas A, B y C, respectivamente. El documento destaca la baja naturaleza predictiva general de varias características lingüísticas y funciones de recuento a nivel de superficie, así como las limitaciones de un enfoque tradicional de aprendizaje automático en comparación con un equivalente de aprendizaje profundo.", 'pt': "O artigo descreve os sistemas submetidos ao OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Tarefa 6) sobre 'Identificando e categorizando linguagem ofensiva nas mídias sociais' pelo 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team'. Um conjunto de dados anotado do Twitter de 13.240 tweets em inglês foi fornecido pelos organizadores da tarefa para treinar os modelos individuais, com os melhores resultados obtidos usando um modelo de conjunto composto por seis classificadores diferentes. O modelo de conjunto produziu pontuações F1 com média macro de 0,7434, 0,7078 e 0,4853 nas subtarefas A, B e C, respectivamente. O artigo destaca a baixa natureza preditiva geral de vários recursos linguísticos e recursos de contagem de nível de superfície, bem como as limitações de uma abordagem tradicional de aprendizado de máquina quando comparada a uma contraparte de aprendizado profundo.", 'ja': 'この論文では、「NIT_AGARTALA_NLP_TEAM」が「ソーシャルメディアにおける攻撃的言語の識別と分類」について、OffensEval （ SemEval 2019、タスク6 ）に提出したシステムについて説明しています。個々のモデルを訓練するために、タスクオーガナイザーによって13,240の英語ツイートのTwitter注釈付きデータセットが提供され、6つの異なる分類子で構成されたアンサンブルモデルを使用して最高の結果が得られた。アンサンブルモデルは、サブタスクＡ、Ｂ、及びＣについて、それぞれ０ ． ７ ４ ３ ４、０ ． ７ ０ ７ ８、及び０ ． ４ ８ ５ ３のマクロ平均Ｆ１スコアを作製した。この論文は、さまざまな言語的特徴と表面レベルのカウント特徴の全体的な低予測性と、ディープラーニングの対応するものと比較したときの従来の機械学習アプローチの制限を強調しています。', 'hi': "पेपर 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team' द्वारा 'सोशल मीडिया में आपत्तिजनक भाषा की पहचान और वर्गीकरण' पर OffensEval (SemEval 2019, कार्य 6) को प्रस्तुत प्रणालियों का वर्णन करता है। 13,240 अंग्रेजी ट्वीट्स का एक ट्विटर एनोटेट डेटासेट कार्य आयोजकों द्वारा व्यक्तिगत मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए प्रदान किया गया था, जिसमें छह अलग-अलग क्लासिफायरों से बने एक पहनावा मॉडल का उपयोग करके प्राप्त सर्वोत्तम परिणाम प्राप्त किए गए थे। पहनावा मॉडल ने क्रमशः उप-कार्यों A, B और C पर 0.7434, 0.7078 और 0.4853 के मैक्रो-औसत F1-स्कोर का उत्पादन किया। पेपर विभिन्न भाषाई विशेषताओं और सतह स्तर की गिनती सुविधाओं की समग्र कम भविष्यवाणी प्रकृति पर प्रकाश डालता है, साथ ही साथ एक पारंपरिक मशीन सीखने के दृष्टिकोण की सीमाओं को भी उजागर करता है जब डीप लर्निंग समकक्ष की तुलना में।", 'zh': '其论叙"NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team"与OffensEval(SemEval 2019,务6)"识类社交媒体犯性语言"之统。 务组织者包13,240条英语推文Twitter注数集,以练诸形,而用六等之获得最佳。 成形于子职 A、B 、 C ,生 0.7434、0.7078 、 0.4853 之宏观均 F1 分数。 本文调诸语言特征及阳水平计数之全体低预测性,及与深度学术相比机器学术之局限性。', 'ru': 'В статье описаны системы, представленные OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Task 6) на тему «Выявление и категоризация оскорбительного языка в социальных сетях» командой «NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team». Организаторы поставленной задачи предоставили в Twitter аннотированный набор данных из 13 240 английских твитов для обучения отдельных моделей, при этом наилучшие результаты были получены с использованием коллективной модели, состоящей из шести различных классификаторов. Модель ансамбля дала макросредние показатели F1 0,7434, 0,7078 и 0,4853 для подзадач A, B и C, соответственно. В статье подчеркивается общий низкий прогностический характер различных лингвистических особенностей и особенностей подсчета на уровне поверхности, а также ограничения традиционного подхода к машинному обучению по сравнению с аналогичным методом глубокого обучения.', 'ga': "Déanann an páipéar cur síos ar na córais a chuir an `NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team' ar fáil do OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Tasc 6) maidir le Teanga Ionsaitheach a Aithint agus a Chatagóiriú sna Meáin Shóisialta. Chuir na heagraithe tasc tacar sonraí anótáilte Twitter de 13,240 tweet Béarla ar fáil chun na múnlaí aonair a oiliúint, agus baineadh na torthaí is fearr amach ag baint úsáide as samhail ensemble comhdhéanta de shé aicmitheora éagsúla. Tháirg an tsamhail ensemble scóir F1 macra-mheánmhéide de 0.7434, 0.7078 agus 0.4853 ar Fhothascanna A, B, agus C, faoi seach. Leagann an páipéar béim ar nádúr íseal réamh-mheastacháin na ngnéithe teanga éagsúla agus na gnéithe comhairimh leibhéal an dromchla, chomh maith leis na teorainneacha a bhaineann le cur chuige meaisínfhoghlama traidisiúnta i gcomparáid le comhghleacaí Deep Learning.", 'el': 'Η εργασία περιγράφει τα συστήματα που υποβλήθηκαν στο OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Task 6) με θέμα "Αναγνώριση και κατηγοριοποίηση της προσβλητικής γλώσσας στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης" από την "NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team". Οι διοργανωτές της εργασίας παρείχαν ένα σύνολο δεδομένων με σχόλια στο Twitter από 13.240 Αγγλικά για την εκπαίδευση των επιμέρους μοντέλων, με τα καλύτερα αποτελέσματα που επιτυγχάνονται χρησιμοποιώντας ένα μοντέλο συνόλου που αποτελείται από έξι διαφορετικούς ταξινομητές. Το μοντέλο του συνόλου παρήγαγε μακρομεσαίες βαθμολογίες F1 των 0.7434, 0.7078 και 0.4853 στις Υποεργασίες Α, Β και Γ αντίστοιχα. Η εργασία υπογραμμίζει τη γενική χαμηλή προβλέψιμη φύση διαφόρων γλωσσικών χαρακτηριστικών και χαρακτηριστικών μέτρησης επιφανειακού επιπέδου, καθώς και τους περιορισμούς μιας παραδοσιακής μεθόδου μηχανικής μάθησης σε σύγκριση με ένα αντίστοιχο Βαθύ Μάθησης.', 'hu': "A tanulmány bemutatja az OffensEval (SemEval 2019, 6. feladat) részére benyújtott rendszereket `NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team által a támadó nyelv azonosítása és kategorizálása a közösségi médiában'. A feladatszervezők 13 240 angol tweetet tartalmazó Twitter-jegyzetekkel ellátott adatkészletet biztosítottak az egyes modellek képzésére, amelyek a legjobb eredményeket egy hat különböző osztályozóból álló együttműködési modell használatával érték el. Az együttműködési modell 0,7434, 0,7078 és 0,4853 makro-átlagos F1 pontszámokat eredményezett az A, B és C alkalmazásokon. A tanulmány kiemeli a különböző nyelvi jellemzők és felületi számú jellemzők általános alacsony prediktív jellegét, valamint a hagyományos gépi tanulási megközelítés korlátait a Deep Learning megfelelőkhöz képest.", 'ka': "დაახლოების შესახებ OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Task 6) სოციალური მედიაში `NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team' გამოსახულებული სისტემის განსახულება და კატეგორიზაცია. ტვირუტერის მონაცემები 13 240 ინგლისური ტივიტების მონაცემები იყო საქმე ორგანიზატორები, რომ ინდოეთიური მოდელების გასწავლა, რომლებიც საუკეთესო მოდელების გასწავლა, რომლებიც მაკრო განსაზღვრებული მოდელი 0,7434, 0,7078 და 0,4853 სამუშაო სამუშაო A, B და C-ზე გამოიყენება. პარამეტრები განსხვავებული ლენგურისტიკური ფუნქციების და სამყარო სამყარო ფუნქციების სამყარო მარტინური სწავლების განსხვავება და სამყარო სამყარო ფუნქციების განსხვავება, და სა", 'kk': "Қағаз OffensEval (2019 жарым жылы, 6- тапсырма) бағдарламасына 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team' деген 'Ашылмалық медиақтардағы көмектесу жүйелерді анықтайды. Твиттердің 13 240 ағылшын тійтіндегі деректер жинағы 13 240 ағылшын тійтіндегі тапсырмалар бақылаушылары бөлек үлгілерді оқыту үшін, алты түрлі классификациялардан құрылған енембул үлгісін қолдан Бұл үлгі макро орташа F1- нөмірлері 0, 7434, 0, 7078 және 0, 4853 бағдарламаларда A, B, C және C ішінде жасалды. Қағаз түрлі лингвистикалық мүмкіндіктерді және поверхностық деңгейіндегі мүмкіндіктерінің жалпы бақылау қасиеттерін, сондай-ақ түрлі оқыту қасиеттеріне салыстырғанда әдетті машинаның оқыту қа", 'it': "L'articolo descrive i sistemi presentati a OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Task 6) su `Identificare e Categorizzare il linguaggio offensivo nei social media' dal `NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team'. Un dataset annotato su Twitter di 13.240 tweet inglesi è stato fornito dagli organizzatori del compito per formare i singoli modelli, con i migliori risultati ottenuti utilizzando un modello ensemble composto da sei diversi classificatori. Il modello dell'ensemble ha prodotto punteggi F1 macro-medi di 0,7434, 0,7078 e 0,4853 rispettivamente sui sottocompiti A, B e C. L'articolo evidenzia la bassa natura predittiva complessiva di varie caratteristiche linguistiche e caratteristiche di conteggio di livello superficiale, nonché le limitazioni di un approccio tradizionale di apprendimento automatico rispetto a una controparte Deep Learning.", 'lt': 'Dokumente aprašomos sistemos, kurias „NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team“ pateikė OffensEval (2019 m. pusmetis, 6 užduotis) dėl „Nubaudžiamos kalbos nustatymo ir klasifikavimo socialinėje žiniasklaidoje“. Užduočių organizatoriai pateikė 13 240 anglų tweetų Twitter anotuotą duomenų rinkinį atskiriems modeliams treniruoti, o geriausi rezultatai gauti naudojant komplekso model į, sudarytą iš šešių skirtingų klasifikatorių. Pagal komplekso model į gautas atitinkamai 0,7434, 0,7078 ir 0,4853 makroekonominis F1 balas A, B ir C pakopose. Dokumente pabrėžiamas bendras nedidelis įvairių kalbinių savybių ir paviršiaus lygio skaičiaus savybių prognozavimas, taip pat tradicinio mašininio mokymosi metodo apribojimai, palyginti su gilaus mokymosi partneriu.', 'mk': 'Во весникот се опишуваат системите поднесени на OffensEval (SemEval 2019, задача 6) за „Идентификување и категоризирање на навредниот јазик во социјалните медиуми“ од „NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team“. Организаторите на задачите обезбедија компјутер на податоци од 13.240 англиски твитови на Твитер со анатизирани податоци за обука на индивидуалните модели, со најдобри резултати добиени со користење на модел на ансембл составен од шест различни класифи Моделот на ансемблот произведува макро-просечни F1-оценки од 0,7434, 0,7078 и 0,4853 на субзадачите А, Б и Ц, односно. Во весникот се истакнува целокупната ниска предвидлива природа на различни јазички карактеристики и карактеристики на бројот на површината, како и ограничувањата на традиционалниот пристап на машинско учење во споредба со колегата на Длабоко учење.', 'mn': 'Үүний сонинд OffensEval (2019 оны SemEval, Task 6) руу "Нийгмийн Мэдээлэл дээрх хамгийн чухал хэл мэдэх, хуваалцах" системийг тайлбарладаг. Твиттерүүд 13 240 Англи хэлний Tweets-ын өгөгдлийн санг зарцуулсан нь ажлын зохион байгуулагчид загвар загварыг суралцах зорилготой. Хамгийн сайн үр дүнг нь зургаан өөр хэлбэрээр бүрдсэн загвар загвар ашиглаж авсан Энэ загварын загвар нь үндсэн хэмжээст F1-тоо 0.7434, 0.7078, 0.4853 Subtasks A, B, and C дээр гаргасан. Энэ цаас нь хэлний хэлний чадваруудын, гадаргуу хэмжээний тоо болон уламжлалтын машин суралцах аргын хязгаарлалтыг харьцуулахад нийт бага таамаглалтай байдлыг тодорхойлж байна.', 'ms': "Kertas menggambarkan sistem yang dihantar kepada OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Tugas 6) pada `Identifikasi dan Kategori Bahasa Offensif dalam Media Sosial' oleh `NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team'. Name Satu set data yang dicatat Twitter dari 13,240 tweet Bahasa Inggeris disediakan oleh pengatur tugas untuk melatih model individu, dengan keputusan terbaik yang diperoleh menggunakan model ensemble yang terdiri dari enam pengklasifikasi yang berbeza. Model ensemble menghasilkan skor F1 makro-rata-rata 0.7434, 0.7078 dan 0.4853 pada Subtugas A, B, dan C, respectively. Kertas menyatakan sifat ramalan umum rendah berbagai ciri bahasa dan ciri kiraan tahap permukaan, serta keterangan pendekatan pembelajaran mesin tradisional bila dibandingkan dengan kontrak belajar dalam.", 'ml': "'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team' എന്ന സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയയില്\u200d 'സോഷ്യല്\u200d മെഡിയയില്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുകയും വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്ന ഓഫെന്\u200dസ്\u200cവാല്\u200d (സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019, ടാസ്ക് 6)  13,240 ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടീറ്റുകളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ടൂട്ടറില്\u200d വിവരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത തരത്തിലുള്ള ആറു വിഭാ ഏന്\u200dസ്മെയില്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നത് സുബ്ട്ടാസ്കുകളില്\u200d A, B, C എന്നിട്ടും 0. 7434, 0. 7078, 0. 4853 സ്കോര്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയതാണ്. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ മൊത്തം കുറഞ്ഞ പ്രവചിതമായ പ്രകൃതിയെയും ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ വിശേഷതകളെയും പ്രഖ്യാപിപ്പിക്കുന്നു, ആഴത്തിലെ പഠിക്ക", 'mt': 'Id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistemi ppreżentati lil OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Task 6) dwar “Identifikazzjoni u Kategorizzazzjoni tal-Lingwa Offensiva fil-Midja Soċjali” mill-“NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team”. Ġie pprovdut sett ta’ dejta annotat fuq Twitter ta’ 13,240 tweet Ingliż mill-organizzaturi tal-kompiti biex iħarrġu l-mudelli individwali, bl-aħjar riżultati miksuba bl-użu ta’ mudell ta’ ensemble magħmul minn sitt klassifikaturi differenti. Il-mudell tal-ensemble ipproduċa punteġġi F1 makro-medji ta’ 0.7434, 0.7078 u 0.4853 fuq is-Subkompiti A, B, u C, rispettivament. Id-dokument jenfasizza n-natura prevedibbli ġenerali baxxa ta’ karatteristiċi lingwistiċi varji u karatteristiċi tal-għadd tal-livell tal-wiċċ, kif ukoll il-limitazzjonijiet ta’ approċċ tradizzjonali ta’ tagħlim bil-magni meta mqabbel ma’ kontroparti ta’ Tagħlim Profond.', 'ro': "Lucrarea descrie sistemele prezentate OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Task 6) privind `Identificarea și categorizarea limbajului ofensiv în rețelele sociale' de către `NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team'. Organizatorii sarcinilor au furnizat un set de date adnotat Twitter de 13.240 tweet-uri în limba engleză pentru instruirea modelelor individuale, cu cele mai bune rezultate obținute folosind un model de ansamblu compus din șase clasificatori diferiți. Modelul ansamblului a produs scoruri F1 macro-medii de 0,7434, 0,7078 și 0,4853 pe subsarcinile A, B și C, respectiv. Lucrarea evidențiază natura predictivă generală scăzută a diferitelor caracteristici lingvistice și caracteristici ale numărului de suprafață, precum și limitările unei abordări tradiționale de învățare automată în comparație cu un omolog Deep Learning.", 'pl': 'W artykule opisano systemy zgłoszone do OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Zadanie 6) dotyczące identyfikacji i kategorizacji języka ofensywnego w mediach społecznościowych przez zespół NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team. Organizatorzy zadań dostarczyli komentowany na Twitterze zbiór danych 13,240 angielskich tweetów, aby przeszkoloć poszczególne modele, z najlepszymi wynikami uzyskanymi przy użyciu modelu zespołu składającego się z sześciu różnych klasyfikatorów. Model zespołu uzyskał makro-średnie punkty F1 o wartościach 0.7434, 0.7078 i 0.4853 na podzadaniach A, B i C. W artykule podkreślono ogólnie niski charakter predykcyjny różnych cech językowych i cech liczby poziomów powierzchni, a także ograniczenia tradycyjnego podejścia do uczenia maszynowego w porównaniu z odpowiednikiem Deep Learning.', 'sr': 'U novinama opisuju sisteme podignute OffensEval (pola Evala 2019, zadatak 6) o "Identifikaciji i kategorizaciji neposlušnog jezika u socijalnim medijima" od strane "NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team". Twitter je navodio spoj podataka od 13 240 engleskih tweeta koji su organizatori zadataka pružili da treniraju pojedinačne modele, sa najboljim rezultatima koji su dobili koristeći model ensemble koji se sastoji od šest različitih klasifikatora. Model ensembla je proizveo makro-srednje F1 rezultate od 0,7434, 0,7078 i 0,4853 na podzadatke A, B i C. U novinama se naglašava ukupna niska predvidljiva priroda različitih jezičkih karakteristika i ličnosti broja površine, kao i ograničenja tradicionalnog pristupa učenja mašina u usporedbi sa kolegom dubokog učenja.', 'si': 'පත්තරේ Offenseval (සෙම්වෙල් 2019, වැඩ 6) ගැන සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයාත්මකයේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා `NIT_Agertla_NLP_කණ්ඩායම් වලින්. ට්විටර් එක්ක ඇන්ග්\u200dරීසි ට්විට් 13,240 වල තියෙන දත්ත සෙට් එක්ක ප්\u200dරතිකාරකයන්ගේ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරකයෙන් පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන් වෙන එන්සෙම්බුල් මොඩේල් එකේ මැක්රෝවේජිත F1-ස්කෝර් 0.7434, 0.7078 සහ 0.4853 සබ්ටාක්ස් A, B, සහ C වලින්. The papers Highlight the overall low forecast ස්වභාවිතයේ විවිධ භාෂාවික සුළුවන් සහ පුළුවන් සුළුවන් සුළුවන්ගේ සුළුවන් සුළුවන් සුළුවන් සුළු', 'so': "Qoraalka waxaa ku qoran nidaamka OffensEval (SemEval 2019, shaqo 6) oo ku qoran `Identification and categorizing luqada Offensive ee Society' 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team'. Twitterka waxaa laga helay ururada shaqaalaha si ay u tababaridaan tusaalaha shakhsiga ah, taas oo ugu wanaagsan resultiyada lagu soo bandhigay tusaale ahaan oo ka mid ah lix fasax oo kala duduwan. Tusaale-bannaantu waxay u soo bandhigtay macro-average F1-score 0.7434, 0.7078 iyo 0.4853 oo ku qoran Subtasks A, B iyo C. Qoraalku wuxuu ku qoran yahay dabiicadda ugu hooseeya oo la hor dhigi karo qalabka luuqadaha kala duduwan iyo heerka sare ee surface, sidoo kale xuduudaha qaababka waxbarashada caadiga ah marka la barbaranayo iskuulka hoose u dhexeeya.", 'sv': "Uppsatsen beskriver de system som lämnats in till OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Uppgift 6) om `Identifiera och kategorisera kränkande språk i sociala medier' av `NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team'. En Twitter-kommenterad datauppsättning med 13 240 engelska tweets tillhandahölls av uppgiftsarrangörerna för att utbilda de enskilda modellerna, med bästa resultat erhållna med hjälp av en ensemblemodell bestående av sex olika klassificerare. Ensemblemodellen gav makrogränsade F1-poäng på 0,7434, 0,7078 och 0,4853 på deluppgifter A, B respektive C. Studien belyser den generella låga prediktiva karaktären hos olika språkliga funktioner och ytnivåräkningsfunktioner, samt begränsningarna för ett traditionellt maskininlärningsmetod jämfört med en motsvarighet till djupinlärning.", 'ta': "'NIT_ Agartala_ NLP_ Team' மூலம் 'சமூக ஊடகத்தில் அடையாளம் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தல் மொழியை அறிவிக்கும் முறைமைகள் OffensEval (SemEval 2019, பணி 6) க்கு வழங்கப்பட்ட அமைப்புகளை குறிப 13,240 ஆங்கிலத்தில் உள்ள தகவல் அமைப்புகள் தனிப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளை பயிற்சி செய்ய வேண்டிய சிறந்த முடிவுகளுடன், ஆறு வேறு வகுப்பாளர்கள் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட ஒர ஒப்புக்கோள் மாதிரி தொகுப்புகள் A, B, மற்றும் C, மேக்ரோ சராசரி F1- மதிப்புகள் 0. 7434, 0. 7078 மற்றும் 0. 4853 ஆக்கியது. இந்த தாள் மொத்த குறைந்த மொழி மொழி மொழி மொழி மொழி குணங்கள் மற்றும் மேல் நிலை எண்ணிக்கைகள் மற்றும் ஆழமான கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் இயந்திரத்தை ஒப்பிடும் ப", 'ur': "The paper describes the systems submitted to OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Task 6) on 'Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media' by the 'NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team'. ایک ٹویٹر نے 13,240 انگلیسی ٹویٹ کے ڈاٹ سٹ کو دکھایا تھا کہ ٹاکس سائٹر نے ایک شخصی موڈل کو ٹرین کریں، اس کے ساتھ چھ مختلف کلاسیٹر کے جوڑے ہوئے انگلیسی موڈل کے استعمال سے بہترین نتیجے حاصل کئے گ اِنسامبل موڈل نے 0.7434، 0.7078 اور 0.4853 کے متوسط میکرو-متوسط F1-اسکور پیدا کیے ہیں، ان کے متعلق A, B اور C پر. یہ کاغذ مختلف زبان شناسی ویژگی اور سطح سطح سطح کی ویژگی کے سارے کم پیش بینی کی طبیعت کو ہلاک کرتا ہے، اور ایک سنتی ماشین سیکھنے کی تقریبا کی محدود کرتی ہے جب ایک عمیق سیکھنے کے کنٹرپارت کے مقابلہ میں۔", 'no': 'Papiret beskriver systema som er sendt til OffensEval (halvEval 2019, oppgåve 6) om «identifisering og kategorisering av offensive språk i sosiale media» av «NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team». Ein Twitter-opplysningssett med 13,240 engelsk tweet vart oppgjeven av oppgåveorganisatorene for å trene dei enkelte modelane, med dei beste resultatene som er fått med ein ensemblemmodell som er lagt av seks ulike klassifikatorar. Den ensemblemmodellen produserte makro-gjennomsnittsverdiar med 0,7434, 0,7078 og 0,4853 på underoppgåver A, B og C. Papiret markerer den generelle låge foregåve naturen av ulike lingviske funksjonar og tale av overflata, og grensene på ein tradisjonell maskinelæringstilnærming når det sammenlignet med ein dyp læringskomponent.', 'uz': "Qogʻoz `NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team', `Society Media'da shaxsiy tilni aniqlash ва kategorishing tilida OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Vazifa 6) ga joʻnatilgan tizimlarni anglatadi. A Twitter annotated dataset of 13,240 English tweets was provided by the task organizers to train the individual models, with the best results obtained using an ensemble model composed of six different classifiers.  Name Qogʻoz har xil tillar xossalari va surface darajasi hisoblarining eng umumiy oldinga natijasi va o'rganish qismini o'rganish usulining chegaralarini va o'rganish qoidalarini qo'shiladi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy mô tả hệ thống được gửi tới OffensEvl (SemEvl 2009, Task 6) về "Nhận diện và phân loại Học sinh Nền Ý Phạm Tăng ở phương tiện xã hội" của nhóm "\'NIT\'trinh sát Agamortal u NLP\'\'. Một tập tin lưu trữ trên Twitter trong 13,240 Anh đã được trang bị bởi tổ chức tác động để huấn luyện các mô hình cá nhân, với những kết quả tốt nhất có thể đạt được nhờ một mô hình chung gồm sáu người phân loại khác nhau. Kiểu kết cấu sản xuất tạp siêu lục C1-điểm 0.744, 0.7078 và 0.483, con tàu SubNhắc A, B, và C. Tờ giấy nhấn mạnh bản năng tiên đoán thấp chung của nhiều tính năng ngôn ngữ khác nhau và tính năng đếm cấp mặt đất, cũng như giới hạn của một phương pháp học máy truyền thống so với một bản sao phát triển sâu học.', 'hr': 'U novinama opisuje sustave podignute OffensEval (pola ispitivanja 2019, zadatak 6) o "Identifikaciji i kategorizaciji neposlušnog jezika u društvenim medijima" od strane "NIT_Agartala_NLP_Teama". Twitter je navodio spoj podataka od 13 240 engleskih tweets koji su organizatori zadataka pružili kako bi obučili pojedinačne modele, s najboljim rezultatima koji su dobili koristeći model ensemble koji se sastoji od šest različitih klasifikatora. Model ensembla proizveo je makro-srednji F1 rezultati od 0,7434, 0,7078 i 0,4853 na podzadatke A, B i C. U novinama se naglašava ukupna niska predvidljiva priroda različitih jezičkih karakteristika i brojanja površine, kao i ograničenja tradicionalnog pristupa učenja strojeva u usporedbi s kolegom dubokog učenja.', 'bg': 'Статията описва системите, представени на "Идентифициране и категоризиране на офенсивния език в социалните медии" от екипа на "НИТ_Агартала_НЛП". Организаторите на задачите предоставиха анотиран набор от данни от 13 240 английски туита за обучение на отделните модели, като най-добрите резултати бяха получени чрез ансамбъл модел, съставен от шест различни класификатора. Моделът на ансамбъла произвежда макросреднени резултати от 0,7434, 0,7078 и 0,4853 за подзадачи А, Б и В съответно. Статията подчертава цялостния нисък прогнозен характер на различните лингвистични характеристики и характеристики на броя на повърхностните нива, както и ограниченията на традиционния подход за машинно обучение в сравнение с аналога за задълбочено обучение.', 'nl': "Het artikel beschrijft de systemen die bij OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Taak 6) zijn ingediend over 'Identificeren en Categoriseren van Offensieve Taal in Social Media' door het NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team'. Een geannoteerde Twitter dataset van 13.240 Engelse tweets werd door de organisatoren van de taken verstrekt om de individuele modellen te trainen, met de beste resultaten verkregen met behulp van een ensemble model bestaande uit zes verschillende classificatoren. Het ensemblemodel produceerde macro-gemiddelde F1-scores van respectievelijk 0.7434, 0.7078 en 0.4853 op Subtaken A, B en C. Het artikel benadrukt de algehele lage voorspellende aard van verschillende linguïstische kenmerken en oppervlakteniveau tellen kenmerken, evenals de beperkingen van een traditionele machine learning benadering in vergelijking met een Deep Learning tegenhanger.", 'da': "Artiklen beskriver de systemer, der er indsendt til OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Opgave 6) om `Identificering og Kategorisering af Offensivt Sprog i Sociale Medier' af `NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team'. Et Twitter-kommenteret datasæt på 13.240 engelske tweets blev leveret af opgavearrangørerne til at træne de enkelte modeller, med de bedste resultater opnået ved hjælp af en ensemblemodel bestående af seks forskellige klassificeringer. Ensemblemodellen producerede makro-gennemsnit F1-scorer på henholdsvis 0,7434, 0,7078 og 0,4853 på underopgaver A, B og C. Artiklen fremhæver den generelle lave forudsigende karakter af forskellige sproglige egenskaber og overfladeniveautællingsfunktioner samt begrænsningerne ved en traditionel maskinlæringstilgang sammenlignet med en Deep Learning modpart.", 'de': 'Der Beitrag beschreibt die Systeme, die OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Task 6) zum Thema "Identifizieren und Kategorisieren von Offensivsprache in Social Media" vom NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team eingereicht hat. Ein Twitter kommentierter Datensatz von 13.240 englischen Tweets wurde von den Aufgabenorganisationen zur Verfügung gestellt, um die einzelnen Modelle zu trainieren, wobei die besten Ergebnisse erzielt wurden, indem ein Ensemblemodell aus sechs verschiedenen Klassifikatoren verwendet wurde. Das Ensemblemodell produzierte makro-gemittelte F1-Partituren von 0.7434, 0.7078 und 0.4853 auf Teilaufgaben A, B und C. Der Beitrag beleuchtet die allgemein niedrige Vorhersage verschiedener linguistischer Merkmale und Oberflächenzählungsmerkmale sowie die Einschränkungen eines traditionellen Machine Learning Ansatzes im Vergleich zu einem Deep Learning Pendant.', 'id': "Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem yang dikirim ke OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Tugas 6) pada `Identifikasi dan Kategorisasi Bahasa Offensif dalam Media Sosial' oleh `NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team'.. Sebuah set data annotasi Twitter dari 13.240 tweet Inggris diberikan oleh organisasi tugas untuk melatih model individu, dengan hasil terbaik yang diperoleh menggunakan model ensemble yang terdiri dari enam klasifikasi yang berbeda. Model ensemble menghasilkan makro-rata-rata F1 skor 0,7434, 0,7078 dan 0,4853 pada Subtasi A, B, dan C, respectively. Kertas menyatakan keseluruhan sifat prediksif rendah dari berbagai karakteristik bahasa dan karakteristik penghitungan tingkat permukaan, serta batasan pendekatan belajar mesin tradisional ketika dibandingkan dengan kontrak belajar dalam.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم\u200cهایی را توضیح می\u200cدهد که به OffensEval (نیمه ۲۰۱۹، Task ۶) در مورد «شناسایی و تقسیم زبان ناتوانی در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی» توسط «NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team» ارائه داده شده است. یک مجموعه داده ای از ۱۳،۲۴۰ تویت انگلیسی که توسط سازمان\u200cکنندگان کار برای آموزش مدل\u200cهای شخصی آموزش داده شده بود، با بهترین نتیجه\u200cهایی که با استفاده از یک مدل انگلیسی ساخته شده از شش کلیسای متفاوت دریافت شده است. Model ensemble produced macro-averaged F1-scores of 0.7434, 0.7078 and 0.4853 on Subtasks A, B, and C respectively. این کاغذ طبیعت پیش بینی پایین از ویژه های زبان و سطح سطح مختلف و محدودیت یک دستور یادگیری ماشین سنتی را در مقایسه با یک همکاری دانش عمیق مشخص می کند.', 'ko': "이 논문은'NIT Agatala NLP 팀'이 Offenseval(SemEval 2019, 미션 6)에 제출한'소셜미디어에서의 공격적 언어를 식별하고 분류하는'시스템을 묘사했다.임무 조직자는 13240개의 영어 추문을 포함하는 트위터 주석 데이터 집합을 제공하여 각 모델을 훈련시키고 6개의 서로 다른 분류기로 구성된 통합 모델을 사용하여 최상의 결과를 얻는다.집적 모델이 하위 임무 A, B, C에서의 F1 성적의 거시적 평균치는 각각 0.7434, 0.7078, 0.4853이다.본고는 각종 언어 특징과 표층 계수 특징의 전체적인 저 예측성, 그리고 전통적인 기계 학습 방법이 깊이 있는 학습 방법에 비해 한계성을 강조했다.", 'sw': 'Gazeti hilo linaelezea mfumo uliotolewa kwa OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Kazi 6) juu ya “Kutambua na Kukataa Lugha Huli katika Vyombo vya Habari vya kijamii” na “NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team”. Kundi la taarifa za twita lililotangaza twiti 13,240 za Kiingereza lilitolewa na waandaaji wa kazi kuwafundisha mifano binafsi, na matokeo bora yaliyopata kwa kutumia mifano yenye wataalamu sita tofauti. Mfano huo ulitengeneza vipindi vya wastani vya F1 vya 0.7434, 0.7078 na 0.4853 kwenye Mipango ya A, B, na C. Gazeti hilo linaonyesha umuhimu wa utabiri wa chini kabisa wa aina mbalimbali za lugha na vipengele vya kuhesabu ngazi za juu, pamoja na vizuizi vya mbinu za kujifunza za kitamaduni ukilinganisha na mpinzani wa kujifunza ya kina.', 'tr': "Kagyzyň OffensEval'a (SemEval 2019, Görev 6) ýazylan syýasatlary `NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team' tarapyndan 'Soýunlar Maglumatynda Gaýratyn Dili tanyşdyrmak we bellenilýär. Twitter 13,240 Iňlis tuýtlarynyň hasaplanýan hasaplanýan sanlary beýleki nusgalary öwretmek üçin tassyklandyryldy. Asemble modeli macro-ortalanmış F1-kürleri 0.7434, 0.7078 we 0.4853 Subtasks A, B, we C üzerinde üretildi. Kagyzyň dürli lingwistiki we ýer derejesi üçin dürli tahmin edip biljek tebigatyny ýagtylaşýar, we dürli öwrenme suratynyň dürli maşynyň öwrenmesi üçin mugatlaryny ýagtylaşýar.", 'af': "Die papier beskrywe die stelsels wat aan OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Opdrag 6) ingestuur word op 'identifiseer en kategoriseer offensiewe taal in sosiale media' deur die `NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team'. 'n Twitter aangetekende datastel van 13,240 Engelske tweets was verskaf deur die taak organiseerders om die individuele modele te tref, met die beste resultate wat ontvang word deur 'n ensemblemmodel wat gesit is van ses verskillende klassifiseerders. Die ensemblemmodel het makro- gemiddelde F1- telling van 0. 7434, 0. 7078 en 0. 4853 geproduseer op Subtasks A, B en C, respectively. Die papier verlig die hele lae voorskoude natuur van verskillende lingwisiese funksies en oorskynlike vlak tel funksies, en ook die beperkings van 'n tradisionele masjien leer toegang wanneer vergelyk word met 'n Deep Leer-onderwerp.", 'sq': "Gazeta përshkruan sistemet e paraqitura në OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Task 6) mbi `Identifikimin dhe kategorizimin e gjuhës ofensive në media sociale' nga `NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team'. Një grup i të dhënave të shënuara në Twitter prej 13,240 tweets angleze u ofrua nga organizatorët e detyrave për të trajnuar modelet individuale, me rezultatet më të mira të arritura duke përdorur një model ensemble të përbërë nga gjashtë klasifikues të ndryshëm. Modeli i ansamblit prodhoi makro-mesatarisht rezultate F1 prej 0.7434, 0.7078 dhe 0.4853 respektivisht mbi nëndetyrat A, B dhe C. The paper highlights the overall low predictive nature of various linguistic features and surface level count features, as well as the limitations of a traditional machine learning approach when compared to a Deep Learning counterpart.", 'am': 'የፕሬዝቡ ሕዝባር `NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team› በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ውስጥ የሚታወቅና መግለጫ እና ክፍተቶችን በማኅበራዊ አውታር ላይ ወደ ኦፎensEval (SemEval 2019, ስራ 6) የሚሰጡትን ስርዓቶች ይናገራል፡፡ የኢንግሊዝኛ ትዊተሮች 13,240 የኢንጂልኛ ትዊተሮችን የሚያሳውቀው ዳታተር አሰራጆች የግንኙነታቸውን ሞላት ለማስተማር ሰጥተዋል፡፡ የሜኑባር ሞዴል በ.ኤ.B እና C በመጠቀም ማክሮ-ተቃውሞ F1-scores 0.7434, 0.7078 እና 0.4853 በመስኮቶች አ. የፕሮግራሙ ወረቀት የቋንቋዊ ጥያቄ እና የደረጃ ቁጥር ጥያቄ እና ከጥልቅ ትምህርት ተቃውሞ በተደረገ ጊዜ የባሕላዊ መሣሪያን ትምህርት ግንኙነትን ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ նկարագրված են համակարգերը, որոնք ներկայացվել են «ՕֆենսԵվալ 2019 թվականին (ՍեմԵվալ 2019 թվականի 6 խնդիր)», «Նիթ_Ագարտալա_ՆԼՊ_թիմ» կողմից «Նիթ_Արտալա_ՆԼՊ_թիմ» կողմից Թվիթերի գրված 13,240 անգլերեն թվիթերի տվյալների համակարգը տրամադրվել է առանձին մոդելների վարժեցնելու խնդիրների կազմակերպողների կողմից, որոնց լավագույն արդյունքները ստացվել են օգտագործելով վեց տարբեր դասակարգչային մոդել: Անցեմբլի մոդելը ստեղծեց 0.7434, 0.7078 և 0.4853 մակրոմիջին F1-գնահատականներ A, B և C ենթախնդիրներում: Այս թղթի վրա ներկայացնում են տարբեր լեզվաբանական հատկությունների և մակերեսային մակարդակի հաշվարկի ընդհանուր ցածր կանխատեսողական բնույթը, ինչպես նաև ավանդական մեքենային ուսումնասիրության սահմանափակումները, երբ համեմատում են Deep-Study', 'az': 'Kağıt OffensEval (2019-in yarım Eval, Task 6) sistemlərini `NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team\' vasitəsilə "Sosyal Media\'da Özülü Dili Kimlişdirmək və Kategoriyalandırmaq haqqında təsbiq edir. Tövratın 13 240 İngilizə tweets qurulduğu verilən verilən quruluş, individual modelləri təhsil etmək üçün təhsil edənlər təhsil etdilər, altı müxtəlif klassifiklərdən oluşan ensemble modeli vasitəsilə ən yaxşı nəticələri ilə alındı. Enemble modeli makro-ortalama F1-scores ürəkləndirdi, respectively A, B və C Subtasks üzerində 0,7434, 0,7078 və 0,4853. Kağıt müxtəlif dil özelliklərinin və səviyyə səviyyələrinin ən düşük təhlükəsini, həmçinin alışkanlı maşın öyrənməsinin təhlükəsi ilə qarşılaşdığı təhlükəsizlik təhlükəsini işıqlandırır.', 'bn': "এই পত্রিকাটির ব্যাখ্যা করছে অফিনসেনভাল (সেমইভাল ২০১৯, কাজ ৬) 'এনআইটি_এগার্তালা_এনএলপি_দল' দ্বারা 'সামাজিক মিডিয়ায় অফিসেন্স ভাষা পরিচিতি এবং বিভা ব্যক্তিগত মডেল প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য টুইটারে ১৩,২৪০ ইংরেজি টুইটের একটি তথ্য বিবৃতি প্রদান করা হয়েছে, যার ফলে ছয় বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন শ্রেণীবিভাগের মডে সাবটাস এ, বি এবং সি-এ ম্যাক্রো গড়ে ম্যাক্রো এফ১ স্কোর তৈরি করেছে। এই পত্রিকাটি বিভিন্ন ভাষাগত বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং সার্ভেস স্তরের বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং সংখ্যার সীমাবদ্ধতা এবং গভীর শিক্ষা প্রতিরোধের তুলনায় একটি ঐতি", 'bs': 'U novinama opisuju sisteme podignute OffensEval (pola Evala 2019, zadatak 6) o "Identifikaciji i kategorizaciji neposlušnog jezika u socijalnim medijima" od strane "NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team". Twitter je navodio spoj podataka o 13.240 engleskih tweets od strane organizatora zadataka da obuče pojedinačne modele, sa najboljim rezultatima dobijenim koristeći model ensemble koji se sastoji od šest različitih klasifikatora. Model ensembla je proizveo makro-srednje F1 rezultate od 0,7434, 0,7078 i 0,4853 na podzadatke A, B i C. U papiru se naglašava ukupna niska predvidljiva priroda različitih jezičkih karakteristika i obraćanja površine, kao i ograničenja tradicionalnog pristupa učenja mašina u usporedbi s kolegom dubokog učenja.', 'ca': 'El paper descriu els sistemes submetits a OffensEval (SemEval 2019, tasca 6) sobre "Identificar i categoritzar el llenguatge ofensiu als mitjans socials" per l\'"NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team". Els organitzadors de les tasques van proporcionar un conjunt de dades anotats a Twitter de 13.240 tweets anglesos per formar els models individuals, amb els millors resultats obtenits utilitzant un model d\'ensemble compost de sis classificadors diferents. The ensemble model produced macro-averaged F1-scores of 0.7434, 0.7078 and 0.4853 on Subtasks A, B, and C, respectively.  El paper destaca la baixa naturalesa preditiva global de diverses característiques lingüístices i característiques del nombre de nivells superficials, així com les limitacions d\'un enfocament tradicional d\'aprenentatge automàtic en comparació amb una contrapartida d\'aprenentatge profund.', 'cs': 'Příspěvek popisuje systémy předložené OffensEvalu (SemEval 2019, Task 6) na téma "Identifikace a kategorizace útočného jazyka v sociálních médiích" týmem NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team". Organizátoři úkolů poskytli na Twitteru anotovaný datový soubor 13,240 anglických tweetů s cílem trénovat jednotlivé modely, s nejlepšími výsledky dosaženými pomocí souborového modelu složeného ze šesti různých klasifikátorů. Souborový model vytvořil makro-průměrné F1 skóre 0.7434, 0.7078 a 0.4853 na dílčích úlohách A, B a C. Příspěvek zdůrazňuje celkově nízkou prediktivní povahu různých jazykových rysů a funkcí počtu povrchových úrovní, stejně jako omezení tradičního přístupu strojového učení ve srovnání s protějškem hlubokého učení.', 'et': 'Töös kirjeldatakse süsteeme, mis on esitatud "NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team" OffensEvalile (SemEval 2019, ülesanne 6) ründava keele tuvastamise ja kategoriseerimise kohta sotsiaalmeedias. Ülesannete korraldajad pakkusid individuaalsete mudelite koolitamiseks Twitteri annoteeritud 13 240 inglise säutsu andmekogumi, parimad tulemused saavutati kuuest erinevast klassifitseerijast koosneva ansambli mudeli abil. Ansambli mudel andis makrokeskmised F1-skoorid vastavalt 0,7434, 0,7078 ja 0,4853 alamülesannetel A, B ja C. Töös rõhutatakse erinevate keeleliste omaduste ja pinnataseme arvu omaduste üldist madalat prognoosimist ning traditsioonilise masinõppe lähenemisviisi piiranguid võrreldes sügavõppega.', 'fi': 'Artikkelissa kuvataan järjestelmät, jotka NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team on toimittanut OffensEvalille (SemEval 2019, Tehtävä 6). Tehtävien järjestäjät toimittivat Twitter-annotoidun aineiston, jossa oli 13 240 englanninkielistä twiittiä yksittäisten mallien kouluttamiseksi, ja parhaat tulokset saatiin käyttämällä kuuden eri luokittelijan muodostamaa ryhmämallia. Ryhmämalli tuotti F1-pisteitä 0,7434, 0,7078 ja 0,4853 alitehtävissä A, B ja C. Tutkimuksessa korostetaan erilaisten kielellisten ominaisuuksien ja pintatason laskentaominaisuuksien yleistä vähäistä ennakoivaa luonnetta sekä perinteisen koneoppimisen rajoituksia verrattuna Deep Learning -menetelmään.', 'he': 'העיתון מתאר את המערכות שנשלחו לאופנסEval (SemEval 2019, Task 6) על "Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Social Media" על ידי "NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team". תוצאות הטוויטר מצביעות של 13,240 טוויטרים אנגליים נותנו על ידי מאורגני המשימה לאמן את הדוגמנים האישיים, עם התוצאות הטובות ביותר שנקבלו באמצעות דוגמני אנסמבל המרכיב מ-6 מסמכים שונים. מודל האנסמבל יצר נקודות F1 בממוצע של 0.7434, 0.7078 ו-0.4853 על Subtasks A, B, ו-C, בהתאם. העיתון מזכיר את הטבע הנמוך הגבול של תכונות שפתיות שונות ומתכונות ספירת רמת השטח, כמו גם את הגבלות של גישה למידה מכונות מסורתית בהשוואה לשותף למידה עמוקה.', 'jv': "Perintah bener nggawe sistem sing nyimpen nggo offensinval (semi-inval 2011, task 6) nang 'Iwakke ngirim nggambar lan nganggo ingkang Ofensive' ning 'NIT_Anartala_NLP_Group' @item:checkbox Walian model sing wis kelompok macro-Averaged F1-points 0. Perintah punika dipunanggé kuwi nggawe perbudhakan kanggo kalagayaan karo pawarang languangka lan kuwi tindakan kuwi kapan kuwi, tambah nggawe ngurangke perusahaan sistem sing nyimpen karo paké nggawe gerarangke karo paké nggawe ngurangke tarjamahan", 'sk': "V prispevku so opisani sistemi, ki jih je ekipa NIT_Agartala_NLP_Team predložila OffensEval (SemEval 2019, naloga 6) na temo `Identifikacija in kategorizacija ofenzivnega jezika v socialnih omrežjih'. Organizatorji nalog so za usposabljanje posameznih modelov zagotovili 13.240 angleških tweetov z oznakami Twitter, najboljši rezultati pa so bili doseženi z uporabo ansamblskega modela, sestavljenega iz šestih različnih klasifikatorjev. Model ansambla je dosegel makropovprečne rezultate F1 0,7434, 0,7078 in 0,4853 za podnaloge A, B oziroma C. Prispevek poudarja splošno nizko napovedovalno naravo različnih jezikovnih značilnosti in značilnosti števila površinskih ravni ter omejitve tradicionalnega pristopa strojnega učenja v primerjavi s poglobljenim učenjem.", 'ha': "Kanarin na bayyana tsarin da aka saka zuwa ofenseval (SemEV 2019, Tafiyar 6) a kan `Ina iya gane da Kifĩfar Tilbake Farawa cikin Musamman da kuma `NIt_Agartala_NLP_Team'. A Twitter na sanar da data set of 13,400 littattafai na Ingiriya na ba da wahalar masu aikin su sanar da misãlai guda, da mafi kyaun matsalar da aka samu da wani misãlai na sifilafi 6. Moden da aka samu gwargwadon F1-score na 0.7434, 0.7078 da 0.4853 na Subtasks A, B, da C. Kanarin na ƙayyade abun littãfi mai ƙaranci na fassarar cikin linguistic da tsarin matsayin tarayya a baka, da kuma tsarin muhimman muhimmin karatun da za'a sanar da shi a ƙidãya idan an sammenliki da motsin da aka sani Depth.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལྟ་བུ་OffensEval (SemEval 2019, Task 6) ནི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་་དབྱེ་རིམ་འདོགས་པ་དང་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཡོད། ཌིས་ཌིར་གྱིས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་འགོད་སྡུད་13240 ཙམ་གྱི་ཟིན་བྲིས་བསམ་བྲིས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་འཛིན་པ་ཚོགས་ཀྱིས་སྒེར་གྱི་མིག་གཟུགས་རྩིས་བ་དང The ensemble model produced macro-averaged F1-scores of 0.7434, 0.7078 and 0.4853 on Subtasks A, B, and C, respectively. The paper highlights the overall low predictive nature of various linguistic features and surface level count features, as well as the limitations of a traditional machine learning approach when compared to a Deep Learning counterpart.'}
{'en': 'NLP@UIOWA at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : Classifying the Crass using Multi-windowed CNNs', 'fr': "NLP @UIOWA à SemEval-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: Classer le Crass à l'aide de CNN multi-fenêtrés", 'ar': 'NLP @ UIOWA في SemEval-2019 Task 6: تصنيف Crass باستخدام Multi-windowed CNNs', 'es': 'NLP @UIOWA en SemeVal-2019 Tarea 6: Clasificación de los burdos mediante CNN con ventanas múltiples', 'pt': 'NLP@UIOWA no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Classificando o Crass usando CNNs de várias janelas', 'ja': 'NLP @ UIOWA at SemEval -2019 Task 6: Multi - windowed CNNを使用したCrassの分類', 'zh': 'NLP@UIOWAňťĘSemEval-2019ňŐí6:šöĘňĄÜš¬ŚňĆúCNNCrassňłć', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 6 पर NLP@UIOWA: बहु-विंडो वाले CNN का उपयोग करके Crass को वर्गीकृत करना', 'ru': 'NLP@UIOWA на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Классификация Crass с использованием многооконных CNN', 'ga': 'NLP@UIOWA ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: An Crass a rangú ag úsáid CNNanna Ilfhuinneoga', 'hu': 'NLP@UIOWA 6. feladat: Az ütközés osztályozása többablakos CNN-ekkel', 'el': 'NLP@UIOWA Εργασία 6: Κατάταξη του Κρας με χρήση πολλαπλών παραθύρων', 'ka': 'NLP@UIOWA semiEval-2019 პარამეტრი 6: კლასიფიკაცია კრასის გამოყენებით მრავალ კვანტური CNN', 'it': 'NLP@UIOWA Task 6: Classificare la Crass utilizzando CNN multi-finestra', 'lt': 'NLP@UIOWA 6 užduotis – klasifikuoti avariją naudojant daugiakalbius CNN', 'kk': 'NLP@UIOWA 6- тапсырма: Көпшілік терезелерді CNN көмегімен Crass- ды классификациялау', 'mt': 'NLP@UIOWA - f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6: Il-Klassifikazzjoni tal-Crass bl-użu ta’ CNNs b’ħafna twieqi', 'ml': 'NLP@UIOWA സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ജോലി 6: പല ജാലകങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ക്രാസ്സില്\u200d ക്ലാസിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'NLP@UIOWA SemEval-2019 ажил 6: Олон салбарын CNN-г ашиглан Crass-г хуваалцах', 'no': 'NLP@UIOWA @ info: status', 'mk': 'NLP@UIOWA - на SemEval-2019 задача 6: Класификување на несреќата користејќи мултипрозори CNN', 'ms': 'NLP@UIOWA - di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Mengklasifikasikan Crash menggunakan CNN berbilang-tingkap', 'pl': 'NLP@UIOWA Zadanie 6: Klasyfikacja Crass za pomocą wielokiennych CNN', 'ro': 'NLP@UIOWA Sarcina 6: Clasificarea accidentului folosind CNN-uri cu mai multe ferestre', 'sr': 'NLP@UIOWA Na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 6: klasifikacija krasa koristeći viševjetrovne CNN-e', 'si': 'NLP@UIOWA සෙම්වේල්-2019 වැඩේ 6: ගොඩක් වතුරු CNNs භාවිතා විශේෂය කරන්න', 'so': 'NLP@UIOWA Shaqooyinka SemEval-2019 6: Kooxa Crass isticmaalaya CNNs', 'sv': 'NLP@UIOWA på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: Klassificera kraschen med hjälp av CNN med flera fönster', 'ta': 'NLP@UIOWA SemEval- 2019 பணி 6: பல- சாளரத்தில் CNNs பயன்படுத்தி கிராஸ் வகைப்படுத்தல்', 'ur': 'NLP@UIOWA سیم اول-2019 ٹاکس ۶ میں: Multi-windowed CNN کے استعمال سے کرس کا کلاس کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'NLP@UIOWA Comment', 'vi': 'NLP@UIOWA Tại Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-209 6: phân loại bo mạch bằng kênh đa gió', 'bg': 'NLP@UIOWA Задача 6: Класифициране на глупостите с помощта на многопрозорци', 'da': "NLP@UIOWA Opgave 6: Klassificering af kradsen ved hjælp af CNN'er med flere vinduer", 'de': 'NLP@UIOWA Aufgabe 6: Klassifizierung des Crasses mithilfe von CNNs mit mehreren Fenstern', 'hr': 'NLP@UIOWA U zadatku 6: klasifikacija krasa koristeći viševjetrovne CNN-e', 'nl': "NLP@UIOWA Taak 6: De Crass classificeren met behulp van CNN's met meerdere vensters", 'id': 'NLP@UIOWA  at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Classifying the Crass using Multi-windowed CNNs', 'ko': 'NLP@UIOWASemEval-2019 작업 6: 다중 창 CNN을 사용하여 CRA 분류', 'fa': 'NLP@UIOWA در کار ششم سال ۲۰۱۹: با استفاده از CNN\u200cهای متعدد تنظیم کراس', 'sw': 'NLP@UIOWA Katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 6: Kuweka baya kwa kutumia CNNN za Jukwaa', 'am': 'NLP@UIOWA ስራ 6:', 'sq': 'NLP@UIOWA - në SemEval-2019 Task 6: Klasifikimi i Crash duke përdorur CNN me shumë dritare', 'tr': 'NLP@UIOWA 2', 'hy': 'NLP@UIOWA Դադար', 'az': 'NLP@UIOWA SemEval-2019 Task 6: Multi-windowed CNN vasitəsilə Crass klasifikasyonu', 'af': 'NLP@UIOWA Na semiEval-2019 Opdrag 6: Klassifiseer die Kras met Multi-windowed CNN', 'bn': 'NLP@UIOWA সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের ৬: বহুজাতিক সিএনএন ব্যবহার করে ক্রাস ব্যবহার করে ক্লাস করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': "NLP@UIOWA - a SemEval-2019 tasca 6: Classificar l'accident fent servir CNN multifinestres", 'cs': 'NLP@UIOWA Úkol 6: Klasifikace Crassu pomocí víceokenních CNN', 'fi': 'NLP@UIOWA SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 6: Luokittaa roskat useilla ikkunoilla CNN:illä', 'bs': 'NLP@UIOWA U zadatku 6: klasifikacija krasa koristeći viševjetrovne CNN-e', 'et': 'NLP@UIOWA SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 6: Hullu klassifitseerimine mitme aknaga CNN-ide abil', 'jv': 'NLP@UIOWA UTC', 'sk': 'NLP@UIOWA Naloga 6: Razvrščanje neumnosti z uporabo CNN-jev z več okni', 'ha': 'NLP@UIOWA @ info: status', 'he': 'NLP@UIOWA - ב SemEval-2019 משימה 6: לקlassify the Crash using Multi-Window CNN', 'bo': 'NLP@UIOWA བགོ་སྤེལ་ལྕགས་ཅན་གྱི་ལཱ་གཡོག་༦：རྩིས་བ་འདི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྩིས་བ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་དབྱིབས་གཏོང་།'}
{'en': 'This paper proposes a system for OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), which calls for a system to classify offensive language into several categories. Our system is a text based CNN, which learns only from the provided training data. Our system achieves 80-90 % accuracy for the binary classification problems (offensive vs not offensive and targeted vs untargeted) and 63 % accuracy for trinary classification (group vs individual vs other).', 'ar': 'تقترح هذه الورقة نظامًا لـ OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6) ، والذي يدعو إلى نظام لتصنيف اللغة الهجومية إلى عدة فئات. نظامنا عبارة عن شبكة CNN تعتمد على النص ، والتي تتعلم فقط من بيانات التدريب المقدمة. يحقق نظامنا دقة 80-90٪ لمشاكل التصنيف الثنائي (الهجومية مقابل غير الهجومية والمستهدفة مقابل غير المستهدفة) ودقة 63٪ للتصنيف الثلاثي (المجموعة مقابل الفردية مقابل الأخرى).', 'es': 'Este artículo propone un sistema para OffensEval (Tarea 6 de SemEval 2019), que exige un sistema para clasificar el lenguaje ofensivo en varias categorías. Nuestro sistema es una CNN basada en texto, que solo aprende de los datos de entrenamiento proporcionados. Nuestro sistema logra una precisión del 80 al 90% para los problemas de clasificación binaria (ofensivo frente a no ofensivo y dirigido frente a no objetivo) y una precisión del 63% para la clasificación trinaria (grupo contra individuo frente a otro).', 'fr': 'Cet article propose un système pour OffenseVal (SemEval 2019 Task 6), qui demande un système pour classer le langage offensant en plusieurs catégories. Notre système est un CNN basé sur du texte, qui apprend uniquement à partir des données de formation fournies. Notre système atteint une précision de 80 à 90\xa0% pour les problèmes de classification binaire (offensif contre non offensif et ciblé vs non ciblé) et 63\xa0% de précision pour la classification trinaire (groupe vs individuel contre autre).', 'pt': 'Este artigo propõe um sistema para OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), que exige um sistema para classificar a linguagem ofensiva em várias categorias. Nosso sistema é uma CNN baseada em texto, que aprende apenas com os dados de treinamento fornecidos. Nosso sistema atinge 80 - 90% de precisão para os problemas de classificação binária (ofensivo versus não ofensivo e direcionado versus não direcionado) e 63% de precisão para classificação trinária (grupo versus indivíduo versus outro).', 'ja': '本稿では，不快な言葉をいくつかのカテゴリに分類するためのシステムを要求する， OffensEvalのためのシステム（ SemEval 2019 Task 6 ）を提案する．当社のシステムはテキストベースのCNNであり、提供されたトレーニングデータからのみ学習します。当社のシステムは、バイナリ分類の問題（攻撃的対非攻撃的対標的型対非標的型）で80〜90 ％の精度を達成し、三元分類（グループ対個別対他）で63 ％の精度を達成します。', 'zh': '本文为OffensEval(SemEval 2019 Task 6)建一统,当分犯性语为几类。 吾统乃文本之CNN,惟习数而已。 吾系统对二元分类(进攻性与非进攻性,针对性非针对性)之准确率至于80-90%,三元之类(群体与私)之准确率为63%。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर OffensEval (SemEval 2019 टास्क 6) के लिए एक प्रणाली का प्रस्ताव करता है, जो कई श्रेणियों में आक्रामक भाषा को वर्गीकृत करने के लिए एक प्रणाली के लिए कहता है। हमारा सिस्टम एक पाठ आधारित सीएनएन है, जो केवल प्रदान किए गए प्रशिक्षण डेटा से सीखता है। हमारी प्रणाली बाइनरी वर्गीकरण समस्याओं के लिए 80 - 90% सटीकता प्राप्त करती है (आक्रामक बनाम आक्रामक और लक्षित बनाम अनचाहे) और त्रिनी वर्गीकरण (समूह बनाम व्यक्तिगत बनाम अन्य) के लिए 63% सटीकता।', 'ru': 'В данной статье предлагается система для OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), которая призывает к системе классификации оскорбительных формулировок по нескольким категориям. Наша система основана на тексте CNN, который извлекает уроки только из предоставленных обучающих данных. Наша система достигает 80 - 90% точности для задач двоичной классификации (оскорбительные и не оскорбительные и целевые и нецелевые) и 63% точности для тринальной классификации (групповые и индивидуальные и прочие).', 'ga': 'Molann an páipéar seo córas le haghaidh OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Tasc 6), a éilíonn córas chun teanga ionsaitheach a rangú i roinnt catagóirí. Is CNN téacs-bhunaithe é ár gcóras, a fhoghlaimíonn ó na sonraí oiliúna a chuirtear ar fáil amháin. Baineann ár gcóras amach cruinneas 80 - 90% maidir le fadhbanna aicmithe dhénártha (ionsaitheach vs neamh-ionsaitheach agus spriocdhírithe vs neamh-spriocdhírithe) agus cruinneas 63% maidir le haicmiú triarach (grúpa vs duine aonair vs eile).', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი განახლება OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6) სისტემის სისტემის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც უნდა სისტემის კლასიფიკაცია განახლებელი ენის რამდენიმე კატეგორიაში. ჩვენი სისტემა ტექსტის ბაზაცია CNN, რომელიც მხოლოდ განახლებული განახლების მონაცემებით ვისწავლის. ჩვენი სისტემა 80-90% წარმოდგენა ბინარი კლასიფიკაციის პრობლემებისთვის წარმოდგენა (სტანსიგური განმავლობაში, არ განმავლობაში და მიზეზებული განმავლობაში) და 63% წარმოდგენა ტრინული კლასიფიკა', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει ένα σύστημα για την επιθετική γλώσσα (SemEval 2019 Task 6), το οποίο απαιτεί ένα σύστημα για την ταξινόμηση της προσβλητικής γλώσσας σε διάφορες κατηγορίες. Το σύστημά μας είναι ένα κείμενο που μαθαίνει μόνο από τα παρεχόμενα δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης. Το σύστημά μας επιτυγχάνει ακρίβεια 80 και 63% για την τριπλή ταξινόμηση (ομάδα εναντίον ατόμου εναντίον άλλου).', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány az OffensEval rendszerét javasolja (SemEval 2019 Task 6), amely egy olyan rendszert kér fel, amely a sértő nyelveket több kategóriába sorolja. Rendszerünk egy szöveges alapú CNN, amely csak a megadott képzési adatokból tanul. Rendszerünk 80-90%-os pontosságot ér el a bináris osztályozási problémák esetében (támadó vs nem sértő és célzott vs nem célzott) és 63%-os pontosságot ér el a háromsági osztályozás esetében (csoport vs egyéni vs egyéb).', 'it': "Questo articolo propone un sistema per OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), che richiede un sistema per classificare il linguaggio offensivo in diverse categorie. Il nostro sistema è una CNN testuale, che impara solo dai dati di allenamento forniti. Il nostro sistema raggiunge l'80 - 90% di accuratezza per i problemi di classificazione binaria (offensivo vs non offensivo e mirato vs non bersaglio) e il 63% di accuratezza per la classificazione trinaria (gruppo vs individuo vs altro).", 'mk': 'Овој весник предложува систем за OffensEval (SemEval 2019 задача 6), кој повикува на систем за класификација на офанзивниот јазик во неколку категории. Нашиот систем е базиран на текст на CNN, кој учи само од обезбедените податоци за обука. Нашиот систем постигнува точност од 80 до 90 отсто за бинарните проблеми со класификацијата (офанзивна против не офанзивна и целна против нецелна) и точност од 63 отсто за тринарната класификација (група против индивидуална против друга).', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз OffensEval жүйесін (2019 жылдың шегінші тапсырмасы) ұсынады. Бұл жүйесі бірнеше санаттарға қарсы тілді классификациялау үшін жүйесін шақыруды шақыру. Біздің жүйеміз CNN негіздеген мәтін, ол тек келтірілген оқыту деректерінен үйренеді. Біздің жүйеміз бинарлық классификациялық мәселелердің 80 - 90% дұрыстығын жеткізеді (қарсылық және қарсылық және қарсылық қарсылық қарсылық қарсылық қарсылық қарсылық қарсылық қарсылық қарсыл', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūloma OffensEval sistema (2019 m. SemEval 6 užduotis), pagal kurią raginama sistemą klasifikuoti offensinę kalbą į kelias kategorijas. Mūsų sistema yra tekstu pagrįstas CNN, kuris mokomas tik iš pateiktų mokymo duomenų. Mūsų sistema pasiekia 80–90 % tikslumą dviejų klasifikavimo problemų atveju (offensive vs non offensive ir targeted vs non targeted) ir 63 % tikslumą trijų klasifikavimo atveju (grupė vs individual vs other).', 'ms': 'Kertas ini melaporkan sistem untuk OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), yang memanggil sistem untuk mengklasifikasikan bahasa serangan ke beberapa kategori. Sistem kita adalah CNN berdasarkan teks, yang hanya belajar dari data latihan yang diberikan. Sistem kita mencapai kepekatan 80 - 90% untuk masalah kelasukan binari (serangan vs tidak serangan dan sasaran vs tidak ditetapkan) dan kepekatan 63% untuk kelasukan binari (kumpulan vs individu vs lain).', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jipproponi sistema għal OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), li titlob għal sistema li tikklassifika l-lingwa offensiva f’diversi kategoriji. Is-sistema tagħna hija CNN ibbażata fuq it-test, li titgħallem biss mid-dejta tat-taħriġ ipprovduta. Is-sistema tagħna tikseb preċiżjoni ta’ 80-90% għall-problemi ta’ klassifikazzjoni binarja (offensiva vs mhux offensiva u mmirata vs mhux immirata) u preċiżjoni ta’ 63% għall-klassifikazzjoni trinarja (grupp vs individwu vs oħrajn).', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഓഫെന്\u200dസ്\u200cവാലിനുള്ള ഒരു സിസ്റ്റം പ്രായണം ചെയ്യുന്നു (സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6), ഒരു സിസ്റ്റമിനെ പല വിഭാഗ നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റം സിഎന്\u200d എന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു ടെക്സ്റ്റേഷനാണ്. അത് പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്ന് മാത ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d 80 - 90% ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിശദീകരണത്തിനുള്ള വിശദീകരണത്തിനുള്ള പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭിക്കുന്നു (ആക്രമണവും ആക്', 'no': 'Denne papiret foreslår eit system for OffensEval (halvEval 2019 oppgåve 6), som fører til eit systemet å klassifisera offensivspråk i fleire kategoriar. Sistemet vårt er ein tekstbasert CNN, som berre lærer frå dei oppgjevne treningsdata. Sistemet vårt når det gjer 80 - 90% nøyaktighet for binærklassifikasjonsproblemet (offensiv mot ikkje offensiv og målet mot ugjennomsiktig) og 63% nøyaktighet for trenarklassifikasjon (gruppe mot individuelle mot andre).', 'pl': 'W artykule zaproponowano system dla OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), który wzywa do stworzenia systemu klasyfikacji języka obraźliwego na kilka kategorii. Naszym systemem jest CNN oparty na tekstach, który uczy się tylko na podanych danych treningowych. Nasz system osiąga dokładność 80×90% dla problemów klasyfikacji binarnej (ofensywna vs. nie ofensywna i ukierunkowana vs. nietargetowana) oraz 63% dla klasyfikacji trójczej (grupa vs. indywidualna vs. inna).', 'ro': 'Această lucrare propune un sistem pentru OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), care solicită un sistem de clasificare a limbajului ofensator în mai multe categorii. Sistemul nostru este un CNN bazat pe text, care învață numai din datele de instruire furnizate. Sistemul nostru obține o acuratețe de 80 - 90% pentru problemele de clasificare binară (ofensivă vs neofensivă și țintită vs neînarmată) și o acuratețe de 63% pentru clasificarea trinară (grup vs individual vs altele).', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6) системийг санал болгодог. Энэ нь системийг олон хэлбэрээр зөрчилдөг хэл хэлэхэд хичээлдэг. Бидний систем бол CNN-д суурилсан текст юм. Энэ нь зөвхөн сургалт өгөгдлийн мэдээллээс суралцдаг. Бидний систем хоёр дахь хэлбэрийн асуудлуудын тулд 80-90% зөв байдал гарч ирнэ (гэмт хэрэггүй, зорилготой эсвэл зорилготой эсвэл зорилготой эсвэл зорилготой эсвэл зорилготой) гурван хэлбэрийн зөв байдал (бүлэг', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže sistem za OffensEval (zadatak 6. polovice 2019), koji poziva za sistem da klasifikuje ofenzivni jezik u nekoliko kategorija. Naš sistem je tekst baziran na CNN-u, koji nauči samo od pruženih podataka obuke. Naš sistem postiže tačnost od 80 - 90% za binarne klasifikacije problema (ofanzivne protiv ne ofanzivne i ciljane protiv nenaražene) i tačnost od 63% za klasifikaciju trinarne klasifikacije (grupa protiv pojedinaca protiv drugih).', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ Offenseval (සෙම්වෙල් 2019 වැඩ 6) ගැන පද්ධතියක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒකෙන් පද්ධතියක් අපරාධ භාෂාව විශේෂ භ අපේ පද්ධතිය තමයි CNN අධාරිත පණිවිඩයක්, ඒක ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරධාන දත්තෙන් විතරයි. අපේ පද්ධතිය 80 - 90% විශ්වාස විශ්වාස ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ වෙනවා (අපරාධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ ව', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu soo jeedaa nidaam OffensEval (SemEval 2019 shaqo 6), kaas oo u yeeraa nidaam in luqada dembiga lagu kala qaybiyo kooxo kala duduwan. nidaamkayagu waa qoraal CNN oo ku saleysan, taas oo kaliya ka barta macluumaadka waxbarashada la siiyay. Isticmaddeenu wuxuu gaadhaa 80-90% saxda dhibaatooyinka kala qaybsiga labaad (dhibaatada dagaalka ka ka gees ah ama wax ka gees ah ka gees ah oo aan la isticmaalin) iyo 63% saxda fasalka saddexda (kooxda ka gees ah dadka kale).', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats föreslår ett system för OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), som kräver ett system för att klassificera stötande språk i flera kategorier. Vårt system är ett textbaserat CNN, som endast lär sig av de angivna träningsdata. Vårt system uppnår 80 - 90% noggrannhet för binära klassificeringsproblem (offensiv vs icke stötande och målinriktad vs icke målinriktad) och 63% noggrannhet för treenig klassificering (grupp vs individ vs andra).', 'ta': 'This paper proposes a system for OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), which calls a system to classify offensive language into several categories. எங்கள் அமைப்பு CNN அடிப்படையில் உள்ள உரையாகும், அது வழங்கப்பட்ட பயிற்சி தரவில் மட்டும் கற்றுக் கொள் எங்கள் அமைப்பு இருந்த வகுப்பு பிரச்சினைகளுக்கு 80 - 90% சரியாக பெறுகிறது (எதிர்பார்ப்பு மற்றும் எதிர்பாராத மற்றும் எதிர்பார்க்கப்படாத) மற்றும் மூன்', 'ur': 'This paper proposes a system for OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), which calls for a system to classify offensive language into several categories. ہمارا سیستم ایک ایسی سی ان کی بنیاد ہے جو صرف پیدا کیا گیا ترین ڈیٹے سے سکھاتا ہے۔ ہماری سیستم 80 - 90% دقیق پہنچتی ہے دوسری کلاسیک مشکلات کے لئے اور 63% دقیق ترین کلاسیک کے لئے۔', 'uz': "Bu hujjat ofensEval (SemEval 2019 Vazifa 6) uchun tizimni tahrirlaydi. Bu tizim bir necha turlarga offensiv tilni tizimga tayyorlash imkoniyatini yetarlicha talab qiladi. Bizning tizimmiz CNN asosida matn, bu faqat taʼminlovchi maʼlumotdan o'rganadi. Bizning tizimimiz ikkita darajalashtirish muammolari uchun 80 - 90% aniqlanishga ega bo'ladi (shaffoflik va hech qanday bo'lmaydi va uchincha darajaga 63% imkoniyatlar (guruhga vs boshqa guruhga boshqa.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đề xuất một hệ thống của OffensEvl (SemEvl Buổi bây giờ) đề nghị một hệ thống phân loại ngôn ngữ tấn công thành nhiều loại. Hệ thống của chúng tôi là một đài CNN dựa trên văn bản, chỉ lấy thông tin từ dữ liệu đào tạo được cung cấp. Hệ thống của chúng ta đạt độ chính xác 897-90 nhằm vào các vấn đề phân loại nhị phân (tấn công v. không tấn công và mục tiêu v. Chưa được phóng to) và 6T.', 'da': 'Denne artikel foreslår et system til OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), som opfordrer til et system til at klassificere offensivt sprog i flere kategorier. Vores system er en tekstbaseret CNN, som kun lærer af de leverede træningsdata. Vores system opnår 80 - 90% nøjagtighed for de binære klassifikationsproblemer (offensiv vs ikke stødende og målrettet vs uopdaget) og 63% nøjagtighed for treenig klassifikation (gruppe vs individuel vs andet).', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия предлага система за задача 6, която призовава за система за класифициране на офанзивния език в няколко категории. Системата ни е текстово базирана, която се учи само от предоставените данни за обучение. Системата ни постига 80 - 90% точност при проблемите с двоичната класификация (офанзивна срещу неофанзивна и целева срещу нецелева) и 63% точност при тройна класификация (група срещу индивидуален срещу друг).', 'nl': 'Deze paper stelt een systeem voor voor OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), dat oproept tot een systeem om beledigende taal in verschillende categorieën te classificeren. Ons systeem is een tekstgebaseerd CNN, dat alleen leert van de verstrekte trainingsgegevens. Ons systeem bereikt 80°90% nauwkeurigheid voor de binaire classificatieproblemen (offensief vs. niet offensief en gericht vs. onbedoeld) en 63% nauwkeurigheid voor trinaire classificatie (groep vs individu vs ander).', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže sistem za OffensEval (zadatak 6. polovične ocjene 2019), koji poziva sistem za klasifikaciju ofenzivnog jezika u nekoliko kategorija. Naš sustav je tekst baziran na CNN-u, koji nauči samo od pruženih podataka obuke. Naš sustav postiže tačnost od 80 - 90% za binarne klasifikacijske probleme (ofanzivne protiv ne ofanzivne i ciljane protiv neodređene) i tačnost od 63% za klasifikaciju trinarne klasifikacije (grupa protiv pojedinaca protiv drugih).', 'ko': '본고는 공격적 언어를 몇 가지 범주로 분류할 것을 요구하는 공격적 언어 시스템(SemEval 2019 Task 6)을 제시했다.우리 시스템은 텍스트 기반의 CNN으로 제공된 훈련 데이터에서만 배운다.우리 시스템은 이원 분류 문제(공격성과 비공격성, 목표성과 비목표성)에 대한 정확도는 80-90%에 달했고 삼원 분류 문제(단체와 개인과 다른 사람)에 대한 정확도는 63%에 달했다.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag wird ein System für OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6) vorgeschlagen, das ein System zur Einteilung offensiver Sprache in mehrere Kategorien fordert. Unser System ist ein textbasiertes CNN, das nur aus den bereitgestellten Trainingsdaten lernt. Unser System erreicht 80°90% Genauigkeit für die binären Klassifikationsprobleme (offensiv vs. nicht offensiv und zielgerichtet vs. ungezielt) und 63% Genauigkeit für die trinäre Klassifizierung (Gruppe vs. Individuum vs. andere).', 'id': 'Kertas ini mengusulkan sistem untuk OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), yang meminta sistem untuk mengklasifikasi bahasa offensive ke beberapa kategori. Our system is a text based CNN, which learns only from the provided training data.  Sistem kita mencapai akurasi 80 - 90% untuk masalah klasifikasi binari (offensive vs tidak offensive dan target vs tidak target) dan akurasi 63% untuk klasifikasi trinary (kelompok vs individu vs lainnya).', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linapendekeza mfumo wa OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Kazi 6), ambalo linatoa wito wa mfumo wa kutangaza lugha ya matusi katika makundi kadhaa. Mfumo wetu ni mfumo wa maandishi anayeishi na CNN, ambao unajifunza tu kutoka taarifa za mafunzo. Mfumo wetu unapata uhakika wa asilimia 80 - 90 kwa matatizo ya usambazaji binabinafsi (matusi dhidi ya mashambulizi na yanayolengwa dhidi ya watu wasiotazamwa) na asilimia 63 kwa usawa wa utamaduni (kikundi dhidi ya watu binafsi na vinginevyo).', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک سیستم برای OffensEval (Task 6 نیم Eval 2019) پیشنهاد می\u200cکند که به یک سیستم می\u200cخواد که زبان نافرمانی را به چند گونه\u200cها کلاس کند. سیستم ما متن بر اساس سین\u200cای است که فقط از داده\u200cهای آموزش داده شده یاد می\u200cگیرد. سیستم ما 80 - 90 درصد دقیق برای مشکلات مختصات دویینی (offensive vs. not offensive and targeted vs. unmarried) و 63 درصد دقیق برای مختصات سه درصد (گروه vs. فرد vs. بقیه).', 'af': "Hierdie papier voorstel 'n stelsel vir OffensEval (SemEval 2019 taak 6), wat roep vir 'n stelsel om offensivele taal in verskeie kategorie te klassifiseer. Ons stelsel is 'n teks gebaseerde CNN, wat leer slegs van die verskaf onderwerp data. Ons stelsel bereik 80 - 90% waarskynlik vir die binêre klasifikasie probleme (offensiv teen nie offensiv en doel teen onbepaalde) en 63% waarskynlik vir trinary klasifikasie (groep teen individuele teen ander).", 'sq': 'Ky dokument propozon një sistem për OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), i cili kërkon që një sistem të klasifikojë gjuhën ofensive në disa kategori. Sistemi ynë është një CNN bazuar në tekst, i cili mëson vetëm nga të dhënat e ushtrimit. Sistemi ynë arrin 80-90% saktësi për problemet e klasifikimit binar (ofensiv vs jo ofensiv dhe objektiv vs jo të caktuar) dhe 63% saktësi për klasifikimin trinar (grup vs individ vs të tjerë).', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz OffensEval sistemini (SemEval 2019 G철revi 6) ta첵첵arla첵ar, ol sistemi takyk dili birn채챌e kategori첵ara klasifikasynda 챌agyr첵ar. Bizi흫 sistemamyz CNN tabanly metin, ol di흫e temin edilen bilim maglumatyndan 철wren첵채r. Bizim sistemimiz ikili klasifikasyon problemleri i챌in 80-90% tam derecede ula힊ar (챌irkin d철w체rc체s체z ve hedefimiz yok edilmez) we 63% 체챌in takyk klasifikasyon 체챌in (grup we bireysel d철w체rc체s체z)', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም የኦፎensEval (SemEval 2019 ስራ 6) ስርዓት ማሰናከያ ቋንቋን በብዙ ክፍሎች እንዲለይ ጥሪ ያቀርባል፡፡ ስርዓታችን CNN የተመሠረተ ጽሑፍ ነው፣ የተጠቃሚ ትምህርት ዳታዎችን ብቻ ትማራለች፡፡ Our system achieves 80 - 90% accuracy for the binary classification problems (offensive vs not offensive and targeted vs untargeted) and 63% accuracy for trinary classification (group vs individual vs other).', 'hy': 'This paper proposes a system for OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), which calls for a system to classify offensive language into several categories.  Մեր համակարգը տեքստի հիմնված CNN է, որը սովորում է միայն տրամադրված ուսումնասիրության տվյալներից: Մեր համակարգը ստանում է 80-90 տոկոս ճշգրիտություն երկարագույն դասակարգման խնդիրների համար (գայթակղիչ և ոչ գայթակղիչ և նպատակային և ոչ նպատակային) և 63 տոկոս ճշգրիտություն երկարագույն դասակարգման խնդիրների համար (խմբի և անհատի', 'az': 'Bu kaƒüƒ±t OffensEval sistemini t…ôbliƒü edir (SemEval 2019 Task 6) ki sistemin bir ne√ß…ô kategoriya olaraq offensive dilini sƒ±nƒ±f etm…ôsini ist…ôyir. Bizim sistemimiz CNN tabanlƒ± bir m…ôtndir, bu ancaq t…ôhsil veril…ôn m…ôlumatlardan √∂yr…ônir. Sistemimiz ikili klasifikasyon probleml…ôrinin 80 - 90% d…ôqiqliyin…ô yetirir (offensive vs. offensive not targeted vs. undergeted vs. underged) v…ô 63% d…ôqiqliyin…ô √º√ß√ºnc√º klasifikasyon (grup vs. dig…ôr t…ôr…ôfind…ôn).', 'ca': "Aquest paper propon un sistema d'OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), que demana que un sistema classifique la llengua ofensiva en diverses categories. El nostre sistema és un CNN basat en text, que només aprenen de les dades de formació proporcionades. El nostre sistema aconsegueix una precisió del 80-90% per als problemes de classificació binaria (ofensiva vs no ofensiva i mirada vs no mirada) i una precisió del 63% per a la classificació trinària (grup vs individu vs altres).", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি অফিনসেনভালের একটি সিস্টেম প্রস্তাব করে (সেমইভাল ২০১৯ কাজ ৬) যা বেশ কয়েকটি শ্রেণীতে আক্রমণ ভাষাকে বিভাগে ব আমাদের সিস্টেম একটি টেক্সট ভিত্তিক সিএনএন, যা শুধুমাত্র প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য থেকে শিখে। আমাদের সিস্টেম বাইনারি শ্রেণীবিভাগের সমস্যার জন্য ৮০-৯০% সঠিকভাবে অর্জন করে (আক্রমণ এবং আক্রমণ এবং লক্ষ্যবস্তুতে বিপরীত নয়) এবং তৃতীয় বিভাগের জন্য ৩৩%', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predlaže sistem za OffensEval (zadatak 6. polovice 2019), koji poziva sistem za klasifikaciju ofenzivnog jezika u nekoliko kategorija. Naš sistem je tekst baziran na CNN-u, koji nauči samo od pruženih podataka obuke. Naš sistem postiže tačnost od 80 - 90% za binarne klasifikacije problema (ofanzivne protiv ne ofanzivne i ciljane protiv neodređene) i tačnost od 63% za klasifikaciju trinaca (grupa protiv pojedinaca protiv drugih).', 'cs': 'Tento článek navrhuje systém pro OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), který vyžaduje systém klasifikace urážlivého jazyka do několika kategorií. Náš systém je textový CNN, který se učí pouze z poskytnutých tréninkových dat. Náš systém dosahuje 80×90% přesnosti pro binární klasifikační problémy (útočné vs. ne útočné a cílené vs. neútočné) a 63% přesnosti pro trinární klasifikaci (skupina vs. jednotlivec vs. ostatní).', 'fi': 'Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ artikkelissa ehdotetaan OffensEval-jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ﾃ､ (SemEval 2019 Task 6), joka vaatii jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ﾃ､ luokitella loukkaava kieli useisiin luokkiin. Jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､mme on tekstipohjainen CNN, joka oppii vain annetuista koulutustiedoista. Jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､mme saavuttaa 80 - 90% tarkkuuden binﾃ､ﾃ､riluokitusongelmissa (hyﾃｶkkﾃ､ﾃ､vﾃ､ vs. ei hyﾃｶkkﾃ､ﾃ､vﾃ､ ja kohdennettu vs. tavoittamaton) ja 63% tarkkuuden kolmikantaluokituksessa (ryhmﾃ､ vs. yksilﾃｶ vs. muu).', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis pakutakse välja süsteem OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), mis nõuab süsteemi liigitamist solvava keele mitmesse kategooriasse. Meie süsteem on tekstipõhine CNN, mis õpib ainult esitatud koolitusandmetest. Meie süsteem saavutab 80-90% täpsuse binaarsete klassifikatsiooniprobleemide puhul (ründav vs mitte ründav ja sihitud vs sihtmärk) ja 63% täpsuse kolmepoolse klassifikatsiooni puhul (rühm vs individuaalne vs muu).', 'jv': 'Perintah iki nggawe sistem kanggo offensinval (seminval 2011 task 6), sing isih sistem kanggo kelas perusahaan langkung akeh kategori. Sistem dhéwé kuwi gambar teks sing sabanjuré, olèh mlaku mungkin kuwi data nggawe baléné. Sistem-sistem dhéwé iso dianggap karo pok asai melambah sing gak dhéwé (dinopakan karo hal-warni supayano ingkang artis terus iso terus-warni) lan sugoleh sing karo pak sampeyan terus-warni sing berarti dhéwé (kelompok sak barêng langgar-barêng)', 'ha': "Wannan takardar da ke buƙata wani na'urar wa ofenseval (SemEl 2019 Taimar 6), wanda yana kira na'urar da tsarin wata na'urar da kure ta cikin wasu ƙungiyõyi. @ info: whatsthis Yafukanmu yana sãmu tsari 80 - 90% wa masu cikin ma'abun fassarar biyu (abuni versa abubuwa kuma aka yi jiyya da shi bai yi bango ba) da tsari ga fasalin nau'in uku (jama'a versa jama'a guda na daban).", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek predlaga sistem za OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), ki poziva k sistemu za razvrstitev žaljivega jezika v več kategorij. Naš sistem je besedilni CNN, ki se uči samo iz zagotovljenih podatkov o usposabljanju. Naš sistem dosega 80 - 90% natančnost pri težavah z binarnim razvrščanjem (napadalni proti nežaljivi in ciljni proti neizvrščeni) in 63% natančnost pri trinarni razvrščanju (skupina proti posamezniku proti drugim).', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציעה מערכת עבור OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6), שמבקשה למערכת להקליף שפה פגיעה לכמה קטגוריות. המערכת שלנו היא CNN מבוססת טקסט, אשר לומד רק ממידע האימונים הנוסף. המערכת שלנו משיגה מדויקת של 80 - 90% לבעיות ההקלטה הבינרית (תקיפה נגד לא תקיפה ומטרה נגד לא תקיפה) ו-63% מדויקת להקלטה טרינרית (קבוצה נגד אדם נגד אחר).', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་OffensEval (SemEval 2019 Task 6) མ་ལག་གི་སྔོན་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་ལྟར་མ་ལག ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་ནི་རྨན་གཞི་བྱས་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ཞིག་རེད། བྱིས་འཛུགས་བྱས་པའི་གཞུང་ཕྱོགས་ལས་ཁོ་ན ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག'}
{'en': 'nlpUP at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : A Deep Neural Language Model for Offensive Language Detection', 'ar': 'nlpUP في SemEval-2019 المهمة 6: نموذج للغة العصبية العميقة لاكتشاف اللغة الهجومية', 'pt': 'nlpUP no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Um Modelo de Linguagem Neural Profunda para Detecção de Linguagem Ofensiva', 'fr': 'NLPUP à SemEval-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: Un modèle de langage neuronal profond pour la détection de langage offensant', 'es': 'NLPup en la Tarea 6 de SemEval-2019: Un modelo de lenguaje neuronal profundo para la detección de lenguaje ofensivo', 'ja': 'nlpUP at SemEval -2019 Task 6: A Deep Neural Language Model for Offensive Language Detection', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 6 पर nlpUP: आक्रामक भाषा का पता लगाने के लिए एक गहरी तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल', 'zh': 'NLPUP at SemEval-2019 务6:以进攻性言检深神经言模形', 'ru': 'nlpUP на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Глубокая модель нейронного языка для обнаружения оскорбительного языка', 'ga': 'nlpUP ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Samhail Dhoimhne Nearach Teanga le Teangacha Ionsaitheach a Bhrath', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'nlpUP a SemEval-2019 6. feladat: Egy mély neurális nyelvi modell a támadó nyelv felismeréséhez', 'it': 'nlpUP a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Un modello di linguaggio neurale profondo per il rilevamento del linguaggio offensivo', 'kk': 'nlpUP шегінші тапсырма 6: Тілді анықтау үшін түсті нейрондық тіл үлгісі', 'lt': 'nlpUP SemEval-2019 6 užduotis: gilios nervinės kalbos modelis pažeidžiamai kalbai nustatyti', 'el': 'Εργασία 6: Ένα μοντέλο βαθιάς νευρωνικής γλώσσας για την ανίχνευση προσβλητικής γλώσσας', 'mk': 'nlpUP на SemEval-2019 задача 6: Длабок неурален јазик модел за детекција на навредлив јазик', 'ms': 'nlpUP pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Model Bahasa Neural Dalam Dalam untuk Pengesanan Bahasa Meninggal', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6: ഒരു ആഴത്തിലെ നെയുറല്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d ഓഫെന്\u200dസിവ് ഭാഷ ഡിറ്റീഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'nlpUP f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6: Mudell ta’ Lingwa Newrali Profonda għad-Detezzjoni tal-Lingwa Offensiva', 'mn': 'nlpUP at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A Deep Neural Language Model for Offensive Language Detection', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'nlpUP w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 6: Głęboki model języka neuronowego do wykrywania języka obraźliwego', 'ro': 'nlpUP la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: Un model profund de limbaj neural pentru detectarea limbajului ofensiv', 'sr': 'nlpUP na semiEval-2019 Task 6: Duboki neuronski model za otkrivanje službenog jezika', 'si': 'nlpUP at Halfeval-2019 Job 6: A Deep neural language Model for Offensive language Detection', 'so': 'nlpUP at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A Deg Neural Model of Finnish Offensive Language', 'sv': 'nlpUP på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: En djup neural språkmodell för detektering av stötande språk', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 6: A Deep Neural Language Model for Offensive Language Detection', 'ur': 'nlpUP at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A Deep Neural Language Model for Offensive Language Detection', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifani 6: A Deep Neural Language Model for Offensive Language Detection', 'vi': 'Tập tin tại SemEvl-tê 9 Task 6: A Deep Neural Language Model for Offtạp Languagetrinh sát', 'bg': 'Задача 6: Дълбок неврален езиков модел за откриване на офанзивен език', 'da': 'nlpUP på SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: En dyb neural sprogmodel til detektering af offensiv sprog', 'nl': 'nlpUP bij SemEval-2019 Taak 6: Een diep neuraal taalmodel voor offensieve taaldetectie', 'hr': 'nlpUP na semiEval-2019 zadatak 6: Duboki neuronski model za otkrivanje službenog jezika', 'de': 'nlpUP at SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 6: Ein tiefes neuronales Sprachmodell zur Erkennung offensiver Sprache', 'id': 'nlpUP di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Sebuah Model Bahasa Neural Dalam Dalam Untuk Deteksi Bahasa Tersinggung', 'ko': 'nlpUP가SemEval-2019퀘스트6: 공격적 언어 검측의 심층 신경 언어 모델', 'fa': 'Comment', 'sw': 'nlpUP katika SemEval-2019 Task 6: A Deep Neural Model of Language for Detective Offensive Language', 'tr': 'nlpUP at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A Deep Neural Language Model for Offensive Language Detection', 'af': "nlpUP by SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 6: ' n Deep Neurale Taal Model vir Offensive Taal Deteksie", 'sq': 'nlpUP at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A Deep Neural Language Model for Offensive Language Detection', 'am': 'Eval-2019 ስራ 6: A Deep Neural Language Model for Offensive language Detection', 'hy': 'nlpUP-ը Halewal-2019-ի 6. գործում. խորը նյարդային լեզվի մոդել օֆենսիվ լեզվի հայտնաբերման համար', 'bn': 'SemEval-2019 কাজ 6: অফিসেন্টিভ ভ ভাষা সনাক্তির জন্য একটি গভীর নিউরেল ভাষা মডেল', 'bs': 'nlpUP na semiEval-2019 zadatak 6: Duboki neuronski model za otkrivanje neposlušnog jezika', 'ca': 'nlpUP a SemEval-2019 tasca 6: Un model de llenguatge neuronal profund per detectar llenguatges ofensius', 'cs': 'nlpUP na SemEval-2019 Úkol 6: Model hlubokého neuronového jazyka pro detekci urážlivého jazyka', 'et': 'nlpUP SemEval-2019 ülesanne 6: sügav neuraalne keele mudel ründava keele tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'nlpUP SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 6: Syvä hermokielimalli hyökkäävän kielen havaitsemiseen', 'az': 'nlpUP at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A Deep Neural Language Model for Offensive Language Detection', 'jv': 'NlpUT at semiinval-2011 task 6: A deep Neral Language model for offensive Language detection', 'ha': 'nlpUP at SemEal-2019 Tafiyar 6: A Depth Neural Model for Definitive Lugha', 'sk': 'nlpUP na SemEval-2019 Naloga 6: Model globokega živčnega jezika za odkrivanje napadalnega jezika', 'he': 'nlpUP ב SemEval-2019 משימה 6: מודל שפת עצבית עמוקה', 'bo': 'nlpUP at SemEval-2019 Task 6: A Deep Neural Language Model for Offensive Language Detection'}
{'en': 'This paper presents our submission for the SemEval shared task 6, sub-task A on the identification of offensive language. Our proposed model, C-BiGRU, combines a Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) with a bidirectional Recurrent Neural Network (RNN). We utilize word2vec to capture the semantic similarities between words. This composition allows us to extract long term dependencies in tweets and distinguish between offensive and non-offensive tweets. In addition, we evaluate our approach on a different dataset and show that our model is capable of detecting online aggressiveness in both English and German tweets. Our model achieved a macro F1-score of 79.40 % on the SemEval dataset.', 'es': 'Este documento presenta nuestra presentación para la tarea compartida 6 de SemEval, subtarea A sobre la identificación del lenguaje ofensivo. Nuestro modelo propuesto, C-Bigru, combina una red neuronal convolucional (CNN) con una red neuronal recurrente (RNN) bidireccional. Utilizamos word2vec para capturar las similitudes semánticas entre las palabras. Esta composición nos permite extraer dependencias a largo plazo en los tuits y distinguir entre tuits ofensivos y no ofensivos. Además, evaluamos nuestro enfoque en un conjunto de datos diferente y demostramos que nuestro modelo es capaz de detectar la agresividad en línea tanto en tuits en inglés como en alemán. Nuestro modelo logró una puntuación F1 macro de 79.40% en el conjunto de datos SemEval.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta nossa submissão para a tarefa compartilhada 6 do SemEval, subtarefa A sobre identificação de linguagem ofensiva. Nosso modelo proposto, C-BiGRU, combina uma Rede Neural Convolucional (CNN) com uma Rede Neural Recorrente (RNN) bidirecional. Utilizamos o word2vec para capturar as semelhanças semânticas entre as palavras. Essa composição nos permite extrair dependências de longo prazo nos tweets e distinguir entre tweets ofensivos e não ofensivos. Além disso, avaliamos nossa abordagem em um conjunto de dados diferente e mostramos que nosso modelo é capaz de detectar agressividade online em tweets em inglês e alemão. Nosso modelo alcançou um macro F1-score de 79,40% no conjunto de dados SemEval.', 'fr': "Cet article présente notre soumission pour la tâche partagée 6 de SemEval, sous-tâche A sur l'identification du langage offensant. Notre modèle proposé, C-BigRU, combine un réseau neuronal convolutif (CNN) avec un réseau neuronal récurrent bidirectionnel (RNN). Nous utilisons word2vec pour capturer les similitudes sémantiques entre les mots. Cette composition nous permet d'extraire les dépendances à long terme dans les tweets et de faire la distinction entre les tweets offensants et non offensants. En outre, nous évaluons notre approche sur un ensemble de données différent et montrons que notre modèle est capable de détecter l'agressivité en ligne dans les tweets en anglais et en allemand. Notre modèle a obtenu un score macro F1 de 79,40\xa0% sur l'ensemble de données SemEval.", 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة تقديمنا لمهمة SemEval المشتركة 6 ، المهمة الفرعية أ حول تحديد اللغة الهجومية. نموذجنا المقترح ، C-BiGRU ، يجمع بين شبكة عصبية تلافيفية (CNN) مع شبكة عصبية متكررة ثنائية الاتجاه (RNN). نحن نستخدم word2vec لالتقاط أوجه التشابه الدلالية بين الكلمات. تسمح لنا هذه التركيبة باستخراج التبعيات طويلة المدى في التغريدات والتمييز بين التغريدات المسيئة وغير المسيئة. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نقوم بتقييم نهجنا على مجموعة بيانات مختلفة ونوضح أن نموذجنا قادر على اكتشاف العدوانية عبر الإنترنت في كل من التغريدات الإنجليزية والألمانية. حقق نموذجنا درجة ماكرو F1 بلغت 79.40٪ على مجموعة بيانات SemEval.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval साझा कार्य 6, उप-कार्य ए के लिए आक्रामक भाषा की पहचान पर हमारे सबमिशन प्रस्तुत करता है। हमारे प्रस्तावित मॉडल, C-BiGRU, एक द्विदिश आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (RNN) के साथ एक Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (सीएनएन) को जोड़ती है। हम शब्दों के बीच शब्दार्थ समानताओं को पकड़ने के लिए Word2vec का उपयोग करते हैं। यह रचना हमें ट्वीट्स में दीर्घकालिक निर्भरताओं को निकालने और आक्रामक और गैर-आक्रामक ट्वीट्स के बीच अंतर करने की अनुमति देती है। इसके अलावा, हम एक अलग डेटासेट पर हमारे दृष्टिकोण का मूल्यांकन करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल अंग्रेजी और जर्मन दोनों ट्वीट्स में ऑनलाइन आक्रामकता का पता लगाने में सक्षम है। हमारे मॉडल ने SemEval डेटासेट पर 79.40% का एक मैक्रो F1-स्कोर हासिल किया।', 'ja': '本稿では、不快な言葉の識別に関するSemEval共有タスク6、サブタスクAの提出物を紹介します。当社の提案モデルであるC - BiGRUは、畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ CNN ）と双方向再帰ニューラルネットワーク（ RNN ）を組み合わせています。私たちはword 2 vecを利用して、単語間の意味的な類似性を取り込んでいます。この構成により、ツイートで長期的な依存関係を抽出し、攻撃的なツイートと非攻撃的なツイートを区別することができます。さらに、異なるデータセット上のアプローチを評価し、当社のモデルが英語とドイツ語の両方のツイートでオンライン攻撃性を検出できることを示します。私たちのモデルは、SemEvalデータセットで79.40 ％のマクロF 1スコアを達成しました。', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе представлено наше представление по совместной задаче 6 SemEval, подзадача А по идентификации оскорбительных формулировок. Наша предлагаемая модель, C-BiGRU, объединяет сверточную нейронную сеть (CNN) с двунаправленной рекуррентной нейронной сетью (RNN). Мы используем word2vec, чтобы зафиксировать семантическое сходство между словами. Эта композиция позволяет нам извлекать долгосрочные зависимости в твитах и различать оскорбительные и ненаступательные твиты. Кроме того, мы оцениваем наш подход на другом наборе данных и показываем, что наша модель способна обнаруживать агрессивность онлайн как в английских, так и в немецких твитах. Наша модель достигла макрорезультата F1 79,40% на наборе данных SemEval.', 'zh': '本文引SemEval共同任务6识犯性语言子职A。 臣等所陈C-BiGRU将卷积神经网络(CNN)与双向递归神经网络(RNN)合。 因word2vec以获单词间语义相似性。 使我能取推文之久恃,而别其犯性与非犯推文。 异数集上估吾法,明吾模形以检英语德语推文之在线攻击性也。 吾法于SemEval数集上得79.40%之宏观F1数。', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo ár n-aighneacht i láthair do thasc comhroinnte 6 SemEval, fothasc A ar shainaithint teanga maslach. Comhcheanglaíonn ár múnla atá beartaithe, C-BiGRU, Líonra Néarthach Comhtháite (CNN) le Líonra Néarach Athfhillteach déthreo (RNN). Bainimid úsáid as word2vec chun na cosúlachtaí shéimeantacha idir focail a ghabháil. Ligeann an comhdhéanamh seo dúinn spleáchas fadtéarmach a bhaint as tweets agus idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir tvuíteanna maslacha agus neamh-ionsaitheacha. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid meastóireacht ar ár gcur chuige maidir le tacar sonraí eile agus léirímid go bhfuil ár múnla in ann ionsaitheacht ar líne a bhrath i dtvuíteanna Béarla agus Gearmáinise araon. Bhain ár múnla macra-scór F1 de 79.40% amach ar thacar sonraí SemEval.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 6. közös feladatát, a sértő nyelv azonosításáról szóló A. alprogramot. Javasolt modellünk, a C-BiGRU egy konvolúciós neurális hálózatot (CNN) és egy kétirányú ismétlődő neurális hálózatot (RNN) kombinál. A word2vec segítségével rögzítjük a szavak közötti szemantikai hasonlóságokat. Ez a kompozíció lehetővé teszi számunkra, hogy kivonjuk a hosszú távú függőségeket a tweetekben, és megkülönböztessük a sértő és nem sértő tweeteket. Ezenkívül egy másik adatkészleten értékeljük megközelítésünket, és megmutatjuk, hogy modellünk képes felismerni az online agresszivitást mind angol, mind német tweetekben. Modellünk 79,40%-os makro F1 pontszámot ért el a SemEval adatkészleten.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει την υποβολή μας για το κοινό έργο 6, υπο-έργο Α για τον προσδιορισμό προσβλητικής γλώσσας. Το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο μας, συνδυάζει ένα Σύλληπτο Νευρικό Δίκτυο (ΚΝΝ) με ένα αμφίδρομο Επαναστατικό Νευρικό Δίκτυο (RNN). Χρησιμοποιούμε για να συλλάβουμε τις σημασιολογικές ομοιότητες μεταξύ λέξεων. Αυτή η σύνθεση μας επιτρέπει να εξάγουμε μακροπρόθεσμες εξαρτήσεις στα tweets και να διακρίνουμε μεταξύ προσβλητικών και μη προσβλητικών tweets. Επιπλέον, αξιολογούμε την προσέγγισή μας σε διαφορετικό σύνολο δεδομένων και αποδεικνύουμε ότι το μοντέλο μας είναι ικανό να ανιχνεύσει διαδικτυακή επιθετικότητα τόσο στα αγγλικά όσο και στα γερμανικά tweets. Το μοντέλο μας πέτυχε μακρο F1-βαθμολογία 79,40% στο σύνολο δεδομένων SemEval.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი ჩვენი სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო A სამუშაო ჩვენი მოდელ C-BiGRU, კონგულოციალური ნეიროლური ქსელი (CNN) კომბიუნტურაციალური ნეიროლური ქსელი (RNN) ერთად დაკავშირება. ჩვენ გამოყენებთ სიტყვას 2vec, რომელიც სიტყვას შიმანტიკური განსხვავებას. ეს კომპოზიცია გვაქვს, რომ ჩვენ ძალიან სიმართლე დაახლოებით ტვირში და განსხვავებას განსხვავებას განსხვავებას განსხვავებას და არ განსხვავებას. დამატებით, ჩვენ განსხვავებული მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას გავამუშავებთ და ჩვენი მოდელი შეუძლებელია ინგლისური და გერმანური ტივიტებში ინგლისური ადრესიგურაციას გან ნაქთწრ მჲევლ ეჲჟრთდნა მაკპჲ F1-ჟოაპრ ნა 79,40% ნა ჟვმვგალჟკთწ ჟოაპრ.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta la nostra presentazione per il compito condiviso di SemEval 6, sottocompito A sull'identificazione del linguaggio offensivo. Il nostro modello proposto, C-BiGRU, combina una Rete Neurale Convoluzionale (CNN) con una Rete Neurale Ricurrente bidirezionale (RNN). Utilizziamo word2vec per catturare le somiglianze semantiche tra le parole. Questa composizione ci permette di estrarre dipendenze a lungo termine nei tweet e distinguere tra tweet offensivi e non offensivi. Inoltre, valutiamo il nostro approccio su un set di dati diverso e dimostriamo che il nostro modello è in grado di rilevare l'aggressività online sia nei tweet inglesi che tedeschi. Il nostro modello ha ottenuto un punteggio macro F1 del 79,40% sul set di dati SemEval.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 6- ортақ тапсырманың "SemEval" жіберілімізді, A- ның ішкі тапсырмасы "offensive language" дегенді анықтау үшін көрсетеді. Біздің келтірілген моделіміз, C- BiGRU, конверсионалды нейрондық желі (CNN) екінші қайталанатын нейрондық желі (RNN) мен біріктіреді. Біз сөздер арасындағы семантикалық ұқсас сөздерді алу үшін 2vec сөздерді қолданамыз. Бұл құрылғы бізге уақыт тәуелсіздіктерді tweetтерде тарқатуға мүмкіндік береді және қарсылық және қарсылық емес tweetтер арасында айыру үшін. Қосымша, біз өзіміздің тәсілімізді басқа деректер жиынына бағалап, онлайн агрессивнісін ағылшын және неміс tweets тізімдерінде анықтауға мүмкіндік береміз. Біздің үлгіміз SemEval деректер жиынында 79,40% макро F1 деңгейін жетті.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatomas mūsų pasiūlymas dėl bendros 6-osios „SemEval“ užduoties, A-osios užduoties dėl įžeidžiančios kalbos nustatymo. Mūsų siūlomas modelis, C-BiGRU, jungia konvoliucinį nervų tinklą (CNN) su dvikryptiniu pakartotiniu nervų tinklu (RNN). We utilize word2vec to capture the semantic similarities between words.  Ši sudėtis leidžia mums išskirti ilgalaikes priklausomybes tweetuose ir atskirti offensinius ir ne offensinius tweetus. Be to, vertiname savo požiūrį į skirtingą duomenų rinkinį ir parodome, kad mūsų model is gali nustatyti agresyvumą internete tiek anglų, tiek vokiečių tweetuose. Mūsų modelis pasiekė 79,40 % makro F1 rezultatą pagal SemEval duomenų rinkinį.', 'mk': 'Овој документ го претставува нашето поднесување за заедничката задача 6, подзадача А за идентификација на офанзивниот јазик. Our proposed model, C-BiGRU, combines a Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) with a bidirectional Recurrent Neural Network (RNN).  Ги користиме зборовите 2vec за да ги фатиме семантичните сличности меѓу зборовите. Оваа композиција ни овозможува да извлечеме долгорочни зависности на твитови и да разликуваме помеѓу навредливите и ненавредливите твитови. Покрај тоа, го проценуваме нашиот пристап на различни податоци и покажуваме дека нашиот модел е способен да открие онлајн агресивност на англиски и германски твитови. Нашиот модел постигна макро-Ф1 оценка од 79,40 отсто на семЕвал податоците.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan penghantaran kita untuk tugas berkongsi SemEval 6, sub-tugas A mengenai pengenalan bahasa serangan. Model kami yang diusulkan, C-BiGRU, menggabungkan Rangkaian Neural Penukaran (CNN) dengan Rangkaian Neural Penukaran Dua Arah (RNN). We utilize word2vec to capture the semantic similarities between words.  Komposisi ini membolehkan kita mengekstrak dependensi jangka panjang dalam tweet dan membedakan antara tweet yang menyerang dan tidak menyerang. Selain itu, kita menilai pendekatan kita pada set data yang berbeza dan menunjukkan bahawa model kita mampu mengesan agresif online dalam tweet Inggeris dan Jerman. Model kami mencapai makro-skor F1 79.40% pada set data SemEval.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d പങ്കാളിയുള്ള ജോലി 6-ന് നമ്മുടെ സന്ദേശം കൊടുക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ പ്രതികാര ഭാഷയുടെ തിര ഞങ്ങളുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച model C-BiGRU, ഒരു കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. പിന്നീട് വീണ്ടും വ വാര്\u200dഡ് 2വെക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഈ സമൂഹത്തിന് നീണ്ട ദീര്\u200dഘായ കാലം ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് അനുവദിക്കുന്നു. പ്രതികാരം ചെയ്യാത്ത ടൂ അതുകൂടാതെ, നമ്മുടെ സാധ്യത വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡാറ്റാസസെറ്റില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ നടപടിയെ വിലാസിക്കുകയും, നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷും ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d ടൂ നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d 79.40% മാക്രോ F1 സ്കോര്\u200d നേടി.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta s-sottomissjoni tagħna għall-kompitu komuni ta’ SemEval 6, sottokompitu A dwar l-identifikazzjoni ta’ lingwa ofensiva. Il-mudell propost tagħna, C-BiGRU, jikkombina Netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali (CNN) ma’ Netwerk newrali rikorrenti bidirezzjonali (RNN). Aħna nużaw il-kliem2vec biex inqabdu s-similaritajiet semantiċi bejn il-kliem. This composition allows us to extract long term dependencies in tweets and distinguish between offensive and non-offensive tweets.  Barra minn hekk, a ħna jevalwaw l-approċċ tagħna fuq sett ta’ dejta differenti u nuru li l-mudell tagħna huwa kapaċi jidentifika l-aggressività onlajn kemm f’tweets Ingliż kif ukoll Ġermaniż. Il-mudell tagħna kiseb punteġġ makro-F1 ta’ 79.40% fuq is-sett tad-dejta SemEval.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас SemEval-ын 6-р ажлын хуваалцааны тухай бидний тайлбарлалтыг тайлбарлаж байна. А-р давхар хэлний тодорхойлолтын тухай. Бидний санал өгсөн загвар, C-BiGRU, Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) нь хоёр дахин дахин сэтгэл мэдрэлийн сүлжээтэй холбоотой. Бид үгний хоорондын семантик төстэй тэнцүү байдлыг авахын тулд 2век үг хэрэглэдэг. Энэ зохиол нь бидэнд хугацааны хамааралтай байдлыг tweets дээр гаргаж, алдагдал болон алдагдал бус tweets-ийн хоорондоо ялгах боломжтой. Мөн бид өөр өгөгдлийн сангийн арга барилгыг үнэлгээд, бидний загвар нь Англи болон Германы tweets дээр онлайн агрессийн байдлыг олж мэдэх боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бидний загвар SemEval өгөгдлийн санд 79.40% Макро F1 оноо гарсан.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiono nasz wniosek o wspólne zadanie SemEval 6, podzadanie A dotyczące identyfikacji języka obraźliwego. Nasz proponowany model, C-BiGRU, łączy w sobie konwolucyjną sieć neuronową (CNN) z dwukierunkową siecią powtarzającą się neuronową (RNN). Używamy Word2vec, aby uchwycić semantyczne podobieństwa między słowami. Skład ten pozwala nam wyodrębnić długoterminowe zależności w tweetach i rozróżnić obraźliwe i nieobraźliwe tweety. Ponadto oceniamy nasze podejście na innym zbiorze danych i pokazujemy, że nasz model jest w stanie wykryć agresywność online zarówno w angielskich, jak i niemieckich tweetach. Nasz model osiągnął makro F1-wynik 79,40% na zbiorze danych SemEval.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser vårt oppføring for semiEval delt oppgåve 6, underoppgåve A om identifiseringa av offensivspråk. Vår foreslått modell, C-BiGRU, kombinerer eit konvolusjonell neiralnettverk (CNN) med ein bidireksjonal gjentakelig neiralnettverk (RNN). Vi bruker ord2vec for å henta semantiske likningar mellom ord. Denne samlinga tillater oss å pakka ut langsiktige avhengighet i tweet og forskjell mellom offensiv og ikkje-offensiv tweet. I tillegg evaluerer vi tilnærminga vårt på eit anna datasett og viser at modellen vårt er i stand til å finna internett aggressivt i både engelsk og tyske tweeter. Modellen vårt oppnådd ein makro F1- poeng med 79,40% på semiEval- datasettet.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă depunerea noastră pentru sarcina comună SemEval 6, subsarcina A privind identificarea limbajului ofensator. Modelul nostru propus, C-BiGRU, combină o Rețea Neurală Convoluțională (CNN) cu o Rețea Neurală Recurentă bidirecțională (RNN). Folosim word2vec pentru a surprinde asemănările semantice dintre cuvinte. Această compoziție ne permite să extragem dependențe pe termen lung în tweet-uri și să distingem între tweet-uri ofensive și non-ofensive. În plus, evaluăm abordarea noastră pe un set de date diferit și arătăm că modelul nostru este capabil să detecteze agresivitatea online atât în limba engleză, cât și în limba germană. Modelul nostru a obținut un scor macro F1 de 79,40% pe setul de date SemEval.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja našu podnošenje za zajednièki zadatak 6, podzadatak A o identifikaciji ofanzivnog jezika. Naš predloženi model, C-BiGRU, kombinira Konvolucionalnu Neuralnu mrežu (CNN) sa dvodirektivnom ponovnom Neuralnom mrežom (RNN). Koristimo reč 2vek da uhvatimo semantičke sličnosti između reči. Ova kompozicija nam omogućava da izvučemo dugoročnu zavisnost u tweetima i razlikujemo napadajuće i ne-napadajuće tweete. Osim toga, procjenjujemo naš pristup na drugom setu podataka i pokazujemo da je naš model sposoban da otkrije online agresivnost na engleskim i njemačkim tweetima. Naš model je postigao makro F1 rezultat od 79,40% na semiEval dataset.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුවෙන් අපේ සෙම්වෙල් එක්ක කාර්ය 6 වෙනුවෙන් පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා, අපරාධ භාෂාව අඳුරගන් අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු මොඩල්, C-BiGRU, සම්පූර්ණයෙන් නියම ජාලය (CNN) එක්ක සම්බන්ධ කරනවා අපි වචන 2වෙක්ව පාවිච්චි කරනවා වචන අතර සිමාන්තික වගේ සම්බන්ධතාවක් අල්ලගන්න. මේ සම්පූර්ණය අපිට ට්විට් වල ලොකු වෙලාවක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා ඒ වගේම අපරාධකාරය සහ අපරාධකාරය න ඒ වගේම, අපි වෙනස් දත්ත සෙට් එකේ අපේ විදියට අවශ්\u200dය කරනවා ඒ වගේම පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ජර්මන් ට්විට් ව අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක මැක්රෝ F1-ස්කෝර් 79.40% තියෙනවා සෙම්වෙල් දත්ත සූදානයට.', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa warqadeena SemEval oo lagu sharciyey shaqada 6, kaas oo ah aqoonsiga luqada dembiga ah. Modelkayaga la soo jeeday, C-BiGRU, wuxuu ku kombinaa Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) with a bidirectional Recurrent Neural Network (RNN). Waxaynu isticmaalnaa hadalka 2vec si aan u qabsanno siman hadalka dhexdooda. Qaybkaas wuxuu inagu ogolaan karaa in aan ku bixino xiriir waqti dheer oo ku saabsan tweetka, waana kala soocno labada tweetka dembiyada iyo kuwa aan dembi lahayn. In addition, we evaluate our approach on a different dataset and show that our model is capable of detecting online aggressiveness in both English and German tweets.  Tusaalkayagii wuxuu gaadhay koox F1 ah oo ka mid ah 79.40% SemEval.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar vårt bidrag till SemEval delade uppgift 6, underuppgift A om identifiering av stötande språk. Vår föreslagna modell, C-BiGRU, kombinerar ett konvulutionellt neuralt nätverk (CNN) med ett dubbelriktat återkommande neuralt nätverk (RNN). Vi använder word2vec för att fånga semantiska likheter mellan ord. Denna sammansättning tillåter oss att extrahera långsiktiga beroenden i tweets och skilja mellan stötande och icke-stötande tweets. Dessutom utvärderar vi vårt tillvägagångssätt på en annan datauppsättning och visar att vår modell kan upptäcka online aggressivitet i både engelska och tyska tweets. Vår modell uppnådde en makro F1-poäng på 79,40% på SemEval datauppsättningen.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் SemEval பகிர்ந்த செயல் 6, துணை பணி A அடையாளத்தின் குறியீட்டு மொழியின் அடையாளத்தை கூறுகிறது. Our proposed model, C-BiGRU, combines a Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) with a bidirectional Recurrent Neural Network (RNN).  வார்த்தைகளுக்கு இடையே உள்ள பாதிப்புகளை பிடிக்க வேண்டும். இந்த உறுப்புகள் நீண்ட நீண்ட காலம் சார்புகளை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க அனுமதிக்கும் மற்றும் சீக்கிரமிக்காத த தொடர்புகளை இடைய மேலும், நாம் வேறு தரவுத்தளத்தில் எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் எங்கள் மாதிரி ஆங்கிலத்தில் இருந்தும் ஜெர்மன எங்கள் மாதிரி செம்Eval தரவுத்தளத்தில் 79.40% மேக்ரோ F1- score அடைந்தது.', 'ur': 'This paper presents our submission for the SemEval shared task 6, sub-task A on the identification of offensive language. ہماری پیشنهاد کی موڈل، C-BiGRU، ایک مشکل نیورال نیورال نیٹ ورک (CNN) کو ایک دوسرے سے جمع کرتا ہے۔ ہم کلمات 2vec کو استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ کلمات کے درمیان سمantic similarities پکڑیں. یہ کامپیوتر ہمیں طویل مدت کے اعتباری توئیٹوں میں اضافہ کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے اور نافساد اور نافساد توئیٹوں کے درمیان اختلاف کرنا چاہتا ہے. اور ہم ایک دوسرے ڈاٹ سٹ پر اپنے طریقے کا ارزش کرتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری مدل آنلاین کے ذریعہ انگلیسی اور جرمانی ٹویٹوں میں نازل ہونے کی قادر ہے۔ ہماری مدل ایک مکرو F1-اسکور کو سیم ایولی ڈیٹ سٹ پر 79.40% مل گیا۔', 'uz': "Bu sahifa SemEval (SemEval) shartlangan vazifani 6 bilan bogʻliq vazifa A'ning tub vazifa Name Biz so'zlar orasidagi semantik bir xil so'zlarini qabul qilishdan foydalanamiz. Bu kompyuter bizga uzun muddat ishlatuvchilarni Twitterda ajratishga ruxsat beradi va ta'minlovchi xabarlarni ajratishga ruxsat beradi. Ko'pchilik, biz boshqa maʼlumotlar tarkibini qiymatimiz va modelimizning ingliz va Olmoncha Twittlarda shaxsiyatlarni ko'rsatish mumkin. Bizning modelimiz SemEval maʼlumotlar satrini 79.40% makro F1 scori topishdi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này giới thiệu yêu cầu của chúng tôi cho nhiệm vụ chia sẻ Semkhai 6, nhiệm vụ A về việc nhận dạng ngôn ngữ tấn công. Mẫu thử ra chúng ta, C-biGRU, kết hợp một kênh thần kinh xuyên tâm linh (CNN) với một mạng thần kinh hai phương (RNN). Chúng ta dùng từ 2vec để thu thập các từ ngữ ngữ rộng giống nhau. Thành phần này cho phép ta trích xuất quan hệ lâu dài trong Twitter và phân biệt giữa tweet khiêu khích và không khiêu khích. Chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp của chúng tôi trên một bộ dữ liệu khác nhau và cho thấy mô hình của chúng tôi có khả năng phát hiện hung dữ trên mạng cả trên Twitter lẫn tiếng Anh. Trong tập tin của chúng tôi, mô- đun đã hoàn thành một macro F1-điểm số 97.40 Name', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя нашето предложение за споделена задача 6, подзадача А за идентифициране на обиден език. Нашият предложен модел комбинира конволюционна неврална мрежа (CNN) с двупосочна повтаряща се неврална мрежа (RNN). Използваме за улавяне на семантичните прилики между думите. Тази композиция ни позволява да извличаме дългосрочни зависимости в туитове и да разграничаваме обидни и необидни туитове. Освен това оценяваме подхода си на различен набор от данни и показваме, че нашият модел е способен да открива онлайн агресивност както в английски, така и в немски туитове. Нашият модел постигна макрооценка от 79.40% на набора от данни.', 'nl': 'Deze paper presenteert onze inzending voor de SemEval gedeelde taak 6, subtaak A over de identificatie van aanstootgevende taal. Ons voorgestelde model, C-BiGRU, combineert een Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) met een bidirectioneel Recurrent Neural Network (RNN). We gebruiken word2vec om de semantische overeenkomsten tussen woorden vast te leggen. Deze samenstelling stelt ons in staat om langetermijnafhankelijkheden in tweets te extraheren en onderscheid te maken tussen aanstootgevende en niet-aanstootgevende tweets. Daarnaast evalueren we onze aanpak op een andere dataset en laten we zien dat ons model online agressiviteit kan detecteren in zowel Engelse als Duitse tweets. Ons model behaalde een macro F1-score van 79,40% op de SemEval dataset.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja naše podatke za zajednički zadatak 6, podzadatak A o identifikaciji ofanzivnog jezika. Naš predloženi model C-BiGRU kombinira konvolucionalnu neuronsku mrežu (CNN) sa dvodirektivnom ponovnom neuronskom mrežom (RNN). Koristimo reč 2vec da uhvatimo semantičke sličnosti između riječi. Ova kompozicija nam omogućava izvući dugoročnu zavisnost u tweetima i različiti između napadajućih i ne-napadajućih tweets. Osim toga, procjenjujemo naš pristup na različitim podacima i pokazujemo da je naš model sposoban otkriti online agresivnost na engleskim i njemačkim tweetima. Naš model je postigao makro F1 rezultat od 79,40% na semiEval dataset.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer vores indlæg til SemEval delte opgave 6, underopgave A om identifikation af stødende sprog. Vores foreslåede model, C-BiGRU, kombinerer et Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) med et bidirectional Recurrent Neural Network (RNN). Vi bruger word2vec til at fange de semantiske ligheder mellem ord. Denne sammensætning giver os mulighed for at udtrække langsigtede afhængigheder i tweets og skelne mellem offensive og ikke-offensive tweets. Derudover evaluerer vi vores tilgang på et andet datasæt og viser, at vores model er i stand til at detektere online aggressivitet i både engelske og tyske tweets. Vores model opnåede en makro F1-score på 79,40% på SemEval datasættet.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag stellt unsere Einreichung für die SemEval Shared Task 6, Teilaufgabe A zur Identifizierung offensiver Sprache vor. Unser vorgeschlagenes Modell, C-BiGRU, kombiniert ein Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) mit einem bidirektionalen Recurrent Neural Network (RNN). Wir verwenden word2vec, um die semantischen Ähnlichkeiten zwischen Wörtern zu erfassen. Diese Zusammensetzung ermöglicht es uns, langfristige Abhängigkeiten in Tweets zu extrahieren und zwischen offensiven und nicht-offensiven Tweets zu unterscheiden. Darüber hinaus evaluieren wir unseren Ansatz auf einem anderen Datensatz und zeigen, dass unser Modell in der Lage ist, Online-Aggressivität sowohl in englischen als auch in deutschen Tweets zu erkennen. Unser Modell erzielte einen Makro F1-Score von 79,40% auf dem SemEval Datensatz.', 'id': 'Kertas ini memperlihatkan pengiriman kita untuk SemEval tugas berbagi 6, sub tugas A mengenai identifikasi bahasa serangan. Model kami yang diusulkan, C-BiGRU, menggabungkan jaringan saraf konvolusi (CNN) dengan jaringan saraf rekurren bidireksi (RNN). We utilize word2vec to capture the semantic similarities between words.  Komposisi ini memungkinkan kita untuk mengekstrak dependensi jangka panjang dalam tweet dan membedakan antara tweet offensive dan non-offensive. Selain itu, kami mengevaluasi pendekatan kami pada set data yang berbeda dan menunjukkan bahwa model kami mampu mendeteksi agresif online dalam tweet Inggris dan Jerman. Model kami mencapai skor makro F1 79,40% pada set data SemEval.', 'ko': '본고는 우리가 제출한 공격적 언어 식별에 관한SemEval 공유 임무 6 하위 임무 A를 소개한다.우리가 제시한 모델인 C-BiGRU는 볼륨신경망(CNN)과 양방향 역귀신경망(RNN)을 결합한다.우리는 워드2vec를 이용하여 단어 간의 의미 유사성을 포착한다.이런 조합은 우리가 추문 중의 장기적인 관련성을 추출하고 공격적인 추문과 비공격적인 추문을 구분할 수 있게 한다.또한 우리는 다른 데이터 집합에서 우리의 방법을 평가하고 우리의 모델이 영어와 독일어 추문의 온라인 공격성을 측정할 수 있음을 나타냈다.우리 모델은 SemEval 데이터 세트에서 79.40%의 거시적 F1 점수를 얻었다.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz SemEval'yň 6-nji buýruky bardygyny aýdyşymyzy görkez. Biziň teklip eden nusgasymyz C-BiGRU, Birleşik Neural Network (CNN) bilen bir ikinji görkezilýän Taýratyn Neural Network (RNN) bilen birleşýär. Sözler arasındaki semantik benzerini yakalamak için 2vek kelimesini kullanıyoruz. Bu compossiýa bize tweetlerde uzak wagtlyklary çykarmagymyza mümkin edýär we günahkar tweetler arasyny tapawutlamagymyza mümkin edýär. Munuň üçin, biz öz metodumyzy başga bir datasetde deňleýäris we nusgamyzyň internetde hem iňlisçe hem nemesçe tweetlerde gatnaşyklygyny tanap biljek bolandygyny görkez. Bizim modelimiz SemEval veri setinde 79,40% küçük bir makro F1 noktasını elde etti.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ تسلیم کردن ما برای کار ششم تقسیم کرده است، زیر کار A در مورد شناسایی زبان تجاوز. مدل پیشنهاد ما C-BiGRU یک شبکه عصبی (CNN) را با شبکه عصبی دوباره دوباره ترکیب می\u200cکند. ما از کلمه ۲vek استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا شبیه\u200cهای semantic بین کلمه\u200cها را بگیریم. این ترکیب به ما اجازه می دهد که بستگی طولانی را در توئیت خارج کنیم و بین توئیت های تجاوز و غیر تجاوز جدا کنیم. در addition, we evaluate our approach on a different data set and show that our model is able to detect online aggressiveness in both English and German tweets. مدل ما در مجموعه داده\u200cهای سیم\u200cEval یک مقدار مکرو F1 درصد 79.40 درصد رسیده است.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaonyesha ujumbe wetu wa SemEval ulioshirikisha kazi 6, jukumu la subira A juu ya kutambua lugha ya uchochezi. Mfano wetu wa pendekezo, C-BiGRU, unaunganisha Mtandao wa Neurali wa Kujitoleza (CNN) kwa kutumia Mtandao wa Neural unaoendelea kwa bidii (RNN). Tunatumia word2vec kuchukua sawa na maneno. Ubunifu huu unaruhusu kututegemea kwa muda mrefu kwenye twiti na kutofautisha kati ya twiti za kihalisi na zisizo na mashambulizi. Zaidi ya hayo, tunapitia mbinu yetu katika seti mbalimbali ya taarifa na kuonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu una uwezo wa kutambua ukatili wa mtandaoni katika twiti za Kiingereza na Kijerumani. Mfano wetu ulipata kiwango cha F1 cha asilimia 79.40 kwenye seti ya data ya SemEval.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet paraqitjen tonë për detyrën e përbashkët SemEval 6, nëndetyrën A për identifikimin e gjuhës ofensive. Modeli ynë i propozuar, C-BiGRU, kombinon një rrjet neural konvolutiv (CNN) me një rrjet neural rekurrent dy-drejtues (RNN). Ne përdorim fjalë2vec për të kapur ngjashmëritë semantike midis fjalëve. Kjo kompozitë na lejon të nxjerrim varësitë afat-gjata në tweetet dhe të dallojmë midis tweeteve ofensive dhe jo ofensive. Përveç kësaj, ne vlerësojmë qasjen tonë në një set të dhënash të ndryshme dhe tregojmë se modeli ynë është i aftë për të zbuluar agresivitetin online në tweetet angleze dhe gjermane. Modeli ynë arriti një makro-rezultat F1 prej 79.40% në sistemin e të dhënave SemEval.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel ons onderskrywing vir die SemEval gedeelde taak 6, subtaak A op die identifiseering van offensiv taal. Ons voorgestelde model, C- BiGRU, kombinieer 'n Konvolusieele Neuralnetwerk (CNN) met 'n bidireksjonale Herhaling Neuralnetwerk (RNN). Ons gebruik woorde 2vec om die semantiese gelykenisse tussen woorde te vang. Hierdie opstelling laat ons toe om lankminde afhanklikhede in tweets te uitpak en tussen offensiv en nie-offensiv tweets te verskille. In addition, we evaluate our approach on a different dataset and show that our model is capable of detecting online aggressiveness in both English and German tweets. Ons model het 'n makro F1- telling van 79. 40% op die semiEval datastel bereik.", 'am': 'ይህም ገጽ ለሴmEval የተካፈለውን ስራ 6፣ አካባቢ አድራጊ አ በአስቆጣሪው ቋንቋ ማረጋገጥ ያቀርባል፡፡ የተዘጋጀ ሞዴላታችን C-ቢGRU፣ የኮንፕሎጂ የኔural መረብ (CNN) በጥያቄ ቅድሚያ የኔural መረብ (RNN) ይጋጠማል፡፡ ቃላትን 2vec እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ ይህ አካባቢ የረጅም ዘመን የታመነ ጥያቄዎችን በትዊተሮች እና አሰቃፊ እና የማያሰቃዩ በትዊተሮች መካከል ለመለየት ይፈቅዳል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ልዩ ዳታተሮች ላይ ሥርዓታችንን እናሳውቃለን እና ሞዴልናችን በንግግሊዝና በጀርመን እና በትዊተኞቹ እና የኢንተርኔት ዓመፃን ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን በSemEval ዳታ ማክሮ F1-score 79.40 በመቶ አግኝቷል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է մեր ներկայացումը "ՍեմԷվալ" համագործակցած հանձնարարության 6-ի, Ա-ի ենթահանձնարարության վրա, որը վերաբերում է գրավիչ լեզվի հայտնաբերությանը: Մեր առաջարկած մոդելը, C-ԲիGRU, համադրում է հակադարձ նյարդային ցանց (CNN) երկու ուղղությամբ կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցի (ՌՆՆ) հետ: Մենք օգտագործում ենք 2Վ բառերը բառերի միջև սեմանտիկ նմանությունների նկատմամբ: Այս բաղադրությունը թույլ է տալիս մեզ երկարաժամկետ կախվածություններ դուրս բերել թվիթերում և տարբերակել գայթակղիչ և ոչ գայթակղիչ թվիթերում: Ավելին, մենք գնահատում ենք մեր մոտեցումը տարբեր տվյալների համակարգում և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը կարող է հայտնաբերել առցանց ագրեսիվությունը անգլերենում և գերմաներենում: Մեր մոդելը հասավ ՍեմԷվալ տվյալների համակարգում 79.40 տոկոսի մակրո F1-գնահատականի:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt SemEval paylaşdığı görevi 6-si, A-si dəyişiklik dilinin tanıdılması barəsində təsdiqlənməyimizi göstərir. Bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz modellərimiz C-BiGRU, Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) ilə ikidirektional Recurrent Neural Network (RNN) ilə birləşdirir. Sözlərin arasındakı semantik məsələləri almaq üçün 2vec sözləri istifadə edirik. Bu kompozisyon bizə uzun müddətli bağımlılıqları twetlərdə çıxartmaq və həddi aşmaq və həddi aşmaq olmayan twetlərdən ayırmaq üçün imkan verir. Əksinə, biz müxtəlif veri qutusunda tərzimizi değerləşdiririk və modelimiz İngilizce və Alman tweetlərdə online agresivitə keşf edə biləcəyini göstəririk. Bizim modelimiz SemEval veri qutusunda 79,40% makro F1 dərəcəsini qəbul etdi.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভালের জন্য আমাদের প্রতিবেদন প্রদান করেছে যা ৬ টি শেয়ার করা হয়েছে, যা আক্রান্ত ভাষার পরিচয়ে সাব-কাজ আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল, সি-বিজিআরউ, একটি কনভোলেশনাল নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক (সিএনএন) সাথে একটি বিদ্যুত পুনরায় নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক (RNN) সংয আমরা ওয়ার্ড২ভেক ব্যবহার করি শব্দের মধ্যে সেমেন্টিক সমতুল্য ধরার জন্য। এই প্রতিষ্ঠান আমাদের দীর্ঘমেয়াদের টুইটে নির্ভর করতে এবং আক্রমণ এবং আক্রমণকারী টুইটের মধ্যে বিচ্ছিন্ন করতে দেয়। এছাড়াও আমরা ভিন্ন ডাটাসেটে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ মূল্যায়ন করি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে আমাদের মডেল ইংরেজি ও জার্মান টুইটে অনলাইন আক্রান্তি আমাদের মডেল সেমইভাল ডাটাসেটে ৭৯.৪০% ম্যাক্রো এফ১ স্কোর অর্জন করেছে।', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja naše podatke za zajednički zadatak SemEval 6, podzadatak A o identifikaciji ofanzivnog jezika. Naš predloženi model, C-BiGRU, kombinira konvolucionalnu Neuralnu mrežu (CNN) sa dvodirektivnom ponovnom Neuralnom mrežom (RNN). Koristimo reč 2vec da uhvatimo semantičke sličnosti između riječi. Ova kompozicija nam omogućava da izvučemo dugoročnu zavisnost u tweetima i razlikujemo između napadajućih i ne-napadajućih tweeta. Osim toga, procjenjujemo naš pristup na drugom setu podataka i pokazujemo da je naš model sposoban da otkrije online agresivnost na engleskim i njemačkim tweetima. Naš model je postigao makro F1 rezultat 79,40% na semiEval dataset.', 'ca': "Aquest paper presenta la nostra presentació per la tasca compartida SemEval 6, subtasca A sobre l'identificació del llenguatge ofensiu. El nostre model proposat, C-BiGRU, combina una Rede Neural Convolutiva (CNN) amb una Rede Neural Recurrent bidireccional (RNN). Utilitzem la paraula 2vec per capturar les similituds semàntiques entre les paraules. Aquesta composició ens permet extrair dependencies a llarg termini en tweets i distingir entre tweets ofensius i no ofensius. A més, evaluem el nostre enfocament en un conjunt de dades diferent i demostrem que el nostre model és capaç de detectar agressivitat en línia en tweets anglès i alemany. El nostre model va aconseguir un marc F1 del 79,40% en el conjunt de dades SemEval.", 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje náš příspěvek pro sdílený úkol SemEval 6, podúkol A o identifikaci urážlivého jazyka. Náš navržený model C-BiGRU kombinuje konveluční neuronovou síť (CNN) s obousměrnou recyklující neuronovou sítí (RNN). Používáme Word2vec k zachycení sémantických podobností mezi slovy. Toto složení nám umožňuje extrahovat dlouhodobé závislosti ve tweetech a rozlišovat mezi urážlivými a neurážlivými tweety. Kromě toho hodnotíme náš přístup na odlišném datovém souboru a ukážeme, že náš model je schopen detekovat online agresivitu v anglických i německých tweetech. Náš model dosáhl makro F1 skóre 79,40% na datové sadě SemEval.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli esittelee ehdotuksemme SemEvalin yhteiseen tehtävään 6, alitehtävään A loukkaavan kielen tunnistamisesta. Ehdotetussa mallissamme C-BiGRU yhdistyy konvolutionaalinen hermoverkko (CNN) kaksisuuntaiseen toistuvaan hermoverkkoon (RNN). Käytämme word2vec:iä kuvaamaan sanojen semanttisia yhtäläisyyksiä. Tämän koostumuksen avulla voimme poimia pitkäaikaisia riippuvuuksia tweeteistä ja erottaa loukkaavat ja ei-loukkaavat tweetit. Lisäksi arvioimme lähestymistapaamme eri aineistojen pohjalta ja osoitamme, että mallimme pystyy havaitsemaan verkkoaggressiivisuuden sekä englannin että saksan twiitteissä. Mallimme saavutti SemEval-aineistossa 79,40% makropisteen F1-pisteen.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis esitatakse meie ettepanek SemEvali jagatud ülesande 6 alamülesandeks A solvava keele tuvastamiseks. Meie väljapakutud mudel C-BiGRU ühendab konvolutsioonilise neurovõrgu (CNN) kahesuunalise korduva neurovõrguga (RNN). Me kasutame Word2vec sõnade semantilise sarnasuse jäädvustamiseks. See kompositsioon võimaldab meil välja võtta pikaajalisi sõltuvusi säutsides ja eristada solvavaid ja mitte-solvavaid säutseid. Lisaks hindame oma lähenemisviisi erineva andmekogumi põhjal ja näitame, et meie mudel suudab tuvastada online agressiivsust nii inglise kui saksa säutsudes. Meie mudel saavutas SemEvali andmekogumil makro F1-skoori 79,40%.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki dadi nggawe rerakno sesuk nggawe Sistem 6, apa-task A ngendalikno urip nggawe perusahaan winih. Kita pergunakake model, C-BigruU, tambah konvolution Neral Network (MT) nganggo binireksyonal recurrecurring Neral Network (DNN). Within Awakdhéwé iki dipoleh awak dhéwé nggawe layang tanggal dipunangé luwih dumadhi iki tentang karo "Tut" lan "Tut". Nambah, awake dhewe nyimpen dadi sing sampeyan dataset sing mengko sampeyan ngono kuwi model sing bisa nguasai iki, akeh online podho kebutuhan podho ajeng-ajeng lan tuwit germanis. model dhéwé wis ngerasakno macro F1-Puntuan sing wis ngawehi, 75.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na gaskata iyalinmu ga shirin aiki 6, mai ƙanƙantar aikin A kan ganin harshen na ƙyama. @ action: button Munã yi amfani da word2vc dõmin mu kãma masu motsi da ke daidaita tsakanin maganar. Wannan ƙanshi yana yarda da mu fita masu daɗayi a cikin Twitter, kuma mu rarrabe a tsakanin Twitter masu ƙiyayya da waɗanda bã su yi abubuwa. Da wannan, muna ƙaddara hanyarmu kan wani tsari na daban-daban, kuma munã nuna cewa misalinmu yana iya iya iya gano suriyar ɗari'a cikin Ingiriya da jerumani. Our model achieved a macro F1-score of 79.40% on the SemEval dataset.", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מציג את ההעברה שלנו למשימה המשותפת של חצי המערכת 6, תחת המשימה A על זיהוי שפה פגיעה. המודל המוצע שלנו, C-BiGRU, משלב רשת נוירולית משתנה (CNN) עם רשת נוירולית משתנה שתיים כיוונים (RNN). אנחנו משתמשים במילה 2vec כדי לתפוס את הדומות הסמנטיות בין מילים. המרכיב הזה מאפשר לנו לחלץ תלויות לטווח ארוך בטיוויטים ולהבחין בין טוויטים פגיעים ולא פגיעים. בנוסף, אנחנו מעריכים את הגישה שלנו על קבוצת נתונים שונה ולהראות שהמודל שלנו מסוגל לגלות אגרסיביות באינטרנט בטוויטים אנגליים וגרמניים. המודל שלנו השיג נקודת מקרו F1 של 79.40% על קבוצת המידע SemEval.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek predstavlja naše predloge za skupno nalogo 6 SemEval, podnalogo A o identifikaciji žaljivega jezika. Naš predlagani model, C-BiGRU, združuje konvolucijsko živčno mrežo (CNN) z dvosmerno ponovno živčno mrežo (RNN). Word2vec uporabljamo za zajemanje semantičnih podobnosti med besedami. Ta sestava nam omogoča, da izvlečemo dolgoročne odvisnosti v tweetih in razlikujemo med žaljivimi in nežaljivimi tweeti. Poleg tega ocenjujemo naš pristop na drugačnem naboru podatkov in pokažemo, da je naš model sposoben zaznati spletno agresivnost v angleškem in nemškem tweetu. Naš model je dosegel makro rezultat F1 79,40% na naboru podatkov SemEval.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་SemEval པར་ང་ཚོའི་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་༦་དང་ལྡན་A གནད་དོན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས C-BiGRU་ནི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཤེས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་ཞིག་སྒྲིག་བྱེད་པ་དང་bidirectional Recurrent Neural Network (RNN) ང་ཚོས་བརྗོད་པའི་ཚིག་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བ་དེ་ཚིག་གི་དབར་གྱི་མཉམ་དུ་རྙེད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། མཉམ་འབྱུང་དེ་གིས་ང་ཚོར་དུས་རྒྱུན་རིང་བའི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་རྩིས་མེད་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཆོག་ཡིན། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གནད་སྡུད་མིན་འདུག་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་དཔེ་གཏོང་ཐུབ་པའི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་དང་ སྐད་ཡིག་ ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ལྟར་ཕྱིར་ཉེན་བརྗོད་སྒྲིག་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་༡༩༧.༤༠་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'TECHSSN at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Tweets using Deep Neural Networks', 'ar': 'TECHSSN في SemEval-2019 المهمة 6: تحديد وتصنيف اللغة الهجومية في التغريدات باستخدام الشبكات العصبية العميقة', 'es': 'TECHSSN en la Tarea 6 de SemEval-2019: Identificación y categorización del lenguaje ofensivo en los tweets mediante redes neuronales profundas', 'pt': 'TECHSSN na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Identificando e categorizando linguagem ofensiva em tweets usando redes neurais profundas', 'fr': "TECHSSN à SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: Identifier et catégoriser le langage offensant dans les Tweets à l'aide de réseaux neuronaux profonds", 'ja': 'TECHSSN at SemEval -2019 Task 6: Deep Neural Networksを使用したツイートにおける不快な言語の識別と分類', 'zh': 'TECHSSN在SemEval-2019务6:用深度神经网络识类推文攻击性语', 'hi': 'SEMEval-2019 कार्य 6 पर TECHSSN: डीप न्यूरल नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके ट्वीट्स में आपत्तिजनक भाषा की पहचान और वर्गीकरण', 'ru': 'TECHSSN на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Выявление и категоризация оскорбительных слов в твитах с использованием глубоких нейронных сетей', 'ga': 'TECHSSN ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Teanga Ionsaitheach a Aithint agus a Chatagóiriú in Tweetanna ag Úsáid Deep Neural Networks', 'ka': 'TECHSSN semiEval-2019 დავალება 6: განსაზღვრება და კატეგორიზაცია უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო ძალიან ნეიროლური ქსელების გამოყენება', 'hu': 'TECHSSN a SemEval-2019 6. feladat: Támadó nyelv azonosítása és kategorizálása Tweetekben mélyidegi hálózatok segítségével', 'el': 'Καθήκον 6: Αναγνώριση και κατηγοριοποίηση της προσβλητικής γλώσσας σε Τουίτερ με χρήση βαθέων νευρωνικών δικτύων', 'it': 'TECHSSN a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identificare e categorizzare il linguaggio offensivo nei tweet utilizzando reti neurali profonde', 'lt': 'TECHSSN pusevalyje 2019 m. 6 užduotis: Nustatyti ir klasifikuoti žalingą kalbą Tweetuose naudojant gilius neurotinius tinklus', 'kk': 'TECHSSN шегінші тапсырма 6: Твиттерде тапсырмаларды анықтау және санаттарды тапсырмалардың түсінікті түсініктемесі', 'mk': 'TECHSSN на SemEval-2019 задача 6: Идентификување и категоризирање на навреден јазик на твитови користејќи длабоки неурални мрежи', 'ms': 'TECHSSN di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Mengenalpasti dan Mengkategori Bahasa Tersinggung dalam Tweet menggunakan Rangkaian Neural Dalam', 'mt': 'TECHSSN at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Tweets using Deep Neural Networks', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6- ലെ ടെക്സെന്\u200d: ആഴത്തിലെ നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുകയും വ്', 'mn': 'TECHSSN at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Tweets using Deep Neural Networks', 'no': 'TECHSSN på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 6: Identifikasjon og kategorisering av offensive språk i tweeter ved bruk av djupne neuralnettverk', 'ro': 'TECHSSN la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: Identificarea și categorizarea limbajului ofensiv în tweets folosind rețele neuronale profunde', 'pl': 'Zadanie 6: Identyfikowanie i kategorizowanie języka ofensywnego w tweetach przy użyciu głębokich sieci neuronowych', 'sr': 'TECHSSN na semiEval-2019 zadatak 6: Identifikacija i kategorizacija službenog jezika u Tweets koristeći duboke neurone mreže', 'si': 'TECHSSN at HalfEvel-2019 Job 6: ID and Categorise Offensive language in Tweets', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019ல் TECHSSN பணி 6: ஆழமான நெயுரல் வலைப்பின்னல்களை பயன்படுத்தி தனிப்பயன் மொழியை அடையாளம் மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தும்', 'sv': 'TECHSSN på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: Identifiera och kategorisera offensivt språk i tweets med hjälp av djupa neurala nätverk', 'so': 'TECHSSN at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Tweets using Deep Neural Networks', 'ur': 'ٹیٹوں میں ٹیٹوں کی سیم ایول-2019 ٹاکس ۶ میں ٹیٹوں میں اوفنسیو زبان شناسایی اور کاٹیوریزی کرتی ہے', 'uz': '6 Vazifani SemEval- 2019 bilan TECHSSN: Kdep Neural Tarmoqlardan foydalanish uchun foydalanuvchi va kategorilashName', 'vi': 'TECHSSN at SemEvl-209 Task 6: Nhận diện và phân loại Ngôn ngữ Hành động ở Tweet bằng mạng thần kinh sâu', 'bg': 'Задача 6: Идентифициране и категоризиране на офанзивен език в туитове с помощта на дълбоки неврални мрежи', 'hr': 'TECHSSN na semiEval-2019 zadatak 6: Identifikacija i kategorizacija neposlušnog jezika u Tweets koristeći duboke neurone mreže', 'da': 'TECHSSN på SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: Identificering og kategorisering af offensivt sprog i tweets ved hjælp af dybe neurale netværk', 'nl': 'TECHSSN op SemEval-2019 Taak 6: Identificeren en categoriseren van offensieve taal in Tweets met behulp van Deep Neural Networks', 'de': 'Aufgabe 6: Identifizierung und Kategorisierung offensiver Sprache in Tweets mithilfe von Deep Neurol Networks', 'id': 'TECHSSN di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Identifikasi dan Kategorisasi Bahasa Serangan dalam Tweets menggunakan Jaringan Neural Dalam', 'ko': 'TECHSSN이SemEval-2019에서의 작업6: 심층 신경 네트워크를 사용하여 트윗의 공격적인 언어를 식별하고 분류', 'fa': 'TECHSSN در پایین Eval-2019 Task 6: Identifying and Categorising Offensive Language in Tweets using Deep Neural Networks', 'sw': 'TECHSSN kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 6: Kutambua na Kugawanya Lugha ya Uhuru katika Twita kwa kutumia Mtandao wa Kikuu cha Neural', 'tr': 'TECHSSN at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Tweets using Deep Neural Networks', 'sq': 'TECHSSN në SemEval-2019 Detyra 6: Identifikimi dhe kategorizimi i gjuhës ofensive në Tweets duke përdorur rrjete të thella neuronale', 'af': 'TECHSSN by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 6: Identifikasie en Kategoriseer Afstandlike Taal in Tweets gebruik Deep Neurale Netwerke', 'am': 'ስራ 6:', 'hy': 'TECHSSN-ը "Halewal-2019" 6-րդ հանձնարարությունում. Դրա մասին խորը նյարդային ցանցերը օգտագործելով թվիթերում վնասավոր լեզու հայտնաբերելը և դասավորելը', 'az': "TECHSSN'in SemEval-2019 G칬z톛l 6: T칬vetl톛rd톛 칐z칲l칲 Dili tan캼ma v톛 Kategoriyalama", 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের ৬ টেক্সএন: ডিপ নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে টুইটারে পরিচয়পত্র এবং বিভিন্ন ভাষাকে পরিচিতি এবং বিভাগ করার', 'bs': 'TECHSSN na semiEval-2019 zadatak 6: Identifikacija i kategorizacija neposlušnog jezika u Tweets koristeći duboke neurone mreže', 'ca': 'TECHSSN a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Tweets using Deep Neural Networks', 'cs': 'TECHSSN na SemEval-2019 Úkol 6: Identifikace a kategorizace útočného jazyka ve tweetech pomocí hlubokých neuronových sítí', 'et': 'TECHSSN SemEval-2019 ülesanne 6: ründava keele tuvastamine ja kategoriseerimine tweetides sügavate neurovõrkude abil', 'fi': 'TECHSSN SemEval-2019 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 6: Hyökkäyskielen tunnistaminen ja luokittelu tweeteissä syvähermoverkostojen avulla', 'jv': 'Text', 'he': 'TECHSSN ב SemEval-2019 משימה 6: זיהוי וקטגוריזציה שפה פגיעה בטוויטים באמצעות רשתות עצביות עמוקות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'TECHSSN na SemEval-2019 naloga 6: prepoznavanje in kategorizacija napadalnega jezika v tweetih z uporabo globokih živčnih omrežij', 'bo': 'TECHSSN at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying and Categorizing Offensive Language in Tweets using Deep Neural Networks'}
{'en': 'Task 6 of SemEval 2019 involves identifying and categorizing offensive language in social media. The systems developed by TECHSSN team uses multi-level classification techniques. We have developed two systems. In the first system, the first level of classification is done by a multi-branch 2D CNN classifier with Google’s pre-trained Word2Vec embedding and the second level of classification by string matching technique supported by offensive and bad words dictionary. The second system uses a multi-branch 1D CNN classifier with Glove pre-trained embedding layer for the first level of classification and string matching for the second level of classification. Input data with a probability of less than 0.70 in the first level are passed on to the second level. The misclassified examples are classified correctly in the second level.', 'ar': 'تتضمن المهمة 6 من SemEval 2019 تحديد وتصنيف اللغة المسيئة في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. تستخدم الأنظمة التي طورها فريق TECHSSN تقنيات تصنيف متعددة المستويات. لقد قمنا بتطوير نظامين. في النظام الأول ، يتم إجراء المستوى الأول من التصنيف بواسطة مُصنِّف CNN ثنائي الأبعاد متعدد الفروع مع تضمين Word2Vec المُدرَّب مسبقًا من Google والمستوى الثاني من التصنيف بواسطة تقنية مطابقة السلسلة المدعومة بقاموس الكلمات المسيئة والسيئة. يستخدم النظام الثاني مصنفًا متعدد الفروع 1D CNN مع طبقة التضمين المدربة مسبقًا من Glove للمستوى الأول من التصنيف ومطابقة السلسلة للمستوى الثاني من التصنيف. يتم تمرير البيانات المدخلة مع احتمال أقل من 0.70 في المستوى الأول إلى المستوى الثاني. يتم تصنيف الأمثلة التي تم تصنيفها بشكل خاطئ بشكل صحيح في المستوى الثاني.', 'pt': 'A tarefa 6 do SemEval 2019 envolve identificar e categorizar linguagem ofensiva nas mídias sociais. Os sistemas desenvolvidos pela equipe da TECHSSN utilizam técnicas de classificação multinível. Desenvolvemos dois sistemas. No primeiro sistema, o primeiro nível de classificação é feito por um classificador CNN 2D multi-ramificações com a incorporação Word2Vec pré-treinada do Google e o segundo nível de classificação pela técnica de correspondência de strings suportada por dicionário de palavras ofensivas e palavrões. O segundo sistema usa um classificador CNN 1D multi-ramificação com camada de incorporação pré-treinada Glove para o primeiro nível de classificação e correspondência de string para o segundo nível de classificação. Os dados de entrada com probabilidade inferior a 0,70 no primeiro nível são passados para o segundo nível. Os exemplos mal classificados são classificados corretamente no segundo nível.', 'fr': "La tâche 6 de SemEval 2019 consiste à identifier et à catégoriser le langage offensant dans les médias sociaux. Les systèmes développés par l'équipe TECHSSN utilisent des techniques de classification multi-niveaux. Nous avons développé deux systèmes. Dans le premier système, le premier niveau de classification est effectué par un classificateur CNN 2D multibranche avec intégration Word2Vec pré-entraînée de Google et le second niveau de classification par la technique de correspondance de chaînes supportée par un dictionnaire de mots offensants et mauvais. Le second système utilise un classificateur CNN 1D multibranche avec une couche d'intégration pré-entraînée Glove pour le premier niveau de classification et une correspondance de chaînes pour le second niveau de classification. Les données d'entrée avec une probabilité inférieure à 0,70 au premier niveau sont transmises au second niveau. Les exemples mal classés sont correctement classés au deuxième niveau.", 'es': 'La tarea 6 de SemEval 2019 implica identificar y categorizar el lenguaje ofensivo en las redes sociales. Los sistemas desarrollados por el equipo de TECHSSN utilizan técnicas de clasificación multinivel. Hemos desarrollado dos sistemas. En el primer sistema, el primer nivel de clasificación se realiza mediante un clasificador CNN 2D de múltiples ramas con la incrustación de Word2Vec previamente entrenada de Google y el segundo nivel de clasificación por técnica de coincidencia de cadenas compatible con el diccionario de palabras ofensivas y malas. El segundo sistema utiliza un clasificador CNN 1D de múltiples ramas con capa de incrustación preentrenada con guantes para el primer nivel de clasificación y coincidencia de cadenas para el segundo nivel de clasificación. Los datos de entrada con una probabilidad inferior a 0.70 en el primer nivel se pasan al segundo nivel. Los ejemplos mal clasificados se clasifican correctamente en el segundo nivel.', 'hi': 'SemEval 2019 के कार्य 6 में सोशल मीडिया में आपत्तिजनक भाषा की पहचान और वर्गीकरण शामिल है। TECHSSN टीम द्वारा विकसित सिस्टम बहु-स्तरीय वर्गीकरण तकनीकों का उपयोग करता है। हमने दो प्रणालियां विकसित की हैं। पहली प्रणाली में, वर्गीकरण का पहला स्तर Google के पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित Word2Vec एम्बेडिंग के साथ एक बहु-शाखा 2 D CNN क्लासिफायर द्वारा किया जाता है और आक्रामक और बुरे शब्दों के शब्दकोश द्वारा समर्थित स्ट्रिंग मिलान तकनीक द्वारा वर्गीकरण का दूसरा स्तर होता है। दूसरी प्रणाली वर्गीकरण के दूसरे स्तर के लिए वर्गीकरण और स्ट्रिंग मिलान के पहले स्तर के लिए दस्ताने पूर्व प्रशिक्षित एम्बेडिंग परत के साथ एक बहु-शाखा 1 डी सीएनएन क्लासिफायर का उपयोग करती है। पहले स्तर में 0.70 से कम की संभावना वाले इनपुट डेटा को दूसरे स्तर पर पारित किया जाता है। गलत वर्गीकृत उदाहरणों को दूसरे स्तर में सही ढंग से वर्गीकृत किया गया है।', 'ja': 'SemEval 2019のタスク6は、ソーシャルメディアで不快な言葉を特定し、分類することです。TECHSSNチームが開発したシステムは、マルチレベル分類技術を使用しています。2つのシステムを開発しました。第1のシステムでは、第1のレベルの分類は、Googleの事前にトレーニングされたWord 2 Vec埋め込みを備えたマルチブランチ2 D CNN分類子によって行われ、第2のレベルの分類は、攻撃的および悪い単語辞書によってサポートされる文字列マッチング技術によって行われます。第２のシステムは、第１のレベルの分類のために、および第２のレベルの分類のための文字列マッチングのために、グローブ事前訓練された埋め込み層を備えたマルチブランチ１ Ｄ ＣＮＮ分類器を使用する。第１のレベルで０ ． ７ ０未満の確率で入力されたデータは、第２のレベルに渡される。誤って分類された例は、第2レベルで正しく分類されています。', 'zh': 'SemEval 2019之任6及识类社交媒体犯性语。 TECHSSN团队开统用多术。 我们开发了两个系统。 一统之中,第一级类多支2D CNN分类器成,其器有Google豫练者Word2Vec嵌功能,第二级类以字符串配,冒犯性坏词典。 第二统用多分支1D CNN分类器,带手套预练者嵌层,用于第一级类,字符串匹配于第二级类。 第一级中概率小于 0.70 者输数传至第二级。 非类者示例正于第二级。', 'ru': 'Задача 6 SemEval 2019 включает определение и категоризацию оскорбительных формулировок в социальных сетях. Системы, разработанные командой TECHSSN, используют многоуровневые методы классификации. Мы разработали две системы. В первой системе первый уровень классификации выполняется многоотраслевым 2D-классификатором CNN с предварительно обученным внедрением Word2Vec от Google, а второй уровень классификации по технике сопоставления строк поддерживается словарем оскорбительных и плохих слов. Во второй системе используется многоотраслевой классификатор 1D CNN с предварительно обученным слоем вложения Glove для первого уровня классификации и согласование строк для второго уровня классификации. Входные данные с вероятностью менее 0,70 на первом уровне передаются на второй уровень. Ошибочно классифицированные примеры правильно классифицируются на втором уровне.', 'ga': 'Baineann Tasc 6 de SemEval 2019 le teanga mhaslach a aithint agus a chatagóiriú sna meáin shóisialta. Úsáideann na córais atá forbartha ag foireann TECHSSN teicnící aicmithe il-leibhéil. Tá dhá chóras forbartha againn. Sa chéad chóras, déantar an chéad leibhéal aicmithe ag aicmitheoir ilbhrainse 2D CNN le leabú Word2Vec réamh-oilte Google agus an dara leibhéal aicmithe de réir teicníc meaitseála teaghrán le tacaíocht ó fhoclóir ionsaitheacha agus drochfhocail. Úsáideann an dara córas aicmitheoir ilbhrainse 1D CNN le ciseal leabaithe réamh-oilte Glove don chéad leibhéal aicmithe agus meaitseáil teaghrán don dara leibhéal aicmithe. Cuirtear sonraí ionchuir a bhfuil dóchúlacht níos lú ná 0.70 acu sa chéad leibhéal ar aghaidh chuig an dara leibhéal. Déantar na samplaí mírangaithe a rangú i gceart sa dara leibhéal.', 'hu': 'A SemEval 2019 6. feladata a sértő nyelv azonosítása és kategorizálása a közösségi médiában. A TECHSSN csapat által kifejlesztett rendszerek többszintű osztályozási technikákat alkalmaznak. Két rendszert fejlesztettünk ki. Az első rendszerben az osztályozás első szintjét egy többágú 2D CNN osztályozó végzi a Google előzetesen képzett Word2Vec beágyazásával, a második szintjét pedig a karakterlánc megfelelő technikával, amelyet sértő és rossz szótár támogat. A második rendszer egy többágú 1D CNN osztályozót használ Glove előre kiképzett beágyazó réteggel az első osztályozási szintre és a második osztályozási szintre vonatkozó megfelelő karakterlánccal. Az első szinten 0,70-nél kisebb valószínűségű beviteli adatokat továbbítják a második szintre. A tévesen minősített példákat helyesen osztályozzák a második szinten.', 'ka': 'SemEval 2019 წლის 6-ი დავალება იყოს სოციალური მედიაში განსაზღვრება და კატეგორიზაცია. TECHSSN ჯგუფის განვითარებული სისტემები გამოყენება მრავალური კლასიფიკაციის ტექნოგიები. ჩვენ ორი სისტემის განვითარება. პირველი სისტემიში, კლასიფიკაციის პირველი დონე გავაკეთება მრავალ საშუალებული 2D CNN კლასიფიკაციატორი Google-ის პირველი საშუალებული Word2Vec-ის დაყენება და მეორე კლასიფიკაციის დონე სტრიქციაციის მეორე დონე, რომელიც მეორე სისტემის გამოყენება მრავალ გარეშე 1D CNN კლასიფიკაციატორი, რომელიც Glove წინ გარეშე გარეშე გარეშე გარეშე სისტემის პირველი სისტემის კლასიფიკაციის და სტრიქონის კლასიფიკაცი მონაცემების მონაცემები, რომელიც უფრო მეტი 0,70 დონეში პირველი დონეში გადატანა მეორე დონეში. შეცდომი კლასიფიკაციური მაგალითები კლასიფიკაციულია მეორე დონეში.', 'el': 'Το έργο 6 του περιλαμβάνει τον εντοπισμό και την κατηγοριοποίηση προσβλητικής γλώσσας στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Τα συστήματα που αναπτύσσονται από την ομάδα χρησιμοποιούν τεχνικές ταξινόμησης πολλαπλών επιπέδων. Έχουμε αναπτύξει δύο συστήματα. Στο πρώτο σύστημα, το πρώτο επίπεδο ταξινόμησης γίνεται από έναν πολυκλαδικό ταξινομητή 2με την προ-εκπαιδευμένη ενσωμάτωση της και το δεύτερο επίπεδο ταξινόμησης με τεχνική αντιστοίχισης συμβολοσειρών που υποστηρίζεται από προσβλητικό και κακό λεξικό λέξεων. Το δεύτερο σύστημα χρησιμοποιεί έναν ταξινομητή πολλαπλών κλάδων 1με το γάντι προ-εκπαιδευμένο στρώμα ενσωμάτωσης για το πρώτο επίπεδο ταξινόμησης και αντιστοίχισης συμβολοσειρών για το δεύτερο επίπεδο ταξινόμησης. Τα δεδομένα εισόδου με πιθανότητα μικρότερης από 0.70 στο πρώτο επίπεδο μεταβιβάζονται στο δεύτερο επίπεδο. Τα λανθασμένα παραδείγματα ταξινομούνται σωστά στο δεύτερο επίπεδο.', 'kk': '2019 жылдың шегінші шегінші тапсырмасы социалдық медиақтардың қарсы тілді анықтау және санаттарын анықтау. TECHSSN тобының құрылған жүйелер көп деңгейлі классификациялау техникаларын қолданады. Біз екі жүйе жасадық. Бірінші жүйеде, бірінші салыстыру деңгейі Google- тың алдында оқылған Word2Vec ендірілген 2D CNN классификаторымен бірнеше салыстыру деңгейі және екінші салыстыру деңгейі жарамсыз сөздер сөздігі арқылы сәйкес келетін техник Екінші жүйе Glove алдында оқылған ендіру қабатты 1D бірнеше бөлік CNN классификаторын қолданады, бірінші бөлік қабатты классификациялау мен жолды бірінші деңгейіне сәйкес келетін класси Алғашқы деңгейінде 0, 70 деңгейіндегі деңгейінде келтірілген деректер екінші деңгейіне беріледі. Бұл дұрыс шектелген мысалдар екінші деңгейде дұрыс шектелген.', 'it': "Il compito 6 di SemEval 2019 prevede l'identificazione e la categorizzazione del linguaggio offensivo nei social media. I sistemi sviluppati dal team TECHSSN utilizzano tecniche di classificazione multi-livello. Abbiamo sviluppato due sistemi. Nel primo sistema, il primo livello di classificazione è fatto da un classificatore CNN 2D multi-branch con l'embedding Word2Vec pre-addestrato di Google e il secondo livello di classificazione per tecnica di corrispondenza delle stringhe supportato da dizionario offensivo e bad words. Il secondo sistema utilizza un classificatore CNN multi-branch 1D con strato di incorporazione pre-addestrato Glove per il primo livello di classificazione e corrispondenza delle stringhe per il secondo livello di classificazione. I dati di input con una probabilità inferiore a 0,70 nel primo livello vengono trasmessi al secondo livello. Gli esempi non classificati sono classificati correttamente nel secondo livello.", 'lt': '2019 m. SemEval 6 uždavinys – nustatyti ir klasifikuoti pažeidžiamąją kalbą social in ėje žiniasklaidoje. TECHSSN grupės sukurtos sistemos naudoja daugiapakopius klasifikavimo metodus. Sukūrėme dvi sistemas. Pirmojoje sistemoje pirmąjį klasifikavimo lygį atlieka dviejų šakų CNN klasifikatorius su Google iš anksto parengtu Word2Vec įdėjimu ir antrasis klasifikavimo lygis pagal string ų derinimo metodiką, paremtą offensiniu ir blogais žodžių žodynu. Antroje sistemoje naudojamas daugiafunkcinis 1D CNN klasifikatorius su pirštinėmis iš anksto parengtu įterpimo sluoksniu pirmajam klasifikavimo lygiui ir antrojo klasifikavimo lygio string ų atitikčiai. Įėjimo duomenys, kurių pirmojo lygio tikimybė mažesnė kaip 0,70, perduodami antrajam lygiui. The misclassified examples are classified correctly in the second level.', 'mk': 'Задачата 6 на SemEval 2019 вклучува идентификување и категоризација на офанзивниот јазик во социјалните медиуми. Системите развиени од тимот TECHSSN користат техники за класификација на повеќе нивоа. Развивме два системи. Во првиот систем, првото ниво на класификација е направено од мултиграничен 2Д класификатор на CNN со преобучено вградување на Word2Vec на Google и второто ниво на класификација со техника на совпаѓање на линии поддржано од офанзивен и лош збор речник. Вториот систем користи мултиграничен класификатор на 1Д CNN со предобучен слој за вградување на ракавици за првото ниво на класификација и совпаѓање на линии за второто ниво на класификација. Внесувачките податоци со веројатност помалку од 0,70 на првото ниво се пренесуваат на второто ниво. Недоверливите примери се коректно класификувани на второто ниво.', 'ms': 'Tugas 6 SemEval 2019 melibatkan pengenalan dan kategorisasi bahasa serangan dalam media sosial. Sistem yang dikembangkan oleh pasukan TECHSSN menggunakan teknik klasifikasi berbilang-aras. Kami telah mengembangkan dua sistem. Dalam sistem pertama, tahap pertama kelasukan dilakukan oleh kelasukan CNN 2D berbilang-cabang dengan penyembelihan Word2Vec terlatih oleh Google dan tahap kedua kelasukan oleh teknik persamaan rentetan yang disokong oleh kamus perkataan yang menyerang dan buruk. Sistem kedua menggunakan klasifikasi CNN berbilang-cabang 1D dengan lapisan penyembedding praterlatih sarung tangan untuk tahap pertama klasifikasi dan rentetan yang sepadan untuk tahap kedua klasifikasi. Data input dengan kemungkinan kurang dari 0.70 dalam tahap pertama akan dihantar ke tahap kedua. Contoh yang salah diklasifikasikan dengan betul dalam tahap kedua.', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ലെ ജോലി 6 സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയില്\u200d ആക്രമണഭാഷ തിരിച്ചറിയുകയും വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. ടെക്സ്എസ്ന്\u200d ടീമില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പല-നില ക്ലാസ്ഫി നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് സിസ്റ്റമുണ്ടാക്കി. ആദ്യത്തെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d, മുമ്പ് പരിശീലന വാര്\u200dഡ്2വെക്കിന്റെ മുന്നോട്ട് പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാര്\u200dഡ്\u200c2വെക്കിന്റെ ആദ്യത്തെ സ്ട്രിങ്ങ് പൊരുത്തുന്ന ടെക രണ്ടാമത്തെ സിസ്റ്റം ഗ്ലോവിന്റെ മുന്\u200dപരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ആദ്യത്തെ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷനിലേക്കും രണ്ടാമത്തെ നിലയിലേക്കും പൊരുതുന്ന സ്ട്രിങ് ആദ്യത്തെ നിലയില്\u200d 0. 70 കൂടുതല്\u200d കുറഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്ന ഉള്\u200dപുട്ട് ഡേറ്റാ രണ്ടാം നിലയിലേക്ക് കടക്കുന്നു. രണ്ടാമത്തെ നിലയില്\u200d തെറ്റായ ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d ക്ലാസിപ്പ് ചെയ്തിരിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Task 6 of SemEval 2019 involves identifying and categorizing offensive language in social media.  Is-sistemi żviluppati mit-tim TECHSSN jużaw tekniki ta’ klassifikazzjoni f’diversi livelli. Żviluppajna żewġ sistemi. Fl-ewwel sistema, l-ewwel livell ta’ klassifikazzjoni jsir minn klassifikatur CNN 2D b’diversi fergħat bl-inkorporazzjoni Word2Vec imħarrġa minn qabel ta’ Google u t-tieni livell ta’ klassifikazzjoni permezz ta’ teknika ta’ tqabbil ta’ string s appoġġjata minn dikjaratur ta’ kliem offensiv u ħa żin. It-tieni sistema tuża klassifikatur CNN b’diversi fergħat 1D b’saff ta’ inkorporazzjoni mħarreġ minn qabel bl-ingwanti għall-ewwel livell ta’ klassifikazzjoni u tqabbil ta’ strings għat-tieni livell ta’ klassifikazzjoni. Id-dejta tad-dħul b’probabbiltà ta’ inqas minn 0.70 fl-ewwel livell tgħaddi għat-tieni livell. L-eżempji kklassifikati ħażin huma kklassifikati korrettament fit-tieni livell.', 'mn': 'SemEval 2019 оны 6 даалгавар нь нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчдийн хэлнийг тодорхойлох, хуваалцах болон хуваалцах хэрэгтэй. TECHSSN багийн хөгжүүлсэн системүүд олон түвшинд ангилах техникуудыг ашигладаг. Бид хоёр системийг хөгжүүлсэн. Эхний системд, анхны хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээг олон талын 2D CNN классификатор Google-ын урд сургалтын Word2Vec нэвтрүүлэх болон стринг хоёр дахь хэмжээний хэмжээг нэвтрүүлэх техник болон муу үгийг дэмжиж байна. Хоёр дахь систем нэг олон загварын 1D CNN классификаторыг Гловын урд сургалтын хөндлөн загвартай ашигладаг. Эхний түвшинд 0.70-аас бага байх магадлал өгөгдлийн мэдээллийг хоёр дахь түвшинд дамжуулдаг. Хоёр дахь хэмжээст буруу жишээг хоёр дахь хэмжээнд зөв хуваалцагдана.', 'pl': 'Zadanie 6 SemEval 2019 polega na identyfikowaniu i kategoryzowaniu języka obraźliwego w mediach społecznościowych. Systemy opracowane przez zespół TECHSSN wykorzystują wielopoziomowe techniki klasyfikacji. Opracowaliśmy dwa systemy. W pierwszym systemie pierwszy poziom klasyfikacji odbywa się przez wielogałęziowy klasyfikator 2D CNN z wstępnie przeszkolonym wbudowaniem Word2Vec Google, a drugi poziom klasyfikacji za pomocą techniki dopasowywania ciągów wspierany przez słownik obraźliwych i złych słów. Drugi system wykorzystuje wielogałęziowy klasyfikator 1D CNN z wstępnie przeszkoloną warstwą osadzania Glove dla pierwszego poziomu klasyfikacji i dopasowania ciągów dla drugiego poziomu klasyfikacji. Dane wejściowe o prawdopodobieństwie mniejszym niż 0.70 na pierwszym poziomie są przekazywane na drugi poziom. Błędnie zaklasyfikowane przykłady są prawidłowo klasyfikowane na drugim poziomie.', 'no': 'Oppgåve 6 av semiEval 2019 involverer identifisering og kategorisering av offensivspråk i sosiale media. Systemane utvikla av TECHSSN-gruppa brukar fleirnivåklassifikasjonssteknikk. Vi har utvikla to systemer. I det første systemet er det første nivået for klassifikasjon gjort av ein multigrenseklassifiserer 2D CNN med Google sin føretrained Word2Vec- innbygging og den andre nivået for klassifikasjon etter teknikk som passar med streng som støttar av offensiv og dårleg ordordordordbok. Den andre systemet brukar ein multigrenseklassifiserer 1D CNN med Glove før- trenga innbyggingslag for den første nivået av klassifikasjon og strengen som passar til den andre nivået av klassifikasjon. Inndata med sannsynlighet på mindre enn 0,70 i den første nivået vert sendt til den andre nivået. Feilklassifiserte eksemplene er klassifisert rett i andre nivå.', 'ro': 'Sarcina 6 a SemEval 2019 implică identificarea și clasificarea limbajului ofensator în rețelele sociale. Sistemele dezvoltate de echipa TECHSSN utilizează tehnici de clasificare pe mai multe niveluri. Am dezvoltat două sisteme. În primul sistem, primul nivel de clasificare este realizat de un clasificator CNN 2D multi-ramură cu încorporarea Word2Vec pre-instruită de Google și al doilea nivel de clasificare prin tehnica de corelare a șirurilor susținută de dicționarul de cuvinte ofensatoare și rele. Al doilea sistem utilizează un clasificator 1D CNN multi-ramură cu strat de încorporare pre-antrenat Glove pentru primul nivel de clasificare și corelarea șirurilor pentru al doilea nivel de clasificare. Datele de intrare cu o probabilitate mai mică de 0,70 în primul nivel sunt transmise la al doilea nivel. Exemplele clasificate greșit sunt clasificate corect în al doilea nivel.', 'sr': 'Цел 6 од полевела 2019. включава идентификацију и категоризацију оффицивног језика у социалним средима. Sistemi koje je razvila TECHSSN tim koriste više nivoa klasifikacijske tehnike. Razvili smo dva sistema. U prvom sistemu, prvi nivo klasifikacije obavlja multi branch 2D CNN klasifikator s a predobučenim Word2Vec integracijom Google-a i drugom nivou klasifikacije tehnikom odgovarajućeg reči koje podržava ofanzivni i loši reči. Drugi sistem koristi multi branch 1D CNN klasifikator sa predobučenim slojem za prvi nivo klasifikacije i linije odgovarajuće za drugu nivo klasifikacije. Podaci o ulazu sa verovatnošću manje od 0,70 na prvom nivou se prenose na drugu nivou. Pogrešne klasifikovane primjere su točno klasifikovane na drugom nivou.', 'so': "Shaqada 6 ee SemEval 2019 waxaa ka mid ah aqoonsiga iyo qeybinta luqada caafimaadka ee bulshada. Isticmaalka kooxda TECHSSN waxay isticmaalaan qaabab kala duduwan. waxaan korinay laba nidaam. Xiliga koowaad waxaa lagu sameeyaa darajada ugu horreeya fasaxa 2D CNN oo kala duduwan oo ku qoran Google's pre-trained Word2Vec embedding iyo darafka labaad ee fasaxga waxaa lagu kaalmeeyaa teknolojiga isku mid ah oo ku qoran hadalka caasiyiinta iyo erayada xunxun. Tirada labaad wuxuu isticmaalaa fasalka 1D CNN oo kala duduwan oo Glove la bartay darafka hore ee fasalka iyo darafka labaad oo u eg darajada labaad. Macluumaadka soo gelinta oo suurtagal ah in ka yar 0.70 darajada kowaad la gudbo darajada labaad. Tusaalaha aan la kala soocayn waa si saxda ah heerka labaad.", 'sv': 'Uppgift 6 i SemEval 2019 handlar om att identifiera och kategorisera stötande språk i sociala medier. Systemen som utvecklats av TECHSSN-teamet använder klassificeringstekniker på flera nivåer. Vi har utvecklat två system. I det första systemet görs den första nivån av klassificering av en multi-branch 2D CNN klassificerare med Googles pre-utbildade Word2Vec inbäddning och den andra nivån av klassificering genom sträng matchning teknik stöds av stötande och dåliga ord ordbok. Det andra systemet använder en multi-branch 1D CNN klassificerare med Glove förintränat inbäddningslager för den första nivån av klassificering och sträng matchning för den andra nivån av klassificering. Inmatningsdata med en sannolikhet på mindre än 0,70 i den första nivån överförs till den andra nivån. De felklassificerade exemplen klassificeras korrekt i den andra nivån.', 'si': '2019 සේම්වල් 6 වැඩේ වැඩේ සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයාත්මක භාෂාව පරීක්ෂා කරන්න සහ පරීක්ෂණ කරනවා. TECHSSN කණ්ඩායමෙන් විස්තර කරපු පද්ධතිය බොහොම ස්ථාන විශේෂණ ප්\u200dරකාරය භාවිත කරනවා. අපි පද්ධති දෙකක් විකාශ කරලා තියෙනවා. පළමු පද්ධතියේ, පළමු පද්ධතියේ පරීක්ෂණයේ පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ ගුගුල්ගේ ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණිත Word2Vec සංවිධානය සහ පරීක්ෂණයේ දෙවෙනි පද්ධතියේ පද්ධතිය සඳහ දෙවෙනි පද්ධතිය භාවිතා කරන්නේ ග්ලෝව් ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතියේ පළමු පද්ධතියේ විශේෂණය සහ ස්ට්\u200dරින්  පළමු ස්ථානයේ 0.70 වඩා අඩු සැකසුම් තියෙන සැකසුම් තියෙන්නේ දෙවෙනි ස්ථානයට යවන්න. වැරදි විශේෂිත උදාහරණය දෙවෙනි ස්ථානයේ හරියටම විශේෂ කරලා තියෙනවා.', 'ta': 'செம்Eval 2019ன் செயல் 6 சமூக ஊடகங்களில் குறைந்த மொழியை கண்டுபிடிப்பது மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்துவது மற்றும் உள்ளது. TECHSSN குழு உருவாக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்புகள் பல நிலை வகுப்பு தொழில்நுட்பங்களை பயன்படுத்துகின்றன. நாங்கள் இரண்டு அமைப்புகளை உருவாக்கினோம். முதல் முறைமையில், முதல் வகுப்பு மட்டத்தின் முறை வகுப்பு 2D CNN வகுப்பாளரால் செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது கூகுலின் முன் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தை2வெக் பொருத்தம் மற்றும்  இரண்டாவது அமைப்பு முதல் வகுப்பு மற்றும் இரண்டாவது மட்டத்திற்கு பொருத்தும் வகுப்பு மற்றும் சரம் பொருத்தும் முதல் வகுப்பு மட்டத்திற்கு கிளோவ் ம முதல் நிலையில் 0. 70 க்கு குறைந்ததாக உள்ளீட்டு தரவு இரண்டாவது நிலைக்கு செல்லப்படுகிறது. தவறான வகைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட உதாரணங்கள் இரண்டாவது நிலையில் சரியாக வகைப்படுகின்றன.', 'ur': 'سوسیل میڈیا میں فساد کی زبان شناسایی اور تقسیم کرنا ہے۔ TECHSSN ٹیم کے ذریعہ تولید کی سیستمات مختلف سطح کلاسپیٹ تکنیک استعمال کرتی ہے. ہم نے دو سیستموں کو پیدا کیا ہے۔ پہلی سیسٹم میں، کلاسیفون کی پہلی سطح ایک multi-branch 2D سی ان کی کلاسیفون نے گوگل کے پہلے ترسیم Word2Vec ایمبڈینگ اور دوسری سطح کلاسیفون کی کلاسیفون کے ذریعہ ایک ٹرینگ مطابق تکنیک کے ذریعہ مطابق کرتی ہے جو فنسیف اور برے کلمات دی جاتی ہے دوسری سیسٹم ایک multi-branch 1D سی ان کے کلیسٹر کا استعمال کرتا ہے جو کلیسٹ کی دوسری سطح کے لئے کلیسٹ کی پہلی سطح کے لئے گلوف پیش تربین کی ایمبڈینگ لائر کے ساتھ کرتا ہے. اولین سطح میں 0.70 سے کم ہو جانے کی امکانات کے ساتھ اپنا ڈیٹا دوسرے سطح پر پھیرا جاتا ہے. غلط طریقے کی مثالیں دوسری سطح میں ٹھیک طریقے سے پھیری جاتی ہیں.', 'uz': "SemEval 2019 yili 6 vazifa jamiyat media'da ta'sirli tilni aniqlash va kattalashga ega. The systems developed by TECHSSN team uses multi-level classification techniques.  Biz ikkita tizimni yaratdik. Birinchi tizimda, birinchi darajadagi darajadagi darajadagi birinchi darajada, Google'ning birinchi o'rganilgan soʻzni 2D CNN darajasi bilan boshqa darajaga bajariladi, va birinchi darajadagi darajadagi darajadagi darajadagi darajadagi darajalashtirish darajasi, ta'sirlik va yomon so'zlar lugʻatga qoʻllaniladi. Ikkinchi tizim darajadagi ikkinchi darajaga mos keladigan darajadagi darajadagi darajadagi darajadagi darajaga birinchi darajaga moslash va satr bilan birinchi darajaga moslash mumkin. Birinchi darajada 0. 70 yoʻq boʻlgan maʼlumot ikkinchi darajaga oʻtishadi. @ info: whatsthis", 'vi': 'Nhiệm vụ 6 của SemEvol diễn ra là việc xác định và phân loại ngôn ngữ tấn công trong truyền thông xã hội. Hệ thống được phát triển bởi đội TECHSSN sử dụng các kỹ thuật phân hạng đa cấp. Chúng tôi đã phát triển hai hệ thống. Trong hệ thống đầu tiên, mức độ phân hạng đầu tiên được thực hiện bởi một chuyên gia đa nhánh 2D CNN cùng với tác phẩm của Google đã được huấn luyện s ẵn Word2Ves và cấp thứ hai của phân loại theo kỹ thuật khớp chuỗi được hỗ trợ bởi từ điển tấn công và từ xấu. Hệ thống thứ hai sử dụng một phân loại đa nhánh 1D CNN với Lớp nhúng nhúng nhúng được chưa đan sẵn với cấp đầu tiên cho cấp độ phân loại đầu tiên và khớp chuỗi cho cấp thứ hai. Dữ liệu nhập với khả năng thấp hơn 0.70 tại tầng đầu tiên được chuyển lên tầng hai. Các ví dụ không phân loại được phân loại đúng ở cấp hai.', 'bg': 'Задача 6 на СемЕвал 2019 включва идентифициране и категоризиране на обиден език в социалните медии. Системите, разработени от екипа на ТЕХСН, използват многостепенни класификационни техники. Разработихме две системи. В първата система първото ниво на класификация се извършва от многобраншов 2класификатор с предварително обучени вграждания и второто ниво на класификация чрез техника за съвпадение на низове, поддържана от обидни и лоши думи речник. Втората система използва многобраншов 1класификатор с предварително обучен вграден слой Ръкавица за първото ниво на класификация и съвпадение на низове за второто ниво на класификация. Входни данни с вероятност по-малка от 0,70 в първото ниво се предават на второто ниво. Грешно класифицираните примери са класифицирани правилно във второто ниво.', 'nl': "Taak 6 van SemEval 2019 omvat het identificeren en categoriseren van aanstootgevende taal in sociale media. De door het TECHSSN team ontwikkelde systemen maken gebruik van multi-level classificatietechnieken. We hebben twee systemen ontwikkeld. In het eerste systeem wordt het eerste classificatieniveau gedaan door een multi-branch 2D CNN classificator met Google's voorgetrainde Word2Vec embedding en het tweede classificatieniveau door string matching techniek ondersteund door aanstootgevende en slechte woorden woordenboek. Het tweede systeem maakt gebruik van een multi-branch 1D CNN classificator met Glove voorgetrainde embedding laag voor het eerste niveau van classificatie en string matching voor het tweede niveau van classificatie. Invoergegevens met een waarschijnlijkheid van minder dan 0.70 in het eerste niveau worden doorgegeven aan het tweede niveau. De misgeclassificeerde voorbeelden zijn correct ingedeeld in het tweede niveau.", 'da': 'Opgave 6 i SemEval 2019 involverer identificering og kategorisering af stødende sprog i sociale medier. Systemerne udviklet af TECHSSN-teamet anvender klassifikationsteknikker på flere niveauer. Vi har udviklet to systemer. I det første system udføres det første niveau af klassificering af en multi-branch 2D CNN klassificering med Googles forududdannede Word2Vec indlejring og det andet niveau af klassificering af streng matching teknik understøttet af offensive og dårlige ord ordbog. Det andet system bruger en multi-branch 1D CNN klassificering med Glove prætrænet indlejringslag til det første niveau af klassificering og strengmatching til det andet niveau af klassificering. Inputdata med en sandsynlighed på mindre end 0,70 i det første niveau videregives til det andet niveau. De fejlklassificerede eksempler klassificeres korrekt på andet niveau.', 'de': 'Aufgabe 6 von SemEval 2019 besteht darin, offensive Sprache in sozialen Medien zu identifizieren und zu kategorisieren. Die vom TECHSSN-Team entwickelten Systeme verwenden mehrstufige Klassifizierungstechniken. Wir haben zwei Systeme entwickelt. Im ersten System erfolgt die erste Klassifikationsstufe durch einen zweizweigen 2D CNN-Klassifikator mit Googles vortrainierter Word2Vec-Einbettung und die zweite Klassifikationsstufe durch String-Matching-Technik, die von offensiven und schlechten Wörtern unterstützt wird. Das zweite System verwendet einen mehrverzweigten 1D CNN Klassifikator mit Glove vortrainierter Einbettungsschicht für die erste Klassifikationsstufe und String Matching für die zweite Klassifikationsstufe. Eingabedaten mit einer Wahrscheinlichkeit von weniger als 0,70 in der ersten Ebene werden an die zweite Ebene weitergegeben. Die falsch klassifizierten Beispiele werden in der zweiten Ebene korrekt eingeordnet.', 'id': 'Tugas 6 SemEval 2019 melibatkan mengidentifikasi dan kategorisasi bahasa offensive dalam media sosial. Sistem yang dikembangkan oleh tim TECHSSN menggunakan teknik klasifikasi multi-level. Kami telah mengembangkan dua sistem. Dalam sistem pertama, tingkat pertama klasifikasi dilakukan oleh klasifikasi CNN multi-cabang 2D dengan pembangunan Word2Vec terlatih oleh Google dan tingkat kedua klasifikasi dengan teknik persamaan string yang didukung oleh kamus kata-kata yang menyerang dan buruk. Sistem kedua menggunakan klasifikasi CNN multi-cabang 1D dengan lapisan embedding prapelatih Glove untuk tingkat pertama klasifikasi dan string yang cocok untuk tingkat kedua klasifikasi. Data masukan dengan kemungkinan kurang dari 0,70 di tingkat pertama dihantar ke tingkat kedua. Contoh yang salah diklasifikasikan dengan benar di tingkat kedua.', 'fa': 'وظیفه ۶ مرحله ۲۰۱۹ شامل شناسایی و برگزیدن زبان تجاوز در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی است. سیستم\u200cهایی که توسط تیم TECHSSN توسعه داده شده استفاده می\u200cکند از تکنیک\u200cهای مختلف سطح\u200cهای زیادی استفاده می\u200cکند. ما دو سیستم توسعه کردیم. در اولین سیستم، سطح اولین برنامه برنامه\u200cبندی توسط یک برنامه برنامه\u200cگر ۲D سین\u200cان با ورود Word2Vec پیش\u200cآموزش گوگل و سطح دوم برنامه\u200cبندی توسط برنامه\u200cهای متفاوت با تکنیک برنامه\u200cبندی که توسط کلمه\u200cهای ناپسند و بد پشتیبانی می\u200cشود سیستم دوم از طریق مختصر ۱ D سین چند شاخه استفاده می\u200cکند با لایه ابتدایی پیش آموزش Glove برای سطح اولین مختصات و خط مسابقه برای سطح دوم مختصات. داده\u200cهای ورودی با احتمال کمتر از 0.70 در سطح اول به سطح دوم رد می\u200cشوند. مثالهای غیرقانونی در سطح دوم به طور درست محرمانه می شوند.', 'sw': "Kazi 6 ya SemEval 2019 inahusisha kutambua na kugawanya lugha ya matusi katika mitandao ya kijamii. Mfumo uliotengenezwa na timu ya TECHSSN hutumia mbinu za usambazaji wa ngazi nyingi. Tumeunda mifumo miwili. In the first system, the first level of classification is done by a multi-branch 2D CNN classifier with Google's pre-trained Word2Vec embedding and the second level of classification by string matching technique supported by offensive and bad words dictionary.  Mfumo wa pili hutumia mwandishi wa CNN wa aina mbalimbali wa CNN na daraja la Glove lililojifunza kwa kiwango cha kwanza cha usafsi na mstari unaohusiana na kiwango cha pili cha darasa. Takwimu za input yenye uwezekano wa chini ya 0.70 katika ngazi ya kwanza hupitishwa kwenye ngazi ya pili. Mifano yasiyofanywa vibaya yanafanana sahihi katika ngazi ya pili.", 'tr': "SemEval 2019-yň 6-nji zady sosial medýdançalaryň adyny tanamak we kategoriýasyz dilini belleýär. TECHSSN topary tarapyndan gelişmiş sistemler birnäçe-dereje klasifikasiýa teknikleri ulanýar. Biz iki sistemany geliştirdik. Ilkinji sistemde, multi-branch 2D CNN klasifikatçysy Google'iň öňünde eğlenen Word2Vec girişi we ikinji dereje klasifikatçysy üçin edilen tekniki üçin ullanýar. Ikinji sistem klasifikasyň birinji derejesi üçin multi-branch 1D CNN klasifikatçysyny ulanýar Ilkinji derejede 0,70'den az bir mümkinçilik bilen girdi maglumaty ikinji derejede geçirilýär. Därler ýalňyş mysal ikinji derejede dogry ýazylýar.", 'af': "Opdrag 6 van SemEval 2019 involves identifying and categorising offensive language in social media. Die stelsels wat deur TECHSSN-span ontwikkel word gebruik multivlak klasifikasie tekniks. Ons het twee stelsels ontwikkel. In die eerste stelsel, word die eerste vlak van klasifikasie gedoen deur 'n multi-branch 2D CNN klassifiseerder met Google se voorafgeleerde Word2Vec inbêding en die tweede vlak van klasifikasie deur string ooreenstemmende tekniks ondersteun deur offensive en slegte woorde woordewoordeboek. Die tweede stelsel gebruik 'n multi- branch 1D CNN klassifiseerder met Glove voor- gevorderde inbêer laag vir die eerste vlak van klassifikasie en string ooreenstem vir die tweede vlak van klassifikasie. Invoer data met 'n waarskynlik van minder as 0. 70 in die eerste vlak word oorgetrek na die tweede vlak. Die misklassifiseerde voorbeelde word korrek in die tweede vlak geklassifiseer.", 'sq': 'Detyra 6 e SemEval 2019 përfshin identifikimin dhe kategorizimin e gjuhës ofensive në media sociale. Sistemet e zhvilluar nga ekipi TECHSSN përdorin teknika klasifikuese shumë nivele. Kemi zhvilluar dy sisteme. Në sistemin e parë, niveli i parë i klasifikimit bëhet nga një klasifikues CNN me shumë degë me Word2Vec të paratrajnuar nga Google dhe niveli i dytë i klasifikimit nga teknika e përshtatjes s ë rreshtave mbështetur nga fjalëkalimi ofensiv dhe i keq. Sistemi i dytë përdor një klasifikues 1D CNN me shtresë përfshirjeje të stërvitur nga dorashka për nivelin e parë të klasifikimit dhe përputhjes me string për nivelin e dytë të klasifikimit. Input data with a probability of less than 0.70 in the first level are passed on to the second level.  Shembujt e klasifikuar gabimisht janë klasifikuar korrekt në nivelin e dytë.', 'am': 'የስምEval 2019 ስራ በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ውስጥ የሚያስቃወም ቋንቋን ለማሳየት እና ማደጋጋጋጨት ነው፡፡ የTECHSSN ቡድን የተደረገውን ስርዓቶች በብዙ ደረጃ መግለጫ ጥያቄዎችን ይጠቅማል፡፡ ሁለትን ስርዓት ፈጠርን ። በመጀመሪያው ስርዓት፣ የፊተኛው ደረጃ መግለጫ በሁለት ቅርንጫፎች 2D CNN ክፍላፊ በጎግል በፊት ተማሪ ቃላት 2Vec በኩል እና በሁለተኛው ደረጃ በሥርዓት ማሰናከል እና በመጥፎ እና በመጥፎ ቃላት መዝገብ የተመዘጋጀ ስህተት የተደገፈ ነው፡፡ ሁለተኛው ስርዓት በሁለተኛው ደረጃ ላይ ለመግለጫ እና ለሁለተኛው ደረጃ የሚተያያየው ክፍል ሥርዓት የተለያየ 1D CNN መግለጫ ይደረጋል። የመጀመሪያው ደረጃ ውስጥ ከ0.70 የሚያንስ የየግብጽ ዳታ ወደ ሁለተኛው ደረጃ ያልፋል። የስህተት ምሳሌዎች በሁለተኛው ደረጃ ላይ የተለያዩ ናቸው።', 'hr': 'Za 6. zadatak semiEvala 2019. uključuje identifikaciju i kategoriju ofanzivnog jezika u društvenim medijima. Sistemi koje je razvila TECHSSN tim koriste više nivoa klasifikacijske tehnike. Razvili smo dva sustava. U prvom sustavu, prva razina klasifikacije čini višegranični 2D CNN klasifikator s a predobučenim Word2Vec ugrađivanjem Google-a i drugim razinama klasifikacije pod tehnikom odgovarajućim žicama podržavanim ofanzivnim i lošim riječima. Drugi sustav koristi multi branch 1D CNN klasifikatora sa predobučenim osnovom za prvu razinu klasifikacije i žica odgovarajućih za drugu razinu klasifikacije. Podaci o ulazu s vjerojatnošću manje od 0,70 na prvoj razini prenose se na drugu razinu. Pogrešno klasifikirani primjeri su točno klasifikirani na drugoj razini.', 'hy': '2019 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" 6-ը ներառում է սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում գրավիչ լեզուների բացահայտումը և դասակարգումը: TECHSSN թիմի կողմից զարգացած համակարգերը օգտագործում են բազմամամամակարդակների դասակարգման մեթոդներ: Մենք երկու համակարգ ենք զարգացել: Առաջին համակարգում դասակարգման առաջին մակարդակը կատարվում է բազմաճիշտ 2D CNN դասակարգչի միջոցով, որը օգտագործվում է Google-ի նախապատրաստված Word2vec-ի ներգրավման և երկրորդ դասակարգման մակարդակի միջոցով լարերի համապատասխանման տեխնիկայի միջոցով, որը աջակցում է ցա Երկրորդ համակարգը օգտագործում է բազմաճիշտ 1D CNN դասակարգչի, որը պատրաստված է Գաշվի նախապատրաստված ներգրավման շերտ դասակարգման առաջին մակարդակի և լարերի համապատասխանման երկրորդ մակարդակի համար: Առաջին մակարդակում 0.70-ից քիչ հավանականությամբ ներմուծի տվյալները տեղափոխվում են երկրորդ մակարդակին: The misclassified examples are classified correctly in the second level.', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল ২০১৯ এর ৬ কাজ সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে আক্রান্ত ভাষা চিহ্নিত এবং বিভক্ত করা হয়েছে। The systems developed by TECHSSN team uses multi-level classification techniques.  আমরা দুই সিস্টেম উন্নয়ন করেছি। প্রথম সিস্টেমে গুগলের পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত ওয়ার্ড ২ভেক বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন স্থান এবং স্ট্রীন ম্যাচিং প্রযুক্তি এবং খারাপ শব্দভাণ্ডার দ্বিতীয় পর্যায়ে প্রথম পর্য দ্বিতীয় সিস্টেম ব্যবহার করে দ্বিতীয় পর্যায়ে গ্লোভ পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত এমপেডিং স্তরের সাথে একটি বহুবিশাল ব্র্যাঙ্ক ১ডি সিএনএন ব্যবহার করে দ্ব প্রথম স্তরের কম ০. 70-এর ইনপুট ডাটা দ্বিতীয় স্তরে পাশ করা হয়। দ্বিতীয় পর্যায়ে ভুল বিভাগের উদাহরণ সঠিকভাবে বিভাগ করা হয়েছে।', 'az': "SemEval 2019'nin 6. iŇüi sosyal media i√ßind…ô offensiv dilini t…ôsdiql…ôm…ôk v…ô kategoriyalandńĪrmaq bar…ôsind…ôdir. TECHSSN ekibi t…ôhsil edilmiŇü sisteml…ôr √ßoxlu seviyy…ôtli klasifikasiya teknikl…ôrini istifad…ô edir. Biz iki sistemi inŇüa etdik. ńįlk sistemd…ô, ilk s …ôviyy…ôd…ô klasifikasiya, Google'un …ôvv…ôlc…ô t…ôhsil edilmiŇü Word2Vec i√ß…ôrisind…ô v…ô ikinci s…ôviyy…ôd…ô klasifikasiya t…ôhsil il…ô istifad…ô edil…ôn teknik…ô il…ô d…ôst…ôkl…ônir. ńįkinci sistem, Klasifikat ikinci s…ôviyy…ôsin…ô uyńüun ilk s…ôviyy…ôsi √ľ√ß√ľn Glove √∂yr…ôtilmiŇü yatńĪrńĪlma s…ôviyy…ôsi il…ô √ßox-d…ôst…ô 1D CNN klasifikat√ßńĪsńĪnńĪ kullanńĪr. ńįlk s…ôviyy…ôd…ô 0,70'd…ôn az m√ľmk√ľn olan girdi m…ôlumatlarńĪ ikinci s…ôviyy…ôy…ô g√∂nd…ôrilir. ńįkinci s…ôviyy…ôd…ô yanlńĪŇü sńĪralanmńĪŇü n√ľmun…ôl…ôr dońüru sńĪralanmńĪŇüdńĪr.", 'ko': 'SemEval 2019의 임무 6는 소셜미디어에서 공격적인 언어를 식별하고 분류하는 데 관련된다.TECHSSN 팀이 개발한 시스템은 다중 분류 기술을 사용합니다.우리는 두 개의 시스템을 개발했다.첫 번째 시스템에서 1단계 분류는 구글이 미리 훈련한 Word2Vec를 끼워 넣은 다중 분기 2D CNN 분류기, 2단계 분류는 공격성과 악어 사전이 지원하는 문자열 매칭 기술로 이뤄졌다.두 번째 시스템은 다중 분기 1D CNN 분류기를 사용하고, 첫 번째 분류는 장갑 프리 트레이닝 삽입층을 사용하며, 두 번째 분류는 문자열을 사용하여 일치한다.1급 확률이 0.70보다 적은 입력 데이터가 2급으로 전달된다.오류 분류의 예는 두 번째 단계에서 정확하게 분류된다.', 'ca': "La tasca 6 de SemEval 2019 implica identificar i categoritzar la llengua ofensiva als mitjans socials. The systems developed by TECHSSN team uses multi-level classification techniques.  Hem desenvolupat dos sistemes. En el primer sistema, el primer nivell de classificació és fet per un classificador CNN en 2D multibranca amb l'incorporació de Word2Vec pré-entrenada de Google i el segon nivell de classificació per tècnica d'ajustament de cadenes sostenida per diccionari ofensiu i dolent. El segon sistema utilitza un classificador CNN 1D multiramal amb capa d'incorporació pré-entrenada de Glove per al primer nivell de classificació i correlació de cadenes per al segon nivell de classificació. Les dades d'entrada amb una probabilitat de menys de 0,70 en el primer nivell es transmetren al segon nivell. Els exemples mal classificats són classificats correctament al segon nivell.", 'cs': 'Úkol 6 SemEval 2019 zahrnuje identifikaci a kategorizaci urážlivého jazyka v sociálních médiích. Systémy vyvinuté týmem TECHSSN využívají víceúrovňové klasifikační techniky. Vyvinuli jsme dva systémy. V prvním systému je první úroveň klasifikace prováděna vícevětvovým 2D CNN klasifikátorem s předškoleným vložením Word2Vec Googlu a druhá úroveň klasifikace technikou shodování řetězců podporovaná urážlivým a špatným slovníkem. Druhý systém využívá vícevětvový 1D CNN klasifikátor s předcvičenou vloženou vrstvou rukavice pro první úroveň klasifikace a řetězcové odpovídání pro druhou úroveň klasifikace. Vstupní data s pravděpodobností menší než 0,70 v první úrovni se předávají do druhé úrovně. Špatně klasifikované příklady jsou správně klasifikovány do druhé úrovně.', 'et': "SemEval 2019 ülesanne 6 hõlmab solvava keele tuvastamist ja kategoriseerimist sotsiaalmeedias. TECHSSNi meeskonna väljatöötatud süsteemides kasutatakse mitmetasandilisi klassifitseerimismeetodeid. Oleme välja töötanud kaks süsteemi. Esimeses süsteemis teeb esimese klassifitseerimistaseme mitmeharuline 2D CNN klassifitseerija Google'i eelnevalt väljaõpetatud Word2Vec manustamisega ja teise taseme klassifitseerimise stringide sobitamise tehnika abil, mida toetab solvav ja halb sõnastik. Teises süsteemis kasutatakse esimese klassifitseerimistaseme jaoks mitmeharulist 1D CNN klassifitseerijat, millel on Glove eelkoolitud manustamiskiht ja teise klassifitseerimistaseme jaoks stringide sobitamist. Sisendandmed, mille tõenäosus on väiksem kui 0,70 esimesel tasandil, edastatakse teisele tasandile. Valesti klassifitseeritud näited klassifitseeritakse teisel tasandil õigesti.", 'bs': 'Za 6. zadatak SemEval 2019 uključuje identifikaciju i kategoriju ofanzivnog jezika u društvenim medijima. Sistemi koje je razvila TECHSSN tim koriste više nivoa klasifikacijske tehnike. Razvili smo dva sistema. U prvom sistemu, prvi nivo klasifikacije obavlja multi branch 2D CNN klasifikator s a predobučenim Word2Vec integracijom Google-a i drugom nivou klasifikacije pod tehnikom odgovarajuće string podržavanim ofanzivnim i lošim riječima. Drugi sistem koristi multi branch 1D CNN klasifikator sa predobučenim slojem za prvi nivo klasifikacije i linije odgovarajućih za drugu nivo klasifikacije. Podaci o ulazu sa verovatnošću manje od 0,70 na prvom nivou se prenose na drugu nivou. Pogrešno klasifikovani primjeri su točno klasifikovani na drugom nivou.', 'fi': 'SemEval 2019:n tehtävä 6 sisältää loukkaavan kielen tunnistamisen ja luokittelun sosiaalisessa mediassa. TECHSSN-tiimin kehittämät järjestelmät käyttävät monitasoisia luokitustekniikoita. Olemme kehittäneet kaksi järjestelmää. Ensimmäisessä järjestelmässä ensimmäinen luokitustaso tehdään monihaaraisella 2D CNN-luokittimella Googlen esikoulutetulla Word2Vec-upotuksella ja toinen luokitustaso merkkijonojen täsmäytystekniikalla, jota tukee loukkaava ja huono sanakirja. Toisessa järjestelmässä käytetään monihaaraista 1D CNN-luokitusta, jossa on Glove-esikoulutettu upotuskerros ensimmäiselle luokittelutasolle ja merkkijonojen täsmäytystä toiselle luokittelutasolle. Syöttötiedot, joiden todennäköisyys on alle 0,70 ensimmäisellä tasolla, siirretään toiselle tasolle. Virheellisesti luokitellut esimerkit luokitellaan oikein toisella tasolla.', 'jv': 'task 6 of semebal 2011 Sistem sing ditambah akeh luwih akeh saben kelas ten Awak dhéwé wis diguwang sistem durung. Nang Sistem tualke, sampeyan perusahaan kelas tualke kelas nang sekondiki 2D amben karo perusahaan kelas word 2vec sing dibenalke nggawe Google s a ProgressBarUpdates Sistem wis digawe sistem sistem sistem sing nambah multi-ramu 1D I Bandit-format', 'ha': "Taimar 6 na SemEal 2019 yana samun su gane kuma su categori lugha turɓãya a cikin mita society. @ item: inlistbox Software Mun develope system biyu. In tsarin farko, daraja na farko na samar da wani daraja mai yawa na 2D CNN mai fassarar da Google's pre-wa'anar magana 2Verd2V embedding and the other levels of classified by string Match Technical which is ƙaranced by dictionary ɗin na ƙiyayya da abuse. Sistemi na biyu yana amfani da wani daraja mai yawa na 1D CNN mai rarraba daraja na GFont da aka yi wa kwance wa daraja na farko na sifiseri da jerin mai daidaita wa daraja na biyu mai ƙidãya. QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu The misclassified examples are classified correctly in the second level.", 'sk': 'Naloga 6 SemEval 2019 vključuje identifikacijo in kategorizacijo žaljivega jezika v družbenih omrežjih. Sistemi, ki jih je razvila ekipa TECHSSN, uporabljajo večstopenjske klasifikacijske tehnike. Razvili smo dva sistema. V prvem sistemu prvo stopnjo klasifikacije opravi večpanožni 2D CNN klasifikator z Googlovim vnaprej usposobljenim Word2Vec vdelavo, drugo stopnjo klasifikacije s tehniko ujemanja nizov pa podpira žaljiv in slab slovar besed. Drugi sistem uporablja večplastni 1D CNN klasifikacijski sistem s predhodno usposobljenim vgradnim slojem Glove za prvo stopnjo klasifikacije in ujemanje nizov za drugo stopnjo klasifikacije. Vhodni podatki z verjetnostjo manj kot 0,70 v prvi stopnji se prenesejo na drugo stopnjo. Napačno razvrščeni primeri so pravilno razvrščeni na drugi stopnji.', 'he': 'המשימה 6 של SemEval 2019 כוללת זיהוי וקטגוריזם שפה פגיעה בתקשורת חברתית. המערכות שפותחות על ידי צוות TECHSSN משתמשים בטכניקות קליזציה רבות רמות. We have developed two systems.  במערכת הראשונה, רמה הראשונה של הסווג נעשה על ידי מסווג CNN במספר ענפים 2D עם הקליסציה Word2Vec מאומנת מראש של גוגל ורמה השנייה של הסווג על ידי טכניקת התאמת רצועות שנתמכה במילון המילים הפגיעות והרעות. המערכת השנייה משתמשת במסגרת CNN multi branch 1D עם שכבת קישור מאומנת מראש של כפפות לרמה הראשונה של סיווג ותאמנת תחתונים לרמה השנייה של סיווג. נתוני הכניסה עם סבירות של פחות מ-0.70 ברמה הראשונה מועברים לרמה השנייה. דוגמאות מסווגות שגויות מסווגות נכון ברמה השנייה.', 'bo': "འཇིག་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བརྗོད་ལ་ ༦(SemEval) 2019ལ་ལས་དུས་མཐུན་གྱི་འགྲོ་སྟངས་དང་དབྱེ་བ་ཡིན་པ། TECHSSN ཚོ་ཁག་གི་མ་ལག་གིས་སྣ་མཐོ་རིམ་གྱི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་སྤྱོད་པ། ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་གཉིས་དབར་གྱི་ལུགས་ཡོད་པ་རེད། In the first system, the first level of classification is done by a multi-branch 2D CNN classifier with Google's pre-trained Word2Vec embedding and the second level of classification by string matching technique supported by offensive and bad words dictionary. The second system uses a multi-branch 1D CNN classifier with Glove pre-trained embedding layer for the first level of classification and string matching for the second level of classification. ཐོག་མའི་གནས་སྟངས་ལྡན་གཉིས་པ་ཡིན་པས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཆེ་ཆུང་ཉུང་ཡིན་པས། དབྱེ་སྟངས་འཛིན་པའི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་དེ་དག་ཚད་གཉིས་པ་ནང་དུ་ཉར་འཛིན་ཡོད་པ"}
{'en': 'The Titans at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : Offensive Language Identification, Categorization and Target Identification', 'fr': 'The Titans at SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: Identification du langage offensant, catégorisation et identification de cible', 'ar': 'The Titans at SemEval-2019 Task 6: تحديد اللغة الهجومية وتصنيفها وتحديد الهدف', 'es': 'Tarea 6 de los Titanes en SemEval-2019: Identificación de lenguaje ofensivo, categorización e identificación de objetivos', 'pt': 'Os Titãs no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Identificação de Linguagem Ofensiva, Categorização e Identificação de Alvos', 'ja': 'Titans at SemEval -2019タスク6 ：攻撃的な言語の識別、分類、ターゲットの識別', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019务6泰坦:犯言知,类与期', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 6 में टाइटन्स: आक्रामक भाषा पहचान, वर्गीकरण और लक्ष्य पहचान', 'ru': 'Титаны на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Идентификация оскорбительного языка, категоризация и идентификация цели', 'ga': 'The Titans ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Aithint Teanga Iontach, Catagóiriú agus Aithint Spriocanna', 'ka': 'სამუშაო-2019 დავალება 6: სამუშაო ენის იდენტიფიკაცია, კატეგორიზაცია და მისაღების იდენტიფიკაცია', 'el': 'Οι Τιτάνες στο έργο 6: Προσθετικός γλωσσικός προσδιορισμός, κατηγοριοποίηση και προσδιορισμός στόχου', 'hu': 'A Titánok a SemEval-2019 6. feladat: Támadó nyelv azonosítása, kategorizálása és célpont azonosítása', 'it': 'I Titani a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identificazione del linguaggio offensivo, categorizzazione e identificazione del bersaglio', 'kk': 'Тапсырма 6- жарым- 2019 тапсырмасының атаулары: Тіл идентификациясы, санатификация және мақсатты идентификациясы', 'lt': 'Titanai 2019 m. pusmečio metu 6 užduotis: žalingos kalbos identifikavimas, kategorijizavimas ir tikslo identifikavimas', 'mk': 'The Titans at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification, Categorization and Target Identification', 'ms': 'The Titans at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification, Categorization and Target Identification', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification, Categorization and Target Identification', 'no': 'Titanene på halvEval-2019 oppgåve 6: Offensive språk-identifisering, kategorisering og mål-identifisering', 'ml': 'SemEval-2019 ടാസ്ക് 6: Offensive Language Identification, Categorization and Target Identification', 'mt': 'It-Titani fis-SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6: Identifikazzjoni tal-Lingwa Offensiva, Kategorizzazzjoni u Identifikazzjoni tal-Mira', 'pl': 'Zadanie 6: Identyfikacja języka ofensywnego, kategorizacja i identyfikacja celów', 'ro': 'Titanii la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: Identificarea limbajului ofensiv, categorizarea și identificarea țintei', 'si': 'සෙම්වේල්-2019 වැඩේ සිටිටන්ස් 6: ප්\u200dරධාන භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය, විශේෂණය සහ ලක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණය', 'sr': 'Titani na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 6: Offensive Language Identification, Categorization and Target Identification', 'sv': 'Titanerna på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: Offensiv språkidentifiering, kategorisering och målidentifiering', 'so': 'Shaqada SemEval-2019 6: Aqoonsiga luqada Offensive, Kalegisation iyo Aqoonsiga goal', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 6: Offensive Language Identification, Categorization and target identification', 'ur': 'سیم Eval-2019 ٹاکس ۶ میں تیٹانز: نافنسی زبان شناسایی، کاٹیوجیزی اور موقع شناسایی', 'uz': 'Eval- 2019 Vazifani 6: Offensive language identification, categorization and target identification', 'vi': 'Nhóm Titan tại Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-209 6: Bất động tự động nhận dạng ngôn ngữ, phân loại và xác định mục tiêu', 'bg': 'Титаните на Задача 6: Идентификация на офанзивен език, категоризация и идентифициране на целите', 'nl': 'De Titanen bij SemEval-2019 Taak 6: Offensieve Taalidentificatie, Categorisatie en Doelidentificatie', 'de': 'Die Titanen bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 6: Offensive Sprachidentifikation, Kategorisierung und Zielidentifikation', 'id': 'The Titans at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification, Categorization and Target Identification', 'da': 'Titanerne på SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: Offensiv sprogidentifikation, kategorisering og mål identifikation', 'hr': 'Titani na zadatku 6. poluvječna-2019: neophodna identifikacija jezika, kategorizacija i ciljna identifikacija', 'tr': 'Tamamlar', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019의 타이탄 퀘스트 6: 공격적 언어 식별, 분류와 목표 식별', 'fa': 'Titans at semiEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification, Categorization and Target Identification', 'af': 'Die Titans by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 6: Offensive Taal Identifikasie, Kategoriseering en doel Identifikasie', 'sw': 'Wakati katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 6: Utambulisho wa lugha rasmi, Utaguzi na Utafiti wa Target', 'sq': 'Titanët në SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifikimi ofensiv i gjuhës, kategorizimi dhe identifikimi i objektivit', 'bn': 'The Titans at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification, Categorization and Target Identification', 'az': 'Yar캼m Eval-2019 G칬nd톛ril톛n Titanlar 6: N칬qsanl캼 Dil Kimlik, Kategoriyasiya v톛 He칞 Kimlik', 'am': 'Eval-2019 ስራ 6: Offensive language Identification, Categorization and Target Identification', 'hy': 'The Titans at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification, Categorization and Target Identification', 'ca': 'The Titans at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification, Categorization and Target Identification', 'bs': 'Titani na pola Evala-2019 zadatku 6: Offensive Language Identification, Categorization and Target Identification', 'et': 'Titaanid SemEval-2019 ülesanne 6: ründav keele identifitseerimine, kategooriad ja sihtmärgi identifitseerimine', 'cs': 'Titáni na SemEval-2019 Úkol 6: Offenzivní jazyková identifikace, kategorizace a identifikace cílů', 'fi': 'Titaanit SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 6: Hyökkäävä kielen tunnistaminen, luokittelu ja kohteen tunnistaminen', 'jv': 'task6', 'ha': '@ item: inmenu Text character set', 'sk': 'Titani na SemEval-2019 Naloga 6: napadalna identifikacija jezika, kategorizacija in identifikacija ciljev', 'bo': 'མགོ་མིང་ལྡོག་པ་-2019 ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་གི་ཚོགས་པ་(Offensive Language Identification)དང་། རྣམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་དང་དམིགས་ཡུལ་འཛིན་བྱེད།', 'he': 'The Titans at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Language Identification, Categorization and Target Identification'}
{'en': 'This system paper is a description of the system submitted to SemEval-2019 Task 6, where we had to detect offensive language in Twitter. There were two specific target audiences, immigrants and women. The language of the tweets was English. We were required to first detect whether a tweet contains offensive content, and then we had to find out whether the tweet was targeted against some individual, group or other entity. Finally we were required to classify the targeted audience.', 'ar': 'تعتبر ورقة النظام هذه وصفًا للنظام المقدم إلى "SemEval-2019 Task 6" ، حيث كان علينا اكتشاف اللغة المسيئة في Twitter. كان هناك جمهوران مستهدفان محددان ، المهاجرون والنساء. كانت لغة التغريدات هي الإنجليزية. لقد طُلب منا أولاً اكتشاف ما إذا كانت إحدى التغريدات تحتوي على محتوى مسيء ، ومن ثم كان علينا معرفة ما إذا كانت التغريدة تستهدف فردًا أو جماعة أو كيانًا آخر. أخيرًا ، طُلب منا تصنيف الجمهور المستهدف.', 'fr': "Ce document système est une description du système soumis à «\xa0SEMEVAL-2019 Task 6\xa0», dans lequel nous devions détecter un langage offensant sur Twitter. Il y avait deux publics cibles spécifiques, les immigrants et les femmes. La langue des tweets était l'anglais. Nous devions d'abord détecter si un tweet contient du contenu offensant, puis nous devions déterminer si le tweet était ciblé contre une personne, un groupe ou une autre entité. Enfin, il nous a été demandé de classer le public cible.", 'pt': 'Este documento do sistema é uma descrição do sistema submetido ao “SemEval-2019 Task 6”, onde tivemos que detectar linguagem ofensiva no Twitter. Havia dois públicos-alvo específicos, imigrantes e mulheres. O idioma dos tweets era o inglês. Fomos obrigados a detectar primeiro se um tweet contém conteúdo ofensivo e, em seguida, tivemos que descobrir se o tweet era direcionado a algum indivíduo, grupo ou outra entidade. Finalmente, fomos obrigados a classificar o público-alvo.', 'es': 'Este documento del sistema es una descripción del sistema enviado a la «Tarea 6 Semeval-2019», donde tuvimos que detectar lenguaje ofensivo en Twitter. Había dos públicos destinatarios específicos, inmigrantes y mujeres. El idioma de los tuits era el inglés. Se nos pidió que primero detectáramos si un tuit contenía contenido ofensivo y, luego, teníamos que averiguar si el tuit estaba dirigido contra alguna persona, grupo u otra entidad. Finalmente, se nos pidió que clasificáramos al público objetivo.', 'zh': '本系统文件是对提交给"SemEval-2019 Task 6"的系统,我们必须在Twitter中检测冒犯性言语。 有二受众者,移民妇女也。 推文语英语。 先检推文犯性,然后须求推文人,团体他实体。 最后,我们被要求对受众分类。', 'ja': 'このシステムペーパーは、Twitterで不快な言葉を検出しなければならなかった「SemEval -2019 Task 6」に提出されたシステムの説明です。具体的な対象者は移民と女性の2人であった。ツイートの言語は英語でした。まず、ツイートに不快なコンテンツが含まれているかどうかを検出し、そのツイートが特定の個人、グループ、またはその他のエンティティを対象としているかどうかを確認する必要がありました。最後に、対象者を分類する必要がありました。', 'hi': 'यह सिस्टम पेपर "SemEval-2019 टास्क 6" को प्रस्तुत की गई प्रणाली का विवरण है, जहां हमें ट्विटर में आक्रामक भाषा का पता लगाना था। दो विशिष्ट लक्षित दर्शक, आप्रवासियों और महिलाओं थे। ट्वीट की भाषा अंग्रेजी थी। हमें पहले यह पता लगाने की आवश्यकता थी कि क्या एक ट्वीट में आपत्तिजनक सामग्री है, और फिर हमें यह पता लगाना था कि क्या ट्वीट को किसी व्यक्ति, समूह या अन्य इकाई के खिलाफ लक्षित किया गया था। अंत में हमें लक्षित दर्शकों को वर्गीकृत करने की आवश्यकता थी।', 'ru': 'Этот системный документ представляет собой описание системы, представленной в «SemEval-2019 Task 6», где нам пришлось обнаружить оскорбительные формулировки в Twitter. Имеются две конкретные целевые аудитории - иммигранты и женщины. Языком твитов был английский. Мы должны были сначала определить, содержит ли твит оскорбительный контент, а затем мы должны были выяснить, был ли твит нацелен на какое-либо лицо, группу или другую организацию. Наконец, нам пришлось классифицировать целевую аудиторию.', 'ga': 'Is cur síos é an páipéar córais seo ar an gcóras a cuireadh faoi bhráid “SemEval-2019 Task 6”, áit a raibh orainn teanga maslach a bhrath ar Twitter. Bhí dhá spriocghrúpa ar leith ann, inimircigh agus mná. Béarla teanga na tweets. Ceanglaíodh orainn a bhrath ar dtús an bhfuil ábhar maslach i tweet, agus ansin bhí orainn a fháil amach an raibh an tweet dírithe ar aonán aonair, grúpa nó aonán eile. Ar deireadh bhí orainn an lucht éisteachta spriocdhírithe a rangú.', 'ka': "ეს სისტემის წიგნი არის სისტემის გამოსახულება, რომელიც 'SemEval-2019 Task 6' დაწყებულია, სადაც ჩვენ რვირტში უნდა განვიხულოთ საფუნქციური ენაზე. ორი განსაკუთრებული მიზეზი აუდიტორია, იმიგრანტები და ქალები იყო. Tweets-ის ენაა ინგლისური იყო. ჩვენ უნდა პირველად განვიცნოთ, თუ რაიმეტი არსებობს სტრუქტური შემდგომარები, და შემდეგ ჩვენ უნდა გავიგოთ, თუ რაიმე ინდიველური, ჯგუფი ან სხვა ინტერტიკ საბოლოოდ ჩვენ უნდა დავაკლასიოთ მისაღებული აუდიტორია.", 'hu': 'Ez a rendszer tanulmány a "SemEval-2019 Task 6" című rendszer leírása, ahol a Twitteren sértő nyelvet kellett észlelnünk. Két konkrét célközönség volt: bevándorlók és nők. A tweetek nyelve angol volt. Először fel kellett derítenünk, hogy egy tweet sértő tartalmat tartalmaz-e, majd meg kellett derítenünk, hogy a tweet valamilyen egyénre, csoportra vagy más entitásra irányul-e célpont. Végül meg kellett osztályoznunk a célzott közönséget.', 'el': 'Αυτό το έγγραφο συστήματος είναι μια περιγραφή του συστήματος που υποβλήθηκε στο "SemEval-2019 Task 6", όπου έπρεπε να εντοπίσουμε προσβλητική γλώσσα στο Twitter. Υπήρχαν δύο συγκεκριμένα ακροατήρια-στόχοι, μετανάστες και γυναίκες. Η γλώσσα των tweets ήταν η αγγλική. Χρειάστηκε πρώτα να εντοπίσουμε αν ένα tweet περιέχει προσβλητικό περιεχόμενο και στη συνέχεια έπρεπε να μάθουμε αν το tweet είχε στόχο κάποιο άτομο, ομάδα ή άλλη οντότητα. Τέλος, απαιτήθηκε να ταξινομήσουμε το στοχευμένο κοινό.', 'it': "Questo documento di sistema è una descrizione del sistema inviato a 'SemEval-2019 Task 6', dove abbiamo dovuto rilevare un linguaggio offensivo su Twitter. C'erano due destinatari specifici, immigrati e donne. La lingua dei tweet era l'inglese. Ci è stato chiesto prima di rilevare se un tweet contiene contenuti offensivi, e poi abbiamo dovuto scoprire se il tweet era mirato a qualche individuo, gruppo o altra entità. Infine ci è stato chiesto di classificare il pubblico di destinazione.", 'lt': "This system paper is a description of the system submitted to 'SemEval-2019 Task 6', where we had to detect offensive language in Twitter.  There were two specific target audiences, immigrants and women.  Tweetų kalba buvo anglų kalba. Pirmiausia turėjome nustatyti, ar tweete yra įžeidžiančio turinio, ir tada turėjome sužinoti, ar tweete buvo skirtas tam tikram asmeniui, grupei ar kitam subjektui. Galiausiai mums reikėjo klasifikuoti tikslinę auditoriją.", 'mk': "This system paper is a description of the system submitted to 'SemEval-2019 Task 6', where we had to detect offensive language in Twitter.  Имаше две специфични метни публики, имигранти и жени. Јазикот на твитовите беше англиски. Требаше прво да откриеме дали твитот содржи навредна содржина, а потоа моравме да дознаеме дали твитот бил насочен против некоја индивидуална, групна или друга ентитет. Конечно ни требаше да ја класификуваме целната публика.", 'kk': 'Бұл жүйелік қағаз - Твиттерде қарсы тілді табу керек жүйесінің сипаттамасы. Екі нақты аудитория, иммигранттер және әйелдер болды. Твиттердің тілі ағылшынша. Біз біріншіден tweet мазмұның орындалуын анықтау керек. Содан кейін tweet мазмұның кейбір, топ не басқа мазмұның қарсы белгіленгенін анықтау керек. Соңында біз мақсатты аудиторияларды сыныптау керек.', 'ms': "This system paper is a description of the system submitted to 'SemEval-2019 Task 6', where we had to detect offensive language in Twitter.  Ada dua penonton sasaran spesifik, imigran dan perempuan. Bahasa tweet adalah bahasa Inggeris. Kita diperlukan untuk mengesan pertama sama ada tweet mengandungi kandungan serang, dan kemudian kita perlu mencari tahu sama ada tweet ditakdirkan terhadap individu, kumpulan atau entiti lain. Akhirnya kita diperlukan untuk mengklasifikasikan penonton sasaran.", 'ml': "ഈ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പത്രത്തിന്റെ 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6' നല്\u200dകിയ സിസ്റ്റമിന്റെ വിവരണമാണിത്. അവിടെ ടൂട്ടരില്\u200d ഞങ് രണ്ടു പ്രത്യേക ലക്ഷ്യം കാണിക്കുന്നവരും അഗസ്ഥികളും സ്ത്രീകളും ഉണ്ടായിരുന്നു. ടൂട്ടുകളുടെ ഭാഷ ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ആയിരുന്നു. We were required to first detect whether a tweet contains offensive content, and then we had to find out whether the tweet was targeted against some individual, group or other entity.  അവസാനം നമുക്ക് ലക്ഷ്യപ്പെട്ട ശ്രദ്ധാക്കളെ വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ടായിരുന്നു.", 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument tas-sistema huwa deskrizzjoni tas-sistema sottomessa għal "SemEval-2019 Task 6", fejn kellna niskopru lingwa offensiva fuq Twitter. There were two specific target audiences, immigrants and women.  Il-lingwa tat-tweets kienet l-Ingliż. Kienu meħtieġa l-ewwel li nidentifikaw jekk tweet fih kontenut offensiv, u mbagħad kellna nidentifikaw jekk it-tweet kienx immirat kontra xi individwu, grupp jew entità oħra. Fl-aħħar nett kien meħtieġ li nikklassifikaw l-udjenza mmirata.', 'mn': 'Энэ системийн цаас нь "SemEval-2019 Task 6" гэх системийн тодорхойлолт юм. Бид Твиттерд зориулсан хэл олж мэдэх хэрэгтэй байсан. Хоёр тодорхой зорилготой сонсогч, хөдөлгөөнт, эмэгтэйчүүд байлаа. Tweets-ын хэл нь Англи хэл байсан. Бид түүхийн тусламжтай холбоотой эсэхийг анх мэдэх хэрэгтэй байсан. Тэгээд бид түүхийн тусламжтай холбоотой эсэхийг олж мэдэх хэрэгтэй. Эцэст нь бидэнд зориулсан сонсогчидыг ангилах шаардлагатай байсан.', 'no': 'Denne systempapiret er ei skildring av systemet som er sendt til «halvEval-2019 oppgåve 6», der me måtte oppdaga offensiv språk i Twitter. Det var to spesifikke målpublikum, imigrantar og kvinner. Språket på tweetene var engelsk. Vi må først finna om ein tweet inneheld offensiv innhald, og så må vi finna ut om tweet er målt mot noen individuell, gruppe eller anna entitet. I slutt var vi nødvendig for å klassifisera målte publikum.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare de sistem este o descriere a sistemului trimis la "SemEval-2019 Task 6", unde a trebuit să detectăm limbajul ofensator pe Twitter. Au existat două audiențe specifice, imigranții și femeile. Limba tweeturilor era engleza. Am fost obligați să detectăm mai întâi dacă un tweet conține conținut ofensator, iar apoi a trebuit să aflăm dacă tweet-ul a fost vizat împotriva unui individ, grup sau altă entitate. În cele din urmă ni s-a cerut să clasificăm publicul vizat.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy dokument systemowy jest opisem systemu przesłanego do "SemEval-2019 Task 6", gdzie musieliśmy wykryć obraźliwy język na Twitterze. Były dwie konkretne grupy docelowe: imigranci i kobiety. Językiem tweetów był angielski. Byliśmy zobowiązani najpierw do wykrycia, czy tweet zawiera obraźliwe treści, a następnie musieliśmy się dowiedzieć, czy tweet był skierowany przeciwko jakiejś osobie, grupie czy innemu podmiotowi. Wreszcie zostaliśmy zobowiązani do klasyfikacji docelowej grupy odbiorców.', 'sr': "Ovaj sistemski papir je opis sustava podignut na 'SemEval-2019 Task 6', gde smo morali da otkrijemo offensivni jezik na Twitter. Postoje dve posebne mete publike, imigrante i žene. Jezik tweeta je bio engleski. Trebali smo prvi put da otkrijemo da li tweet sadrži ofanzivni sadržaj, a onda smo morali da saznamo da li je tweet ciljen protiv nekog pojedinca, grupe ili drugog entiteta. Konačno smo bili potrebni da klasifikujemo ciljnu publiku.", 'si': "මේ පද්ධති පත්තුව තමයි 'සෙම්වෙල්-2019 වැඩක් 6' වලට දාලා තියෙන පද්ධතියේ විස්තර කිරීමක්, අපිට ට්විටර් වල අපරාධ විශේෂ ලක්ෂණ දෙකක් තියෙනවා ප්\u200dරධානකයෝ, ග්\u200dරාහකයෝ සහ ගැනියෝ. ට්විට්ට්ගේ භාෂාව තමයි ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ. අපිට මුලින්ම දැනගන්න ඕනේ ට්විට් එකක් අපරාධකාරියක් තියෙන්නේ නැද්ද කියලා, ඊට පස්සේ අපිට ට්විට් එක ප්\u200dරතිකාර, කණ්ඩා අන්තිමට අපිට අවශ්\u200dය වුනා ලක්කුණු ප්\u200dරේක්ෂකයන්ට පරීක්ෂා කරන්න.", 'so': "Qoraalkan nidaamkan waa sawir ku saabsan nidaamka loo soo dhiibay 'SemEval-2019 shaqo 6', kaas oo aan ku baahnaa in aan ku ogaano luuqada dhibaatada ah ee Twitterka. Waxaa jiray laba dhalinyara oo gaar ah, dadka dalka u soo guuray iyo dumar. Luqada Tweetiga waa Ingiriis. Waxaa nala baahan yahay marka hore in aad ogaato in twitter ku jirto waxyaabo dhib ah, markaasna waa in aan ogaano in twitteriga looga jeeday qof, koox ama wax kale. Ugu dambaysta waxaa naloo baahan yahay in aan fasaxno dhegaha la jeedo.", 'ta': "'SemEval- 2019 பணி 6' க்கு கொடுக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பின் விவரமாகும், அங்கு நாம் தொடர்ந்து மொழியை கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும். இரண்டு குறிப்பிட்ட இலக்கு காட்சிகள், குடியாளிகள், பெண்கள். தொடர்புகளின் மொழி ஆங்கிலத்தில் இருந்தது. நாங்கள் முதலில் தேவைப்பட்டிருந்தோம் ஒரு tweet கொண்டிருக்கும் உள்ளடக்கங்கள் உள்ளதா என்பதை கண்டுபிடிக்கவும், பின்னர் நாம் சில தனி இறுதியாக நாம் இலக்கு காட்சிகளை வகைப்படுத்த வேண்டும்.", 'sv': 'Detta systemdokument är en beskrivning av systemet som skickats in till "SemEval-2019 Task 6", där vi var tvungna att upptäcka stötande språk på Twitter. Det fanns två specifika målgrupper, invandrare och kvinnor. Twitternas språk var engelska. Vi var tvungna att först upptäcka om en tweet innehåller stötande innehåll, och sedan var vi tvungna att ta reda på om tweeten var riktad mot någon individ, grupp eller annan enhet. Slutligen var vi tvungna att klassificera målgruppen.', 'ur': 'یہ سیسٹم کاغذ یہ سیسٹم کا سفارش ہے جہاں ہمیں توئیٹر میں فساد کی زبان پہچان لینے کی ضرورت تھی۔ دو مخصوص موقع حاضر کرنے والے، مہاجرین اور عورتیں تھے۔ ٹویٹوں کی زبان انگلیسی تھی۔ ہم کو پہلی بار جاننے کے لئے ضرورت تھی کہ ایک ٹویٹ کے ذریعے نافذ منصفات موجود ہے، پھر ہم کو معلوم ہونا چاہیے کہ ٹویٹ کسی شخص, گروپ یا دوسری چیز کے مقابلہ میں لکھی گئی ہے. آخر میں ہمیں موجود اہل کو کلاس کرنے کی ضرورت تھی۔', 'uz': "Bu tizim gazeti 'SemEval-2019 Vazifani 6' ga joʻnatilgan tizimning taʼrifiидир. Bu yerda Twitterda offensive tillarini aniqlash kerak edi. Икки махсус аъзолар, муҳожирлар ва аёллар бор. The language of the tweets was English.  We were required to first detect whether a tweet contains offensive content, and then we had to find out whether the tweet was targeted against some individual, group or other entity.  Endi bizga qanday qilingan maqsadlarni nashfiy qilish uchun kerak edi.", 'vi': 'Tờ báo hệ thống này là một mô tả hệ thống được gửi đến "Semkhai-thẩm 9 Task 6", nơi chúng tôi phải phát hiện ngôn ngữ tấn công trên Twitter. Có hai khán giả đặc biệt, nhập cư và phụ nữ. Ngôn ngữ trên Twitter là tiếng Anh. Chúng tôi được yêu cầu trước tiên phải xác định rằng Twitter có chứa nội dung tấn công, và sau đó chúng tôi phải tìm hiểu xem Twitter được nhắm vào cá nhân, nhóm hay những thực thể khác. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi được yêu cầu phân loại đối tượng.', 'bg': 'Този системен доклад е описание на системата, подадена на задача 6, където трябваше да открием обиден език в Туитър. Имаше две специфични целеви аудитории - имигранти и жени. Езикът на туитовете беше английски. Първо трябваше да открием дали туитът съдържа обидно съдържание, а след това трябваше да разберем дали туитът е насочен към някое физическо лице, група или друго лице. Накрая трябваше да класифицираме целевата аудитория.', 'da': "Dette system papir er en beskrivelse af systemet indsendt til 'SemEval-2019 Task 6', hvor vi måtte opdage stødende sprog på Twitter. Der var to specifikke målgrupper, indvandrere og kvinder. Twitternes sprog var engelsk. Vi skulle først finde ud af, om en tweet indeholder stødende indhold, og så skulle vi finde ud af, om tweeten var målrettet mod en person, gruppe eller anden enhed. Endelig skulle vi klassificere målgruppen.", 'hr': "Ovaj sistemski papir je opis sustava podignut na 'SemEval-2019 Task 6', gdje smo morali otkriti ofanzivni jezik na Twitteru. Bilo je dva određena ciljna publika, imigranta i žena. Jezik tweets je bio engleski. Trebali smo prvi put otkriti da li tweet sadrži ofanzivni sadržaj, a onda smo morali saznati da li je tweet ciljan protiv nekog pojedinca, grupe ili drugog entiteta. Konačno smo bili potrebni da klasifikujemo ciljnu publiku.", 'nl': "Dit systeemdocument is een beschrijving van het systeem dat is ingediend bij 'SemEval-2019 Task 6', waar we aanstootgevende taal in Twitter moesten detecteren. Er waren twee specifieke doelgroepen, immigranten en vrouwen. De taal van de tweets was Engels. We moesten eerst detecteren of een tweet aanstootgevende inhoud bevat, en daarna moesten we uitzoeken of de tweet gericht was op een individu, groep of andere entiteit. Tot slot moesten we de doelgroep classificeren.", 'ko': '이 시스템 파일은 "SemEval-2019 퀘스트 6"에 제출된 시스템을 설명하고 있으며, 트위터에서 공격적인 언어를 감지해야 합니다.이민자와 여성 두 명의 특정한 목표 시청자가 있다.트위터의 언어는 영어다.우리는 먼저 트위터가 무례한 내용을 포함하고 있는지 검사한 다음에 트위터가 개인, 단체 또는 다른 실체를 겨냥하고 있는지 찾아내야 한다.마지막으로 우리는 목표 시청자에 대한 분류를 요구받았다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم توضیح سیستم\u200cای است که به ماموریت ششم سال ۲۰۱۹ فرستاده شده است، جایی که باید زبان تجاوز را در توئیتر شناسایی کنیم. دو تا تماشاگر هدف خاص، مهاجران و زنان وجود داشتند. زبان tweets انگلیسی بود. ما باید اول تشخیص دهیم که آیا توئیت یک محتوای تجاوز دارد، و سپس باید بفهمیم آیا توئیت بر خلاف یک فرد، گروه یا یک فرد دیگر هدف یافته است. بالاخره ما مجبور شديم که مردم هدف رو تحصيل کنيم', 'de': 'Dieses Systempapier ist eine Beschreibung des Systems, das bei SemEval-2019 Task 6 eingereicht wurde, wo wir anstößige Sprache in Twitter erkennen mussten. Es gab zwei spezifische Zielgruppen, Einwanderer und Frauen. Die Sprache der Tweets war Englisch. Wir mussten zuerst feststellen, ob ein Tweet beleidigende Inhalte enthält, und dann mussten wir herausfinden, ob der Tweet gegen eine Einzelperson, Gruppe oder andere Entität gerichtet war. Schließlich mussten wir die Zielgruppe klassifizieren.', 'id': "Kertas sistem ini adalah deskripsi sistem yang dikirim ke 'SemEval-2019 Task 6', di mana kita harus mendeteksi bahasa offensive di Twitter. Ada dua target penonton spesifik, imigran dan wanita. Bahasa tweet adalah bahasa Inggris. We were required to first detect whether a tweet contains offensive content, and then we had to find out whether the tweet was targeted against some individual, group or other entity.  Finally we were required to classify the targeted audience.", 'sw': "Gazeti hili la mfumo ni maelezo ya mfumo uliotolewa kwa 'SemEval-2019 Kazi 6', ambapo ilipaswa kutambua lugha ya matusi katika mtandao wa Twita. Kulikuwa na hadhira wawili maalumu, wahamiaji na wanawake. Lugha ya twita ilikuwa ni Kiingereza. We were required to first detect whether a tweet contains offensive content, and then we had to find out whether the tweet was targeted against some individual, group or other entity.  Mwisho tulihitajika kuwasifu hadhira waliolengwa.", 'af': "Hierdie stelsel papier is 'n beskrywing van die stelsel wat aan 'SemEval-2019 Opdrag 6 ingestuur is, waar ons moes offensive taal in Twitter ontdek het. Daar was twee spesifieke doel publiekers, immigrante en vroue. Die taal van die tweets was Engels. Ons was benodig om eerste te beskry of 'n tweet 'n opstandige inhoud bevat, en dan moet ons uitvind of die tweet teen sommige individuele, groep of ander entiteite gedoen is. Eindelik was ons nodig om die doeltyd publiek te klassifiseer.", 'tr': "Bu sistem kagyzy 'SemEval-2019 Görevi 6'a süýtgedilen sistemiň waspy. Bu ýerde biziň Twitter'da hassas dilini tapmalydyk. Iki sany beýleki maksady seçgisi, göçmenler we aýallar bar. Tweets dili iňlisçe boldy. Biz birinji gezek týwiň içinde howpsyz maksady bardygyny tapmalydyk we soňra týwiň birnäçe, topar ýa başga bir maksady bilen maksady bardygyny bilmelidik. Soňunda maksady jenaýatçylary klasifikasynda gerek boldy.", 'hy': "This system paper is a description of the system submitted to 'SemEval-2019 Task 6', where we had to detect offensive language in Twitter.  Կան երկու հատուկ նպատակային հանդիսատես, միմիգրանտներ և կանայք: Թվիթերի լեզուն անգլերեն էր: Սկզբում մեզ հարկավոր էր հայտնաբերել, թե արդյոք թվիթը պարունակում է գայթակղիչ պարունակություն, և հետո մենք պետք է պարզեինք, թե արդյոք թվիթը նպատակադրված է ինչ-որ անհատի, խմբի կամ այլ էության դեմ: Վերջապես մեզ հարկավոր էր դասակարգել նպատակային հանդիսատեսը:", 'sq': "Ky dokument i sistemit është një përshkrim i sistemit të paraqitur në 'SemEval-2019 Task 6', ku ne duhej të zbulonim gjuhën ofensive në Twitter. Ishin dy publikë të caktuar, emigrante dhe gra. Gjuha e tweeteve ishte angleze. Ne ishim të kërkuar së pari të zbulonim nëse një tweet përmban përmbajtje ofensive, dhe pastaj na duhej të zbulonim nëse tweeti ishte objektiv kundër një njësie individuale, grupi apo njësie tjetër. Më në fund ne ishim të kërkuar për të klasifikuar publikun e synuar.", 'am': 'ይህ ሲስተም ፕሮግራም ‹SemEval-2019 ስራ 6› ለስርዓቱ የሰጠው የስርዓት መግለጫ ነው፡፡ ሁለት የተለያዩ አዳኞች፣ ስደተኞች ሴቶችም ነበሩ፡፡ የTweets ቋንቋ እንግሊዘኛ ነው:: We were required to first detect whether a tweet contains offensive content, and then we had to find out whether the tweet was targeted against some individual, group or other entity.  በመጨረሻው የተቃወሙትን አዳማጮች ለመግለጽ ያስፈልገናል፡፡', 'az': 'Bu sistem kağıdı "SemEval-2019 Task 6" sisteminə göndərilən sistemin təsbiqidir. Twitterdə həddi a şma dilini keçmək zorunda idik. İki müəyyən məqsəd auditorisi, imigrantlər və qadınlar idi. Tövtlərin dili İngilizdir. Bizə ilk dəfə twet içərisində həddi a şan məlumat olub olmadığını öyrənmək lazımdı. Sonra tweet bir kişinin, qrupun və ya digər məlumat barəsində nişan edildiyini öyrənmək lazımdı. Sonunda biz məqsədilə seyirciləri dəyişdirmək lazımdı.', 'bn': "এই সিস্টেমের পত্রিকা হচ্ছে 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৬' প্রদান করা ব্যবস্থার বর্ণনা, যেখানে টুইটারে আমাদের আক্রমণের ভাষা সন দুই নির্দিষ্ট টার্গেট শ্রোতা, অভিবাসী এবং নারী ছিল। টুইটের ভাষা ইংরেজী ছিল। আমাদের প্রথমে সন্ধান করা দরকার ছিল যে টুইটে আক্রমণের বিষয়বস্তু আছে কিনা, এবং তারপর আমাদের জানতে হবে যে টুইট কোন ব্যক্তি, গ্রুপ অথবা অন্যান Finally we were required to classify the targeted audience.", 'bs': "Ovaj sistemski papir je opis sustava podignut na 'SemEval-2019 Task 6', gdje smo morali otkriti ofanzivni jezik na Twitter. Bilo je dvije posebne ciljne publike, imigrante i žene. Jezik tweeta je bio engleski. Trebali smo prvi put da otkrijemo da li tweet sadrži ofanzivni sadržaj, a onda smo morali da saznamo da li je tweet ciljen protiv nekog pojedinca, grupe ili drugog entiteta. Konačno smo bili potrebni da klasifikujemo ciljnu publiku.", 'cs': 'Tento systémový příspěvek je popisem systému odeslaného na "SemEval-2019 Task 6", kde jsme museli detekovat urážlivý jazyk na Twitteru. Byly zde dvě specifické cílové skupiny, imigranti a ženy. Jazyk tweetů byl angličtina. Byli jsme povinni nejprve zjistit, zda tweet obsahuje urážlivý obsah, a pak jsme museli zjistit, zda byl tweet zaměřen proti nějaké jednotlivci, skupině nebo jiné entitě. Nakonec jsme byli požadováni klasifikovat cílové publikum.', 'et': 'Käesolev süsteemi dokument kirjeldab süsteemi, mis on esitatud SemEval-2019 ülesandele 6, kus pidime Twitteris tuvastama solvavat keelt. Konkreetseid sihtrühmi oli kaks: sisserändajad ja naised. Säutsude keel oli inglise keel. Kõigepealt pidime tuvastama, kas säuts sisaldab solvavat sisu, ja seejärel pidime teada saama, kas säuts on suunatud mõne üksikisiku, rühma või muu üksuse vastu. Lõpuks pidime sihtrühma liigitama.', 'fi': "Tämä järjestelmäpaperi on kuvaus järjestelmästä, joka lähetettiin 'SemEval-2019 Task 6', jossa meidän täytyi havaita loukkaava kieli Twitterissä. Kohderyhmää oli kaksi, maahanmuuttajat ja naiset. Twiittien kieli oli englanti. Meidän piti ensin havaita, sisältääkö tweet loukkaavaa sisältöä, ja sitten meidän piti selvittää, onko tweet kohdistettu johonkin yksilöön, ryhmään tai muuhun tahoon. Lopuksi meidän piti luokitella kohdeyleisö.", 'ca': "This system paper is a description of the system submitted to 'SemEval-2019 Task 6', where we had to detect offensive language in Twitter.  Hi havia dos públics específics, immigrants i dones. El llenguatge dels tweets era anglès. Ens va obligar primer a detectar si un tweet conté continguts ofensius, i després vam haver de descobrir si el tweet està mirat contra alguna persona, grup o altra entitat. Finally we were required to classify the targeted audience.", 'ha': "@ action: button Kun da saurãre biyu masu amfani da, muhamata da mãtã. Harshen Twitter ta kasance Ingiriya. An buƙata mu farko, ya gane cewa shin wani jumui na ƙunsa da tsari, kuma sa'an nan, sai mu buƙata mu san shin an yi amfani da Twitter a kan wasu jama'a, jama'a ko wani halin daban. Gani na buƙata da mu bayyana saurãre da ake yi goani.", 'he': "This system paper is a description of the system submitted to 'SemEval-2019 Task 6', where we had to detect offensive language in Twitter.  There were two specific target audiences, immigrants and women.  The language of the tweets was English.  We were required to first detect whether a tweet contains offensive content, and then we had to find out whether the tweet was targeted against some individual, group or other entity.  סוף סוף נאלצנו להקליף את הקהל המטרה.", 'jv': "Perintah sistem iki dadi nggawe sistem sing nyimpen tanggal 'semi-2011 task 6', ning awak dhéwé kudu etikno idiwa urês-urês nang Tom. Kayané awak dhéwé sing nyimpen tanggal, dadi wis rambarang lan babah. Tulung tresnaning bintang kuwi Inggris. Awak dhéwé kudu tanggal mbéwé iso ngotokno iki dadi, kelompok yo ngono cilik Tulung awak dhéwé wis dipoleh kanggo kelas urip iki dadi.", 'sk': "Ta sistemski prispevek je opis sistema, predloženega v 'SemEval-2019 Task 6', kjer smo morali v Twitterju zaznati žaljiv jezik. Posebni ciljni skupini sta bili priseljenci in ženske. Jezik tweetov je bil angleščina. Najprej smo morali ugotoviti, ali tweet vsebuje žaljivo vsebino, nato pa smo morali ugotoviti, ali je bil tweet namenjen nekemu posamezniku, skupini ali drugemu subjektu. Končno smo morali razvrstiti ciljno občinstvo.", 'bo': "དེ་ནི་མ་ལག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིས་ཌིས་ཌིར་ལ་'SemEval-2019 Task 6' དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་ཡོད་པའི་མ་ལག་གི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཞིག་ཡིན། འདི་རུ་སྐྱེལ་བ་དང་། བུད་མེད་གཉིས་དམིགས་འབེན་སའི་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་ཡོད། Tweets འི་སྐད་ཡིག་ནི་དབྱིན་ཡིག་རེད། ང་ཚོས་དྲ་ཐོག་གི་ནང་དོན་ཡོད་མིན་ཡང་ན་བཟོ་བཅོས་པ མཐའ་མར་མ་དེར། ང་ཚོས་དམིགས་འབེན་བྱས་པའི་རྣམ་པ་ཚོར་གྲྭར་ཞིག་དགོས་པ་རེད།"}
{'en': 'TKaSt at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : Something Old, Something Neu(ral): Traditional and Neural Approaches to Offensive Text Classification', 'ar': 'TüKaSt في SemEval-2019 المهمة 6: شيء قديم ، شيء جديد (ral): الأساليب التقليدية والعصبية لتصنيف النص المسيء', 'pt': 'TüKaSt na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Algo Velho, Algo Neu(ral): Abordagens Tradicionais e Neurais à Classificação de Texto Ofensiva', 'fr': 'TüKast à SemEval-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: Quelque chose de vieux, quelque chose de nouveau (ral)\xa0: Approches traditionnelles et neuronales de la classification de textes offensants', 'es': 'TüKast en SemEval-2019 Tarea 6: Algo viejo, algo nuevo (ral): enfoques tradicionales y neuronales para la clasificación de textos ofensivos', 'ja': 'TüKaSt at SemEval -2019 Task 6: Something Old, Something Neu (RAL): Traditional and Neural Approaches to Offensive Text Classification', 'ru': 'TüKaSt на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Что-то старое, что-то новое(ral): Традиционные и нейронные подходы к классификации оскорбительного текста', 'zh': 'TüKaSt at SemEval-2019 务6:旧物,Neu(ral):犯性文本神经法', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 6 पर TüKaSt: कुछ पुराना, कुछ Neu (ral): आक्रामक पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए पारंपरिक और तंत्रिका दृष्टिकोण', 'ga': 'TüKaSt ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Rud éigin Sean, Rud éigin Neodrach: Cur Chuige Traidisiúnta agus Néaracha maidir le hAicmiú Téacs Ionsaitheach', 'hu': 'TuKaSt a SemEval-2019 feladat 6: Valami régi, valami új(ral): Hagyományos és idegi megközelítések a támadó szövegosztályozáshoz', 'el': 'Εργασία 6: Κάτι παλιό, κάτι νέο: Παραδοσιακές και νευρωνικές προσεγγίσεις στην προσβλητική ταξινόμηση κειμένου', 'ka': 'ტუკასენტი SemEval-2019 დავალება 6: რაღაც ძალიან, რაღაც ნუ(რალური): ტრადიციონალური და ნუპალური დახმარება სუფლიო ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციაში', 'kk': 'Тапсырма 6- Тапсырмасында TuKaSt: Ескі, Ней( рал): Тәдімгі және Нейрондық мәтін классификациясына қатынау', 'it': 'TuKaSt a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Qualcosa di vecchio, Qualcosa di nuovo(ral): Approcci tradizionali e neurali alla classificazione dei testi offensivi', 'lt': 'TuKaSt per SemEval-2019 6 užduotis: kažkas seno, kažkas naujo: tradiciniai ir neurologiniai požiūriai į pažeidžiamą teksto klasifikaciją', 'mk': 'TuKaSt at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Something Old, Something Neu(ral): Traditional and Neural Approaches to Offensive Text Classification', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6: പഴയ കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d, എന്തോ ന്യൂ( റാല്\u200d): പാട്ടികവും നെയുറല്\u200d സമീപിക്കുന്ന പദാവലി ക്ലാസിഷനിലേക്ക്', 'ms': 'TuKaSt at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Something Old, Something Neu(ral): Traditional and Neural Approaches to Offensive Text Classification', 'mn': 'TuKaSt at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Something Old, Something Neu(ral): Traditional and Neural Approach to Offensive Text Classification', 'no': 'TuKaSt ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 6: Noe gamle, noe Neu( ral): Tradisjonale og neuralnærmingar til offensive tekstklassifikasjon', 'mt': 'TuKaSt f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6: Xi ħaġa qodma, Xi ħaġa Newrali: Approċċi Tradizzjonali u Newrali għall-Klassifikazzjoni tat-Test Offensiv', 'pl': 'Zadanie 6: Coś starego, coś nowego: Tradycyjne i neuronowe podejście do klasyfikacji tekstu ofensywnego', 'ro': 'TuKaSt la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: Ceva vechi, ceva nou(ral): Abordări tradiționale și neurale în clasificarea textelor ofensive', 'so': 'TuKaSt at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Something Old, Something Neu(ral): Traditional and Neural Approaches to Offensive Text Classification', 'sv': 'TuKaSt på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: Något gammalt, Något nytt(ral): Traditionella och neurala förhållningssätt till offensiv textklassificering', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 6: Something Old, something Neu( ral): Traditional and Neural Approaches to Offensive Text Classification', 'sr': 'TuKaSt na semiEval-2019 Task 6: Nešto staro, Nešto Neu(ral): Tradicionalni i Neuralni pristup klasifikaciji službenog teksta', 'ur': 'TuKaSt at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Something Old, Something Neu(ral): Traditional and Neural Approaches to Offensive Text Classification', 'si': 'TuKaSt at semeval-2019 Job 6: දෙයක් පරණ, දෙයක් නුව( රල්): සාමාන්\u200dය සහ න්\u200dයූරාලික අවස්ථානය පාළුවන් ක්\u200dරියාසිකරණය', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifani 6: Nom Old, Something Neu( ral): Traditional and Neural Approaches Offensive Text Classification', 'vi': 'Cái gì đó cũ, cái gì đó Neu (ral): truyền thống và Neual tiếp cận động kích động.', 'bg': 'Задача 6: Нещо старо, Нещо невро: Традиционен и неврален подход към класификацията на офанзивния текст', 'hr': 'TuKaSt na semiEval-2019 zadatak 6: Nešto staro, Nešto Neu(ral): Tradicionalni i neurološki pristupi klasifikaciji neovisnog teksta', 'da': 'TuKaSt på SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: Noget gammelt, noget nyt (ral): Traditionelle og neurale tilgange til offensiv tekstklassifikation', 'nl': 'TuKaSt bij SemEval-2019 Taak 6: Iets Ouds, Iets Neu(ral): Traditionele en Neurale Aanpak van Offensieve Tekst Classificatie', 'de': 'TuKaSt at SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 6: Etwas Altes, Etwas Neu(ral): Traditionelle und Neurale Ansätze zur offensiven Textklassifikation', 'id': 'TuKaSt at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Something Old, Something Neu(ral): Traditional and Neural Approaches to Offensive Text Classification', 'ko': 'TuKaSt가SemEval-2019에서 맡은 임무6: 낡은 것, 새로운 것(ral): 공격적인 텍스트 분류의 전통과 신경법', 'fa': 'TuKaSt at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Something Old, Something Neu(ral): Traditional and Neural Approaches to Offensive Text Classification', 'sw': 'TuKaSt katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 6: Kitu cha zamani, Kitu cha Neu(Kikundi): Inapatikana kwa Taifa na Kiuraia kwa Kutangaza Makala ya Maandishi ya Habari', 'sq': 'TuKaSt at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Something Old, Something Neu(ral): Traditional and Neural Approaches to Offensive Text Classification', 'af': 'TuKaSt by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 6: iets Oud, iets Neu( rale): Tradisjoneel en Neurale toegang na Offensive Teks Klassifikasie', 'tr': 'TuKaSt at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Something Old, Something Neu(ral): Traditional and Neural Approaches to Offensive Text Classification', 'az': 'TuKaSt at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Something Old, Something Neu(ral): Traditional and Neural Approaches to Offensive Text Classification', 'am': 'ስራ 6: አንዳች ሽማግሌ፣ አንዳች ነገር ኒው(ral): ባሕላዊ እና የኔural Approaches to Offensive Text Classification', 'hy': 'TuKast-ը, 2019 թվականի կիսագնդի 6. առաջադրանքն է. ինչ-որ բան հին, ինչ-որ բան նոր(ռալ): ավանդական և նյարդային մոտեցումներ օֆանսիվ տեքստի դասակարգում', 'bs': 'TuKaSt na semiEval-2019 Task 6: Nešto Staro, Nešto Neu(ral): Tradicionalni i Neuralni pristupi klasifikaciji Offensive Text', 'cs': 'TuKaSt na SemEval-2019 Úkol 6: Něco starého, Něco nového: Tradiční a neurální přístupy k ofenzivní klasifikaci textu', 'bn': 'TuKaSt at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Something Old, Something Neu(ral): Traditional and Neural Approaches to Offensive Text Classification', 'et': 'TuKaSt SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 6: Midagi vana, midagi neutraalset: traditsioonilised ja neuraalsed lähenemisviisid ründava teksti klassifitseerimisele', 'fi': 'TukaSt SemEval-2019 Teht채v채 6: Jotain vanhaa, Jotain Neu(raa): Perinteisi채 ja Neuraalisia l채hestymistapoja hy철kk채채v채채n tekstiluokitukseen', 'ca': 'TuKaSt at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Something Old, Something Neu(ral): Traditional and Neural Approaches to Offensive Text Classification', 'jv': 'TuKaSent at semebal-2011', 'sk': 'TukaSt na SemEval-2019 Naloga 6: Nekaj starega, nekaj nevtralnega: Tradicionalni in nevralni pristopi k napadalni klasifikaciji besedila', 'he': 'TuKaSt at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Something Old, Something Neu(ral): Traditional and Neural Approaches to Offensive Text Classification', 'ha': 'Dakata', 'bo': 'TuKaSt at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Something Old, Something Neu(ral): Traditional and Neural Approaches to Offensive Text Classification'}
{'en': 'We describe our system (TKaSt) submitted for Task 6 : Offensive Language Classification, at SemEval 2019. We developed multiple SVM classifier models that used sentence-level dense vector representations of tweets enriched with sentiment information and term-weighting. Our best results achieved F1 scores of 0.734, 0.660 and 0.465 in the first, second and third sub-tasks respectively. We also describe a neural network model that was developed in parallel but not used during evaluation due to time constraints.', 'ar': 'نحن نصف نظامنا (TüKaSt) المقدم للمهمة 6: تصنيف اللغة الهجومية ، في SemEval 2019. لقد طورنا عدة نماذج مصنفات SVM التي استخدمت تمثيلات متجهية كثيفة على مستوى الجملة للتغريدات المخصبة بمعلومات المشاعر وترجيح المصطلح. حققت أفضل نتائجنا درجات F1 من 0.734 و 0.660 و 0.465 في المهام الفرعية الأولى والثانية والثالثة على التوالي. نصف أيضًا نموذج الشبكة العصبية الذي تم تطويره بالتوازي ولكن لم يتم استخدامه أثناء التقييم بسبب قيود الوقت.', 'pt': 'Descrevemos nosso sistema (TüKaSt) enviado para a Tarefa 6: Classificação de linguagem ofensiva, no SemEval 2019. Desenvolvemos vários modelos de classificador SVM que usaram representações vetoriais densas em nível de sentença de tweets enriquecidas com informações de sentimento e ponderação de termos. Nossos melhores resultados alcançaram pontuações F1 de 0,734, 0,660 e 0,465 na primeira, segunda e terceira subtarefas, respectivamente. Também descrevemos um modelo de rede neural que foi desenvolvido em paralelo, mas não utilizado durante a avaliação devido a restrições de tempo.', 'fr': "Nous décrivons notre système (TüKaST) soumis pour la tâche 6\xa0: Classification des langues offensantes, au SemEval 2019. Nous avons développé plusieurs modèles de classificateurs de SVM qui utilisaient des représentations vectorielles denses au niveau de la phrase de tweets enrichies d'informations sur les sentiments et de pondération des termes. Nos meilleurs résultats ont obtenu des scores F1 de 0,734, 0,660 et 0,465 dans les première, deuxième et troisième sous-tâches respectivement. Nous décrivons également un modèle de réseau neuronal qui a été développé en parallèle mais qui n'a pas été utilisé pendant l'évaluation en raison de contraintes de temps.", 'es': 'Describimos nuestro sistema (TüKast) presentado para la Tarea 6: Clasificación de Lenguajes Ofensivos, en SemEval 2019. Desarrollamos varios modelos de clasificadores de SVM que utilizaban representaciones vectoriales densas a nivel de oración de tuits enriquecidas con información de opinión y ponderación de términos. Nuestros mejores resultados alcanzaron puntuaciones F1 de 0.734, 0.660 y 0.465 en la primera, segunda y tercera subtareas, respectivamente. También describimos un modelo de red neuronal que se desarrolló en paralelo pero que no se utilizó durante la evaluación debido a limitaciones de tiempo.', 'ja': '私たちは、SemEval 2019でタスク6 ：攻撃的言語分類のために提出されたシステム（ TüKaSt ）について説明します。センチメント情報と項加重を豊富に含むツイートの文レベルの濃密なベクトル表現を使用した複数のSVM分類モデルを開発しました。私たちの最高の結果は、最初のサブタスク、2番目のサブタスク、3番目のサブタスクでそれぞれ0.734、0.660、0.465のF 1スコアを達成しました。また、並行して開発されたが、時間的制約から評価時には使用されなかったニューラルネットワークモデルについても述べる。', 'hi': 'हम कार्य 6 के लिए प्रस्तुत हमारे सिस्टम (TüKaSt) का वर्णन करते हैं: आक्रामक भाषा वर्गीकरण, SemEval 2019 में। हमने कई एसवीएम क्लासिफायर मॉडल विकसित किए हैं जो भावना की जानकारी और टर्म-वेटिंग से समृद्ध ट्वीट्स के वाक्य-स्तरीय घने वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारे सर्वोत्तम परिणामों ने क्रमशः पहले, दूसरे और तीसरे उप-कार्यों में 0.734, 0.660 और 0.465 के F1 स्कोर प्राप्त किए। हम एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल का भी वर्णन करते हैं जो समानांतर में विकसित किया गया था लेकिन समय की कमी के कारण मूल्यांकन के दौरान उपयोग नहीं किया गया था।', 'ru': 'Мы описываем нашу систему (TüKaSt), представленную для Задачи 6: Классификация оскорбительных языков, на SemEval 2019. Мы разработали несколько моделей классификаторов виртуальных машин защиты, в которых использовались плотные векторные представления твитов на уровне предложений, обогащенные информацией о настроениях и взвешиванием терминов. Наши лучшие результаты достигли F1 баллов 0,734, 0,660 и 0,465 в первой, второй и третьей подзадачах соответственно. Мы также описываем модель нейронной сети, которая была разработана параллельно, но не использовалась во время оценки из-за временных ограничений.', 'zh': '述SemEval 2019为务6:冒言类(TüKaSt)。 多发 SVM 器,句密推文向量,多情术语重。 第一,第二及第三子职各得0.734,0.6600.465F1分数。 又述一神经网络模形,并行开发,限以时限,评事未用。', 'ga': 'Déanaimid cur síos ar ár gcóras (TüKaSt) a cuireadh isteach le haghaidh Tasc 6: Aicmiú Teanga Ionsaitheach, ag SemEval 2019. D’fhorbraíomar samhlacha éagsúla aicmitheora SFM a d’úsáid uiríll dlúth veicteoirí ar leibhéal na habairte de thvuíteanna a shaibhríodh le faisnéis meon agus ualú téarmaí. Bhain ár dtorthaí is fearr amach scóir F1 de 0.734, 0.660 agus 0.465 sa chéad, sa dara agus sa tríú fothasc faoi seach. Déanaimid cur síos freisin ar shamhail líonra néarúil a forbraíodh go comhthreomhar ach nár úsáideadh le linn meastóireachta mar gheall ar shrianta ama.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენი სისტემა (TuKaSt) დავწერეთ 6-ი დავალებისთვის: უფრო უფრო მუშაობელი ენაკლასიფიკაცია, 2019-ში SemEval. ჩვენ განვიყენეთ მრავალ SVM კლასიფიკაციური მოდელები, რომლებიც გამოყენეთ სიტყვების დუნე გვეკტორის გამოსაყენებები, რომლებიც სიტყვების ინფორმაცია და ტერმინტის გა ჩვენი ყველაზე საუკეთესო შედეგი გადასვლა F1 შედეგი 0,734, 0,660 და 0,465 პირველი, მეორე და მესამე სამუშაო სამუშაო დავალებში. ჩვენ ასევე აღწერეთ ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელი, რომელიც პარალელურად განვითარებულია, მაგრამ არ გამოყენებულია განსაზღვრებულებაზე დროს შედგა.', 'el': 'Περιγράφουμε το σύστημά μας (TuKaSt) που υποβλήθηκε για την εργασία 6: Προσβαλτική Ταξινόμηση Γλωσσών, στο SemEval 2019. Αναπτύξαμε πολλαπλά μοντέλα ταξινόμησης που χρησιμοποίησαν πυκνές διανυσματικές αναπαραστάσεις σε επίπεδο προτάσεων εμπλουτισμένες με πληροφορίες συναισθημάτων και στάθμιση όρων. Τα καλύτερα αποτελέσματα μας πέτυχαν βαθμολογίες των 0.734, 0.660 και 0.465 στην πρώτη, δεύτερη και τρίτη δευτερεύουσα εργασία αντίστοιχα. Περιγράφουμε επίσης ένα μοντέλο νευρωνικού δικτύου που αναπτύχθηκε παράλληλα αλλά δεν χρησιμοποιήθηκε κατά την αξιολόγηση λόγω χρονικών περιορισμών.', 'it': 'Descriviamo il nostro sistema (TuKaSt) presentato per il Task 6: Classificazione linguistica offensiva, a SemEval 2019. Abbiamo sviluppato diversi modelli di classificazione SVM che hanno utilizzato rappresentazioni vettoriali dense a livello di frase di tweet arricchite con informazioni sentiment e ponderazione dei termini. I nostri migliori risultati hanno ottenuto punteggi F1 di 0,734, 0,660 e 0,465 rispettivamente nella prima, seconda e terza sottomissione. Descriviamo anche un modello di rete neurale sviluppato in parallelo ma non utilizzato durante la valutazione a causa di vincoli di tempo.', 'kk': 'Біз 6- тапсырма үшін жүйемізді (TuKaSt) түсіндіреміз: Offensive Language Classification, 2019 жылдың semiEval. Біз бірнеше SVM классификациялық үлгілерін жасадық. Бұл сөз деңгейіндегі жиілік вектордың түсініктері, көңіл мәліметі мен терминдің маңыздылығымен байланыстырылған twe Біздің ең жақсы нәтижелеріміз 0,734, 0,660 және 0,465 нәтижелерін бірінші, екінші және үшінші ішкі тапсырмаларда жеткізді. Біз сондай-ақ параллелді жасалған невралдық желінің үлгісін түсіндіреміз, бірақ уақыт шектерінің себебі қолданылмаған оқиғанда қолданылмаған.', 'lt': 'Mes apibūdiname savo sistemą (TuKaSt), pateiktą 6 uždaviniui: Pažeidžiamos kalbos klasifikavimui, 2019 m. puslapyje. Sukūrėme keletą SVM klasifikatorių modelių, kuriuose buvo naudojami sakinių lygio tankių vektorių nuotraukos iš tweetų, praturtintų jausmų informacija ir termino svertinimu. Mūsų geriausi rezultatai buvo pasiekti atitinkamai 0,734, 0,660 ir 0,465 F1 rezultatų pirmoje, antroje ir trečioje subužduotyse. Mes taip pat apibūdiname nervinio tinklo model į, kuris buvo sukurtas lygiagrečiai, bet nebuvo naudojamas vertinimo metu dėl laiko apribojimų.', 'ms': 'Kami menggambarkan sistem kami (TuKaSt) dihantar untuk Tugas 6: Klasifikasi Bahasa Meninggal, di SemEval 2019. Kami mengembangkan beberapa model pengklasifikasi SVM yang menggunakan perwakilan vektor tebal tahap kalimat tweet yang diperiksa dengan maklumat sentimen dan penimbangan terma. Keputusan terbaik kami mencapai skor F1 0.734, 0.660 dan 0.465 dalam sub-tugas pertama, kedua dan ketiga respectively. Kami juga menggambarkan model rangkaian saraf yang dikembangkan secara selari tetapi tidak digunakan semasa penilaian kerana kekangan masa.', 'hu': 'Leírjuk a 6. feladatra benyújtott rendszerünket (TuKaSt) a SemEval 2019-en. Több SVM osztályozó modellt fejlesztettünk ki, amelyek a tweetek mondatszintű vektoros ábrázolását használták, amelyek érzelmi információkkal és kifejezéssúlyozással gazdagítottak. Legjobb eredményeink 0,734, 0,660 és 0,465 F1 pontszámot értek el az első, második és harmadik alcsoportban. Leírunk egy ideghálózati modellt is, amelyet párhuzamosan fejlesztettek ki, de az értékelés során időkorlátozások miatt nem használtak.', 'ml': 'We describe our system (TuKaSt) submitted for Task 6: Offensive Language Classification, at SemEval 2019.  നമ്മള്\u200d പല എസ്\u200cവിഎം ക്ലാസ്പിഫയര്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ചു. വാക്കിന്റെ നിലപാടിന്റെ തണുപ്പ് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d വെക നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d എഫ്1. 734, 0. 660, 0. 465 ആദ്യത്തെ രണ്ടാമത്തേതും മൂന്നാമത്തേതും ഉപാധികളില്\u200d എത്തി. സമയത്തിന്റെ നിര്\u200dബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d കാരണമായി നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരുന്ന ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് മോഡല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mk': 'Го опишуваме нашиот систем (TuKaSt) поднесен за задача 6: Онавредна класификација на јазикот, на SemEval 2019. Развивме неколку модели за класификација на СВМ кои користеа густи вектори на ниво на реченици на твитови богати со чувствителни информации и терминска тежина. Нашите најдобри резултати постигнаа оценки F1 од 0,734, 0,660 и 0,465 во првата, втората и третата подзадача. Ние, исто така, опишуваме нервен мрежен модел кој беше развиен паралелно но не беше употребен за време на проценката поради временски ограничувања.', 'mt': 'Aħna niddeskrivu s-sistema tagħna (TuKaSt) sottomessa għall-Kompitu 6: Klassifikazzjoni tal-Lingwa Offensiva, fis-SemEval 2019. Żviluppajna mudelli multipli tal-klassifikaturi SVM li użaw rappreżentazzjonijiet densi tal-vetturi fil-livell tas-sentenza ta’ tweets arrikkiti b’informazzjoni dwar is-sentimenti u l-ippeżar tat-terminu. L-aħjar riżultati tagħna kisbu punteġġi F1 ta’ 0.734, 0.660 u 0.465 fl-ewwel, it-tieni u t-tielet sottokompiti rispettivament. Aħna niddeskrivu wkoll mudell tan-netwerk newrali li ġie żviluppat b’mod parallel iżda li ma ntużax matul l-evalwazzjoni minħabba restrizzjonijiet ta’ żmien.', 'mn': 'Бид өөрсдийн системийг (TuKaSt) 2019 оны SemEval-д тайлбарлаж байгааг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид олон SVM классификацийн загваруудыг хөгжүүлсэн бөгөөд өгүүлбэр-түвшинд жингийн векторын үзүүлэлтийг ашиглаж байсан. Энэ нь мэдрэмжтэй мэдээллээр, хэмжээний жингээр баялагдсан. Бидний хамгийн сайн үр дүн нь 0.734, 0.660, 0.465 тоонуудыг анхны, хоёр, гурав дахь суб-даалгавар дээр гаргасан. Бид мөн параллель боловсруулагдсан мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загварыг тайлбарлаж, цаг хязгаарын шаардлагатай шаардлагагүй.', 'pl': 'Opisujemy nasz system (TuKaSt) zgłoszony do Zadania 6: Klasyfikacja języka ofensywnego na SemEval 2019. Opracowaliśmy wiele modeli klasyfikacji SVM, które wykorzystują gęste wektorowe reprezentacje tweetów na poziomie zdań wzbogacone o informacje sentymentów i ważenie terminów. Nasze najlepsze wyniki osiągnęły wyniki F1 0.734, 0.660 i 0.465 odpowiednio w pierwszym, drugim i trzecim podzadaniu. Opisujemy również model sieci neuronowej, który został opracowany równolegle, ale nie wykorzystywany podczas oceny ze względu na ograniczenia czasowe.', 'no': 'Vi beskriver systemet vårt (TuKaSt) som er sendt til oppgåve 6: Offensive Language Classification, på semiEval 2019. Vi utvikla fleire SVM- klassifiseringsmodular som bruka setningsnivå tette vektorrepresentasjonar av tweets som er røyd med sentimentsinformasjon og uttrykk. Det beste resultatet våre oppnådd F1- poeng med 0,734, 0,660 og 0,465 i dei første, andre og tredje underoppgåvene. Vi beskriver også eit neuralnettverksmodell som ble utvikla i parallell, men ikkje brukt under evalueringa på grunn av tidsgrensningar.', 'ro': 'Descriem sistemul nostru (TuKaSt) depus pentru Sarcina 6: Clasificarea limbilor ofensive, la SemEval 2019. Am dezvoltat mai multe modele de clasificare SVM care au folosit reprezentări vectoriale dense la nivel de frază ale tweeturilor îmbogățite cu informații sentimentale și ponderare a termenilor. Cele mai bune rezultate ale noastre au obținut scoruri F1 de 0,734, 0,660 și 0,465 în prima, a doua și respectiv a treia subsarcină. De asemenea, descriem un model de rețea neurală care a fost dezvoltat în paralel, dar care nu a fost utilizat în timpul evaluării din cauza constrângerilor de timp.', 'sr': 'Opisujemo naš sistem (TuKaSt) podignut za zadatak 6: klasifikacija službenog jezika, na semiEvalu 2019. Razvili smo višestruke modele klasifikacije SVM-a koji su koristili guste vektorske reprezentacije tweeta bogatih informacijama o osjećajima i težinom termina. Naši najbolji rezultati su postigli rezultate F1 od 0,734, 0,660 i 0,465 u prvim, drugim i trećim podzadatkima. Takođe opisujemo model neuronske mreže koji je razvijen paralelno ali nije koristen tokom procjene zbog vremenskih ograničenja.', 'si': 'අපි අපේ පද්ධතිය (TuKaSt) විස්තර කරන්නේ වැඩ 6 වෙනුවෙන්: අධික භාෂා ක්ලාසිකේෂණය, 2019 සෙම්වල් වල. අපි විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ වාක්ෂාවක් ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ වාක්ෂාවක් වගේ වෙක් අපේ හොඳම ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප අපි සමහර විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලයේ මොඩල් එකක් විස්තර කරනවා නමුත් වෙලාවට විශ්වාස කරන්නේ', 'so': 'We describe our system (TuKaSt) submitted for Task 6: Offensive Language Classification, at SemEval 2019.  Tusaale kala duduwan oo SVM ah ayaannu korinnay, kuwaas oo isticmaalay waddooyinka qeybta qarsoon ee Twitteetka oo ku hodansanaya macluumaad iyo miisaanka xiliga. Abaalkayaga ugu wanaagsan waxay gaadheen iskuul F1 ah 0.734, 0.660 iyo 0.465 ee ugu horeeyay, labaad iyo saddexaad. Sidoo kale waxaan sawiranaa tusaale ahaan shabakadda neurada ah oo u koray si siman laakiin aan lagu isticmaalin marka lagu qiimeynayo xadhka waqtiga darteed.', 'sv': 'Vi beskriver vårt system (TuKaSt) som lämnats in för uppgift 6: Offensiv språkklassificering, på SemEval 2019. Vi utvecklade flera SVM-klassificeringsmodeller som använde meningsnivåtäta vektorrepresentationer av tweets berikade med sentimentinformation och termviktning. Våra bästa resultat uppnådde F1 poäng på 0,734, 0,660 och 0,465 i den första, andra respektive tredje deluppgiften. Vi beskriver också en neuralt nätverksmodell som utvecklades parallellt men som inte användes vid utvärdering på grund av tidsbegränsningar.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் செம்Eval 2019ல் எங்கள் அமைப்பை விவரிக்கிறோம் (TuKaSt) பணி 6: செய்திக்கு வழங்கப்பட்ட மொழி வகைப்பாடு, செம்Eval 2019 நாம் பல எஸ்விஎம் வகுப்பான மாதிரிகளை உருவாக்கினோம் அது வாக்கில் மட்டத்தில் உள்ள தூக்கு நெறிய வெக்டார் உருவாக்கியது உணர்வு தக முதல், இரண்டாவது மற்றும் மூன்றாவது துணை பணிகளில் F1 புள்ளிகள் 0. 734, 0. 660 மற்றும் 0. 465 பெற்றது. நாம் ஒரு புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் மாதிரியை விவரிக்கிறோம், அது ஒப்பிட்டு உருவாக்கப்பட்டது, ஆனால் நேர கட்டுப்பாடு', 'ur': 'ہم نے اپنے سیسٹم (TuKaSt) کو ٹاکس ۶ کے لئے پیش کیا ہے: Offensive Language Classification, SemEval 2019 میں. ہم نے بہت سی SVM کلاسیر موڈلوں کو ایجاد کیا ہے جن کو توئیٹوں کے ٹیوٹ کے مطابق احساسات معلومات اور ترمیم وزن کے ذریعہ ثابت ہونے والی توئیٹ کے مطابق استعمال کیا ہے۔ ہمارے سب سے بہترین نتیجے 0.734، 0.660 اور 0.465 کی F1 اسکور پہلی، دوسری اور تیسری sub-tasks میں پہنچ گئے۔ ہم نے ایک نئورل نیٹ ورک موڈل کو بھی توصیح دیتے ہیں جو موقع محدودیت کے سبب مطابق استعمال نہیں کی گئی تھی۔', 'uz': "Vazifaning 6 (TuKaSt) uchun joʻnatilgan tizimmizni tahrirlash: SemEval 2019'da shaxsiy tillar klassification. Biz bir necha SVM klassifiker modellarini yaratdik, bu bir so'zlar darajadagi chegara vektorining foydalanuvchilaridan foydalanadigan foydalanuvchi xabarlarni hisoblashtirish va tugma turli bilan o'zgartirish mumkin. Bizning eng yaxshi natijalarimiz boshqa birinchi, ikkinchi va uchinchi tub vazifalarga 0.734, 0.660 va 0.465 birinchi darajaga F1 foizga keldi. Шунингдек, Биз парламент таркибида таркиб таркиб таркиб ясалган, аммо вақт маҳдудиятлари сабабидан фойдаланмаган.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi mô tả hệ thống của chúng tôi (Tubabost) nộp cho Task 6: Đánh giá Ngôn ngữ, tại SemEvl 209. Chúng tôi phát triển nhiều mẫu phân loại SVM mà sử dụng biểu tượng vector đậm đặc của tweet, được thêm thông tin tình cảm và trọng lượng tạm thời. Kết quả tốt nhất của chúng ta là F1 điểm 0.734, 0.660 và 0.46. nhiệm vụ thứ nhất, thứ hai và thứ ba. Chúng tôi cũng mô tả một mô hình mạng thần kinh được phát triển song song song nhưng không được sử dụng trong khi đánh giá vì hạn chế thời gian.', 'nl': 'We beschrijven ons systeem (TuKaSt) ingediend voor Taak 6: Offensieve Taalclassificatie, op SemEval 2019. We ontwikkelden meerdere SVM classificatormodellen die gebruik maakten van dichte vectorrepresentaties op zinsniveau van tweets verrijkt met sentimentinformatie en termweging. Onze beste resultaten behaalden F1 scores van 0.734, 0.660 en 0.465 in respectievelijk de eerste, tweede en derde deeltaken. We beschrijven ook een neuraal netwerkmodel dat parallel werd ontwikkeld maar niet werd gebruikt tijdens de evaluatie vanwege tijdsbeperkingen.', 'hr': 'Opisujemo naš sustav (TuKaSt) podignut za zadatak 6: klasifikacija službenog jezika, na semiEvalu 2019. Razvili smo višestruke modele klasifikacije SVM-a koji su koristili guste vektorske reprezentacije tweets bogatih informacijama o osjećajima i težinom izraza. Naši najbolji rezultati su postigli rezultate F1 od 0,734, 0,660 i 0,465 u prvim, drugim i trećim podzadatkima. Također opisujemo model neuralne mreže koji je razvijen paralelno ali nije koristen tijekom procjene zbog vremenskih ograničenja.', 'da': 'Vi beskriver vores system (TuKaSt) indsendt til opgave 6: Offensiv sprogklassificering, på SemEval 2019. Vi udviklede flere SVM klassificeringsmodeller, der brugte sætningsniveau tætte vektorrepræsentationer af tweets beriget med sentiment information og termvægtning. Vores bedste resultater opnåede F1 scorer på 0,734, 0,660 og 0,465 i henholdsvis den første, anden og tredje underopgave. Vi beskriver også en neural netværksmodel, der blev udviklet parallelt, men ikke brugt under evaluering på grund af tidsbegrænsninger.', 'bg': 'Описваме нашата система (ТУКаСт), подадена за Задача 6: Офанзивна езикова класификация, на СемЕвал 2019. Разработихме множество модели класификатори, които използваха плътни векторни изображения на туитове на ниво изречение, обогатени с информация за сентимента и претегляне на термините. Нашите най-добри резултати постигнаха резултати от 0.734, 0.660 и 0.465 съответно в първата, втората и третата подзадачи. Описваме и модел на невронна мрежа, който е разработен паралелно, но не е използван по време на оценката поради ограничения във времето.', 'ko': '우리 시스템(TuKaSt)이 2019년 SemEval에 제출한 임무 6: 공격적 언어 분류에 대해 설명했습니다.여러 SVM 분류기 모델을 개발하고, 문장급 밀집 벡터로 표시된 트윗을 사용해 감정 정보와 용어 가중치를 풍부하게 했다.우리의 최고 성적은 첫 번째, 두 번째, 세 번째 하위 임무에서 각각 0.734, 0.660, 0.465의 F1 점수를 얻었다.우리는 병행 개발된 신경 네트워크 모델도 묘사했지만 시간 제한으로 평가 기간에 이 모델을 사용하지 않았다.', 'id': 'Kami menggambarkan sistem kami (TuKaSt) yang diserahkan untuk Tugas 6: Klasifikasi Bahasa Meninggal, di SemEval 2019. Kami mengembangkan beberapa model klasifikasi SVM yang menggunakan representation vektor tingkat kalimat dense dari tweet yang diperiksa dengan informasi sentimen dan timbangan terma. Hasil terbaik kami mencapai skor F1 0,734, 0,660 dan 0,465 dalam subtugas pertama, kedua dan ketiga secara sesuai. Kami juga menggambarkan model jaringan saraf yang dikembangkan secara paralel tapi tidak digunakan selama evaluasi karena batas waktu.', 'de': 'Wir beschreiben unser System (TuKaSt), das für Aufgabe 6: Offensive Sprachklassifikation bei SemEval 2019 eingereicht wurde. Wir entwickelten mehrere SVM-Klassifizierungsmodelle, die dichte Vektordarstellungen von Tweets auf Satzebene verwendeten, die mit Stimmungsinformationen und Termgewichtung angereichert wurden. Unsere besten Ergebnisse erzielten F1-Werte von 0.734, 0.660 und 0.465 in der ersten, zweiten und dritten Teilaufgabe. Wir beschreiben auch ein Modell des neuronalen Netzes, das parallel entwickelt wurde, aber aus zeitlichen Gründen bei der Auswertung nicht verwendet wurde.', 'fa': 'ما سیستم خود (TuKaSt) را توصیف می\u200cکنیم که برای وظیفه ۶: کلاس زبان ناظیر، در نیمه ۲۰۱۹ ارائه شده است. ما مدل\u200cهای مختصر SVM را توسعه دادیم که از نمایش\u200cهای ویکتورهای داغ سطح جمله\u200cها استفاده می\u200cکردند که با اطلاعات احساسات و وزن\u200cشدن کلمه\u200cها ثروتمند شده\u200cاند. بهترين نتيجه\u200cهامون در اولين، دومين و سومين وظيفه\u200cهامون از 0.734، 0.660 و 0.465 پيدا کردند. ما همچنین یک مدل شبکه عصبی را توصیف می کنیم که در حال ارزیابی با محدودیت زمانی استفاده نمی شود.', 'sq': 'Ne e përshkruajmë sistemin tonë (TuKaSt) të paraqitur për detyrën 6: Klasifikimin ofensiv të gjuhës, në SemEval 2019. Kemi zhvilluar modele të shumta klasifikues SVM që përdorën përfaqësime vector ësh të dendura në nivelin e fjalëve të tweeteve të pasur me informacion të ndjenjave dhe peshojë termore. Rezultatet tona më të mira arritën rezultate F1 prej 0.734, 0.660 dhe 0.465 respektivisht në nëndetyrat e para, të dyta dhe të treta. Ne përshkruajmë gjithashtu një model rrjeti nervor që u zhvillua në paralel por nuk u përdorë gjatë vlerësimit për shkak të kufizimeve kohore.', 'tr': "Biz sistemimizi (TuKaSt) Taryşdyryldyk we görevimiz 6: Offensive Language Classification at SemEval 2019. Biz bir çok SVM klasifikatçı modellerini geliştirdik ve cümle seviyesinde yoğun vektör şeklinde duygular bilgi ve termi ağırlığıyla zenginleştirilmiş Tweets'in temsilleri kullandık. Biziň iň gowy netijelerimiz 0,734, 0,660 we 0,465 sany ilkinji, ikinji we üçünji sub-tasklerde ýetip bardy. Biz hem parallel ýagdaýda gelinýän nuýral a ýun nuýdançasyny tassykladyrys ýöne wagt çykyşlygyna görä ulanylmadyk.", 'sw': 'Tunaelezea mfumo wetu (TuKaSt) uliotolewa kwa ajili ya kazi 6: Kutangaza lugha rasmi, katika SemEval 2019. Tumetengeneza mifano mbalimbali ya SVM iliyotumia uwakilizaji wa vector yenye kiwango cha tete cha sentence wa twiti zilizotajiriwa na taarifa na uzito wa muhula. Matokeo yetu bora yalifanikiwa vipindi vya F1 vya 0.734, 0.660 na 0.465 katika kazi za kwanza, ya pili na ya tatu. Kadhalika tunaelezea muundo wa mtandao wa neura uliotengenezwa kwa kulinganisha lakini haukutumika wakati wa kutathmini kwa sababu ya vikwazo vya muda.', 'hy': 'We describe our system (TuKaSt) submitted for Task 6: Offensive Language Classification, at SemEval 2019.  Մենք զարգացրեցինք բազմաթիվ համակարգչային դասակարգչային մոդելներ, որոնք օգտագործեցին նախադասության մակարդակի խտուն վեկտորների ներկայացումներ թվիթերի վրա, հարստացված զգացմունքների տեղեկատվությամբ և տերմինային Մեր լավագույն արդյունքները հասան F1-ի 0.734, 0.660 և 0.465 գնահատականների առաջին, երկրորդ և երրորդ ենթախնդիրներում: Մենք նաև նկարագրում ենք նյարդային ցանցի մոդելը, որը զարգացել է զուգահեռ, բայց չի օգտագործվել գնահատման ընթացքում ժամանակային սահմանափակումների պատճառով:', 'af': "Ons beskrywe ons stelsel (TuKaSt) voorgestuur vir taak 6: Offensive Taal Klassifikasie, by SemEval 2019. Ons het veelvuldige SVM klassifiseerder modele ontwikkel wat sentence- level dense vektor voorstellings van tweets wat ryk is met sentiment inligting en term- weighting gebruik het. Ons beste resultate het F1 telling van 0.734, 0.660 en 0.465 in die eerste, tweede en derde sub-opdragte bereik. Ons beskrywe ook 'n neurale netwerk model wat in parallele ontwikkeld is, maar nie gebruik word gedurende evaluasie vanweë tydsbeheininge.", 'am': 'ለስራ 6 የተላከውን ስርዓታችንን (TuKaSt) እናሳውቃለን፤ በSemEval 2019 ውስጥ የቋንቋ ክፍል ነው። የንግሥት ደረጃዎች ሰፊ የኢትዮጵያዊ መረጃ እና የቁጥጥር ሚዛን የተጠቃሚ የኢትዮጵያ አካባቢዎች አካባቢዎች እና የቁጥጥር ሚዛን የተመሳሳይ ብዙዎችን SVM መተላለፊያ አካሄድን አካሄድን፡፡ የመጀመሪያው፣ ሁለተኛ እና ሦስተኛ የደብዳቤዎችን ስራ የF1 score 0.734፣ 0.660 እና 0.465 ደረሱ፡፡ We also describe a neural network model that was developed in parallel but not used during evaluation due to time constraints.', 'az': "Biz sistemimizi (TuKaSt) 2019-in SemEval'da 6-ci Task üçün təyin etdik: Offensive Dil Klasifikasyonu. Biz çoxlu SVM klasifikatçı modelləri təhsil etdik ki, sentiment malları və termin ağırlığı ilə zenginlənən twetlərin yoxlu vektör göstərilmələrini istifadə etdik. Ən yaxşı sonuçlarımız ilk, ikinci və üçüncü işlərdə F1 müəyyən etdi. Biz həmçin in paralel olaraq təşkil edilmiş bir nöral a ğ modelini də təsdiqləyirik, amma zamanın müəyyən edilməsi üçün istifadə edilməmişik.", 'bn': 'We describe our system (TuKaSt) submitted for Task 6: Offensive Language Classification, at SemEval 2019.  আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি এসভিএম ক্লাসিফার মডেল তৈরি করেছি যারা কারাদণ্ড-স্তরের গভীর ভেক্টরের প্রতিনিধিত্ব ব্যবহার করেছে যারা অনুভূত আমাদের সবচেয়ে ভাল ফলাফল প্রথম, দ্বিতীয় এবং তৃতীয় সাব-কাজের মধ্যে এফ১ স্কোর অর্জন করেছে। আমরা একই সাথে একটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল বর্ণনা করি যা সামান্য পরিমাণে উন্নয়ন করা হয়েছিল, কিন্তু সময়ের বাধ্যতার কারণে ব্যবহার', 'bs': 'Opisujemo naš sistem (TuKaSt) podignut za zadatak 6: klasifikacija službenog jezika, na semiEvalu 2019. Razvili smo višestruke modele klasifikacije SVM-a koji su koristili guste vektore na razini rečenica, koje su obogatile sa informacijama o osjećanjima i težinom izraza. Naši najbolji rezultati su postigli rezultate F1 od 0,734, 0,660 i 0,465 u prvim, drugim i trećim podzadatkima. Također opisujemo model neuralne mreže koji je razvijen paralelno ali nije koristen tijekom procjene zbog vremenskih ograničenja.', 'et': 'Kirjeldame oma süsteemi (TuKaSt), mis on esitatud ülesandele 6: ründav keele klassifikatsioon SemEval 2019. Töötasime välja mitmed SVM klassifikaatorimudelid, mis kasutasid lausetasemel tihedaid vektorikujutisi säutsidest, mis on rikastatud sentimentaalse informatsiooni ja terminite kaalumisega. Meie parimad tulemused saavutasid F1 skoorid 0,734, 0,660 ja 0,465 vastavalt esimeses, teises ja kolmandas alamülesandes. Samuti kirjeldame neurovõrgu mudelit, mis töötati välja paralleelselt, kuid mida ei kasutatud hindamisel ajapiirangute tõttu.', 'cs': 'Popisujeme náš systém (TuKaSt) předložený pro Úkol 6: Oficiální jazyková klasifikace, na SemEvalu 2019. Vyvinuli jsme několik SVM klasifikátorů, které používaly husté vektorové reprezentace tweetů na úrovni věty obohacené o sentimentové informace a vážení termínů. Naše nejlepší výsledky dosáhly F1 skóre 0.734, 0.660 a 0.465 v prvním, druhém a třetím dílčím úkolu. Dále popisujeme model neuronové sítě, který byl vyvinut paralelně, ale nepoužíván během hodnocení z důvodu časového omezení.', 'fi': 'Kuvaamme järjestelmämme (TukaSt) lähetetty tehtävään 6: Hyökkäävä kieliluokitus, osoitteessa SemEval 2019. Kehitimme useita SVM-luokittelumalleja, joissa käytettiin lausetason tiheitä vektoriesityksiä tweeteistä, jotka rikastuivat tunteiden tiedolla ja termien painotuksella. Parhaat tulokset saavuttivat F1-pisteet 0,734, 0,660 ja 0,465 ensimmäisessä, toisessa ja kolmannessa osatehtävässä. Kuvaamme myös neuroverkkomallia, jota kehitettiin rinnakkain, mutta jota ei käytetty arvioinnissa aikarajoitteiden vuoksi.', 'ca': 'We describe our system (TuKaSt) submitted for Task 6: Offensive Language Classification, at SemEval 2019.  Vam desenvolupar múltiples models de classificador SVM que utilitzaven representacions denses de vectors en nivell de frases de tweets enriqueguts amb informació sentimental i ponderació de termes. Our best results achieved F1 scores of 0.734, 0.660 and 0.465 in the first, second and third sub-tasks respectively.  We also describe a neural network model that was developed in parallel but not used during evaluation due to time constraints.', 'jv': 'We rambaran Sistem (TuKast) kang disenyong kanggo task 6: offensive Language We Developer Ndoleh barêng-barêng sing paling-barêng nggawe barang F1 karo 0.7, 0.6 karo 0.4 Awakdhéwé éntuk pisan penggunaké model sing ditambah ngéwang geratan karo perusahaan, kuwi nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nggawe nguasakno ujaran.', 'he': 'We describe our system (TuKaSt) submitted for Task 6: Offensive Language Classification, at SemEval 2019.  פיתחנו דוגמנים מסוימים של SVM שהשתמשו באמצעות ווקטורים צפופים ברמת המשפטים של טוויטים שמעשירים עם מידע רגשות ומשקל המונח. התוצאות הטובות ביותר שלנו השיגו נקודות F1 של 0.734, 0.660 ו 0.465 בתפקידים הראשונים, השניים והשלישיים בהתאם. We also describe a neural network model that was developed in parallel but not used during evaluation due to time constraints.', 'sk': 'Opisujemo naš sistem (TuKaSt), oddan za nalogo 6: Ofenzivna jezikovna klasifikacija, na SemEval 2019. Razvili smo več modelov SVM klasifikatorjev, ki so uporabljali goste vektorske reprezentacije tvitov na ravni stavka, obogatene s sentimentalnimi informacijami in utežitvijo izrazov. Naši najboljši rezultati so dosegli rezultate F1 0,734, 0,660 in 0,465 v prvi, drugi in tretji podnalogi. Opisujemo tudi model nevronskega omrežja, ki je bil razvit vzporedno, vendar ni bil uporabljen med ocenjevanjem zaradi časovnih omejitev.', 'ha': "Tuna bayyana tsarin na'uranmu (TuKaSt) wanda aka shimfiɗa wa aikin aiki 6: Mun buɗe masu motsi masu yawa na SvM-mai fassara, waɗanda suka yi amfani da masu motsi na-daraja mai nau'i na sauri na rubutun da aka rikitar da information da taƙaitaccen sauri. Mataimakinmu mafi kyaun su sami F1 score 0.734, 0.660 da 0.465 a shekara kwance, na biyu da na uku. Tuna bayyana wani misali na'urar neural wanda aka develope a sami-sami kuma ba za'a yi amfani ba a lokacin muhimmada.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་མ་ལག་གསལ་བཤད་པ་(TuKaSt) དེ་གིས་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་༦:Offensive Language Classification, at SemEval 2019. We developed multiple SVM classifier models that used sentence-level dense vector representations of tweets enriched with sentiment information and term-weighting. ང་ཚོའི་འབྲུག ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་དུས་མཐུན་གྱི་མ་དབུགས་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལ་ཉུང་བའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་དུས་གཏོང་མཚམས་ལྟར་སྟེ'}
{'en': 'TUVD team at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : Offense Target Identification', 'ar': 'فريق TUVD في SemEval-2019 المهمة 6: تحديد هدف الهجوم', 'es': 'Equipo de TUVD en Semeval-2019 Tarea 6: Identificación del objetivo del delito', 'fr': "L'équipe TUVD à SEMEVAL-2019 Task 6\xa0: Identification des cibles offensives", 'pt': 'Equipe TUVD no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Identificação de alvos de ofensa', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019タスク6のTUVDチーム：オフェンスターゲットの特定', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019иҒҢ6TUVDеӣўйҳҹ:ж”»е…¶иҜҶ', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 6 में TUVD टीम: अपराध लक्ष्य पहचान', 'ru': 'Команда TUVD на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Идентификация целей правонарушения', 'ga': 'Foireann TUVD ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Aithint Spriocanna Cionta', 'el': 'Ομάδα στο έργο 6: Αναγνώριση στόχου επίθεσης', 'ka': 'TUVD ჯგუფი semiEval-2019 სამუშაო დავალება 6', 'hu': 'TUVD csapata a SemEval-2019 6. feladat: Támadási célpont azonosítása', 'it': 'Team TUVD a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identificazione del bersaglio offensivo', 'lt': 'TUVD komanda 2010–2019 m. pusėje 6 užduotis: Offense Target Identification', 'mk': 'ТУВД тим на SemEval-2019 задача 6: Идентификација на метата на злосторството', 'ms': 'Pasukan TUVD di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Pengenalan Sasaran Tersinggung', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6: ഓഫീസന്\u200dസ് ലക്ഷ്യം തിരിച്ചറിയുക', 'mt': 'Tim TUVD fis-SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6: Identifikazzjoni tal-Mira tal-Offens', 'kk': 'TUVD тобы шегінші тапсырма 6: Мақсатты идентификациясы', 'mn': 'TUVD баг SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offense Target Identification', 'pl': 'Zespół TUVD w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 6: Identyfikacja celu ataku', 'no': 'TUVD-gruppe på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 6: Offense target identification', 'ro': 'Echipa TUVD la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: Identificarea țintei ofensive', 'si': 'TUVD කණ්ඩායම් සම්වේල්-2019 වැඩ 6: අධිරාධික ලක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණය', 'so': 'Kooxda TUVD ee SemEval-2019 Shaqada 6: Aqoonsiga shahaadada rasmiga ah', 'sr': 'TUVD tim na semiEval-2019 Task 6: Offense Target Identification', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019ல் TUVD குழு செயல் 6: Offense இலக்கு அடையாளம்', 'sv': 'TUVD team på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: Identifiering av brottsmål', 'ur': 'ٹیوویڈ ٹیم سیم Eval-2019 ٹاکس 6: نافنس ٹاکٹ شناسایی', 'uz': 'TUVD team at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offense Target Identification', 'vi': 'Đội U.VO.V ở SemEvl-209 Task 6: Nhận diện mục tiêu tấn công', 'bg': 'Екип на ТУВД в Задача 6: Идентификация на мишената на нападението', 'nl': 'TUVD team bij SemEval-2019 Taak 6: Identificatie van het doelwit', 'da': 'TUVD team på SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: Identifikation af angrebsmålet', 'hr': 'TUVD tim na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 6: identifikacija cilja', 'de': 'TUVD-Team bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 6: Offensive Target Identification', 'fa': 'تیم TUVD در نیمه Eval-2019 کار ۶: شناسایی هدف نابودی', 'id': 'Tim TUVD di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Identifikasi Target Offense', 'ko': 'TUVD팀이SemEval-2019퀘스트6: 공격목표식별', 'sw': 'Timu ya TUVD kwenye SemEval-2019 Kazi 6: Utafiti wa Target Official', 'af': 'TUVD-span by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 6: Offense Target Identifikasie', 'sq': 'TUVD team at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offense Target Identification', 'am': 'ስራ 6: Offense Target Identification', 'tr': 'fs-type', 'hy': 'ՏուՎԴ-ի թիմը ՍեմԷվալ 2019 թվականին 6. հանձնարարություն', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 G칬z톛l 6: G칬z톛l Kimlik', 'bs': 'TUVD tim na semiEval-2019 Task 6: Offense Target Identification', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2019 কাজের টিউভিডি দল ৬: অফিসেন্স টার্গেট পরিচয়', 'ca': "L'equip TUVD a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offense Target Identification", 'cs': 'Tým TUVD na SemEval-2019 Úkol 6: Identifikace cíle útoku', 'et': 'TUVD meeskond SemEval-2019 ülesanne 6: kuriteo sihtmärgi tuvastamine', 'fi': 'TUVD-tiimi SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 6: Rikoksen kohteen tunnistaminen', 'jv': 'unit-format', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'he': 'צוות TUVD ב SemEval-2019 משימה 6: זיהוי מטרה הפשע', 'sk': 'Ekipa TUVD na SemEval-2019 Naloga 6: identifikacija tarče kaznivih dejanj', 'bo': 'TUVD ལོ་ཁག་པོ SemEval-2019 ལས་ཀ་༦：Offense Target Identification'}
{'en': 'This article presents our approach for detecting a target of offensive messages in Twitter, including Individual, Group and Others classes. The model we have created is an ensemble of simpler models, including Logistic Regression, Naive Bayes, Support Vector Machine and the interpolation between Logistic Regression and Naive Bayes with 0.25 coefficient of interpolation. The model allows us to achieve 0.547 macro F1-score.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه المقالة طريقتنا في اكتشاف هدف الرسائل المسيئة في تويتر ، بما في ذلك الفصول الفردية والجماعية وغيرها. النموذج الذي أنشأناه عبارة عن مجموعة من النماذج الأبسط ، بما في ذلك الانحدار اللوجستي ، و Naive Bayes ، وآلة المتجهات الداعمة ، والاستيفاء بين الانحدار اللوجستي و Naive Bayes مع معامل الاستيفاء 0.25. يتيح لنا النموذج تحقيق 0.547 درجة ماكرو F1.', 'fr': "Cet article présente notre approche pour détecter une cible de messages offensants sur Twitter, y compris les cours individuels, collectifs et autres. Le modèle que nous avons créé est un ensemble de modèles plus simples, y compris la régression logistique, le bayésien naïf, la machine à vecteurs de support et l'interpolation entre la régression logistique et le bayésien naïf avec un coefficient d'interpolation de 0,25. Le modèle nous permet d'obtenir un score macro F1 de 0,547.", 'es': 'Este artículo presenta nuestro enfoque para detectar un objetivo de mensajes ofensivos en Twitter, incluidas las clases individuales, grupales y otras. El modelo que hemos creado es un conjunto de modelos más simples, incluidos Logistic Regression, Naive Bayes, Support Vector Machine y la interpolación entre Logistic Regression y Naive Bayes con un coeficiente de interpolación de 0.25. El modelo nos permite lograr una puntuación macro F1 de 0.547.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta nossa abordagem para detectar um alvo de mensagens ofensivas no Twitter, incluindo classes Individual, Grupo e Outros. O modelo que criamos é um conjunto de modelos mais simples, incluindo Logistic Regression, Naive Bayes, Support Vector Machine e a interpolação entre Logistic Regression e Naive Bayes com coeficiente de interpolação de 0,25. O modelo nos permite atingir 0,547 macro F1-score.', 'ja': 'この記事では、個人、グループ、その他のクラスを含むTwitterの不快なメッセージのターゲットを検出するための当社のアプローチを紹介します。ロジスティック回帰、ナイーブベイズ、サポートベクターマシン、そしてロジスティック回帰とナイーブベイズの間の補間を含む、0.25の補間係数を持つより単純なモデルのアンサンブルです。このモデルでは、0.547マクロF 1スコアを達成できます。', 'zh': '本文引我们在 Twitter 中检测冒犯性的法术,包括私人、组和他类。 吾创模之会,包Logistic Regression素贝叶斯,扶向量机及Logistic归素贝叶斯之插值,插值系数为0.25。 当模使我得0.547宏观F1得分。', 'hi': 'यह लेख ट्विटर में आपत्तिजनक संदेशों के लक्ष्य का पता लगाने के लिए हमारे दृष्टिकोण को प्रस्तुत करता है, जिसमें व्यक्तिगत, समूह और अन्य वर्ग शामिल हैं। हमारे द्वारा बनाया गया मॉडल सरल मॉडल का एक पहनावा है, जिसमें लॉजिस्टिक रिग्रेशन, भोले बेयस, सपोर्ट वेक्टर मशीन और इंटरपोलेशन के 0.25 गुणांक के साथ लॉजिस्टिक रिग्रेशन और भोले बेयस के बीच इंटरपोलेशन शामिल है। मॉडल हमें 0.547 मैक्रो F1-स्कोर प्राप्त करने की अनुमति देता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлен наш подход к обнаружению цели оскорбительных сообщений в Twitter, включая индивидуальные, групповые и другие классы. Созданная нами модель представляет собой совокупность более простых моделей, включая логистическую регрессию, наивную байесовскую, опорно-векторную машину и интерполяцию между логистической регрессией и наивной байесовской с коэффициентом интерполяции 0,25. Модель позволяет достичь 0,547 макрос F1-балла.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an t-alt seo i láthair ár gcur chuige maidir le sprioc de theachtaireachtaí maslacha a bhrath ar Twitter, lena n-áirítear ranganna Aonair, Grúpa agus Eile. Is é an tsamhail atá cruthaithe againn ná ensemble de mhúnlaí níos simplí, lena n-áirítear Aischéimniú Lóistíochta, Cuan Naive, Meaisín Veicteoir Tacaíochta agus an t-idirshuíomh idir Aischéimniú Lóistíochta agus Naive Bayes le comhéifeacht idirshuíomh 0.25. Ceadaíonn an tsamhail dúinn a bhaint amach 0.547 macra F1-scór.', 'ka': 'ეს წესტია ჩვენი მოწყობილობას, რომელსაც განსაზღვრება სტუქტიური შეტყობინებების მიზეზი Twitter ში, რომელსაც განსაზღვრებული, ჯგუფი და სხვა კლასი. ჩვენ შექმნით მოდელი არის უფრო მხოლოდ მოდელების ინსნემბელი, როგორც ლოგისტიკური რეგრესი, ნაიგური ბეზები, გვეკტორის მაქსინი და ინტერპოლაცია ლოგისტიკური რეგრესი და ნაიგური ბეზების შორის, რომელიც მოდელის შესაძლებელია ჩვენ 0,547 მაკრო F1-სოფლიოს მიღება.', 'el': 'Αυτό το άρθρο παρουσιάζει την προσέγγισή μας για την ανίχνευση ενός στόχου προσβλητικών μηνυμάτων στο Twitter, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των τάξεων ατομικών, ομαδικών και άλλων. Το μοντέλο που δημιουργήσαμε είναι ένα σύνολο απλούστερων μοντέλων, συμπεριλαμβανομένων της Logistic Regression, Naive Bayes, Support Vector Machine και της παρεμβολής μεταξύ Logistic Regression και Naive Bayes με συντελεστή παρεμβολής 0.25. Το μοντέλο μας επιτρέπει να επιτύχουμε 0.547 μακροεντολή F1-σκορ.', 'hu': 'Ez a cikk bemutatja a megközelítésünket a sértő üzenetek célpontjának felismerésére a Twitteren, beleértve az egyéni, csoportos és mások osztályokat is. Az általunk létrehozott modell egyszerűbb modellek együttese, beleértve a Logistic Regression, Naive Bayes, Support Vector Machine és a Logistic Regression és Naive Bayes interpolációját 0,25 interpolációs együtthatóval. A modell lehetővé teszi számunkra, hogy elérjük a 0,547 makró F1 pontszámot.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta il nostro approccio per rilevare un target di messaggi offensivi su Twitter, incluse le classi Individuale, Gruppo e altri. Il modello che abbiamo creato è un insieme di modelli più semplici, tra cui Regressione Logistica, Naive Bayes, Support Vector Machine e l'interpolazione tra Regressione Logistica e Naive Bayes con coefficiente di interpolazione 0,25. Il modello ci permette di raggiungere 0,547 macro F1-score.", 'kk': 'Бұл мақала Твиттердегі жеке, топ және басқа класстардың мақсатты хаттарды табу үшін біздің арқылымызды көрсетеді. Біз құрған үлгі - логистикалық Регрессия, Найв Бейз, Вектор Машинасын қолдау мен логистикалық Регрессия мен Найв Бейз арасындағы интерполация 0,25 коэффициенті бар қарапайым үлгілердің символы. Бұл үлгі 0,547 макро F1- нәтижесін жеткізуге мүмкіндік береді.', 'mk': 'Оваа статија го претставува нашиот пристап за откривање на мета на навредливи пораки на Твитер, вклучувајќи ги и класите на Индивидуални, Групи и други. Моделот кој го создадовме е ансембл на поедноставни модели, вклучувајќи го и логистичката регресија, Наивните Бејзи, Поддржувачката векторна машина и интерполацијата помеѓу логистичката регресија и Наивните Бејзи со 0,25 коефициент на интерполација. Моделот ни овозможува да постигнеме 0,547 макро Ф1 оценка.', 'lt': 'Šiame straipsnyje pristatomas mūsų požiūris į užpuolamų pranešimų tikslo nustatymą Twitter, įskaitant Individual, Group ir kt. klases. Modelis, kurį sukūrėme, yra paprastesnių modelių rinkinys, įskaitant logistinę regresiją, Naive Bayes, paramos vektorių mašiną ir logistinės regresijos ir Naive Bayes interpoliaciją su 0,25 interpoliacijos koeficientu. Modelis leidžia mums pasiekti 0,547 makro F1 rezultatus.', 'ms': 'Artikel ini memperkenalkan pendekatan kita untuk mengesan sasaran mesej serang dalam Twitter, termasuk kelas Individual, Kumpulan dan Lain-lain. Model yang kita cipta adalah kumpulan model yang lebih mudah, termasuk Regresi Logistik, Bayes Naive, Mesin Vektor Sokongan dan interpolasi antara Regresi Logistik dan Bayes Naive dengan koeficien interpolasi 0.25. Model ini membolehkan kita mencapai 0.547 makro-skor F1.', 'ml': 'This article presents our approach for detecting a target of offensive messages in Twitter, including Individual, Group and Others classes.  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിച്ച മോഡല്\u200d ലോഗിസ്റ്റിക് റിഗ്രഷന്\u200d, നാവ് ബെയ്സ്, പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന വെക്റ്റര്\u200d യന്ത്രം, ലോഗിസ്റ്റിക് റിഗ്രഷനും നാവ് ബെയ്സും തമ്മിലുള്ള വ്യ മോഡല്\u200d നമുക്ക് 0.547 മാക്രോ F1-സ്കോര്\u200d എത്താന്\u200d അനുവദിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Dan l-artikolu jippreżenta l-approċċ tagħna biex tinstab mira ta’ messaġġi offensivi fuq Twitter, inklużi klassijiet Individwali, Gruppi u Oħrajn. Il-mudell li nħolqu huwa ġabra ta’ mudelli aktar sempliċi, inklużi r-Regressjoni Loġistika, il-Bajja Naiva, il-Magna tal-Vetturi ta’ Appoġġ u l-interpolazzjoni bejn ir-Regressjoni Loġistika u l-Bajja Naiva b’koeffiċjent ta’ interpolazzjoni ta’ 0.25. Il-mudell jippermettilna nilħqu 0.547 punteġġ makro F1.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono nasze podejście do wykrywania celu obraźliwych wiadomości na Twitterze, w tym klas indywidualnych, grupowych i innych. Stworzony przez nas model to zespół prostszych modeli, w tym Regresja Logistyczna, Naive Bayes, Support Vector Machine oraz interpolacja między Regresją Logistyczną a Naive Bayes o współczynniku interpolacji 0,25. Model pozwala nam osiągnąć makro F1-wynik 0.547.', 'ro': 'Acest articol prezintă abordarea noastră pentru detectarea unei ținte de mesaje ofensatoare în Twitter, inclusiv clasele Individual, Grup și alții. Modelul pe care l-am creat este un ansamblu de modele mai simple, incluzând Regresia Logistică, Naive Bayes, Suport Vector Machine și interpolația dintre Regresia Logistică și Naive Bayes cu coeficient de interpolație 0,25. Modelul ne permite să obținem 0,547 macro F1 scor.', 'mn': 'Энэ баримтууд биднийг Твиттерт хүмүүсийн, бүлэг болон бусад хичээлийн зорилго олох арга замыг илэрхийлдэг. Бидний бүтээсэн загвар бол логистик халдвар, Найв Бейс, Вектор Машин дэмжих болон Логистик халдвар болон Найв Бейс хоорондын интерполационы хоорондын халдвар нь 0.25-тай илүү энгийн загвар юм. Загвар нь бидэнд 0.547 макро F1 оноо гаргаж чадна.', 'sr': 'Ovaj članak predstavlja naš pristup otkrivanju meta ofanzivnih poruka na Twitteru, uključujući individualne, grupe i druge klase. Model koji smo stvorili je ensembl jednostavnijih modela, uključujući Logističku regresiju, Naive Bayes, Podršku vektorskoj mašini i interpolaciju između Logističke regresije i Naive Bayes sa 0,25 koeficijenta interpolacije. Model nam omogućava da postignemo 0,547 makro F1 rezultat.', 'no': 'Denne artikkelen viser tilnærminga vårt for å finna eit mål for offensiv meldingar i Twitter, inkludert individuell, gruppe og andre klasser. Modellen vi har laga er ein ensembel av enklere modeller, inkludert logistisk regresjon, Naive Bayes, støtte vektormaskinen og interpolasjon mellom logistisk regresjon og Naive Bayes med 0,25 koeffisient av interpolasjon. Modellen lèt oss oppnå 0,547 makro F1- poeng.', 'si': 'මේ ලේඛනය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදිහට ට්විටර් වල අපරාධ පණිවිඩයක් හොයාගන්න, ප්\u200dරතිකාරය, කණ්ඩායම, අනිත් ප අපි නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තමයි ලොජිස්ටික් ප්\u200dරමාණය, නේව් බේස්, වෙක්ටර් මැෂින් සහ ලොජිස්ටික් ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ නේව් බේස් අතර අතර්පර්ධ මොඩේල් එකෙන් අපිට 0.547 මැක්රෝ F1 ස්කෝර් ලැබෙන්න පුළුවන්.', 'sv': 'Den här artikeln presenterar vår metod för att upptäcka ett mål för stötande meddelanden i Twitter, inklusive Individuell, Grupp och andra klasser. Modellen vi har skapat är en ensemble av enklare modeller, inklusive Logistic Regression, Naive Bayes, Support Vector Machine och interpolationen mellan Logistic Regression och Naive Bayes med 0,25 interpolationskoefficient. Modellen tillåter oss att uppnå 0,547 makro F1-poäng.', 'ta': 'இந்த கட்டுரை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க எங்கள் வழிமுறையை காண்பிக்கிறது தொடர்ந்து கொண்டுள்ள செய்திகளின் இலக்கு, சாந்தியமா நாம் உருவாக்கிய மாதிரி ஒரு எளிதான மாதிரிகளின் ஒளிப்புள்ளி The model allows us to achieve 0.547 macro F1- score.', 'so': 'Maktabadan wuxuu soo bandhigayaa qaababka aan ku helno wargeeyayaasha waxqabadka ee Twitterka, kuwaas oo ah dhaqdhaqaaq, koox iyo fasalka kale. The model we have created is an ensemble of simpler models, including Logistic Regression, Naive Bayes, Support Vector Machine and the interpolation between Logistic Regression and Naive Bayes with 0.25 coefficient of interpolation.  Tusaalada waxaa inagu ogolaan karaa in aan gaadho 0.547-kooxda macro F1.', 'ur': 'یہ لکھ ٹویٹر میں ایک فساد پیغام کا موقع تلاش کرنے کے لئے ہمارا طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے۔ ہم نے پیدا کیا ہے ایک سادھا موڈل ہے، یہاں تک کہ لوجیسٹی ریگرس، نایو بیز، ویکتور ماشین کی مدد کریں اور لوجیسٹی ریگرس اور نایو بیز کے درمیان انٹرپولٹ کی تعداد 0.25 کے مطابق ہے. Model allows us to achieve 0.547 macro F1-score.', 'uz': "Bu maqola Twitterda ta'sirli xabarlarni aniqlash uchun qanday qilish imkoniyatini koʻrsatiladi. Bu maqola, Individual, Guruh va boshqa sinflar kabi. Biz yaratgan model - Logistic Regression, Naive Bayes, Vector Mashini qoʻllash va Logistik boshqarish va Naiv Bayes bilan interpolatning 0.25 ta'siri darajasi bilan boshqarish mumkin. Model bizga 0.547 makro F1 scorini olishga ruxsat beradi.", 'vi': 'Bài báo này giới thiệu phương pháp phát hiện mục tiêu của các tin nhắn tấn công trên Twitter, gồm cả các lớp học cá nhân, Nhóm và Những Trường khác. Mô hình mà chúng ta đã tạo ra là một kết hợp của mô hình đơn giản hơn, bao gồm Hồi phục lôgíc, Naile Bayes, Ủng hộ cỗ máy Vector và sự phân phối giữa Hồi phục lôgícic và Naive Bayes với 0.25 số nhân tố nội suy. Mẫu này cho phép chúng ta đạt được 0.57 macro F1-điểm.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer vores tilgang til at registrere et mål for stødende meddelelser i Twitter, herunder individuelle, gruppe og andre klasser. Den model, vi har skabt, er et ensemble af enklere modeller, herunder Logistic Regression, Naive Bayes, Support Vector Machine og interpolationen mellem Logistic Regression og Naive Bayes med 0,25 interpolationskoefficient. Modellen giver os mulighed for at opnå 0,547 makro F1-score.', 'bg': 'Тази статия представя нашия подход за откриване на цел от обидни съобщения в Туитър, включително индивидуални, групови и други класове. Моделът, който създадохме е ансамбъл от по-прости модели, включително Логистична регресия, Нейв Байс, Поддържаща Векторна Машина и интерполацията между Логистична регресия и Нейв Байс с коефициент на интерполация 0.25. Моделът ни позволява да постигнем 0.547 макрос Формула-резултат.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert onze aanpak voor het detecteren van een doelwit van beledigende berichten in Twitter, inclusief individuele, groeps- en andere lessen. Het model dat we hebben gemaakt is een ensemble van eenvoudigere modellen, waaronder Logistic Regression, Naive Bayes, Support Vector Machine en de interpolatie tussen Logistic Regression en Naive Bayes met 0,25 coëfficiënt van interpolatie. Het model stelt ons in staat om 0.547 macro F1-score te bereiken.', 'hr': 'Ovaj članak predstavlja naš pristup otkrivanju cilja ofanzivnih poruka na Twitteru, uključujući individualne, grupe i druge klase. Model koji smo stvorili je ensemble jednostavnijih modela, uključujući Logističku regresiju, Naive Bayes, Podršku vektorskoj mašini i interpolaciju između Logističke regresije i Naive Bayes s 0,25 koeficijentom interpolacije. Model nam omogućava postići 0,547 makro F1 rezultat.', 'id': 'This article presents our approach for detecting a target of offensive messages in Twitter, including Individual, Group and Others classes.  Model yang telah kita ciptakan adalah sebuah kumpulan model sederhana, termasuk Regresi Logistik, Naive Bayes, Support Vector Machine dan interpolasi antara Regresi Logistik dan Naive Bayes dengan koeficien interpolasi 0,25. Model ini memungkinkan kita untuk mencapai 0,547 makro F1-skor.', 'de': 'Dieser Artikel stellt unseren Ansatz vor, ein Ziel von beleidigenden Nachrichten in Twitter zu erkennen, einschließlich Einzel-, Gruppen- und Andere-Klassen. Das von uns erstellte Modell ist ein Ensemble einfacherer Modelle, einschließlich Logistic Regression, Naive Bayes, Support Vector Machine und die Interpolation zwischen Logistic Regression und Naive Bayes mit 0,25 Interpolationskoeffizient. Das Modell ermöglicht es uns, 0.547 Makro F1-Score zu erreichen.', 'ko': '본고는 트위터에서 공격적인 메시지 목표를 탐지하는 방법을 소개하는데 개인, 그룹 및 기타 유형을 포함한다.우리가 만든 모델은 간단한 모델의 집합으로 로지스틱 회귀, 소박 베일러스, 벡터 지원 및 로지스틱 회귀와 소박 베일러스 간의 삽입값을 포함하고 삽입 계수는 0.25이다.이 모델을 사용하면 0.547 매크로 F1 점수를 얻을 수 있습니다.', 'fa': 'این مقاله روش ما را برای شناسایی هدف پیغام های تجاوز در توئیتر نشان می دهد، شامل کلاس فردی، گروه و بقیه. مدل ما ایجاد کرده ایم یک نمونه از مدل ساده\u200cتر است، شامل بازگشت Logistics, Naive Bayes، ماشین ویکتور پشتیبانی و بازگشت بین بازگشت Logistics و Bayes Naive با 0.25 coefficient of interpolation. این مدل به ما اجازه می دهد تا امتیاز F1 0.547 مکرو برسیم.', 'tr': 'Bu maksadyň Twitter-da birnäçe, Grup we Başgalar klaslaryň bir maksady tapmak üçin gurnalarymyzy görkezýär. Biziň yaratdyk nusgadymyz, Logistik Regression, Naive Bayes, Vektor Maşyny Destekle we Lojik Regresi we Naive Baylar arasynda 0.25 koefitär bilen ýeňil nusgadyr. Bu nusga bize 0,547 makro F1 अंश berip biler.', 'af': "Hierdie artikel stel ons toegang voor die ontdekking van 'n doel van offensivele boodskappe in Twitter, insluitend individuele, groep en ander klasse. Die model wat ons geskep het is 'n ensemble van eenvoudiger modele, insluitend Logistiese Regresie, Naive Bayes, ondersteun Vektor Masjien en die interpolasie tussen Logistiese Regresie en Naive Bayes met 0.25 koeffisient van interpolasie. Die model laat ons toe om 0. 547 makro F1- telling te bereik.", 'sw': 'Makala hii inaonyesha hatua yetu ya kutambua lengo la ujumbe wa mashambulizi kwenye mtandao wa Twita, ikiwa ni pamoja na watu binafsi, Group na wengine darasa. Mfano tuliyetengeneza ni mfano wa mifano rahisi, ikiwa ni pamoja na Udhibiti wa KiLogistic, Naive Bayes, Mashine ya Kuunga mkono Vector na mchanganyiko kati ya ukandamizaji wa Kilogistic na Naive Bayes wenye ufanisi wa kuingiliana na 0.25. Mfano unaruhusu kufikia vipindi 0.547 vidogo vya F1.', 'sq': 'Ky artikull paraqet qasjen tonë për zbulimin e objektivit të mesazheve ofensive në Twitter, duke përfshirë klasat Individuale, Grupi dhe të tjerë. Modeli që kemi krijuar është një grup modelesh më të thjeshta, duke përfshirë Regresionin Logjik, Bayes Naive, Mekanizën e Vektorit të Mbështetjes dhe interpolacionin midis Regresionit Logjik dhe Bayes Naive me koeficientin 0.25 të interpolacionit. Modeli na lejon të arrijmë 0.547 makro-rezultate F1.', 'hy': 'This article presents our approach for detecting a target of offensive messages in Twitter, including Individual, Group and Others classes.  Մենք ստեղծել ենք ավելի պարզ մոդելների համակարգ, ներառյալ Լոգիստիկ ռեգրեսիան, Նայվ Բեյսը, աջակցության մեքենան և ինտերպոլացիան Լոգիստիկ ռեգրեսիայի և Նայվ Բեյսների միջև 0.25 ինտերպոլացիայի կոեֆեյցիոն: Մոդելը թույլ է տալիս մեզ հասնել 0.547 մակրո F1-գնահատման:', 'am': 'ይህም ጽሑፍ የኢንጂብ፣ ጉባኤ እና ሌሎች ክፍሎች ጋር በትዊተር የመልእክት መልዕክቶችን ለማግኘት አቀረበ፡፡ የፈጠርነው ሞዴል፣ Logistic Regression፣ Naive Bayes፣ የዌctor መኪን እና የሎጂካዊ መክፈቻ እና ናይብ ባይስ መካከል የግንኙነት አካባቢ ነው፡፡ The model allows us to achieve 0.547 macro F1-score.', 'az': 'Bu məktub, Tövratdakı individual, Grup və Digər Sınıflardan istifadə etmək üçün bizim tərzimizi göstərir. Bizim yaratdığımız modellər, Logistik Regression, Naive Bayes, Vektor Makinesini və Lojik Regresi və Naive Bayes arasındakı interpolasyonun 0.25 koeficientləri ilə birlikdə olaraq daha basit modellərin ensembliyidir. Model bizə 0,547 makro F1 nöqtəsini tapmağa imkan verir.', 'bs': 'Ovaj članak predstavlja naš pristup otkrivanju cilja ofanzivnih poruka na Twitteru, uključujući individualne, grupe i druge klase. Model koji smo stvorili je ensembl jednostavnijih modela, uključujući Logističku regresiju, Naive Bayes, Podršku vektorskoj mašini i interpolaciju između Logističke regresije i Naive Bayes sa 0,25 koeficijenta interpolacije. Model nam omogućava da postignemo 0,547 makro F1 rezultat.', 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধটি টুইটারে একটি আক্রমণ বার্তার লক্ষ্য খুঁজে বের করার জন্য আমাদের প্রযুক্তি উপস্থাপন করেছে, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে প্রত আমরা যে মডেল তৈরি করেছি তা হচ্ছে সাধারণ মডেল, যার মধ্যে লোজিস্টিক নিয়ন্ত্রণ, নাইভ বেয়েস, সমর্থন করে ভেক্টর মেশিন এবং লোগিস্টিক নিয়ন্ত্রণ এবং নাইভ বেয়েস এর মধ্যে যে ক The model allows us to achieve 0.547 macro F1-score.', 'ca': 'Aquest article presenta el nostre enfocament per detectar un objectiu de missatges ofensius a Twitter, incloent classes Individuals, Grups i altres. The model we have created is an ensemble of simpler models, including Logistic Regression, Naive Bayes, Support Vector Machine and the interpolation between Logistic Regression and Naive Bayes with 0.25 coefficient of interpolation.  El model ens permet aconseguir 0,547 puntuacions macro F1.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje náš přístup k detekci cíle urážlivých zpráv na Twitteru, včetně tříd Individuální, Skupinové a další. Model, který jsme vytvořili, je soubor jednodušších modelů, včetně logistické regrese, Naive Bayes, Support Vector Machine a interpolace mezi logistickou regrese a Naive Bayes s koeficientem interpolace 0,25. Model nám umožňuje dosáhnout 0.547 makro F1 skóre.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis tutvustatakse meie lähenemisviisi Twitteris solvavate sõnumite sihtmärgi tuvastamiseks, sealhulgas individuaalsete, gruppide ja teiste klassides. Mudel, mille oleme loonud, on komplekt lihtsamatest mudelitest, sealhulgas Logistiline Regressioon, Naive Bayes, Support Vector Machine ja interpolatsioon Logistic Regression ja Naive Bayes vahel 0,25 interpolatsioonikoefitsiendiga. Mudel võimaldab meil saavutada 0,547 makro F1 skoor.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään lähestymistapamme loukkaavien viestien kohteen tunnistamiseen Twitterissä, mukaan lukien yksilö-, ryhmä- ja muut-luokat. Luomamme malli koostuu yksinkertaisemmista malleista, kuten Logistic Regression, Naive Bayesin, Support Vector Machinen sekä Logistic Regression ja Naive Bayesin interpoloinnin 0,25 interpolointikertoimella. Mallin avulla voimme saavuttaa 0,547 makron F1-pisteen.', 'sk': 'Ta članek predstavlja naš pristop za odkrivanje cilja žaljivih sporočil v Twitterju, vključno z individualnimi, skupinskimi in drugimi razredi. Model, ki smo ga ustvarili, je komplet preprostejših modelov, vključno z logistično regresijo, Naive Bayes, Support Vector Machine in interpolacijo med logistično regresijo in Naive Bayes s koeficientom interpolacije 0,25. Model nam omogoča doseganje 0,547 makro F1-rezultata.', 'ha': "Wannan makala na gaya mataimakanmu da za'a gane wasu manzanni masu zartar da haske a Twitter, kamar ɗabi'a, GUlum da wasu darajõji. @ info Modelen na yarda mu iya sami kowon 0.547 macro F1.", 'jv': 'Artik iki dadi nggawe akeh podho kanggo kejahake tarjamahan kanggo kelas Google, inkluyeng individual, Group lan sa oleh kles . model sing nggawe kelompok kuwi model sing ngetokake model sing semplin, tambah logistik Regresyon, Nave bayes, Tuderan vector Mas lan interpolation terus logistik Regresyon lan Nave bayes kuwi 0.24 coeffisit interpolation. paragraphs', 'he': 'המאמר הזה מציג את הגישה שלנו לגלות מטרה של הודעות פגיעות בטוויטר, כולל כיסויים אישיים, קבוצה ואחרים. המודל שנצרנו הוא סמל של מודלים פשוטים יותר, כולל חזרה לוגיסטית, בייס נייב, מכונת קטור תמיכה והאינטרפוליציה בין חזרה לוגיסטית לבייס נייב עם 0.25 קופיקטור של אינטרפוליציה. The model allows us to achieve 0.547 macro F1-score.', 'bo': 'འོན་ཀྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་འདི་ཌིས་ཌིར་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་འཕྲིན་དོན་རྙེད་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟོན་འཆར་བྱེད ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གསར་འཛུགས་དེ་ནི་སྟབས་བདེ་བའི་མིག་ཆས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། མ་དབུགས་འདིས་ང་ཚོར་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་0.547 རྩིས་ཐོ F1་གྲངས་དང་མཐུན་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'UBC-NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : Ensemble Learning of Offensive Content With Enhanced Training Data', 'ar': 'UBC-NLP في SemEval-2019 المهمة 6: تجميع تعلم المحتوى العدواني مع بيانات التدريب المحسّنة', 'fr': "UBC-NLP à SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: Apprentissage d'ensemble de contenu offensant avec des données d'entraînement améliorées", 'pt': 'UBC-NLP no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Aprendizado conjunto de conteúdo ofensivo com dados de treinamento aprimorados', 'es': 'UBC-NLP en la Tarea 6 de SemeVal-2019: Aprendizaje conjunto de contenido ofensivo con datos de entrenamiento mejorados', 'zh': 'UBC-NLP在SemEval-2019务6:以强练数,集冒犯性为学', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 6 पर UBC-NLP: एन्हांस्ड प्रशिक्षण डेटा के साथ आक्रामक सामग्री की एनसेम्बल लर्निंग', 'ru': 'UBC-NLP на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Ансамблевое изучение оскорбительного контента с расширенными данными обучения', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のUBC - NLPタスク6 ：強化されたトレーニングデータで不快なコンテンツの学習を組み立てる', 'ga': 'UBC-NLP ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Insemble Foghlaim ar Ábhar Ionsaitheach le Sonraí Oiliúna Feabhsaithe', 'ka': 'UBC-NLP semiEval-2019 სამუშაო დავალება 6: უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო სწავლობა', 'el': 'Εργασία 6: Ενσωμάτωση εκμάθησης επιθετικού περιεχομένου με βελτιωμένα δεδομένα κατάρτισης', 'hu': 'UBC-NLP a SemEval-2019 6. feladat: Támadó tartalom együttes tanulása továbbfejlesztett képzési adatokkal', 'mk': 'UBC-NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Ensemble Learning of Offensive Content With Enhanced Training Data', 'kk': 'UBC- NLP жарым Eval- 2019 тапсырмасының 6- тапсырмасы: Кеңейтілген оқыту деректерімен өзгертілген мазмұның оқытуы', 'lt': 'UBC-NLP 2010 m. pusmečio vertinimo metu 6 užduotis: Suderinti žalingo turinio mokymąsi gerinant mokymo duomenis', 'it': 'UBC-NLP al SemEval-2019 Task 6: Ensemble Learning of Offensive Content with Enhanced Training Data', 'ms': 'UBC-NLP di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Pembelajaran Serangan Kandungan Dengan Data Pelatihan Tertinggi', 'mn': 'UBC-NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Ensemble Learning of Offensive Content With Enhanced Training Data', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6- ല്\u200d യുബിസി- NLP: മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയ പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങളുമായി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ അഭിപ്ര', 'mt': 'UBC-NLP f’SemEval-2019 Task 6: Ensemble Learning of Offensive Content with Enhanced Training Data', 'no': 'UBC-NLP på halvEval-2019 oppgåve 6: Ensemble Learning of Offensive Content With Enhanced Training Data', 'pl': 'UBC-NLP na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 6: Zespół uczenia się treści ofensywnych z udoskonalonymi danymi szkoleniowymi', 'sr': 'UBC-NLP na pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 6: Učenje neposlušnog sadržaja sa povećanim podacima obuke', 'ro': 'UBC-NLP la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: Învățarea în ansamblu a conținutului ofensiv cu date de instruire îmbunătățite', 'si': 'UBC-NLP at Halfeval-2019 Job 6: Ensemble Training Data with Ensemble Offensive Contexts', 'so': 'UBC-NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Ensemble Learning of Offensive Content With Enhanced Training Data', 'sv': 'UBC-NLP på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: Samla inlärning av offensivt innehåll med förbättrade utbildningsdata', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 6: மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட பயிற்சி தகவலுடன் கூட்டும் தொடர்பு உள்ளடக்கம்', 'ur': 'UBC-NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Ensemble Learning of Offensive Contents With Enhanced Training Data', 'uz': 'Eval- 2019 vazifa 6: Taò¥lim bilan qoò£shimcha maò¥lumot bilan bogò£liq', 'vi': 'Việc làm của UBC-Nchọc tại SemEvl-209 Task 6: chắc chắn học về nội dung tàn bạo Với dữ liệu đào tạo cao', 'bg': 'Задача 6: Ансамбъл обучение на офанзивно съдържание с подобрени данни за обучение', 'da': 'UBC-NLP på SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: Ensemble læring af offensivt indhold med forbedrede træningsdata', 'hr': 'UBC-NLP na pola Evala-2019. zadatak 6: Učenje neposlušnog sadržaja s povećanim podacima obuke', 'nl': 'UBC-NLP bij SemEval-2019 Taak 6: Ensembleleren van offensieve inhoud met verbeterde trainingsgegevens', 'de': 'UBC-NLP bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabenstellung 6: Ensemblelernen von offensiven Inhalten mit erweiterten Trainingsdaten', 'id': 'UBC-NLP di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Ensemble Learning of Offensive Content With Enhanced Training Data', 'ko': 'UBC-NLP가SemEval-2019퀘스트6: 강화된 훈련 데이터를 이용하여 공격적인 내용을 집적 학습', 'fa': 'UBC-NLP در ماموریت ۶: آموزش یادگیری از محتوای ناتوانی با داده های آموزش بیشتر', 'sw': 'UBC-NLP katika SemEval-2019 kazi 6: Kufundisha Ujumbe wa Taarifa Bora kwa mafunzo', 'af': 'UBC- NLP by SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 6: Ensembler Leer van Offensive Inhoud met Verbeter Opvoer Data', 'tr': 'UBC-NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Ensemble Learning of Offensive Content With Enhanced Training Data', 'am': 'Eval-2019 ስራ 6: Ensemble Learning of Offensive Content with Enhanced Training Data', 'hy': 'UBC-NSP-ը, 2019-ի կիսագնդի 6-րդ հանձնարարությունում. վնասավոր բովանդակության սովորելը բարելավված ուսուցման տվյալներով', 'sq': 'UBC-NLP në SemEval-2019 Task 6: Ensemble Learning of Offensive Content with Enhanced Training Data', 'az': 'UBC-NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Ensemble Learning of Offensive Content With Ensemble Training Data', 'bn': 'UBC-NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Ensemble Learning of Offensive Content With Enhanced Training Data', 'ca': 'UBC-NLP a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Ensemble Learning of Offensive Content with Enhanced Training Data', 'bs': 'UBC-NLP na pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 6: Učenje neposlušnog sadržaja sa povećanim podacima obuke', 'cs': 'UBC-NLP na SemEval-2019 Úkol 6: Souborové učení útočného obsahu s vylepšenými tréninkovými daty', 'et': 'UBC-NLP SemEval-2019 ülesanne 6: ründava sisu ansambli õppimine täiustatud koolitusandmetega', 'fi': 'UBC-NLP SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 6: Ryhmäoppiminen hyökkäävästä sisällöstä parannetulla koulutustiedolla', 'jv': 'UB-NLP at semiinval-2011 task 6: ENsemble Learning of offensive Content with advanced Learning data', 'he': 'UBC-NLP ב SemEval-2019 משימה 6: ללמוד סמוך של תוכן פגיע עם נתונים מאימונים משתפרים', 'sk': 'UBC-NLP na SemEval-2019 Naloga 6: Skupinsko učenje napadalnih vsebin z izboljšanimi podatki o usposabljanju', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'bo': 'UBC-NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Ensemble Learning of Offensive Content With Enhanced Training Data'}
{'en': 'We examine learning offensive content on Twitter with limited, imbalanced data. For the purpose, we investigate the utility of using various data enhancement methods with a host of classical ensemble classifiers. Among the 75 participating teams in SemEval-2019 sub-task B, our system ranks 6th (with 0.706 macro F1-score). For sub-task C, among the 65 participating teams, our system ranks 9th (with 0.587 macro F1-score).', 'ar': 'ندرس محتوى التعلم المسيء على تويتر ببيانات محدودة وغير متوازنة. لهذا الغرض ، نتحرى فائدة استخدام طرق مختلفة لتحسين البيانات مع مجموعة من مصنّفات المجموعات الكلاسيكية. من بين 75 فريقًا مشاركًا في المهمة الفرعية B لـ SemEval-2019 ، يحتل نظامنا المرتبة السادسة (مع 0.706 درجة ماكرو F1). بالنسبة للمهمة الفرعية C ، من بين 65 فريقًا مشاركًا ، يحتل نظامنا المرتبة التاسعة (مع 0.587 درجة ماكرو F1).', 'es': 'Examinamos el aprendizaje de contenido ofensivo en Twitter con datos limitados y desequilibrados. Para ello, investigamos la utilidad de utilizar varios métodos de mejora de datos con una serie de clasificadores de conjuntos clásicos. Entre los 75 equipos participantes en la subtarea B de SemeVal-2019, nuestro sistema ocupa el sexto lugar (con una puntuación macro F1 de 0.706). Para la subtarea C, entre los 65 equipos participantes, nuestro sistema ocupa el noveno lugar (con una puntuación macro F1 de 0.587).', 'fr': "Nous examinons le contenu d'apprentissage choquant sur Twitter avec des données limitées et déséquilibrées. À cette fin, nous étudions l'utilité d'utiliser diverses méthodes d'amélioration des données avec une multitude de classificateurs d'ensembles classiques. Parmi les 75 équipes participantes à la sous-tâche B SEMEVAL-2019, notre système se classe 6e (avec un score macro F1 de 0,706). Pour la sous-tâche C, parmi les 65 équipes participantes, notre système se classe au 9e rang (avec un score macro F1 de 0,587).", 'pt': 'Examinamos o aprendizado de conteúdo ofensivo no Twitter com dados limitados e desequilibrados. Para isso, investigamos a utilidade de usar vários métodos de aprimoramento de dados com uma série de classificadores de ensemble clássicos. Entre as 75 equipes participantes da subtarefa B do SemEval-2019, nosso sistema ocupa a 6ª posição (com 0,706 macro F1-score). Para a subtarefa C, entre as 65 equipes participantes, nosso sistema ocupa a 9ª posição (com 0,587 macro F1-score).', 'ja': '私たちは、限られた不均衡なデータを使用して、Twitter上の不快な学習コンテンツを検討します。そのために、古典的なアンサンブル分類子のホストで様々なデータ強化手法を用いることの有用性を検討した。SemEval -2019サブタスクBに参加する75チームのうち、当社のシステムは6位です（マクロF 1スコアは0.706 ）。サブタスクCについては、65の参加チームのうち、当社のシステムは9位です（マクロF 1スコアは0.587 ）。', 'zh': '吾以有限、不平之数究Twitter上学之冒犯也。 是以考诸数以增其方,合诸经而合其实用性。 SemEval-2019子职B75参赛团队,吾统排名第6位(宏观F1分为0.706)。 子职C,在65参赛伍中,吾属排名第9位(宏观F1分为0.587)。', 'ru': 'Мы изучаем обучение оскорбительному контенту в Twitter с ограниченными, несбалансированными данными. С этой целью мы исследуем полезность использования различных методов улучшения данных с помощью множества классических классификаторов ансамблей. Среди 75 команд, участвующих в подзадаче B SemEval-2019, наша система занимает 6-е место (с 0,706 макросчет F1). По подзадаче С, среди 65 команд-участниц, наша система занимает 9-е место (с 0,587 макросчета F1).', 'hi': 'हम सीमित, असंतुलित डेटा के साथ ट्विटर पर आपत्तिजनक सामग्री सीखने की जांच करते हैं। इस उद्देश्य के लिए, हम शास्त्रीय पहनावा क्लासिफायरके एक मेजबान के साथ विभिन्न डेटा वृद्धि विधियों का उपयोग करने की उपयोगिता की जांच करते हैं। SemEval-2019 उप-कार्य बी में 75 भाग लेने वाली टीमों में से, हमारा सिस्टम 6 वें स्थान पर है (0.706 मैक्रो F1-स्कोर के साथ)। उप-कार्य सी के लिए, 65 प्रतिभागी टीमों में से, हमारा सिस्टम 9 वें स्थान पर है (0.587 मैक्रो एफ 1-स्कोर के साथ)।', 'ga': 'Scrúdaímid ábhar maslach foghlama ar Twitter le sonraí teoranta neamhchothromaithe. Chun na críche sin, déanaimid imscrúdú ar an bhfóntas a bhaineann le modhanna éagsúla feabhsaithe sonraí a úsáid le go leor aicmitheoirí ensemble clasaiceacha. I measc na 75 fhoireann rannpháirteacha i bhfothasc B SemEval-2019, tá ár gcóras sa 6ú háit (le 0.706 macra-scór F1). Maidir le fothasc C, i measc na 65 fhoireann rannpháirteacha, tá ár gcóras sa 9ú háit (le 0.587 macra-scór F1).', 'ka': 'ჩვენ შევხედავთ ტვირუტერის სწავლებელი ინფორმაციური ინფორმაციას, რომელიც განსაზღვრებული, განბლანზეული მონაცემებით. მიზეზისთვის, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ განსხვავებული მონაცემების უფრო მეტისთვის გამოყენება კლასიკური ანსტემბლის კლასიფიკაციის ჰოსტით. ჩვენი სისტემა 6-ი (0,706 მაკრო F1-score) სკენ დაწყებული 75 დაწყებული ჯგუფის შორის B-ში. სამუშაო დავალებისთვის C, 65 მოთავსწავლობული ჯგუფი შორის, ჩვენი სისტემის წერტილი 9-ია (0,587 მაკრო F1-score).', 'hu': 'A Twitteren korlátozott, kiegyensúlyozatlan adatokkal rendelkező sértő tartalmakat vizsgálunk. Ennek érdekében különböző adatfejlesztési módszerek alkalmazásának hasznosságát vizsgáljuk számos klasszikus együttesosztályozóval. A SemEval-2019 B alcsoportban részt vevő 75 csapat közül rendszerünk 6. helyen áll (0,706 makro F1 pontszámmal). A C alfeladat esetében a 65 résztvevő csapat közül a rendszerünk 9. helyen áll (0,587 makró F1 pontszámmal).', 'el': 'Εξετάζουμε προσβλητικό περιεχόμενο μάθησης στο Twitter με περιορισμένα, ανισορροπημένα δεδομένα. Για το σκοπό αυτό, διερευνούμε τη χρησιμότητα της χρήσης διαφόρων μεθόδων βελτίωσης δεδομένων με πλήθος κλασικών ταξινομητών συνόλων. Μεταξύ των 75 συμμετεχόντων ομάδων στην υποεργασία Β, το σύστημά μας κατατάσσεται 6η (με 0.706 μακροβαθμολογία F1). Για την υποεργασία Γ, μεταξύ των 65 συμμετεχόντων ομάδων, το σύστημά μας κατατάσσεται 9η (με 0.587 μακροβαθμολογία F1).', 'it': "Esaminiamo l'apprendimento di contenuti offensivi su Twitter con dati limitati e sbilanciati. A tal fine, esaminiamo l'utilità di utilizzare vari metodi di miglioramento dei dati con una serie di classificatori classici di ensemble. Tra le 75 squadre partecipanti alla sottomissione B SemEval-2019, il nostro sistema si colloca al sesto posto (con 0,706 macro F1-punteggio). Per la sottomissione C, tra le 65 squadre partecipanti, il nostro sistema si colloca al nono posto (con 0,587 macro F1-punteggio).", 'kk': 'Біз Твиттерде шектелген, дибалансияланған деректермен оқытуға тырыстық мазмұнын тексереміз. Мұндай үшін біз классикалық ензембл классикалық классификациялық классификациялық деректерді жақсарту әдістерін қолданатын утилитетті зерттеп көрдік. Біздің жүйеңіздің шешінші реті (0,706 макро F1- нүктесі) 75 қатысушылық топтардың арасында B ішкі тапсырмасында қатысушылық топтардың арасында. C ішкі тапсырма үшін, 65 қатысушылық топтардың арасында, жүйеміздің 9- жолдары (0, 587 макро F1- нүкте).', 'lt': 'Mes tiriame įžeidžiantį Twitter turinį su ribotais, disbalansuotais duomenimis. Šiuo tikslu mes tiriame, kaip naudinga naudoti įvairius duomenų tobulinimo metodus su daugeliu klasikinių ansamblių klasifikatorių. Iš 75 dalyvaujančių grupių, dalyvaujančių B pusužduotyje „SemEval-2019“, mūsų sistema yra 6-oji (0,706 makro F1 balais). Iš 65 dalyvaujančių komandų C poskyryje mūsų sistema yra 9-oji (0,587 makro F1 balas).', 'mk': 'Го проверуваме учењето на навредливата содржина на Твитер со ограничени, нерамнотежни податоци. За цел, ја истражуваме корисноста на користењето на различни методи за подобрување на податоците со голем број класични класификатори на ансембли. Меѓу 75 тимови кои учествуваат во подзадачата Б SemEval-2019, нашиот систем се рангира на 6-тото место (со 0,706 макро F1-оценка). За подзадачата Ц, меѓу 65 тимови кои учествуваат, нашиот систем се рангира на 9-тото место (со 0,587 макро Ф1-оценка).', 'ms': 'Kami memeriksa kandungan pembelajaran serangan di Twitter dengan data yang terbatas dan tidak seimbang. Untuk tujuan ini, kami menyelidiki utiliti menggunakan pelbagai kaedah peningkatan data dengan host klasik ensemble klasik. Di antara 75 pasukan yang berpartisipasi dalam sub-tugas B SemEval-2019, sistem kita berturut-turut ke-6 (dengan 0.706 makro-skor F1). Untuk sub-tugas C, di antara 65 pasukan yang berpartisipasi, sistem kita berturut-turut ke-9 (dengan 0.587 makro-skor F1).', 'mt': 'Aħna jeżaminaw il-kontenut offensiv tat-tagħlim fuq Twitter b’dejta limitata u żbilanċjata. Għall-fini, ninvestigaw l-utilità tal-użu ta’ diversi metodi ta’ titjib tad-dejta ma’ għadd ta’ klassifikaturi tal-ensembles klassiċi. Fost il-75 tim parteċipanti fis-sottokompitu B ta’ SemEval-2019, is-sistema tagħna tikklassifika s-sitt (b’0.706 makro-punteġġ F1). For sub-task C, among the 65 participating teams, our system ranks 9th (with 0.587 macro F1-score).', 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ട്രൂട്ടറില്\u200d കഠിനമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. പരിധിയില്ലാത്ത, തികഞ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡേറ്റാ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഉപയോഗം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ക്ലാസിക്കല Among the 75 participating teams in SemEval-2019 sub-task B, our system ranks 6th (with 0.706 macro F1-score).  പങ്കെടുക്കുന്ന 65 ടീമില്\u200d ഉള്ള സബ് ജോലി സിയ്ക്ക്, നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ', 'mn': 'Бид Твиттерт хэмжээтэй, хязгаарлагдмал мэдээллийг суралцаж суралцаж байдаг. Энэ зорилгоор бид олон өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэх арга хэрэглэх хэрэглээ судалж байлаа. SemEval-2019 B суб-даалгаварын 75 багийнхаа дунд бидний систем 6-р (0.706 макро F1-тоо) байдаг. С-ийн суб-даалгаварын хувьд, 65 оролцогчдын хамтдаа бидний систем 9-р (0.587 макро F1-той).', 'pl': 'Badamy obraźliwe treści uczenia się na Twitterze z ograniczonymi, niezrównoważonymi danymi. W tym celu badamy użyteczność stosowania różnych metod poprawy danych z szeregiem klasyfikatorów zespołów klasycznych. Wśród 75-drużyn uczestniczących w podzadaniu SemEval-2019 B, nasz system jest szósty (z makro F1-wynikiem 0.706). W przypadku podzadania C, wśród 65 uczestniczących zespołów, nasz system jest dziewiąty (z 0.587 makro F1-wynik).', 'ro': 'Examinăm conținutul ofensator de învățare pe Twitter cu date limitate și dezechilibrate. În acest scop, investigăm utilitatea utilizării diferitelor metode de îmbunătățire a datelor cu o serie de clasificatoare clasice de ansambluri. Dintre cele 75 de echipe participante la subsarcina B SemEval-2019, sistemul nostru se clasează pe locul 6 (cu 0,706 macro F1 scor). Pentru subsarcina C, printre cele 65 de echipe participante, sistemul nostru se claseaza pe locul 9 (cu 0.587 macro F1 scor).', 'sr': 'Pregledavamo uvredljiv sadržaj učenja na Twitter sa ograničenim, neravnoteženim podacima. Za svrhu toga istražujemo korisnost korištenja različitih metoda povećanja podataka sa domaćinom klasičnih klasičnih klasičnih klasičnih klasičara. Među 75 tima koji su sudjelovali u podzadatku B, naš sistem je 6. red (sa 0,706 makro F1 rezultat). Za podzadatak C, među 65 tim koji sudjeluju, naš sistem je 9. red (sa 0,587 makro F1 rezultat).', 'no': 'Vi undersøker å lære offensiv innhald på Twitter med begrenset, ulike data. For dette målet undersøker vi verktøyet for å bruka ulike dataforbedringsmetoder med ein vert av klassiske ensembelsklassifikatorar. Av 75 deltakende grupper i semiEval-2019 underoppgåve B, vår systemet rankerer 6. tidspunkt (med 0,706 makro F1-score). For underoppgåve C, mellom 65 deltakende grupper, er systemet vårt 9. rank (med 0,587 makro F1-score).', 'so': 'Waxaannu ku baaraynaa waxbarashada waxyaabaha dhimirka ah ee Twitterka, macluumaad aan la qiimo karin. Ujeeda darteed waxaynu baaraynaa isticmaalka isticmaalka qaababka horumarinta ee macluumaadka kala duduwan, kuwaas oo ay leeyihiin koox kooxa fasax ah. Kooxda qayb-qaadashada ee SemEval-2019 sub-task B waxaa ka mid ah kooxda 75 oo ka mid ah kooxda SemEval-2019, nidaamkayaga waxay leedahay 6aad (with 0.706 macro F1 score). Sub-task C, kooxda 65 ka mid ah ayaa nidaamka u dhexeeya 9aad (0.587 macro F1 score).', 'sv': 'Vi undersöker lärande stötande innehåll på Twitter med begränsad, obalanserad data. För ändamålet undersöker vi nyttan av att använda olika dataförbättringsmetoder med en mängd klassiska ensembleklassificerare. Bland de 75 deltagande lagen i SemEval-2019 deluppgift B rankas vårt system 6:e (med 0,706 makro F1-poäng). För deluppgift C, bland de 65 deltagande lagen, rankas vårt system 9:e (med 0,587 makro F1-poäng).', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் கடுமையான, ஒழுங்கும் தரவுடன் பயிற்சி உள்ளடக்கங்களை Twitter ல் பரிசோதிக்கிறோம். நாம் வேறு தரவு மேம்படுத்தும் முறைகளை பயன்படுத்தும் பயன்பாட்டில் ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம் வகுப்பாளர்களின் புரவலன். SemEval-2019 துணை பணி B-ல் 75 பங்கீட்டுக் குழுக்களில், எங்கள் கணினியின் தரம் 6வது (0. 706 மேக்ரோ F1- புள்ளியுடன்) உள்ளது. துணை சிக்கு, 65 குழுக்களில் பங்கிடும் குழுக்களுக்கு, எங்கள் அமைப்பு 9வது நிறுவனது (0. 587 மேக்ரோ F1- புள்ளியுடன்)', 'ur': 'ہم توئیٹر پر ناپسندیدہ موضوع کی تعلیم کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں، محدود، ناپسندیدہ ڈیٹا کے ساتھ. اس کے لئے ہم مختلف ڈیٹا اضافہ طریقے کے استعمال کرنے کے مطابق استعمال کرتے ہیں کلاسیکی انسمبل کلاسیٹر کے ساتھ۔ سیم اول-2019 سوب-ٹاکس ب میں 75 شرکت گروہوں میں، ہمارا سیستم 6م رقم ہے (0.706 مکرو F1-score کے ساتھ). سوب-ٹاکس کے لئے، 65 شرکت گروہوں کے درمیان، ہماری سیسٹم ۹م درجہ ہے (0.587 مکرو F1-score کے ساتھ).', 'si': 'අපි ට්විටර් එකේ අපරාධකාරීය සම්බන්ධතාවක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, සීමාවිත, අන්තිම ද අදහසට, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ විවිධ දත්ත වැඩි විශේෂ විධානය ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් සමග සංවිධානය සංවිධානයේ  සෙම්වෙල්-2019 සුබ-වැඩ B වල සාමාන්\u200dය කණ්ඩායම් 75 අතර, අපේ පද්ධතිය 6වෙනි පද්ධතිය (0.706 මැක්රෝ F1-ස්කෝර් එක්ක). සාබ් වැඩ C සඳහා, 65 කණ්ඩායම් අතර, අපේ පද්ධතිය 9 පැත්ත (0.587 මැක්රෝ F1-ස්කෝර් එක්ක).', 'uz': "Biz Twitterda ta'sirlik tarkibini o'rganishni o'rganimiz, cheksiz, balandroq maʼlumot bilan o'rganimiz. Masalan, biz bir xil maʼlumot qo'shish usullarini ishlatish mumkin. Klassik ensemble klassiplari kompyuterda. SemEval-2019 sub-vazifa B bilan 75 ta bo'lishi guruhidagi, bizning tizimmiz 6 marta (0.706 macro F1 scori bilan). C'ning tub vazifa uchun 65 bo'lgan guruhdagi, bizning tizimmiz 9 marta (0.587 macro F1 scori bilan).", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi xem các nội dung tấn công học trên Twitter với dữ liệu nhỏ, thiếu cân bằng. Để đạt được mục đích, chúng tôi điều tra tiện ích của việc sử dụng các phương pháp cải tạo dữ liệu khác nhau với một loạt các phân loại nhạc điển cổ. Trong số các đội 75 tham gia phân bổ Semkhai-thẩm 9 B, hệ thống thuộc hàng thứ sáu (ghi 0.706 macro F1-số lượng). Đối với phần dưới nhiệm vụ C, trong các đội bóng 85, hệ thống của chúng ta xếp hạng 9th (ghi 0.587 macro F1-số).', 'bg': 'Разглеждаме изучаването на обидно съдържание в Туитър с ограничени, дисбалансирани данни. За целта изследваме ползата от използването на различни методи за подобряване на данните с множество класически ансамбълни класификатори. Сред 75 отбора, участващи в подзадача Б, нашата система се нарежда на 6-о място (с 0.706 макрос). За подзадача С, сред 65-те участващи отбора, нашата система се нарежда на 9-то място (с 0.587 макро резултат).', 'hr': 'Pregledavamo uvredljiv sadržaj učenja na Twitter s ograničenim, neravnoteženim podacima. Za svrhu toga istražujemo korisnost korištenja različitih metoda povećanja podataka sa domaćinom klasičnih klasičnih klasičnih klasičnih klasičnih klasičnih klasičara. Među 75 sudjelujućih timova u podzadatku B-u SemEval-2019, naš sustav je 6. redak (s 0,706 makro F1 rezultat). Za podzadatak C, među 65 sudjelujućih timova, naš sustav je 9. redak (s 0,587 makro F1 rezultat).', 'nl': 'We onderzoeken leeraanstootgevende content op Twitter met beperkte, onevenwichtige data. Hiervoor onderzoeken we het nut van het gebruik van verschillende data enhancement methodes met een groot aantal klassieke ensemble classificatoren. Onder de 75-deelnemende teams in SemEval-2019 subtaak B staat ons systeem op de 6e plaats (met 0.706 macro F1-score). Voor deeltaak C, onder de 65 deelnemende teams, staat ons systeem 9e (met 0.587 macro F1-score).', 'da': 'Vi undersøger indlæringsstødende indhold på Twitter med begrænsede, ubalancerede data. Til dette formål undersøger vi nytten af at bruge forskellige dataforbedringsmetoder med et væld af klassiske ensemble klassifikationer. Blandt de 75 deltagende hold i SemEval-2019 underopgave B, rangerer vores system 6. (med 0,706 makro F1-score). For underopgave C, blandt de 65 deltagende hold, rangerer vores system 9. (med 0,587 makro F1-score).', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen lernfreundliche Inhalte auf Twitter mit begrenzten, unausgewogenen Daten. Zu diesem Zweck untersuchen wir die Nützlichkeit verschiedener Methoden zur Datenoptimierung mit einer Vielzahl klassischer Ensembleklassifikatoren. Unter den 75-teilnehmenden Teams in SemEval-2019 Teilaufgabe B belegt unser System den sechsten Platz (mit 0.706 Makro F1-Score). Bei Teilaufgabe C, unter den 65-teilnehmenden Teams, rangiert unser System neun (mit 0.587 Makro F1-Punktzahl).', 'ko': '우리는 트위터의 공격적인 내용을 유한하고 불균형한 데이터로 연구했다.이를 위해 우리는 대량의 고전 집적 분류기에서 각종 데이터 강화 방법을 사용하는 실용성을 연구했다.SemEval-19 서브퀘스트 B의 75개 참가팀 중 우리 시스템은 6위(F1총점 0.706)에 올랐다.서브퀘스트 C에 대해서는 65개 참가팀 중 우리 시스템이 9위(매크로F1 점수 0.587)에 올랐다.', 'fa': 'ما محتوای تجاوز یادگیری را در توئیتر با داده های محدودیت و نابرابری تحقیق می کنیم. برای هدف، ما استفاده از روش\u200cهای افزایش داده\u200cهای مختلف با یک میزبان گروهی از گروهی\u200cهای گروهی کلاسیک تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. بین ۷۵ تیم شرکت کننده در نیم\u200cEval-2019 sub-task B، سیستم ما درجات ۶م (با نمونه\u200cی ۰.706 ماکرو F1). برای زیر وظیفه C، بین ۶۵ تیم شرکت کننده، سیستم ما درجه ۹م است (با 0.587 مکرو F1-score).', 'id': 'Kami memeriksa isi pembelajaran offensif di Twitter dengan data yang terbatas dan tidak seimbang. For the purpose, we investigate the utility of using various data enhancement methods with a host of classical ensemble classifiers.  Among the 75 participating teams in SemEval-2019 sub-task B, our system ranks 6th (with 0.706 macro F1-score).  Untuk sub-tugas C, diantara 65 tim yang berpartisipasi, sistem kita berturut-turut ke-9 (dengan 0,587 makro-skor F1).', 'sw': 'Tunajaribu kujifunza maudhui ya mashambulizi kwenye mtandao wa Twita kwa taarifa zisizo na usawa. Kwa lengo hilo, tunachunguza matumizi ya kutumia mbinu mbalimbali za taarifa za kuongeza kwa makundi ya wataalamu wa kiganjani. Miongoni mwa timu 75 za ushiriki katika jukumu la SemEval-2019 B, mfumo wetu una vyeo 6 (yenye vipimo 0.706 vya makro F1). For sub-task C, among the 65 participating teams, our system ranks 9th (with 0.587 macro F1-score).', 'sq': 'Ne shqyrtojmë përmbajtjen e mësimit ofensiv në Twitter me të dhëna të kufizuara dhe të paekuilibruara. Për qëllim, ne hetojmë utilitetin e përdorimit të metodave të ndryshme të përmirësimit të të dhënave me një grup klasifikues klasike të ansamblit. Midis 75 ekipave pjesëmarrëse në nëndetyrën B të SemEval-2019, sistemi ynë renditet i gjashti (me 0.706 makro F1-rezultat). Për nëndetyrën C, midis 65 ekipave pjesëmarrëse, sistemi ynë renditet i nënti (me 0.587 makro-rezultate F1).', 'tr': "Biz Twitter'da howply maksady öwrenmegi diýip çykýarys. Mazmunyň üçin, klasik ensembler klassifikatçylary bilen görnüş maglumatlary geliştirmek üçin ullanlygyny barlaýarys. SemEval-2019 sub-task B sistemimiziň 6-nji derejesi bar (0.706 makro F1-score bilen). Sub-task C üçin, 65 toparyň arasynda sistemamyz 9-nji dereje (0.587 makro F1-score bilen).", 'af': "Ons ondersoek die leer van offensivele inhoud op Twitter met beperkte, onbalanse data. Vir die doel, ons ondersoek die nutsprogram van verskeie data verbeteringsmetodes met 'n gasheer van klassieke ensemble klassieerders. Ons stelsel rank 6de (met 0.706 makro F1-telling). Vir sub-taak C, onder die 65 deelnaamde teams, ons stelsel rank 9de (met 0,587 makro F1-poeier).", 'am': 'በትዊተር ላይ የጥላቻን ትምህርት እናስተማርናለን፡፡ ለዚህ ምክንያት፣ በተለያዩ የዳታ አካባቢ ሥርዓት በመጠቀም የክላሲካዊ ስንሰፋፊዎችን ማኅበረሰብ እናጠይቃለን፡፡ በሴምEval-2019 ደብዳቤ B ውስጥ 75 ተጋሪዎች ቡድን መካከል የስብሰባችን ደረጃዎች 6ኛ (0.706 ማክሮ F1-score) ነው፡፡ ለስራ C፣ 65 ተካያፊዎች ቡድን መካከል የስርዓታችን ክፍል 9ኛ (0.587 ማኮር F1-score) ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք Թվիթերում սովորելու գայթակղիչ պարունակությունը սահմանափակ, անհավասարակշռության տվյալներով: Այս նպատակով, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք տարբեր տվյալների բարելավման մեթոդների օգտագործման օգտակարությունը մի շարք դասակարգերի միջոցով: Among the 75 participating teams in SemEval-2019 sub-task B, our system ranks 6th (with 0.706 macro F1-score).  C-ի ենթախնդրի համար մեր համակարգը մասնակցում է 65 խմբի մեջ 9-րդ դասակարգ է (0,587 մակրո F1-ի գնահատականով):', 'az': "Biz Twitter'da x…ôrcl…ônmiŇü, m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edilmiŇü m…ôlumatlarńĪ t…ôhsil edirik. Bu m…ôqs…ôdil…ô, biz m√ľxt…ôlif m…ôlumatlarńĪ artńĪrma metodlarńĪnńĪ klasik ensemble klasifikatorlarńĪ il…ô istifad…ô etm…ôk faydalanńĪŇüńĪnńĪ incidirik. SemEval-2019 B sub-task 75 istifad…ô ed…ôn d…ôst…ôl…ôrin arasńĪnda sistemimiz 6-ci d…ôst…ô (0,706 makro F1-score il…ô). C …ônn…ôtd…ô, 65 istifad…ô ed…ôn d…ôst…ôl…ôr arasńĪnda sistemimiz 9. d…ôr…ôc…ôsi il…ô (0,587 makro F1-score il…ô).", 'bn': 'We examine learning offensive content on Twitter with limited, imbalanced data.  উদ্দেশ্যের জন্য আমরা বিভিন্ন তথ্য উন্নয়ন পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করে তদন্ত করি ক্লাসিক্যাল এনসেম্পেল ব্যবহারকারীদের সাথে এক হোস্ট সেমইভাল-২০১৯ সাব-কাজ B-এর ৭৫টি অংশগ্রহণকারী দলের মধ্যে আমাদের সিস্টেমের ৬ সাম্প্রতিক (০. সাব-কাজ সি-এর জন্য, ৬৫টি অংশগ্রহণকারী দলের মধ্যে, আমাদের সিস্টেম ৯ সালের সার্ভিস (০. 587 ম্যাক্রো এফ১ স্কোরের', 'bs': 'Pregledavamo uvredljiv sadržaj učenja na Twitter sa ograničenim, neravnoteženim podacima. Za svrhu toga istražujemo korisnost korištenja različitih metoda povećanja podataka sa domaćinom klasičnih klasičnih klasičnih klasičnih klasičnih klasičara. Među 75 sudjelujućim timovima u podzadatku B, naš sistem je 6. red (sa 0,706 makro F1 rezultat). Za podzadatak C, među 65 tim koji sudjeluju, naš sistem je 9. redak (sa 0,587 makro F1 rezultat).', 'ca': "Examinem continguts ofensius d'aprenentatge a Twitter amb dades limitades i desequilibrats. Per tal d'investigar l'utilitat d'utilitzar diversos mètodes de millora de dades amb un munt de classificadors clàssics d'ensembles. Entre els 75 equips participants de la subtasca B de SemEval-2019, el nostre sistema es ranka a la sexta (amb 0,706 puntuacions macro F1). Per la subtasca C, entre els 65 equips participants, el nostre sistema es classe en 9è (amb 0,587 puntuacions macro F1).", 'cs': 'Zkoumáme učení urážlivého obsahu na Twitteru s omezenými, nevyváženými daty. Za tímto účelem zkoumáme užitečnost využití různých metod vylepšování dat s řadou klasifikátorů souborů. Mezi 75 zúčastněnými týmy v podúkolu B SemEval-2019 se náš systém nachází na šestém místě (s makro F1-skóre 0.706). U podúkolu C, mezi 65 zúčastněnými týmy, náš systém je devátý (s 0.587 makro F1-skóre).', 'fi': 'Tutkimme loukkaavan sisällön oppimista Twitterissä rajoitetusti ja epätasapainoisesti. Tätä tarkoitusta varten tutkimme erilaisten tiedonparannusmenetelmien hyödyllisyyttä useiden klassisten ryhmäluokittelijoiden kanssa. SemEval-2019 osatehtävään B osallistuvista 75 tiimistä järjestelmämme sijoittuu kuudenneksi (0,706 makropisteellä F1). Alatehtävässä C järjestelmämme sijoittuu 65 osallistujajoukkueen joukosta yhdeksänneksi (0,587 makropisteellä F1).', 'et': 'Me uurime solvava sisu õppimist Twitteris piiratud ja tasakaalustamata andmetega. Selleks uurime erinevate andmeparandusmeetodite kasutamise kasulikkust paljude klassikaliste ansambli klassifitseerijatega. SemEval-2019 alamülesandes B osalenud 75 meeskonnast on meie süsteem 6. kohal (0,706 makro F1 skooriga). Alaülesande C puhul on meie süsteem 65 osalevast meeskonnast 9. kohal (0,587 makroskooriga F1).', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk kelas nang pisan ingkang kesempatan tentang tuwater Saiki, kita nguasai nggunakake usakno kanggo gampang sistem dadi nggawe dolanan karo perusahaan seneng dolanan karo koyok barang kelas Mungkin 75 pating-pating tamah sing dibenakno ning semiinval-2011 Sub-task B, sistem kita rangsi 6 (karo 0.006 macro F1-pung). Omah apa-task C, mengko liman-liman karo nganggo liman-liman, siji tentang 9 (karo 0.587 macro F1-puntu).', 'he': 'אנחנו בודקים את התוכן הלימודי הנתק בטוויטר עם נתונים מוגבלים, לא מאוזנים. למטרה, אנו חוקרים את שימושי השימוש בשיטות שיפור נתונים שונות עם ערוץ של קלאסיבלי אנסמבל קלאסיים. בין 75 קבוצות השתתפות בסימוול-2019 בתפקיד B, המערכת שלנו מגוונת ב-6 (עם 0.706 נקודות מקרו F1). למשימה הקטנה C, בין 65 הקבוצות המשתתפות, המערכת שלנו מגוונת ב-9 (עם 0.587 נקודות מקרו F1).', 'sk': 'Učenje žaljivih vsebin preučujemo na Twitterju z omejenimi in neravnoteženimi podatki. V ta namen raziskujemo uporabnost uporabe različnih metod izboljšanja podatkov s številnimi klasičnimi klasičnimi klasifikatorji ansambla. Med 75 sodelujočimi ekipami v podnalogi B SemEval-2019 se naš sistem uvršča na 6. mesto (z 0,706 makro rezultati F1). Pri podnalogi C se naš sistem med 65 sodelujočimi ekipami uvršča na 9. mesto (z 0,587 makro rezultati F1).', 'ha': "Tuna jarraba kan karatun abubuwa a Twitter, da data da ba ta yi taƙaita ba. To, don haka, Munã yin ƙidãya da amfani da su yi amfani da wasu hanyoyin ƙaranci ga data na ƙaranci da wani runduna na classical fanemble. Bayan jama'ar mãsu shirin jama'a na SemEV-2019 sub-aikin B, na'uranmu yana da daraja 6 (da 0.706 macro F1-score). Ga sub-aikin C, daga jama'ar 65 masu haɗi, na'asarmu yana da 9 (na 0.587 macro F1 score).", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཌིས་ཌིར་ཐོག་གི་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་བྱེད་པའི་ནང་དོན་ཉེན་ཅིག་དང་ཉེ་བར་བཀག་བྱས་པ་ཡིན་ དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ང་ཚོས་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིག་གིས་སྤྱད་པའི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རྩོམ་འབྲེལ་གྱི་དམིགས Among the 75 participating teams in SemEval-2019 sub-task B, our system ranks 6th (with 0.706 macro F1-score). འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་གནད་དོན་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག་ལས་དབུལ་གྱི་ཕྱོགས་ལས་ཀྱང་འགོད་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་༦༦༠་ནང་ལ་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་'}
{'en': 'UHH-LT at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : Supervised vs. Unsupervised Transfer Learning for Offensive Language Detection', 'pt': 'UHH-LT na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Aprendizado de transferência supervisionado versus não supervisionado para detecção de linguagem ofensiva', 'es': 'UHH-LT en SemEval-2019 Tarea 6: Aprendizaje de transferencia supervisado frente a no supervisado para la detección de lenguaje ofensivo', 'ar': 'UHH-LT في SemEval-2019 المهمة 6: نقل التعلم الخاضع للإشراف مقابل غير الخاضع للإشراف لاكتشاف اللغة الهجومية', 'fr': 'UHH-LT au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: Apprentissage par transfert supervisé et non supervisé pour la détection de langage offensant', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のUHH - LTタスク6 ：不快な言語検出のための監督された転送学習と監督されていない転送学習', 'ru': 'UHH-LT на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Контролируемое и неконтролируемое обучение переносу для обнаружения оскорбительного языка', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 6 पर UHH-LT: पर्यवेक्षित बनाम आक्रामक भाषा का पता लगाने के लिए असुरक्षित स्थानांतरण सीखने', 'zh': 'UHH-LT在SemEval-2019务6:以攻击性言检督无监迁学', 'ga': 'UHH-LT ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Foghlaim Aistrithe Maoirsithe vs. Gan Mhaoirseacht chun Teangacha Ionsaitheach a Bhrath', 'ka': 'UHH-LT semiEval-2019 დავალება 6: დანახვა vs. უფრო მუშაობელი ენერგიის განსახულებისთვის შესწავლება', 'el': 'Εργασία 6: Επίβλεπτη vs. Μη εποπτευόμενη Μάθηση Μεταβίβασης για την Ανίχνευση προσβλητικών γλωσσών', 'hu': 'UHH-LT a SemEval-2019 6. feladat: Felügyelet kontra felügyelet nélküli transzfertanulás a támadó nyelvészleléshez', 'it': 'UHH-LT a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Trasferimento di apprendimento supervisionato contro non supervisionato per il rilevamento offensivo del linguaggio', 'lt': 'UHH-LT 2010 m. pusmečio mėn. 6 užduotis: prižiūrimas ir nenorėtas perkėlimo mokymasis pažeidžiamoms kalboms nustatyti', 'kk': 'UHH- LT жарым- 2019 тапсырмасының 6- тапсырмасы: Бақылау және бақыламаған Тілді анықтау үшін тапсырмаларды оқыту', 'mk': 'UHH-LT на SemEval-2019 задача 6: надгледувано против ненадгледувано префрлање за детекција на навредлив јазик', 'ms': 'UHH-LT pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Dipengawasi vs. Tidak Dipengawasi Belajar Pemindahan untuk Pengesanan Bahasa Tersinggung', 'ml': 'SemEval- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6- ല്\u200d UHH-LT: പരിശോധിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'UHH-LT f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6: Tagħlim ta’ Trasferiment Sorveljat vs. Mhux Sorveljat għad-Detezzjoni ta’ Lingwa Offensiva', 'mn': 'UHH-LT at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Supervised vs. Unsupervised Transfer Learning for Offensive Language Detection', 'no': 'UHH-LT ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 6: Overvåka mot ulike overføringslæring for forskyving av språk', 'pl': 'Zadanie 6: Nauka transferowa nadzorowana vs. nienadzorowana dla wykrywania języka obraźliwego', 'sr': 'UHH-LT na semiEval-2019 zadatak 6: nadzor protiv neodređenog učenja prijenosnih jezika', 'ro': 'UHH-LT la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: Învățarea transferului supravegheată vs. nesupravegheată pentru detectarea limbilor ofensive', 'si': '@ item: inlistbox', 'sv': 'UHH-LT på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: Övervakad vs oövervakad transferinlärning för detektering av kränkande språk', 'so': 'UHH-LT at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Superwatched vs. Unsupervised Transfer Learning for Offensive Language Detection', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி', 'ur': 'UHH-LT at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Supervised vs. Unsupervised Transfer Learning for Offensive Language Detection', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifani 6: Superwatched vs. Unwatched Transfer Learning for Offensive Language Detection', 'vi': 'UHH-LT tại nhiệm vụ SemEvl-209: giám sát chống lại chưa bị giám sát truyền học cho phát hiện rộng ngôn ngữ.', 'bg': 'Задача 6: Наблюдавано срещу неконтролирано трансферно обучение за откриване на офанзивен език', 'da': 'UHH-LT på SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: Overvåget vs. ikke-overvåget overførselslæring til detektering af offensiv sprog', 'nl': 'UHH-LT bij SemEval-2019 Taak 6: Toezicht versus Onbegeleid Transferleren voor Offensieve Taaldetectie', 'hr': 'UHH-LT na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 6: nadzor protiv neodređenog učenja prijenosa za otkrivanje neodređenog jezika', 'id': 'UHH-LT di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: DiSupervise vs. Tidak DiSupervise Transfer Learning for Offensive Language Detection', 'de': 'UHH-LT bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabenstellung 6: Überwachtes vs. unbeaufsichtigtes Transferlernen zur Offensivsprachenerkennung', 'ko': 'UHH-LT가SemEval-2019 퀘스트 6: 공격 언어 검측에 사용되는 감독 및 무감독 이동 학습', 'sw': 'UHH-LT kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 6: Imetolewa dhidi ya UHH-UHH-LT', 'tr': 'UHH-LT at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Supervised vs. Unsuperved Transfer Learning for Offensive Language Detection', 'af': '@ info', 'fa': 'UHH-LT در پایگاه ۲۰۱۹ وظیفه ۶: تحت نظر بر خلاف آموزش انتقال غیرقابل حفاظت برای شناسایی زبان غیرقابل حفاظت', 'hy': 'UHH-LT-ը Halewal-2019 թվականին 6. առաջադրանքն է. վերահսկված համեմատած անվերահսկված փոխանցման սովորելը', 'sq': 'UHH-LT në SemEval-2019 Task 6: Supervised vs. Unsupervised Transfer Learning for Offensive Language Detection', 'am': 'UHH-LT at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Supervised vs. Unsupervised Transfer Learning for Offensive Language Detection', 'az': 'UHH-LT at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Supervised vs. Unsupervised Transfer Learning for Offensive Language Detection', 'bs': 'UHH-LT na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 6: nadzor protiv neodređenog učenja prijenosa za otkrivanje neodređenog jezika', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2019 কাজ 6- এ UHH-LT: সার্ভিভিস বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন ভাষা সনাক্তির জন্য অনভারণভাবে ট্রান্সফারের শিক্ষার্থী', 'cs': 'Úkol 6: Kontrolované vs. nekontrolované přenosové učení pro detekci urážlivého jazyka', 'fi': 'UHH-LT SemEval-2019 -tapahtumassa Tehtﾃ､vﾃ､ 6: Valvottu ja valvomaton siirtooppiminen hyﾃｶkkﾃ､ﾃ､vﾃ､n kielen havaitsemiseen', 'ca': 'UHH-LT a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Supervised vs. Unsupervised Transfer Learning for Offensive Language Detection', 'et': 'UHH-LT SemEval-2019 ülesanne 6: jälgitav vs järelevalveta siirdeõpe ründava keele tuvastamiseks', 'jv': 'UHH-LT at semiinval-2011 task 6: super Vised against. Unupupperused transfer Learning for offensive Language detection', 'ha': '@ info: status', 'he': 'UHH-LT ב SemEval-2019 משימה 6: משגיח נגד ללמוד העברה ללא השגחה', 'sk': 'UHH-LT na SemEval-2019 Naloga 6: Nadzorovano in nenadzorovano učenje prenosa za zaznavanje napadalnih jezikov', 'bo': 'UHH-LT at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Supervised vs. Unsupervised Transfer Learning for Offensive Language Detection'}
{'en': 'We present a neural network based approach of transfer learning for offensive language detection. For our system, we compare two types of knowledge transfer : supervised and unsupervised pre-training. Supervised pre-training of our bidirectional GRU-3-CNN architecture is performed as multi-task learning of parallel training of five different tasks. The selected tasks are supervised classification problems from public NLP resources with some overlap to offensive language such as sentiment detection, emoji classification, and aggressive language classification. Unsupervised transfer learning is performed with a thematic clustering of 40 M unlabeled tweets via LDA. Based on this dataset, pre-training is performed by predicting the main topic of a tweet. Results indicate that unsupervised transfer from large datasets performs slightly better than supervised training on small ‘near target category’ datasets. In the SemEval Task, our system ranks 14 out of 103 participants.', 'ar': 'نقدم نهجًا قائمًا على الشبكة العصبية لنقل التعلم لاكتشاف اللغة الهجومية. بالنسبة لنظامنا ، نقارن نوعين من نقل المعرفة: التدريب المسبق الخاضع للإشراف وغير الخاضع للإشراف. يتم تنفيذ التدريب المسبق الخاضع للإشراف على بنية GRU-3-CNN ثنائية الاتجاه كتعلم متعدد المهام للتدريب الموازي لخمس مهام مختلفة. تخضع المهام المحددة للإشراف لمشاكل التصنيف من موارد البرمجة اللغوية العصبية العامة مع بعض التداخل مع اللغة الهجومية مثل اكتشاف المشاعر وتصنيف الرموز التعبيرية وتصنيف اللغة العدواني. يتم إجراء تعلم النقل غير الخاضع للإشراف من خلال مجموعة موضوعية من 40 مليون تغريدة غير مسماة عبر LDA. بناءً على مجموعة البيانات هذه ، يتم إجراء التدريب المسبق من خلال التنبؤ بالموضوع الرئيسي للتغريدة. تشير النتائج إلى أن النقل غير الخاضع للإشراف من مجموعات البيانات الكبيرة يؤدي بشكل أفضل قليلاً من التدريب الخاضع للإشراف على مجموعات البيانات الصغيرة من "الفئة القريبة من الهدف". في مهمة SemEval ، يصنف نظامنا 14 من أصل 103 مشاركًا.', 'pt': "Apresentamos uma abordagem baseada em rede neural de aprendizado de transferência para detecção de linguagem ofensiva. Para nosso sistema, comparamos dois tipos de transferência de conhecimento: pré-treinamento supervisionado e não supervisionado. O pré-treinamento supervisionado de nossa arquitetura bidirecional GRU-3-CNN é realizado como aprendizado multitarefa de treinamento paralelo de cinco tarefas diferentes. As tarefas selecionadas são problemas de classificação supervisionados de recursos públicos de PNL com alguma sobreposição a linguagem ofensiva, como detecção de sentimento, classificação de emoji e classificação de linguagem agressiva. O aprendizado de transferência não supervisionado é realizado com um agrupamento temático de 40 milhões de tweets não rotulados via LDA. Com base nesse conjunto de dados, o pré-treinamento é realizado prevendo o tópico principal de um tweet. Os resultados indicam que a transferência não supervisionada de grandes conjuntos de dados tem um desempenho ligeiramente melhor do que o treinamento supervisionado em pequenos conjuntos de dados 'próximos à categoria de destino'. Na Tarefa SemEval, nosso sistema está em 14º lugar entre 103 participantes.", 'fr': "Nous présentons une approche basée sur un réseau neuronal d'apprentissage par transfert pour la détection de langage offensant. Pour notre système, nous comparons deux types de transfert de connaissances\xa0: la pré-formation supervisée et la pré-formation non supervisée. La pré-formation supervisée de notre architecture GRU-3-CNN bidirectionnelle est réalisée sous la forme d'un apprentissage multitâche ou d'une formation parallèle de cinq tâches différentes. Les tâches sélectionnées sont des problèmes de classification supervisés provenant de ressources PNL publiques avec un certain chevauchement avec un langage offensant tel que la détection des sentiments, la classification des emoji et la classification de langage agressif. L'apprentissage par transfert non supervisé est effectué avec un regroupement thématique de 40 millions de tweets non étiquetés via LDA. Sur la base de cet ensemble de données, la pré-formation est réalisée en prédisant le sujet principal d'un tweet. Les résultats indiquent que le transfert non supervisé à partir de grands ensembles de données est légèrement plus performant que la formation supervisée sur de petits ensembles de données de «\xa0catégorie proche de la cible\xa0» Dans la tâche SemEval, notre système classe 14e sur 103 participants.", 'es': 'Presentamos un enfoque basado en redes neuronales de aprendizaje por transferencia para la detección de lenguaje ofensivo. Para nuestro sistema, comparamos dos tipos de transferencia de conocimiento: preentrenamiento supervisado y no supervisado. La capacitación previa supervisada de nuestra arquitectura GRU-3-CNN bidireccional se realiza como aprendizaje multitarea de capacitación paralela de cinco tareas diferentes. Las tareas seleccionadas son problemas de clasificación supervisados de los recursos públicos de PNL con cierta superposición con el lenguaje ofensivo, como la detección de sentimientos, la clasificación de emojis y la clasificación agresiva del lenguaje. El aprendizaje por transferencia no supervisado se realiza con un agrupamiento temático de 40 millones de tuits sin etiqueta a través de LDA. Sobre la base de este conjunto de datos, la capacitación previa se realiza mediante la predicción del tema principal de un tuit. Los resultados indican que la transferencia no supervisada desde grandes conjuntos de datos funciona ligeramente mejor que la capacitación supervisada en pequeños conjuntos de datos de «categoría cercana al objetivo». En la tarea SemEval, nuestro sistema clasifica a 14 de 103 participantes.', 'ja': '私たちは、不快な言語検出のための転送学習のニューラルネットワークベースのアプローチを提示します。当社のシステムでは、2種類の知識移転を比較しています。監督付きと監督なしの事前トレーニングです。双方向GRU -3 - CNNアーキテクチャの監督された事前トレーニングは、5つの異なるタスクの並行トレーニングのマルチタスク学習として実行されます。選択されたタスクは、公共のNLPリソースからセンチメント検出、絵文字分類、積極的な言語分類などの不快な言語まで、監督された分類問題です。監督されていない転送学習は、LDAを介して40 Mのラベル付けされていないツイートのテーマクラスタリングで実行されます。このデータセットに基づいて、事前トレーニングは、ツイートのメイントピックを予測することによって実行されます。結果は、大規模なデータセットからの無監督トランスファーは、小規模な「ターゲットカテゴリーに近い」データセットでの監督トレーニングよりもわずかに優れていることを示しています。SemEvalタスクでは、当社のシステムは103人の参加者のうち14人をランク付けします。', 'zh': '建一神经网络之迁学,以攻击性言检。 于我之统,我较二体:有监无监。 吾双向 GRU-3-CNN 架构之监预训练,并练五务者多任务学而行之。 所选自公共NLP资源督类,与情检之,表情符号类与攻击性言类等冒犯性语有重叠。 无监徙学者,因LDA4000万条之未标者推文主聚类也。 基于此数集,推文主行预训练。 结果表明大集者无监传输小者有近集上者无监。 在SemEval之任,系于103名参与者中排名第14位。', 'ru': 'Представлен нейросетевой подход к трансферному обучению для обнаружения оскорбительного языка. Для нашей системы мы сравниваем два типа передачи знаний: контролируемое и неконтролируемое предварительное обучение. Контролируемое предварительное обучение нашей двунаправленной архитектуры GRU-3-CNN выполняется как многозадачное обучение параллельному обучению пяти различных задач. Выбранные задачи представляют собой контролируемые проблемы классификации из публичных ресурсов NLP с некоторым перекрытием с оскорбительным языком, таким как обнаружение настроений, классификация эмодзи и агрессивная классификация языка. Обучение с неконтролируемой передачей выполняется с помощью тематической кластеризации 40-МЕТРОВЫХ немеченных твитов через LDA. Основываясь на этом наборе данных, предварительное обучение выполняется путем прогнозирования основной темы твита. Результаты показывают, что неконтролируемая передача из больших наборов данных дает несколько лучшие результаты, чем контролируемая подготовка по малым наборам данных "ближней целевой категории". В задании SemEval наша система занимает 14 место из 103 участников.', 'hi': "हम आक्रामक भाषा का पता लगाने के लिए स्थानांतरण सीखने का एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आधारित दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हमारे सिस्टम के लिए, हम दो प्रकार के ज्ञान हस्तांतरण की तुलना करते हैं: पर्यवेक्षित और असुरक्षित पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण। हमारे द्विदिश GRU-3-CNN वास्तुकला के पर्यवेक्षित पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण को पांच अलग-अलग कार्यों के समानांतर प्रशिक्षण के बहु-कार्य सीखने के रूप में किया जाता है। चयनित कार्यों को सार्वजनिक एनएलपी संसाधनों से पर्यवेक्षित वर्गीकरण समस्याओं के साथ कुछ ओवरलैप के साथ आक्रामक भाषा जैसे भावना का पता लगाने, इमोजी वर्गीकरण और आक्रामक भाषा वर्गीकरण के लिए पर्यवेक्षण किया जाता है। असुरक्षित स्थानांतरण सीखने LDA के माध्यम से 40M unlabled tweets के एक विषयगत clustering के साथ किया जाता है। इस डेटासेट के आधार पर, पूर्व-प्रशिक्षण एक ट्वीट के मुख्य विषय की भविष्यवाणी करके किया जाता है। परिणामों से संकेत मिलता है कि बड़े डेटासेट से असुरक्षित स्थानांतरण छोटे 'निकट लक्ष्य श्रेणी' डेटासेट पर पर्यवेक्षित प्रशिक्षण की तुलना में थोड़ा बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है। SemEval कार्य में, हमारी प्रणाली 103 प्रतिभागियों में से 14 रैंक करती है।", 'ga': "Cuirimid i láthair cur chuige líonra néarbhunaithe um fhoghlaim aistrithe chun teanga maslach a bhrath. Maidir lenár gcóras, déanaimid comparáid idir dhá chineál aistrithe eolais: réamhoiliúint faoi mhaoirseacht agus gan mhaoirseacht. Déantar réamhoiliúint faoi mhaoirseacht ar ár n-ailtireacht dhéthreorach GRU-3-CNN mar fhoghlaim ilthasc ar oiliúint chomhthreomhar cúig thasc dhifriúla. Is iad na tascanna roghnaithe fadhbanna aicmithe maoirsithe ó acmhainní poiblí NLP le roinnt forluí go teanga maslach ar nós braite meon, aicmiú emoji, agus aicmiú ionsaitheach teanga. Déantar foghlaim aistrithe gan mhaoirseacht le cnuasach téamach de 40M tweets gan lipéad trí LDA. Bunaithe ar an tacar sonraí seo, déantar réamhoiliúint trí phríomhábhar tweet a thuar. Tugann na torthaí le fios go bhfeidhmíonn aistriú neamh-mhaoirsithe ó thacair shonraí mhóra beagán níos fearr ná oiliúint maoirsithe ar thacair sonraí beaga `gar-chatagóirí'. Sa Tasc SemEval, tá ár gcóras 14 as 103 rannpháirtí.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ნეიროლური ქსელის გადავიტანოთ ტრანსტრინტის სწავლების განახლებისთვის. ჩვენი სისტემისთვის, ჩვენ ორი ტიპის მეცნიერების გადასრულება: დანარწმუნებული და არ გადასრულებული წინ გასრულება. ჩვენი ბედირექციონალური GRU-3-CNN არქტიქტურის პრეტრექციური განათლება გავაკეთებულია, როგორც ხუთი განსხვავებული საქმედების პარალელური განათლების მრავალური დასწავლება. მონიშნული დავალებები დაახლოებით კლასიფიკაციის პრობლემები პრობლემები სახელსაწინო NLP რესურსებიდან, რომელიც სენტიმენტის განახლობა, ემოჯი კლასიფიკაცია და ადგრესიური ენის კლასიფი არაფერიზებული ტრანსპერტის სწავლება LDA-ის გამოყენებაში 40M არაფერიზებული ტრანსპერტის კლასტერებით გავაკეთება. ამ მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის ბაზაზე, საწინასწარმოდგენება გავაკეთება, რომელიც tweet-ის მნიშვნელოვანი თემა. შედეგი მონაცემები იცის, რომ დიდი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის გარეშე უფრო უკეთესია, ვიდრე მარტივი მონაცემების გარეშე მონაცემების გარეშე. ჩვენი სისტემის სამუშაო დავაკეთებაში, სამუშაო დავაკეთება 14-იან 103-იან მოთავსებელი.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση εκμάθησης μεταφοράς με βάση το νευρωνικό δίκτυο για την ανίχνευση προσβλητικών γλωσσών. Για το σύστημά μας, συγκρίνουμε δύο τύπους μεταφοράς γνώσεων: την εποπτευόμενη και την απροετοίμακτη προεκπαίδευση. Η εποπτευόμενη προεκπαίδευση της αμφίδρομης αρχιτεκτονικής μας πραγματοποιείται ως εκμάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών παράλληλης εκπαίδευσης πέντε διαφορετικών εργασιών. Οι επιλεγμένες εργασίες είναι εποπτευμένα προβλήματα ταξινόμησης από δημόσιους πόρους με κάποια επικάλυψη σε προσβλητική γλώσσα, όπως ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων, ταξινόμηση και επιθετική ταξινόμηση γλωσσών. Η μη εποπτευόμενη μάθηση μεταφοράς πραγματοποιείται με μια θεματική ομαδοποίηση 40Μ χωρίς ετικέτα tweets μέσω LDA. Με βάση αυτό το σύνολο δεδομένων, η προεκπαίδευση πραγματοποιείται με την πρόβλεψη του κύριου θέματος ενός tweet. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η μη εποπτευόμενη μεταφορά από μεγάλα σύνολα δεδομένων αποδίδει ελαφρώς καλύτερη από την εποπτευόμενη εκπαίδευση σε μικρά σύνολα δεδομένων "κοντά στην κατηγορία στόχου". Στο έργο SemEval, το σύστημά μας κατατάσσεται 14 από τους 103 συμμετέχοντες.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a transzfertanulás ideghálózati alapú megközelítését a sértő nyelvfelismeréshez. Rendszerünkhöz kétféle tudásátadást hasonlítunk össze: felügyelt és felügyelet nélküli előképzést. A kétirányú GRU-3-CNN architektúránk felügyelt előképzése öt különböző feladat párhuzamos képzésének többfeladatos tanulásaként történik. A kiválasztott feladatok a nyilvános NLP erőforrásokból származó felügyelt osztályozási problémák, amelyek bizonyos átfedéseket mutatnak a sértő nyelvekre, mint például a hangulatfelismerés, az emoji osztályozás és az agresszív nyelvi osztályozás. A felügyelet nélküli transzfertanulás 40 millió címke nélküli tweet tematikus klaszterezésével történik LDA-n keresztül. Ezen adatok alapján az előképzést a tweet fő témájának előrejelzésével végezzük. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a nagyméretű adatkészletekből történő felügyelet nélküli továbbítás valamivel jobban teljesít, mint a kis "célkategória közeli" adatkészleteken végzett felügyelet nélküli képzés. A SemEval feladatban a 103 résztvevő közül 14-et rangsorolunk.', 'it': 'Presentiamo un approccio basato sulla rete neurale di apprendimento del trasferimento per il rilevamento offensivo del linguaggio. Per il nostro sistema, confrontiamo due tipi di trasferimento di conoscenze: pre-formazione supervisionata e non supervisionata. La pre-formazione supervisionata della nostra architettura bidirezionale GRU-3-CNN viene eseguita come apprendimento multi-task di formazione parallela di cinque diversi compiti. I compiti selezionati sono problemi di classificazione supervisionati da risorse pubbliche NLP con alcune sovrapposizioni a linguaggio offensivo come il rilevamento dei sentimenti, la classificazione emoji e la classificazione aggressiva del linguaggio. L\'apprendimento di trasferimento non supervisionato viene eseguito con un cluster tematico di 40 milioni di tweet senza etichetta tramite LDA. Sulla base di questo set di dati, il pre-training viene eseguito predicendo l\'argomento principale di un tweet. I risultati indicano che il trasferimento non supervisionato da set di dati di grandi dimensioni ha prestazioni leggermente migliori rispetto all\'addestramento supervisionato su set di dati di piccole dimensioni "vicino alla categoria target". Nel SemEval Task, il nostro sistema classifica 14 partecipanti su 103.', 'kk': 'Тілді анықтау үшін аудару үйренудің негізгі неврал желіне негізделген тәртібін таңдаймыз. Біздің жүйеміз үшін екі түрлі білім аударуын салыстырып тұрмыз: бақылау және өзгертілмеген алдыңғы оқыту. Біздің бидирекциялық GRU-3-CNN архитектурасының алдындағы бақылау алдындағы бес әртүрлі тапсырмалардың параллель оқытуын бірнеше тапсырмаларды оқыту үшін орындалады. Таңдалған тапсырмалар NLP ресурстарының көпшілігінен басқару мәселелерін қарастырылады, мысалы, сезімдерді табу, эмодж классификациясы және агрессивні тіл классификациясына қарап тұрады. Қолданбаған аудару үйренімі LDA арқылы 40M арқылы келтірілмеген tweets кластері арқылы орындалады. Бұл деректер жиының негізгі нақышын таңдау үшін алдын- ала оқыту орындалады. Нәтижелер үлкен деректер қорларының көмегімен ауыстырылмаған ауыстыруларының "мақсат санатының жақын" деректер қорларында бақылау тәжірибесінен артық жұмыс істейді. Біздің жүйеіміз 103 қатысушылардан 14 деп жазылады.', 'mk': "Презентираме пристап базиран на нервна мрежа на трансферентно учење за детекција на навредлив јазик. За нашиот систем, споредуваме два вида на пренесување на знаење: надгледуван и ненадгледуван предобука. Набљудуваната предобука на нашата дворечна архитектура GRU-3-CNN се извршува како мултизадачно учење на паралелна обука на пет различни задачи. Избраните задачи се надгледувани проблеми со класификацијата од јавните ресурси на НЛП со некои прекривање на офанзивниот јазик како што се детективирање на чувствата, класификација на емоџи и агресивна класификација на јазикот. Ненадгледувано учење за трансфер се извршува со тематски групирање на 40M неозначени твитови преку ЛДА. На основа на овој податок, предобуката се извршува со предвидување на главната тема на твитот. Results indicate that unsupervised transfer from large datasets performs slightly better than supervised training on small `near target category' datasets.  Во SemEval Task, нашиот систем се рангира 14 од 103 учесници.", 'ms': "Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan rangkaian saraf berdasarkan pemindahan belajar untuk pengesan bahasa yang menyerang. Untuk sistem kita, kita membandingkan dua jenis pemindahan pengetahuan: Latihan awal yang diawasi dan tidak diawasi. Latihan awal di atas arkitektur GRU-3-CNN bidireksi kita dilakukan sebagai pembelajaran multi-tugas latihan selari lima tugas yang berbeza. Tugas yang dipilih adalah masalah kelasukan yang diawasi dari sumber NLP awam dengan beberapa saling bertindak ke bahasa serangan seperti pengesan perasaan, kelasukan emoji, dan kelasukan bahasa agresif. Pembelajaran pemindahan yang tidak dikendalikan dilakukan dengan kumpulan tematik tweet 40M tanpa tanda melalui LDA. Berdasarkan set data ini, praselatihan dilakukan dengan meramalkan topik utama tweet. Results indicate that unsupervised transfer from large datasets performs slightly better than supervised training on small `near target category' datasets.  Dalam SemEval Task, sistem kami berturut 14 daripada 103 peserta.", 'lt': 'Mes pristatome nerviniu tinklu pagrįstą metodą, kaip perkelti mokymąsi offensiniam kalbų aptikimui. For our system, we compare two types of knowledge transfer: supervised and unsupervised pre-training.  Priežiūrėtas mūsų dvikryptinės GRU-3-CNN architektūros išankstinis mokymas atliekamas kaip kelių užduočių mokymas lygiagrečiame penkių skirtingų užduočių mokyme. Atrinktos užduotys yra prižiūrimos klasifikavimo problemos, susijusios su viešaisiais NLP ištekliais, kai kurios sutampa su pažeidžiama kalba, pavyzdžiui, jausmų aptikimas, emodžių klasifikavimas ir agresyvus kalbų klasifikavimas. Unsupervised transfer learning is performed with a thematic clustering of 40M unlabeled tweets via LDA.  Remiantis šiuo duomenų rinkiniu, parengiamasis mokymas atliekamas numatant pagrindinę tweeto temą. Rezultatai rodo, kad nepastebimas didelių duomenų rinkinių perdavimas šiek tiek geresnis nei prižiūrimas mokymas mažų „artimos tikslinės kategorijos“ duomenų rinkinių atžvilgiu. SemEval užduotyje mūsų sistema sudaro 14 iš 103 dalyvių.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw approċċ ibbażat fuq in-netwerk newrali tat-tagħlim tat-trasferiment għall-individwazzjoni tal-lingwi offensivi. Għas-sistema tagħna, aħna nqabblu żewġ tipi ta’ trasferiment ta’ għarfien: taħriġ minn qabel sorveljat u mhux sorveljat. It-taħriġ minn qabel superviż tal-arkitettura bidirezzjonali tagħna GRU-3-CNN jitwettaq bħala tagħlim multikompitu ta’ taħriġ parallel ta’ ħames kompiti differenti. Il-kompiti magħżula huma problemi ta’ klassifikazzjoni sorveljati mir-riżorsi pubbliċi tal-NLP b’xi sovrappożizzjoni għal lingwa offensiva bħall-individwazzjoni tas-sentimenti, il-klassifikazzjoni tal-emoji, u l-klassifikazzjoni aggressiva tal-lingwa. It-tagħlim tat-trasferiment mhux sorveljat isir b’raggruppament tematiku ta’ tweets ta’ 40M mingħajr tikketta permezz tal-LDA. Abbażi ta’ dan is-sett ta’ dejta, it-taħriġ minn qabel isir billi jitbassar is-suġġett ewlieni ta’ tweet. Ir-riżultati jindikaw li trasferiment mhux sorveljat minn settijiet kbar ta’ dejta jwettaq ftit aħjar minn taħriġ sorveljat fuq settijiet żgħar ta’ dejta “qrib il-kategorija fil-mira”. Fil-Kompitu SemEval, is-sistema tagħna tikklassifika 14 minn 103 parteċipant.', 'mn': 'Бид мэдрэлийн сүлжээний сургалтын сургалтын сургалтын үндсэн арга зам илтгэдэг. Бидний системийн хувьд бид хоёр төрлийн мэдлэг шилжүүлэлтийг харьцуулж байна: удирдаж, харьцуулагддаггүй урд сургалт. Груу-3-CNN архитектурын хоёр дахь сургалтын өмнө багш суралцах нь 5 өөр ажлын параллел сургалтын олон ажлын сургалтыг хийгддэг. Шинэ сонгогдсон үйл ажиллагаанууд нь нийтийн NLP баялагуудын хэлбэрээс хамаарч, сэтгэл хөдлөл, эможи хэлбэрээр, агрессийн хэл хэлбэрээр давхарагдаж байдаг. Дэлхийн тусламжгүй шилжүүлэлт суралцах нь LDA-ын хувьд 40М бичигдэггүй tweets-тай холбоотой. Энэ өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээс үндсэн, өмнөх сургалт нь tweet-ын гол сэдвийг таамаглаж байдаг. Үүний үр дүнд том өгөгдлийн сангийн шилжүүлэлтийг бага зэрэг удирдагдсан сургалтын бага зэрэг сайн хийдэг гэдгийг харуулдаг. SemEval Task-д бидний систем 103 оролцогчдын 14 дүрс орж байна.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein neuralnettverk basert tilnærming til å læra overføringar for offensiv språk. For systemet vårt sammenliknar vi to typar kunnskap overføring: oversikt og ikkje oppretta føreøving. Overvakt føreøving av vår bidireksjonal GRU-3-CNN-arkitektur er utført som fleire oppgåver læring av parallelle øving av fem ulike oppgåver. Den valde oppgåva er oversikt over klassifikasjonsproblemene frå offentlige NLP-ressursar med nokre overlapp til offensiv språk, som sentimentoppdaging, emoji-klassifikasjon og aggressiv språkkklassifikasjon. Ulæring av overføringar er utført med eit tematisk klassering av 40M- ubeabelte tweeter via LDA. Basert på denne dataset, vert føreøvinga utført ved å foregå hovudemnet på ein tweet. Resultater tyder på at ukjende overføring frå store datasett utfører litt bedre enn overvåkinga på små datasett «nær målkategori». I semiEval-oppgåva rankerer systemet vårt 14 av 103 deltakarar.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു അക്രമമായ ഭാഷ കണ്ടെത്താന നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്, നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു തരം അറിവ് മാറ്റുന്നതിനെ താല്\u200dപ്പര്യമാക്കുന്നു: നമ്മുടെ ബിഡിറ്റര്\u200dനെക്ഷന്\u200d ജിറുയി-3-സിനെന്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിന്റെ മുന്\u200dപ് പരിശീലനം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അഞ്ചു വ്യത തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത ജോലികള്\u200d പൊതു NLP വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടുന്നുണ്ട്. വികാരം കണ്ടെത്തു നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് LDA മുഖാന്തരം 40M ലേബെല്\u200dഡ് ചെയ്ത ടൂട്ടുകളുടെ സ്ഥിതികമായ ഒര ഈ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിനെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു ടൂട്ടിയുടെ പ്രധാന വിഷയം പ്രവചിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d പ പരിശീലനം കാണിക്കുന്നത് വലിയ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും സൂക്ഷിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d ചെറിയ `ലക്ഷ്യം വിഭാഗത്തില സെമ്എവാല്\u200d ജോലിയില്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d 103 പങ്കാളികളില്\u200d നിന്ന് 14 നില്\u200dക്കുന്നു.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy podejście do nauki transferowej oparte na sieci neuronowej w celu wykrywania obraźliwego języka. Dla naszego systemu porównujemy dwa rodzaje transferu wiedzy: nadzorowane i bez nadzoru przedszkolenia. Nadzorowane szkolenie wstępne naszej dwukierunkowej architektury GRU-3-CNN odbywa się jako wielozadaniowe uczenie się równoległego szkolenia pięciu różnych zadań. Wybrane zadania to nadzorowane problemy klasyfikacji z publicznych zasobów NLP z pewnym nakładaniem się na obraźliwy język, taki jak wykrywanie sentymentów, klasyfikacja emoji i agresywna klasyfikacja językowa. Uczenie się transferu nienadzorowanego odbywa się przy użyciu klastrowania tematycznego 40M nieoznakowanych tweetów za pośrednictwem LDA. Na podstawie tego zbioru danych przedszkolenie odbywa się poprzez przewidywanie głównego tematu tweeta. Wyniki wskazują, że bez nadzoru transfer z dużych zbiorów danych wynika nieco lepiej niż nadzorowane szkolenia na małych zbiorach danych "bliskiej kategorii docelowej". W zadaniu SemEval nasz system znajduje się czternastu spośród 103 uczestników.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm o abordare bazată pe rețea neurală a învățării transferului pentru detectarea limbajului ofensator. Pentru sistemul nostru, comparăm două tipuri de transfer de cunoștințe: pregătirea supravegheată și cea nesupravegheată. Pregătirea supravegheată a arhitecturii noastre bidirecționale GRU-3-CNN se realizează ca învățare multi-task a pregătirii paralele a cinci sarcini diferite. Sarcinile selectate sunt probleme de clasificare supravegheate din resursele publice PNL cu unele suprapuneri la limbaj ofensator, cum ar fi detectarea sentimentelor, clasificarea emoji și clasificarea limbajului agresiv. Învățarea transferului nesupravegheată se realizează cu o grupare tematică de 40 milioane de tweet-uri fără etichete prin LDA. Pe baza acestui set de date, pregătirea se realizează prin prezicerea subiectului principal al unui tweet. Rezultatele indică faptul că transferul nesupravegheat de la seturi mari de date performează puțin mai bine decât instruirea supravegheată pe seturi mici de date "aproape de categoria țintă". În sarcina SemEval, sistemul nostru clasează 14 din 103 participanți.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo neuralnu mrežu bazirani pristup učenja prijenosa za detekciju ofanzivnog jezika. Za naš sistem uspoređujemo dve vrste prebacivanja znanja: nadzorna i neodređena predobuka. Nadzorna predobuka naše dvodirektivne arhitekture GRU-3-CNN provedena je kao multizadatačko učenje paralelne obuke pet različitih zadataka. Izabrani zadatak nadgledaju klasifikacijske probleme iz javnih NLP resursa sa nekim preoklapanjem na ofanzivni jezik kao što su detektiva sentimenta, klasifikacija emoji i agresivna klasifikacija jezika. Neodređeno učenje prijenosa izvršeno je sa tematskim skupljanjem 40M nezabeliranih tweeta putem LDA. Na osnovu ovog seta podataka, predobuka se izvršava predviđanjem glavne teme tweet a. Rezultati ukazuju na to da nepotrebni prijenos iz velikih podataka izvršava malo bolje od nadzorne obuke na malim podatakama "blizu ciljne kategorije". U polovičnom zadatku, naš sistem rankira 14 od 103 sudionika.', 'so': 'Waxaynu keennaa shabakadda neurada ah oo ku saleysan qaab u bedelka barashada aqoonta luqada cadaawayaasha ah. For our system, we compare two types of knowledge transfer: supervised and unsupervised pre-training.  Arkitirka GRU-3-CNN waxaa loo sameeyaa waxbarasho badan oo la barto barbaarinta lambarka ah shan shaqo oo kala duduwan. Shaqooyinka la doortay waxaa lagu ilaaliyaa dhibaatooyin fasax ah oo laga helaa 资源 guud ee NLP, kuwaas oo ku qoran luqada caafimaadka, tusaale ahaan aqoonsiga xisaabta, fasaxa emoji iyo fasaxa luuqada xadgudubka ah. Waxbarashada aan la ilaalinayn waxaa lagu sameeyaa taariikhda ah oo ku qoran 40M oo aan la labeyn karo qoraalka LDA. Sida lagu saleynayo sawirkan macluumaadka, waxbarashada horumarinta waxaa lagu sameeyaa warqada ugu weyn ee Tweet. Xilliyadu waxay ka muuqataa in wareejinta aan la ilaalinayn laga sameeyo macluumaad badan wax ka wanaagsan waxbarasho la ilaaliyo oo ku qoran kooxda macluumaadka ku dhow Shaqooyinka SemEval waxaa nidaamkayaga ka mid ah 14 kuwa ka qayb gala 103.', 'si': 'අපි අපරාධ භාෂාව හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් සිදුවීමේ න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලයේ අධාරිත ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප අපේ පද්ධතිය සඳහා, අපි දන්න ප්\u200dරකාරයක් දෙකක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා: පරීක්ෂණා කරලා නැති විදිහට පුරාවර්ථ අපේ බිදිරික්ෂණික GRU-3-CNN ස්ථාපනයේ ප්\u200dරධානයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ වෙනස් වෙනස් වැඩක් පහක් සමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරධාන තෝරාගෙන හැකි වැඩක් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ සාමාජික NLP ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ සමහර විශ්වා අපරික්ෂාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් ඉගෙනගන්න බැරි වෙනුවෙන් ඉගෙනගන්නේ තේමාත්මක ක්\u200dලාස්ටර් එක්ක 40M විදිහට LDA මේ දත්ත සූදානයට අධිරූපය, ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ට්විට් එකේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අනතුරු කරනවා. ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ ලොකු දත්ත සෙට්ටුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නැති ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක සේම්වල් වැඩේ අපේ පද්ධතිය පද්ධතියේ අංශිකාරියෝ 103 නිසා 14ක් තියෙනවා.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett neuralt nätverksbaserat tillvägagångssätt för överföring lärande för stötande språkdetektering. För vårt system jämför vi två typer av kunskapsöverföring: övervakad och obevakad fortbildning. Övervakad fortbildning av vår tvåriktade GRU-3-CNN-arkitektur utförs som multi-task lärande av parallell träning av fem olika uppgifter. De valda uppgifterna är övervakade klassificeringsproblem från offentliga NLP-resurser med viss överlappning till stötande språk såsom sentimentdetektering, emojiklassificering och aggressiv språkklassificering. Icke övervakad överföring lärande utförs med en tematisk klustring av 40 miljoner icke märkta tweets via LDA. Baserat på denna dataset utförs pre-training genom att förutsäga huvudämnet i en tweet. Resultaten indikerar att oövervakad överföring från stora datauppsättningar presterar något bättre än övervakad utbildning på små datauppsättningar nära målkategori. I SemEval Task rankar vårt system 14 av 103 deltagare.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் அடிப்படையில் கற்றுக்கொள்ள முறையை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் மொழி கண்டுபிடி எங்கள் கணினி எங்கள் ஒப்பிடும் GRU-3-CNN கட்டுப்பாட்டின் முன் பயிற்சி செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டது ஐந்து வேறு வேறு பணிகளுக்கு இணைய பயிற்சியை பல பணி கற்று தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட பணிகள் பொது NLP மூலங்களிலிருந்து வகைப்படுத்தல் பிரச்சினைகளை கண்காணிக்கப்படுகின்றன, உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பு, உணர Unsupervised transfer learning is performed with a thematic clustering of 40M unlabeled tweets via LDA.  இந்த தரவுத்தளத்தை அடிப்படையில், முன் பயிற்சி ஒரு முக்கிய தலைப்பை முன்னோட்டம் செய்யப்படுகிறது. @ info SemEval பணியில், எங்கள் அமைப்பு 103 ல் 14 பங்கீடாளர்கள்.', 'ur': "ہم ایک نئورل نیٹ ورک کی بنیادی طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں جن کی تلاوت کی تلاوت کی تلاوت کی ہے۔ ہمارے سیستم کے لئے ہم دو طرح علم ترافیس کے مطابق مقایسہ کرتے ہیں: تحقیق کی اور غیر تحقیق کی آموزش کی۔ ہمارے بیڈیریٹریکیشن GRU-3-CNN معماری کی پیش آموزش کی تعلیم پانچ مختلف کاموں کے مشابل آموزش کی تعلیم کے مطابق بہت سے کام کی جاتی ہے۔ انتخاب کئے ہوئے تابعیں NLP منبع سے کلاسیفوں کے مسئلہ پر نظر آئے ہیں جن کے ساتھ بعض فساد کی زبان کی طرف متصل ہوتے ہیں جیسے احساسات شناسایی، emoji کلاسیفوں، اور گرسنگی زبان کلاسیفوں. غیر قابل تحویل کی تعلیم LDA کے ذریعہ 40M ناپذیر ٹیوٹ کی تئمیٹی کلسٹر کے ساتھ کیا جاتا ہے. اس ڈیٹ سٹ پر بنیاد ہے، ایک ٹویٹ کی اصلی موضوع کی پیش آموزش کے ذریعہ عمل کی جاتی ہے. نتیجے نشان دیتے ہیں کہ بڑے ڈیٹ سٹ سے غیر قابل ترنسفور کم اچھے کام کرتا ہے چھوٹے `نزدیک مالک کاٹی' ڈیٹ سٹ پر زیادہ تحقیق کی تطارین سے بہتر. ہم سیسٹم 103 شرکت کرنے والوں میں سے 14 درجے ہیں.", 'uz': "Biz bir neyrolik tarmoqni o'rganish tilni o'rganish uchun o'rganishga asosiy tarmoq qilamiz. For our system, we compare two types of knowledge transfer: supervised and unsupervised pre-training.  Bizning ikkinchi GRU-3-CNN architektorimizning bir necha vazifa o'rganish uchun bir necha vazifa o'rganishni bajaradi. @ info Koʻrib chiqarilmagan tarjima o'rganish LDA orqali 40M notoʻgʻri xabarlar bilan ishlab chiqaradi. @ info: whatsthis @ info SemEval vazifasida bizning tizimmiz 103 participants 14 dan foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp truyền tải dựa trên mạng thần kinh để phát hiện ngôn ngữ tấn công. Đối với hệ thống, chúng tôi so sánh hai loại chuyển tri thức: giám sát và không giám sát khóa huấn luyện. Giám sát việc huấn luyện tiền tuyến hai phương trình cấu trúc GRU-3-CNN của chúng tôi được thực hiện để học nhiều nhiệm vụ về khóa huấn luyện song song song với năm nhiệm vụ khác nhau. Những nhiệm vụ được chọn là vấn đề mật khẩu được giám sát bởi nguồn tài nguyên chính của ngôn ngữ quốc gia, với một số sự chồng chéo với ngôn ngữ tấn công như đa cảm, phân loại biểu biểu cảm, và mật độ ngôn ngữ hung hăng. Không giám sát việc học chuyển nhượng được thực hiện với một tập hợp các tweet chủ đề 40M. Dựa trên bộ dữ liệu này, tiền đào tạo được thực hiện bằng cách dự đoán chủ đề chính của tweet. Kết quả cho thấy việc chuyển nhượng không giám sát từ các bộ dữ liệu lớn hiệu quả tốt hơn việc huấn luyện giám sát trên các tập tin nhỏ « gần mục tiêu ». Trong Nhiệm vụ Tinh dịch, hệ thống của chúng ta xếp hàng 44 trên 103.', 'nl': "We presenteren een neuraal netwerk gebaseerde benadering van transfer learning voor aanvallende taaldetectie. Voor ons systeem vergelijken we twee soorten kennisoverdracht: begeleide en onbeheerde pre-training. De begeleide pre-training van onze bidirectionele GRU-3-CNN architectuur wordt uitgevoerd als multi-task leren van parallelle training van vijf verschillende taken. De geselecteerde taken zijn begeleide classificatieproblemen van openbare NLP-bronnen met enige overlapping tot aanstootgevende taal, zoals sentimentdetectie, emoji-classificatie en agressieve taalclassificatie. Onbegeleid transfer learning wordt uitgevoerd met een thematische clustering van 40M ongelabelde tweets via LDA. Op basis van deze dataset wordt pre-training uitgevoerd door het hoofdonderwerp van een tweet te voorspellen. De resultaten wijzen erop dat onbeheerde overdracht van grote datasets iets beter presteert dan begeleide training op kleine datasets 'near target category'. In de SemEval Task rangschikt ons systeem 14 van 103 deelnemers.", 'bg': 'Представяме невронно базиран подход за трансферно обучение за откриване на офанзивен език. За нашата система сравняваме два вида трансфер на знания: надзорно и без надзор предварително обучение. Надзореното предварително обучение на нашата двупосочна архитектура се извършва като мултизадачно обучение на паралелно обучение на пет различни задачи. Избраните задачи са надзорни проблеми с класификацията от публични ресурси на НЛП с известно припокриване с обиден език като откриване на сентименти, класификация на емоджи и агресивна езикова класификация. Неконтролираното трансферно обучение се извършва с тематично клъстериране от 40 милиона немаркирани туитове чрез ЛД. Въз основа на този набор от данни предварителното обучение се извършва чрез прогнозиране на основната тема на туит. Резултатите показват, че прехвърлянето без надзор от големи набори от данни е малко по-добро от обучението под надзор върху малки набори от данни "близка целева категория". В задачата нашата система се класира на 14 от 103 участници.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en neural netværksbaseret tilgang til overførselsindlæring til offensiv sprogdetektion. For vores system sammenligner vi to typer vidensoverførsel: overvåget og uden opsyn forudgående træning. Overvåget foruddannelse af vores bidirektionelle GRU-3-CNN arkitektur udføres som multi-task læring af parallel træning af fem forskellige opgaver. De valgte opgaver er overvågede klassifikationsproblemer fra offentlige NLP-ressourcer med nogle overlapninger til stødende sprog såsom sentiment detektion, emoji klassificering og aggressiv sprogklassificering. Uovervåget overførselslæring udføres med en tematisk klynge af 40 millioner uafhængige tweets via LDA. Baseret på dette datasæt udføres forudtræning ved at forudsige hovedemnet i en tweet. Resultaterne indikerer, at uautoriseret overførsel fra store datasæt klarer sig lidt bedre end overvåget træning på små datasæt "nær målkategori". I SemEval Task rangerer vores system 14 ud af 103 deltagere.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo neuralnu mrežu bazirani pristup učenja prijenosa za otkrivanje ofanzivnog jezika. Za naš sustav uspoređujemo dvije vrste prijenosa znanja: nadzorna i neodržana predobuka. Nadzorena predobuka naše dvodirektivne arhitekture GRU-3-CNN provedena je kao multizadatačko učenje paralelne obuke pet različitih zadataka. Izabrani zadatak nadziraju klasifikacijske probleme iz javnih NLP resursa s nekim preklapanjem na ofanzivni jezik poput otkrivanja osjećaja, klasifikacije emoji i agresivne klasifikacije jezika. Nepotrebno učenje prijenosa izvršeno je s tematskim skupljanjem 40M nezabeliranih tweets putem LDA-a. Na temelju ovog seta podataka, predobuka se provede predviđanjem glavne teme tweet a. Rezultati ukazuju na to da nepotrebni prijenos iz velikih podataka čini malo bolje od nadzornog treninga na malim podatakama "blizu ciljne kategorije". U semiEval zadatku, naš sustav čini 14 od 103 učesnika.', 'id': "Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan jaringan saraf berdasarkan transfer belajar untuk deteksi bahasa yang menyerang. Untuk sistem kita, kita membandingkan dua jenis transfer pengetahuan: diawasi dan tidak diawasi prapelatihan. Supervised pre-training of our bidirectional GRU-3-CNN architecture is performed as multi-task learning of parallel training of five different tasks.  Tugas yang dipilih adalah masalah klasifikasi yang diawasi dari sumber daya publik NLP dengan beberapa saling bertindak ke bahasa offensive seperti deteksi sentimen, klasifikasi emoji, dan klasifikasi bahasa agresif. Pembelajaran transfer yang tidak diawasi dilakukan dengan kelompok tematik dari tweet 40 M tanpa label melalui LDA. Berdasarkan dataset ini, prapelatihan dilakukan dengan memprediksi topik utama dari tweet. Hasil menunjukkan bahwa transfer tidak diawasi dari set data besar melakukan sedikit lebih baik dari pelatihan diawasi pada set data `dekat kategori target' kecil. Dalam SemEval Task, sistem kita mengatur 14 dari 103 peserta.", 'de': 'Wir präsentieren einen neuronalen Netzwerk-basierten Ansatz des Transferlernens zur Erkennung offensiver Sprache. Für unser System vergleichen wir zwei Arten des Wissenstransfers: überwachte und unbeaufsichtigte Vortrainings. Das überwachte Vortraining unserer bidirektionalen GRU-3-CNN-Architektur wird als Multi-Task-Lernen des parallelen Trainings von fünf verschiedenen Aufgaben durchgeführt. Die ausgewählten Aufgaben sind überwachte Klassifizierungsprobleme von öffentlichen NLP-Ressourcen mit einigen Überschneidungen zu anstößigen Sprachen wie Sentiment Detection, Emoji Klassifizierung und aggressive Sprachklassifizierung. Unsupervised Transfer Learning wird mit einem thematischen Clustering von 40M unbeschrifteten Tweets über LDA durchgeführt. Basierend auf diesem Datensatz wird das Vortraining durchgeführt, indem das Hauptthema eines Tweets vorhergesagt wird. Die Ergebnisse deuten darauf hin, dass der unbeaufsichtigte Transfer von großen Datensätzen etwas besser abschneidet als das überwachte Training auf kleinen Datensätzen in der Nähe der Zielkategorie. Im SemEval Task rangiert unser System 14 von 103 Teilnehmern.', 'fa': 'ما یک شبکه عصبی را بر اساس یادگیری انتقال برای شناسایی زبانهای تجاوز نشان می دهیم. برای سیستم ما، دو نوع انتقال علم را مقایسه می\u200cکنیم: پیش آموزش تحت نظر و تحت نظر قرار نداده است. آموزش پیش از تمرین پیش از آموزش معماری GRU-3-CNN ما به عنوان یادگیری چندین کاری از آموزش مشابه پنج کار متفاوت انجام می شود. وظیفه\u200cهای برگزیده\u200cشده مشکلات مختلفی از منابع NLP عمومی با برخی از زبان\u200cهای تجاوز مانند شناسایی احساسات، مختلفی احساسات و مختلف زبان\u200cهای تجاوز تحت نظر می\u200cگیرند. یادگیری انتقال غیرقابل تحویل با یک گروهی از ۴۰ میلیون توئیت غیرقابل تحویل از طریق LDA انجام می\u200cشود. بر اساس این مجموعه داده\u200cها، پیش آموزش با پیش\u200cبینی موضوع اصلی یک تویت انجام می\u200cشود. نتیجه نشان می\u200cدهد که انتقال غیرقابل تحویل از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای بزرگ کمی بهتر از آموزش\u200cهای تحویل بر مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای کوچک «نزدیک kategoriه هدف» انجام می\u200cدهد. در وظيفه\u200cي نيمه\u200cي عمليات سيستم\u200cمون 14 از 103 شرکت\u200cکننده است.', 'ko': "우리는 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 공격적인 언어 검측 이동 학습 방법을 제시했다.우리의 시스템에 대해 우리는 두 가지 유형의 지식 이동을 비교했다. 그것이 바로 감독이 있는 예비 교육과 감독이 없는 예비 교육이다.우리의 쌍방향 GRU-3-CNN 체계 구조의 감독 예비 훈련은 다섯 가지 서로 다른 임무의 병행 훈련의 다중 임무 학습으로 집행된다.선택한 임무는 공공 NLP 자원에서 나온 감독 분류 문제로 공격적인 언어와 감정 검측, 표정 분류와 공격적인 언어 분류 등 중첩되어 있다.무감독 마이그레이션 학습은 LDA를 통해 표시되지 않은 4000만 개의 트윗을 주제별로 분류합니다.이 데이터 집합을 바탕으로 추문의 주요 주제를 예측하여 예비 훈련을 실시한다.그 결과 작은'근목표 유형'데이터 집합에서 빅데이터 집합에서 나온 무감독 전송 성능은 감독이 있는 훈련보다 약간 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.SemEval 임무에서 우리 시스템은 103명의 참여자 중 14위에 랭크되어 있다.", 'af': "Ons stel 'n neuralnetwerk gebaseerde toegang van oordrag leer vir offensivele taal opdekking. Vir ons stelsel vergelyk ons twee tipes kennis oordrag: ondersoek en onondersoek voor onderwerp. Onderbeheerde voor-oefening van ons bidireksjonale GRU-3-CNN-arkitektuur is uitgevoer as multi-taak leer van parallele oefening van vyf verskillende taak. Die gekose taak word klassifikasie probleems van publieke NLP hulpbronne met sommige oorvloei na offensivele taal soos sentiment opdekking, emoji klassifikasie en aggressiewe taal klassifikasie. Onondersteunde oordrag leer word uitgevoer met 'n tematiske klastering van 40M ongeabelde tweete deur LDA. Gebaseer op hierdie datastel, word voor-oefening uitgevoer deur die hoof onderwerp van 'n tweet te voorskou. @ info In die SemEval Opdrag, ons stelsel rank 14 uit 103 deelnimmers.", 'sw': "Tunaweza kuweka mtandao wa neura mbinu za kuhamisha kujifunza kwa ajili ya kutambua lugha ya kutisha. Kwa mfumo wetu, tunalinganisha aina mbili ya usafirishaji wa maarifa: inayofuatiliwa na kutokuwa na mafunzo ya kabla. Tafsiri ya mafunzo ya awali ya ujenzi wetu wa GRU-3-CNN unaofanywa kama kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi za mafunzo yanayofanana kwa kazi tano tofauti. Kazi zilizochaguliwa zinafuatiliwa na matatizo ya kutangazwa kutoka rasilimali za NLP kwa baadhi ya lugha ya kibaguzi kama vile kutambua hisia, usambazaji wa hisia, na kutangazwa kwa lugha ya kibaguzi. Ufunzi usiotangaliwa unafanyika kwa ujumbe wa twiti za watu 40M zisizoeleweka kupitia LDA. Kutokana na seti hii ya taarifa, mafunzo ya kabla yanafanyika kwa kutabiri mada kuu ya twita. Matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa uhamiaji usiohifadhiwa kutoka kwenye seti kubwa za data hufanya vizuri zaidi ya mafunzo yanayofuatiliwa kwenye seti ndogo ya ` makundi makubwa ya lengo'. Katika kazi ya SemEval, mfumo wetu unaofanana 14 kati ya washiriki 103.", 'tr': "Biz günahkar dil deteksiyonu üçin öwrenmek üçin nuýral a ýry tabanly çykarjak şeklini görkeýäris. Biziň sistemamyz üçin bilim aktarmasyny iki hili şeklinde karşılaşdyrýarys: gözlemýän we öňünden boýunça öňünde durumýän bilim aktarmasyny. Biziň ikinji görnüş GRU-3-CNN arhitektegimiziň öňünden gözleýän öňünden beş farklı işiň parallel okuwçylygyny öwrenmek üçin edildi. Saýlanan buýruklar NLP jemgyýetlerinden bazyk çykyş dili, duýgular tanyş, emoji klasifikasy we agresif dillerden bejerilýär. Mazmunla terjime öwrenmek LDA vasitynda 40M ýazylmaýan tweets klusteri bilen edildi. Bu veri setirine görä, ön-okuwçylyk başga temasyny täze etmek üçin edilýär. Netijeler uly faýllar arasyndaky gaýd edilmedik transferler kiçi `golaý kategoriýanyň golaýy' sanyndaky eğitim üçin biraz gowy edip bilýär. SemEval Görevinde, sistemimizde 103 katılan 14 tanesi vardır.", 'sq': "Ne paraqesim një qasje të rrjetit nervor bazuar në transferimin e mësimit për zbulimin ofensiv të gjuhës. Për sistemin tonë, ne krahasojmë dy lloje transferimi të njohurive: mbikqyrur dhe pa mbikqyrur parastërvitje. Parastërvitja e mbikqyrur e arkitekturës tonë dy-drejtore GRU-3-CNN kryehet si mësim shumëdetyror i trajnimit paralel të pesë detyrave të ndryshme. Detyrat e zgjedhura janë probleme të klasifikimit të mbikqyrura nga burimet publike të NLP me disa kapërcime në gjuhën ofensive të tilla si zbulimi i ndjenjave, klasifikimi i emoji dhe klasifikimi agresiv i gjuhës. Mësimi i pashpejtuar i transferit kryehet me një grupim tematik të tweeteve të pashpejtuara 40M nëpërmjet LDA. Based on this dataset, pre-training is performed by predicting the main topic of a tweet.  Rezultatet tregojnë se transferimi i pazgjidhur nga grupet e të dhënave të mëdha kryen pak më mirë se trajnimi i mbikqyrur në grupet e të dhënave të vogla `afër kategorisë objektive'. Në Detyrën SemEval, sistemi ynë renditet 14 nga 103 pjesëmarrës.", 'am': 'የኔውራዊ መረብ የቋንቋውን ለማግኘት የመለስ ትምህርት ለመቀናቀል የሚደረገውን አቀረብን፡፡ ለስብስነታችን ሁለት ዓይነት እውቀት መዘዋወርን እናሳያታለን፤ አስቀድሞ ትምህርት ያልጠበቀ እና ያልጠበቀ፡፡ የGRU-3-CNN መሠረት መሠረት የተለየ የፊተኛውን ትምህርት የአምስት ልዩ ስራ ትምህርት በማስተማር እንደተፈጸመ ነው፡፡ The selected tasks are supervised classification problems from public NLP resources with some overlap to offensive language such as sentiment detection, emoji classification, and aggressive language classification.  ያልተገለጠው ስንቀሳቅስ ትምህርት ከ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ.አ. በዚህ ዳታ ሳጥን በመሠረት የፊተኛ ትዊተር ዋና በመፍጠር ይደረጋል፡፡ ምርጫዎች በሴmEval ስራችን ስርዓታችን ከ103 ተጋሪዎች 14 ይደረጋል፡፡', 'bn': "আমরা একটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করছি আক্রান্ত ভাষা আবিষ্কারের জন্য পরিবর্তন শিক্ষা প আমাদের সিস্টেমের জন্য আমরা দুটি ধরনের জ্ঞান পরিবর্তনের তুলনা করি: পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষণ পর্যবেক্ষণ এবং অরক্ষিত। আমাদের বিদ্যমান GRU-3-CNN কাঠামোর পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষণের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে পাঁচটি ভিন্ন কাজের প্যালেল প্রশিক্ষণের মাল্টিক ক কা নির্বাচিত কাজগুলো পাবলিক এনএলপি সম্পদ থেকে বিভিন্ন পর্যবেক্ষণের সমস্যা পর্যবেক্ষণ করা হয়েছে, যেমন আবেগ আবিষ্কার, ইমোজি গ্রাফিকেশন এবং আক্রা এলডিএ-এর মাধ্যমে ৪০মিটার অলেবেল টুইটের বিভিন্ন বিষয়বস্তু নিয়ন্ত্রণ শিক্ষা প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে। এই ডাটাসেটের ভিত্তিতে, টুইটের প্রধান বিষয় ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদর্শন করা হচ্ছে। ফলাফল নির্দেশ করে যে বিশাল ডাটাসেট থেকে সংরক্ষিত পরিবর্তন সংরক্ষণ করা হয়েছে সামান্য `লক্ষ্য বিভাগের কাছাকাছি' ডাটাসেটের তথ্ সেমইভাল কাজে আমাদের সিস্টেম ১০৩ জনের অংশগ্রহণকারীদের মধ্যে ১৪ জন সংখ্যা লাভ করে।", 'hy': "Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նյարդային ցանցի հիմնված մոտեցում փոխանցման ուսումնասիրության համար, որպեսզի սարսափելի լեզվի հայտնաբերման համար: Մեր համակարգի համար մենք համեմատում ենք երկու տեսակի գիտելիքների փոխանցումը' վերահսկված և անվերահսկված նախապատրաստման: Մեր երկու ուղղությամբ GRU-3-CNN ճարտարապետության վերահսկված նախապատրաստումը կատարվում է որպես հինգ տարբեր խնդիրների զուգահեռ ուսուցման բազմախնդիրներ: Ընտրված խնդիրները վերահսկված են դասակարգման խնդիրներից հանրային ՆԼՊ ռեսուրսներից, որոնք որոշ հակադրություններ ունեն հակադրող լեզուների, ինչպիսիք են զգացմունքների հայտնաբերումը, էմոջի դասակարգման և ագրեսիվ լե Առանց վերահսկվող փոխանցման ուսումնասիրությունը կատարվում է 40M-ի թեմատիկ խմբագրության միջոցով, որոնց միջոցով չկա թվիթեր: Հիմնվելով այս տվյալների համակարգի վրա, նախավարժումը կատարվում է թվիթի հիմնական թեման կանխատեսելով: Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ անվերահսկված տեղափոխումը մեծ տվյալների համակարգերից մի քիչ ավելի լավ է աշխատում, քան վերահսկված ուսումնասիրությունը փոքր «մոտ նպատակային կատեգորիայի» տվյալների համակարգերի վրա: Մեր համակարգը դասակարգում է 10 մասնակիցներից 14:", 'az': "Biz fəsad dili keşfetmək üçün transfers öyrənməsi üçün nöral a ğ tərəfindən təşkil edirik. Sistemimiz üçün iki növ bilgi tərəfindən əvvəlcə təhsil edilməmiş və təhsil edilməmiş ilk təhsil ilə qarşılaşdırırıq. Bizim ikidiktiv GRU-3-CNN arhitektüsümüzün öndə təhsil edilməsi beş müxtəlif işlərin paralel təhsil öyrənməsi kimi çox iş öyrənir. Seçilmiş işlər NLP qüvvətli kaynaqlarından gizli klasifikasyon problemlərinə baxılır, hisslər tanıması, emoji klasifikasyonu və agresif dil klasifikasyonu kimi həddi aşmaq dillərinə qarışır. Qeyd edilməmiş transfer öyrənməsi LDA vasitəsilə 40M yazılması olmayan twetlərin tema ilə istifadə edilir. Bu veri qurğusuna baxmayaraq, təhsil əvvəlcə təhsil edilir tweetin əsl məsələsini təmin edir. Sonuçlar, böyük verilən qurğulardan istifadə edilməmiş daşımaq, kiçik `yaxın məqsəd kategoriyası' verilən qurğularda təhsil edilmədən az daha yaxşıdır. SemEval Taskdə, sistemimiz 103 katılanlardan 14 səf verir.", 'et': "Tutvustame neurovõrgupõhist lähenemisviisi siirdeõppele solvava keele tuvastamiseks. Meie süsteemi puhul võrdleme kahte tüüpi teadmiste edasiandmist: järelevalveta ja järelevalveta eelkoolitust. Meie kahesuunalise GRU-3-CNN arhitektuuri juhitav eelkoolitus toimub viie erineva ülesande paralleelse koolituse mitmeülesandelise õppena. Valitud ülesanneteks on avalike NLP ressursside järelevalve all olevad klassifitseerimisprobleemid, mis kattuvad teataval määral solvava keelega, nagu sentimentaalsuse tuvastamine, emojide klassifitseerimine ja agressiivne keele klassifitseerimine. Järelevalveta siirdeõpe viiakse läbi 40 miljoni märgistamata säutsu temaatilise klastriga LDA kaudu. Selle andmekogumi põhjal viiakse eelkoolitus läbi säutsu põhiteema prognoosimise teel. Tulemused näitavad, et järelevalveta edastamine suurtest andmekogumitest toimib veidi paremini kui järelevalve all toimuv koolitus väikeste `sihtrühma lähedal' andmekogumite kohta. SemEval ülesandes on meie süsteem 103 osalejast 14.", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo neuralnu mrežu bazirani pristup učenja prijenosa za otkrivanje ofanzivnog jezika. Za naš sistem uspoređujemo dvije vrste prijenosa znanja: nadzorna i neodređena predobuka. Nadzorna predobuka naše dvodirektivne arhitekture GRU-3-CNN provedena je kao multitaskno učenje paralelne obuke pet različitih zadataka. Izabrani zadatak nadziru klasifikacijske probleme iz javnih NLP resursa sa nekim preklapanjem na ofanzivni jezik kao što su detektiva osjećaja, klasifikacija emoji i agresivna klasifikacija jezika. Neodređeno učenje prijenosa izvršeno je sa tematskim skupljanjem 40M nezabeliranih tweeta putem LDA-a. Na temelju ovog seta podataka, predobuka se izvršava predviđanjem glavne teme tweet a. Rezultati ukazuju na to da nepotrebni prijenos iz velikih podataka čini malo bolje od nadzorne obuke na malim podatakama "blizu ciljne kategorije". U poluvremenom zadatku, naš sistem čini 14 od 103 učesnika.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme neuroverkkopohjaisen siirtooppimisen lähestymistavan loukkaavan kielen havaitsemiseen. Järjestelmässämme vertailemme kahta tiedonsiirtoa: valvottua ja valvomatonta esikoulutusta. Kaksisuuntaisen GRU-3-CNN-arkkitehtuurimme ohjattu esikoulutus suoritetaan viiden eri tehtävän rinnakkaiskoulutuksen monitehtäväoppimisena. Valitut tehtävät ovat valvottuja luokitusongelmia julkisista NLP-resursseista, joissa on jonkin verran päällekkäisyyttä loukkaavaan kieleen, kuten tunteentunnistukseen, emojiluokitukseen ja aggressiiviseen kieliluokitukseen. Valvontaton siirtooppiminen suoritetaan 40 miljoonan merkitsemättömän tweetin temaattisella klusteroinnilla LDA:n kautta. Tämän aineiston perusteella esiharjoittelu suoritetaan ennustamalla twiitin pääaihe. Tulokset osoittavat, että valvomaton siirto suurista tietoaineistoista suoriutuu hieman paremmin kuin valvottu koulutus pienissä lähellä kohderyhmää olevissa tietoaineistoissa. SemEval-tehtävässä järjestelmämme sijoittuu 14 osallistujasta 103:sta.', 'cs': 'Představujeme přístup k transferovému učení založený na neuronové síti pro detekci urážlivého jazyka. Pro náš systém porovnáváme dva typy přenosu znalostí: předškolení pod dohledem a bez dohledu. Dohlížené předškolení naší obousměrné architektury GRU-3-CNN je prováděno jako víceúlohové učení paralelního školení pěti různých úkolů. Vybranými úkoly jsou problémy s dohledem na klasifikaci z veřejných zdrojů NLP s určitým překrýváním k urážlivým jazykům, jako je detekce sentimentů, klasifikace emoji a agresivní jazyková klasifikace. Nekontrolované přenosové učení je prováděno s tematickým shlukováním 40M neoznačených tweetů prostřednictvím LDA. Na základě tohoto datového souboru je předškolení prováděno predikcí hlavního tématu tweetu. Výsledky naznačují, že bez dohledu přenos z velkých datových souborů vede o něco lepší než dohled na malých datových souborech "blízko cílové kategorie". V SemEval Task se náš systém řadí čtrnáct z 103 účastníků.', 'ca': 'We present a neural network based approach of transfer learning for offensive language detection.  Per al nostre sistema, comparem dos tipus de transfer ència de coneixement: previa formació supervisada i no supervisada. La pré-capacitació supervisada de la nostra arquitectura bidireccional GRU-3-CNN es fa com a aprenentatge multitasca de capacitació parallela de cinc tasques diferents. The selected tasks are supervised classification problems from public NLP resources with some overlap to offensive language such as sentiment detection, emoji classification, and aggressive language classification.  L\'aprenentatge de transfer ència no supervisada es fa amb una agrupació temàtica de tweets de 40 M sense etiqueta a través de LDA. Sobre la base d\'aquest conjunt de dades, el pré-entrenament es fa predir el tema principal d\'un tweet. Els resultats indiquen que la transfer ència no supervisada de grans conjunts de dades fa una mica millor que la formació supervisada en petits conjunts de dades "propers a la categoria d\'objectius". En la SemEval Task, el nostre sistema té 14 de 103 participants.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk ngênêr kuwi tambah sing basa dadi ngênêr kuwi nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang. Sistem awak dhéwé, kita komparasi iki soko perusahaan pawang nggawe ngerasah karo hal-kuwi mau Ngawe mesthi apa-prelimurasi sistem sing dibenalke ARGU-3-MT architecture dadi sing diranggawe multi-task Learning Perintal kuwi tindakan pet task gawe ngubah. task FindOK Tulung isi diangkat nggo dataset iki, tapi-curemu sing dianggap oleh dunyane tiket sing isi dianggawe. NAME OF TRANSLATORS Nang Samebal task, sistem kita ngawehi tanggal 14 sisan mruput', 'sk': "Predstavljamo pristop prenosnega učenja, ki temelji na nevronskem omrežju, za odkrivanje žaljivega jezika. Za naš sistem primerjamo dve vrsti prenosa znanja: nadzorovano in nenadzorovano predusposabljanje. Nadzorovano predusposabljanje naše dvosmerne arhitekture GRU-3-CNN poteka kot večopravilno učenje vzporednega usposabljanja petih različnih nalog. Izbrane naloge so težave z nadzorovanim razvrščanjem iz javnih virov NLP z določenim prekrivanjem z žaljivim jezikom, kot so zaznavanje čustev, klasifikacija emojijev in agresivna jezikovna klasifikacija. Nenadzorovano prenosno učenje se izvaja s tematskim združevanjem 40M neoznačenih tweetov prek LDA. Na podlagi tega nabora podatkov se predusposabljanje izvaja z napovedovanjem glavne teme tweeta. Rezultati kažejo, da je prenos brez nadzora iz velikih naborov podatkov nekoliko boljši od nadzorovanega usposabljanja na majhnih naborih podatkov ‚blizu ciljne kategorije'. V nalogi SemEval naš sistem uvršča 14 od 103 udeležencev.", 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים גישה מבוססת ברשת עצבית של לימוד העברה לזיהוי שפות פגיעה. למערכת שלנו, אנחנו משוותים שני סוגים של העברת ידע: התאמנות מראשית מבוקרת ולא מבוקרת. הארכיטקטורה הג.ר.ו-3-סי.נ.אן המבוצעת בתור לימוד במשימות רבות של אימון מקביל של חמישה משימות שונות. The selected tasks are supervised classification problems from public NLP resources with some overlap to offensive language such as sentiment detection, emoji classification, and aggressive language classification.  למידת העברה ללא השגחה מבצעת באמצעות קבוצה נושאית של טוויטים ללא סימנים באמצעות LDA. בהתבסס על קבוצת נתונים זו, האימונים הקדמיים מבצעים על ידי חיזוי נושא העיקרי של טוויט. התוצאות מצביעות על העברה ללא השגחה ממערכות נתונים גדולות מבצעת מעט יותר טוב מאימונים על קבוצות נתונים קטנות "קרובות לקטגוריה המטרה". במשימת הסימוול, המערכת שלנו מצוות 14 מתוך 103 משתתפים.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da wani shirin neural a kan shirin ta da za'a sanar da za'a gane wa lugha mai fassarwa. For our system, we compare two types of knowledge transfer: supervised and unsupervised pre-training.  Superpared pre-Training of the dictionary GRU-3-CNN architecture is performed as multi-job learning of parallel Training of shan task õki. Ana tsare wa aikin waɗanda aka zãɓe su masu fitina daga manyan NLP na Public Resource da some na rufe zuwa harshen na zargi kamar gane na hisia, fassarar masu kiyaye da kuma fassarar harshe na ƙetare. Ana sami karatun transfer da ba'a tsare shi ba na sami da wata taskacin mai shekara 40M na rubutu na LDA. A kan kan wannan tsarin da aka sani, za'a yi tafiyar da pre-tsarin gaba ɗaya da ya yi bayani ga maɓallin wani jumla na Twitter. Mataimakin na nuna cewa transfer da ba'a tsare ba daga tsarin maɓallin da aka yi amfani da shi kaɗan mafi alhẽri daga tsarin da aka tsare shi a kan danne-zane ɗin `makusanci na ƙidãya'. Ga aikin SemEL, na'urarmu yana danganta 14 daga 103 mãsu shirin ciki.", 'bo': "འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་པ་རྙེད་སྐད་རྙེད་ཚུལ་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བཅུག ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་སྐོར་ལས་དབྱེ་རིགས་གཉིས་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་མཐུན་པ་མི་འདུག ང་ཚོའི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྔོན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་སྔོན་གྲངས་བསྒྲགས་གནང་།GRU-3-CNN་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་འདི་ལྔན་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་ བདམས་ཟིན་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་ཚོ་ནི་མི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་NLP རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཐོག་ཁུངས་ལ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཡིན་པ་དང་། སེམས་རིམ་བཤད་དང་ སེམས་ཚོར་ཆ་བཤད་ སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་མེད་པའི་སྐྱེལ སྔོན་གྱི་གནད་དོན Results indicate that unsupervised transfer from large datasets performs slightly better than supervised training on small `near target category' datasets. ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་ཆེན་དཔེ་ལས་དུས་ལྟར་ཞིབ་འཇུག་པ་ལས་འགྲོ་མཁན་གནད་མེད་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་༡༤༠།"}
{'en': 'UM-IU@LING at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : Identifying Offensive Tweets Using BERT and SVMs', 'ar': 'UM-IU @ LING في مهمة SemEval-2019 6: تحديد التغريدات المسيئة باستخدام BERT و SVM', 'fr': "UM-IU @LING au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: identifier les tweets offensants à l'aide du BERT et des SVM", 'pt': 'UM-IU@LING no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: Identificando Tweets Ofensivos Usando BERT e SVMs', 'es': 'UM-IU @LING en la Tarea 6 de SemEval-2019: Identificación de tuits ofensivos mediante BERT y SVM', 'ja': 'UM - IU @ LING at SemEval -2019タスク6 ： BERTとSVMを使用した不快なツイートの特定', 'zh': 'UM-IU@LINGĺś¨SemEval-2019ĺŠˇ6:ç”¨BERTSVMçźĄĺŹŤć„źäą‹ćŽ¨ć–‡', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 6 पर UM-IU@LING: BERT और SVM का उपयोग करके आपत्तिजनक ट्वीट्स की पहचान करना', 'ru': 'UM-IU@LING на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: Идентификация оскорбительных твитов с использованием BERT и виртуальных машин защиты', 'ga': 'UM-IU@LING ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: Curfá Ionsaitheach a Aithint ag Úsáid BERT agus SVManna', 'ka': 'სმ. IU@LING semiEval-2019 დავალება 6: განსაზღვრება უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უნდა გამოყენება BERT და SVM', 'el': 'UM- IU@LING Καθήκον 6: Εντοπισμός επιθετικών tweets χρησιμοποιώντας BERT και SVMs', 'hu': 'Um- IU@LING 6. feladat: Támadó tweetek azonosítása BERT és SVM felhasználásával', 'it': 'Um... IU@LING Task 6: Identificare i Tweet Offensivi utilizzando BERT e SVM', 'kk': 'unit description in lists IU@LING 6- шегінші тапсырма: BERT және SVMs қолданылатын официалдық Tweets', 'mk': 'Ум... IU@LING - на SemEval-2019 задача 6: Идентификување на навредни твитови со BERT и SVM', 'lt': 'UM- IU@LING 6 užduotis: nustatyti pažeidžiamus Tweets, naudojančius BERT ir SVM', 'ms': 'UM- IU@LING - di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Mengenalpasti Tweet Offensif menggunakan BERT dan SVMs', 'mt': 'UM- IU@LING - f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6: Identifikazzjoni ta’ Tweets Offensivi bl-Użu tal-BERT u l-SVMs', 'ml': 'ഉം- IU@LING സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ജോലി 6: ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയും എസ്\u200cവിഎസ്സും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഓഫീസല്\u200d ടൂട്ടുകളും തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നു', 'mn': 'UM- IU@LING SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying Offensive Tweets Use BERT and SVMs', 'no': 'UM- IU@LING @ item: inlistbox', 'pl': 'UM- IU@LING Zadanie 6: Identyfikacja tweetów ofensywnych przy użyciu BERT i SVM', 'ro': 'UM- IU@LING Sarcina 6: Identificarea tweeturilor ofensive folosind BERT și SVM-uri', 'sr': 'UM... IU@LING U zadatku 6: identifikacija službenih Tweets korištenja BERT i SVMs', 'si': 'UM- IU@LING සෙම්වේල්-2019 වැඩේ 6: BERT සහ SVMs භාවිතා කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ.', 'sv': 'UM- IU@LING på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: Identifiera offensiva tweets med hjälp av BERT och SVM', 'so': 'UM- IU@LING Shaqada SemEval-2019 6: Identification Offensive Tweets using BERT and SVMs', 'ta': 'UM- IU@LING  at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying Offensive Tweets Using BERT and SVMs', 'ur': 'UM- IU@LING SemEval-2019 Task 6: Offensive Tweets Identifying BERT and SVMs Using', 'uz': 'UM- IU@LING  at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying Offensive Tweets Using BERT and SVMs', 'vi': 'Mm-hmm IU@LING tại Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-209: xác định kích động súng băng giả sử BERT và SVMs.', 'bg': 'UM- IU@LING Задача 6: Идентифициране на нападателни туитове с помощта на BERT и SVMs', 'hr': 'UM- IU@LING U zadatku 6. ispitivanja: identifikacija neophodnih Tweets korištenja BERT i SVMs', 'da': "UM- IU@LING Opgave 6: Identificering af offensive tweets ved hjælp af BERT og SVM'er", 'nl': "UM- IU@LING Taak 6: Identificeren van offensieve tweets met behulp van BERT en SVM's", 'de': 'UM- IU@LING Aufgabe 6: Offensive Tweets mithilfe von BERT und SVMs identifizieren', 'fa': 'آم... IU@LING در کار ۶: شناسایی Tweets Offensive با استفاده از BERT و SVMs', 'ko': '응-IU@LINGSemEval-2019 작업 6: BERT 및 SVM을 사용한 공격적인 트윗 인식', 'id': 'UM- IU@LING - di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: Identifikasi Tweet Tersinggung Menggunakan BERT dan SVM', 'sw': 'UM- IU@LING Katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 6: Kutambua twiti za rasmi kwa kutumia BERT na SVMs', 'tr': 'UM IU@LING SemEval-2019 Görev 6: Identifying Offensive Tweets Using BERT and SVMs', 'af': 'UM- IU@LING Na SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 6: Identifikasie Offensive Tweets gebruik BERT en SVMs', 'sq': 'UM- IU@LING - në SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifikimi i Tweeteve Offensive duke përdorur BERT dhe SVMs', 'am': 'ሀ IU@LING ስምንት 6:', 'hy': 'Օմ... IU@LING ՍեմԷվալ 2019 թվականի 6-րդ հանձնարարությամբ. հայտնաբերել վիթեթները BER և SVM-ի օգտագործման միջոցով', 'az': 'UM- IU@LING SemEval-2019 G칬z톛l 6: BERT v톛 SVMs istifad톛 ed톛n Offensive Tweets identification', 'bn': 'উম- IU@LING সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের ৬: বার্টি এবং এসভিমি ব্যবহার করে অফিসেভ টুইট পরিচিতি করা হয়েছে', 'bs': 'UM... IU@LING U zadatku 6: identifikacija službenih Tweets korištenja BERT i SVMs', 'cs': 'UM- IU@LING Úkol 6: Identifikace útočných tweetů pomocí BERT a SVM', 'ca': 'UM- IU@LING - a SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying Offensive Tweets Using BERT and SVMs', 'et': 'UM- IU@LING Ülesanne 6: ründavate tweetide tuvastamine BERT-i ja SVM-ide abil', 'fi': 'UM- IU@LING Tehtävä 6: Hyökkäävien twiittien tunnistaminen BERT:n ja SVM:n avulla', 'jv': 'vertical-aligntextattr IU@LING Workspace 1', 'sk': 'UM- IU@LING Naloga 6: prepoznavanje napadalnih tweetov z uporabo BERT in SVM', 'he': 'אום... IU@LING  at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying Offensive Tweets Using BERT and SVMs', 'ha': 'M̃. IU@LING QWebPage', 'bo': 'UM- IU@LING • at SemEval-2019 Task 6: Identifying Offensive Tweets Using BERT and SVMs'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the UM-IU@LING’s system for the SemEval 2019 Task 6 : Offens-Eval. We take a mixed approach to identify and categorize hate speech in social media. In subtask A, we fine-tuned a BERT based classifier to detect abusive content in tweets, achieving a macro F1 score of 0.8136 on the test data, thus reaching the 3rd rank out of 103 submissions. In subtasks B and C, we used a linear SVM with selected character n-gram features. For subtask C, our system could identify the target of abuse with a macro F1 score of 0.5243, ranking it 27th out of 65 submissions.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe el sistema de UM-IU @LING para la Tarea 6 de SemEval 2019: Offens-Eval. Adoptamos un enfoque mixto para identificar y clasificar el discurso de odio en las redes sociales. En la subtarea A, ajustamos un clasificador basado en BERT para detectar contenido abusivo en los tuits, logrando una puntuación macro F1 de 0,8136 en los datos de prueba, alcanzando así el tercer puesto de 103 envíos. En las subtareas B y C, utilizamos un SVM lineal con funciones seleccionadas de n-gramas de caracteres. Para la subtarea C, nuestro sistema podría identificar el objetivo del abuso con una puntuación macro F1 de 0.5243, situándolo en el puesto 27 de 65 envíos.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le système UM-IU @LING pour le SemEval 2019 Task 6\xa0: Offens-Eval. Nous adoptons une approche mixte pour identifier et catégoriser les discours de haine dans les médias sociaux. Dans la sous-tâche A, nous avons affiné un classificateur basé sur BERT pour détecter le contenu abusif dans les tweets, obtenant un score macro F1 de 0,8136 sur les données de test, atteignant ainsi le 3e rang sur 103 soumissions. Dans les sous-tâches B et C, nous avons utilisé une SVM linéaire avec des entités de n-grammes de caractères sélectionnées. Pour la sous-tâche C, notre système a pu identifier la cible d'abus avec un score macro F1 de 0,5243, le classant au 27e rang sur 65 soumissions.", 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظام UM-IU @ LING لمهمة SemEval 2019 6: Offens-Eval. نتبع نهجًا مختلطًا لتحديد وتصنيف خطاب الكراهية في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. في المهمة الفرعية أ ، قمنا بضبط المصنف المستند إلى BERT لاكتشاف المحتوى المسيء في التغريدات ، وحققنا درجة F1 الكلية البالغة 0.8136 على بيانات الاختبار ، وبالتالي الوصول إلى المرتبة الثالثة من بين 103 إرسال. في المهام الفرعية B و C ، استخدمنا SVM خطيًا مع ميزات n-gram المحددة. بالنسبة للمهمة الفرعية "ج" ، يمكن لنظامنا تحديد هدف إساءة الاستخدام بدرجة ماكرو F1 تبلغ 0.5243 ، مما يجعله يحتل المرتبة 27 من أصل 65 طلبًا.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve o sistema da UM-IU@LING para a Tarefa 6 do SemEval 2019: Ofens-Eval. Adotamos uma abordagem mista para identificar e categorizar o discurso de ódio nas mídias sociais. Na subtarefa A, ajustamos um classificador baseado em BERT para detectar conteúdo abusivo em tweets, alcançando uma pontuação macro F1 de 0,8136 nos dados de teste, alcançando assim o 3º lugar entre 103 envios. Nas subtarefas B e C, usamos um SVM linear com recursos de n-gram de caracteres selecionados. Para a subtarefa C, nosso sistema pode identificar o alvo do abuso com uma pontuação macro F1 de 0,5243, classificando-a em 27º lugar em 65 envios.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2019タスク6 ： Offens - EvalのためのUM - IU @ LINGのシステムについて説明する。私たちは、ソーシャルメディアでのヘイトスピーチを特定し、分類するために、混合されたアプローチを取っています。サブタスクAでは、BERTベースの分類子を微調整して、ツイート内の不正なコンテンツを検出し、テストデータで0.8136のマクロF 1スコアを達成し、103件の提出物のうち3位に達しました。サブタスクBとCでは、選択された文字n - gramの特徴を持つ線形SVMを使用しました。サブタスクCの場合、当社のシステムは0.5243のマクロF 1スコアで不正行為のターゲットを特定し、65件の提出物のうち27位にランク付けすることができます。', 'zh': '本文UM-IU@LING SemEval 2019务6:Offens-Eval之统也。 吾以混合知类社交媒体仇言也。 子职 A 中,微 BERT 之类器来检推文之滥,得 0.8136 之宏观 F1 分于测试数据,而第三于 103 。 子职 B C ,我有选字符 n-gram 特徵之线性 SVM。 其于子职 C,吾统可以识滥,其宏观 F1 分为 0.5243,排名第 27 位于 65 。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval 2019 कार्य 6 के लिए UM-IU@LING के सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है: Offens-Eval। हम सोशल मीडिया में नफरत भरे भाषण की पहचान करने और वर्गीकृत करने के लिए एक मिश्रित दृष्टिकोण अपनाते हैं। सबटास्क ए में, हमने ट्वीट्स में अपमानजनक सामग्री का पता लगाने के लिए एक BERT आधारित क्लासिफायर को ठीक किया, परीक्षण डेटा पर 0.8136 का मैक्रो F1 स्कोर प्राप्त किया, इस प्रकार 103 प्रस्तुतियों में से तीसरे स्थान पर पहुंच गया। उप-कार्य बी और सी में, हमने चयनित चरित्र एन-ग्राम सुविधाओं के साथ एक रैखिक एसवीएम का उपयोग किया। सबटास्क सी के लिए, हमारा सिस्टम 0.5243 के मैक्रो एफ 1 स्कोर के साथ दुरुपयोग के लक्ष्य की पहचान कर सकता है, इसे 65 प्रस्तुतियों में से 27 वें स्थान पर रख सकता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается система UM-IU @LING для задачи 6 SemEval 2019: Offens-Eval. Мы используем смешанный подход для идентификации и классификации ненавистнических высказываний в социальных сетях. В подзадаче A мы доработали классификатор на основе BERT, чтобы обнаружить оскорбительный контент в твитах, достигнув макрос F1 0,8136 на тестовых данных, таким образом, достигнув 3-го места из 103 представлений. В подзадачах B и C мы использовали линейную виртуальную машину защиты с выбранными признаками n-грамм символов. По подзадаче C наша система могла определить цель злоупотребления с макрорейтингом F1 0,5243, заняв 27-е место из 65 представленных материалов.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar chóras UM-IU@LING do Thasc 6 SemEval 2019: Offens-Eval. Glacaimid cur chuige measctha chun fuathchaint a aithint agus a chatagóiriú ar na meáin shóisialta. I bhfothasc A, rinneamar mionchoigeartú ar aicmitheoir bunaithe ar BERT chun ábhar maslach i dtvuíteanna a bhrath, ag baint amach scór macrai F1 de 0.8136 ar na sonraí tástála, rud a bhain an 3ú rang amach as 103 aighneacht. I bhfothascanna B agus C, d’úsáideamar SVM líneach le gnéithe n-gram de charachtair roghnaithe. I gcás fhothasc C, d’fhéadfadh ár gcóras sprioc na mí-úsáide a shainaithint le scór macrai F1 de 0.5243, á rangú sa 27ú háit as 65 aighneacht.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány az UM- IU@LING A SemEval 2019-es feladat 6: Offens-Eval rendszere. Vegyes megközelítést alkalmazunk a gyűlöletbeszédek azonosítására és kategorizálására a közösségi médiában. Az "A" altűrésben finomhangoltunk egy BERT alapú osztályozót, hogy felismerjük a visszaélő tartalmakat a tweetekben, elérve a tesztadatok alapján 0,8136-os F1 makró pontszámot, így elértük a 103 beadvány közül a 3. helyet. A B és C altevékenységekben lineáris SVM-t használtunk kiválasztott karakter n-gram funkciókkal. A C altfeladat esetében a rendszerünk 0,5243 makró F1 pontszámmal tudta azonosítani a visszaélés célját, és 65 beadvány közül 27. helyre sorolta.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το UM- IU@LING Το σύστημα του SemEval 2019 Εργασία 6: Παράπτωση-Αξιολόγηση. Ακολουθούμε μια μικτή προσέγγιση για τον εντοπισμό και την κατηγοριοποίηση της ομιλίας μίσους στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Στη δευτερεύουσα εργασία Α, τελειοποιήσαμε έναν ταξινομητή με βάση το BERT για να ανιχνεύσει καταχρηστικό περιεχόμενο σε tweets, επιτυγχάνοντας μια μακροεντολή F1 βαθμολογία 0.8136 στα δεδομένα δοκιμής, φτάνοντας έτσι στην τρίτη θέση από τις υποβολές 103. Στις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες Β και Γ, χρησιμοποιήσαμε μια γραμμική SVM με επιλεγμένα χαρακτηριστικά γραμμάτων χαρακτήρων. Για την δευτερεύουσα εργασία Γ, το σύστημά μας θα μπορούσε να εντοπίσει τον στόχο της κατάχρησης με ένα μακροχρόνιο σκορ F1 0.5243, ταξινομώντας τον 27ο από 65 υποβολές.', 'ka': 'ეს დაახლოები UM-ს გამოსახულებს. IU@LING SemEval 2019 დავალების სისტემა 6: Offens-Eval. ჩვენ სოციალური მედიაში გავაკეთებთ და კატეგორიზებთ მპატის სიტყვას. A წერტილებში, ჩვენ BERT-ის კლასიფიკაციას დავიწყეთ, რომ გავიღოთ ძალიან შემდგომარებული შემდგომარების შემდგომარების შემდგომარებისთვის, რომელიც შემდგომარებული მონაცემების შემდგომარებით 0,8136 B და C-ში, ჩვენ გამოიყენეთ linear SVM, რომელიც არჩეულია n-გრამის სიმბოლოებით. ჩვენი სისტემა შეიძლება იდენტიფიკუროთ მაკრო F1 წერტილი 0,5243, რომელიც 65 წერტილიდან 27 წერტილი.', 'it': "Il presente documento descrive l'UM- IU@LING Il sistema di SemEval 2019 Task 6: Offens-Eval. Adottiamo un approccio misto per identificare e classificare i discorsi di odio nei social media. Nel sottotask A, abbiamo perfezionato un classificatore basato su BERT per rilevare contenuti abusivi nei tweet, ottenendo un punteggio macro F1 di 0,8136 sui dati del test, raggiungendo così il terzo posto su 103 contributi. Nelle sottoattività B e C, abbiamo usato un SVM lineare con caratteristiche n-gram selezionate. Per la sottomissione C, il nostro sistema potrebbe identificare il target di abuso con un punteggio F1 macro di 0,5243, classificandolo 27esimo su 65 invii.", 'mk': "Овој весник го опишува УМ- IU@LING 's system for the SemEval 2019 Task 6: Offens-Eval.  Ние земаме мешан пристап за идентификување и категоризирање на говорот на омраза во социјалните медиуми. Во субпрашањето А, го пофиниравме класификаторот базиран на БЕРТ за да откриеме злоупотребна содржина на твитови, постигнувајќи макро-Ф1 оценка од 0,8136 на тестовите податоци, достигнувајќи го третиот ранг од 103 поднесувања. Во потпрашањата Б и Ц, користевме линијарен СВМ со избрани карактеристики на n-грам знак. За субпрашањето Ц, нашиот систем може да ја идентификува целта на злоупотреба со макро Ф1 оценка од 0,5243, рангирајќи ја на 27 од 65 поднесувања.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз UM IU@LING 2019 жылдың бөлшегінің жүйесі 6- тапсырма: Offens- Eval. Социалдық медиақтағы жұмыс сөйлеуді анықтау және санаттарды таңдау үшін аралас тәсілді қолданамыз. A суретінде біз BERT негіздеген классификаторын тесті деректерінде 0,8136 макро F1 деңгейін таңдау үшін таңдадық. Сондықтан 103 суретінен 3-ші жолды жеткіздік. B және C суреттерінде, таңдалған n- грамм символдары бар сызық SVM қолдандық. C суреті үшін, біздің жүйеміз макро F1 деңгейіндегі 0,5243 деңгейіндегі жеңілдірудің мақсатын анықтай алады, ол 65 деңгейіндегі 27ші деңгейінде.', 'lt': "Šiame dokumente aprašoma UM- IU@LING 's system for the SemEval 2019 Task 6: Offens-Eval.  Mes taikome mišrų požiūrį nustatant ir klasifikuodami neapykantos kalbą social in ėje žiniasklaidoje. A paklausime tiksliai pritaikėme BERT grindžiamą klasifikatorių, kad nustatytume piktnaudžiavimą turiniu tweetuose, pasiekėme 0,8136 makro F1 balas bandymų duomenimis, taigi pasiekėme trečią laipsnį iš 103 pareiškimų. B ir C paklausimuose naudojame linijinį SVM su pasirinktais simboliais n-gramai. C paklausimui mūsų sistema galėtų nustatyti piktnaudžiavimo tikslą, kurio makro F1 balas yra 0,5243, o 27-asis iš 65 pareiškimų.", 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പ് UM-നെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു IU@LING SemEval 2019 ജോലി 6: ഓഫെന്\u200dസ്-Eval. സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയില്\u200d വെറുപ്പ് സംസാരം തിരിച്ചറിയാനും വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചറിയാനും നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു മികച്ച പ ഉപേക്ഷ A-ല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ബെര്\u200dട്ടി അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കറിയാന്\u200d ശ്രമിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ടൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d പീഡിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഉള്ളടക്കം കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d, പരീക്ഷണ ബിയും സിയും സബ്ട്ടാസില്\u200d, തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത അക്ഷരത്തിന്റെ n- ഗ്രാമിന്റെ ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ലൈനെര്\u200d  സബ്ബസ്സ് സിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന് മാക്രോ F1 സ്കോര്\u200d 0. 5243 ന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d കഴിയും, 65 കീഴ്പെടുത്തി', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас UM-г IU@LING 2019 оны SemEval-ын систем 6-р ажил: Offens-Eval. Бид нийгмийн мэдээлэлд үзэн ядах илтгэлийг тодорхойлох, хуваалцах арга зам ашигладаг. A-ын доогуур асуултын дотор бид БЕРТ-ын үндсэн классификаторыг тооцоолж, шинжлэх өгөгдлийн дээр 0.8136 макро F1 оноо олж, 103 дахь хэмжээнд 3-р хэмжээнд хүрэх болно. B болон C сурагчдад бид сонгогдсон n-грамм дүрсийг шулуун SVM ашигласан. Ц-ын доогуур асуултын тулд бидний систем хэрэглээний зорилго нь 0.5243-ын макро F1 цэгээр 0.5243, 65 дахь 27-г нэмэгдүүлж чадна.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule opisano UM- IU@LING System SemEval 2019 Zadanie 6: Przestępczość. Stosujemy mieszane podejście do identyfikacji i kategoryzowania mowy nienawiści w mediach społecznościowych. W podzadaniu A dostosowaliśmy klasyfikator oparty na BERT, aby wykrywać nadużywające treści w tweetach, osiągając makro F1 wynik 0.8136 na danych testowych, osiągając tym samym trzecią rangę spośród zgłoszeń 103. W podzadaniach B i C użyliśmy liniowego SVM z wybranymi funkcjami n-gram znaku. W przypadku podzadania C nasz system mógłby zidentyfikować cel nadużyć za pomocą makro F1 wyniku 0,5243, klasyfikując go 27th spośród 65 zgłoszeń.', 'no': 'Denne papiren skildrar UM-en IU@LING Systemet for halvEvalen 2019 oppgåve 6: Offens-Eval. Vi tar ein blandet tilnærming for å identifisera og kategorisera hatespråk i sosiale media. I underspørjinga A finn vi ein BERT-basert klassifiserer for å finna abusive innhald i tweeter, og når det gjer eit makro F1-poeng med 0,8136 på test data, når det gjer den tredje rekninga ut av 103 tillegg. I underspørsmål B og C brukte vi ein lineær SVM med valte teikn n- gram-funksjonar. For underspørjing C kan systemet vårt identifisera målet for å bruka med eit makro F1- poeng med 0,5243, som reknar det 27te av 65 oppføringar.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan UM- IU@LING Sistem untuk SemEval 2019 Tugas 6: Offens-Eval. Kami mengambil pendekatan campuran untuk mengenalpasti dan kategori ucapan kebencian dalam media sosial. Dalam sub-tanya A, kami tetapkan penyesuaian berdasarkan BERT untuk mengesan kandungan yang menyalahgunakan dalam tweet, mencapai skor makro F1 0.8136 pada data ujian, sehingga mencapai peringkat ketiga daripada 103 penghantaran. Dalam subtanya B dan C, kami menggunakan SVM linear dengan ciri n-gram aksara terpilih. For subtask C, our system could identify the target of abuse with a macro F1 score of 0.5243, ranking it 27th out of 65 submissions.', 'mt': "Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-UM- IU@LING 's system for the SemEval 2019 Task 6: Offens-Eval.  Aħna nieħdu approċċ imħallat biex nidentifikaw u jikkategorizzaw id-diskors tal-mibegħda fil-midja soċjali. Fis-sottomistoqsija A, a ħna rranġajna klassifikatur ibbażat fuq BERT biex nidentifikaw kontenut abbużiv fit-tweets, li kisbu punteġġ makro F1 ta’ 0.8136 fuq id-dejta tat-test, u b’hekk laħqu t-tielet grad minn 103 sottomissjoni. F’sottomistoqsijiet B u C, użajna SVM lineari b’karatteristiċi magħżula n-gramma. Għas-sottomistoqsija C, is-sistema tagħna tista’ tidentifika l-mira tal-abbuż b’punteġġ makro F1 ta’ 0.5243, u tikklassifikaha fis-27 minn 65 sottomissjoni.", 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie UM- IU@LING Sistemul SemEval 2019 Sarcina 6: Offens-Eval. Luăm o abordare mixtă pentru identificarea și clasificarea discursului de ură în rețelele sociale. În subactivitatea A, am reglat fin un clasificator bazat pe BERT pentru a detecta conținutul abuziv în tweet-uri, obținând un scor macro F1 de 0,8136 pe datele de testare, atingând astfel locul 3 din 103 trimiteri. În subactivitățile B și C, am folosit un SVM liniar cu caracteristici n-gram selectate. Pentru subactivitatea C, sistemul nostru ar putea identifica ținta abuzului cu un scor F1 macro de 0,5243, clasificându-l pe locul 27 din 65 de trimiteri.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje UM- IU@LING Sistem za pola Evala 2019. zadatak 6: Offens-Eval. Uzimamo mešan pristup da identifikujemo i kategorišemo govor mržnje u društvenim medijima. U podpitanju A, ispravili smo klasifikatora na BERT-u kako bi otkrili nasilni sadržaj u tweetima, ostvarili makro F1 rezultat od 0,8136 na ispitivanju podataka, tako da postignemo treći red od 103 podataka. U podkazama B i C, koristili smo linearnu SVM sa izabranim karakterima n-gram a. Za podpitanje C, naš sistem bi mogao da identifikuje cilj zlostavljanja sa makrom F1 rezultatom od 0,5243, kojim je 27. od 65 podataka.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තේ UM විස්තර කරන්නේ... IU@LING 2019 සෙම්වේල් වැඩ 6 වැඩේ පද්ධතිය: Offens-eval. අපි සාමාජික මධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමයේ වෛර කතාවක් අඳුරගන්න සහ ක්\u200dරමයක් කරනවා. A සබ්ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන්, අපි BERT පරීක්ෂණ දත්තේ පරීක්ෂණා කරන්න පරීක්ෂණාකරුවෙක් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ බ්\u200dරාජික සාමාන්ත්\u200dරයක් තියෙන්න, මැක් B සහ C සබ්ටැක්ස් වලින්, අපි තෝරාගත් අක්ෂර n- ග්\u200dරාම් අක්ෂර වලින් linear SVM එකක් භාවිත කරනවා. C සබ්ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපේ පද්ධතියට පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ මැක්රෝ F1 ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් 0.5243 වලින් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න, ඒ', 'sv': 'I detta dokument beskrivs UM- IU@LING Systemet för SemEval 2019 Uppgift 6: Offens-Eval. Vi använder ett blandat tillvägagångssätt för att identifiera och kategorisera hatpropaganda i sociala medier. I subaktivitet A finjusterade vi en BERT-baserad klassificerare för att upptäcka missbruk av innehåll i tweets, vilket uppnådde en makro F1 poäng på 0,8136 på testdata och nådde därmed 3:e rankningen av 103 inlämningar. I underaktiviteterna B och C använde vi en linjär SVM med utvalda tecken n-gram funktioner. För underuppgift C kunde vårt system identifiera målet för missbruk med en makro F1 poäng på 0,5243, vilket rankade det 27:e av 65 inlämningar.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் UM விவரிக்கிறது IU@LING SemEval 2019 பணி 6: Offens- Eval. நாங்கள் சமூக ஊடகங்களில் வெறுப்பு பேச்சை கண்டுபிடிக்க மற்றும் வகுக்க ஒரு கலப்பு வழியை எடுத்துக A துணை பணியில், நாம் ஒரு BERT அடிப்படையில் வகுப்பாளரை நன்றாக தேர்ந்தெடுத்துள்ளோம் மேக்ரோ F1 புள்ளியை கண்டுபிடிக்க, சோதனை தகவலில் 0. 8136 புள்ளியை பெற் B மற்றும் C துணை பணிகளில், நாங்கள் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட எழுத்து n- gram குணங்களுடன் ஒரு வரிசை SVM பயன்படுத்தினோம். துணை பணி C க்கு, எங்கள் கணினி மேக்ரோ F1 புள்ளியை 0. 5243 கொண்டு குறிக்க முடியும், 65 கட்டளைகளில் இருந்து 27வதை வரிசைப்படுத்தும்.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ UM کی تعریف کرتا ہے - IU@LING سیسٹم 2019 ٹاکس 6 کے لئے: Offens-Eval. ہم ایک مختلف طریقہ لیتے ہیں کہ سوسیل میڈیا میں نفرت کی بات شناسایی اور کاٹی کریں۔ A subtask میں ہم نے ایک BERT-based classifier کو ٹویٹوں میں فساد پھیلانے کے لئے تنظیم کیا تھا، جو 0.8136 کے مکرو F1 اسکور کو پہنچا رہا تھا، اس طرح 103 مضبوطی سے تیسرے رقم تک پہنچا رہا تھا. ہم نے برگزیدہ کریٹر n-گرم فرصت کے ساتھ ایک لینار SVM کو استعمال کیا۔ اس کے لئے ہماری سیسٹم نے 0.5243 کی مکرو F1 اسکور کے ساتھ مفسد کا موقعیت پہچان سکتا ہے، اس کو 65 مسلمانوں میں سے 27th رینگ کرتا ہے.', 'so': 'Warqadan ayaa ku qoran UM-ka IU@LING nidaamka SemEval 2019 shaqo 6: Offens-Eval. Waxaynu qaadannaa qaab isku qasnaan si aan u aqoonsanno oo aan ugu kala qeybinno hadalka nacaybka ee shabakadda bulshada. Shaqo A, waxaynu si fiican u qornay fasalka BERT si aan u ogaano waxyaabaha isticmaalka ee Tweetka, waxaana gaadhnay koox macro F1 oo ku qoran 0.8136 oo ku saabsan data imtixaanka, sidaa darteed waxaynu gaadhnay darajada 3aad oo ka mid ah 103 submit. In subtasks B and C, we used a linear SVM with selected character n-gram features.  Sababta sub-safka C, nidaamkayagu wuxuu aqoonsan karaa waxyaabaha lagu isticmaalo macro F1 koox 0.5243, waxayna ka mid tahay 27aad oo ka mid ah 65.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz UM haqida IU@LING SemEval 2019 Vazifani 6: Offens-Eval. Biz jamiyat media'da kuch aytishni aniqlash va tayyorlash uchun bir qanchalik usulni boshqaramiz. Ushbu vazifani A bilan bir BERT asosida Twittlarda ta'sirlik tarkibini aniqlash uchun bir darajani yaxshi ko'rsatdik. Biz sinov maʼlumotlarda 0.8136 makro F1 scori topdik. Bu uchun 103 imkoniyatlaridan 3 darajaga yetkazdi. B va C vazifalarda, biz tanlangan belgi n- gram xususiyatlari bilan SVM tarkibini ishlatdik. C'ning tub vazifa uchun, bizning tizimmiz 0.5243 makro F1 scorini aniqlash natijasini ko'rsatishi mumkin, 65 muammolardan 27inchi darajaga ega bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả... IU@LING Hệ thống của SemEvl 209 Task 6: Offens-Evl. Chúng tôi có một cách tiếp cận khác nhau để nhận dạng và phân loại giọng nói ghét trong truyền thông xã hội. Theo phần A, chúng tôi chỉnh lại một nhà phân loại nền BERT để phát hiện nội dung xấu xí trên Twitter, đạt được một số vi phạm F1 trong 0.8136 trên dữ liệu thí nghiệm, và đến mức thứ ba vượt qua 103. Trong phần phụ B và C, chúng tôi dùng SVM tuyến với các tính n ăng n-gram đã chọn. Đối với phần phụ đề C, hệ thống của chúng ta có thể xác định mục tiêu lạm dụng với một số vi phạm F1 của 0.52.43, xếp thứ bảy trong sự đệ trình 85.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва IU@LING Системата на СемЕвал 2019 Задача 6: Одеяния-Евал. Приемаме смесен подход за идентифициране и категоризиране на речта на омразата в социалните медии. В подзадача А финализирахме базиран класификатор за откриване на злоупотребяващо съдържание в туитове, постигайки макрос оценка от 0,8136 на тестовите данни, като по този начин достигнахме 3-то място от 103 подадени. В подзадачите В и В, използвахме линейна СВМ с избрани символни n-грамови функции. За подзадача С, нашата система може да идентифицира целта на злоупотреба с макрос от 0,5243, класирайки я на 27-о място от 65 подадени заявки.', 'da': 'Dette dokument beskriver UM- IU@LING SemEval 2019 Opgave 6: Offens-Eval er en af de mest populære opgaver. Vi har en blandet tilgang til at identificere og kategorisere hadefulde taler i sociale medier. I underopgave A finjusterede vi en BERT-baseret klassificering for at opdage misbrug af indhold i tweets og opnåede en makro F1 score på 0,8136 på testdataene og nåede dermed 3. rang ud af 103 indsendelser. I underopgaver B og C brugte vi en lineær SVM med udvalgte tegn n-gram funktioner. For underopgave C kunne vores system identificere målet for misbrug med en makro F1 score på 0,5243 og placere det 27. ud af 65 indsendelser.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje UM- IU@LING Sistem poluvremenog razdoblja 2019. zadatak 6: Offens-Eval. Uzimamo miješani pristup identificiranju i kategoriziranju govora mržnje u društvenim medijima. U podpitanju A, ispravljali smo klasifikatora koji je osnovan na BERT-u kako bi otkrili nasilni sadržaj u tweetima, ostvarili makro F1 rezultat od 0,8136 na ispitivanju podataka, tako da postignemo treći red od 103 podataka. U podrazumijevanju B i C, koristili smo linearnu SVM sa izabranim znakovima n gram a. Za podpitanje C, naš sustav bi mogao identificirati cilj zlostavljanja s makrom F1 rezultatom od 0,5243, kojim je 27. iz 65 podataka.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft de UM- IU@LING Het systeem van SemEval 2019 Taak 6: Offens-Eval. We hanteren een gemengde aanpak om hate speech in sociale media te identificeren en te categoriseren. In subtaak A hebben we een op BERT gebaseerde classificator verfijnd om misbruikende inhoud in tweets te detecteren, waardoor we een macro F1 score van 0.8136 op de testgegevens bereikten, waardoor we de 3e rang van 103 inzendingen bereikten. In subtaken B en C gebruikten we een lineaire SVM met geselecteerde tekens n-gram eigenschappen. Voor subtaak C kan ons systeem het doelwit van misbruik identificeren met een macro F1 score van 0.5243, die het 27ste van 65 inzendingen rangschikt.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan UM- IU@LING Sistem untuk SemEval 2019 Tugas 6: Offens-Eval. Kami mengambil pendekatan campuran untuk mengidentifikasi dan kategorisasi pidato kebencian di media sosial. In subtask A, we fine-tuned a BERT based classifier to detect abusive content in tweets, achieving a macro F1 score of 0.8136 on the test data, thus reaching the 3rd rank out of 103 submissions.  Dalam subtasks B dan C, kami menggunakan SVM linear dengan karakter n-gram yang dipilih. Untuk subtask C, sistem kita bisa mengidentifikasi sasaran penyalahgunaan dengan skor makro F1 0,5243, mengatur 27 dari 65 pengiriman.', 'ko': '본문에서 이걸 소개했어요-IU@LING2019년 SemEval Task 6 시스템: Offens Eval.우리는 혼합 방법을 채택하여 소셜 미디어 중의 증오 언론을 식별하고 분류한다.서브퀘스트 A에서 우리는 버트 기반 분류기를 미세하게 조정하여 트윗의 남용 내용을 검출했고 테스트 데이터에서 0.8136의 매크로F1 점수를 얻어 103부 제출 중 3위에 올랐다.하위 작업 B와 C에서, 우리는 선택한 문자 n-gram 특징을 가진 선형 지원 벡터기를 사용했다.하위 임무 C에 대해 우리 시스템은 남용된 목표를 식별할 수 있는데 F1 매크로 점수는 0.5243로 65건의 제출 중 27위이다.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt die UM- IU@LING Das System für die SemEval 2019 Task 6: Offens-Eval. Wir verfolgen einen gemischten Ansatz, um Hassreden in sozialen Medien zu identifizieren und zu kategorisieren. In Subtask A haben wir einen BERT-basierten Klassifikator verfeinert, um missbräuchliche Inhalte in Tweets zu erkennen, wodurch ein Makro F1 Score von 0.8136 auf den Testdaten erreicht wurde und somit den dritten Rang unter 103-Einreichungen erreicht wurde. In Teilaufgaben B und C haben wir eine lineare SVM mit ausgewählten Zeichen n-Gramm-Features verwendet. Für Subtask C konnte unser System das Ziel des Missbrauchs mit einem Makro F1 Score von 0.5243 identifizieren und es 27ste von 65 Einreichungen rangieren.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea UM- IU@LING Mfumo wa kazi ya SemEval 2019 6: Uthibitisho wa Offenders. Tunachukua mbinu tofauti ya kutambua na kutenganisha hotuba ya chuki katika mitandao ya kijamii. Katika jukumu la A, tulimfanyia vizuri mkusanyiko wa BERT ili kutambua maudhui ya matumizi yanayotumiwa katika twiti, kwa upatikanaji wa kiwango cha F1 cha 0.8136 cha taarifa za jaribio, kwa hiyo tukafikia daraja la tatu kutoka kwenye ujumbe wa 103. In subtasks B and C, we used a linear SVM with selected character n-gram features.  Kwa jukumu la subira C, mfumo wetu unaweza kutambua lengo la unyanyasaji kwa kiwango kikuu cha F1 cha 0.5243, kinachochea nafasi ya 27 kati ya matamko 65.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ UM را توصیف می\u200cکند IU@LING سیستم مرحله ۲۰۱۹ کار ۶: Offens-Eval. ما یک روش مختلف برای شناسایی و تنظیم سخنرانی از نفرت در رسانه های اجتماعی می گیریم. در زیر سوال A، ما یک کلیسای بنیاد BERT را برای شناسایی محتوای تجاوز در توئیت، با رسیدن یک امتیاز ماکرو F1 از 0.8136 در داده های آزمایش، به سوی درجه سوم از 103 تحویل رسیدیم. در زیر سطح B و C، ما از یک SVM خطی با ویژگی\u200cهای نوشته\u200cای n گرم استفاده کردیم. برای زیر سوال C، سیستم ما می\u200cتواند هدف تجاوز با نمونه\u200cی مکرو F1 0.5243 را شناسایی کند، که 27م از 65 تسلیم شده است.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz UM-ny tassyklaýar IU@LING 's system for the SemEval 2019 Task 6: Offens-Eval. Biz sosial mediýalarda ýigrenýän çykyşyny tanamak we çykmak üçin karmaşgalaşyk bir nusga alýarys. A alt soragynda, BERT tabanly klassifikatçisini tweetlerde hasaplamak üçin, testiň maglumatynda 0,8136 noktasy berip, bu şekilde 103 sahypalardan üçünji dereje berip bardyk. B we C süýşikliklerde saýlanan hatlary üçin bir SVM ullandyk. C alt soraglamak üçin sistemamyz yaramaz netijesi 0,5243 derejesinden 27-nji derejesini belirleyebilir.", 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf die UM- IU@LING Die stelsel vir die semiEval 2019 taak 6: Offens-Eval. Ons neem 'n gemengde toegang om haatspraak in sosiale media te identifiseer en kategoriseer. In subvraag A, ons het 'n BERT gebaseerde klassifiseerder gevind om abusive inhoud in tweets te ontdek, met 'n makro F1 skaal van 0. 8136 op die toets data te bereik, sodat die derde rank uit 103 voorskrifte bereik het. In subtaske B en C, gebruik ons 'n lineêre SVM met gekose karakter n- gram funksies. Vir subvraag C kan ons stelsel die doel van misbruk identifiseer met 'n makro F1 skaal van 0,5243, wat dit 27de van 65 onderskrifte rangeer.", 'sq': 'Kjo letër përshkruan UM- IU@LING Sistemi i SemEval 2019 Task 6: Offens-Eval. Ne marrim një qasje të përzier për të identifikuar dhe kategorizuar fjalimin e urrejtjes në mediat shoqërore. Në nënpyetjen A, ne rregulluam një klasifikues të bazuar në BERT për të zbuluar përmbajtje abuzive në tweet, duke arritur një rezultat makro F1 prej 0.8136 në të dhënat e testit, duke arritur kështu rendin e tretë nga 103 paraqitjet. Në n ënpyetjet B dhe C, ne përdorëm një SVM linear me karaktere të zgjedhur n-gram. Për nënpyetjen C, sistemi ynë mund të identifikojë objektivin e abuzimit me një rezultat makro F1 prej 0.5243, duke e renditur atë të 27-të nga 65 paraqitjet.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ UM-ን ይናገራል፡፡ IU@LING የSemEval 2019 ስራ 6: Offens-Eval. በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ውስጥ ጥላቻን ንግግር ለማሳየትና ለመለያየት የተለያየን ልማድ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በትዊተር አ፣ የBERT ተቃውሞ አካባቢውን ለማግኘት እና የ0.8136 ማክሮ F1 score በመፈተን ዳታ አግኝተናል፡፡ በ B እና C ስራ ውስጥ የተመረጠውን የ-ግራም ፊደል አቀማመጥ ከ65 መልዕክቶች ውስጥ 27ኛ የሆኑትን የ.5243 የ.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է IU@LING 2019 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ"-ի 6. հանձնարարության համակարգը. Մենք տարբեր մոտեցում ենք հասարակական լրատվամիջոցներում ատելության խոսքերի հայտնաբերման և դասակարգման համար: In subtask A, we fine-tuned a BERT based classifier to detect abusive content in tweets, achieving a macro F1 score of 0.8136 on the test data, thus reaching the 3rd rank out of 103 submissions.  B և C ենթահարցերում մենք օգտագործեցինք գծային ԱՎՄ-ը, որը ունի ընտրված n-գրամային հատկություններ: C-ի ենթահարցերի համար մեր համակարգը կարող է ճանաչել չարաշահույթի նպատակը 0.5243 մակրո F1-ի գնահատականով, դասավորելով այն 65-ից 27-ին:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt UM-ni IU@LING SemEval 2019 Görevi 6: Offens-Eval sistemi. Biz sosyal media içində nifrət sözlərini tanıtmaq və seçmək üçün qarışıqlı bir tərzim alırıq. A subtask içində, sınama məlumatlarında 0,8136 makro F1 dəqiqəsini keçirmək üçün BERT tabanlı bir klasifikatçı təyin etdik, buna görə də 103 təkliflərdən üçüncü dərəfə çatdıq. B və C subtasklarında, seçilmiş n-gram karakterləri ilə linear SVM kullandıq. C subtask üçün, sistemimiz istifadə etmək məqsədini 0,5243 makro F1 dərəcəsi ilə tanıyabilir, 65 dərəcəsindən 27-ni dərəcə verir.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu l'UM- IU@LING el sistema del SemEval 2019 tasca 6: Offens-Eval. Prenem un enfocament mixte per identificar i categoritzar el discurs d'odi als mitjans socials. En la subtanya A, vam ajustar un classificador basat en BERT per detectar contingut abusiv en tweets, aconseguint una puntuació macro F1 de 0,8136 a les dades de prova, arribant així al tercer rangde 103 presentacions. En les subtaskes B i C, vam utilitzar un SVM linear amb caracteres n-gram seleccionats. Per a la subterrània C, el nostre sistema podria identificar l'objectiu de l'abús amb una puntuació macro F1 de 0,5243, classificant-la 27ª de cada 65 presentacions.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje UM- IU@LING Systém pro SemEval 2019 Úkol 6: Útočníky-Eval. Používáme smíšený přístup k identifikaci a kategorizaci nenávistných projevů v sociálních médiích. V podúkolu A jsme vyladili klasifikátor založený na BERT pro detekci zneužívajícího obsahu ve tweetech, čímž jsme dosáhli makro F1 skóre 0,8136 na testovacích datech, čímž jsme dosáhli třetí hodnoty z 103 příspěvků. V podúkolech B a C jsme použili lineární SVM s vybranými znaky n-gramovými prvky. U podúkolů C by náš systém mohl identifikovat cíl zneužití s makro F1 skóre 0,5243 a hodnotit ho 27tým ze 65 příspěvků.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse UMi- IU@LING Süsteem SemEval 2019 ülesande 6 jaoks: kuriteod-eval. Me kasutame segast lähenemisviisi vihakõne tuvastamiseks ja kategoriseerimiseks sotsiaalmeedias. Alaülesandes A täpsustasime BERT-põhist klassifikaatorit, et tuvastada väärkohtlemist säutsudes, saavutades makro F1 skoori 0,8136 testiandmetel, jõudes seega kolmandale kohale 103 esitatud tulemusest. Alaülesannetes B ja C kasutasime lineaarset SVM-i valitud märgi n-grammi funktsioonidega. Alaülesande C puhul võiks meie süsteem tuvastada kuritarvitamise sihtmärgi makro F1 skooriga 0,5243, asetades selle 65 esitatud tulemusest 27. kohale.', 'fi': 'Tässä asiakirjassa kuvataan IU@LING SemEval 2019 Task 6: Offens-Eval -ohjelman järjestelmä. Käytämme sekalaista lähestymistapaa vihapuheen tunnistamiseen ja luokitteluun sosiaalisessa mediassa. Alatehtävässä A hienosäädimme BERT-pohjaisen luokittelijan havaitsemaan väärinkäyttävän sisällön tweeteissä ja saavutimme makron F1 pisteen 0,8136 testitiedoissa, jolloin saavutimme kolmannen sijan 103 lähetyksestä. Alatehtävissä B ja C käytimme lineaarista SVM:ää, jossa on valittuja n-gramman ominaisuuksia. Alatehtävän C osalta järjestelmämme pystyi tunnistamaan väärinkäytön kohteen makron F1 pisteellä 0,5243, mikä sijoittuu 27. sijalle 65 lähetyksestä.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje UM- IU@LING Sistem za pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 6: Offens-Eval. Mi uzimamo mešan pristup da identificiramo i kategoriziramo govor mržnje u društvenim medijima. U podpitanju A, ispravili smo klasifikatora koji je baziran na BERT-u kako bi otkrili nasilni sadržaj u tweetima, ostvarili makro F1 rezultat od 0,8136 na ispitivanju podataka, tako da postignemo treći red od 103 podataka. U podrazumijevanju B i C, koristili smo linearnu SVM sa izabranim karakterima n-gram a. Za podpitanje C, naš sistem bi mogao identificirati cilj zlostavljanja sa makrom F1 rezultatom od 0,5243, kojim je 27. iz 65 podataka.', 'bn': "এই পত্রিকা UM-কে বর্ণনা করেছে- IU@LING 's system for the SemEval 2019 Task 6: Offens-Eval.  সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে ঘৃণা ভাষণ চিহ্নিত এবং বিভক্ত করার জন্য আমরা একটি মিশ্রিত উপায় নেই। সাবক্ষেত্র A-এ আমরা টুইটে ভিত্তিক বিবেরেট ভিত্তিক বিষয়বস্তু সনাক্ত করার জন্য ভালোভাবে পরীক্ষা করেছিলাম। টুইটের মধ্যে নির্যাতনের বিষয়বস্তু খুঁজে বের করে বি এবং সি সাবটাসে আমরা নির্বাচিত অক্ষর n-gram বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করেছি। সাবক্ষেত্র সি-এর জন্য আমাদের সিস্টেমের নির্যাতনের লক্ষ্যবস্তুকে চিহ্নিত করতে পারে যে ম্যাক্রো এফ১ স্কোরের মাধ্যমে নির্যাতন", 'jv': "Pametuné iki rambaran bakal nge UT- IU@LING 's Sistem kanggo seminval 2011 task 6: offen-inval. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing dibenakake kanggo ngilangno karo kategori sing nganggep kuwi media sotiki. Rasané A, awake dhéwé ngerasai pernik BERT sing basa dadi, dadi sing nyimpen pernik abagadi kanggo tuytir, sinau pernik macro F1 sing wis 0.8 So long Terus alih mbukak C, sistem punika dipoleh kanggo langgar tarjamahan kanggo ngilanggar macro F1 punika 0.5, sampeyan tanggal uga sabanjur 75 sumulasi", 'ha': "Wannan karatasi yana bayyana UM- IU@LING @ item: inmenu Tuna sami hanya da haɗiya dõmin mu gane kuma mu rarraba magana na ƙi a cikin mitandai da jamii. A cikin sub-aikin A, muka sami wani mai bambanci na BERT dõmin ya gane maɓallin abuse cikin Twitter, kuma muka sami makaro F1 score 0.8136 kan jarraba data, kamar haka muka sami daraja na uku daga silsiliyoyin 103. In sub-aikin B da C, mun yi amfani da wata SvM mai tsaye da wasu fassarar n-gram n a zaɓen. Ga sub-aikin C, ma'anarmu zai iya gane abun bayani na macro F1 score 0.5243, tare da shi 27 daga 65 siliyar.", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את UM- IU@LING המערכת של חצי המערכה 2019 משימה 6: Offens-Eval. We take a mixed approach to identify and categorize hate speech in social media.  בתת-שאלה א, הצגנו מעצב מבוסס על BERT כדי לזהות תוכן מתעללות בטוויטים, להשיג נקודת מקרו F1 של 0.8136 על נתוני הבדיקה, כך להשיג את הדרגה השלישית מתוך 103 השימושים. בשאלות תת B ו-C, השתמשנו באSVM לינרית עם תווים n-גרם בוחרים. עבור תחת שאלה סי, המערכת שלנו יכולה לזהות את המטרה של התעללות עם נקודת מקרו F1 של 0.5243, מצוות את זה ב-27 מתוך 65 הצעות.', 'sk': 'Ta dokument opisuje UM- IU@LING Sistem za nalogo 6 SemEval 2019: Offens-Eval. Za prepoznavanje in kategorizacijo sovražnega govora v družbenih omrežjih uporabljamo mešan pristop. V podopravilu A smo natančno nastavili klasifikator, ki temelji na BERT-u, da bi zaznali zlorabljajočo vsebino v tweetih in dosegli oceno makro F1 0,8136 na testnih podatkih, s čimer smo dosegli 3. mesto od 103 prispevkov. V podopravilih B in C smo uporabili linearni SVM z izbranimi znakom n-gramskimi funkcijami. Za podopravilo C bi lahko naš sistem identificiral cilj zlorabe z oceno makro F1 0,5243, kar bi ga uvrstilo na 27. mesto od 65 prijav.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་UM-འདི་སྒྲིག་བཞིན་པ་ IU@LING དེ་ནི་SemEval 2019 ལྟ་བུའི་མིང་གི་དོན་ལྡན་༦：ཕྱིར་ཉེན་ལྡན་པ། ང་ཚོས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་ཐོག་ནས་དབྱིབས་དགའ་ཕྱོགས་འདྲི་བ་ཞིག་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། In subtask A, we fine-tuned a BERT based classifier to detect abusive content in tweets, achieving a macro F1 score of 0.8136 on the test data, thus reaching the 3rd rank out of 103 submissions. A subtask A, we fine-tuned a BERT based classifier to detect abusive content in tweets. subtasks B and C ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་བདམས་ཟིན་པའི་ཡིག་འབྲུ་n-gram་ཆ་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཡོད་པའི་linear SVM་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་བྱས། འདིའི་ནང་གི་ཕྱོགས་སྐོར་ལྟར་ན། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རྩིས་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཨང་གྲངས་(0.5243)ཞིག་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'YNUWB at SemEval-2019 Task 6 : K-max pooling CNN with average meta-embedding for identifying offensive language', 'fr': 'YNUWB au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 6\xa0: K-max met en commun CNN avec un méta-intégration moyen pour identifier le langage offensant', 'pt': 'YNUWB no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 6: K-max agrupando CNN com meta-incorporação média para identificar linguagem ofensiva', 'ar': 'YNUWB في SemEval-2019 المهمة 6: K-max تجمع CNN مع متوسط التضمين التلوي لتحديد اللغة الهجومية', 'es': 'YNUWB en la Tarea 6 de Semeval-2019: K-max pone en común CNN con metaincrustación promedio para identificar el lenguaje ofensivo', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のYNUWBタスク6 ：攻撃的な言語を識別するための平均メタ埋め込みを備えたK最大プーリングCNN', 'zh': 'YNUWB在SemEval-2019务6:K-max池化CNN与均元嵌,以识犯言', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 6 पर YNUWB: आक्रामक भाषा की पहचान करने के लिए औसत मेटा-एम्बेडिंग के साथ K-max पूलिंग सीएनएन', 'ru': 'YNUWB на SemEval-2019 Задача 6: K-max объединяет CNN со средним мета-встраиванием для идентификации оскорбительного языка', 'ga': 'YNUWB ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 6: K-max ag comhthiomsú CNN le meiteabúchadh meánach chun teanga maslach a aithint', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εργασία 6: Συγκέντρωση του ΚΝΝ με μέση μετα-ενσωμάτωση για τον προσδιορισμό προσβλητικής γλώσσας', 'hu': 'YNUWB a SemEval-2019 6. feladat: K-max összevonása a CNN átlagos metabeágyazással a sértő nyelv azonosításához', 'it': 'YNUWB a SemEval-2019 Task 6: K-max mette in comune CNN con meta-embedding medio per identificare il linguaggio offensivo', 'lt': 'YNUWB 2010–2019 m. puslapyje 6 užduotis: K-max sujungti CNN su vidutiniu meta įterpimu, kad būtų galima nustatyti offensinę kalbą', 'mk': 'YNUWB на SemEval-2019 задача 6: K-max спојување на CNN со просечно мета-вградување за идентификување на офанзивниот јазик', 'kk': 'YNUWB шегінші тапсырма 6: K- max pooling CNN жалпы тілді анықтау үшін орташа мета- ендіру', 'ms': 'YNUWB di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: K-max mengumpulkan CNN dengan meta-embedding rata-rata untuk mengenalpasti bahasa serangan', 'mn': 'YNUWB at SemEval-2019 Task 6: K-max pooling CNN with average meta-embedding for identifying offensive language', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 6: കെ- മാക്സ് പൂളിങ്ങ് സിഎന്\u200d- എംഎംഎംബിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ സാധാരണ മെറ്റ്- എംബെങ്ങിങ്ങ് ആക്രമണഭാ', 'mt': 'YNUWB f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 6: K-max pooling CNN b’meta-embedding medju għall-identifikazzjoni tal-lingwa offensiva', 'no': 'YNUWB på semiEval-2019 Oppgåve 6: K-max pooling CNN med gjennomsnittlig meta-embedding for identifisering av offensivspråk', 'pl': 'YNUWB na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 6: K-max pooling CNN ze średnim meta-embedding w celu identyfikacji języka obraźliwego', 'ro': 'YNUWB la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 6: K-max pune în comun CNN cu meta-încorporarea medie pentru identificarea limbajului ofensator', 'sr': 'YNUWB na semiEval-2019 Task 6: K-max okupljanje CNN sa prosječnim metaintegracijom za identifikaciju ofanzivnog jezika', 'si': 'YNWB at HalfEvel-2019 Job 6: K-max pooling CNN', 'so': 'YNUWB-da SemEval-2019 Shaqada 6: K-max pooling CNN with average meta-embedding for identifying luqada wax dhaca', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019ல் YNUWB செயல் 6: K- max pooling CNN with average meta- embedding for identifying offensive language', 'sv': 'YNUWB på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 6: K-max sammanför CNN med genomsnittlig meta-inbäddning för att identifiera stötande språk', 'ur': 'YNUWB نصم Eval-2019 ٹاکس 6: K-max pooling CNN with average meta-embedding for identifying offensive language', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tập hợp National với ô nhiễm trung bình để xác định ngôn ngữ tấn công', 'bg': 'Задача 6: К-макс обединяване на CNN със средно мета вграждане за идентифициране на обиден език', 'da': 'YNUWB ved SemEval-2019 Opgave 6: K-max samler CNN med gennemsnitlig meta-indlejring for at identificere krænkende sprog', 'nl': 'YNUWB bij SemEval-2019 Taak 6: K-max pooling CNN met gemiddelde meta-embedding voor het identificeren van aanstootgevende taal', 'hr': 'YNUWB na semiEval-2019 zadatak 6: K-max pooling CNN s prosječnim meta-ugrađenjem za identifikaciju ofanzivnog jezika', 'id': 'YNUWB di SemEval-2019 Tugas 6: K-max pooling CNN dengan rata-rata meta-embedding untuk mengidentifikasi bahasa offensive', 'de': 'YNUWB bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 6: K-max Pooling CNN mit durchschnittlicher Meta-Einbettung zur Identifizierung offensiver Sprache', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019년의 YNUWB 퀘스트 6: K-max는 CNN과 평균원을 결합하여 공격적인 언어를 식별하는 데 사용', 'tr': 'YNUWB at SemEval-2019 Task 6: K-max pooling CNN with average meta-embedding for identifying offensive language', 'fa': 'YNUWB در کار ششم ۲۰۱۹: K-max pooling CNN with average meta-embedding for identifying offensive language', 'sw': 'YNUWB at SemEval-2019 Task 6: K-max pooling CNN with average meta-embedding for identifying offensive language', 'af': 'YNUWB by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 6: K-max pooling CNN met gemiddelde meta-inbêring vir identifiseer offensive taal', 'am': 'ስራ 6:', 'sq': 'YNUWB në SemEval-2019 Task 6: K-max pooling CNN with average meta-embedding for identifying offensive language', 'hy': 'YNwB-ը, ՍեմԷվալ-2019-ի 6. հանձնարարությունը. K-MAX-ը համախմբում է CNN-ը միջին մետա-ներգրավված լեզու հայտնաբերելու համար', 'az': 'YNUWB at SemEval-2019 Task 6: K-max pooling CNN with average meta-embedding for identifying offensive language', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের ৬: কে-ম্যাক্স পুলিং সিএনএন-এর সাধারণ মেট-এমপেডিং চিহ্নিত করার জন্য', 'bs': 'YNUWB na semiEval-2019 Task 6: K-max pooling CNN sa prosječnim meta-integracijom za identifikaciju ofanzivnog jezika', 'cs': 'YNUWB na SemEval-2019 Úkol 6: K-max sdružení CNN s průměrným meta-embedováním pro identifikaci urážlivého jazyka', 'et': 'YNUWB SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 6: K-max ühendab CNN keskmise metamanustamisega solvava keele tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'YNUWB SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 6: K-max yhdistää CNN:n keskimääräiseen metaupotukseen loukkaavan kielen tunnistamiseksi', 'ca': 'YNUWB a SemEval-2019 Task 6: K-max agrupant CNN amb metaintegració mitjana per identificar llenguatges ofensius', 'jv': 'YNUWB at semiAvel-2011 task 6: K-maximum pool MTR with medium meta-embedding for ID', 'sk': 'YNUWB na SemEval-2019 Naloga 6: K-max združevanje CNN s povprečno meta-vdelavo za prepoznavanje žaljivega jezika', 'bo': 'YNUWB at SemEval-2019 Task 6: K-max pooling CNN with average meta-embedding for identifying offensive language', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'he': 'YNUWB ב SemEval-2019 משימה 6: K-max ביחד CNN עם מטה-קישור ממוצע לזהות שפה פגיעה'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the system submitted to SemEval 2019 Task 6 : OffensEval 2019. The task aims to identify and categorize offensive language in social media, we only participate in Sub-task A, which aims to identify offensive language. In order to address this task, we propose a system based on a K-max pooling convolutional neural network model, and use an argument for averaging as a valid meta-embedding technique to get a metaembedding. Finally, we also use a cyclic learning rate policy to improve model performance. Our model achieves a Macro F1-score of 0.802 (ranked 9/103) in the Sub-task A.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة النظام المقدم إلى SemEval 2019 Task 6: OffensEval 2019. وتهدف المهمة إلى تحديد وتصنيف اللغة المسيئة في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ، ونحن نشارك فقط في المهمة الفرعية أ ، والتي تهدف إلى تحديد اللغة الهجومية. من أجل معالجة هذه المهمة ، نقترح نظامًا يعتمد على نموذج شبكة عصبية تلافيفية تجمع K-max ، ونستخدم حجة للتوسيط كأسلوب صالح لتضمين meta للحصول على metaembedding. أخيرًا ، نستخدم أيضًا سياسة معدل التعلم الدوري لتحسين أداء النموذج. يحقق نموذجنا درجة ماكرو F1 تبلغ 0.802 (المرتبة 9/103) في المهمة الفرعية أ.', 'pt': 'Este trabalho descreve o sistema submetido à Tarefa 6 do SemEval 2019: OffensEval 2019. A tarefa visa identificar e categorizar linguagem ofensiva em mídias sociais, participamos apenas da Subtarefa A, que visa identificar linguagem ofensiva. Para resolver esta tarefa, propomos um sistema baseado em um modelo de rede neural convolucional K-max pooling, e usamos um argumento para a média como uma técnica válida de meta-incorporação para obter uma meta-incorporação. Por fim, também usamos uma política de taxa de aprendizado cíclica para melhorar o desempenho do modelo. Nosso modelo atinge uma pontuação Macro F1 de 0,802 (classificado 9/103) na Subtarefa A.', 'es': 'Este documento describe el sistema presentado a SemEval 2019 Tarea 6: OffensEval 2019. La tarea tiene como objetivo identificar y categorizar el lenguaje ofensivo en las redes sociales, solo participamos en la Subtarea A, que tiene como objetivo identificar el lenguaje ofensivo. Para abordar esta tarea, proponemos un sistema basado en un modelo de red neuronal convolucional de agrupación K-max, y utilizamos un argumento para promediar como una técnica válida de metaincrustación para obtener una metaincrustación. Por último, también utilizamos una política de tasa de aprendizaje cíclico para mejorar el rendimiento del modelo. Nuestro modelo logra una puntuación Macro F1 de 0.802 (en el puesto 9/103) en la subtarea A.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le système soumis à SemEval 2019 Task 6\xa0: OffenseVal 2019. La tâche vise à identifier et à catégoriser le langage offensant dans les médias sociaux, nous participons uniquement à la sous-tâche A, qui vise à identifier le langage offensant. Afin de répondre à cette tâche, nous proposons un système basé sur un modèle de réseau de neurones convolutif de regroupement K-max, et utilisons un argument pour la moyenne comme technique valide de méta-intégration pour obtenir un méta-enrobage. Enfin, nous utilisons également une politique de taux d'apprentissage cyclique pour améliorer les performances du modèle. Notre modèle obtient un score Macro F1 de 0,802 (classé 9/103) dans la sous-tâche A.", 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2019 Task 6: OffensEval 2019に提出されたシステムについて説明します。このタスクは、ソーシャルメディアで不快な言葉を特定し、分類することを目的としています。私たちは不快な言葉を特定することを目的としたサブタスクAにのみ参加しています。このタスクに対処するために、K - maxプール畳み込みニューラルネットワークモデルに基づいたシステムを提案し、メタ埋め込みを得るための有効なメタ埋め込みテクニックとして平均化のための引数を使用します。最後に、モデルのパフォーマンスを向上させるために循環学習率ポリシーも使用します。当社のモデルは、サブタスクAで0.802 （ランク9/103 ）のマクロF 1スコアを達成します。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval 2019 कार्य 6: OffensEval 2019 के लिए प्रस्तुत सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है। कार्य का उद्देश्य सोशल मीडिया में आक्रामक भाषा की पहचान करना और वर्गीकृत करना है, हम केवल उप-कार्य ए में भाग लेते हैं, जिसका उद्देश्य आक्रामक भाषा की पहचान करना है। इस कार्य को संबोधित करने के लिए, हम एक के-मैक्स पूलिंग कनवल्शनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क मॉडल के आधार पर एक प्रणाली का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, और मेटाएम्बेडिंग प्राप्त करने के लिए एक वैध मेटा-एम्बेडिंग तकनीक के रूप में औसत के लिए एक तर्क का उपयोग करते हैं। अंत में, हम मॉडल प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने के लिए एक चक्रीय सीखने की दर नीति का भी उपयोग करते हैं। हमारा मॉडल उप-कार्य A में 0.802 (रैंक 9/103) का मैक्रो F1-स्कोर प्राप्त करता है।', 'zh': '本文引SemEval 2019 Task 6:OffensEval 2019之统。 职在识类社交媒体犯性言语,惟与子职A,其志在犯言。 为此一事,立K-max池化卷积神经网络模形之统,而以均为有效元之参数以得元嵌。 最后,我们还用循环学习速率策策来崇模样。 子职 A 成 0.802 Macro F1 得分(名 9/103)。', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе описывается система, представленная SemEval 2019 Task 6: OffensEval 2019. Задача направлена на выявление и классификацию оскорбительных выражений в социальных сетях, мы участвуем только в подзадаче А, которая направлена на выявление оскорбительных выражений. Для решения этой задачи мы предлагаем систему, основанную на модели сверточной нейронной сети с объединением K-max, и используем аргумент для усреднения в качестве допустимого метода встраивания метаданных для получения встраивания метаданных. Наконец, мы также используем политику циклической скорости обучения для улучшения эффективности модели. В подзадаче А наша модель достигает макрос F1 - 0,802 (рейтинг 9/103).', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcóras a cuireadh faoi bhráid SemEval 2019 Tasc 6: OffensEval 2019. Tá sé mar aidhm ag an tasc teanga ionsaitheach a aithint agus a chatagóiriú sna meáin shóisialta, ní ghlacaimid ach le Fothasc A, a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige teanga ionsaitheach a aithint. Chun dul i ngleic leis an tasc seo, molaimid córas bunaithe ar shamhail de líonra comhthiomsaithe néarúil K-max, agus úsáidimid argóint ar son an meánaithe mar theicníc bhailí meitea-leabaithe chun meiteabhrú a fháil. Ar deireadh, bainimid úsáid freisin as beartas ráta foghlama timthriallach chun feidhmíocht na samhla a fheabhsú. Baineann ár múnla amach scór Macra F1 de 0.802 (rangaithe 9/103) san Fhothasc A.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნტის სისტემა, რომელიც SemEval 2019 წლის სამუშაო დავალება 6: OffensEval 2019. დავალების მიზეზი იდენტიფიკაცია და კატეგორიზაცია საზოგადო მედიაში, ჩვენ მხოლოდ საზოგადო A საზოგადო დავათავსდებით, რომელიც მიზეზიან იდენტიფიკაცია საფ ამ დავალების შესახებ, ჩვენ კონტუალური ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელზე დაბაზეული სისტემის შესახებ გამოყენებთ, და მეტაბეჭდომის შესახებ მეტაბეჭდომა ტექნექტიკის გარეშე არგუმენტის გამოყ საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ ასევე გამოყენებთ სიკლიკური სწავლების პოლიტიკა, რომელიც მოდელური მუშაობის გასაკეთებლად. ჩვენი მოდელი მიიღება მაკრო F1-სოფლიო 0.802-ის (რედაქტირებულია 9/103) სამუშაო სამუშაო A-ში.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2019 feladat 6: OffensEval 2019-re benyújtott rendszert. A feladat célja a sértő nyelv azonosítása és kategorizálása a közösségi médiában, kizárólag a sértő nyelv azonosítására irányuló "A" alcsoportban veszünk részt. Ennek a feladatnak a megoldása érdekében egy K-max pooling konvuluális neurális hálózati modellre épülő rendszert javasolunk, és egy érvényes metabeágyazási technikát használunk a metabeágyazás érdekében. Végezetül ciklikus tanulási ráta-politikát is alkalmazunk a modell teljesítményének javítására. Modellünk elérte a Macro F1 pontszámot 0,802 (9/103) az A alcsoportban.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα που υποβλήθηκε στο έργο 6: Εγκληματολογικό 2019. Η εργασία στοχεύει στον εντοπισμό και την κατηγοριοποίηση προσβλητικής γλώσσας στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης, συμμετέχουμε μόνο στην Υποεργασία Α, η οποία στοχεύει στον εντοπισμό προσβλητικής γλώσσας. Προκειμένου να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το έργο, προτείνουμε ένα σύστημα βασισμένο σε ένα μοντέλο συσσώρευσης νευρωνικού δικτύου Κ-max, και χρησιμοποιούμε ένα όρισμα για τον μέσο όρο ως έγκυρη τεχνική μετα-ενσωμάτωσης για να έχουμε μια μετα-ενσωμάτωση. Τέλος, χρησιμοποιούμε επίσης μια κυκλική πολιτική ποσοστού μάθησης για τη βελτίωση των επιδόσεων του μοντέλου. Το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει μακρο F1-βαθμολογία 0.802 (κατάταξη 9/103) στην Υποεργασία Α.', 'it': 'Questo articolo descrive il sistema presentato a SemEval 2019 Task 6: OffensEval 2019. Il compito mira a identificare e categorizzare il linguaggio offensivo nei social media, partecipiamo solo al Sottocompito A, che mira a identificare il linguaggio offensivo. Per affrontare questo compito, proponiamo un sistema basato su un modello di rete neurale convoluzionale K-max pooling, e usiamo un argomento per la media come una valida tecnica di meta-embedding per ottenere un metaembedding. Infine, utilizziamo anche una politica del tasso di apprendimento ciclico per migliorare le prestazioni dei modelli. Il nostro modello raggiunge un punteggio Macro F1 di 0.802 (classificato 9/103) nel Sottocompito A.', 'mk': 'Овој документ го опишува системот поднесен на SemEval 2019 задача 6: OffensEval 2019. Оваа задача има за цел идентификување и категоризација на офанзивниот јазик во социјалните медиуми, ние учествуваме само во подзадачата А, која има за цел идентификување на офанзивниот јазик. За да ја решиме оваа задача, предлагаме систем базиран на K-max спојувачки конволуционален модел на невројална мрежа, и користиме аргумент за просекување како валидна мета-вградена техника за да добиеме мета-вградување. Конечно, исто така, користиме политика за цикличка стапка на учење за подобрување на моделните резултати. Нашиот модел постигнува Макро Ф1 оценка од 0,802 (рангирано 9/103) во подзадачата А.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2019 жылдың шегінші тапсырмасына жүйені: OffensEval 2019 жүйені таңдайды. Тапсырманың мақсаты, социалдық медиақтағы ақпараттық тілді анықтау және санаттық тілді анықтау және санаттық, біз тек A- тапсырманың субтапсырмасына қатысу үшін қатысулы болады Бұл тапсырманы шешу үшін K- max жинақталған неврал желінің моделіне негізделген жүйесін жұмыс істеп, мета- ендіру үшін дұрыс мета- ендіру техникасы ретінде орташа аргументті қолданамыз. Соңында біз басқа цикликалық үйрену жылдамдығын үлгілеу үшін қолданамыз. Біздің үлгіміз A ішкі тапсырмасында 0,802 (9/103 ретінде) Макро F1- нәтижесін жеткізеді.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma sistema, pateikta 2010 m. SemEval 6 uždaviniui „OffensEval 2019“. Šios užduoties tikslas – nustatyti ir suskirstyti pažeidžiamąją kalbą social in ėje žiniasklaidoje, mes dalyvaujame tik A poskirsnyje, kuriame siekiama nustatyti pažeidžiamąją kalbą. Siekdami išspręsti šią užduotį, siūlome sistemą, pagrįstą K-max konvoliucinio nervinio tinklo modeliu, ir pasinaudosime argumentu vidurkiui nustatyti kaip tinkamą meta įterpimo metodą metaįterpimui gauti. Galiausiai mes taip pat naudojame ciklinio mokymosi kurso politiką modelio rezultatams gerinti. Mūsų modelis pasiekia 0,802 (9/103 laipsnio) makro F1 rezultatą A poskirsnyje.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem yang dihantar ke SemEval 2019 Tugas 6: OffensEval 2019. Tugas ini bertujuan untuk mengenalpasti dan kategori bahasa serangan dalam media sosial, kita hanya berpartisipasi dalam Sub-tugas A, yang bertujuan untuk mengenalpasti bahasa serangan. Untuk mengatasi tugas ini, kami cadangkan sistem berdasarkan model rangkaian saraf konvolusi K-max, dan gunakan argumen untuk mejaringan sebagai teknik meta-embedding yang sah untuk mendapatkan metaembedding. Akhirnya, kita juga menggunakan polisi kadar belajar siklik untuk meningkatkan prestasi model. Model kita mencapai skor-F1 Macro 0.802 (tertinggi 9/103) dalam Sub-tugas A.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ജോലി 6: ഓഫെന്\u200dസ്\u200cവാല്\u200d 2019 കൊടുത്ത സിസ്റ്റം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. സാമൂഹിക മാധ്യമങ്ങളില്\u200d ശക്തിയുള്ള ഭാഷ തിരിച്ചറിയുകയും വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ ലക്ഷ്യം നമുക്ക് സബ് ജോല ഈ ജോലിയെ വിവരമറിയാന്\u200d വേണ്ടിയാണ് നാം ഒരു കെ-മാക്സ് സിസ്റ്റം പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്, ഒരു ക്യൂമ്പ്യൂട്ടല്\u200d നെറുറല്\u200d നെറ്റല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമ അവസാനം, നമുക്കൊരു സൈക്കിളിക്ക് പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഹേറ്റ് പോലീസ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. മോഡല്\u200d പ്രകട ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d സൂബ് ജോലി A-ല്\u200d ഒരു മാക്രോ F1-സ്കോര്\u200d പ്രാപിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema ppreżentata lil SemEval 2019 Task 6: OffensEval 2019. Il-kompitu għandu l-għan li jidentifika u jikkategorizza l-lingwa offensiva fil-midja soċjali, aħna qed jipparteċipaw biss fis-Subkompitu A, li għandu l-għan li jidentifika l-lingwa offensiva. Sabiex nindirizzaw dan il-kompitu, nipproponu sistema bbażata fuq mudell tan-netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali li jiġbor flimkien K-max, u nużaw argument għall-medja bħala teknika valid a ta’ meta-inkorporazzjoni biex jinkiseb metainkorporazzjoni. Finally, we also use a cyclic learning rate policy to improve model performance.  Il-mudell tagħna jikseb punteġġ Makro F1 ta’ 0.802 (klassifikat 9/103) fis-Subkompitu A.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас 2019 оны SemEval 2019-д өгсөн ажил 6: OffensEval 2019 онд тайлбарладаг. Үүний зорилго нь нийгмийн мэдээлэл дээр зөвхөн А-н суб-даалгавар дээр оролцож буй хүмүүсийг тодорхойлж, хувьсгал хэлний тухай тодорхойлдох зорилготой. Энэ үйлдлийн тухай ярихын тулд бид K-max хадгалах боломжтой мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загвар дээр суурилсан системийг санал дэвшүүлнэ. Мөн мета-хадгалах техник болгон дунджаар аргумент ашиглаж байна. Эцэст нь бид мөн циклик суралцах хурдын бодлого ашиглаж загварын үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулахын тулд. Бидний загвар нь A-ын суб-даалгаварт 0.802 (9/103) Макро F1 оноо гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje system zgłoszony do SemEval 2019 Zadanie 6: OffenEval 2019. Zadanie ma na celu identyfikację i kategoryzację języka obraźliwego w mediach społecznościowych, uczestniczymy tylko w Podzadaniu A, którego celem jest identyfikacja języka obraźliwego. Aby rozwiązać to zadanie, proponujemy system oparty na modelu K-max pooling konwolucyjnej sieci neuronowej i używamy argumentu uśrednienia jako ważnej metody meta-embeddingu, aby uzyskać metaembedding. Wreszcie stosujemy również cykliczną politykę wskaźnika uczenia się, aby poprawić wydajność modelu. Nasz model osiąga makro F1 wynik 0.802 (ranking 9/103) w podzadaniu A.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem podignut semiEvalu 2019. zadatak 6: OffensEval 2019. Цел је да идентифицирамо и категорирамо обидни језик у социалним средима, само участвамо у подзадачи A, који има цел да идентифицирамо обидни језик. Da bi se riješili ovaj zadatak, predlažemo sistem baziran na konvolucionalnom modelu K-max okupljanja neuralne mreže, i koristimo argument za prosječavanje kao validnu metodu metaintegriranja kako bi dobili metaintegraciju. Na kraju, takođe koristimo politiku za stopu cikličkog učenja kako bi poboljšali model. Naš model postiže makro F1 rezultat 0,802 (ranked 9/103) u podzadatku A.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul transmis SemEval 2019 Task 6: OffensEval 2019. Sarcina urmărește identificarea și clasificarea limbajului ofensator în rețelele sociale, participăm doar la Subsarcina A, care urmărește identificarea limbajului ofensator. Pentru a aborda această sarcină, propunem un sistem bazat pe un model de rețea neuronală convoluțională K-max pooling și folosim un argument pentru medie ca o tehnică validă de meta-încorporare pentru a obține o metaîncorporare. În cele din urmă, folosim, de asemenea, o politică privind rata de învățare ciclică pentru a îmbunătăți performanța modelului. Modelul nostru obține un scor Macro F1 de 0.802 (clasat 9/103) în Subsarcina A.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet som er sendt til semiEval 2019 oppgåve 6: OffensEval 2019. Oppgåva måtar å identifisera og kategorisera offensivspråk i sosiale medier, og vi bare deltar i Sub-task A, som måtar å identifisera offensivspråk. For å adressa denne oppgåva, foreslår vi eit systemet basert på ein K-max pooling konvolusjonell neuralnettverksmodell, og bruk eit argument for å gjennomsnitt som ein gyldig meta-innebygging teknikk for å få ein meta-innebygging. I slutt bruker vi også ein syklisk læringsrate-politikk for å forbetra modellen. Modellen vårt oppnår eit makro F1- poeng med 0,802 (rankert 9/103) i underoppgåva A.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ සෙම්වෙල් 2019 වැඩේ 6: Offenseval 2019 වැඩේ දාලා තියෙන පද්ධතිය විස්තර කරනවා. සාමාජික භාෂාව සාමාජික මිඩියාවේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් තියෙන්න සහ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් තියෙන්න සහ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක්  මේ කාර්යය විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි K- max pooling සම්පූර්ණ න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය මොඩේල් එක අධාරිත පද්ධතියක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම සමාන්\u200dය මෙටා- ඇ අන්තිමට, අපි සයික්ලික් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා මොඩේල් වැඩි කරන්න. අපේ මොඩේල් එකේ මැක්රෝ F1-ප්\u200dරමාණයක් 0.80ක් වෙනුවෙන් (9/103 ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වෙනුවෙන්) A ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන්.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver systemet som skickats in till SemEval 2019 Uppgift 6: OffensEval 2019. Uppgiften syftar till att identifiera och kategorisera kränkande språk i sociala medier, vi deltar endast i Underuppgift A, som syftar till att identifiera kränkande språk. För att hantera denna uppgift föreslår vi ett system baserat på en K-max pooling konvulutional neural nätverksmodell, och använder ett argument för medelvärde som en giltig metainbäddningsteknik för att få en metainbäddning. Slutligen använder vi också en politik för cyklisk inlärning för att förbättra modellprestanda. Vår modell uppnår en makro F1-poäng på 0,802 (rankad 9/103) i deluppgift A.', 'so': 'This paper describes the system submitted to SemEval 2019 Task 6: OffensEval 2019.  Shaqada waxaa loogu talagalay inuu aqoonsado oo ku kala qeybeeyo luqada caafimaadka ee shabakadda bulshada, waxaynu ka qeybqaadannaa shaqada hoose A, taas oo aimo in la aqoonsado luqada caafimaadka ah. Si a an u qabsado shuqulkaas, waxaan u soo jeedaynaa nidaam ku saleysan K-max oo ku qoran model shabakadda neurada oo dhan, waxaana isticmaalaynaa warqad ku saabsan si uu ugu shaqeeyo teknikada meta-ka-gudaha si uu u helo meta-ka. Ugu dambaysta waxaynu sidoo kale isticmaalnaa siyaasada barashada iskuulka si aan u kordhino tababarka muusikada. Tusaale ahaan waxaa sameynaya Macro F1 score 0.802 (saqafka 9/103) ee Sub-task A.', 'ta': 'SemEval 2019 பணி 6: OffensEval 2019 க்கு கொடுக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பை இந்த தாள் விவரிக்கும். சமூக ஊடகங்களில் குழப்பமான மொழியை கண்டுபிடிக்க மற்றும் பிரிப்பதற்கான செயல், நாம் துணை செயல் A-ல் மட்டும் பகிர்ந்து கொள்க இந்த செயலை முகவரிக்க, நாம் ஒரு K- max பிரச்சனையின் முறைமையை அடிப்படையில் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், ஒரு செல்லுபடியான புதிய பிணையம் மாதிரி மாதிரி முறைம இறுதியில், நாம் மாதிரி செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்த ஒரு சைக்லிக் கற்றல் விகிதத்தை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். எங்கள் மாதிரி பெறுகிறது 0. 802 (வரிசையாக 9/103) துணை பணி A-ல் ஒரு மேக்ரோ F1- score பெறுகிறது.', 'ur': 'This paper describes the system submitted to SemEval 2019 Task 6: OffensEval 2019. اس کام کا ارادہ ہے کہ سوسیل میڈیا میں فساد کی زبان پہچان کریں اور کاٹی کریں، ہم صرف sub-task A میں شرکت کریں، جو فساد کی زبان پہچان کرنا چاہتا ہے. اس کام کے لئے ہم ایک سیسٹم کی پیشنهاد کریں جو ایک K-max پولینگ کنویرول نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک موڈل پر بنیاد ہے، اور ایک معتبر مٹا-ایمبڈنگ ٹیکنیک کے طور پر متوسط کرنے کے لئے ایک اروگرم استعمال کریں۔ بالآخر، ہم نے ایک سیکلیک سیکھنے کے ریٹ پلیسی بھی استعمال کر رکھا ہے کہ موڈل کی عملکرد بہتر کرے۔ ہمارا موڈل ایک مکرو F1-اسکور پہنچتا ہے 0.802 (رانڈ 9/103) کے A Sub-task میں۔', 'uz': "Bu hujjat SemEval 2019 Vazifani 6: OffensEval 2019 ga joʻnatilgan tizimni anglatadi. Ushbu vazifa jamiyat media'da ta'minlovchi tilni aniqlash va kattalashtirish uchun qanday qiladi. Biz faqat ta'sirli tillarni aniqlashga ega bo'ladi. Bu vazifani boshqarish uchun biz bir tizimni K- maxs tarmoq modeli asosida yaratib beramiz va o'zimni meta-embedded texnologiya sifatida ishlatish mumkin. Endi biz model bajarishni o'zgartirish uchun foydalanamiz. Bu modelmiz Aning sub-vazifani 0. 802 (9/103 rangi 9/103) uchun Makro F1 scori topadi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống được gửi đến Nhiệm vụ SemEvl 209: OffensEvl Des9. Nhiệm vụ này nhằm mục đích xác định và phân loại ngôn ngữ tấn công trên các phương tiện xã hội, chúng tôi chỉ tham gia tiểu nhiệm vụ A, nhằm xác định ngôn ngữ tấn công. Để thực hiện nhiệm vụ này, chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống dựa trên một mô hình mạng lưới thần kinh hỗn hợp K-Max, và dùng một lý lẽ để tính trung chuyển thành một kỹ thuật đột nhập hợp lệ để có được một phần mũi giáp. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi cũng dùng chính sách tỉ lệ học vòng để cải thiện hiệu suất mô hình. Mẫu của chúng ta đạt được vi mô F1 số 0.802 (hạng 9/103) trong con chạy phụ A.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва системата, подадена на Задача 6: Оценка 2019. Задачата има за цел идентифициране и категоризиране на обиден език в социалните медии, ние участваме само в Подзадача А, която има за цел идентифициране на обиден език. За да се справим с тази задача, предлагаме система, базирана на модел на конволюционна невронна мрежа и използваме аргумент за осредняване като валидна техника за метавграждане, за да получим метавграждане. И накрая, използваме и политика за цикличен темп на обучение, за да подобрим ефективността на модела. Нашият модел постига макро оценка от 0.802 (класирана 9/103) в подзадача А.', 'hr': 'Ovaj novinar opisuje sustav podignut semiEvalu 2019. zadatku 6: OffensEval 2019. Cilj zadatka je da identificiramo i kategoriziramo ofanzivni jezik u društvenim medijima, sudjelujemo samo u podzadatku A, čiji je cilj identificiranja ofanzivnog jezika. Da bi se riješili ovaj zadatak, predlažemo sistem na temelju konvolucionalnog model a nervne mreže K-max okupljanja i koristimo argument za prosječavanje kao validnu metodu metaintegriranja kako bi dobili metaintegriranje. Na kraju, također koristimo politiku stope cikličkog učenja kako bi poboljšali uspješnost model a. Naš model postiže makro F1 rezultat 0,802 (redovito 9/103) u podzadatku A.', 'nl': 'Deze paper beschrijft het systeem dat is ingediend bij SemEval 2019 Taak 6: OffenEval 2019. De taak is gericht op het identificeren en categoriseren van aanstootgevende taal in sociale media, we nemen alleen deel aan Sub-taak A, die gericht is op het identificeren van aanstootgevende taal. Om deze taak aan te pakken, stellen we een systeem voor dat gebaseerd is op een K-max pooling convolutional neural network model, en gebruiken we een argument voor gemiddelde als een geldige meta-embedding techniek om een metaembedding te krijgen. Tot slot maken we ook gebruik van een cyclisch leerpercentage beleid om de prestaties van modellen te verbeteren. Ons model behaalt een Macro F1-score van 0.802 (gerangschikt 9/103) in de Sub-taak A.', 'da': 'I denne artikel beskrives systemet indsendt til SemEval 2019 Opgave 6: OffensEval 2019. Opgaven har til formål at identificere og kategorisere stødende sprog i sociale medier, vi deltager kun i Underopgave A, som har til formål at identificere stødende sprog. For at løse denne opgave foreslår vi et system baseret på en K-max pooling konvulutional neural netværk model, og bruger et argument for gennemsnit som en gyldig meta-embedding teknik for at få en metaembedding. Endelig bruger vi også en politik for cyklisk læring til at forbedre modellens præstationer. Vores model opnår en makro F1-score på 0,802 (rangeret 9/103) i underopgaven A.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt das System, das an SemEval 2019 Aufgabe 6: OffensEval 2019 eingereicht wurde. Die Aufgabe zielt darauf ab, beleidigende Sprache in sozialen Medien zu identifizieren und zu kategorisieren, wir nehmen nur an Unteraufgabe A teil, die darauf abzielt, beleidigende Sprache zu identifizieren. Um dieser Aufgabe gerecht zu werden, schlagen wir ein System vor, das auf einem K-max Pooling Convolutional Neuronal Network Modell basiert, und verwenden ein Argument für Mittelwertbildung als gültige Meta-Embedding Technik, um eine Metaembedding zu erhalten. Schließlich nutzen wir auch eine zyklische Lernratenpolitik, um die Modellleistung zu verbessern. Unser Modell erreicht eine Makro F1-Punktzahl von 0.802 (Rangliste 9/103) in der Unteraufgabe A.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem yang dikirim ke SemEval 2019 Tugas 6: OffensEval 2019. Tugas ini bertujuan untuk mengidentifikasi dan kategorisasi bahasa offensive dalam media sosial, kita hanya berpartisipasi dalam Sub-Task A, yang bertujuan untuk mengidentifikasi bahasa offensive. Untuk mengatasi tugas ini, kami mengusulkan sistem berdasarkan model jaringan saraf konvolusi K-max, dan menggunakan argumen untuk mejaringan sebagai teknik meta-embedding yang valid untuk mendapatkan metaembedding. Akhirnya, kita juga menggunakan kebijakan tingkat belajar siklus untuk meningkatkan prestasi model. Model kami mencapai skor Macro F1 0,802 (tertinggi 9/103) di Sub-tugas A.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم را توصیف می\u200cکند که به کار ۶: OffensEval 2019 ارائه شده است. این وظیفه هدف است که زبان نافرمانی را در رسانه های اجتماعی شناسایی و تقسیم کنیم، ما تنها در زیر وظیفه ای شرکت می کنیم که هدف آن است که زبان نافرمانی را شناسایی کند. برای حل این کار، یک سیستم را بر اساس یک مدل شبکه عصبی کنترل K-max جمع می\u200cکنیم، و از یک مدل برای متوسط به عنوان یک تکنیک متوسط قابل استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا یک متوسط جمع شود. بالاخره، ما از سیاست یادگیری دوچرخه استفاده می کنیم تا عملکرد مدل را بهتر کنیم. مدل ما یک نمونه مکرو F1 از 0.802 (درجه 9/103) در زیر کار A رسیده است.', 'ko': '본고는 SemEval 2019 임무 6: OffensEval 2019에 제출된 시스템을 소개한다.소셜미디어에서 공격적인 언어를 식별하고 분류하기 위한 임무로, 공격적인 언어를 식별하기 위한 하위 임무 A에만 참여한다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 K-max 탱크 권적 신경 네트워크 모델을 바탕으로 하는 시스템을 제시했고 하나의 평균 파라미터를 효과적인 원삽입 기술로 사용하여 원삽입을 얻었다.마지막으로 우리는 순환 학습률 전략을 사용하여 모델의 성능을 향상시킨다.우리의 모델은 하위 임무 a에서 0.802의 거시적 F1 점수(9/103)를 얻었다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo uliotolewa kwa SemEval 2019 Kazi 6: OffensEval 2019. Kazi hiyo inakusudia kutambua na kugawanya lugha ya matusi katika mitandao ya kijamii, tunashiriki tu katika kazi ya A Kusini, inayolenga kutambua lugha ya matusi. Ili kuzungumzia kazi hii, tunapendekeza mfumo unaofanywa na kituo cha K-max kinachosimamia mtindo wa mtandao wa neura wa kimataifa, na kutumia hoja kwa wastani kama teknolojia yenye ujuzi wa kutumika ili kupata mabadiliko. Mwisho, pia tunatumia sera ya kupata kiwango cha kujifunza mzunguko ili kuboresha utendaji wa mifano. Mfano wetu unapata kipindi cha Macro F1 cha 0.802 (chenye rangi 9/103) katika kazi ya A Kuu.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die stelsel wat na SemEval 2019 ingestuur is, taak 6: OffensEval 2019. Die taak doel om offensivele taal in sosiale media te identifiseer en kategoriseer, ons deel slegs in Sub-task A, wat doel om offensivele taal te identifiseer. In order to address this task, we propose a system based on a K- max pooling convolutional neural network model, and use an argument for averaging as a valid meta- embedding technique to get a metaembedding. Eindelik gebruik ons ook 'n sykliese leer tempo beleid om model prestasie te verbeter. Ons model bereik 'n Makro F1-telling van 0,802 (rangeer 9/103) in die Sub-taak A.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan sistemin e paraqitur në SemEval 2019 Task 6: OffensEval 2019. Detyra synon të identifikojë dhe kategorizojë gjuhën ofensive në mediat sociale, ne marrim pjesë vetëm në nëndetyrën A, e cila synon të identifikojë gjuhën ofensive. Për të trajtuar këtë detyrë, ne propozojmë një sistem bazuar në një model rrjeti nervor konvolutiv K-max, dhe përdorim një argument për mesatarinë si një teknikë të vlefshme meta-embedding për të marrë një metaembedding. Më në fund, ne përdorim gjithashtu një politikë të nivelit të mësimit ciklik për të përmirësuar performancën e modelit. Modeli ynë arrin një Makro F1-rezultat 0.802 (renditur 9/103) në Subdetyrën A.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ለSemEval 2019 ስራ 6: OffensEval 2019 የሰጠውን ስርዓት ይናገራል፡፡ ስራው በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ውስጥ የሚያስቃወም ቋንቋን ለማሳየትና ማለያየት ነው፤ እና አቃጣፊ ቋንቋን ለማሳየት የሚችል አካባቢ አ ብቻ ነው፡፡ ይህንን ስራ ለመቀበል፣ የK-ማነሻ የነዌብ መረብ ሞዴል በመጠቀም ሲስተካከል እና የተመሳሳይ መሆኑን ለመጠቀም የሚችል የ-መሀብት-አካባቢ ቴክኖክን ለመጠቀም እናስጠይቃለን፡፡ በመጨረሻው የኪኪሎክ ትምህርት የፖሊሲ ፖሊሲ እናስቀምጣለን የሞዴል ፍለጋውን ለማሻሻል፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን በ አካባቢ ስራ A ማክሮ F1 ነጥብ 0.802 (ደረጃ 9/103) አግኝቷል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է համակարգը, որը ներկայացվել է ՍեմԷվալ 2019-ի 6. հանձնարարությանը՝ ՕֆենսԷվալ 2019-ին: Այս խնդիրը նպատակում է հասարակական լրատվամիջոցներում բացահայտել և կատեգորիզավորել հակառակ լեզուն, մենք մասնակցում ենք միայն A-ի ենթախնդիրը, որը նպատակում է բացահայտել հակառակ լեզուն: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք մի համակարգ, որը հիմնված է K-մաքսի կոնվոլյուցիոն նյարդային ցանցի մոդելի վրա և օգտագործում ենք միջինը որպես ճշգրիտ մետաներգրավման մեթոդ մետաներգրավման համար: Վերջապես, մենք նաև կիրառում ենք ցիկլային ուսումնասիրության արագության քաղաքականությունը մոդելի արդյունքների բարելավման համար: Մեր մոդելը հասնում է Մակրո F1-ի 0.802 (9.3.3) գնահատականի A-ի ենթախնդրի մեջ:', 'tr': "Bu kagyz SemEval 2019 Görevi 6: OffensEval 2019-nji ýylda bellenilýär Göreviň maksady sosyal medýýatlarda hasaplanjak we çykyş dilini tanamak we kategoriýalaşdyrmak, biz diňe Sub-Task A'da goşulýarys, bu iň maksady hasaplanjak dilini tanamak üçin meýilleşdirýäris. Bu görevi çözmek üçin, K-max pooling konvolucional näral şebeke modelinin daýan ýan bir sistemi teklip etmek üçin we meta-integrasyn üçin önlenmek üçin bir argument ulanýarys. Soňunda çykyşlyk öwrenmek ýoldaşyny nusgasyny geliştirmek üçin bisiklik öwrenmek ýoldaşyny ulanýarys. Biziň nusgamyz Sub-task A'da Makro F1-अ 0,802 (derejesi 9/103) ýetip barýar.", 'az': 'Bu kağıt 2019-ci SemEval Task 6: OffensEval 2019-ə göndərilmiş sistemi təsbit edir. Bu işin sosyal media içində offensiv dilini tanımmaq və kategoriyalarını məqsədilə məcbur edir, biz ancaq A Sub-task ilə birlikdə yer alırıq, bu da offensiv dili tanımmaq niyyətindədir. Bu işi çəkmək üçün, K-max pooling konvolucional nöral a ğ modeli ilə dayanan bir sistemi təklif edirik və meta-integring üçün müəyyən bir meta-integring tekniki olaraq ortalamaq üçün bir argument istifadə edirik. Sonunda, modellərini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün bisikli öyrənmə sürəti siyasi də istifadə edirik. Bizim modelimiz A Sub-Taskdə Makro F1-score 0,802 (dərəcəli 9/103) ilə başa düşər.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটি সেমইভাল ২০১৯ কাজের প্রতি জমা দেয়া সিস্টেমের বর্ণনা করেছে: অফিনসেভাল ২০১৯। সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে আক্রান্ত ভাষাকে চিহ্নিত এবং বিভক্ত করার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে, আমরা শুধুমাত্র সাব-কাজ A-এ অংশগ্রহণ করি, যার এই কাজের কথা বলার জন্য আমরা একটি কে-ম্যাক্সের ভিত্তিতে একটি সিস্টেম প্রস্তাব করি যা সংঘর্ষিত নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেলের ভিত্তিতে ভিত্তি করে এবং একটি বৈধ মেট- Finally, we also use a cyclic learning rate policy to improve model performance.  আমাদের মডেল সাব-কাজ A-এ ম্যাক্রো এফ১ স্কোর অর্জন করে।', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem podignut semiEvalu 2019. zadatak 6: OffensEval 2019. Cilj zadatka je da identificiramo i kategoriziramo ofanzivni jezik u društvenim medijima, sudjelujemo samo u podzadatku A, koji je cilj identificiranja ofanzivnog jezika. Da bi se riješili ovaj zadatak, predlažemo sistem koji se temelji na konvolucionalnom modelu neuralne mreže K-max okupljanja, i koristimo argument za prosječavanje kao validnu metodu metaintegriranja kako bi dobili metaintegraciju. Na kraju, također koristimo politiku stope cikličkog učenja kako bi poboljšali model učinkovitost. Naš model postiže makro F1 rezultat 0,802 (redovito 9/103) u podzadatku A.', 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu el sistema submetit a SemEval 2019 Task 6: OffensEval 2019. La tasca mira a identificar i categoritzar la llengua ofensiva als mitjans socials, només participem a la Subtasca A, que mira a identificar la llengua ofensiva. Per abordar aquesta tasca, proposem un sistema basat en un model de xarxa neural convolucionada K-max, i utilitzem un argument per a medir-se com una tècnica de meta-incorporació válida per aconseguir una metaincorporació. Finalment, també utilitzem una política de ritme d'aprenentatge cíclic per millorar el rendiment del model. El nostre model aconsegueix una puntuació Macro F1 de 0,802 (puntuació 9/103) a la Subtasca A.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje systém předložený na SemEval 2019 Úkol 6: OffenEval 2019. Úkol si klade za cíl identifikovat a kategorizovat urážlivý jazyk v sociálních médiích, účastníme se pouze podúkolu A, který si klade za cíl identifikovat urážlivý jazyk. Pro řešení tohoto úkolu navrhujeme systém založený na K-max poolingovém konvolučním neuronovém síťovém modelu a používáme argument pro průměrování jako platnou metodu meta-embeddingu pro získání metaembeddingu. Konečně také využíváme politiku cyklické míry učení ke zlepšení výkonnosti modelu. Náš model dosahuje makro F1 skóre 0.802 (hodnocení 9/103) v podúkolu A.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan SemEval 2019 Task 6: OffensEval 2019 -ohjelmaan lähetetty järjestelmä. Tehtävän tavoitteena on tunnistaa ja luokitella loukkaava kieli sosiaalisessa mediassa, osallistumme vain alatehtävään A, jonka tavoitteena on tunnistaa loukkaava kieli. Tämän tehtävän ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme K-max pooling-konvolutionaaliseen neuroverkkomalliin perustuvaa järjestelmää ja käytämme keskiarvon argumenttia kelvollisena metaupotustekniikana metaupotuksen saamiseksi. Lisäksi käytämme syklistä oppimisastetta koskevaa politiikkaa mallien suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi. Mallimme saavuttaa makron F1-pisteen 0,802 (sijoitus 9/103) alitehtävässä A.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse süsteemi, mis on esitatud SemEval 2019 Task 6: OffensEval 2019. Ülesande eesmärk on tuvastada ja kategoriseerida solvav keel sotsiaalmeedias, me osaleme ainult alamülesandes A, mille eesmärk on tuvastada solvav keel. Selle ülesande lahendamiseks pakume välja süsteemi, mis põhineb K-max koondamise konvolutsioonilisel närvivõrgu mudelil ja kasutame keskmise arvutamise argumenti kui kehtivat metamanustamismeetodit metamanustamise saamiseks. Lõpuks kasutame mudeli tulemuslikkuse parandamiseks ka tsüklilist õppimismäära poliitikat. Meie mudel saavutab alamülesandes A makro F1 skoori 0,802 (9/103).', 'jv': 'Perintah iki-jenis rambaran sistem sing nyimpen to seminval 2011 task 6: offensinval 2011. Awak dhéwé wis nambah kang nggarap lan soko kategorise lengkang kang angkang ing media sotiki, kita nguasai lang ing Sub-task A, sing yen alih kanggo nambah idiomat sing apik. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Sokake, awak dhéwé ngubah sistem dadi nggawe barang bisa kuwi nggawe model sing bisa bantuan. Kita model pengguna karo macro F1-puntu 0.wireless (ranged 9/dlong) ning Sub-task A.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje sistem, predložen SemEval 2019 Task 6: OffensEval 2019. Cilj naloge je prepoznavanje in kategorizacija žaljivega jezika v družbenih omrežjih, sodelujemo le v podnalogi A, katere cilj je prepoznavanje žaljivega jezika. Za reševanje te naloge predlagamo sistem, ki temelji na modelu konvolucijskega živčnega omrežja K-max združevanja, in uporabimo argument za povprečje kot veljavno metodo metavdelave, da dobimo metavdelavo. Za izboljšanje uspešnosti modela uporabljamo tudi politiko ciklične stopnje učenja. Naš model v podnalogi A doseže oceno makro F1 0,802 (9/103).', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana tsarin da aka saka zuwa SemEV 2019 Taimar 6: offenseval 2019. Kayan aiki na aimar ka gane kuma su categori lugha ɗin mai zartar da shi a cikin mitandai da jamii, munã haɗi kawai da al'amarin A, wanda ke so dõmin ka gane lugha na ƙetare. Dõmin ya yi amfani da wannan aikin, sai Mu buɗa wata na'ura a kan wani shirin K-max da ke samu'a da kwamfyutan jerin neural, kuma Mu yi amfani da wata argument dõmin ya yi amfani da shi a kan karatun mai inganci kamar technci mai meta-embedded don ka sami wata metamfyutan. Haƙĩƙa, za mu yi amfani da wata na'ura a lissafa da za'a sanar kwamfyuta don mu kyautata gyaranin misali. Tuduniyarmu ya sami wani ma'abũcin Macro F1 na 0.80 2 (ranked 9/103) cikin al'amarin A.", 'he': 'הנייר הזה מתאר את המערכת שנשלחה לסימוול 2019 משימה 6: OffensEval 2019. The task aims to identify and categorize offensive language in social media, we only participate in Sub-task A, which aims to identify offensive language.  כדי להתמודד עם המשימה הזאת, אנו מציעים מערכת מבוססת על מודל רשת עצבית משותפת K-max, ולהשתמש בטעון לממוצע כטכניקה מתקנה תקינה כדי לקבל מתקנה. סוף סוף, אנחנו גם משתמשים במדיניות שיעור הלימוד המחזורי כדי לשפר את ההופעה של המודל. המודל שלנו משיג נקודת מקרו-F1 של 0.802 (מגוון 9/103) בתא-משימה A.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལྟར་2019ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལྟར་འཇིག་པ་དེ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།OffensEval 2019 བྱ་འགུལ་འདིས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདོན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་དམིགས་འཛུགས་དང་དབྱེ་རིགས་བཀོད་དགོས། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀ In order to address this task, we propose a system based on a K-max pooling convolutional neural network model, and use an argument for averaging as a valid meta-embedding technique to get a metaembedding. མཐའ་མར་མ་དེ་ལ། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་སྤྱིར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གྱིས་Sub-task A ནང་དུ་Macro F1-score of 0.802(ranked 9/103)ཡི་ཚད་གཅིག་ཐུབ་ཀྱིན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'SemEval-2019 Task 7 : RumourEval, Determining Rumour Veracity and Support for Rumours', 'es': 'Tarea 7 de Semeval-2019: RumoureVal, determinación de la veracidad de los rumores y apoyo a los rumores', 'fr': 'SemEval-2019 Tâche 7\xa0: RumourEval, détermination de la véracité des rumeurs et prise en charge des rumeurs', 'pt': 'Tarefa 7 do SemEval-2019: RumourEval, determinando a veracidade de rumores e suporte para rumores', 'ar': 'مهمة SemEval-2019 7: الإشاعات ، تحديد صحة الشائعات ودعمها', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019务7:讹言Eval,定讹言', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019タスク7 ： RumourEval、Rumourの真実性の決定、およびRumoursのサポート', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 7: अफवाहें, अफवाह सत्यता और अफवाहों के लिए समर्थन का निर्धारण', 'ru': 'SemEval-2019 Задача 7: Оценка слухов, определение достоверности слухов и поддержка слухов', 'ga': 'SemEval-2019 Tasc 7: RumourEval, Cinntíonn fírinneacht Rumor agus Tacaíocht do Ráflaí', 'el': 'Εργασία 7: Φήμες, Καθορισμός της αξιοπιστίας των φήμων και υποστήριξη των φήμων', 'ka': 'SemEval-2019 პარამეტრი 7: სამყაროEval, განსაზღვრება სამყარო წარმოდგენება და სამყარო', 'lt': 'SemEval-2019 7 užduotis: RumourEval, Determining Rumour Truthfulness and Support for Rumours', 'it': 'SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval, Determinazione della Veracità delle Rumore e Supporto alle Rumore', 'kk': 'Жалпы-2019 тапсырма 7: RumourEval, Rumour тексерілігін анықтау және Rumour қолдауы', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 7: റൂമൂര്\u200dവെല്\u200d, വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിശ്വാസവും പിന്തുണയും തീരുമാനിക്കുന്നു', 'hu': 'SemEval-2019 7. feladat: PletykEval, a pletykák hitelességének meghatározása és a pletykák támogatása', 'ms': 'SemEval-2019 Tugas 7: RumourEval, Menentukan Kebenaran Rumor dan Sokongan Rumor', 'mt': 'SemEval-2019 Kompitu 7: RumourEval, Determination of Rumour Veracity and Support for Rumours', 'pl': 'SemEval-2019 Zadanie 7: PlomourEval, określenie wiarygodności plotek i wsparcie dla plotek', 'no': 'SemEval-2019 Oppgåve 7: RumourEval, Determining Rumour Veracity and Support for Rumours', 'ro': 'SemEval-2019 Sarcina 7: ZvonuriEval, Determinarea Veracității zvonurilor și sprijinul pentru zvonuri', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval, Rumour Verification and Support for Rumours', 'mk': 'Семиевал-2019 задача 7: Размислување на гласините, одредување на верноста на гласините и поддршка за гласините', 'so': 'SemEval-2019 Shaqada 7: RumourEval, caddeynta runta iyo kaalmada hadalka', 'sr': 'SemEval-2019 zadatak 7: RumourEval, određivanje ružne verovatnosti i podrške ružnosti', 'si': 'සම්වේල්-2019 වැඩක් 7: විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරන්න, විශ්වාස විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ විශ්වාස කරන්න', 'sv': 'SemEval-2019 Uppgift 7: RumourEval, Fastställande av Ryktets Veracity och Stöd för Rykten', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி', 'ur': 'SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval, Determining Rumour Veracity and Support for Rumours', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifa 7: RumourEval, Rumor Vertibility va Rumaqat uchun qoʻllash', 'vi': 'Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-2009 7: RumourEvl, quyết định nổi điên và hỗ trợ cho Rumour.', 'bg': 'Задача 7: Слухове, определяне на верността на слуховете и подкрепа за слуховете', 'hr': 'SemEval-2019 zadatak 7: RumourEval, utvrđivanje provjernosti rušenja i podrške rušenja', 'da': 'SemEval-2019 Opgave 7: Rygteval, fastlæggelse af rygternes sandhed og støtte til rygter', 'nl': 'SemEval-2019 Taak 7: RumourEval, Vaststellen van geruchtvastheid en Ondersteuning voor geruchten', 'de': 'SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 7: RumourEval, Ermittlung von Gerüchtebeständigkeit und Unterstützung für Gerüchte', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019 미션7: 루머 평가, 루머의 진실성과 루머에 대한 지지 확인', 'id': 'SemEval-2019 Tugas 7: RumourEval, Menentukan Kebenaran Rumor dan dukungan Rumor', 'tr': 'SemEval-2019 Görev 7: RumourEval, Determining Rumour Veracity and Support for Rumours', 'fa': 'ماموریت شماره ۲۰۱۹: فساد فساد فساد فساد، تعیین فساد فساد و حمایت روانه\u200cها', 'sw': 'SemEval-2019 Kazi 7: Uthibiti wa Uaminifu, Kuhitimisha Uukweli na Uungaji wa Utetesi', 'am': 'Eval-2019 ስራ 7: RumourEval, ውሸትን ማረጋገጥ እና የውሸቶች እርዳታ', 'hy': 'SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval, Determining Rumour Veracity and Support for Rumours', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৭: গুজব ইভাল, গুজব গুজবের সত্যি এবং গুজবের সমর্থন নির্ধারণ করা হচ্ছে', 'af': 'SemEval-2019 Opdrag 7: RumourEval, Besluit Rumour Verwaarsheid en Ondersteuning vir Rumours', 'sq': 'SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval, Determining Rumour Veracity and Support for Rumours', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval, Rumour Veracity Determining and Support for Rumours', 'et': 'SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 7: RumourEval, kuulujuttude usaldusväärsuse kindlaksmääramine ja kuulujuttude toetamine', 'bs': 'SemEval-2019 zadatak 7: RumourEval, određivanje verovatnosti ružanja i podrške ružanja', 'fi': 'SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 7: HuhuEval, huhujen uskottavuuden määrittäminen ja huhujen tukeminen', 'cs': 'SemEval-2019 Úkol 7: RumourEval, stanovení zvědavosti a podpora fámů', 'ca': 'SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval, Determining Rumour Veracity and Support for Rumors', 'sk': 'SemEval-2019 Naloga 7: RumourEval, določanje verodostojnosti govoric in podpora govoricam', 'ha': 'QScriptBreakpointsModel', 'jv': 'semi-2011 task 7', 'he': 'SemEval-2019 משימה 7: Eval שמועות, לקבוע אמת שמועות ותמיכה לשמועות', 'bo': 'SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval, Determining Rumour Veracity and Support for Rumours'}
{'en': 'Since the first RumourEval shared task in 2017, interest in automated claim validation has greatly increased, as the danger of fake news has become a mainstream concern. However automated support for rumour verification remains in its infancy. It is therefore important that a shared task in this area continues to provide a focus for effort, which is likely to increase. Rumour verification is characterised by the need to consider evolving conversations and news updates to reach a verdict on a rumour’s veracity. As in RumourEval 2017 we provided a dataset of dubious posts and ensuing conversations in social media, annotated both for stance and veracity. The social media rumours stem from a variety of breaking news stories and the dataset is expanded to include Reddit as well as new Twitter posts. There were two concrete tasks ; rumour stance prediction and rumour verification, which we present in detail along with results achieved by participants. We received 22 system submissions (a 70 % increase from RumourEval 2017) many of which used state-of-the-art methodology to tackle the challenges involved.', 'fr': "Depuis la première tâche partagée de RumourEval en 2017, l'intérêt pour la validation automatisée des réclamations a considérablement augmenté, le danger de «\xa0fake news\xa0» étant devenu une préoccupation courante. Cependant, la prise en charge automatisée de la vérification des rumeurs n'en est qu'à ses débuts Il est donc important qu'une tâche partagée dans ce domaine continue de focaliser les efforts, qui sont susceptibles de s'accroître. La vérification des rumeurs se caractérise par la nécessité de tenir compte de l'évolution des conversations et des actualités afin de parvenir à un verdict sur la véracité d'une rumeur. Comme dans RumourEval 2017, nous avons fourni un ensemble de données de publications douteuses et de conversations qui ont suivi sur les réseaux sociaux, annotées à la fois pour la position et la véracité. Les rumeurs sur les réseaux sociaux découlent d'une variété d'actualités de dernière heure et l'ensemble de données est élargi pour inclure Reddit ainsi que de nouveaux messages Twitter. Il y avait deux tâches concrètes\xa0: la prédiction de la position de la rumeur et la vérification de la rumeur, que nous présentons en détail ainsi que les résultats obtenus par les participants. Nous avons reçu 22 soumissions de systèmes (une augmentation de 70\xa0% par rapport à RumourEval 2017), dont beaucoup utilisaient une méthodologie de pointe pour relever les défis posés.", 'pt': 'Desde a primeira tarefa compartilhada do RumourEval em 2017, o interesse na validação automatizada de reivindicações aumentou muito, pois o perigo de “notícias falsas” se tornou uma preocupação comum. No entanto, o suporte automatizado para verificação de rumores permanece em sua infância. Portanto, é importante que uma tarefa compartilhada nesta área continue a fornecer um foco de esforço, que provavelmente aumentará. A verificação de rumores é caracterizada pela necessidade de considerar a evolução das conversas e atualizações de notícias para chegar a um veredicto sobre a veracidade de um boato. Assim como no RumourEval 2017, fornecemos um conjunto de dados de postagens duvidosas e conversas subsequentes nas mídias sociais, anotadas tanto para postura quanto para veracidade. Os rumores de mídia social derivam de uma variedade de notícias de última hora e o conjunto de dados é expandido para incluir o Reddit, bem como novas postagens no Twitter. Havia duas tarefas concretas; previsão de postura de rumores e verificação de rumores, que apresentamos em detalhes junto com os resultados alcançados pelos participantes. Recebemos 22 submissões de sistema (um aumento de 70% em relação ao RumourEval 2017), muitos dos quais usaram metodologia de ponta para enfrentar os desafios envolvidos.', 'es': 'Desde la primera tarea compartida de RumoureVal en 2017, el interés en la validación automática de reclamos ha aumentado considerablemente, ya que el peligro de las «noticias falsas» se ha convertido en una preocupación generalizada. Sin embargo, el soporte automatizado para la verificación de rumores sigue siendo incipiente. Por lo tanto, es importante que una tarea compartida en esta esfera siga proporcionando un enfoque para el esfuerzo, que probablemente aumentará. La verificación de rumores se caracteriza por la necesidad de considerar la evolución de las conversaciones y las actualizaciones de las noticias para llegar a un veredicto sobre la veracidad de un rumor. Al igual que en RumoureVal 2017, proporcionamos un conjunto de datos de publicaciones dudosas y conversaciones posteriores en las redes sociales, con anotaciones tanto de postura como de veracidad. Los rumores en las redes sociales provienen de una variedad de noticias de última hora y el conjunto de datos se amplía para incluir Reddit y nuevas publicaciones de Twitter. Había dos tareas concretas; la predicción de la postura del rumor y la verificación del rumor, que presentamos en detalle junto con los resultados logrados por los participantes. Recibimos 22 presentaciones de sistemas (un aumento del 70% con respecto a RumoureVal 2017), muchas de las cuales utilizaron una metodología de vanguardia para abordar los desafíos involucrados.', 'ar': 'منذ أول مهمة مشتركة لـ RumourEval في عام 2017 ، زاد الاهتمام بالتحقق الآلي من صحة المطالبات بشكل كبير ، حيث أصبح خطر "الأخبار المزيفة" مصدر قلق رئيسي. ومع ذلك ، فإن الدعم الآلي للتحقق من الشائعات لا يزال في مهده. لذلك من المهم أن تستمر المهمة المشتركة في هذا المجال في توفير تركيز للجهود التي من المرجح أن تزداد. يتميز التحقق من الشائعات بضرورة التفكير في تطور المحادثات وتحديثات الأخبار للوصول إلى حكم بشأن صحة شائعة. كما هو الحال في RumourEval 2017 ، قدمنا مجموعة بيانات من المنشورات المشبوهة والمحادثات التي تلت ذلك في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ، مع تعليقات توضيحية للموقف والصدق. تنبع شائعات وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي من مجموعة متنوعة من الأخبار العاجلة ويتم توسيع مجموعة البيانات لتشمل Reddit بالإضافة إلى منشورات Twitter الجديدة. كانت هناك مهمتان محددتان ؛ التنبؤ بموقف الشائعات والتحقق من الشائعات ، والتي نقدمها بالتفصيل جنبًا إلى جنب مع النتائج التي حققها المشاركون. تلقينا 22 طلبًا للنظام (زيادة بنسبة 70٪ عن RumourEval 2017) ، استخدم العديد منها منهجية متطورة للتعامل مع التحديات التي ينطوي عليها الأمر.', 'zh': '自2017首RumourEval共享,随假新闻之危以为上流,大增索赔验之兴。 然讹言验者,犹处其端。 是以大共同任务继之,其力或益。 讹言验者,虑新闻更新,以决其情。 与2017年RumourEval同,供社交媒体上疑帖及后对数集,并行立场真实注。 社交媒体讹言出于诸突新闻报道,数集扩及Reddit及新Twitter帖子。 有二具体任务。 讹言立验,备言参与者取。 臣等得22系统提交(比2017年RumourEval增70%),其中多用最先进之法以应所及挑战。', 'ja': '2017年の最初のRumourEval共有タスク以降、「フェイクニュース」の危険性が主流になったため、自動クレーム検証への関心が大幅に高まりました。 しかし、噂検証の自動サポートはまだ初期段階です。 したがって、この分野で共有されたタスクが引き続き努力の焦点を提供し、それが増加する可能性があることが重要です。 噂の検証の特徴は、噂の真実性についての評決に到達するために、進化する会話やニュースの更新を検討する必要があることです。 RumourEval 2017では、ソーシャルメディアでの疑わしい投稿とその後の会話のデータセットを提供し、スタンスと真実性の両方のために注釈を付けました。 ソーシャルメディアの噂は、さまざまな速報ニュースに由来しており、データセットはRedditだけでなく、新しいTwitterの投稿も含めて拡張されています。 噂のスタンス予測と噂の検証という2つの具体的なタスクがあり、参加者が達成した結果とともに詳細に提示しています。 当社は22件のシステム提出を受けました（ RumourEval 2017から70 ％増加）。その多くは、関連する課題に対処するために最先端の方法論を使用しました。', 'hi': '2017 में पहले अफवाहएवल साझा किए गए कार्य के बाद से, स्वचालित दावा सत्यापन में रुचि बहुत बढ़ गई है, क्योंकि "नकली समाचार" का खतरा मुख्यधारा की चिंता का विषय बन गया है। हालांकि, अफवाह सत्यापन के लिए स्वचालित समर्थन अपनी प्रारंभिक अवस्था में बना हुआ है। इसलिए यह महत्वपूर्ण है कि इस क्षेत्र में एक साझा कार्य प्रयास के लिए एक फोकस प्रदान करना जारी रखे, जो बढ़ने की संभावना है। अफवाह सत्यापन को अफवाह की सत्यता पर फैसले तक पहुंचने के लिए बातचीत और समाचार अपडेट विकसित करने पर विचार करने की आवश्यकता की विशेषता है। जैसा कि अफवाह 2017 में हमने सोशल मीडिया में संदिग्ध पोस्ट और आगामी बातचीत का एक डेटासेट प्रदान किया, जो रुख और सत्यता दोनों के लिए एनोटेट किया गया था। सोशल मीडिया अफवाहें विभिन्न प्रकार की ब्रेकिंग न्यूज कहानियों से उत्पन्न होती हैं और डेटासेट को रेडिट के साथ-साथ नए ट्विटर पोस्ट को शामिल करने के लिए विस्तारित किया जाता है। दो ठोस कार्य थे; अफवाह रुख भविष्यवाणी और अफवाह सत्यापन, जो हम प्रतिभागियों द्वारा प्राप्त परिणामों के साथ विस्तार से प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हमें 22 सिस्टम सबमिशन (अफवाहएवल 2017 से 70% की वृद्धि) प्राप्त हुई, जिनमें से कई ने इसमें शामिल चुनौतियों से निपटने के लिए अत्याधुनिक पद्धति का उपयोग किया।', 'ru': 'С момента первой совместной задачи RumourEval в 2017 году интерес к автоматической проверке утверждений значительно возрос, поскольку опасность «фейковых новостей» стала основной проблемой. Однако автоматизированная поддержка проверки слухов все еще находится в зачаточном состоянии. Поэтому важно, чтобы совместная задача в этой области по-прежнему служила ориентиром для усилий, которые, вероятно, активизируются. Проверка слухов характеризуется необходимостью рассмотрения эволюционирующих разговоров и обновлений новостей для вынесения вердикта о достоверности слухов. Как и в RumourEval 2017, мы предоставили набор данных сомнительных постов и последующих разговоров в социальных сетях, аннотированных как для позиции, так и для правдивости. Слухи в социальных сетях проистекают из целого ряда актуальных новостей, и набор данных расширяется и включает в себя Reddit, а также новые сообщения в Twitter. Были две конкретные задачи: предсказание позиции слухов и проверка слухов, которую мы подробно представляем вместе с результатами, достигнутыми участниками. Мы получили 22 системных заявки (на 70% больше, чем RumourEval 2017), многие из которых использовали самую современную методологию для решения связанных с этим проблем.', 'ga': 'Ó tharla an chéad tasc roinnte RumourEval in 2017, tá méadú mór tagtha ar an spéis i mbailíochtú éileamh uathoibrithe, toisc gur ábhar imní príomhshrutha an chontúirt a bhaineann le “nuacht bréige”. Mar sin féin tá tacaíocht uathoibrithe le haghaidh fíorú ráflaí fós ina thús. Tá sé tábhachtach mar sin go leanann tasc comhroinnte sa réimse seo le fócas a sholáthar don iarracht, ar dócha go dtiocfaidh méadú air. Is sainairíonna é fíorú ráflaí ná an gá atá le machnamh a dhéanamh ar chomhráite atá ag teacht chun cinn agus nuashonraithe nuachta chun teacht ar bhreithiúnas ar fhírinneacht ráflaí. Mar a tharla i RumourEval 2017 chuireamar tacar sonraí de phoist amhrasacha agus de chomhráite ina dhiaidh sin ar fáil ar na meáin shóisialta, agus anótáilte maidir le seasamh agus fírinneacht araon. Eascraíonn ráflaí na meáin shóisialta ó éagsúlacht de na scéalta nuachta ceannródaíocha agus leathnaítear an tacar sonraí chun Reddit a chur san áireamh chomh maith le poist nua Twitter. Bhí dhá thasc nithiúla; tuar seasamh ráflaí agus fíorú ráflaí, a chuirimid i láthair go mion mar aon leis na torthaí atá bainte amach ag rannpháirtithe. Fuaireamar 22 aighneacht córais (méadú 70% ó RumourEval 2017) agus bhain go leor acu úsáid as modheolaíocht den scoth chun dul i ngleic leis na dúshláin a bhí i gceist.', 'el': 'Από την πρώτη κοινή εργασία του το 2017, το ενδιαφέρον για την αυτοματοποιημένη επικύρωση αξιώσεων έχει αυξηθεί σημαντικά, καθώς ο κίνδυνος των "ψεύτικων ειδήσεων" έχει γίνει κυρίαρχη ανησυχία. Ωστόσο, η αυτοματοποιημένη υποστήριξη για την επαλήθευση φήμων παραμένει στα νηπιακά της χρόνια. Ως εκ τούτου, είναι σημαντικό ένα κοινό καθήκον σε αυτόν τον τομέα να συνεχίσει να δίνει έμφαση στην προσπάθεια, η οποία είναι πιθανό να αυξηθεί. Η επαλήθευση των φήμων χαρακτηρίζεται από την ανάγκη να εξεταστούν οι εξελισσόμενες συζητήσεις και οι ενημερώσεις ειδήσεων για να καταλήξουμε σε ετυμηγορία σχετικά με την αληθεία μιας φήμης. Όπως και στο RumourEval 2017 παρέχουμε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων αμφίβολων δημοσιεύσεων και συνακόλουθων συνομιλιών στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης, σχολιάζοντας τόσο για στάση όσο και για αληθεία. Οι φήμες στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης προέρχονται από μια ποικιλία έκτακτων ειδήσεων και το σύνολο δεδομένων επεκτείνεται για να συμπεριλάβει το Reddit καθώς και νέες δημοσιεύσεις στο Twitter. Υπήρχαν δύο συγκεκριμένα καθήκοντα: Προβλεπόμενη στάση φήμης και επαλήθευση φήμης, την οποία παρουσιάζουμε λεπτομερώς μαζί με τα αποτελέσματα που επιτεύχθηκαν από τους συμμετέχοντες. Λάβαμε 22° υποβολές συστήματος (αύξηση 70% από το RumourEval 2017), πολλές από τις οποίες χρησιμοποίησαν την πιο σύγχρονη μεθοδολογία για την αντιμετώπιση των προκλήσεων που εμπλέκονται.', 'ka': '2017 წლის პირველი სამყაროEval გაყოფილი სამყაროდან, ინტერესტი ავტომატიკური სამყაროს გადაწყვეტილებისთვის ძალიან უფრო მეტია, რადგან „ტალქტური ნუზების გამოცდილობა” სა მაგრამ ავტომატიური დაეხმარება სიტყვანის შემოწმება იქნება თავის ბავშვებში. ამიტომ მნიშვნელოვანია, რომ ამ ადგილში ერთადერთი სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო მუშაოდ გადასრულება, რომელიც შეიძლება იქნება. პრომელური შემოწმება განსაზღვრებულია, რომელიც უნდა აღმოჩნოთ განვითარებული პარამეტრები და ახალგაზრულებები, რომელიც შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ სწორედ სიმართლეზე როგორც 2017 წლის RumourEval-ში, ჩვენ მონაცემები სოციალური მედიაში და შემდეგ საუკუნო საუკუნოებები დავიწყეთ, როგორც სოციალური მედიაში და სინამდვილეობისთვის. სოციალური მედიაში სიტყვები განსხვავებული სიტყვების განსხვავებაზე მოიქნება და მონაცემების სექტი განსხვავებულია, რომ Reddit-ს და ახალი Twitter-ის პოსტის შესახებ. ორი კონკრეტული დავალება იყო; პასუხის განსაზღვრება და შემოწმება სიტყვის, რომელიც ჩვენ განვითარებთ დეტალურად და გავაკეთებთ წარმოდგენების შემდეგ. ჩვენ 22 სისტემის მიღება (2017 წლის RumourEval-დან 70%-ის აღმოჩენა) რამდენიმე მათგანი გამოიყენეთ მსგავსი მეტოდოლოგია, რომელიც გამოყენეთ დაკავშირებული გამოცდილებების გარეშე', 'hu': 'A RumourEval 2017-es első megosztott feladata óta nagymértékben megnőtt az érdeklődés az automatizált igények érvényesítése iránt, mivel a "hamis hírek" veszélye általános aggodalommá vált. A pletykák ellenőrzésének automatizált támogatása azonban még csecsemőkorában van. Ezért fontos, hogy egy közös feladat ezen a területen továbbra is összpontosítson az erőfeszítéseknek, amelyek valószínűleg növekedni fognak. A pletykák igazolását az jellemzi, hogy fontolóra kell venni a folyamatosan fejlődő beszélgetéseket és a hírek frissítését annak érdekében, hogy ítéletet hozzunk egy pletyka valódiságáról. Mint a RumourEval 2017-ben, kétes bejegyzésekből és az ezt követő beszélgetésekből álló adatkészletet biztosítottunk a közösségi médiában, amelyeket mind az álláspont, mind a valóság szempontjából jegyzeteltünk meg. A közösségi média pletykái számos friss hírekből származnak, és az adatkészletet bővítik a Reddittel és az új Twitter bejegyzésekkel. Két konkrét feladat volt: Részletesen bemutatjuk a résztvevők által elért eredményeket. 22 rendszer benyújtása érkezett (70%-os növekedés a RumourEval 2017-hez képest), amelyek közül sokan korszerű módszertant használtak a felmerülő kihívások kezelésére.', 'kk': '2017 жылы бірінші RumourEval бөлінген тапсырмасынан бастап, автоматты сұрақтарды тексеру көбірек көптеген, себебі «жалғыз жаңалықтар» қауіпсіздігі негізгі қатынас болды. Бірақ жаңалық тексерудің автоматты түрде қолдауы балаларында қалды. Сондықтан бұл аумақтағы ортақ тапсырманың көңіл күшінде көңіл беру үшін маңызды. Шығыс тексеру үшін өзгертілген сұрақтар мен жаңалықтар жаңартуларының қажеттігін қарастыру керек. 2017 жылы RumourEval дегенде біз көбірек жазуларды және социаллық медиақтағы сұхбаттауларды келтірдік. Сол жағдайда да, қазір және дұрыстығын түсіндік. Социалдық медиаға жаңалық оқиғалар көптеген және деректер жинағы Reddit және жаңа Twitter жіберілген жаңа оқиғалардан келеді. Екі конкретті тапсырма болды; қатысушылардың нәтижелерімен бірге келтірілген жағдайларды таңдау және жаңалықтарды тексеру. Біз 22 жүйелік тапсырмаларды (2017 жылы RumourEval-дан 70% көтерілген) алдық. Олардың көпшілігі бәрілдерді өзгерту үшін әртүрлі методологиясын қолданады.', 'mk': 'Од првата заедничка задача на RumourEval во 2017 година, интересот за автоматизирана валидација на тврдењата значително се зголеми, бидејќи опасноста од „лажни вести“ стана главна загриженост. However automated support for rumour verification remains in its infancy.  Затоа е важно заедничката задача во оваа област да продолжи да обезбедува фокус за напорите, кои најверојатно ќе се зголемат. Верификацијата на гласините е карактеризирана од потребата да се разгледаат еволуирачките разговори и новини за да се донесе пресуда за вистината на гласините. Како и во RumourEval 2017 ние обезбедивме податоци од сомневачки постови и последните разговори во социјалните медиуми, анотирани за став и вистина. Гласините на социјалните медиуми потекнуваат од различни новински приказни и податоците се прошируваат за да вклучат и Редит, како и нови постови на Твитер. Имаше две конкретни задачи; rumour stance prediction and rumour verification, which we present in detail along with results achieved by participants.  Примивме 22 поднесувања од системот (зголемување од 70 отсто од RumourEval 2017), од кои многумина користеа најсовремена методологија за решавање на вклучените предизвици.', 'it': 'Dal primo compito condiviso di RumourEval nel 2017, l\'interesse per la convalida automatica dei reclami è aumentato notevolmente, poiché il pericolo di "fake news" è diventato una preoccupazione principale. Tuttavia, il supporto automatizzato per la verifica delle voci rimane agli inizi. È quindi importante che un compito condiviso in questo settore continui a concentrarsi sugli sforzi, che probabilmente aumenteranno. La verifica delle voci è caratterizzata dalla necessità di considerare l\'evoluzione delle conversazioni e degli aggiornamenti delle notizie per raggiungere un verdetto sulla veridicità di una voce. Come in RumourEval 2017, abbiamo fornito un set di dati di post dubbi e conversazioni conseguenti sui social media, annotati sia per posizione che per veridicità. Le voci sui social media derivano da una varietà di notizie di ultima generazione e il set di dati è stato ampliato per includere Reddit e nuovi post su Twitter. Vi erano due compiti concreti: La previsione della posizione delle voci e la verifica delle voci, che presentiamo in dettaglio insieme ai risultati raggiunti dai partecipanti. Abbiamo ricevuto 22 proposte di sistema (un aumento del 70% rispetto a RumourEval 2017), molte delle quali hanno utilizzato metodologie all\'avanguardia per affrontare le sfide coinvolte.', 'ms': 'Sejak tugas pertama RumourEval berkongsi pada tahun 2017, kepentingan dalam pengesahihan hak automatik telah meningkat jauh, kerana bahaya "berita palsu" telah menjadi masalah utama. Namun sokongan automatik untuk pengesahan khabar angin masih dalam masa kecil. Oleh itu, penting tugas berkongsi di kawasan ini terus memberikan fokus untuk usaha, yang mungkin akan meningkat. Pengesahan khabar angin dikatakan oleh keperluan untuk mempertimbangkan pembicaraan berkembang dan kemaskini berita untuk mencapai keputusan tentang kebenaran khabar angin. Seperti dalam RumourEval 2017 kami menyediakan set data dari pos yang ragu-ragu dan perbualan yang berikutnya dalam media sosial, menyatakan kedua-dua kedudukan dan kebenaran. Kabar angin media sosial berasal dari berbagai cerita berita terbaru dan set data dikembangkan untuk termasuk Reddit serta pos Twitter baru. There were two concrete tasks;  ramalan pendapat khabar angin dan pengesahan khabar angin, yang kami persembahkan secara terperinci bersama dengan hasil yang dicapai oleh peserta. Kami menerima 22 penghantaran sistem (meningkat 70% dari RumourEval 2017) kebanyakan dari mereka menggunakan metodologi terbaik untuk menangani cabaran yang terlibat.', 'ml': '2017-ല്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ റുമോര്\u200dവെല്\u200d പങ്കെടുത്ത ജോലിയില്\u200d താങ്കള്\u200dക്ക് താല്\u200dപര്യമുള്ള വിശ്വാസം വളരെ കൂടുതലായി വര്\u200dദ്ധിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു.  എന്നാലും കുട്ടിയില്\u200d സ്വയം പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നത് കുട്ടിയിലാണ്. അതുകൊണ്ട് ഈ പ്രദേശത്ത് പങ്കാളിയുള്ള ഒരു ജോലിയുണ്ടാക്കുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്, ശ്രമിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്ക സംസാരം വികസിക്കുന്നതും വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d പുതുക്കുന്നതും പരിശോധിക്കേണ്ടതുമായി വിശ്വസിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു വാക്കിന്\u200dറെ സത്യസന്ധതയില റൂമോര്\u200dഎവാല്\u200d 2017-ല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ഡാറ്റാബിയസ് പോസ്റ്റുകള്\u200d നല്\u200dകിയിരുന്നു. സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനെ പിന്തുടര്\u200dന The social media rumours stem from a variety of breaking news stories and the dataset is expanded to include Reddit as well as new Twitter posts.  രണ്ട് കോണ്\u200dക്രീറ്റ് ജോലികള്\u200d ഉണ്ടായിരുന്നു; പങ്കാളികള്\u200d നേടിയ ഫലങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന വ്യാജത്തിന്റെ പ്രവചനവും വാക്കുകളും വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നതും  ഞങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് 22 സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ കീഴടങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭിച്ചു (റമൂര്\u200dഎവാല്\u200d 2017-ല്\u200d നിന്ന് 70% കൂടുതല്\u200d) അതില്\u200d പലരും ചേര്\u200dന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്', 'mt': 'Mill-ewwel kompitu kondiviż ta’ RumourEval fl-2017, l-interess fil-validazzjoni awtomatizzata tat-talbiet żdied ħafna, minħabba li l-periklu ta’ “a ħbarijiet foloz” sar tħassib ewlieni. Madankollu, l-appoġġ awtomatizzat għall-verifika tar-rumori għadu fit-tfulija tiegħu. Għalhekk huwa importanti li kompitu kondiviż f’dan il-qasam ikompli jipprovdi attenzjoni għall-isforz, li x’aktarx jiżdied. Il-verifika tar-rumori hija kkaratterizzata mill-ħtieġa li jiġu kkunsidrati konverżjonijiet li qed jevolvu u a ġġornamenti tal-aħbarijiet biex jintlaħaq verdict dwar il-veraċità tar-rumori. Bħal f’RumourEval 2017 ipprovdejna sett ta’ dejta ta’ postijiet dubjużi u konversazzjonijiet sussegwenti fil-midja soċjali, annotati kemm għall-pożizzjoni kif ukoll għall-veraċità. Is-rumori tal-midja soċjali jirriżultaw minn varjetà ta’ storji ta’ a ħbarijiet ġodda u s-sett tad-dejta huwa estiż biex jinkludi Reddit kif ukoll postijiet ġodda fuq Twitter. Kien hemm żewġ kompiti konkreti; tbassir tal-pożizzjoni tar-rumour u verifika tar-rumour, li nippreżentaw fid-dettall flimkien mar-riżultati miksuba mill-parteċipanti. Irċevejna 22 sottomissjoni tas-sistema (żieda ta’ 70% minn RumourEval 2017) li ħafna minnhom użaw metodoloġija avvanzata biex jindirizzaw l-isfidi involuti.', 'mn': '2017 оны анхны Румерэвил ажил хуваалцаж байхаас хойш автоматжуулсан хүлээн зөвшөөрүүлэлтийн шалгалтын сонирхол маш их нэмэгдсэн. Яагаад гэвэл "хуурамч мэдээний аюул" нь ихэвчлэн асуудал болсон. Гэхдээ шүлэг шалгахад автоматжуулан дэмжих нь бага насанд байдаг. Тиймээс энэ хэсэгт хуваалцах үйл ажиллагаа үргэлжлүүлэх нь чухал. Энэ нь нэмэгдэх магадлалтай хичээлийн төвлөрөл. Шийтгэлийн үнэндээ шийдвэр гаргах үед хөгжиж буй ярилцлагууд болон мэдээний шинэчлэлүүдийг ойлгох шаардлагатай. 2017 оны RumourEval-ын хувьд бид нийгмийн мэдээллийн мэдээллийн хэлбэрүүд болон үнэндээ хоёулаад ярилцлага гаргасан. Нийгмийн мэдээллийн мэдээллийн сонсолтууд олон түүхийг хуваалцдаг бөгөөд өгөгдлийн сангууд нь Reddit болон шинэ Twitter-ийн захирагдалд нэмэгдсэн. Хоёр тодорхой ажил байсан. оролцогчдын гарсан үр дүнтэй хамт нарийвчлан тайлбарлаж өгсөн ярианы таамаглал болон шүлэг шалгалт. Бид 22 системийн дамжуулалт авсан (2017 оны RumourEval-аас 70% нэмэгдсэн) ихэнх нь урлагийн хувь методологийг ашиглаж байсан.', 'pl': 'Od czasu pierwszego wspólnego zadania RumourEval w latach 2017, zainteresowanie zautomatyzowaną walidacją roszczeń znacznie wzrosło, ponieważ niebezpieczeństwo "fake news" stało się głównym problemem. Jednak zautomatyzowane wsparcie weryfikacji plotek pozostaje w powietrzu. Dlatego też ważne jest, aby wspólne zadanie w tej dziedzinie nadal zapewniało koncentrację wysiłków, które prawdopodobnie będą rosły. Weryfikacja plotek charakteryzuje się potrzebą rozważenia ewoluujących rozmów i aktualizacji wiadomości w celu wydania werdyktu dotyczącego prawdziwości plotek. Podobnie jak w RumourEval 2017 dostarczyliśmy zbiór danych wątpliwych postów i wynikających z nich rozmów w mediach społecznościowych, podanych zarówno pod kątem stanowiska, jak i prawdziwości. Plotki w mediach społecznościowych wynikają z różnych najnowszych wiadomości, a zbiór danych został rozszerzony o Reddit, a także nowe posty na Twitterze. Były dwa konkretne zadania: Przewidywanie stanowiska plotek i weryfikacja plotek, którą szczegółowo prezentujemy wraz z wynikami osiągniętymi przez uczestników. Otrzymaliśmy 22 zgłoszenia systemowe (o 70% wzrost z RumourEval 2017), z których wiele wykorzystało najnowocześniejszą metodologię do sprostania związanym z tym wyzwaniom.', 'sr': 'Od prvog zadatka RumourEval koji je dijelio 2017. godine, interes za automatsku potvrdu tvrdnja je veoma povećan, jer je opasnost "lažnih vijesti" postala glavna zabrinutost. Međutim, automatska podrška za verificiju glasina ostaje u svom malom djetinjstvu. Stoga je važno da zajednički zadatak u ovoj oblasti nastavi da se fokusira na napore, što će vjerojatno povećati. Verifikacija ružanja karakterizira potrebu razmotriti razgovore i aktualizacije vesti kako bi postigla presudu o istinitosti glasine. Kao u RumourEval 2017, pružili smo skup podataka o sumnjivim položajima i sledećim razgovorima u društvenim medijima, annotirani i za stanje i istinu. Priče o društvenim medijima proizvode razne vijesti, a komplet podataka se proširi kako bi uključio Reddit i nove Twitter postove. Bilo je dva konkretna zadataka; Predviđanje glasina i verifikacija glasina, koju predstavljamo detaljno zajedno sa rezultatima postignutim sudionicima. Dobili smo 22 podatke o sistemu (povećanje od 70% od RumourEval 2017) mnogi od njih su koristili državnu metodologiju umjetnosti za rješavanje uključenih izazova.', 'no': 'Sidan den første RumourEval delte oppgåva i 2017, har interesse på automatisk validating av etterspørselen mykje økt, sidan fargen for «falske nyhetar» er blitt ein hovudbekymring. Men automatisk støtte for rumoreverifikasjon er likevel i infanten. Det er derfor viktig at ein delt oppgåve i dette området fortsetter å gjera fokus for innpålet, som sannsynlegvis vil auka. Verifisering av ruter er karakterisert av nødvendighet for å forstå utviklingane av samtaler og nyhetsoppdateringar for å nå ein sprøyt om sannheten til ein rumor. Som i RumourEval 2017, oppgaven vi ei dataset med dubbeleg postar og ettersom samtaler i sosiale medier, oppmerkte både for stasjon og sannhet. Socielle media-rumorene stemmer frå mange brytingshistoriar og dataset er utvida for å inkludere Reddit og nye Twitter-postar. Det var to konkrete oppgåver; forebygging av avstanden og rumoreverifikasjon, som vi presenterer i detalj saman med resultat oppnådd av deltakarar. Vi fikk 22 systemopplysningar (ein 70% økning frå RumourEval 2017) mange av dei brukte metodologiske tilstanden for å løse utfordringane som er involvert.', 'lt': 'Nuo pirmosios RumourEval bendros užduoties 2017 m. labai padidėjo susidomėjimas automatizuotu reikalavimų patvirtinimu, nes „suklastotų naujienų“ pavojus tapo pagrindine problema. Tačiau automatizuota parama gandų tikrinimui išlieka dar mažai. Todėl svarbu, kad bendra užduotis šioje srityje ir toliau sutelktų dėmesį į pastangas, kurios greičiausiai padidės. Garsų tikrinimui būdingas poreikis apsvarstyti pokalbių raidą ir naujienų atnaujinimą, kad būtų priimtas sprendimas dėl garsų tikrumo. Kaip ir 2017 m. RumourEval, pateikėme duomenų rinkinį apie abejotinus postus ir po to vykstančius pokalbius social in ėje žiniasklaidoje, užfiksuotus tiek dėl pozicijos, tiek dėl tikrumo. Socialinės žiniasklaidos gandai kyla iš įvairių naujienų istorijų, o duomenų rinkinys išplečiamas taip, kad apimtų Reddit ir naujus Twitter postus. Buvo atlikti du konkretūs uždaviniai; rumour stance prediction and rumour verification, which we present in detail along with results achieved by participants.  Gavome 22 sistemos paraiškas (70 proc. padidėjo nuo 2017 m. RumourEval), iš kurių daugelis naudojo naujausią metodiką sprendžiant susijusius uždavinius.', 'ro': 'De la prima sarcină partajată de RumourEval în 2017, interesul pentru validarea automată a cererilor a crescut considerabil, deoarece pericolul "știrilor false" a devenit o preocupare generală. Cu toate acestea, sprijinul automat pentru verificarea zvonurilor rămâne în faza incipientă. Prin urmare, este important ca o sarcină comună în acest domeniu să continue să ofere un accent deosebit eforturilor, care este probabil să crească. Verificarea zvonurilor este caracterizată de necesitatea de a lua în considerare evoluția conversațiilor și actualizărilor de știri pentru a ajunge la un verdict cu privire la veridicitatea zvonurilor. Ca și în RumourEval 2017 am furnizat un set de date de postări dubioase și conversații care au urmat în rețelele de socializare, adnotate atât pentru poziție, cât și pentru veridicitate. Zvonurile rețelelor sociale provin dintr-o varietate de știri de ultimă oră și setul de date este extins pentru a include Reddit, precum și noi postări Twitter. Au existat două sarcini concrete; Prevederea poziției zvonurilor și verificarea zvonurilor, pe care le prezentăm în detaliu împreună cu rezultatele obținute de participanți. Am primit 22 de depuneri de sistem (o creștere de 70% față de RumourEval 2017), dintre care multe au folosit metode de ultimă generație pentru a aborda provocările implicate.', 'so': "Tan iyo waqtigii ugu horeysay ee warqada Eval ee loo qaybsaday sanadkii 2017, xiiseynta ku saabsan xaqiiqnimada dalbashada hore ayaa aad u kordhay, sababtoo ah khatar ku jirta “warar been ah” waxay noqotay mid aad u khatar ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee caawimaadda iskuulka ah ee xaqiijinta warqadu wuxuu ku jiraa ilmihiisa. Sidaa darteed waa muhiim in shaqada wadajirka ah ee dalkan ku yaala ay sii socoto ku dayactirka, taas oo suurtowda in la kordhiyo. Aqoonsiga warqadda waxaa lagu qoraa baahida in la fikiro hadallada bedbeddelaya iyo wararka cusub si uu u gaaro go'aanka warqada ah. Sidii aan RumourEval 2017 u soo dirnay koorasyo labaad oo kala duduwan, waxaana soo raacaynaa hadallo ku saabsan shabakada bulshada, taasoo dhibaataysan dhaqdhaqaaq iyo daaqsinimo. Wararka shabakadda bulshada ayaa ka soo baxay warqado warbixinta kala duduwan oo kala duduwan, sawiradana waxaa loo fidiyaa mid ku jira Reddit iyo warqado cusub oo Twitterka ah. Waxaa jiray laba shaqo oo la mid ah; warqada beenta ah iyo xaqiijinta hadalka, taas oo aynu si cad ugu soo soconaynaa iyo resultiyadii kuwa ka qeybqaaday. We received 22 system submissions (a 70% increase from RumourEval 2017) many of which used state-of-the-art methodology to tackle the challenges involved.", 'sv': 'Sedan RumourEvals första delade uppgift 2017 har intresset för automatiserad skadevalidering ökat kraftigt, eftersom faran för "falska nyheter" har blivit ett vanligt problem. Automatiserat stöd för verifiering av rykten är dock fortfarande i sin linda. Det är därför viktigt att en gemensam uppgift på detta område fortsätter att fokusera på insatserna, som sannolikt kommer att öka. Bekräftelsen av rykten kännetecknas av behovet av att överväga pågående samtal och nyhetsuppdateringar för att nå en dom om ett ryktes sanning. Precis som i RumourEval 2017 tillhandahöll vi en datauppsättning tvivelaktiga inlägg och efterföljande konversationer i sociala medier, kommenterade både för inställning och sanning. Rykten från sociala medier härstammar från en mängd nyheter och datauppsättningen utökas till att omfatta Reddit samt nya Twitter-inlägg. Det fanns två konkreta uppgifter: förutsägelse av rykten och verifiering av rykten, som vi presenterar i detalj tillsammans med resultat som uppnåtts av deltagarna. Vi fick 22 systembidrag (en ökning med 70% från RumourEval 2017) varav många använde state-of-the-art metoder för att hantera utmaningarna.', 'si': '2017 දී පලවෙනි රූම්\u200dරෝවර් වලින් කාර්යය සම්බන්ධ කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ ස්වයංක නමුත් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක උදව් තියෙනවා. ඉතින් මේ ප්\u200dරදේශයේ සමාගත වැඩක් පටන් ගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා කියලා, ඒක වැඩි වෙන්න පුළුවන්. විශ්වාස විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරන්න අවශ්\u200dයයෙන් විශ්වාස කතා කරන්න සහ වාර්තාව අවස්ථානයක් පටන් ගන්න විධානයක්  2017 රූමුර් වලින් අපි සාමාජික මධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමයේ සංවාදයක් සඳහා දත්ත සූදානම් කරලා තියෙනවා, ස්ථානය සහ ඇත්ත සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයාත්මක කතාවක් විශේෂයෙන් පිටවෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පත්වෙන්නේ, ඒ වගේම දත්ත සැට් විස්තර කර කොන්ක්\u200dරිට් වැඩක් දෙකක් තියෙනවා; ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තරයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ති අපිට පද්ධතිය අවස්ථාවක් 22 (රූමීර් වලින් 70% විශාලයක් 2017 වලින්) ගොඩක් දෙනෙක් පාවිච්චි කරලා තියෙනවා කියලා අභ්\u200dයා', 'ta': '2017-ல் முதல் புத்தகம் Eval பகிர்ந்த பணியில் இருந்து, தானாகவே தேவைப்படும் சரிபார்த்தல் வட்டி அதிகப்படுத்தப்பட்டது, ஏனென்றால் "பொய் செய்தி ஆனால் குறிப்பு உறுதிப்படுத்தலுக்கு தானாகவே ஆதரவு அவரது குழந்தையில் இருக்கிறது. எனவே இந்த புலத்தில் பகிர்ந்த பணியின் முயற்சிக்கு ஒரு கவனத்தை தொடர்ந்து கொள்ளும் என்பது முக்கியமானது, அது அதிகரிக்க குறிப்பிட்ட உரையாடல் மற்றும் செய்தி புதுப்பித்தலை பரிசோதிக்க வேண்டிய தேவையால் குறிப்பிடப்பட்டுள்ளது ஒரு வார்த்தை As in RumourEval 2017 we provided a dataset of dubious posts and ensuing conversations in social media, annotated both for stance and veracity.  செய்திகளை முறித்துவிடும் பல்வேறு செய்திகளிலிருந்து சமூக ஊடகங்களின் வார்த்தைகள் விரிவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும இரண்டு குறிப்பிட்ட பணிகள் இருந்தன; கூற்று நிலையில் புரிந்தது மற்றும் புகழ் உறுதிப்படுத்தல், அதை நாம் விளக்கமாக காண்பிக்கிறோம் பங்குக்குள நாங்கள் 22 முறைமையில் ஒப்புக்கொள்கிறோம் (வார்த்தையில் இருந்து 70% அதிகரிக்கப்பட்டது), அதில் பெரும்பாலானவர்கள் கலை முறைமையி', 'ur': '۲۰۱۷ میں پہلی رومور Eval کے بارے میں مشترک کام کی وجہ سے، اتوماٹی ادعا کی تصدیق کی علاقہ بہت زیادہ اضافہ ہوتی ہے، کیونکہ "جھوٹی خبر" کی خطرہ ایک بڑی نگرانی ہو گئی ہے. اگرچہ شفاعت کی تصدیق کے لئے اتمام کی مدد اس کے بچے میں رہتا ہے۔ لہٰذا یہ ضرورت ہے کہ اس منطقه میں ایک مشترک کام کوشش کے لئے تمرکز کرنا ادامہ کرے جو بڑھنے کی امید ہے۔ ایک افسانہ کی سچائی کے بارے میں ایک فیصلہ پہنچانے کے لئے تبدیل ہونے والی باتوں اور خبروں میں اضافہ کرنے کی ضرورت کے ذریعہ سے روشنی کی تصدیق کرتی ہے. جس طرح ہم نے روم ایولی 2017 میں ایک ڈیٹسٹ ڈیٹ سٹ دی تھی اور سوسیل میڈیا میں باتیں پیدا کی تھیں، وضعیت اور سچائی کے ساتھ مطلع کی تھی. سوسیلی میڈیا کی آواز مختلف خبریوں سے آتی ہے اور ڈیٹ سٹ بھی گھٹا دی گئی ہے کہ ریڈیٹ اور نیوی ٹویٹر پوسٹ شامل کریں۔ دو مشخص کام تھے شرکتوں کے نتیجے کے ساتھ ہم تفصیل کے ساتھ بیان کرتے ہیں. ہم نے 22 سیسٹم کے مطابق (روmourEval 2017 سے 70% زیادہ اضافہ) حاصل کئے۔ ان میں سے بہت سے لوگ شرکت کے مطابق طریقے استعمال کرتے تھے۔', 'vi': 'Kể từ vụ chia sẻ RumourEvl lần đầu ở 2007, hứng thú với việc xác nhận yêu cầu tự động đã tăng lên rất nhiều, vì nguy cơ gây ra nguy hiểm cho "82202; Tuy nhiên, sự hỗ trợ tự động cho tin đồn vẫn còn trong giai đoạn đầu. Vì vậy, việc chia sẻ một nhiệm vụ trong lĩnh vực này tiếp tục là tập trung cho nỗ lực, mà có thể sẽ tăng lên. Nguồn tin đồn đã được đánh dấu bởi việc cần cân nhắc các cuộc nói chuyện và cập nhật tin tức tiến triển để đưa ra phán quyết s ự thật của tin đồn. Như trong phim Rumour Evl rác rưởi chúng tôi đã cung cấp một tập tin đầy mơ hồ và tiếp theo các cuộc trò chuyện trên truyền thông xã hội, ghi chú cả về lập trường và sự công bằng. Tin đồn truyền thông xã hội bắt nguồn từ rất nhiều câu chuyện mới nhận được, và bộ dữ liệu được mở rộng để bao gồm Reddit cũng như những bài đăng trên Twitter mới. Có hai nhiệm vụ cụ thể; Tin đồn về lời tiên tri và lời đồn, chúng ta sẽ trình bày chi tiết cùng với kết quả được thành công. Chúng tôi đã nhận được thư viện mô-71 phần lớn từ Rumour Evl 2007, nhiều trong số đó đã dùng phương pháp tiên tiến để giải quyết những thử thách liên quan.', 'uz': '2017-yildan birinchi so\'zlar Eval bilan birinchi ishga aytgandan, avtomatik tashkilotni tasdiqlash qiziyati juda ko\'proq edi, chunki "fake news" xavfsizligi eng muhim eng muhimdir. Lekin tasdiqlashni tasdiqlash uchun avtomatik qoʻllanmagan qoʻllaniladi. Шундай қилиб, бу жойда шериклик вазифаси давом этмоқда ва бу ишларни зиёда қилиш мумкин. Tasdiqlashni tasdiqlash mumkin, axborot haqiqida gapirishni tasdiqlash va xabar yangilash kerak. 2017-yildan RumourEval davomida biz bir necha postlarni bajardik va jamiyat medya bilan suhbatlarni qo\'shishga qo\'shib keldik, hamma suhbatlarni tasavvur qiladi. Name Bir nechta vazifalar bo\'lgan edi; biz bu haqida o\'xshash hayotni taqdim qildik, biz o\'rganish natijalari bilan bajarayotganmiz. Biz 22 tizimga ishlatilgan (RumourEval 2017 dan 70% korganda) ko\'pchilik shunday muammolarni taklif qilish uchun davlat usulini ishlatilgan.', 'bg': 'От първата споделена задача през 2017 г., интересът към автоматизираното валидиране на претенции значително се увеличи, тъй като опасността от "фалшиви новини" се превърна в основна грижа. Автоматизираната подкрепа за проверка на слуховете обаче остава в ранна детска възраст. Ето защо е важно споделената задача в тази област да продължи да осигурява фокус върху усилията, които вероятно ще се увеличат. Проверката на слуховете се характеризира с необходимостта от обмисляне на развиващи се разговори и актуализации на новините, за да се стигне до присъда за истинността на слуховете. Както и в РумурЕвал 2017, ние предоставихме набор от данни от съмнителни публикации и последващи разговори в социалните медии, анотирани както за позицията, така и за истинността. Слуховете в социалните медии произтичат от различни новинарски истории и наборът от данни е разширен, за да включва Редит, както и нови публикации в Туитър. Имаше две конкретни задачи: Прогнозиране на позицията на слуховете и проверка на слуховете, които представяме подробно заедно с резултатите, постигнати от участниците. Получихме 22 системни предложения (70% увеличение спрямо много от които използваха най-съвременна методология за справяне с предизвикателствата, свързани с това.', 'nl': "Sinds de eerste gezamenlijke taak van RumourEval in 2017 is de interesse voor geautomatiseerde claimvalidatie sterk toegenomen, omdat het gevaar van 'fake news' een mainstream probleem is geworden. De geautomatiseerde ondersteuning voor geruchtverificatie staat echter nog in de kinderschoenen. Het is daarom belangrijk dat een gezamenlijke taak op dit gebied een focus blijft vormen voor inspanningen, die waarschijnlijk zullen toenemen. De verificatie van geruchten wordt gekenmerkt door de noodzaak om evoluerende gesprekken en nieuwsupdates te overwegen om tot een oordeel te komen over de waarheidsgetrouwheid van een gerucht. Net als in RumourEval 2017 hebben we een dataset voorzien van dubieuze posts en daaropvolgende gesprekken in sociale media, geannoteerd op zowel standpunt als waarachtigheid. De social media geruchten komen voort uit een verscheidenheid aan breaking news stories en de dataset is uitgebreid met Reddit en nieuwe Twitter posts. Er waren twee concrete taken: Voorspelling van geruchtstandpunten en geruchtverificatie, die we in detail presenteren samen met resultaten die door deelnemers zijn bereikt. We ontvingen 22-systeeminzendingen (een stijging van 70% van RumourEval 2017), waarvan velen gebruikten state-of-the-art methodologie om de uitdagingen aan te pakken.", 'hr': 'Od prvog zadatka u RumourEval-u 2017. godine, interes o autentičnom potvrđivanju tvrdnji je veoma povećan, jer je opasnost "lažnih vijesti" postala glavna zabrinutost. Međutim, automatska podrška ovjerenja glasina ostaje u svom djetinjstvu. Stoga je važno da zajednički zadatak u ovom području nastavi usredotočiti napore, što će vjerojatno povećati. Verifikacija ruža karakterizira potrebu razmotriti razgovore i aktualizacije vijesti kako bi postigla presudu o istinitosti glasine. Kao u RumourEval 2017. pružili smo skup podataka o sumnjivim položajima i sljedećim razgovorima u društvenim medijima, navodili smo i za stav i istinu. Priče o društvenim medijima proizvode razne vijesti i širi se podaci kako bi uključili Reddit i nove Twitter postove. Bilo je dva konkretna zadatka; predviđanje glasina i ovjerenje glasina, koje predstavljamo detaljno zajedno s rezultatima postignutim sudionicima. Dobili smo 22 podatke o sustavu (povećanje 70% od RumourEval 2017) mnogi od kojih su koristili državnu metodologiju umjetnosti za rješavanje uključenih izazova.', 'da': 'Siden RumourEval første delte opgave i 2017 er interessen for automatiseret validering af krav steget kraftigt, da faren for "fake news" er blevet en almindelig bekymring. Automatiseret støtte til bekræftelse af rygter er imidlertid stadig i sin begyndelse. Det er derfor vigtigt, at en fælles opgave på dette område fortsat fokuserer på indsatsen, som sandsynligvis vil stige. Bekræftelse af rygter er karakteriseret ved behovet for at overveje udviklende samtaler og nyhedsopdateringer for at nå frem til en dom om et rygtes sandhed. Som i RumourEval 2017 leverede vi et datasæt af tvivlsomme indlæg og efterfølgende samtaler i sociale medier, kommenteret både for holdning og sandhed. Rygterne på sociale medier stammer fra en række nyhedshistorier, og datasættet udvides til at omfatte Reddit samt nye Twitter-indlæg. Der var to konkrete opgaver: forudsigelse af rygter og bekræftelse af rygter, som vi præsenterer detaljeret sammen med resultater opnået af deltagerne. Vi modtog 22 systemindsendelser (en stigning på 70% fra RumourEval 2017), hvoraf mange brugte state-of-the-art metode til at tackle de involverede udfordringer.', 'id': "Sejak tugas pertama RumourEval dibagi tahun 2017, kepentingan dalam validasi klaim otomatis telah meningkat jauh, karena bahaya 'berita palsu' telah menjadi masalah utama. Namun dukungan otomatis untuk verifikasi rumor tetap di masa kecil. Karena itu penting bahwa tugas berbagi di daerah ini terus menyediakan fokus untuk usaha, yang mungkin akan meningkat. Verifikasi rumor dikaraterisasikan oleh kebutuhan untuk mempertimbangkan pembicaraan berkembang dan pembaruan berita untuk mencapai keputusan tentang kebenaran rumor. Seperti di RumourEval 2017 kami menyediakan dataset posting yang meragukan dan percakapan yang berikutnya di media sosial, menyatakan kedudukan dan kebenaran. Rumor media sosial berasal dari berbagai cerita berita terbaru dan dataset diperbesar untuk termasuk Reddit serta posting Twitter baru. Ada dua tugas konkret; rumour stance prediction and rumour verification, which we present in detail along with results achieved by participants.  Kami menerima 22 pengiriman sistem (meningkat 70% dari RumourEval 2017) banyak dari mereka menggunakan metodologi terbaik untuk mengatasi tantangan yang terlibat.", 'de': 'Seit der ersten gemeinsamen Aufgabe von RumourEval im 2017 ist das Interesse an automatisierter Schadenabwicklung stark gestiegen, da die Gefahr von "Fake News" zu einem Mainstream-Anliegen geworden ist. Die automatisierte Unterstützung zur Überprüfung von Gerüchten steckt jedoch noch in den Kinderschuhen. Daher ist es wichtig, dass eine gemeinsame Aufgabe in diesem Bereich weiterhin einen Schwerpunkt für Anstrengungen bietet, der voraussichtlich zunehmen wird. Die Überprüfung von Gerüchten ist durch die Notwendigkeit gekennzeichnet, sich entwickelnde Konversationen und Nachrichten-Updates zu berücksichtigen, um ein Urteil über die Wahrhaftigkeit eines Gerüchtes zu erzielen. Wie in RumourEval 2017 stellten wir einen Datensatz zweifelhafter Beiträge und anschließender Gespräche in sozialen Medien zur Verfügung, kommentiert sowohl hinsichtlich Haltung als auch Wahrhaftigkeit. Die Gerüchte in den sozialen Medien stammen aus einer Vielzahl aktueller Nachrichten und der Datensatz wird um Reddit sowie neue Twitter-Beiträge erweitert. Es gab zwei konkrete Aufgaben: Vorhersage und Verifikation von Gerüchten, die wir zusammen mit den Ergebnissen der Teilnehmer ausführlich vorstellen. Wir erhielten 22-System-Einreichungen (eine Erhöhung um 70% von RumourEval 2017), von denen viele modernste Methoden zur Bewältigung der damit verbundenen Herausforderungen verwendeten.', 'fa': 'از اولین کاری که در سال ۲۰۱۷ رومور Eval شریک کرد، علاقه به تصدیق دادن ادعای خودکار بسیار افزایش یافته است، زیرا خطر اخبار دروغگویی یک نگرانی اصلی تبدیل شده است. با این حال، حمایت اتوماتیک برای تصدیق شایعه\u200cها در کودکیش باقی مانده است. به همین دلیل مهم است که یک کار مشترک در این منطقه ادامه دهد که برای تلاش تمرکز کند، که احتمالاً افزایش خواهد داشت. تأييد خطرناک توسط نيازي که باعث تغيير گفتگوها و اخبار تغيير دادن به تصميم رسيدن به حقيقت شايعه ها تحريک شده است. همانطور که در RumourEval 2017 ما مجموعه داده\u200cای از پوست\u200cهای شک\u200cآور و بعد از گفتگو\u200cهای در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی به عنوان وضعیت و حقیقت تحریک کردیم. شایعه\u200cهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی از داستان\u200cهای مختلف اخبار شکسته می\u200cشود و مجموعه داده\u200cها گسترش داده می\u200cشود تا شامل Reddit و پست\u200cهای جدید توئیتر باشد. دو کار مشخص بود شایعه\u200cهای پیش\u200cبینی و تصدیق شایعه\u200cهایی که ما در جزئیات با نتیجه\u200cهایی که توسط شرکتگران به دست آورده\u200cاند نشان می\u200cدهیم. ما ۲۲ تسلیم سیستم (افزایش ۷۰ درصد از RumourEval ۲۰۰۷) را دریافت کردیم. بسیاری از آنها از روش\u200cشناسی دولتی هنر برای حل چالش\u200cها استفاده کردند.', 'ko': "2017년 첫 Rumber Eval 공유 임무 이후'가짜뉴스'의 위험이 주류 우려가 되면서 자동청구 검증에 대한 관심이 크게 늘었다.그러나 루머 확인에 대한 자동화 지원은 아직 시작 단계에 있다.따라서 이 분야의 공동 임무는 계속 늘어날 수 있는 노력에 중점을 두는 것이 중요하다.루머 확인의 특징은 끊임없이 변화하는 대화와 뉴스 업데이트를 고려해 루머의 진실성에 대한 판단을 해야 한다는 것이다.2017년 Rumoreval과 마찬가지로 우리는 소셜미디어에 수상한 게시물과 후속 대화를 위한 데이터 세트를 제공하고 입장과 진실성에 대해 주석을 달았다.소셜미디어의 루머는 각종 돌발 뉴스에서 유래한 것으로 데이터집은 레딧과 새로운 트위터 게시물을 포함해 확장됐다.두 가지 구체적인 임무가 있다.유언비어 입장 예측과 유언비어 검증, 참여자들이 얻은 결과를 상세히 소개하겠습니다.우리는 22개의 시스템 제출 서류(2017년의 Rumber Eval보다 70% 증가)를 받았는데 그 중 많은 것들이 가장 선진적인 방법을 사용하여 관련 도전에 대응했다.", 'sq': "Që nga detyra e parë e përbashkët e RumourEval në 2017, interesi në vlerësimin e automatizuar të pretendimeve është rritur shumë, pasi rreziku i 'lajmeve të rreme' është bërë një shqetësim kryesor. Megjithatë mbështetja automatike për verifikimin e thashethemeve mbetet në fëmijërinë e saj. It is therefore important that a shared task in this area continues to provide a focus for effort, which is likely to increase.  Rumour verification is characterised by the need to consider evolving conversations and news updates to reach a verdict on a rumour's veracity.  Si në RumourEval 2017 ne ofruam një sërë të dhënash të postimeve të dyshimtë dhe bisedimeve që pasojnë në mediat shoqërore, shënuar si për qëndrimin ashtu edhe për vërtetësinë. The social media rumours stem from a variety of breaking news stories and the dataset is expanded to include Reddit as well as new Twitter posts.  Kishte dy detyra konkrete; parashikimi i qëndrimit të thashethemeve dhe verifikimi i thashethemeve, të cilat ne paraqesim në hollësi së bashku me rezultatet e arritura nga pjesëmarrësit. Ne morëm 22 paraqitje të sistemit (një rritje prej 70% nga RumourEval 2017) shumë prej të cilave përdorën metodologjinë më të lartë për të trajtuar sfidat e përfshira.", 'am': 'የፊተኛይቱ ሪፖርት ኢዌል ስራ ከ2017 ጀምሮ፣ የሐሰት ዜና ደኅንነት የውሸት ጉዳይ አካባቢ መሆኑን በማድረግ ግንኙነት አበዛ፡፡ ነገር ግን የውሸት አረጋገጠው የራሳቸውን ድጋፍ በሕፃንነቱ ውስጥ ይኖራል፡፡ It is therefore important that a shared task in this area continues to provide a focus for effort, which is likely to increase.  የውይይት ማረጋገጫ የውይይት ውይይት ማግኘት እና የዜና አዲስ ውይይት እንዲደርስ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በሪሙርEval 2017 የሁለት ደብዳቤዎች ጽሑፎችን እና በማኅበራዊ አውታር ውስጥ የተናገረውን እና የጥላቻን ስርዓት እና አሰቃየን፡፡ ማኅበራዊ አውታር ወሬዎችን ከመቀጠል የተለየ ዝርዝሮች ነው፡፡ የዳታተርንም እና አዲስ ትዊተር ጽሑፎችን ለመጨመር ይዘረጋል፡፡ ሁለት ስራ ነበሩ:: የውይይት ትንቢት እና የውይይት ማስረጃ እና በተካፈሉት ፍሬዎች በተለይተን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ 22 የድምፅ ውጤቶች (ከሩመንEval 2017 መቶ የሚጨመር) ተቀበልን፡፡ ከእነዚህም ብዙዎቹ የሀገር-የ-አርእስት ልማድ ተቃውሞውን ለመቀበል ይጠቀማሉ፡፡', 'sw': "Tangu kazi ya kwanza ya Ujumbe wa Eval mwaka 2017, maslahi ya kujitegemea ya kudhibiti ukweli umeongezeka sana, kwa sababu hatari ya 'habari potofu' imekuwa ya hofu kubwa. However automated support for rumour verification remains in its infancy.  Kwa hiyo ni muhimu kwamba kazi ya kushirikiana katika eneo hili inaendelea kutoa lengo la juhudi, ambalo inawezekana kuongezeka. Uthibitisho wa ukweli unahusika na haja ya kuangalia mazungumzo yanayoendelea na habari mpya ili kufikia hukumu juu ya ukweli wa uvumi. Kama ilivyokuwa kwenye RumourEval 2017, tulitoa takwimu ya makala mbili na kufuatia mazungumzo katika mitandao ya kijamii, yaliudhi wote kwa msimamo na ukweli. Matumizi ya mitandao ya kijamii yanatokana na habari mbalimbali za kuvunja habari na seti ya taarifa zinaongezeka kuwajumuisha Reddit pamoja na makala mpya za Twita. Kulikuwa na kazi mbili za mahsusi; utabiri wa uvumi na ukweli wa uvumi, ambao tunawasilisha kwa kina pamoja na matokeo yaliyofanikiwa na washiriki. We received 22 system submissions (a 70% increase from RumourEval 2017) many of which used state-of-the-art methodology to tackle the challenges involved.", 'tr': "2017-nji ýylda birinji RumourEval işi paýlaşyp ýöränden bäri, awtomatiki iddialar barlamasynyň gyzyklanmasy örän köp kän boldy, sebäbi 'ýalançy haberler' howplysynyň üýtgeýän ajaýyp mesele bolup geçdi. Şuny barlamak üçin awtomatik desteklenýän bolsa şeýle däldir. Şonuň üçin bu bölgede paylaşyk bir zadyň kynçylyk üçin fokus bermegi dowam etmesi möhüm. Gaýratyn barlamak a ýdyşy hakykatdanam hakykatdanam bir karara ýetmek üçin gelişmek we täzelikleri düşünmeli bolup geçmeli däldir. 2017 Sosyal medýdançalaryň a ýdyşylary birnäçe gürrüňli haberler ýaly ýuwaşlyk bilen döwletlendirildi we veri setidi Reddit we Täze posteler ýaly daşarylýar. Iki sany netijesi bardy; Şahsy durumlaryň tahribaýy we diňe sözleriň barlagy we netijeleri tarapyndan berilýän netijeleri bilen detaylar çykýarys. Biz 22 sistem süýşiklikleri (2017-nji ýyldan RumourEval'dan 70% artygy) aldyk. Köp sanat meýdançasyny çözmek üçin bu kynçylyklary çözmek üçin ulandyk.", 'af': "Omdat die eerste RumourEval in 2017 deel opdrag, het belang in outomatiese aandrukking baie vergroot, omdat die gevaar van 'falske nuus'  'n ondersteunde bekommerding geword het. Maar outomatiese ondersteuning vir rumour verifikasie bly in sy infancy. Dit is daarom belangrik dat 'n gedeelde taak in hierdie area voortgaan om 'n fokus vir verskaffing te verskaf, wat waarskynlik sal vermeerder word. Rumour verifikasie is karakteriseer deur die nodig om te beskou om ontwikkeling van gesprekke en nuus opdaterings te besig om 'n oordeel te bereik op 'n rumour se waarheid. Soos in RumourEval 2017 het ons 'n datastel van dubbele pos verskaf en vervolg gesprekke in sosiale media, aangeteken beide vir staatskap en waarheid. Die sosiale media rumours kom van 'n verskillende nuushistories af en die datastel is uitgevou om Reddit en nuwe Twitter-pos te insluit. Daar was twee beteken opdragte; rumour-staanse voorskou en rumour-verifikasie, wat ons in detail voorsien saam met resultate wat deur deelnaders bereik is. Ons ontvang 22 stelsel onderskrifte (â\x80\x99n 70% verhoog van RumourEval 2017) baie van hulle het state-of-the-art metodologie gebruik om die uitdagings betrokke te probeer.", 'az': "2017-ci ildə ilk RumourEval işini paylaşdığından bu yana, automatik iddiaların təsdiqlənməsi çox artırıldı, çünki 'sahte xəbərlər' təhlükəsi çox endirildi. Ancaq səslər təsdiqlənməsi üçün automatlı dəstək çox uşaqlıq içindədir. Buna görə də bu bölgedə paylaşılan bir işin çabaları üçün fokus vermək mümkün deyildir, bu da artırmaq mümkün olacaq. Şeytanın doğruluğu barəsində hökmünü yerinə yetirmək üçün dəyişiklik təsdiqləməsi və xəbər güncellərini düşünmək lazımdır. 2017-ci RumourEval kimi, şəkk-şübhə məlumatların və sosyal mediyalarda danışmaqlarını təmin etdik, həmçin in durumun və həqiqət barəsində danışdıq. Sosyal media səsləri müxtəlif xəbərlərin xəbərlərindən gəlir və verilən qutusu Reddit və yeni Twitter məktubları içərisində genişlənir. İki konkretli işlər vardı. Şahidlərin gələn sonuçları ilə birlikdə detaylı təsdiqlədiyimiz xəbərlər təsdiqlənməsi və səslər təsdiqlənməsi. Biz 22 sistem təbliğlərini (2017 RumourEval'dən 70%-dən art ırmaq üçün) aldıq. Bunların çoxunun çətinliklərə çəkilmək üçün müəyyən olunmuş şəkil metodolojisini istifadə etdi.", 'bn': '২০১৭ সালে প্রথম রুমার ইভাল শেয়ার কর্মসূচীর পর থেকে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে দাবী করার আগ্রহ বেড়ে গেছে, যেহেতু মিথ্যা সংবাদের বিপদ হচ্ছে  তবে গুজব পরীক্ষার জন্য স্বয়ংক্রিয় সমর্থন তার শিশুর মধ্যে রয়েছে। তাই এটা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ যে এই এলাকায় একটি শেয়ার কর্মসূচি চালিয়ে যাচ্ছে প্রচেষ্টার জন্য একটি মনোযোগ প্রদান করার জন্য,  বিবর্তনশীল আলোচনা এবং সংবাদ আপডেট বিবেচনা করার প্রয়োজনীয় গুজবের সত্যির বিষয়ে একটি রায় পৌঁছানোর জন্য গুজব পরিচিত। রুমুর ইভাল ২০১৭ সালে আমরা দুবাইবায়ু পোস্ট এবং সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে কথোপকথন অনুসরণ করে একটি ডাটাসেট পোস্ট দিয়েছি, যার ফলে দুজনে সামাজিক যোগাযোগ মাধ্যমের গুজব বিভিন্ন সংবাদ ভেঙ্গে যাচ্ছে এবং রেডিডিট এবং নতুন টুইটার পোস্টের মধ্যে রাখার জন্য ত দুই কনক্রিট কাজ ছিল। গুজব প্রত্যাখ্যান এবং গুজব নিশ্চিতকরণ, যা আমরা বিস্তারিত উপস্থাপন করছি অংশগ্রহণকারীদের ফলাফলের সাথে। আমরা ২২ টি সিস্টেম প্রদান করেছি (রুমার ইভাল ২০১৭ থেকে ৭০% বৃদ্ধি) যার মধ্যে অনেকে যুক্ত চ্যালেঞ্জের মুখোমুখি হওয়ার জন্য রাষ', 'cs': 'Od prvního sdíleného úkolu RumourEval v letošním roce 2017 se zájem o automatizované ověřování reklamací výrazně zvýšil, protože nebezpečí "falešných zpráv" se stalo hlavním zájmem. Automatizovaná podpora ověřování zvěstí však zůstává v plenkách. Je proto důležité, aby společný úkol v této oblasti nadále zaměřil na úsilí, které se pravděpodobně zvýší. Ověřování zvěstí je charakterizováno nutností zvážit vyvíjející se konverzace a aktualizace zpráv, aby se dosáhlo verdiktu o pravdivosti zvěstí. Stejně jako v RumourEval 2017 jsme poskytli datovou sadu pochybných příspěvků a následných konverzací na sociálních médiích, anotované jak pro postoj, tak i pravdivost. Zvěsti o sociálních médiích vycházejí z nejrůznějších zpráv a datový soubor je rozšířen o Reddit i o nové příspěvky na Twitteru. Byly zde dva konkrétní úkoly: Predikce pověstí a ověření pověstí, které detailně prezentujeme spolu s výsledky dosaženými účastníky. Obdrželi jsme 22 systémové příspěvky (o 70% navýšení od RumourEval 2017), z nichž mnohé využívaly nejmodernější metodiky k řešení souvisejících výzev.', 'et': 'Alates esimesest RumourEvali jagatud ülesandest 2017. aastal on huvi nõuete automatiseeritud valideerimise vastu märkimisväärselt suurenenud, sest "valeuudiste" oht on muutunud peamiseks probleemiks. Kuid automaatne toetus kuulujuttude kontrollimisele on alles lapsepõlves. Seetõttu on oluline, et ühine ülesanne selles valdkonnas keskenduks jätkuvalt jõupingutustele, mis tõenäoliselt suurenevad. Kuulujutte kinnitamist iseloomustab vajadus kaaluda arenevaid vestlusi ja uudiseid, et jõuda kuulujutu tõesuse kohta otsuseni. Nagu ka RumourEval 2017. aastal, esitasime andmekogumi kahtlastest postitustest ja sellele järgnenud vestlustest sotsiaalmeedias, märgitud nii seisukoha kui ka tõesuse kohta. Sotsiaalmeedia kuulujutud pärinevad mitmesugustest värskete uudiste lugudest ning andmekogumit laiendatakse nii Redditi kui ka uute Twitteri postituste hulka. Oli kaks konkreetset ülesannet: kuulujuttude hoiaku prognoosimine ja kuulujuttude kontrollimine, mida tutvustame üksikasjalikult koos osalejate saavutatud tulemustega. Saime 22 süsteemi taotlust (70% rohkem kui RumourEval 2017), millest paljud kasutasid kaasnevate probleemide lahendamiseks kaasaegset metoodikat.', 'fi': 'Ensimmäisen RumourEvalin yhteisen tehtävän jälkeen vuonna 2017 kiinnostus automaattiseen korvausvaatimusten validointiin on lisääntynyt huomattavasti, kun "valeuutisten" vaara on noussut valtavirtapiiriin. Automaattinen tuki huhujen todentamiselle on kuitenkin vasta lapsenkengissään. Tämän vuoksi on tärkeää, että yhteinen tehtävä tällä alalla keskittyy edelleen ponnistuksiin, jotka todennäköisesti lisääntyvät. Huhujen todentamiselle on ominaista tarve harkita kehittyviä keskusteluja ja uutispäivityksiä, jotta huhun totuudenmukaisuudesta päästään ratkaisuun. Kuten RumourEval 2017:ssä, toimitimme aineiston epäilyttävistä viesteistä ja niistä seuranneista keskusteluista sosiaalisessa mediassa, joissa oli sekä kannanottoja että totuudenmukaisuutta. Sosiaalisen median huhut juontavat juurensa erilaisista uutisista ja aineistoa laajennetaan Redditiin sekä uusiin Twitter-viesteihin. Konkreettisia tehtäviä oli kaksi. huhun asennon ennustaminen ja huhun todentaminen, joita esittelemme yksityiskohtaisesti yhdessä osallistujien kanssa. Saimme 22 järjestelmähakemusta (70% enemmän kuin RumourEval 2017), joista monet käyttivät viimeisintä tekniikkaa haasteiden ratkaisemiseksi.', 'bs': 'Od prvog zadatka RumourEval u 2017. godini, interes o autentičnom potvrđivanju tvrdnji je veoma povećan, jer je opasnost "lažnih vijesti" postala glavna zabrinutost. Međutim, automatska podrška za provjeru glasina ostaje u svom djetinjstvu. Stoga je važno da zajednički zadatak u ovom području nastavi da se fokusira na napore, što će vjerojatno povećati. Verifikacija ružanja karakterizira potrebu razmotriti razgovore i aktualizacije vijesti kako bi postigla presudu o istinitosti glasine. Kao u RumourEval 2017. pružili smo skup podataka o sumnjivim položajima i slijedećim razgovorima u društvenim medijima, annotirani i za stav i istinu. Priče o društvenim medijima proizvode razne vijesti, a komplet podataka se širi kako bi uključio Reddit i nove Twitter postove. Bilo je dva konkretna zadatka; predviđanje glasina i ovjeravanje glasina, koje predstavljamo detaljno zajedno sa rezultatima koji su postigli učesnici. Dobili smo 22 podatke o sustavu (povećanje 70% od RumourEval 2017) mnogi od kojih su koristili državnu metodologiju umjetnosti kako bi se riješili uključeni izazovi.', 'ca': "Since the first RumourEval shared task in 2017, interest in automated claim validation has greatly increased, as the danger of 'fake news' has become a mainstream concern.  Tanmateix, el suport automatitzat a la verificació de rumors segueix en la seva infancia. Per tant, és important que una tasca compartida en aquesta àrea continui centrant-se en l'esforç, que probablement augmenta. La verificació de rumors està caracterizada per la necessitat de considerar converses i actualitzacions en evolució per arribar a un veredicte sobre la veritat d'un rumor. Com en RumourEval 2017 vam proporcionar un conjunt de dades de posts dubtables i converses que van seguir als mitjans socials, anotats tant per la posició com per la veritat. Els rumors dels mitjans socials deriven d'una varietat de notícies noves i el conjunt de dades s'expandeix per incloure Reddit i noves publicacions de Twitter. Hi havia dues tasques concretes; predicció de la posició rumorosa verificació de les rumores, que presentem en detall juntament amb els resultats aconseguits pels participants. Vam rebre 22 presentacions del sistema (un augment del 70% de RumourEval 2017), moltes de les quals van utilitzar la metodologia més avançada per abordar els reptes involucrats.", 'hy': '2017 թվականի առաջին "rumoreewal" հանձնարարությունից սկսած անհրաժեշտ հետաքրքրությունը ավտոմատիկ համոզմունքների հավասարման մեծ է, քանի որ "կեղծ նորությունների" վտանգը դարձավ հիմնական անհանգստացում: Այնուամենայնիվ, ձայների ստուգելու ավտոմատիկ աջակցությունը մնում է իր մանկության մեջ: It is therefore important that a shared task in this area continues to provide a focus for effort, which is likely to increase.  Rumour verification is characterised by the need to consider evolving conversations and news updates to reach a verdict on a rumour\'s veracity.  Ինչպես 2017 թվականի "ԽոսուրԷվալ" ընթացքում մենք տվյալներ ենք տրամադրել կասկածելի դիրքերի և հետևյալների խոսակցությունների համակարգի սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում, որոնք նշում են նաև դիրքի և ճշմարտության համար: The social media rumours stem from a variety of breaking news stories and the dataset is expanded to include Reddit as well as new Twitter posts.  There were two concrete tasks;  rumour stance prediction and rumour verification, which we present in detail along with results achieved by participants.  Մենք ստացանք 22 համակարգի ներկայացումներ (70 տոկոսով աճ 2017 թվականից), որոնցից շատերը օգտագործեցին ամենաբարձր մեթոդոլոգիա, որպեսզի լուծենք այդ խնդիրները:', 'jv': 'Suara ing perusahaan Language Nyong-ngopo sing dikarepak nggawe task sing dikarolan ning arep iki dadi njaluk nggawe ngubah ujaran kanggo nggawe ujaran. @title: window Taning ing ne-2013, durung-durung durung-durung we nyimpen dataset dadi nggawe kapan pangan lan ijol-ijolan winih sing dikarepaké ning media sothik, kawula-ajahan kanggo ngerayakno durung lan barang nggih. Perintah sing media sothik dadi sing perkaran akeh basa sing perkaran barang kanggo ngerasah barang nggawe dataset iki dadi sing katya ngulinakake kuwi durung wektu sampeyan gawan; iki Rasané kapan langkung karo cebudhakan lan mbukakipun ciptaaken Awak dhéwé éntuk tanggal 22 Sistem (tahun sedhaya% sing katya mengko duruh ing, ingkang 7) sing apik dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang-sistem kanggo ngilanggar susahé sak ujaran.', 'sk': 'Od prve skupne naloge RumourEval leta 2017 se je zanimanje za avtomatizirano potrjevanje zahtevkov močno povečalo, saj je nevarnost "lažnih novic" postala glavna skrb. Vendar pa je avtomatizirana podpora za preverjanje govoric še vedno v otroštvu. Zato je pomembno, da se skupna naloga na tem področju še naprej osredotoča na prizadevanja, ki se bodo verjetno povečala. Za preverjanje govoric je značilna potreba po razmisleku o razvoju pogovorov in posodobitvah novic, da se doseže razsodba o resničnosti govoric. Tako kot v RumourEval 2017 smo zagotovili nabor podatkov o dvomljivih objavah in sledečih pogovorih v družbenih omrežjih, z oznakami glede stališča in resničnosti. Govorice o družbenih omrežjih izvirajo iz različnih novic, nabor podatkov pa je razširjen tako, da vključuje Reddit kot tudi nove objave na Twitterju. Obstajata dve konkretni nalogi: napoved položaja govoric in preverjanje govoric, ki jih podrobno predstavljamo skupaj z rezultati, ki so jih dosegli udeleženci. Prejeli smo 22 sistemskih prijav (70-odstotno povečanje od RumourEval 2017), od katerih so mnogi uporabili najsodobnejšo metodologijo za reševanje izzivov.', 'ha': "Tan da na farkon Rumoureval ya raba aikin 2017, ana ƙara riba da daman farat ɗaya da za'a gaskata ingancin, kamar wata alama na 'warin ƙarya' ya kasance mai muhimmin muhimmi. However automated support for rumour verification remains in its infancy.  Ina da muhimu a sami wani aikin da aka raba shi a cikin wannan wuri, yana daidai a ƙayyade wani fokus wa aikin da za'a ƙara. Sura'in gaskiyar na ƙayyade wajen ta ƙayyade mazaɓa masu buɗewa da yanzu-yanzu dõmin ya isa wani hukunci na gaskiyar-gaskiyar. Kamin Rumoureval 2017, mun sami kodi na takardar posten biyu da ke bin mazaɓa a cikin mitandai da jamii, sai muka yi zartar da su ga istanci da gaskiya. Kirayar mitandai da jamii za'a samu daga wasu lãbãrayen mai sãɓa wa lãbãra na'ura, kuma an faɗa ɗa tsarin da za'a haɗa Rededit da jumla'anan Twitter. An sami aikin biyu masu adadi. kunnuwa na rumi da gaskiyar gaskiyar, da muna halarce da fassarar mãsu haɗuwa da shi. Mun motsa musamman 22 na'urar (an ƙara 70% daga Rumoureval 2017) masu yawa daga cikinsu, sun yi amfani da metodin-sanawa dõmin su tacce wa masu tsõron masu husũma.", 'he': 'מאז משימה השמועה הראשונה ששותפה בשנת 2017, התעניין באישור התבועה אוטומטי גדל באופן גדול, כיוון שהסכנה של \'חדשות מזויפות\' הפכה לדאגה ראשית. However automated support for rumour verification remains in its infancy.  לכן חשוב שמשימה משותפת באזור הזה תמשיך לספק מרכז למאמץ, שכנראה יגדל. האמת השמועות אופיינת על ידי הצורך לשקול שיחות מתפתחות ומעדכונים חדשות כדי להגיע לדין על האמת של השמועות. כמו בשער השמועה 2017, סיפקנו קבוצת נתונים של משימות ספקות, ושיחות שלאחר מכן בתקשורת חברתית, הצביעו על עמדה ובאמת. השמועות של התקשורת החברתית מגיעות מגוון של סיפורים חדשות חדשות ומערכת המידע מתרחבת כדי לכלול את רדיט וגם פוסטים חדשים בטוויטר. There were two concrete tasks;  ציפוי עמדת השמועה ואמת השמועות, שאנחנו מציגים בפרטים יחד עם התוצאות שנשגשו על ידי השתתפים. קיבלנו 22 הודעות מערכת (עלייה של 70% מ"RumourEval 2017"), רבות מהן השתמשו במטדולוגיה חדשה כדי להתמודד עם האתגרים המעורבים.', 'bo': 'ལོ་ནར་ལྷོག་ཁང་དང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་ལ་ སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་དང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་ནང་དུ་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡིན། འོན་ཀྱང་། དཀྲོག་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཀྱི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་དེ་དུས་ཆུང་དུ་རེད། དེར་བརྟེན། མདུན་ངོས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་མཉམ་སྤྱོད་གྱི་ལས་འགན་ཞིག་ནི་སྣ་ཚུལ་མཐོང་བ་དང་། Rumour verification is characterized by the need to consider evolve conversations and news updates to reach a verdict on a rumor. RumourEval 2017 ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་བཤད་པ་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་ཐོག་ཏུ་གཏོང་གླེང་སྒྲུབ སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་དྲན་དུ་གསར་འགྱུར་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་འགྱུར་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ནས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་གཏོང་ཡོད། དེའི་རིགས་སྡོམ་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལས་རོགས་བྱས་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་མཐོང་སྣང་དང་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཞིབ་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོར་རུ་མིག་ལྟ་གཟུགས་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་དོན་དག་༢༠(RumourEval 2017) སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ལྟ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་ལྟ་བ་སྤྱོད་པའི་རྒྱུ་རྩལ་'}
{'en': 'eventAI at SemEval-2019 Task 7 : Rumor Detection on Social Media by Exploiting Content, User Credibility and Propagation Information', 'ar': 'eventAI في SemEval-2019 المهمة 7: الكشف عن الشائعات على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي من خلال استغلال المحتوى ومصداقية المستخدم ومعلومات النشر', 'fr': 'EventAI au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 7\xa0: Détection de rumeurs sur les réseaux sociaux en exploitant le contenu, la crédibilité des utilisateurs et les informations de propagation', 'es': 'EventAI en la Tarea 7 de SemEval-2019: Detección de rumores en las redes sociales mediante la explotación del contenido, la credibilidad del usuario y la información de propagación', 'pt': 'eventAI no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 7: Detecção de Rumores nas Redes Sociais Explorando Conteúdo, Credibilidade do Usuário e Informações de Propagação', 'ja': 'eventAI at SemEval -2019タスク7 ：コンテンツ、ユーザーの信頼性、および伝播情報を悪用することによるソーシャルメディア上の噂の検出', 'zh': 'EventAI at SemEval-2019 务7:利用用户可信度,讹言于社交媒体', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 7 पर eventAI: सामग्री, उपयोगकर्ता विश्वसनीयता और प्रचार जानकारी का शोषण करके सोशल मीडिया पर अफवाह का पता लगाना', 'ru': 'eventAI на SemEval-2019 Задача 7: Обнаружение слухов в социальных сетях с использованием контента, доверия пользователей и информации о распространении', 'ga': 'eventAI ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 7: Ráflaí a Bhrath ar na Meáin Shóisialta trí Leas a Bhaint as Ábhar, Creidiúnacht Úsáideora agus Faisnéis Iomadaithe', 'el': 'Εργασία 7: Ανίχνευση φήμων στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης με αξιοποίηση περιεχομένου, αξιοπιστίας χρηστών και πληροφοριών διάδοσης', 'ka': 'eventAI semiEval-2019 პარამეტრი 7: სოციალური მედიაზე სიტყვების განსახულება შესახებ, მომხმარებელი დასაწყვება და პროპაგიაციის ინფორმაციის გამოყენებით', 'hu': '7. feladat: Pletykák felismerése a közösségi médiában a tartalom, a felhasználói hitelesség és a terjesztési információk kihasználásával', 'lt': 'renginys SemEval-2019 7 užduotis: Socialinės žiniasklaidos atradimas naudojant turinį, naudotojų patikimumą ir propagavimo informaciją', 'it': "Task 7: Rilevazione di voci sui social media sfruttando contenuti, credibilità dell'utente e informazioni sulla propagazione", 'kk': '7. тапсырма: Мазмұнын, пайдаланушының сенімділігі және пропагациялық мәліметін зерттеу арқылы социалдық медиақтардың жаңалық тапсырмасын табу', 'mk': 'eventAI на SemEval-2019 задача 7: Детектирање на гласини за социјалните медиуми со искористување на содржината, корисничката кредибилитет и пропагационата информација', 'ms': 'eventAI di SemEval-2019 Tugas 7: Pengesanan Rumor pada Media Sosial dengan Menggunakan Kandungan, Kepercayaan Pengguna dan Maklumat Propagasi', 'mt': 'eventAI at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Rumor Detection on Social Media by Exploiting Content, User Credibility and Propagation Information', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 7: വാക്കുകള്\u200d സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയയില്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുക', 'mn': 'eventAI at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Нийгмийн мэдээлэл дээр нээлттэй мэдээлэл', 'no': 'eventAI at semiEval-2019 oppgåve 7: Rumor-oppdaging på sosialmedia ved utforsking av innhald, brukar-kredibilitet og spreidsinformasjon', 'pl': 'Zadanie 7: Wykrywanie plotek w mediach społecznościowych poprzez wykorzystanie treści, wiarygodności użytkowników i informacji propagacyjnych', 'ro': 'EventAI la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 7: Detectarea zvonurilor pe rețelele sociale prin exploatarea conținutului, credibilitatea utilizatorului și informațiile de propagare', 'sr': 'eventAI na zadatku 7: otkrivanje glasina o socijalnim medijima eksplozivanjem sadržaja, povjerljivosti korisnika i informacija o propagaciji', 'so': 'eventAI at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Eray Detection of Rumor Society by Exploting Content, User Credebility and Property Information', 'sv': 'EventAI på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 7: Upptäckt av rykten på sociala medier genom att utnyttja innehåll, användartrovärdighet och spridningsinformation', 'si': 'සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමයෙන් විස්තර, ප්\u200dරයෝජකය විශ්වාස සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය තොරතුරු විස්තර කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி', 'ur': 'SemEval-2019 ٹاکس ۷ میں eventAI: سوسیل میڈیا کے بارے میں روشن شناسایی حاصل، کارساز یقین اور پھیلانے کی اطلاعات کے ذریعہ', 'vi': 'Sự kiện tại Nhiệm vụ hoàn hảo 7: Phát hiện tin đồn về phương tiện giao tiếp bằng cách phát nổ nội dung, khả năng người dùng và thông tin', 'uz': 'Hisobot', 'bg': 'Задача 7: Откриване на слухове в социалните медии чрез използване на съдържание, надеждност на потребителите и информация за разпространението', 'da': 'EventAI på SemEval-2019 Opgave 7: Opdagelse af rygter på sociale medier ved at udnytte indhold, brugertroværdighed og propagationsoplysninger', 'nl': 'eventAI op SemEval-2019 Taak 7: Geruchsdetectie op sociale media door gebruik te maken van content, gebruikersgeloofwaardigheid en verspreidingsinformatie', 'hr': 'eventAI na zadatku 7: otkrivanje glasina o socijalnim medijima istražujući sadržaj, kreditnost korisnika i informacije o propagaciji', 'de': 'eventAI auf der SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 7: Gerüchteerkennung in sozialen Medien durch Nutzung von Inhalten, Nutzerglaubwürdigkeit und Verbreitung von Informationen', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019 이벤트 퀘스트 7: 내용, 사용자의 신뢰도와 정보를 이용하여 소셜 미디어에서 헛소문 발견', 'id': 'eventAI di SemEval-2019 Tugas 7: Deteksi Rumor pada Media Sosial dengan Eksploatasi Konten, Kredibilitas Pengguna dan Informasi Propagasi', 'fa': 'eventAI در تابع شماره ۲۰۱۹: شناسایی شایعه در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی با استفاده از محتوای، اعتماد کاربر و اطلاعات گسترش', 'tr': 'eventAI at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Rumor Detection on Social Media by Exploiting Content, User Credibility and Propagation Information', 'sw': 'eventAI katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 7: Uchunguzi wa Uchunguzi wa Vyombo vya Habari vya kijamii kwa Kutumia Maudhui, Utumiaji wa Uhamiaji na Utagaji', 'af': 'eventAI by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 7: Rumor Opdekking op Sosiale Media deur Inhoud, Gebruiker Oordelikheid en Propagasie Informasie', 'hy': '"Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների հայտնաբերումը օգտագործելով պարունակությունը, օգտագործողների հավատարմությունը և քարոզման տեղեկատվությունը"', 'sq': 'eventAI në SemEval-2019 Detyra 7: Zbulimi i thashethemeve mbi mediat sociale duke shfrytëzuar përmbajtjen, besueshmërinë e përdoruesve dhe informacionin e propagacionit', 'am': 'eventAI at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Rumor Detection Social Media by Exploting Content, User Credibility and Propagation Information', 'az': 'eventAI at semiEval-2019 Task 7: Sosyal Media haqq캼nda S칬yl톛nm톛k, 캻stifad톛칞i 캻nan캼lmas캼 v톛 Propagasyon Mal칲mat캼n캼 Exploiting Content, User Credibility and Propagation Information vasit톛sil톛', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের ৭: গুজব সন্ধানের সামাজিক মিডিয়া, ব্যবহারকারী ক্রিডিবিলি এবং বিজ্ঞাপন তথ্য', 'bs': 'eventAI na zadatku 7: otkrivanje glasina o društvenim medijima istražujući sadržaj, kredibilitet korisnika i informacije o propagaciji', 'ca': 'eventAI a SemEval-2019 Task 7: Detection of Rumors on Social Media by Exploiting Content, User Credibility and Propagation Information', 'cs': 'eventAI na SemEval-2019 Úkol 7: Detekce zvěstí na sociálních médiích využitím obsahu, důvěryhodnosti uživatelů a šíření informací', 'et': 'eventAI SemEval-2019 ülesanne 7: kuulujutute avastamine sotsiaalmeedias sisu, kasutaja usaldusväärsuse ja levitamise teabe kasutamise kaudu', 'fi': 'eventAI SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 7: Huhujen havaitseminen sosiaalisessa mediassa hyödyntämällä sisältöä, käyttäjien uskottavuutta ja levitystietoja', 'ha': '1 hour', 'he': 'EvenAI ב SemEval-2019 משימה 7: גילוי שמועות על מדיה חברתית על ידי ניצול תוכן, אמינות משתמש ומידע ניצוי', 'sk': 'Naloga 7: Odkrivanje govoric na družbenih omrežjih z izkoriščanjem vsebine, verodostojnosti uporabnikov in širjenja informacij', 'jv': 'eventAI at semi-2011 task 7', 'bo': 'eventAI at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Rumor Detection on Social Media by Exploiting Content, User Credibility and Propagation Information'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our system for SemEval 2019 RumorEval : Determining rumor veracity and support for rumors (SemEval 2019 Task 7). This track has two tasks : Task A is to determine a user’s stance towards the source rumor, and Task B is to detect the veracity of the rumor : true, false or unverified. For stance classification, a neural network model with language features is utilized. For rumor verification, our approach exploits information from different dimensions : rumor content, source credibility, user credibility, user stance, event propagation path, etc. We use an ensemble approach in both tasks, which includes neural network models as well as the traditional classification algorithms. Our system is ranked 1st place in the rumor verification task by both the macro F1 measure and the RMSE measure.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظامنا الخاص بـ SemEval 2019 RumorEval: تحديد صحة الشائعات ودعمها (SemEval 2019 Task 7). هذا المسار له مهمتان: المهمة (أ) هي تحديد موقف المستخدم من مصدر الشائعات ، والمهمة (ب) هي الكشف عن صحة الإشاعة: صحيحة أو خاطئة أو لم يتم التحقق منها. لتصنيف الموقف ، يتم استخدام نموذج الشبكة العصبية مع ميزات اللغة. للتحقق من الشائعات ، يستغل نهجنا المعلومات من أبعاد مختلفة: محتوى الشائعات ، ومصداقية المصدر ، ومصداقية المستخدم ، وموقف المستخدم ، ومسار انتشار الأحداث ، وما إلى ذلك. نستخدم نهجًا جماعيًا في كلتا المهمتين ، والذي يتضمن نماذج الشبكة العصبية بالإضافة إلى التصنيف التقليدي الخوارزميات. تم تصنيف نظامنا في المرتبة الأولى في مهمة التحقق من الشائعات من خلال مقياس الماكرو F1 ومقياس RMSE.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nosso sistema para SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Determinando a veracidade de rumores e suporte para rumores (Tarefa 7 do SemEval 2019). Essa faixa tem duas tarefas: a tarefa A é determinar a posição de um usuário em relação ao rumor de origem e a tarefa B é detectar a veracidade do rumor: verdadeiro, falso ou não verificado. Para classificação de postura, é utilizado um modelo de rede neural com recursos de linguagem. Para verificação de rumores, nossa abordagem explora informações de diferentes dimensões: conteúdo de rumores, credibilidade da fonte, credibilidade do usuário, postura do usuário, caminho de propagação de eventos, etc. algoritmos. Nosso sistema está classificado em 1º lugar na tarefa de verificação de rumores tanto pela medida macro F1 quanto pela medida RMSE.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre système pour SemEval 2019 RumoReval\xa0: Déterminer la véracité des rumeurs et la prise en charge des rumeurs (SemEval 2019 Task 7). Cette piste a deux tâches\xa0: la tâche A est de déterminer la position d'un utilisateur face à la rumeur source, et la tâche B est de détecter la véracité de la rumeur\xa0: vraie, fausse ou non vérifiée. Pour la classification des positions, un modèle de réseau neuronal avec des caractéristiques linguistiques est utilisé. Pour la vérification des rumeurs, notre approche exploite des informations de différentes dimensions\xa0: contenu de la rumeur, crédibilité de la source, crédibilité de l'utilisateur, position de l'utilisateur, chemin de propagation des événements, etc. Nous utilisons une approche d'ensemble dans les deux tâches, qui inclut des modèles de réseaux neuronaux ainsi que les algorithmes de classification traditionnels. Notre système est classé 1er dans la tâche de vérification des rumeurs à la fois par la mesure macro F1 et la mesure RMSE.", 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestro sistema para SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Determinación de la veracidad de los rumores y apoyo a los rumores (Tarea 7 de SemEval 2019). Esta pista tiene dos tareas: la Tarea A es determinar la postura del usuario ante el rumor de origen, y la Tarea B es detectar la veracidad del rumor: verdadero, falso o no verificado. Para la clasificación de posturas, se utiliza un modelo de red neuronal con características del lenguaje. Para la verificación de rumores, nuestro enfoque explota información de diferentes dimensiones: contenido de rumores, credibilidad de la fuente, credibilidad del usuario, postura del usuario, ruta de propagación de eventos, etc. Utilizamos un enfoque conjunto en ambas tareas, que incluye modelos de redes neuronales y algoritmos de clasificación tradicionales. Nuestro sistema ocupa el primer lugar en la tarea de verificación de rumores tanto por la medida macro F1 como por la medida RMSE.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2019 RumorEvalのためのシステムについて説明します。RumorEval: Determining rumor veracity and support for rumors (SemEval 2019 Task 7 )。このトラックには2つのタスクがあります。タスクAはソースの噂に対するユーザーのスタンスを決定し、タスクBは噂の真実性を検出します。真実、偽、または未確認です。スタンス分類には、言語の特徴を持つニューラルネットワークモデルが利用される。うわさの検証のために、当社のアプローチは、うわさのコンテンツ、ソースの信頼性、ユーザーの信頼性、ユーザーのスタンス、イベントの伝播経路など、さまざまな次元からの情報を利用します。私たちは、従来の分類アルゴリズムだけでなく、ニューラルネットワークモデルを含む両方のタスクでアンサンブルアプローチを使用しています。当社のシステムは、マクロF 1メジャーとRMSEメジャーの両方によって、噂検証タスクで1位にランクされています。', 'zh': '本文述我SemEval 2019 RumorEval统:定讹言真(SemEval 2019 Task 7)。 此迹有二务:务 A 定用户对源讹言,务 B 检讹言,真伪未验。 其于立场之类,用言语之神经网络。 讹言验之,吾法用维度异息:讹言来可信度,用户可信度用户立,事传路径。 凡此二者,皆用集成法,其神经网络模形及故事分类算法。 我们的系统在宏观F1测量和RMSE测量的讹言验考中第一。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval 2019 RumorEval के लिए हमारी प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है: अफवाह सत्यता और अफवाहों के लिए समर्थन का निर्धारण (SemEval 2019 कार्य 7)। इस ट्रैक में दो कार्य हैं: कार्य ए स्रोत अफवाह के प्रति उपयोगकर्ता के रुख को निर्धारित करना है, और कार्य बी अफवाह की सत्यता का पता लगाना है: सच, गलत या असत्यापित। रुख वर्गीकरण के लिए, भाषा सुविधाओं के साथ एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल का उपयोग किया जाता है। अफवाह सत्यापन के लिए, हमारा दृष्टिकोण विभिन्न आयामों से जानकारी का शोषण करता है: अफवाह सामग्री, स्रोत विश्वसनीयता, उपयोगकर्ता विश्वसनीयता, उपयोगकर्ता रुख, घटना प्रसार पथ, आदि। हम दोनों कार्यों में एक पहनावा दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग करते हैं, जिसमें तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल के साथ-साथ पारंपरिक वर्गीकरण एल्गोरिदम भी शामिल हैं। हमारे सिस्टम को मैक्रो F1 माप और RMSE माप दोनों द्वारा अफवाह सत्यापन कार्य में 1 स्थान दिया गया है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наша система SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Determining rumor trueness and support for rumors (SemEval 2019 Task 7). Этот трек имеет две задачи: Задача A заключается в определении позиции пользователя по отношению к источнику слуха, а Задача B - в определении достоверности слуха: истина, ложь или непроверенный. Для классификации положения используется модель нейронной сети с языковыми особенностями. Для проверки слухов в нашем подходе используется информация из разных измерений: содержание слухов, достоверность источника, достоверность пользователя, позиция пользователя, путь распространения события и т. д. В обеих задачах мы используем ансамблевый подход, который включает в себя модели нейронных сетей, а также традиционные алгоритмы классификации. Наша система занимает 1-е место в задаче проверки слухов как по макро- измерению F1, так и по измерению RMSE.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcóras le haghaidh SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Ag Cinneadh fírinne ráflaí agus tacaíocht do ráflaí (SemEval 2019 Tasc 7). Tá dhá thasc ag an rian seo: Is é Tasc A seasamh úsáideora i dtreo ráfla na foinse a chinneadh, agus is é Tasc B fírinne an ráfla a bhrath: fíor, bréagach nó neamhfhíoraithe. Chun seasamh a rangú, baintear úsáid as samhail néarlíonra le gnéithe teanga. Chun ráflaí a fhíorú, baineann ár gcur chuige leas as faisnéis ó thoisí éagsúla: ábhar ráflaí, creidiúnacht foinse, creidiúnacht an úsáideora, seasamh an úsáideora, cosán iomadaithe imeachtaí, srl. halgartaim. Tá ár gcóras rangaithe sa 1ú háit sa tasc fíoraithe ráflaí de réir an bheart macra F1 agus an beart RMSE.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημά μας για τον προσδιορισμό της αληθείας των φήμων και την υποστήριξη των φήμων (Εργασία 7). Αυτό το κομμάτι έχει δύο καθήκοντα: Εργασία Α είναι να καθορίσει τη στάση ενός χρήστη έναντι της φήμης προέλευσης, και εργασία Β είναι να ανιχνεύσει την αλήθεια της φήμης: αληθινή, ψεύτικη ή μη επαληθευμένη. Για την ταξινόμηση στάσης, χρησιμοποιείται ένα μοντέλο νευρωνικού δικτύου με γλωσσικά χαρακτηριστικά. Για την επαλήθευση φήμης, η προσέγγισή μας εκμεταλλεύεται πληροφορίες από διαφορετικές διαστάσεις: περιεχόμενο φήμης, αξιοπιστία πηγής, αξιοπιστία χρήστη, στάση χρήστη, διαδρομή διάδοσης γεγονότων κλπ. Χρησιμοποιούμε μια προσέγγιση συνόλου και στις δύο εργασίες, η οποία περιλαμβάνει μοντέλα νευρωνικών δικτύων καθώς και τους παραδοσιακούς αλγόριθμους ταξινόμησης. Το σύστημά μας κατατάσσεται στην 1η θέση στο έργο επαλήθευσης φήμων τόσο από το μακροχρόνιο μέτρο F1 όσο και από το μέτρο RMSE.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი ჩვენი სისტემა semiEval 2019 RumorEval-ის განსაზღვრება: სიტყვას სიმართლეობის განსაზღვრება და სიტყვას (SemEval 2019 Task 7). ეს ტრაკი აქვს ორი დავალება: A დავალება არის მომხმარებლის სტანციაციის განსაზღვრება გამოიყენებელი სიტყვებისთვის, და B დავალება არის სიტყვების სიმართლის განსაზღვრება: მართლა, მართლა ან არ სტანციის კლასიფიკაციისთვის ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელი ენის ფუნქციებით გამოყენება. ჩვენი პროგრამა განსხვავებული განზომილებებიდან გამოვიყენება ინფორმაცია: ხსნის შესახებ, მხოლობელობა, მომხმარებელობა, მომხმარებელი სტანცია, მომხმარებელი სტანცია, მოვლენების პროპაგრაციის გზით და ასე. ჩვენ გამოვიყენებთ ანს ჩვენი სისტემა პირველი ადგილია პირველი ადგილის სიტყვების შემოწმებაში, რომელიც მაკრო F1 მაზრია და RMSE მაზრია.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2019 RumorEval rendszerét: A pletykák valódiságának meghatározása és a pletykák támogatása (SemEval 2019 Task 7). Ennek a pályának két feladata van: A feladat az, hogy meghatározza a felhasználó álláspontját a forrás pletykával szemben, a B feladat pedig, hogy felismerje a pletyka valóságát: igaz, hamis vagy nem igazolt. Az állás osztályozásához egy nyelvi funkciókkal rendelkező neurális hálózati modellt használunk. A pletyka ellenőrzéséhez megközelítésünk különböző dimenziókból származó információkat használ ki: pletyka tartalom, forrás hitelesség, felhasználói hitelesség, felhasználói állás, eseményterjesztési út stb. Mindkét feladatban együttes megközelítést alkalmazunk, amely magában foglalja az ideghálózati modelleket és a hagyományos osztályozási algoritmusokat. Rendszerünk első helyen áll a pletyka ellenőrzési feladatban mind a makro F1 mérték, mind az RMSE mérték alapján.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il nostro sistema per SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Determinare la veridicità delle voci e il supporto alle voci (SemEval 2019 Task 7). Questa traccia ha due compiti: Task A è quello di determinare la posizione di un utente nei confronti del rumor sorgente, e Task B è quello di rilevare la veridicità del rumor: vero, falso o non verificato. Per la classificazione delle posizioni, viene utilizzato un modello di rete neurale con caratteristiche linguistiche. Per la verifica del rumor, il nostro approccio sfrutta informazioni di diverse dimensioni: contenuto del rumor, credibilità della fonte, credibilità dell'utente, posizione dell'utente, percorso di propagazione degli eventi, ecc. Usiamo un approccio ensemble in entrambi i compiti, che include modelli di rete neurale e algoritmi di classificazione tradizionali. Il nostro sistema è classificato al primo posto nel compito di verifica delle voci sia dalla misura macro F1 che dalla misura RMSE.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinama mūsų sistema „SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Determining rumors veracity and support for rumors“ (SemEval 2019 užduotis 7). Šis kelias turi dvi užduotis: A užduotis – nustatyti naudotojo poziciją dėl garso šaltinio, o B užduotis – nustatyti garso tikrumą: tiesą, klaidingą ar nepatikrintą. Klasifikuojant pozicijas naudojamas nervinio tinklo model is su kalbos savybėmis. For rumor verification, our approach exploits information from different dimensions: rumor content, source credibility, user credibility, user stance, event propagation path, etc. We use an ensemble approach in both tasks, which includes neural network models as well as the traditional classification algorithms.  Mūsų sistema priskiriama pirmajai pozicijai gandų tikrinimo užduotyje pagal makro F1 priemonę ir RMSE priemonę.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2019 жылдың semiEval жүйесімізді түсіндіреді: жаңалықтар дұрыстығын анықтау және жаңалықтардың қолдауын (2019 жылдың 7. тапсырмасы) анықтау. Бұл жолдың екі тапсырмасы бар: A тапсырмасы - пайдаланушының көзінің дыбыс сөзіне қарсы анықтау, B тапсырмасы - дыбыс сөзінің дұрыстығын анықтау: true, false немесе тексерілмеген. Тіл мүмкіндіктері бар нейрондық желі үлгісі үшін қолданылады. Дыбысты тексеру үшін, біздің тәсіліміз түрлі өлшемдерден мәліметті жұмыс істейді: дыбыс мазмұны, көзінің сенімділігі, пайдаланушылардың сенімділігі, пайдаланушылардың қасиеті, оқиғалардың пропагациясы және т.б. Екі та Біздің жүйеміз ауқымды тексеру тапсырмасының бірінші ретінде, макро F1 өлшемі мен RMSE өлшемі бойынша.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашиот систем за SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Одредување на вистинската гласина и поддршка за гласините (SemEval 2019 задача 7). Оваа трага има две задачи: задачата А е да се одреди ставот на корисникот кон гласините од изворот, а задачата Б е да се открие вистинската гласина: вистинска, лажна или неверификувана. За класификација на ставот, се користи нервен мрежен модел со јазични карактеристики. За верификација на гласините, нашиот пристап ги искористува информациите од различни димензии: содржината на гласините, кредибилитетот на изворот, кредибилитетот на корисникот, ставот на корисникот, патот на пропагација на настаните итн. Ние користиме ансембл пристап во двете задачи, кој вклучува нервни мрежни мо Нашиот систем е рангиран на првото место во задачата за верификација на гласини, како по мерката на макро Ф1, така и мерката на РМСЕ.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem kita untuk SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Menentukan kebenaran khabar angin dan sokongan khabar angin (SemEval 2019 Task 7). Trek ini mempunyai dua tugas: Tugas A adalah untuk menentukan kedudukan pengguna terhadap khabar angin sumber, dan Tugas B adalah untuk mengesan kebenaran khabar angin: benar, palsu atau tidak disahkan. Untuk klasifikasi kedudukan, model rangkaian saraf dengan ciri bahasa digunakan. Untuk pengesahan khabar angin, pendekatan kami mengeksploitasi maklumat dari dimensi yang berbeza: kandungan khabar angin, kepercayaan sumber, kepercayaan pengguna, posisi pengguna, laluan penyebaran peristiwa, dll. Kami menggunakan pendekatan ensemble dalam kedua-dua tugas, yang termasuk model rangkaian saraf serta algoritma klasifikasi tradisional. Sistem kita tertinggi tempat pertama dalam tugas pengesahan khabar angin berdasarkan ukuran makro F1 dan ukuran RMSE.', 'ml': "ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തെ സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 റുമോര്\u200dവെല്\u200d വിവരിക്കുന്നു: വ്യാജത്തിന്റെ വാക്കുകളുടെ ശക്തിയും പിന്തുണ This track has two tasks: Task A is to determine a user's stance towards the source rumor, and Task B is to detect the veracity of the rumor: true, false or unverified.  സ്റ്റേസ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസ്റ്റിഫിക്ഷനില്\u200d ഭാഷയുടെ വിശേഷതകളുള്ള ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റോര്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ഉപ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും നമ്മുടെ പ്രോക്ഷന്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു; വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d, സോര്\u200dസ് വിശ്വാസം, ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ വിശ്വാസം, ഉപയോക്ത നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ആദ്യത്തെ സ്ഥലം മാക്രോ F1 അളവും RMSE അളവും കൊണ്ടാണ്.", 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema tagħna għal SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Determination of rumor veracity and support for rumors (SemEval 2019 Task 7). Din il-mogħdija għandha żewġ kompiti: Il-kompitu A huwa li tiddetermina l-pożizzjoni ta’ utent lejn is-s or s ta’ rumor, u l-kompitu B huwa li tidentifika l-veraċità tas-rumor: vera, foloz jew mhux ivverifikat. Għall-klassifikazzjoni tal-pożizzjoni, jintuża mudell ta’ netwerk newrali b’karatteristiċi lingwistiċi. For rumor verification, our approach exploits information from different dimensions: rumor content, source credibility, user credibility, user stance, event propagation path, etc. We use an ensemble approach in both tasks, which includes neural network models as well as the traditional classification algorithms.  Is-sistema tagħna hija kklassifikata bħala l-ewwel post fil-kompitu ta’ verifika tar-rumori kemm mill-miżura makro F1 kif ukoll mill-miżura RMSE.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас 2019 оны SemEval-ын хувьд бидний системийг тайлбарладаг: ярианы үнэнийг тодорхойлох, сонсолтын дэмжлэг (SemEval 2019 Task 7). Энэ хэлбэрт хоёр даалгавар байна: А даалгавар бол хэрэглэгчийн байр суурь сонсолтыг тодорхойлох ба B даалгавар нь сонсолтын үнэн байдлыг тодорхойлох юм: үнэн, худлаа эсвэл шалгалтгүй. Харин нөхцөл байдлын хуваалтын тулд хэлний чанартай мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загвар хэрэглэгддэг. Шуух шалгалтын тулд бидний арга нь өөр хэмжээсүүдээс мэдээллийг ашигладаг: шүх хэмжээсүүд, эх үүсвэр итгэлтэй, хэрэглэгчийн итгэлтэй, хэрэглэгчийн байр суурь, үйл явдал дэвшүүлэх зам, т.д. бид хоёр даалгаварт дамжуулагдсан зам ашигладаг. Энэ нь Макро F1 хэмжээгээр, RMSE хэмжээгээр бидний систем сонсох шалгалтын ажлын 1-р орон байдаг.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet vår for semiEval 2019 RumorEval: Beskriver rumor veracity og støtte for rumorer (semiEval 2019 Task 7). Denne sporen har to oppgåver: Oppgåve A er å bestemme brukaren sin stad mot kjelderumoren, og oppgåve B er å finna sannheten på rumoren: sann, falsk eller ukjend. For stadsklassifikasjon brukar eit neuralnettverksmodell med språk- funksjonar. For å verifisera rumoren, brukar tilnærminga vårt informasjon frå ulike dimensjonar: rumoreinnhald, kjeldekredibilitet, brukar-kredibilitet, brukar-stasjon, hendingsprogrammasjon osv. Vi brukar ein ensemble tilnærming i begge oppgåver, som inneheld neuralnettverksmodeller og tradisjonelle klassifikasjonsgoritme. Systemet vårt er rankert første plass i rumoreverifikasjonen av både makro F1-målet og RMSE-målet.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz system dla SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Określenie prawdziwości plotek i poparcie dla plotek (SemEval 2019 Task 7). Ten utwór ma dwa zadania: Zadanie A polega na określeniu stanowiska użytkownika wobec pogłoski źródłowej, a Zadanie B polega na wykryciu prawdziwości pogłoski: prawda, fałszywa lub niezweryfikowana. Do klasyfikacji stanowiska wykorzystywany jest model sieci neuronowej z cechami językowymi. Do weryfikacji plotek nasze podejście wykorzystuje informacje z różnych wymiarów: treści plotek, wiarygodności źródła, wiarygodności użytkownika, stanowiska użytkownika, ścieżki propagacji zdarzeń itp. W obu zadaniach stosujemy podejście zespołowe, które obejmuje modele sieci neuronowych, a także tradycyjne algorytmy klasyfikacji. Nasz system zajmuje pierwsze miejsce w zadaniu weryfikacji plotek zarówno według pomiaru makro F1, jak i RMSE.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul nostru pentru SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Determinarea veridicității zvonurilor și sprijinul pentru zvonuri (SemEval 2019 Task 7). Această pistă are două sarcini: sarcina A este de a determina poziția unui utilizator față de zvonul sursă, iar sarcina B este de a detecta veridicitatea zvonului: adevărat, fals sau neverificat. Pentru clasificarea posturilor, este utilizat un model de rețea neurală cu caracteristici lingvistice. Pentru verificarea zvonurilor, abordarea noastră exploatează informații din diferite dimensiuni: conținutul zvonurilor, credibilitatea sursei, credibilitatea utilizatorului, poziția utilizatorului, calea propagarii evenimentelor etc. Utilizăm o abordare ansamblă în ambele sarcini, care include modele de rețea neurală, precum și algoritmii tradiționali de clasificare. Sistemul nostru se află pe locul 1 în sarcina de verificare a zvonurilor atât prin măsura macro F1, cât și prin măsura RMSE.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem za pola ispitivanja glasina 2019. godine: određivanje veranosti glasina i podrške glasina (zadatak 7. polevala 2019). Ovaj trag ima dva zadatka: zadatak A je da odredi stanje korisnika prema izvornoj glasini, a zadatak B je da otkrije istinu glasine: istina, lažna ili nepovjerena. Za klasifikaciju stanja, koristi se neuralna mreža sa jezičkim karakteristikama. Za provjeru glasina, naš pristup koristi informacije iz različitih dimenzija: sadržaj glasina, povjerljivost izvora, povjerljivost korisnika, stav korisnika, put propagacije događaja itd. Koristimo ensemble pristup u obje zadatke, koji uključuje i modele neuralne mreže, kao i tradicionalne algoritme klasifikacije. Naš sistem je prvi mjesto u zadatku za verifikaciju glasina, od mjere makro F1 i RMSE-a.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ පද්ධතිය සෙම්වෙල් 2019 රුමෝර් වලට විස්තර කරනවා: කියපු කියලාවක් විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ කියලාවක් සහය විස්තර ක මේ ට්\u200dරෑකේ වැඩක් දෙකක් තියෙනවා: වැඩක් A තමයි ප්\u200dරභාවිතයේ ප්\u200dරභාවිතයේ ස්ථානයක් තීරණය කරන්න, ඒ වගේම වැඩක් B තමයි වැඩක් වැඩක්  ස්ථානය විශේෂණය සඳහා, භාෂාව අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් තියෙන න්\u200dයුරල් ජාලය මඩේල් භාවිත කරනවා. For Ruor verification, our approach exploits data from vary size: Ruor contingent, source credit, user credit, user condition, case promogation path, etc. we use an ensEmble approach in both Jobs, that comprises neural network Models as well as the standard classification algolorithms. අපේ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරධාන ස්ථානය පළමු ස්ථානය තියෙන්නේ අවස්ථානය සහ RMSE පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා මැක්රෝ F1 මාපය ස', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoraa nidaamka SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Go’aan daacadnimo iyo kaalmada wararka (SemEval 2019 Shaqada 7). Shaqo A waa in uu caddeeyo xaalad uu isticmaalayo warqada asalka ah, shaqo B waa in uu ogaado runta warqada: runta, been ama aan xaqiijinayn. Fasaxa xaaladaha waxaa lagu isticmaalaa model shabakadda neurada ah oo ku qoran aqoonta luuqada. Si loo xaqiijiyo hadal, qaababkayagu wuxuu macluumaad ka baaraandegaa noocyo kala duduwan: warqada warqada ah, aqoonta sourceed, maamulka isticmaalaha, istaagga isticmaalaha, jidka ogeysiiska dhacdooyinka, etc. Waxaynu u isticmaalnaa qaab ka mid ah labada shaqaalaha, kaas oo ku jira modelalka shabakadda neurada iyo algorityada tababarka ah. nidaamkayaga waxaa lagu qiyaasay xafiiska xaqiijinta macro F1 iyo qiyaastii RMSE.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt system för SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Bestämning av ryktens sanning och stöd för rykten (SemEval 2019 Task 7). Detta spår har två uppgifter: Uppgift A är att fastställa en användares inställning till källan rykte, och Uppgift B är att upptäcka sanningsenheten i ryktet: sant, falskt eller obekräftat. För ställningsklassificering används en neural nätverksmodell med språkfunktioner. För ryktesverifiering utnyttjar vårt tillvägagångssätt information från olika dimensioner: rykteinnehåll, källtrovärdighet, användartrovärdighet, användarinställning, händelsespridningsväg etc. Vi använder ett ensembletillvägagångssätt i båda uppgifterna, vilket inkluderar neurala nätverksmodeller samt traditionella klassificeringsalgoritmer. Vårt system rankas på 1:a plats i ryktesverifieringsuppgiften av både makro F1-måttet och RMSE-måttet.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் SemEval 2019 ரும்பொருள் விளக்குகிறது: குறியீட்டு சரிவு மற்றும் குறியீட்டு ஆதரவை உறுதி செய்யும் (SemEval 2019 பணி 7). இந்த தடத்தில் இரண்டு பணிகள் உள்ளன: பணி A என்பது மூல குறியீட்டிற்கு பயனரின் நிலையை தீர்மானிக்கவேண்டும், பணி B என்பது குறியீட்டின் உண்மையை கண்டறி நிலை வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கு, மொழி குணங்களுடன் ஒரு புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் மாதிரி பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. கூற்று உறுதிப்படுத்தலுக்கு, எங்கள் அணுக்கம் வேறு பரிமாணங்களிலிருந்து தகவல்களை வெளிப்படுத்துகிறது: வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கங்கள், மூலம் நம்பிக்கை, பயனர் நம்பிக்கை, பயனர் நிலைமையில், ந எங்கள் அமைப்பு மேக்ரோ F1 அளவு மற்றும் RMSE அளவு இருந்தும் சரிபார்த்தல் செயலில் முதல் இடத்தில் உள்ளது.', 'ur': 'This paper describes our system for SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Determining rumor truth and support for rumors (SemEval 2019 Task 7). اس ٹراک کے پاس دو تابع ہیں: تابع ا یہ ہے کہ ایک کارساز کی موقعیت سراسر آواز کی طرف مقرر کرے، اور تابع B یہ ہے کہ آواز کی حقیقت کو معلوم کرے: حقیقت، غلط یا غلط ہے. موقعیت کلاسیفوں کے لئے، زبان ویژگی کے ساتھ ایک نیورال نیٹ ورک موڈل استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. افسور کی تصدیق کے لئے، ہمارا تقریبا مختلف اندازے سے اطلاعات اضافہ کرتا ہے: افسور کی موجود، سورس اعتماد، کارساز اعتماد، کارساز کی موقعیت، ایڈیٹ پراپاگریٹ مسیر، اضافہ کرتا ہے، اور اضافہ کرتا ہے. ہم دونوں کاموں میں ایک ایسمبل طریقہ استعمال کرتے ہیں، جس میں نیورال نیٹ ور ہمارا سیستم پڑھنے کے لئے پہلی جگہ ہے مکرو F1 ناپ اور RMSE ناپ کے ذریعے۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz SemEval 2019 RumorEval tizimimizni anglatadi: Hisobni aniqlash va so'zlarni qoʻllash (SemEval 2019 Vazifa 7). Bu yerda ikkita vazifalar mavjud: Vazifa A, manba qiymatga foydalanuvchining stansiyini aniqlash va Vazifa B so'zning haqiqiqini aniqlash mumkin: haqiqiy, to ʻgʻri yoki haqiqiqiylik emas. Andoza darajalashtirish uchun tilning xossalari bilan neyrol tarmoq modeli ishlatiladi. Biz tashkilotni tasdiqlash uchun boshqa shakllardan ma'lumotni ishlatimiz: so'zlar tarkibi, manba tarkibi, foydalanuvchi ishonaligi, ishlatuvchi davomida ishlatiladik. Biz ikkita vazifalardan foydalanuvchi soʻzda bir qismni foydalanamiz. Bu ikkita vazifalarda neyural tarmoq modellari va tabiiy taʼminlik algoritlari bor. Bizning tizimimizning birinchi joyi makro F1 metrlari va RMSE metrlari bilan tasdiqlash imkoniyatini o'zgartiradi.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả hệ thống của chúng ta với SemEvl 2009 Rumor Evol: xác định sự thật về tin đồn và hỗ trợ cho tin đồn. Đường ray này có hai nhiệm vụ: Nhiệm vụ A là quyết định quan điểm của người dùng với tin đồn nguồn, và Nhiệm vụ B là phát hiện s ự thật của tin đồn: đúng, sai hoặc không xác thực. Để phân loại lập trường, sử dụng một mô hình mạng thần kinh với tính năng ngôn ngữ. Để xác định tin đồn, phương pháp của chúng tôi sử dụng thông tin từ các chiều khác nhau: tin đồn, uy tín nguồn tin, uy tín người dùng, vị trí người dùng, đường dẫn truyền sự kiện, v. Chúng tôi sử dụng một phương pháp kết hợp trong cả hai nhiệm vụ, gồm các mô hình mạng thần kinh cũng như các thuật toán truyền thống. Hệ thống của chúng tôi được xếp hạng đầu tiên trong nhiệm vụ kiểm tra tin đồn do cả hành động cơ bản F1 và tiến trình của RMxơi.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва нашата система за Определяне на истинността на слуховете и подкрепа за слухове (Задача 7 на СемЕвал 2019). Тази песен има две задачи: Задача А е да определи позицията на потребителя към слуха източник, а Задача Б е да открие истинността на слуха: вярно, невярно или неповерено. За класификация на стойката се използва модел на невронна мрежа с езикови характеристики. За проверка на слуховете подходът ни използва информация от различни измерения: съдържание на слухове, надеждност на източника, надеждност на потребителя, потребителска позиция, път на разпространение на събития и др. Използваме ансамбълен подход и в двете задачи, който включва модели на невронни мрежи, както и традиционните алгоритми за класификация. Нашата система е класирана на първо място в задачата за проверка на слуховете както по мярката на макрос Ф1, така и по мярката на RMSE.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sustav za pola evaluacije 2019. RumorEval: utvrđivanje istinitosti glasina i podrške glasina (zadatak 7. polevaluacije 2019.). Ovaj trag ima dva zadatka: zadatak A je utvrditi stanje korisnika prema izvornoj glasini, a zadatak B je otkriti istinu glasine: istina, lažna ili nepovjerena. Za klasifikaciju stanja, koristi se model neuralne mreže s jezičkim karakteristikama. Za provjeru glasina, naš pristup koristi informacije iz različitih dimenzija: sadržaj glasina, povjerljivost izvora, povjerljivost korisnika, stav korisnika, propagacijski put događaja itd. Koristimo ensemble pristup u oba zadatka, uključujući modele neurone mreže, kao i tradicionalne algoritme klasifikacije. Naš sustav je prvi mjesto u zadatku za provjeru glasina na mjeri makro F1 i mjeri RMSE-a.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores system til SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Fastlæggelse af rygters sandhed og støtte til rygter (SemEval 2019 Task 7). Dette spor har to opgaver: Opgave A er at bestemme en brugers holdning til kildebrygtet, og Opgave B er at opdage sandheden af rygtet: sandt, falsk eller ubekræftet. Til standsklassificering anvendes en neural netværksmodel med sprogfunktioner. Til bekræftelse af rygter udnytter vores tilgang oplysninger fra forskellige dimensioner: rygteindhold, kildens troværdighed, brugertroværdighed, brugerholdning, hændelsesformeringssti osv. Vi bruger en ensemble tilgang i begge opgaver, som omfatter neurale netværksmodeller såvel som de traditionelle klassifikationsalgoritmer. Vores system er rangeret 1. plads i rygtebeverifikationsopgaven af både makro F1 måling og RMSE måling.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft ons systeem voor SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Het bepalen van gerucht waarheidsgetrouwheid en ondersteuning voor geruchten (SemEval 2019 Taak 7). Deze track heeft twee taken: Taak A is om de houding van een gebruiker ten opzichte van het brongerucht te bepalen, en Taak B is om de waarachtigheid van het gerucht te detecteren: waar, vals of niet geverifieerd. Voor standclassificatie wordt een neuraal netwerkmodel met taalkenmerken gebruikt. Voor geruchtverificatie maakt onze aanpak gebruik van informatie uit verschillende dimensies: geruchtinhoud, brongeloofwaardigheid, gebruikersgeloofwaardigheid, gebruikershouding, event propagation pad, enz. We gebruiken een ensemble benadering in beide taken, die zowel neurale netwerkmodellen als de traditionele classificatiealgoritmen omvat. Ons systeem staat op de 1e plaats in de geruchtverificatie taak door zowel de macro F1 meting als de RMSE meting.', 'id': 'This paper describes our system for SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Determining rumor veracity and support for rumors (SemEval 2019 Task 7).  Trek ini memiliki dua tugas: Tugas A adalah untuk menentukan posisi pengguna terhadap rumor sumber, dan Tugas B adalah untuk mendeteksi kebenaran rumor: benar, palsu atau tidak verifikasi. Untuk klasifikasi posisi, model jaringan saraf dengan ciri bahasa digunakan. Untuk verifikasi rumor, pendekatan kita mengeksploitasi informasi dari dimensi yang berbeda: konten rumor, kredibilitas sumber, kredibilitas pengguna, posisi pengguna, jalur propagasi peristiwa, dll. Kami menggunakan pendekatan ensemble dalam kedua tugas, yang termasuk model jaringan saraf serta algoritma klasifikasi tradisional. Sistem kita tertarik di tempat pertama dalam tugas verifikasi rumor oleh ukuran makro F1 dan ukuran RMSE.', 'ko': '본고는 저희의SemEval 2019 RumorEval 시스템을 소개합니다. 루머의 진실성과 루머에 대한 지원을 확인합니다(SemEval 2019 퀘스트 7).이 단서에는 두 가지 임무가 있다. 임무 A는 사용자가 유언비어에 대한 입장을 확정하는 것이고 임무 B는 유언비어의 진실성을 측정하는 것이다. 그것이 바로 진실, 가짜 또는 확인되지 않은 것이다.자세 분류에 있어 언어 특징을 가진 신경 네트워크 모델을 채택했다.루머 검증에 있어서 우리의 방법은 서로 다른 차원의 정보를 이용했다. 루머 내용, 출처 신뢰도, 사용자 신뢰도, 사용자 입장, 사건 전파 경로 등이다. 우리는 이 두 가지 임무에서 통합 방법을 사용했는데 신경 네트워크 모델과 전통적인 분류 알고리즘을 포함한다.우리 시스템은 루머 검증 임무 중 거시 F1 지표와 RMSE 지표로 1위를 차지했다.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaelezea mfumo wetu wa SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Kugundua ukweli wa uvumi na kuunga mkono uvumi (SemEval 2019 Kazi 7). Hatua hii ina kazi mbili: Kazi A ni kuamua msimamo wa mtumiaji kwa uvumi wa chanzo, na kazi B ni kutambua ukweli wa uvumi: ukweli, uongo au usithibitishwa. Kwa usambazaji wa msimamo, modeli ya mtandao wa neura yenye vipengele vya lugha inatumika. Kwa kuthibitishwa kwa uvumi, mbinu yetu inatumia taarifa kutoka katika utofauti tofauti: uvumi, uaminifu wa vyanzo, uaminifu wa watumiaji, msimamo wa matumizi, njia ya kutangaza matukio, etc. Tunatumia mbinu za namna moja kwa moja katika kazi hizo mbili, ambazo zinajumuisha mifano ya mitandao ya kijamii pamoja na makubaliano ya kitamaduni. Mfumo wetu umepangwa na nafasi ya kwanza katika kazi ya kuthibitishwa kwa kiasi kikubwa cha F1 na hatua ya RMSE.', 'de': 'Dieser Artikel beschreibt unser System für SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Ermittlung der Wahrhaftigkeit von Gerüchten und Unterstützung für Gerüchte (SemEval 2019 Task 7). Dieser Track hat zwei Aufgaben: Aufgabe A ist es, die Haltung eines Benutzers gegenüber dem Quellgerücht zu bestimmen, und Aufgabe B ist es, die Wahrhaftigkeit des Gerüchtes zu erkennen: wahr, falsch oder nicht verifiziert. Für die Positionsklassifizierung wird ein neuronales Netzwerkmodell mit Sprachmerkmalen verwendet. Für die Überprüfung von Gerüchten nutzt unser Ansatz Informationen aus verschiedenen Dimensionen: Gerüchteinhalt, Quellglaubwürdigkeit, Benutzerglaubwürdigkeit, Nutzerhaltung, Ereignispropagationspfad usw. Wir verwenden in beiden Aufgaben einen Ensembleansatz, der sowohl neuronale Netzwerkmodelle als auch die traditionellen Klassifizierungsalgorithmen umfasst. Unser System belegt sowohl die Makro F1 als auch die RMSE-Messung den ersten Platz in der Gerüchteprüfung.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم ما را برای شعار ۲۰۱۹ توصیف می\u200cکند: تعیین کردن شایعه\u200cهای حقیقت و پشتیبانی شایعه\u200cها (کار ۲۰۱۹ نیمه ۲۰۱۹). این ترک دو کار دارد: Task A این است که وضعیت کاربر را در مقابل شایعه منبع تعریف کنید، و Task B این است که حقیقت شایعه را شناسایی کنید: حقیقت، دروغ یا غیرتصدیق کنید. برای محرمانه موقعیت، یک مدل شبکه عصبی با ویژه\u200cهای زبانی استفاده می\u200cشود. برای بررسی شایعات، دستور ما اطلاعات را از اندازه\u200cهای مختلف استفاده می\u200cکند: شایعات، اعتماد منبع، اعتماد قابلیت کاربر، وضعیت کاربر، راه گسترش رویداد و غیر از آن استفاده می\u200cکنیم. ما از یک دستور قابل توجه در هر دو وضعیت استفاده می\u200cکنیم که شامل مدل شبکه عصبی و الگوری سیستم ما به عنوان اندازه\u200cی ماکرو F1 و اندازه\u200cی RMSE نخستین مرتبه در کار شنیدن شایعات است.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz SemEval 2019 RumorEval sistemamyzy çykarýar we aýdymlar üçin golaýlanýar (SemEval 2019 Task 7). Bu hatyň iki zady bar: Görev A bolsa ullanyň çeşme diňe golaýynyň durumyny bejermek, we Görev B bolsa diňe s özläniň dogrudygyny tanamak üçin: dogry, ýalňyş ýada tanamakdyr. Taýýarlama üçin, diller bilen näyral şebeke nusgasy ullanýar. Şuny barlamak üçin, öňümiz dürli ölçülerden maglumatlaryny ulanýar: eser meselesi, çeşme ynamlylyklygyny, ullançy ynamlylyklygyny, ullançy durum, evet täsir etmek ýolusynda we bölegi. Biz iki zadyň içinde hem bir ýagdaýy ullanýarys, hem näyral şebeke modelleri we däpli klasifikasyon algoritmala Biziň sistemimiz diňe çykyşyň barlama täzisinde ilkinji gezek, makro F1 ölçüsi we RMSE ölçüsi bilen döredildi.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan sistemin tonë për SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Përcaktimi i vërtetës së thashethemeve dhe mbështetjes për thashethemet (SemEval 2019 Task 7). Ky gjurmë ka dy detyra: Detyra A është të përcaktojë qëndrimin e një përdoruesi drejt thashethemeve burimore, dhe Detyra B është të zbulojë vërtetësinë e thashethemeve: të vërtetë, të rreme apo të paverifikuar. Për klasifikimin e qëndrimit, përdoret një model rrjeti nervor me karakteristika gjuhësore. For rumor verification, our approach exploits information from different dimensions: rumor content, source credibility, user credibility, user stance, event propagation path, etc. We use an ensemble approach in both tasks, which includes neural network models as well as the traditional classification algorithms.  Sistemi ynë është renditur në vendin e parë në detyrën e verifikimit të thashethemeve si nga masa makro F1 dhe masa RMSE.', 'am': 'ይህም ገጽ ለSemEval 2019 RumorEval ስብሰባችንን ይገልጻል፤ የውጤቱን አነስተኛ እና የውጤቱን እርዳታ ማረጋገጥ (SemEval 2019 ስራ 7). የዚህ መንገዱ ሁለት ስራ አለበት፤ ስራ A የሆኗል ውጤት ወደ ምንጭ ውጤት መቆጣጠር ነው፣ ስራ B የእውነቱን ውሸት ማግኘት ነው፤ እውነት፣ ውሸት ወይም ያልተረጋገጠ ነው፡፡ For stance classification, a neural network model with language features is utilized.  ውይይት ለማረጋገጥ፣ የሥርዓታችን መረጃዎችን ከልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ደረጃዎች ይለካል፡፡ የውጤት መረጃዎች፣ የኩነቶች መታሰቢያ፣ የተጠቃሚው ምስክር፣ የግንኙነት አካባቢ፣ የግንኙነት አካባቢ መንገድ እና እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የሥርዓታችን መጀመሪያ ስፍራን በማክሮው F1 ስፍርና RMSE ስፍር ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Bu kağıt 2019 RumorEval sistemimizi təsdiqləyir: sözlərin doğruluğunu təsdiqləyir və sözlərin dəstəkini təsdiqləyir (SemEval 2019 Task 7). Bu yolda iki işin var: A işi istifadəçinin mənbə s əslərinə qarşı təyin etməkdir, B işi səslərin doğruluğunu təsdiqləməkdir: doğru, yalan və ya təsdiqlənmədir. İstasyon klasifikasyonu üçün dil özellikləri ilə nöral a ğ modeli istifadə edilir. Səsər təsdiqləməsi üçün, tərzimiz müxtəlif ölçülərdən məlumatları istifadə edir: səs məlumatları, mənbə təsdiqliyi, istifadəçi təsdiqliyi, istifadəçi tərzini, vaxt propagasyon yolu və ya da. Biz hər iki işdə nöral şəbəkə modelləri və nəticəli klasifikasiya algoritmi içində ensemble tərzini istifadə edirik. Sistemimiz səslər təsdiqləməsi işində ilk dərəcə F1 ölçüsü və RMSE ölçüsü ilə.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր համակարգը "ՍեմԵվալ 2019" Խոսքերը. Խոսքերի ճշմարտությունը որոշում և ձայների աջակցությունը (ՍեմԵվալ 2019-ի 7. հանձնարարությունը): Այս ճանապարհորդությունը ունի երկու խնդիր. A-ն օգտագործողի դիրքը որոշելն է աղբյուրի ձայների նկատմամբ, իսկ B-ն՝ հայտնաբերել ձայների ճշմարտությունը. ճշմարտություն, սխալ կամ անստուգում: Սկզբունքի դասակարգման համար օգտագործվում է լեզվի հատկանիշներով նյարդային ցանցի մոդել: For rumor verification, our approach exploits information from different dimensions: rumor content, source credibility, user credibility, user stance, event propagation path, etc. We use an ensemble approach in both tasks, which includes neural network models as well as the traditional classification algorithms.  Մեր համակարգը դասակարգված է ձայների հավասարման առաջին տեղում՝ ինչպես մակրո F1 չափով, ինչպես նաև ՌՄՍԵ չափով:', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf ons stelsel vir SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Besluit rumor waarheid en ondersteun vir rumore (SemEval 2019 Taak 7). Hierdie snit het twee taak: Taak A is om 'n gebruiker se staanse te bepaal teenoor die bron rumor, en Taak B is om die waarheid van die rumor te vind: waar, vals of onbevestig. Vir staanse klasifikasie word 'n neurale netwerk model met taal funksies gebruik. Vir rumor verifikasie, ons toegang uitbreek inligting van verskillende dimensies: rumor inhoud, bron-betroubaarheid, gebruikerstaanse, gebruikerstaanse, gebeurtenis propagasie pad, ensfh. Ons gebruik 'n ensemble toegang in beide taak, wat insluit neurale netwerk modele en die tradisionele klassifikasie algoritme. Ons stelsel is rankeer eerste plek in die rumor verifikasie taak deur beide die makro F1 maat en die RMSE maat.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem za pola ispitivanja glasina 2019. godine: određivanje istinitosti glasina i podrške glasina (zadatak 7. semiEval 2019). Ovaj trag ima dva zadatka: zadatak A je utvrditi stanje korisnika prema izvornoj glasini, a zadatak B je otkriti istinu glasine: istina, lažna ili nepovjerena. Za klasifikaciju stanja, koristi se neuralni model mreže sa jezičkim karakteristikama. Za provjeru glasina, naš pristup koristi informacije iz različitih dimenzija: sadržaj glasina, povjerljivost izvora, povjerljivost korisnika, stav korisnika, putem propagacije događaja itd. Koristimo osiguran pristup u oba zadatka, koji uključuje modele neuralne mreže, kao i tradicionalne algoritme klasifikacije. Naš sistem je prvi mjesto u zadatku za provjeru glasina, od mjere makro F1 i mjere RMSE-a.', 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধে সেমইভাল ২০১৯ রুমোরেভালের জন্য আমাদের সিস্টেম বর্ণনা করেছে: গুজব নির্ধারণ করা এবং গুজবের প্রতি সমর্থন নির্ধারণ করা হয়ে এই ট্র্যাকের দুটি কাজ রয়েছে: কাজ A হচ্ছে সূত্র গুজবের প্রতি একজন ব্যবহারকারীর অবস্থান নির্ধারণ করার জন্য, আর কাজ বি হচ্ছে গুজবের সত্যি সনাক্ত করতে: সত্য ভাষার বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর একটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে। গুজব নিশ্চিত করার জন্য আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভ ম্যাক্রো এফ১ পরিমাপ এবং RMSE মাপের মাধ্যমে গুজব পরিচালনা করা কাজের মধ্যে আমাদের সিস্টেমের প্রথম স্থানের স্থ', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el nostre sistema de SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Determinant la veritat de les rumors i el suport a les rumors (SemEval 2019 Task 7). Aquesta pista té dues tasques: La tasca A és determinar la posició d'un usuari cap a la rumor de fonts, i la tasca B és detectar la veritat de la rumor: veritat, falsa o no verificada. Per a classificar la posició, s'utilitza un model de xarxa neural amb característiques lingüístices. Per a la verificació de rumors, el nostre enfocament explota informació de diferents dimensions: contingut de rumors, credibilitat de fonts, credibilitat d'usuari, posició d'usuari, camí de propagació d'eventos, etc. Utilitzem un enfocament conjunt en ambdues tasques, que inclou models de xarxa neural i algoritmes tradicionals de classificació. El nostre sistema es classifica en primer lloc en la tasca de verificació de rumors tant per la mesura macro F1 com per la mesura RMSE.", 'et': 'Selles artiklis kirjeldatakse meie süsteemi SemEval 2019 RumorEval: kuulujutte tõesuse kindlaksmääramine ja kuulujutte toetamine (SemEval 2019 ülesanne 7). Sellel rajal on kaks ülesannet: ülesanne A on määrata kasutaja seisukoht allika kuulujutu suhtes ja ülesanne B on tuvastada kuulujutu õigsus: tõene, vale või kontrollimata. Seiaku klassifitseerimiseks kasutatakse keelefunktsioonidega neurovõrgu mudelit. Kuuljutte kontrollimiseks kasutame meie lähenemisviisi erinevatest mõõtmetest pärit informatsiooni: kuulujutusisu, allika usaldusväärsus, kasutaja usaldusväärsus, kasutaja seisukoht, sündmuste leviku tee jne. Mõlemas ülesandes kasutame ansambli lähenemisviisi, mis hõlmab nii närvivõrgu mudeleid kui ka traditsioonilisi klassifitseerimisalgoritme. Meie süsteem on kuulujutte kontrollimise ülesandes esimesel kohal nii makro F1 meetme kui RMSE meetme järgi.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš systém pro SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Stanovení pravdivosti drbů a podpory fámů (SemEval 2019 Task 7). Tato stopa má dva úkoly: Úkol A je určit postoj uživatele ke zdrojové fámě a Úkol B je zjistit pravdivost fámy: pravdivá, falešná nebo neověřená. Pro klasifikaci postojů je použit model neuronové sítě s jazykovými vlastnostmi. Pro ověřování fámů využíváme informace z různých dimenzí: obsahu fámů, důvěryhodnosti zdroje, důvěryhodnosti uživatele, postoje uživatele, cesty šíření událostí apod. V obou úkolech používáme souborový přístup, který zahrnuje modely neuronových sítí i tradiční klasifikační algoritmy. Náš systém je na prvním místě v úkolu ověřování fámů jak makro F1, tak RMSE.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan järjestelmäämme SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Määrittelemällä huhujen totuudenmukaisuutta ja tukemalla huhuja (SemEval 2019 Task 7). Tällä raidalla on kaksi tehtävää: Tehtävä A on määrittää käyttäjän kanta lähteen huhun ja tehtävä B on havaita huhun totuudenmukaisuus: tosi, väärä tai vahvistamaton. Asennon luokittelussa käytetään neuroverkkomallia kieliominaisuuksineen. Huhujen todentamiseksi lähestymistapamme hyödyntää tietoa eri ulottuvuuksista: huhusisällöstä, lähteen uskottavuudesta, käyttäjän uskottavuudesta, käyttäjän asenteesta, tapahtumien etenemispolusta jne. Käytämme molemmissa tehtävissä ensemble-lähestymistapaa, joka sisältää sekä neuroverkkomallit että perinteiset luokitusalgoritmit. Järjestelmämme on sijoittunut 1. sijalle huhujen todentamistehtävässä sekä makro F1- että RMSE-mittarilla.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na faɗaɗa tsarin na'urar SemEV 2019 Rumoreval: Ana ƙayyade gaskiyar rumor da kuma yana ƙarfafa wa rumors (SemEV 2019 Taimar 7). Wannan shirin yana da aikin biyu: Tafiyar A is to bayyana wurin mai amfani da shi zuwa rumori na source, kuma aiki B yana kasa gane gaskiyar rumor s: gaskiyar, ƙarya ko ba da gaskiyar ba. Don wa'a yi amfani da wani misali na'urar na'urar da wasu shiryoyin harshe. Ga gaskatãwa ga rumor, hanyarmu za'a zartar da maɓallin tsari daga hanyõyi daban-daban: rumor, maɓallin wuri, mai aminci, abinci na amfani da mai amfani da shi, hanci na amfani da mai amfani da shi, hanci na bayani da shirin ayuka da za'a yi amfani da su a cikin aikin duk da ke sami misãlai na jerin neural da algoritori na fassarar. Tsarinmu na ranar ta farkon wuri a cikin aikin na gaskata na macro F1 da ma'aunin RM.", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את המערכת שלנו לסמיוול 2019 שמועות: קובע את האמת של שמועות ותמיכה לשמועות (SemEval 2019 משימה 7). למסלול הזה יש שתי משימות: משימה א היא לקבוע את עמדתו של משתמש כלפי השמועה המקורית, ומשימה ב היא לגלות את האמת של השמועה: נכון, שקר או לא מאושר. בשביל מסווג עמדה, מודל רשת עצבית עם תכונות שפה משתמש. כדי לבדוק שמועות, הגישה שלנו מנצלת מידע ממימדים שונים: תוכן שמועות, אמינות מקור, אמינות משתמש, עמדת המשתמש, דרך פיתוח אירועים, וכו. המערכת שלנו מוצבת במקום הראשון במשימת האמת השמועות על ידי מדידת המקרו F1 וגם מדידת RMSE.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naš sistem za SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Določanje resničnosti govoric in podpore govoricam (SemEval 2019 Task 7). Ta skladba ima dve nalogi: naloga A je določiti uporabnikovo stališče do izvorne govorice, naloga B pa je zaznati resničnost govorice: resnično, napačno ali nepreverjeno. Za klasifikacijo položaja je uporabljen model nevronskega omrežja z jezikovnimi značilnostmi. Za preverjanje govoric naš pristop izkorišča informacije iz različnih dimenzij: vsebina govoric, verodostojnost vira, verodostojnost uporabnika, držo uporabnika, pot širjenja dogodkov itd. Pri obeh nalogah uporabljamo pristop ansambla, ki vključuje modele nevronskih omrežij in tradicionalne algoritme klasifikacije. Naš sistem je uvrščen na 1. mesto v nalogi preverjanja govoric tako po merilu makro F1 kot RMSE.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki diperawa sistem awakdhéwé kanggo seminval 2011 Coverage Sampeyan tanggal, sistem kuwi alat oleh nduwé kesalahan seneng nggambar apat. Ngawe Sistem-sistem sing ditambah basa sing sabanjuré ing pancening nggawe gerakan kanggo nambah macro F1 karo nambah tanggal RSE.', 'bo': 'This paper describes our system for SemEval 2019 RumorEval: Determining rumor veracity and support for rumors (SemEval 2019 Task 7). གླེང་མོལ་འདི་ལ་ལས་ཀ་གཉིས་ཡོད། ལས་ཀ་A་ནི་ལག་ལེན་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ཐོག དབྱིབས་བཤད་དབྱེ་རིགས་ལ་སྤྱོད་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་རེད། For rumor verification, our approach exploits information from different dimensions: rumor content, source credibility, user credibility, user stance, event propagation path, etc. We use an ensemble approach in both tasks, which includes neural network models as well as the traditional classification algorithms. ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་འདིའི་ཚད་F1་ཚད་དང་RMSE་ཚད་ལ་ཐོག་ལས་བརྟན་དཔྱད་འབད་ནིའི་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཐོག་གཟུགས་དང་བཤད་པ'}
{'en': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA at SemEval-2019 Task 8 : Application of BERT for Fact-Checking in Community Forums', 'es': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA en SemEval-2019 Tarea 8: Aplicación del BERT para la verificación de datos en los foros de la comunidad', 'pt': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 8: Aplicação do BERT para Fact-Checking em Fóruns da Comunidade', 'ar': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA في SemEval-2019 المهمة 8: تطبيق BERT لتقصي الحقائق في منتديات المجتمع', 'fr': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA à SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 8\xa0: Application du BERT pour la vérification des faits dans les forums communautaires', 'zh': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA在SemEval-2019务8:BERT于社区论坛中事实核用', 'ja': 'AUTOHOME - ORCA at SemEval -2019 Task 8: BERTのコミュニティフォーラムでのファクトチェックへの応用', 'ru': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA на SemEval-2019 Задача 8: Применение BERT для проверки фактов на форумах сообщества', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 8 पर AUTOHOME-ORCA: सामुदायिक मंचों में तथ्य-जांच के लिए BERT का आवेदन', 'ga': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 8: Feidhmiú BERT le haghaidh Seiceáil Fíricí i bhFóram Pobail', 'ka': 'AUTOHOME', 'el': 'Εργασία 8: Εφαρμογή του BERT για έλεγχο γεγονότων σε κοινοτικά φόρουμ', 'hu': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA a SemEval-2019 8. feladat: A BERT alkalmazása a közösségi fórumokon', 'it': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA a SemEval-2019 Task 8: Applicazione del BERT per il controllo dei fatti nei forum comunitari', 'lt': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA 2010 m. pusmečio vertinimo 8 užduotis: BERT taikymas faktų tikrinimui Bendrijos forumuose', 'kk': 'AUTOHOME- ORCA жарым- 2019 тапсырмасында 8. тапсырма: BERT бағдарламасы Компания форумында факт тексеру үшін', 'mk': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA на SemEval-2019 задача 8: Апликација на BERT за проверка на факти во заедничките форуми', 'ms': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA di SemEval-2019 Tugas 8: Aplikasi BERT untuk Memeriksa Fakta dalam Forum Komuniti', 'mt': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 8: Applikazzjoni tal-BERT għall-Verifika tal-Fatti f’Forums Komunitarji', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 8- ലെ AUTOHOME- ORCA: കമ്മിറ്റി ഫോറമുകളില്\u200d ഫാക്റ്റ് ചെക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ പ്രയ', 'mn': 'АТОХОМ-ОРКА-2019 ЦАБЛ 8: БЕРТ-ын Үнэндээ Шинэ Шинэ Шинэ ЦАБЛ', 'no': 'AUTOHOME- ORCA på semiEval- 2019 Oppgåve 8: Programmet av BERT for faktisksjekk i fellesskapsformer', 'pl': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 8: Zastosowanie BERT do kontroli faktów na forach społecznościowych', 'ro': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 8: Aplicarea BERT pentru verificarea faptelor în forumurile comunitare', 'sr': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA na semiEval-2019 zadatak 8: Prijava BERT za provjeru činjenica u Forumima zajednice', 'si': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA at semeval-2019 Job 8: BERT Application for Real-checking in Comunity Force', 'so': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA ee Shaqada SemEval-2019 8: Dalbashada BERT ee koontarooyinka jaamacadda', 'sv': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 8: Tillämpning av BERT för faktakontroll i gemenskapsforum', 'ta': 'செம்வால்- 2019ல் AUTOHOME- ORCA செயல் 8: சமுதாயத்தின் குறிப்புகளில் நேர்ம சரிபார்ப்பதற்கான பெர்ட் பயன்பாடு', 'ur': 'سیم Eval-2019 ٹاکس 8 میں AUTOHOME-ORCA: کمونٹی فورموں میں فکت چک کرنے کے لئے BERT کا کاروبار', 'uz': '8. Vazifani SemEval- 2019 AUTOHOME- ORCA: Community Forumlarida Fat tekshirish uchun BERT dasturi', 'vi': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA tại SemEvl-209 Task 8: Application of BERT for Fact-Checking in Community Forum', 'bg': 'Задача 8: Прилагане на БЕРТ за проверка на фактите във форумите на Общността', 'hr': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA na semiEval-2019 zadatak 8: primjena BERT za provjeru činjenica u Forumima zajednice', 'nl': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA op SemEval-2019 Taak 8: Toepassing van BERT voor fact-checking in Community Forums', 'da': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA på SemEval-2019 Opgave 8: Anvendelse af BERT til faktatkontrol i fællesskabsfora', 'de': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 8: Anwendung von BERT zur Fact-Checking in Community-Foren', 'id': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA at SemEval-2019 Task 8: Application of BERT for Fact-Checking in Community Forums', 'ko': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA가SemEval-2019퀘스트8: 커뮤니티 포럼에서 BERT를 응용하여 사실 검사', 'fa': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA در نیم Eval-2019 Task 8: Application of BERT for Fact-Checking in Community Forums', 'sw': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 8: Utumiaji wa BERT kwa ajili ya Kuchungulia Ukweli katika Jukwaa za Jamii', 'tr': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA at SemEval-2019 Task 8: Application of BERT for Fact-Checking in Community Forums', 'af': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 8: Toepassing van BERT vir Fakte-Kontrolering in Kommunikasieforme', 'sq': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA at SemEval-2019 Task 8: Application of BERT for Fact-Checking in Community Forums', 'am': 'ስራ 8: BERT Application of BERT for Fact-Check in Community Forums', 'hy': 'AutoHome-OrCA-ը 2019-ի կիսագնդի 8-րդ հանձնարարում. BERT-ի կիրառումը համայնքի ֆորմում փաստերի ստուգելու համար', 'az': "SemEval-2019 Task 8: BERT'nin Fakat Verirm톛si 칲칞칲n C톛nn톛t Forumlar캼nda", 'bn': 'সেমাইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৮: কমিউনিটি ফোরামে ফ্যাক- চেক করার জন্য বেরেট আপ্লিকেশন', 'bs': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA na semiEval-2019 zadatak 8: Prijava BERT za provjeru činjenica u Forumima zajednice', 'ca': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA a SemEval-2019 Task 8: Application of BERT for Fact-Check in Community Forums', 'cs': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA na SemEval-2019 Úkol 8: Aplikace BERT pro kontrolu faktů v komunitních fórech', 'et': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 8: BERTi rakendamine faktide kontrollimiseks ühenduse foorumitel', 'fi': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 8: BERT:n soveltaminen faktojen tarkistamiseen yhteisön foorumeilla', 'jv': 'Ngawe', 'sk': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA na SemEval-2019 naloga 8: Uporaba BERT za preverjanje dejstev v forumih Skupnosti', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'bo': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA at SemEval-2019 Task 8: Application of BERT for Fact-Checking in Community Forums', 'he': 'AUTOHOME-ORCA ב SemEval-2019 משימה 8: שימוש של BERT לבדוק עובדות בפורומים קהילתיים'}
{'en': 'Fact checking is an important task for maintaining high quality posts and improving user experience in Community Question Answering forums. Therefore, the SemEval-2019 task 8 is aimed to identify factual question (subtask A) and detect true factual information from corresponding answers (subtask B). In order to address this task, we propose a system based on the BERT model with meta information of questions. For the subtask A, the outputs of fine-tuned BERT classification model are combined with the feature of length of questions to boost the performance. For the subtask B, the predictions of several variants of BERT model encoding the meta information are combined to create an ensemble model. Our system achieved competitive results with an accuracy of 0.82 in the subtask A and 0.83 in the subtask B. The experimental results validate the effectiveness of our system.', 'ar': 'يعد التحقق من صحة المعلومات مهمة مهمة للحفاظ على منشورات عالية الجودة وتحسين تجربة المستخدم في منتديات "إجابة أسئلة المجتمع". لذلك ، تهدف مهمة SemEval-2019 8 إلى تحديد السؤال الواقعي (المهمة الفرعية أ) واكتشاف المعلومات الواقعية الحقيقية من الإجابات المقابلة (المهمة الفرعية ب). من أجل معالجة هذه المهمة ، نقترح نظامًا يعتمد على نموذج BERT مع معلومات وصفية للأسئلة. بالنسبة للمهمة الفرعية A ، يتم دمج مخرجات نموذج تصنيف BERT الدقيق مع ميزة طول الأسئلة لتعزيز الأداء. بالنسبة للمهمة الفرعية B ، يتم دمج تنبؤات العديد من المتغيرات لنموذج BERT لترميز المعلومات الوصفية لإنشاء نموذج مجموعة. حقق نظامنا نتائج تنافسية بدقة تبلغ 0.82 في المهمة الفرعية أ و 0.83 في المهمة الفرعية ب. تثبت النتائج التجريبية فعالية نظامنا.', 'es': 'La verificación de datos es una tarea importante para mantener publicaciones de alta calidad y mejorar la experiencia del usuario en los foros de respuesta a preguntas de la comunidad. Por lo tanto, la tarea 8 de SemEval-2019 tiene como objetivo identificar la pregunta fáctica (subtarea A) y detectar información fáctica verdadera a partir de las respuestas correspondientes (subtarea B). Para abordar esta tarea, proponemos un sistema basado en el modelo BERT con metainformación de preguntas. Para la subtarea A, los resultados del modelo de clasificación BERT afinado se combinan con la característica de longitud de las preguntas para mejorar el rendimiento. Para la subtarea B, las predicciones de varias variantes del modelo BERT que codifican la metainformación se combinan para crear un modelo de conjunto. Nuestro sistema logró resultados competitivos con una precisión de 0.82 en la subtarea A y 0.83 en la subtarea B. Los resultados experimentales validan la eficacia de nuestro sistema.', 'pt': 'A verificação de fatos é uma tarefa importante para manter postagens de alta qualidade e melhorar a experiência do usuário nos fóruns de respostas a perguntas da comunidade. Portanto, a tarefa 8 do SemEval-2019 tem como objetivo identificar a questão factual (subtarefa A) e detectar informações factuais verdadeiras a partir das respostas correspondentes (subtarefa B). Para dar conta dessa tarefa, propomos um sistema baseado no modelo BERT com meta-informação de perguntas. Para a subtarefa A, os resultados do modelo de classificação BERT ajustado são combinados com o recurso de duração das perguntas para aumentar o desempenho. Para a subtarefa B, as previsões de várias variantes do modelo BERT que codificam as informações meta são combinadas para criar um modelo de conjunto. Nosso sistema alcançou resultados competitivos com uma precisão de 0,82 na subtarefa A e 0,83 na subtarefa B. Os resultados experimentais validam a eficácia do nosso sistema.', 'fr': "La vérification des faits est une tâche importante pour maintenir des publications de haute qualité et améliorer l'expérience utilisateur dans les forums de réponse aux questions de la communauté. Par conséquent, la tâche 8 SemEval-2019 vise à identifier des questions factuelles (sous-tâche A) et à détecter des informations factuelles vraies à partir des réponses correspondantes (sous-tâche B). Afin de répondre à cette tâche, nous proposons un système basé sur le modèle BERT avec des méta-informations de questions. Pour la sous-tâche A, les résultats du modèle de classification BERT affiné sont combinés avec la caractéristique de longueur des questions pour améliorer les performances. Pour la sous-tâche B, les prédictions de plusieurs variantes du modèle BERT codant les méta-informations sont combinées pour créer un modèle d'ensemble. Notre système a obtenu des résultats compétitifs avec une précision de 0,82 pour la sous-tâche A et de 0,83 pour la sous-tâche B. Les résultats expérimentaux valident l'efficacité de notre système.", 'zh': '实核者,护高质量帖改善社区问论坛用户体验之要务也。 故SemEval-2019务8指知事实(子职A)以应对(子职B)中检实事。 为此一事,BERT有元信。 子职 A, BERT 分形而合长短,以崇性能。 其于子职 B,合编码元信息之 BERT 数变体之占以为之。 吾统得竞争力,子职A精为0.82,子职B精为0.83。 实验验其有效性。', 'ja': 'ファクトチェックは、コミュニティ質問回答フォーラムで高品質の投稿を維持し、ユーザーエクスペリエンスを向上させるための重要なタスクです。したがって、SemEval -2019タスク8は、事実に基づく質問（サブタスクA ）を特定し、対応する回答（サブタスクB ）から真の事実情報を検出することを目的としている。この課題に対処するために、質問のメタ情報を持つBERTモデルに基づくシステムを提案します。サブタスクAについては、微調整されたBERT分類モデルの出力と質問の長さの特徴を組み合わせてパフォーマンスを向上させます。サブタスクＢについて、メタ情報を符号化するＢＥＲＴモデルのいくつかの変形例の予測を組み合わせて、アンサンブルモデルを作成する。当社システムは、サブタスクAで0.82、サブタスクBで0.83の精度で競争力のある結果を達成しました。実験結果は、当社システムの有効性を検証しています。', 'hi': 'तथ्यों की जांच उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले पदों को बनाए रखने और सामुदायिक प्रश्न उत्तर देने वाले मंचों में उपयोगकर्ता अनुभव में सुधार करने के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण कार्य है। इसलिए, SemEval-2019 कार्य 8 का उद्देश्य तथ्यात्मक प्रश्न (subtask A) की पहचान करना और संबंधित उत्तरों (subtask B) से सही तथ्यात्मक जानकारी का पता लगाना है। इस कार्य को संबोधित करने के लिए, हम प्रश्नों की मेटा जानकारी के साथ BERT मॉडल पर आधारित एक प्रणाली का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। सबटास्क ए के लिए, ठीक-ट्यून किए गए BERT वर्गीकरण मॉडल के आउटपुट को प्रदर्शन को बढ़ावा देने के लिए प्रश्नों की लंबाई की सुविधा के साथ जोड़ा जाता है। सबटास्क बी के लिए, मेटा जानकारी को एन्कोडिंग करने वाले BERT मॉडल के कई संस्करणों की भविष्यवाणियों को एक पहनावा मॉडल बनाने के लिए संयुक्त किया जाता है। हमारे सिस्टम ने सबटास्क ए में 0.82 और सबटास्क बी में 0.83 की सटीकता के साथ प्रतिस्पर्धी परिणाम प्राप्त किए। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम हमारे सिस्टम की प्रभावशीलता को मान्य करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Проверка фактов является важной задачей для поддержания высокого качества публикаций и улучшения пользовательского опыта на форумах, отвечающих на вопросы сообщества. Таким образом, задача 8 SemEval-2019 направлена на выявление фактического вопроса (подзадача А) и выявление достоверной фактической информации из соответствующих ответов (подзадача Б). Для решения этой задачи мы предлагаем систему, основанную на модели BERT с метаинформацией вопросов. Для подзадачи А выходы доработанной модели классификации BERT объединяются с признаком длины вопросов для повышения производительности. Для подзадачи B прогнозы нескольких вариантов модели BERT, кодирующих метаинформацию, объединяются для создания ансамблевой модели. Наша система достигла конкурентных результатов с точностью 0,82 в подзадаче А и 0,83 в подзадаче Б. Экспериментальные результаты подтверждают эффективность нашей системы.', 'ga': 'Is tasc tábhachtach é seiceáil fíricí chun poist ardchaighdeáin a chothabháil agus chun taithí úsáideora ar fhóraim Freagraí Ceisteanna Pobail a fheabhsú. Mar sin, tá tasc 8 SemEval-2019 dírithe ar cheist fhíorasach (fothasc A) a shainaithint agus faisnéis fhíorasach a bhrath ó fhreagraí comhfhreagracha (fothasc B). Chun dul i ngleic leis an tasc seo, molaimid córas bunaithe ar mhúnla BERT le meitea-eolas ar cheisteanna. Maidir le fothasc A, comhcheanglaítear aschuir mhúnla aicmithe BERT mionchoigeartaithe le gné fhad na gceisteanna chun an fheidhmíocht a threisiú. Maidir le fothasc B, déantar na réamh-mheastacháin ar roinnt malairtí de shamhail BERT a ionchódaíonn an meiteaisnéis a chomhcheangal chun samhail ensemble a chruthú. Bhain ár gcóras torthaí iomaíocha amach le cruinneas 0.82 i bhfothasc A agus 0.83 i bhfothasc B. Déanann na torthaí turgnamhacha éifeachtacht ár gcóras a bhailíochtú.', 'ka': 'ფაქტის შემოწმება არის მნიშვნელოვანი საქმე, რომელიც უფრო მეტი კანგალიტიური პოსტუმების შესაძლებლობა და გამოყენებელი გამოცდილობა საზოგადოებო კითხვ ამიტომ, SemEval-2019 დავალება 8 უნდა იდენტიფიკაციური კითხვა (A subtask) და შესაბამისი რეალური ფექტური ინფორმაცია (B subtask) დაიწყება. ამ დავალების შესახებისთვის, ჩვენ შევძლებთ BERT მოდელის ბაზაზე მეტა ინფორმაციის სისტემა. A-ს სტკითხვის შესახებ, BERT კლასიფიკაციის მოდელის გამოსახულებები შეიძლება კითხვების სიგრძნობის გამოსახულება, რომ გამოსახულება იქნება. B-ის საკითხვა, BERT მოდელის რამდენიმე განრამეტრების წინასწორება, მეტა ინფორმაცია შექმნა მოდელის შექმნა. ჩვენი სისტემა შეიძლება კონპექციენტიური შედეგი 0,82 სისტემაში A და 0,83 სისტემაში. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი ჩვენი სისტემას ეფექტიურობას გავაკეთება.', 'el': 'Ο έλεγχος γεγονότων είναι ένα σημαντικό καθήκον για τη διατήρηση υψηλής ποιότητας δημοσιεύσεων και τη βελτίωση της εμπειρίας των χρηστών στα φόρουμ απαντήσεων σε κοινοτικές ερωτήσεις. Ως εκ τούτου, η εργασία 8 στοχεύει στον εντοπισμό πραγματικής ερώτησης (δευτερεύουσα ερώτηση Α) και στον εντοπισμό πραγματικών πληροφοριών από αντίστοιχες απαντήσεις (δευτερεύουσα ερώτηση Β). Προκειμένου να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το έργο, προτείνουμε ένα σύστημα βασισμένο στο μοντέλο BERT με μετα-πληροφορίες των ερωτήσεων. Για την δευτερεύουσα εργασία Α, τα αποτελέσματα του εκλεπτυσμένου μοντέλου ταξινόμησης συνδυάζονται με το χαρακτηριστικό του μήκους των ερωτήσεων για την ενίσχυση της απόδοσης. Για το δευτερεύον έργο Β, οι προβλέψεις διαφόρων παραλλαγών του μοντέλου BERT που κωδικοποιεί τις μετα-πληροφορίες συνδυάζονται για να δημιουργηθεί ένα μοντέλο συνόλου. Το σύστημά μας πέτυχε ανταγωνιστικά αποτελέσματα με ακρίβεια 0.82 στην υποταγή Α και 0.83 στην υποταγή Β. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα επικυρώνουν την αποτελεσματικότητα του συστήματός μας.', 'hu': 'A tények ellenőrzése fontos feladat a magas színvonalú bejegyzések fenntartásához és a felhasználói élmény javításához a Közösségi Kérdések Válaszolási Fórumokon. Ezért a SemEval-2019 feladat 8 célja, hogy azonosítsa a tényszerű kérdéseket (A részfeladat), és a megfelelő válaszokból valódi tényszerű információkat (B részfeladat). Ennek a feladatnak a megvalósítása érdekében egy BERT modellre épülő rendszert javasolunk, amely metainformációkat tartalmaz a kérdésekről. Az A részfeladat esetében a finomhangolt BERT osztályozási modell kimeneteit a kérdések hosszának jellemzőivel kombináljuk, hogy növeljük a teljesítményt. A B résztevékenység esetében a metainformációkat kódoló BERT modell több változatának előrejelzései kombinálódnak egy együttműködési modell létrehozásához. Rendszerünk versenyképes eredményeket ért el 0,82 pontossággal az A részfeladatban és 0,83 pontossággal a B részfeladatban. A kísérleti eredmények igazolják rendszerünk hatékonyságát.', 'it': "Il controllo dei fatti è un compito importante per mantenere i post di alta qualità e migliorare l'esperienza degli utenti nei forum di risposta alle domande della community. Pertanto, il compito 8 di SemEval-2019 è volto a identificare la domanda fattuale (sottomissione A) e rilevare informazioni fattuali reali dalle risposte corrispondenti (sottomissione B). Per affrontare questo compito, proponiamo un sistema basato sul modello BERT con metainformazioni delle domande. Per la sottomissione A, le uscite del modello di classificazione BERT perfezionato sono combinate con la caratteristica della lunghezza delle domande per aumentare le prestazioni. Per la sottomissione B, le previsioni di diverse varianti del modello BERT che codifica le metainformazioni sono combinate per creare un modello ensemble. Il nostro sistema ha ottenuto risultati competitivi con una precisione di 0,82 nella sottomissione A e 0,83 nella sottomissione B. I risultati sperimentali convalidano l'efficacia del nostro sistema.", 'kk': 'Деректерді тексеру - сапатты жоғары және Компаттық Сұрақ жауап беру форумында пайдаланушылардың тәжірибесін жақсарту үшін маңызды тапсырма. Сондықтан, SemEval-2019 8- тапсырмасы фактикалық сұрақ (A асты сұрақ) анықтауға мақсатты және сәйкес жауаптардан шын фактикалық мәліметті анықтау (B асты сұрақ) деген мақсатты Бұл тапсырманы шешу үшін біз BERT үлгісіне негізделген жүйе сұрақтардың мета мәліметі бар. A асты сұрақ үшін BERT классификациясының шығысы жұмысын көтеру үшін сұрақтардың ұзындығымен біріктіріледі. B ішкі сұрақ үшін BERT үлгі кодтамасының бірнеше параметрлерін бақылау үшін мета мәліметі белгілі үлгі құру үшін біріктіріледі. Біздің жүйеіміз бөліміздің A және 0,83 суретінде 0,82 деген дұрыстығын жеткіздік. Тәжірибелі нәтижелер жүйеміздің эффектілігін тексереді.', 'mk': 'Проверката на фактите е важна задача за одржување на високи квалитетни функции и подобрување на искуството на корисниците во форумите за одговори на прашањата на заедницата. Затоа, задачата SemEval-2019 8 има за цел идентификување на фактичното прашање (подпрашање А) и детектирање на вистински фактични информации од соодветните одговори (подпрашање Б). За да ја решиме оваа задача, предложуваме систем базиран на моделот BERT со метаинформации за прашања. За субпрашањето А, излезите на финетизираниот модел на класификација BERT се комбинирани со карактеристиката на должината на прашањата за зголемување на перформансата. За подпрашањето Б, предвидувањата на неколку варијанти на моделот BERT кодирање на метаинформациите се комбинирани за да се создаде модел на ансембл. Нашиот систем постигна конкурентни резултати со точност од 0,82 во подпрашањето А и 0,83 во подпрашањето Б. Експерименталните резултати ја потврдуваат ефикасноста на нашиот систем.', 'lt': 'Faktų patikrinimas yra svarbus uždavinys išlaikyti aukštos kokybės pareigas ir gerinti naudotojų patirtį Bendrijos atsakymų į klausimus forumuose. Therefore, the SemEval-2019 task 8 is aimed to identify factual question (subtask A) and detect true factual information from corresponding answers (subtask B).  Siekiant išspręsti šią užduotį, siūlome BERT modeliu pagrįstą sistemą su metainformacija apie klausimus. A paklausos atveju tiksliai pritaikyto BERT klasifikavimo modelio rezultatai derinami su klausimų trukmės požymiais, siekiant padidinti veiklos rezultatus. For the subtask B, the predictions of several variants of BERT model encoding the meta information are combined to create an ensemble model.  Mūsų sistema pasiekė konkurencinius rezultatus tiksliai 0,82 paklausos A ir 0,83 paklausos B. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai patvirtina mūsų sistemos veiksmingumą.', 'ms': 'Pemeriksaan fakta adalah tugas penting untuk menjaga pos kualiti tinggi dan memperbaiki pengalaman pengguna dalam forum Jawapan soalan Komuniti. Oleh itu, tugas SemEval-2019 8 bertujuan untuk mengenalpasti soalan fakta (subtask A) dan mengesan maklumat fakta sebenar dari jawapan yang sepadan (subtask B). Untuk mengatasi tugas ini, kami cadangkan sistem berdasarkan model BERT dengan maklumat meta soalan. Untuk sub-tanya A, output model klasifikasi BERT yang ditetapkan bergabung dengan ciri panjang soalan untuk meningkatkan prestasi. Untuk subtask B, ramalan beberapa varian model BERT yang mengekodkan maklumat meta digabung untuk mencipta model ensemble. Sistem kita mencapai keputusan kompetitif dengan ketepatan 0.82 dalam subtask A dan 0.83 dalam subtask B. Keputusan percubaan mengesahkan efektivitas sistem kita.', 'ml': 'സത്യം പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത് ഉയര്\u200dന്ന സ്ഥാനത്തിനുള്ള പോസ്റ്റുകള്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനും സമൂഹത്തിലെ ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം ഫോര്\u200dമുകള Therefore, the SemEval-2019 task 8 is aimed to identify factual question (subtask A) and detect true factual information from corresponding answers (subtask B).  ഈ ജോലി വിവരമറിയാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ മെറ്റാ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ബെര്\u200dട്ടി മോഡലിനെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കി ഒരു സ ബെര്\u200dട്ടി ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d മോഡലിന്റെ ഉള്\u200dപ്പുട്ടുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന് വളര്\u200dത്താനുള്ള നീളം ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ വിശേഷത്തോടൊപ് ബിബെര്\u200dട്ടി മോഡലിന്റെ പല വ്യത്യാസങ്ങളുടെയും പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d എതിര്\u200dക്കാനുള്ള ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d സുബ്ബട്ട് A-ലും 0.83-ലും വിശദീകരിച്ചു. പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്ര', 'mt': 'Il-verifika tal-fatti hija kompitu importanti għaż-żamma ta’ postijiet ta’ kwalità għolja u t-titjib tal-esperjenza tal-utent fil-fora Komunitarji għat-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet. Therefore, the SemEval-2019 task 8 is aimed to identify factual question (subtask A) and detect true factual information from corresponding answers (subtask B).  Sabiex nindirizzaw dan il-kompitu, nipproponu sistema bbażata fuq il-mudell BERT b’meta informazzjoni ta’ mistoqsijiet. Għas-sottomistoqsija A, ir-riżultati tal-mudell tal-klassifikazzjoni BERT irfinat huma kkombinati mal-karatteristika tat-tul tal-mistoqsijiet biex isaħħu l-prestazzjoni. Għas-sottomistoqsija B, il-previżjonijiet ta’ diversi varjanti tal-mudell BERT li jikkodifikaw il-metainformazzjoni huma kkombinati biex jinħoloq mudell ta’ ensemble. Is-sistema tagħna kisbet riżultati kompetittivi b’preċiżjoni ta’ 0.82 fis-sottomistoqsija A u 0.83 fis-sottomistoqsija B. Ir-riżultati sperimentali jivvalidaw l-effettività tas-sistema tagħna.', 'mn': 'Үнэндээ шалгалт нь өндөр чанартай захидал, Компанийн асуулт Хариултын форумын хэрэглэгчийн туршлагыг сайжруулах чухал ажил юм. Тиймээс SemEval-2019 ажил 8 нь үнэндээ асуулт тодорхойлж, хариултаас хариултаас үнэндээ мэдээллийг олох зорилго юм. Энэ үйл ажилд туслахын тулд бид BERT загварын үндсэн системийг суралцах мета мэдээллээр санал болгоно. A-ын доогуур асуултын тулд, BERT-ын хуваалтын загварын үр дүнг нь үйл ажиллагааг нэмэгдүүлэхийн тулд асуултын урт хувьд холбогдож байна. B-н доогуур асуултын хувьд, BERT загварын кодлогын олон төрлийн хувьд мета мэдээлэл нь загварын загвар бүтээхэд холбогдож байна. Бидний систем тэмцээний үр дүн нь 0.82 А болон 0.83 суралцах суралцах буюу B суралцах буюу B суралцах буюу 0.83 суралцах буюу бидний системийн үр дүнг баталж байна.', 'no': 'Kontrollering av faktum er ein viktig oppgåve for å vedlikehalda høg kvalitetsprogram og forbetra brukarøvinga i forume for svaring av spørsmål i fellesskapet. Det er derfor midten til å identifisera faktisk spørsmål (subtspørsmål A) og oppdaga sann faktisk informasjon frå tilsvarande svar (subtspørsmål B). For å handtera denne oppgåva, foreslår vi eit system basert på BERT-modellen med metainformasjon om spørsmål. For underspørjinga A blir utdata av fine-tuned BERT-klassifikasjonsmodulen kombinert med funksjonen på lengda av spørsmål for å auka utviklinga. For underspørjinga B, forhåndsvisingane av fleire variantar av BERT-modellekoding er metainformasjonen kombinerte for å laga eit ensemblemmodell. Sistemet vårt oppnådd konkurentære resultater med nøyaktighet 0,82 i subtspørjinga A og 0,83 i subtspørjinga B. Eksperimentale resultater validerer effektiviteten av systemet vårt.', 'pl': 'Sprawdzanie faktów jest ważnym zadaniem dla utrzymania wysokiej jakości postów i poprawy doświadczeń użytkowników na forach społecznościowych ds. odpowiedzi na pytania. Dlatego zadanie SemEval-2019 8 ma na celu zidentyfikowanie pytania faktycznego (podzadanie A) i wykrycie prawdziwych informacji faktycznych z odpowiednich odpowiedzi (podzadanie B). Aby sprostać temu zadaniu, proponujemy system oparty na modelu BERT z metainformacjami pytań. W przypadku podzadania A wyjścia dostrojonego modelu klasyfikacji BERT są połączone z funkcją długości pytań, aby zwiększyć wydajność. W przypadku podzadania B przewidywania kilku wariantów modelu BERT kodującego metainformacje są łączone w celu utworzenia modelu zespołu. Nasz system osiągnął konkurencyjne wyniki z dokładnością 0,82 w podzadaniu A i 0.83 w podzadaniu B. Wyniki eksperymentalne potwierdzają skuteczność naszego systemu.', 'ro': 'Verificarea faptelor este o sarcină importantă pentru menținerea posturilor de înaltă calitate și îmbunătățirea experienței utilizatorilor în forumurile de răspuns la întrebări comunitare. Prin urmare, sarcina SemEval-2019 8 vizează identificarea întrebării fapte (subactivitatea A) și detectarea informațiilor fapte reale din răspunsurile corespunzătoare (subactivitatea B). Pentru a aborda această sarcină, propunem un sistem bazat pe modelul BERT cu meta-informații ale întrebărilor. Pentru subactivitatea A, rezultatele modelului de clasificare BERT reglat fin sunt combinate cu caracteristica lungimii întrebărilor pentru a spori performanța. Pentru subactivitatea B, predicțiile mai multor variante ale modelului BERT care codează metainformațiile sunt combinate pentru a crea un model de ansamblu. Sistemul nostru a obținut rezultate competitive cu o precizie de 0,82 în subsarcina A și 0,83 în subsarcina B. Rezultatele experimentale validează eficiența sistemului nostru.', 'sr': 'Provjeravanje činjenica je važan zadatak za održavanje visokog kvalitetnog položaja i poboljšanje iskustva korisnika u forumu odgovora na pitanja zajednice. Stoga je zadatak 8 od semiEval-2019 cilj da identifikuje činjenično pitanje (podpitanje A) i otkrije prave činjenične informacije iz odgovarajućih odgovora (podpitanje B). Da bi se riješili ovaj zadatak, predlažemo sistem koji se temelji na modelu BERT sa metainformacijama o pitanjima. Za podpitanje A, rezultati kvalificiranog modela klasifikacije BERT povezani su sa karakteristikom dužine pitanja kako bi se povećala performanca. Za podpitanje B, predviđanja nekoliko varianta BERT modela kodiranja meta informacija se kombiniraju kako bi stvorili model ensemble. Naš sistem je ostvario konkurentne rezultate sa preciznošću od 0,82 u podpitanju A i 0,83 u podpitanju B. Eksperimentalni rezultati potvrđuju učinkovitost našeg sistema.', 'si': 'ඇත්ත පරීක්ෂණය තමයි වැදගත් වැදගත් වැඩක් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියාගන්න සහ සමාජ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200d ඉතින්, සෙම්වේල්-2019 වැඩ 8 අරමුණ විදියට ඇත්ත ප්\u200dරශ්නය (A සබ්ප්\u200dරශ්නය) පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න සහ සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නය (B සබ්ප්\u200d මේ වැඩේ විස්තර කරන්න, අපි පද්ධතියක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය ගැන මෙටා තොරතුරු සඳහා BERT මොඩල් එක අධාරණය කරනවා. A සබ්ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා, සම්ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා සම්ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා සම්ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය විශේෂණය වැඩ කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ B සබ්ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා, BERT මෝඩල් සංකේතනයේ වෙනස් වර්ගයක් ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් මෙටා තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ඇති අ අපේ පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණයක් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති', 'so': "Baaritaanka xaqnimadu waa shaqo muhiim ah oo ku haysta boostada qiimaha sare iyo horumarinta aqoonta isticmaalayaasha ee su'aalaha jawaabta bulshada. Sidaa darteed Shaqada SemEval-2019 waxaa loogu talo galay inuu aqoonsado su'aalaha runta ah (sub-task A) iyo inuu ogaado macluumaadka runta ah oo ka mid ah jawaabaha ku habboon (sub-task B). In order to address this task, we propose a system based on the BERT model with meta information of questions.  Samooyinka A waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa tusaalaha fasaxa BERT ee si fiican looga dhigo, waxayna ku leeyihiin xiriir dheer oo su'aalo ah si loo kordhiyo fasaxa. Sababta B waxaa loo soo bandhigi karaa qaabab kala duwan oo ku qoran qaababka BERT oo ku qoran macluumaadka meta si uu u abuuro model muusiko ah. nidaamkayagii wuxuu ku helay resulto khilaaf ah oo saxda 0.82 ee subxabsiga A iyo 0.83. resultiyada imtixaanka ayaa xaqiijiya shaqaalaha nidaamka.", 'sv': 'Faktakontroll är en viktig uppgift för att upprätthålla högkvalitativa inlägg och förbättra användarupplevelsen i forum för gemenskapsfrågor. Därför syftar SemEval-2019 uppgift 8 till att identifiera faktauppgifter (deluppgift A) och upptäcka faktauppgifter från motsvarande svar (deluppgift B). För att hantera denna uppgift föreslår vi ett system baserat på BERT-modellen med metainformation av frågor. För underuppgiften A kombineras resultaten från den finjusterade BERT-klassificeringsmodellen med funktionen av frågelängden för att öka prestandan. För underuppgiften B kombineras förutsägelserna av flera varianter av BERT-modellen som kodar metainformationen för att skapa en ensemblemodell. Vårt system uppnådde konkurrenskraftiga resultat med en noggrannhet på 0,82 i underuppgiften A och 0,83 i underuppgiften B. De experimentella resultaten bekräftar systemets effektivitet.', 'ta': 'கேள்வி குறிப்புகளில் பயனர் அனுபவத்தை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கான முக்கியமான செயல் எனவே, SemEval-2019 செயல் 8 உண்மையான கேள்வியை (துணை பணி A) கண்டுபிடிக்க மற்றும் பதில் இருந்து உண்மையான தகவலை கண்டுபிடிக்கவும் (துணை பணி B). இந்த பணியை முகவரிப்பதற்கு, நாம் BERT மாதிரியில் அடிப்படையில் ஒரு அமைப்பை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் கேள்விகளின் ம A துணை பணிக்கு, நன்றாக குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட BERT வகைப்பாட்டு மாதிரியின் வெளியீடுகள் செயல்பாட்டை அதிகரிக்க க கேள்விகளின் நீளம்  துணை பணி B க்கு, BERT மாதிரி மாதிரி குறியீட்டின் பல மாறிகளின் முன்னோர்வுகள் மெடா தகவல் குறியீட்டில் ஒரு ஒதுக்கும் மா A மற்றும் 0.83 துணை பணி B-ல் 0.82 துணை முடிவுகள் பெற்றது. சோதனை முடிவுகள் எங்கள் கணினியின் விளைவை சரிபார்க்கும்.', 'ur': 'حقیقت چک کرنے کا ایک اہم کام ہے کہ اچھی کیفیت پوسٹ کی حفاظت کریں اور کمونٹی سوال جواب کرنے کے فرموموں میں کارساز کا تجربہ بہتر کریں. لہٰذا، سامیوئل-2019 ٹیکس 8 کا ارادہ ہے کہ حقیقی سؤال (A) کو پہچان سکیں اور سچی حقیقی معلومات کو پوچھ سکیں (B) کے جواب سے۔ اس کام کے بارے میں ہم ایک سیستم کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں BERT موڈل پر متا معلومات کے ساتھ۔ سپٹ پرس A کے لئے، نیک تنظیم BERT کلاسپیٹ موڈل کے نتائج ان سوالوں کی طول کی ویژگی کے ساتھ ملے جاتے ہیں کہ ان کے عملکرد کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے۔ زیب پرسش کے لئے، BERT موڈل اکنوڈینگ کے چند متفاوتوں کی پیش بینی مٹا معلومات کو ایک انسبل موڈل بنانے کے لئے ترکیب کیا جاتا ہے. ہماری سیستم نے سپٹسٹم B میں 0.82 کی سپٹسٹ پوچھ اور 0.83 کی سپٹسٹ پوچھ کے مطابق پیدا کی ہے. آزمائش کا نتیجہ ہمارے سیستم کے مطابق ثابت ہوتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Шундай қилиб, SemEval-2019 вазифаси 8 ҳақиқий саволни аниқлаш ва жавоб бергувчи жавоб (subtask B) томонидан ҳақиқий маълумотни аниқлаш учун мавжуд. Bu vazifani boshqarish uchun biz savollar meta maʼlumoti bilan BERT modeli asosida tizimni talab qilamiz. Ushbu vazifa A uchun bajarilgan BERT classification modelining natijalari bajarish natijasini oshirish uchun maslahatlarning chegarasi bilan birlashtiriladi. Ushbu vazifa B uchun, meta maʼlumotini kodlash uchun bir nechta variant BERT modelining predictions to create an ensemble model. Bizning tizimimiz sub-vazifaning A va 0.83 tashkilotlarida 0.82 ta'siri natijalariga yetdi. Imtibor natijalarimizning tizimning effektini toʻgʻri beradi.", 'vi': 'Việc kiểm tra dữ liệu là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng để giữ các vị trí chất lượng cao và cải thiện kinh nghiệm người dùng trong các diễn đàn tra hỏi. Mục đích của nhiệm vụ hoàn hảo là xác định câu hỏi có thực (phụ đề A) và phát hiện thông tin thực sự từ câu trả lời tương ứng (phụ đề B). Để thực hiện nhiệm vụ này, chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống dựa trên mô hình BERT cùng với các siêu thông tin về các câu hỏi. Đối với phần A phụ đề, kết xuất của mô hình cân nhắc thiếu chuẩn được kết hợp với tính năng của độ dài các câu hỏi để tăng cường hiệu suất. Đối với phần phụ đề B, dự đoán của nhiều biến thể của mô hình BERT in mã các meta information được kết hợp lại để tạo ra một mô hình kết hợp. Hệ thống của chúng tôi đạt được kết quả cạnh tranh với độ chính xác 0.82 trong phần A và 0.3 trong phần B. Các kết quả thử nghiệm xác nhận hiệu quả của hệ thống.', 'bg': 'Проверката на фактите е важна задача за поддържане на висококачествени публикации и подобряване на потребителския опит във форумите за Отговаряне на въпроси на Общността. Затова задача 8 е насочена към идентифициране на фактически въпрос (подзадача А) и откриване на истинска фактическа информация от съответните отговори (подзадача Б). За да се справим с тази задача, предлагаме система, базирана на модела с мета информация от въпроси. За подзадача А изходите от фино настроения модел за класификация се комбинират с характеристиката на дължината на въпросите, за да се повиши производителността. За подзадачата Б се комбинират прогнозите на няколко варианта на модела, кодиращ мета информацията, за да се създаде ансамбъл модел. Системата ни постига конкурентни резултати с точност 0.82 в подзадача А и 0.83 в подзадача Б. Експерименталните резултати потвърждават ефективността на нашата система.', 'da': 'Faktakontrol er en vigtig opgave for at opretholde indlæg af høj kvalitet og forbedre brugeroplevelsen i fællesskabsspørgsmål besvarelse fora. Derfor har SemEval-2019 opgave 8 til formål at identificere faktuelle spørgsmål (underopgave A) og opdage sande faktuelle oplysninger fra tilsvarende svar (underopgave B). For at løse denne opgave foreslår vi et system baseret på BERT-modellen med metaoplysninger om spørgsmål. For underopgaven A kombineres output fra den finjusterede BERT-klassifikationsmodel med funktionen af spørgsmålenes længde for at øge ydeevnen. For underopgaven B kombineres forudsigelserne af flere varianter af BERT-modellen, der koder metaoplysningerne, for at skabe en ensemblemodel. Vores system opnåede konkurrencedygtige resultater med en nøjagtighed på 0,82 i underopgaven A og 0,83 i underopgaven B. De eksperimentelle resultater validerer effektiviteten af vores system.', 'nl': 'Factcontrole is een belangrijke taak voor het handhaven van hoge kwaliteit berichten en het verbeteren van de gebruikerservaring in Community Question Antwoorden forums. Daarom is de SemEval-2019 taak 8 gericht op het identificeren van feitelijke vraag (subtaak A) en het detecteren van echte feitelijke informatie uit overeenkomstige antwoorden (subtaak B). Om deze taak aan te pakken, stellen we een systeem voor gebaseerd op het BERT-model met metainformatie van vragen. Voor de subtaak A worden de outputs van het verfijnde BERT-classificatiemodel gecombineerd met de functie van de lengte van vragen om de prestaties te verbeteren. Voor de subtaak B worden de voorspellingen van verschillende varianten van BERT model die de meta informatie coderen gecombineerd om een ensemble model te creëren. Ons systeem behaalde concurrerende resultaten met een nauwkeurigheid van 0.82 in de subtaak A en 0.83 in de subtaak B. De experimentele resultaten valideren de effectiviteit van ons systeem.', 'hr': 'Provjera činjenica je važan zadatak za održavanje visokog kvalitetnog mjesta i poboljšanje iskustva korisnika u foruma odgovora na pitanja zajednice. Stoga je zadatak SemEval-2019 usmjeren na identifikaciju činjeničnog pitanja (podpitanje A) i otkrivanje prave činjenične informacije iz odgovarajućih odgovora (podpitanje B). Da bi se riješili ovaj zadatak, predlažemo sistem baziran na model BERT sa metainformacijama o pitanjima. Za podpitanje A, rezultati kvalificiranog modela klasifikacije BERT kombinirani su s karakteristikom dužine pitanja kako bi se povećala učinkovitost. Za podpitanje B, predviđanja nekoliko varianta BERT modela kodiranja meta informacija se kombiniraju kako bi stvorili model ensemble. Naš sustav je postigao konkurentne rezultate sa preciznošću od 0,82 u podpitanju A i 0,83 u podpitanju B. Eksperimentalni rezultati potvrđuju učinkovitost našeg sustava.', 'de': 'Faktenüberprüfung ist eine wichtige Aufgabe, um qualitativ hochwertige Beiträge zu erhalten und die Benutzererfahrung in Community Question Answering Foren zu verbessern. Daher zielt die SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 8 darauf ab, faktische Fragen (Teilaufgabe A) zu identifizieren und wahre faktische Informationen aus entsprechenden Antworten (Teilaufgabe B) zu erkennen. Um dieser Aufgabe gerecht zu werden, schlagen wir ein auf dem BERT-Modell basierendes System mit Metainformationen von Fragen vor. Bei der Teilaufgabe A werden die Ergebnisse eines fein abgestimmten BERT-Klassifikationsmodells mit der Funktion der Fragenlänge kombiniert, um die Leistung zu steigern. Für den Teilauftrag B werden die Vorhersagen mehrerer Varianten des BERT-Modells, das die Metainformationen kodiert, zu einem Ensemblemodell kombiniert. Unser System erzielte wettbewerbsfähige Ergebnisse mit einer Genauigkeit von 0,82 in der Teilaufgabe A und 0,83 in der Teilaufgabe B. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse bestätigen die Wirksamkeit unseres Systems.', 'id': 'Pemeriksaan fakta adalah tugas penting untuk menjaga pos kualitas tinggi dan meningkatkan pengalaman pengguna di forum jawaban pertanyaan komunitas. Oleh karena itu, tugas SemEval-2019 8 bertujuan untuk mengidentifikasi pertanyaan faktual (subtask A) dan mendeteksi informasi faktual sejati dari jawaban yang sesuai (subtask B). Untuk mengatasi tugas ini, kami mengusulkan sistem berdasarkan model BERT dengan metainformasi pertanyaan. Untuk subtask A, hasil dari model klasifikasi BERT yang ditetapkan dikombinasikan dengan fitur panjang pertanyaan untuk meningkatkan prestasi. Untuk subtask B, prediksi beberapa varian dari model BERT yang mengekodikan metainformasi dikombinasikan untuk menciptakan model ensemble. Sistem kita mencapai hasil kompetitif dengan akurasi 0,82 dalam subtask A dan 0,83 dalam subtask B. hasil percobaan mengkvalifikasi efektif sistem kita.', 'ko': '커뮤니티 퀴즈 포럼에서 사실 검사는 고품질의 게시물을 유지하고 사용자 체험을 개선하는 데 중요한 임무이다.따라서 SemEval-2019 퀘스트 8은 사실 문제(하위 퀘스트 A)를 식별하고 해당하는 답안(하위 퀘스트 B)에서 진실한 사실 정보를 검출하는 데 목적을 둔다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해서, 우리는 문제원 정보를 바탕으로 하는 버트 모델의 시스템을 제시했다.서브퀘스트 A의 경우 미세한 버트 분류 모델의 출력을 문제의 길이 특징과 결합시켜 성능을 향상시킨다.하위 작업 B에 대해 인코딩 메타데이터의 몇 가지 버트 모델 변형에 대한 예측을 조합하여 하나의 집합 모델을 만든다.우리의 시스템은 하위 임무 A와 하위 임무 B의 정밀도는 각각 0.82와 0.83으로 경쟁력 있는 결과를 얻었다. 실험 결과는 우리 시스템의 유효성을 검증했다.', 'fa': 'بررسی حقیقت یک وظیفه مهم برای حفظ پوست\u200cهای کیفیت بالا و بهتر تجربه\u200cهای کاربر در فرموم جواب سوال اجتماعی است. بنابراین، وظیفه\u200cی semiEval-2019 ۸ هدف گرفته است که سوال حقیقی را شناسایی کند (زیر سوال A) و اطلاعات حقیقی را از جواب\u200cهای مناسب شناسایی کند (زیر سوال B). برای حل این کار، یک سیستم بر اساس مدل BERT با اطلاعات متا از سوالات پیشنهاد می کنیم. برای زیر سوال A، نتیجه\u200cهای مدل classification BERT با ویژگی طول سوال برای افزایش عملکرد ترکیب می\u200cشوند. برای زیر سوال B، پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای چندین متفاوت از رمزبندی مدل BERT اطلاعات متا برای ایجاد یک مدل انجمن ترکیب می\u200cشوند. سیستم ما نتیجه رقابت با دقیق 0.82 در زیر سوال A و 0.83 در زیر سوال B رسید. نتیجه آزمایش موثیت سیستم ما را تأثیر می دهد.', 'sw': 'Uchunguzi wa ukweli ni jukumu muhimu la kuendeleza makala za ubora na kuboresha uzoefu wa watumiaji katika Jukwaa la Swali la Jamii. Kwa hiyo, kazi ya SemEval-2019 inalenga kutambua swali la ukweli (kazi A) na kutambua taarifa halisi kutoka majibu yanayojibu (kazi ya subira B). Ili kuzungumzia kazi hii, tunapendekeza mfumo unaotengenezwa na mtindo wa BERT wenye taarifa za meta za maswali. Kwa jukumu la A, matokeo ya modeli ya usambazaji mzuri wa BERT yanaunganishwa na utaratibu wa mrefu wa maswali ili kukuza utendaji huo. Kwa jukumu la subira B, utabiri wa mabadiliko kadhaa ya mifano ya BERT inayojumuisha taarifa za meta wanaunganishwa na kutengeneza muundo wa mpira. Mfumo wetu ulipata matokeo ya mashindano yenye uhakika wa 0.82 katika juhudi la A na 0.83 katika jukumu la subira B. Matokeo ya majaribio yanathibitisha ufanisi wa mfumo wetu.', 'tr': 'Fact barlamak ýokary kalitesi meýdançalary goramak we jemgyýet soragy jogaplama forumlarynda qullanıcılaryň tecrübesini geliştirmek üçin wajyp zadyr. Şol sebäpli, SemEval-2019 zady 8-nji sany faktal soragy (subtask A) tanamak we dogry faktal maglumaty (subtask B) üstünden tanamak amaçly. Bu zady çözmek üçin, BERT nusgasyna meta maglumaty bilen daýanýan sistemi teklip etmek üçin. A alt soragy üçin, BERT klasifikasyon nusgasynyň netijesi başarmak üçin soraglaryň uzlukynyň özellikleri bilen birleştirilýär. B alt soragy üçin BERT modeliniň birnäçe wariantçylyk ködleme üçin meta maglumaty ködlemek üçin birleştirilip biler. Biziň sistemamyz 0,82 we 0,83 subtask sistemasynda ýaryşylyk netijesi bar.Synaglaşdyrylyşyň netijesi biziň sistemamyzyň etkinlik barlygyny barlaýar.', 'af': "Faktiese kontrole is 'n belangrike taak vir die onderhou van hoë kwaliteit-pos en verbetering van gebruiker-erfaring in gemeenskapsvraag-antwoord-forums. Daarom, die SemEval-2019 taak 8 is doel om faktuurlike vraag te identifiseer (subtask A) en waar faktuurlike inligting te vind van ooreenstemmende antwoorde (subtask B). In order to address this task, we propose a system based on the BERT model with meta information of questions. Vir die subtvraag A, word die uitvoerdes van fyn- tuned BERT klassifikasie model gekombineer met die funksie van die lengte van vrae om die prestasie te vergroot. Vir die subtvraag B, die voorskoude van verskeie variante van BERT model enkodering die meta inligting word gekombineer om 'n ensembleem model te skep. Ons stelsel het mededingsresultate bereik met 'n presies van 0,82 in die subtfraag A en 0,83 in die subtfraag B. Die eksperimentale resultate het die effektiviteit van ons stelsel gelyk.", 'sq': 'Kontrollimi i fakteve është një detyrë e rëndësishme për mbajtjen e postimeve të cilësisë së lartë dhe përmirësimin e përvojës së përdoruesve në forumet e përgjigjeve të pyetjeve të komunitetit. Therefore, the SemEval-2019 task 8 is aimed to identify factual question (subtask A) and detect true factual information from corresponding answers (subtask B).  Për të trajtuar këtë detyrë, ne propozojmë një sistem bazuar në modelin BERT me meta informacion të pyetjeve. Për nënpyetjen A, rezultatet e modelit të rregulluar të klasifikimit BERT kombinohen me karakteristikën e gjatësisë së pyetjeve për të rritur performancën. Për nënpyetjen B, parashikimet e disa varianteve të modelit BERT që kodojnë metainformacionin kombinohen për të krijuar një model ensemble. Sistemi ynë arriti rezultate konkurruese me një saktësi 0.82 në nënpyetjen A dhe 0.83 në nënpyetjen B. Rezultatet eksperimentale vlerësojnë efektshmërinë e sistemit tonë.', 'am': 'የእውነት ማረጋገጫ ከፍተኛ ጥያቄ ጽሑፎችን ለመጠበቅ እና የጦማሪያን ፈቃድ በመጠየቅ ውይይት በመቀበል ፎርማቶች ውስጥ ለመጠቀም የሚያስፈልግ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ ስለዚህም የSemEval-2019 ስራ 8 እውነተኛውን ጥያቄ (አዲስ ስራ A) ለማግኘት እና የመስጠት እውነተኛውን መረጃ ከመስጠት ማግኘት ነው፡፡ ይህንን ስራ ለመቀበል፣ የBERT ሞዴል በመሠረት ላይ የተመሳሳይ የጥያቄዎችን የመረጃ መረጃ እናስገልጻለን፡፡ ለመስኮቱ አ፣ የBERT መክፈቻ ሞዴል ውጤቶች የጥያቄውን ለማበዛት የረዘመ ጥያቄ ጥያቄ ጋር ተጋርሟል፡፡ ለመስኮቱ B፣ የብERT ሞዴል የሚካሄደውን የmeta መረጃዎች የሚቆሙትን የፊደል ሞዴል ለመፍጠር የሚጠቅሙት ትንቢት ነው፡፡ የስርዓታችን ውጤቶች አ እና አ.83 በትክክል ስራ B ውስጥ የተጠቃሚ ፍሬዎችን አግኝቷል። ፈተናው ፍሬው የስርዓታችንን ውጤት ያረጋግጣል።', 'hy': 'Փաստացի ստուգելը կարևոր խնդիր է բարձր որակային աշխատանքների պահպանելու և օգտագործողների փորձի բարելավման համար համայնքային հարցերի պատասխանատվությունների ֆորմում: Այդ պատճառով, 2019 թվականի 8 մասը նպատակն է հայտնաբերել փաստացի հարցը (A ենթահարց) և հայտնաբերել իրական փաստացի տեղեկատվությունը համապատասխանատու պատասխաններից (B ենթահարց): Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք BER մոդելի հիմնված համակարգ, որն ունի հարցերի մետատեղեկատվություն: Ա-ի ենթահարցի համար բարձրացված BER դասակարգման մոդելի արդյունքները համադրվում են հարցերի երկարության առանձնահատկության հետ, որպեսզի բարձրացվի արդյունքը: Բ ենթահարցի համար մետատեղեկատվությունը կոդավորող BER մոդելի բազմաթիվ տարբերակների կանխատեսումները համադրվում են էնսեմբլի մոդելի ստեղծելու համար: Մեր համակարգը ստացավ մրցակցության արդյունքներ, որոնց ճշգրիտությունը 0.82 է A-ի ենթահարցում և 0.82 է B-ի ենթահարցում: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ստուգեցին մեր համակարգի արդյունավետությունը:', 'az': 'Fakat sınaması yüksək kaliteli məlumatları qorumaq və Cənnətlə sual cavab verən forumların istifadəçilərin təcrübəsini daha yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün vacib bir işdir. Buna görə də, SemEval-2019 işi 8-ci əsas sual (A subtask) təsdiqləmək və müəyyən cavablardan doğru əsas bilgiləri təsdiqləmək məqsədilədir. Bu işi çəkmək üçün BERT modeli ilə meta məlumatları ilə sistemi təklif edirik. A subtask üçün, BERT klasifikasyonu modelinin çıxışları, performansını artırmaq üçün sualların uzunluğunun özellikləri ilə birləşdirilmişdir. B subtask üçün BERT modeli kodlamasının çoxlu variablarının tədbirləri meta məlumatlarını ensemble modeli yaratmaq üçün birləşdirildir. Sistemimiz B subtask içində A və 0,83 subtask içində 0,82 ilə müəllif sonuçlarını başa düşdü. Müşriklərin sonuçları sistemimizin etkinliğini təsdiqləyir.', 'bn': 'সমাজের প্রশ্নের উত্তর ফোরামে ব্যবহারকারীদের অভিজ্ঞতা উন্নত করার জন্য মানুষের মান পোস্ট রাখার জন্য ব্যাক্তিগত পরীক্ষা একটি গ তাই সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৮টির উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে আসল প্রশ্ন (সাবকাজ A) চিহ্নিত করা এবং সংশ্লিষ্ট উত্তর (সাব কাজ বি) থেকে সত্যিকার তথ্য এই কাজের কথা বলার জন্য আমরা প্রস্তাব করি বিআরটি মডেলের উপর ভিত্তিক একটি সিস্টেম, যা প্রশ্নের মেটা তথ্য দিয়ে। সাবকাজ A এর জন্য ভালো ভালোভাবে বেরেটি ক্লাসাফিকেশন মডেলের আউটপুটগুলো প্রশ্নের দীর্ঘ বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাথে একত্রিত হয়েছে য বি সাবকাজের জন্য, বিআরটি মডেলের বেশ কয়েকটি ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন আমাদের সিস্টেমের প্রতিযোগিতার ফলাফল অর্জন করেছে সাবটাবাজ বি এবং ০. ৮৩ সাম্প্রতিক পরীক্ষার ফলাফল বৈধ করেছে।', 'ca': "La verificació de fets és una tasca important per mantenir posts d'alta qualitat i millorar l'experiència dels usuaris en fòrums comunitaris de resposta a preguntes. Per tant, la tasca 8 de SemEval-2019 està destinada a identificar la pregunta factual (subterrània A) i detectar la veritable informació factual a partir de les respostes correspondents (subterrània B). Per abordar aquesta tasca, proposem un sistema basat en el model BERT amb metainformació de preguntes. Per a la subterrània A, els resultats del model de classificació BERT ajustad s'combinan amb la característica de la llargada de preguntes per augmentar el rendiment. Per a la subterrània B, les prediccions de diverses variants del model BERT codificant la meta informació es combinan per crear un model d'ensemble. El nostre sistema va aconseguir resultats competitius amb una precisió de 0,82 en la subtanya A i 0,83 en la subtanya B. Els resultats experimentals validen l'eficacia del nostre sistema.", 'bs': 'Provjera činjenica je važan zadatak za održavanje visokog kvalitetnog položaja i poboljšanje iskustva korisnika u forumima odgovora na pitanja zajednice. Stoga je zadatak SemEval-2019 cilj identificiranja činjeničnog pitanja (podpitanje A) i otkrivanja prave činjenične informacije iz odgovarajućih odgovora (podpitanje B). Da bi se riješili ovaj zadatak, predlažemo sistem baziran na model BERT sa metainformacijama o pitanjima. Za podpitanje A, rezultati kvalificiranog modela klasifikacije BERT povezani su sa karakteristikom dužine pitanja kako bi se povećala performanca. Za podpitanje B, predviđanja nekoliko varianta BERT modela kodiranja meta informacija se kombiniraju kako bi stvorili model ensemble. Naš sistem je postigao konkurentne rezultate sa preciznošću od 0,82 u podpitanju A i 0,83 u podpitanju B. Eksperimentalni rezultati potvrđuju učinkovitost našeg sistema.', 'cs': 'Kontrola faktů je důležitým úkolem pro udržování vysoce kvalitních příspěvků a zlepšování uživatelské zkušenosti ve fórech pro odpovědi na otázky komunity. Proto je úkol SemEval-2019 8 zaměřen na identifikaci faktické otázky (podúkol A) a odhalení skutečných faktických informací z odpovídajících odpovědí (podúkol B). Pro řešení tohoto úkolu navrhujeme systém založený na BERT modelu s metainformacemi dotazů. U podúkolu A jsou výstupy vyladěného klasifikačního modelu BERT kombinovány s funkcí délky otázek pro zvýšení výkonu. Pro podúkol B jsou predikce několika variant BERT modelu kódujícího metainformace kombinovány k vytvoření souborového modelu. Náš systém dosáhl konkurenčních výsledků s přesností 0,82 v podúkolu A a 0,83 v podúkolu B. Experimentální výsledky potvrzují efektivitu našeho systému.', 'et': 'Faktide kontrollimine on oluline ülesanne kvaliteetsete postituste säilitamiseks ja kasutajakogemuse parandamiseks kogukonna küsimustele vastamise foorumites. Seetõttu on SemEval-2019 ülesande nr 8 eesmärk tuvastada faktiline küsimus (alaülesanne A) ja tuvastada vastavate vastuste põhjal tõelist faktilist teavet (alaülesanne B). Selle ülesande täitmiseks pakume välja BERT mudelil põhineva süsteemi, mis sisaldab metainformatsiooni küsimustest. Alaülesande A puhul kombineeritakse täpselt häälestatud BERT klassifikatsioonimudeli väljundid küsimuste pikkusega, et suurendada jõudlust. Alaülesande B puhul kombineeritakse mitme metainformatsiooni kodeeriva BERT mudeli variandi prognoosid ansamblimudeli loomiseks. Meie süsteem saavutas konkurentsivõimelised tulemused täpsusega 0,82 alaülesandes A ja 0,83 alaülesandes B. Katsetulemused kinnitavad meie süsteemi efektiivsust.', 'fi': 'Faktojen tarkistaminen on tärkeä tehtävä laadukkaiden viestien ylläpitämiseksi ja käyttäjäkokemuksen parantamiseksi yhteisön kyselyvastausfoorumeilla. Siksi SemEval-2019-tehtävän 8 tavoitteena on tunnistaa faktakysymys (alatehtävä A) ja tunnistaa oikeat faktatiedot vastaavista vastauksista (alatehtävä B). Tämän tehtävän hoitamiseksi ehdotamme BERT-malliin perustuvaa järjestelmää, jossa on metatietoa kysymyksistä. Alatehtävässä A hienoviritetyn BERT-luokitusmallin tuotokset yhdistetään kysymysten pituuden ominaisuuteen suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi. Alatehtävään B yhdistetään useiden metatietoja koodaavan BERT-mallin varianttien ennusteet ensemblemallin luomiseksi. Järjestelmämme saavutti kilpailukykyiset tulokset tarkkuudella 0,82 alatehtävässä A ja 0,83 alatehtävässä B. Kokeelliset tulokset validoivat järjestelmämme tehokkuuden.', 'jv': 'checkbox Yukono, Samebal-2011 saiki 8 nggawe kanggo ngilangno Perintah Panjenengan (basa A) lan kang disinteksi informasi sing katos barang seneng pisan (basa B). Ngawe ngerti nggawe task iki, kita supoyo sistem sing bisa saben ning model BERT karo meta informasi ing panggunaké. Genjer-genjer A, dibutuhke sistem sing dibutuhke BERT tau ngomong karo perusahaan langgar lengrung lan ujian sing bisa nggawe gerampen Attribute B" Sistem awak dhéwé iso nglanggar barang sampeyan nganggo 0.', 'sk': 'Preverjanje dejstev je pomembna naloga za ohranjanje visokokakovostnih objav in izboljšanje uporabniške izkušnje v forumih za odgovarjanje na vprašanja skupnosti. Zato je naloga SemEval-2019 8 namenjena identificiranju dejanskega vprašanja (podnaloga A) in odkrivanju resničnih dejanskih informacij iz ustreznih odgovorov (podnaloga B). Za reševanje te naloge predlagamo sistem, ki temelji na BERT modelu z metainformacijami vprašanj. Za podnalogo A so rezultati natančno nastavljenega modela klasifikacije BERT kombinirani z značilnostjo dolžine vprašanj za povečanje zmogljivosti. Za podopravilo B so napovedi več različic BERT modela, ki kodira meta informacije, združene, da se ustvari model ansambla. Naš sistem je dosegel konkurenčne rezultate z natančnostjo 0,82 v podnalogi A in 0,83 v podnalogi B. Eksperimentalni rezultati potrjujejo učinkovitost našega sistema.', 'he': 'בדיקת העובדות היא משימה חשובה לשמור על משימות איכות גבוהה ולהשפר את חווית המשתמשים בפורומים של תשובות לשאלות הקהילתיים. לכן, המשימה 8 של SemEval-2019 מתכוונת לזהות שאלה עובדת (subtask A) ולגלות מידע עובד אמיתי מהתשובות מתאימות (subtask B). כדי להתמודד עם המשימה הזאת, אנו מציעים מערכת מבוססת על מודל BERT עם מיטה מידע של שאלות. עבור התת-שאלה A, התוצאות של מודל מסווג BERT מעוצבן משולב עם תכונת אורך השאלות כדי להעלות את ההופעה. עבור התת-שאלה ב, התחזויות של מספר שונות של דוגמא BERT שמקודדים את המטה מידע משולבים כדי ליצור דוגמא אנסמבל. המערכת שלנו השיגה תוצאות תחרותיות עם מדויקה של 0.82 בתחתית השאלה A ו-0.83 בתחתית השאלה B. התוצאות הניסוייות מאשרות את היעילות של המערכת שלנו.', 'ha': "@ info: status Therefore, the SemEval-2019 task 8 is aimed to identify factual question (subtask A) and detect true factual information from corresponding answers (subtask B).  Dõmin in yi tambaya ga wannan aikin, sai mu buɗa wata na'ura, a kan misalin BERT da zane-zane na zane-zane masu tambayar. Ga sub-aikin A, ana haɗa OutOutputs of Model mai Shirin BERT mai kyau-tun, kuma an haɗa wasu na'urar durowa wa tambayar su dõmin ya ƙara fassaran. @ action: button Ga jarrabai ta sami matsalar da tsari na 0.82 a cikin aikin A da 0.83 a subaikin B. Matarin jarrabai sun gaskata aikin na'ananmu.", 'bo': 'Fact checking is an important task for maintaining high quality posts and improving user experience in Community Question Answering forums. དེར་བརྟེན། SemEval བྱ་འགུལ་འདི་ལ་བསྡུར་ན་ལྟར་བྱས་ན། ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་ཅིག་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་རྒྱུ་མཚན་གྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་མཉམ་ For the subtask A, the outputs of fine-tuned BERT classification model are combined with the feature of length of questions to boost the performance. subtask B དང་ལྟ་བུའི་སྔོན་ལྟར་BERT མ་དབྱིབས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་བཟོ་རྣམ་ཤས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུས་ཡོད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་རྒྱབ'}
{'en': 'AiFu at SemEval-2019 Task 10 : A Symbolic and Sub-symbolic Integrated System for SAT Math Question Answering', 'ar': 'AiFu في SemEval-2019 Task 10: نظام متكامل رمزي وشبه رمزي للإجابة على أسئلة الرياضيات SAT', 'fr': 'AiFu à SemEval-2019 Tâche 10\xa0: Un système intégré symbolique et sous-symbolique pour répondre aux questions mathématiques SAT', 'es': 'AiFU en SemEval-2019 Tarea 10: Un sistema integrado simbólico y subsimbólico para responder a preguntas matemáticas del SAT', 'pt': 'AiFu no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 10: Um Sistema Integrado Simbólico e Subsimbólico para Resposta a Perguntas de Matemática do SAT', 'ja': 'AiFu at SemEval -2019 Task 10: A Symbolic and Sub - symbololic Integrated System for SAT Math Question Answering', 'zh': 'AiFu at SemEval-2019 事10:以SAT数学问答之符与亚符集成系统', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 टास्क 10 पर AiFu: SAT गणित प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए एक प्रतीकात्मक और उप-प्रतीकात्मक एकीकृत प्रणाली', 'ru': 'AiFu на SemEval-2019 Задача 10: Символическая и субсимволическая интегрированная система для ответов на математические вопросы SAT', 'ga': 'AiFu ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 10: Córas Comhtháite Siombalach agus Fo-shiombalach le haghaidh Freagairt ar Cheisteanna SAT Math', 'hu': 'AiFu a SemEval-2019 10. feladat: Szimbolikus és szubszimbolikus integrált rendszer SAT matematikai kérdések megválaszolásához', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εργασία 10: Ένα συμβολικό και υποσυμβολικό ολοκληρωμένο σύστημα απάντησης μαθηματικών', 'it': 'AiFu al SemEval-2019 Task 10: Un sistema integrato simbolico e sub-simbolico per la risposta alle domande di matematica SAT', 'kk': 'AiFu жарым-Eval-2019 тапсырма 10: SAT математикалық сұрақ жауап беру үшін символдық және субсимволдық комплексті жүйе', 'ms': 'AiFu at SemEval-2019 Task 10: A Symbolic and Sub-symbolic Integrated System for SAT Math Question Answering', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 10: SAT ഗണിത ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു ചിഹ്നങ്ങളും സബ് ചിഹ്നത്തിലുമുള്ള സിസ്റ്റമില്\u200d', 'lt': 'AiFu 2010 m. pusmečio vertinimo 10 užduotis: simbolinė ir subsimbolinė integruota sistema, skirta atsakymui į SAT matematikos klausimus', 'mk': 'AiFu на SemEval-2019 задача 10: Симболички и субсимболички интегриран систем за одговори на математички прашања на SAT', 'mt': 'AiFu f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 10: Sistema Integrata Simbolika u Subsimbolika għat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet matematiċi tas-SAT', 'pl': 'AiFu w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 10: Symboliczny i subsymboliczny zintegrowany system do odpowiedzi na pytania matematyczne SAT', 'no': 'AiFu på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 10: Eit symbolsk og subsymbolsk integrert system for SAT matematiske svar', 'mn': 'AiFu at SemEval-2019 Task 10: A Symbolic and Sub-symbolic Integrated System for SAT Math Question Response', 'sr': 'AiFu na semiEval-2019 Task 10: Simbolni i podsimbolički integrirani sistem za odgovor na matematičko pitanje SAT-a', 'ro': 'AiFu la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 10: Un sistem integrat simbolic și sub-simbolic pentru răspunsul la întrebările matematice SAT', 'si': 'AiFu at HalfEvel-2019 Job 10: A Simolic and Sub-Simolic Integrated System for SAT Calc Query Answer', 'so': 'AiFu at SemEval-2019 Task 10: A Symbolic and Sub-symbolic Integrated System for SAT Math Questions', 'ur': 'آئفو سیم اول-2019 ٹاکس ۱۰: SAT ریاضی سوال جواب کے لئے ایک سیم مولیک اور سو-سیم مولیک متحد سیسٹم', 'sv': 'AiFu på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 10: Ett symboliskt och subsymboliskt integrerat system för SAT Math-svar', 'ta': 'Я«џЯ»єЯ««Я»ЇEval- 2019 Я«фЯ«БЯ«┐', 'vi': 'AiFu at SemEvl-2009 Task 10: A Symbolic và Sub-tượng trưng cho giải đáp câu hỏi SAT.', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifani 10: SAT Math soʻrovi uchun Symbolic and Sub- symbolic Integrated System', 'hr': 'AiFu na semiEval-2019 zadatku 10: simbolički i podsimbolički integrirani sustav za odgovor na SAT matematičko pitanje', 'bg': 'Задача 10: Символична и субсимволична интегрирана система за отговори на въпроси по математика по САТ', 'da': 'AiFu på SemEval-2019 Opgave 10: Et symbolsk og subsymbolsk integreret system til SAT matematik spørgsmål besvarelse', 'nl': 'AiFu bij SemEval-2019 Taak 10: Een symbolisch en subsymbolisch geïntegreerd systeem voor SAT Math Question Beantworting', 'ko': 'AiFu가SemEval-2019의 임무 10:SAT 수학 문답의 기호와 아기호 통합 시스템', 'sw': 'AiFu katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 10: Mfumo wa Kiunganishwa na Kiungo kwa ajili ya Swali la Matihatibu ya SAT', 'de': 'AiFu at SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 10: Ein symbolisches und subsymbolisches integriertes System zur Beantwortung mathematischer Fragen', 'af': "AiFu by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 10: ' n simboliese en subsimboliese integreerde stelsel vir SAT wiskundige vraag antwoord", 'tr': 'AiFu at SemEval-2019 Task 10: A Symbolic and Sub-symbolic Integrated System for SAT Math Question Answering', 'am': 'ስራ 10: A Symbolic and Sub-symbolic Integrated System for SAT Math Question answers', 'id': 'AiFu di SemEval-2019 Tugas 10: Sistem Integrat Simbolik dan Subsimbolik untuk Jawaban Pertanyaan Matematik SAT', 'fa': 'AiFu در پاسخ سؤال ریاضی SAT', 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৯ কাজের আইফু: SAT Math প্রশ্নের উত্তর', 'sq': 'AiFu at SemEval-2019 Task 10: A Symbolic and Sub-symbolic Integrated System for SAT Math Question Answering', 'hy': 'AiFu at SemEval-2019 Task 10: A Symbolic and Sub-symbolic Integrated System for SAT Math Question Answering', 'az': 'AiFu at SemEval-2019 Task 10: A Symbolic and Sub-symbolic Integrated System for SAT Math Question Answer', 'bs': 'AiFu na semiEval-2019 Task 10: Simbolski i podsimbolički integrirani sistem za odgovor na matematičko pitanje SAT-a', 'ca': 'AiFu a SemEval-2019 tasca 10: Un sistema integrat simbòlic i subsimbòlic per respondre a preguntes matemàtiques SAT', 'cs': 'AiFu na SemEval-2019 Úkol 10: Symbolický a subsymbolický integrovaný systém pro SAT matematické odpovědi na otázky', 'et': 'AiFu SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 10: Sümboolne ja alamsümboolne integreeritud süsteem SAT matemaatika küsimustele vastamiseks', 'fi': 'AiFu SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 10: Symbolinen ja sub-symbolinen integroitu järjestelmä SAT Math Question Answering', 'ha': 'AiFu at SemEal-2019 Tafiyar 10: A Symbolic and Sub-symbolic Intructed system for SAT Math Result', 'sk': 'AiFu na SemEval-2019 Naloga 10: Simbolični in podsimbolni integrirani sistem za odgovarjanje na matematična vprašanja SAT', 'he': 'AiFu ב-SemEval-2019 משימה 10: מערכת משותפת סימפולית ו-sub-סימפולית לענות על שאלות מתמטיות SAT', 'jv': 'AIFU at semiinval-2011 task 10: A symbol and Sub-symbol embedted System for SaT Met question Replwering', 'bo': 'AiFu at SemEval-2019 Task 10: A Symbolic and Sub-symbolic Integrated System for SAT Math Question Answering'}
{'en': 'AiFu has won the first place in the SemEval-2019 Task 10-Math Question Answeringcompetition. This paper is to describe how it works technically and to report and analyze some essential experimental results', 'ar': 'فازت AiFu بالمركز الأول في مسابقة SemEval-2019 Task 10 - "Math Question Answer". تهدف هذه الورقة إلى وصف كيفية عملها تقنيًا ولتقديم تقرير عن بعض النتائج التجريبية الأساسية وتحليلها', 'es': 'AiFu ha ganado el primer lugar en la competencia Tarea 10 de SemeVal-2019: «Respuesta a preguntas matemáticas». Este artículo es para describir cómo funciona técnicamente y para informar y analizar algunos resultados experimentales esenciales', 'fr': "AiFu a remporté la première place du concours SemEval-2019 Task 10 - «\xa0Math Question Answering\xa0». Cet article a pour but de décrire son fonctionnement technique et de rapporter et d'analyser certains résultats expérimentaux essentiels", 'pt': 'A AiFu conquistou o primeiro lugar na competição SemEval-2019 Task 10 - ”Math Question Answering”. Este artigo descreve como funciona tecnicamente e relata e analisa alguns resultados experimentais essenciais', 'ja': 'AiFuは、SemEval -2019 Task 10 -「数学の質問に答える」コンテストで1位を獲得しました。この論文は、技術的にどのように機能するかを説明し、いくつかの本質的な実験結果を報告し、分析するためのものである。', 'zh': 'AiFu于SemEval-2019 Task 10 - "Math Question Answering"第一。 旨在述其术理,而告析其实验。', 'ru': 'AiFu занял первое место в конкурсе SemEval-2019 Task 10 - “Math Question Answering”. Этот документ должен описать, как он работает технически, а также сообщить и проанализировать некоторые существенные экспериментальные результаты', 'hi': 'AiFu ने SemEval-2019 टास्क 10 - "गणित प्रश्न उत्तर" प्रतियोगिता में पहला स्थान जीता है। यह पेपर यह वर्णन करने के लिए है कि यह तकनीकी रूप से कैसे काम करता है और कुछ आवश्यक प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों की रिपोर्ट और विश्लेषण करने के लिए है', 'ga': 'Tá an chéad áit buaite ag AiFu sa chomórtas Tasc 10 - “Freagairt Ceisteanna Matamaitice” SemEval-2019. Tá an páipéar seo le cur síos ar an gcaoi a n-oibríonn sé go teicniúil agus chun roinnt torthaí turgnamhacha riachtanacha a thuairisciú agus a anailísiú', 'el': 'Η AiFu κέρδισε την πρώτη θέση στον διαγωνισμό Απαντήσεις Μαθηματικών. Η παρούσα εργασία είναι να περιγράψει πώς λειτουργεί τεχνικά και να αναφέρει και να αναλύσει μερικά βασικά πειραματικά αποτελέσματα', 'ka': "AiFu პირველი ადგილში SemEval-2019 დავალება 10 - 'Math Question Answering' ეს წიგნი არის როგორ მუშაობს ტექნიკურად და როგორ მუშაობს და ანალიზაცია რამდენიმე მნიშვნელოვანი ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი", 'hu': 'Az AiFu megnyerte az első helyezést a SemEval-2019 feladat 10 - "Matematikai kérdések megválaszolása" versenyen. Ez a tanulmány bemutatja, hogyan működik technikailag, valamint jelentést és elemez néhány lényeges kísérleti eredményt', 'it': 'AiFu ha vinto il primo posto nel concorso SemEval-2019 Task 10 - "Math Question Answering". Questo articolo è quello di descrivere come funziona tecnicamente e di riportare e analizzare alcuni risultati sperimentali essenziali', 'lt': 'AiFu pirmą kartą laimėjo 2010 m. pusmečio vertinimo 10 užduotyje „Math Question Answering“ konkurse. Šiame dokumente turi būti aprašyta, kaip jis veikia techniškai, ir pateikiami ir analizuojami kai kurie esminiai eksperimentiniai rezultatai.', 'mk': 'Аифу победи на првото место на натпреварот "Половина на Евал-2019-та задача 10 - "Одговори на математичките прашања". Овој весник треба да опише како работи технички и да известува и анализира некои основни експериментални резултати', 'kk': 'АйФу бірінші жағдайда 2019 жыл бөлігінің 10- тапсырмасында "Математикалық сұрақтар жауап беру" дегенді жетті. Бұл қағаз техникалық жұмыс істейтін және хабарлау және кейбір негізгі тәжірибе нәтижелерін талдау', 'ml': "എയ്ഫു സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2019 ടാസ്ക് 10 - 'ഗണിത ചോദ്യം പ്രതിരോധിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ആദ്യ സ്ഥലം ജയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഇത് എങ്ങനെ സാങ്കേതികമായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നുവെന്നും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക", 'mt': "AiFu rebħet l-ewwel post fil-kompetizzjoni SemEval-2019 Task 10 - 'Tweġiba għal Mistoqsijiet Matematiċi'. Dan id-dokument għandu jiddeskrivi kif taħdem teknikament u jirrapporta u janalizza xi riżultati sperimentali essenzjali", 'mn': 'АйФу 2019 оны SemEval-ын 10-р ажлын анхны анхны талаар ялсан. Энэ цаас нь техник хэрхэн ажиллаж, зарим чухал туршилтын үр дүнг шинжилгээ хийх,', 'ms': "AiFu telah memenangkan tempat pertama dalam SemEval-2019 Tugas 10 - 'Math Question Answering' pertandingan. Kertas ini adalah untuk menggambarkan bagaimana ia berfungsi secara teknikal dan untuk melaporkan dan menganalisis beberapa hasil percubaan penting", 'no': 'AiFu har vann den første plassen i oppgåva 10 i semiEval-2019 – « Mathematiske spørsmål svaring ». Denne papiret er å beskrive korleis det fungerer teknisk og å rapportera og analysera nokre viktige eksperimentelle resultat', 'pl': 'AiFu zdobyła pierwsze miejsce w konkursie SemEval-2019 Task 10.Math Question Respwering. Niniejszy artykuł ma opisać, jak działa technicznie oraz zgłosić i analizować niektóre istotne wyniki eksperymentalne', 'ro': 'AiFu a câștigat primul loc în competiția SemEval-2019 Task 10 - "Răspunsul la întrebări matematice". Această lucrare este de a descrie modul în care funcționează tehnic și de a raporta și analiza unele rezultate experimentale esențiale', 'si': "AiFu පළමු ස්ථානයෙන් සෙම්වෙල්-2019 වැඩක් 10 - 'ගණිත ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතික්ෂණය 'ප්\u200dරතික්ෂණය. මේ පත්තර තමයි ඒක විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විස්තර කරන්න, වාර්තාව සහ විශ්වාස කරන්න,", 'so': "AiFu wuxuu ku guulaystay meeshii ugu horeysay ee shaqada SemEval-2019 10 - 'Qashinka jawaabta su'aalaha Math. This paper is to describe how it works technically and to report and analyze some essential experimental results", 'sv': 'AiFu har vunnit första plats i tävlingen SemEval-2019 Task 10 - "Math Question Answering". Denna uppsats är att beskriva hur det fungerar tekniskt samt att rapportera och analysera några väsentliga experimentella resultat', 'sr': "AiFu je osvojio prvo mesto na zadatku 10 iz semiEvala 2019 - 'Odgovor na matematičko pitanje. Ovaj papir je opisati kako tehnički funkcioniše i prijaviti i analizirati neke važne eksperimentalne rezultate", 'ur': "آئفو نے سموئل-2019 ٹاکس ۱۰ میں پہلی جگہ جیت دی ہے - 'ریاضی سؤال جواب دینے' کی رقابت. یہ کاغذ ہے کہ اسے تکنیک طریقے سے کیسے کام کرتا ہے اور کیسے راپورٹ کرتا ہے اور کچھ ضروری آزمائش نتیجے تحقیق کرتا ہے", 'ta': "எய்ஃபு செம்Eval-2019 பணி 10 - 'கணிதம் கேள்வி விடையில் முதல் இடத்தை வெற்றியுள்ளது. இந்த காகிதத்தை எப்படி தொழில்நுட்பத்தில் செயல்படுகிறது மற்றும் அறிவிக்க மற்றும் சில முக்கியமான சோதனைகளின்", 'vi': 'AiPhúc đã giành được vị trí đầu tiên trong vòng thi đấu Cuộc Trả lời câu hỏi Toán. Tờ giấy này dùng để miêu tả công việc của nó về kỹ thuật, báo cáo và phân tích một số kết quả thử nghiệm quan trọng.', 'uz': "AiFu SemEval-2019 Vazifa 10 - 'Math savol javob beradi' birinchi марта ғолиб бўлди. Bu qogʻoz, buni teknikada ishlaydigan va xabar qilish va muhim jarayon natijalarini analysh uchun", 'hr': "AiFu je osvojio prvo mjesto na zadatku 10 iz polovine ispitivanja 2019. - 'Matematičko odgovoranje pitanja'. Ovaj papir je opisati kako tehnički funkcionira i prijaviti i analizirati neke važne eksperimentalne rezultate", 'bg': 'АйФу спечели първото място в конкурса Задача 10 - "Отговаряне на математически въпроси". Настоящата статия има за цел да опише как работи технически и да докладва и анализира някои съществени експериментални резултати', 'nl': "AiFu heeft de eerste plaats gewonnen in de SemEval-2019 Taak 10.Math Question Answering'competitie. Dit artikel is bedoeld om te beschrijven hoe het technisch werkt en om enkele essentiële experimentele resultaten te rapporteren en te analyseren", 'id': "AiFu telah memenangkan tempat pertama di SemEval-2019 Task 10 - 'Math Question Answering' kompetisi. Kertas ini adalah untuk menggambarkan cara kerjanya secara teknis dan untuk melaporkan dan menganalisis beberapa hasil percobaan penting", 'da': "AiFu har vundet førstepladsen i SemEval-2019 Task 10 - 'Math spørgsmål besvarelse'konkurrence. Dette arbejde skal beskrive, hvordan det fungerer teknisk og rapportere og analysere nogle væsentlige eksperimentelle resultater", 'fa': 'آیفو اولین جایزه در مسابقه ۱۰ سال ۲۰۱۹ برنده شده است. این کاغذ برای توصیف کردن چگونه فنی کار می کند و گزارش دادن و تحلیل کردن نتیجه\u200cهای آزمایش اصلی است', 'sw': "AiFu has won the first place in the SemEval-2019 Task 10 - 'Math Question Answering'competition.  Makala hii ni kuelezea jinsi inavyofanya kazi kwa ufundi na kuripoti na kuchambua matokeo muhimu ya majaribio", 'de': "AiFu hat den ersten Platz im SemEval-2019 Task 10.Math Question Answering'Wettbewerb gewonnen. Dieses Papier soll beschreiben, wie es technisch funktioniert und einige wesentliche experimentelle Ergebnisse berichten und analysieren", 'tr': "AiFu SemEval-2019 Görevi 10'da ilkinji gezek gazandy - 'Math Question Answering' Bu häzirki tehniýa nädip işleýändigini tassyklamak we hasaplamak we wajyp deňlik netijelerini çözümlemek.", 'sq': "AiFu ka fituar vendin e parë në konkurrimin SemEval-2019 Task 10 - 'Math Question Answering'. Kjo letër është për të përshkruar se si funksionon teknikisht dhe për të raportuar dhe analizuar disa rezultate thelbësore eksperimentale", 'hy': 'Աիֆուն առաջին հերթին է հաղթել 2019 թվականի "Սեմեվալ-2019" 10-ի "Մաթեմատիկական հարցերի պատասխանը" մրցակցության ժամանակ: Այս աշխատանքը նպատակն է նկարագրել, թե ինչպես է այն աշխատում տեխնիկապես, զեկուցել և վերլուծել որոշ կարևոր փորձարկման արդյունքներ,', 'ko': "에포는 Sem Eval-2019 미션 10인'수학 퀴즈'경기에서 1위를 차지했다.본고는 그것이 기술적인 작업 원리를 묘사하고 일부 중요한 실험 결과를 보고하고 분석하고자 한다", 'am': "አየፉም የስራ ስራ 10 - 'math ጥያቄ መልስ አሸንፈዋል፡፡ ይህ ገጽ የትክክለኛ ተቃውሞ እንዴት እንደሚሠራ እና የግንኙነት ፈተና ፍሬዎችን ለማስተዋል ነው፡፡", 'af': "AiFu het die eerste plek gewen in die SemEval-2019 Opdrag 10 - 'Mathematiese Fraag Antwoord' Hierdie papier is om te beskrywe hoe dit tekens werk en om sommige nuwe eksperimentale resultate te raporteer en te analiseer", 'ca': "AiFu ha guanyat el primer lloc en la competició SemEval-2019 Task 10 - 'Math Question Answering'. Aquest paper és per descriure com funciona tècnicament i per informar i analitzar alguns resultats experimentals essencials", 'cs': "AiFu získala první místo v soutěži SemEval-2019 Task 10.Math Question Answering'soutěže. Tento článek má popsat, jak to technicky funguje a nahlásit a analyzovat některé základní experimentální výsledky", 'bn': "AiFu has won the first place in the SemEval-2019 Task 10 - 'Math Question Answering'competition.  এই পত্রিকা বর্ণনা করার জন্য এটা কিভাবে কাজ করে এবং কিছু গুরুত্বপূর্ণ পরীক্ষার ফলাফল বিশ্লেষণ করার জন্য রিপোর্ট কর", 'bs': "AiFu je osvojio prvo mjesto na zadatku 10 iz semiEvala 2019 - 'Odgovor na matematičko pitanje. Ovaj papir je opisati kako tehnički funkcioniše i prijaviti i analizirati neke ključne eksperimentalne rezultate", 'et': 'AiFu on võitnud esimese koha SemEval-2019 ülesande 10 - "Matemaatika küsimustele vastamine" konkursil. Käesoleva töö eesmärk on kirjeldada, kuidas see tehniliselt toimib ning arutada ja analüüsida mõningaid olulisi katsetulemusi', 'fi': "AiFu on voittanut ensimmäisen sijan SemEval-2019 Task 10 - 'Math Question Answering' -kilpailussa. Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan, miten se toimii teknisesti ja raportoidaan ja analysoidaan joitakin olennaisia kokeellisia tuloksia", 'az': 'AiFu ilk keçmişi yarışmaq-2019 Task 10 - Math Question Answering tələb etdi. Bu kağıt tekniki olaraq işlədiyini təsdiqləməkdir və bəzi mövcud təcrübə sonuçlarını təsdiqləməkdir.', 'jv': "AyFu wis nambah sing perusahaan nang semebal-2011 task 10 - 'Wis Panjenengan Artis respon' Pesene iki dadi kanggo ngerwih piye isakno lan nggawe alikno lan ngerwih nyong ngerwih dadi bagian sing paling apik bakun", 'he': 'אייפו זכה במקום הראשון בתחרות השאלה המתמטיקה. העיתון הזה הוא לתאר איך הוא עובד טכנית ולדווח ולניתוח כמה תוצאות ניסויים חיוניות', 'sk': 'AiFu je osvojil prvo mesto na tekmovanju SemEval-2019 Task 10 - "Math Questions Responsing". V prispevku je opisano, kako deluje tehnično, ter poročati in analizirati nekatere bistvene eksperimentalne rezultate.', 'ha': "AiFu ya rinjãye ta farkon a SemEal-2019 Taimar 10 - 'Ansãr Math Issuwa' Wannan takardan shine a bayyana yadda it ke aiki na kimkakati da to rape and analyze some matsalar jarrabai masu muhimu", 'bo': "AiFu ཡིས་SemEval-2019 ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་གི་སྔོན་པ་དེ་རྒྱལ་ཡོད། ལས་འགུལ་ལྡན་༡༠ - 'གྲངས་རིག་འདྲི་ཚིག་ལབ་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་དགའ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ལག་ལེན་པ་དང་གལ་ཆེན་ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་ནི་ཇི་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་དང་གལ"}
{'en': 'Clark Kent at SemEval-2019 Task 4 : Stylometric Insights into Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'es': 'Clark Kent en la Tarea 4 de SemEval-2019: Perspectivas estilométricas en la detección de noticias hiperpartidistas', 'pt': 'Clark Kent na Tarefa 4 do SemEval-2019: Insights estilométricos na detecção de notícias hiperpartidárias', 'fr': 'Clark Kent au SEMEVAL-2019 Task 4\xa0: Perspectives stylométriques dans la détection hyperpartisane des actualités', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のクラーク・ケントタスク4 ：ハイパーパーパーティサンのニュース検出に関するスタイルメトリックの洞察', 'ar': 'كلارك كينت في SemEval-2019 Task 4: Stylometric Insights to Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'zh': '克拉克·肯特在SemEval-2019务4:超党派新闻检测之风', 'ru': 'Кларк Кент на SemEval-2019 Задача 4: Стилометрические идеи по обнаружению гиперпартийных новостей', 'hi': 'क्लार्क केंट SemEval-2019 कार्य 4 पर: हाइपरपार्टिजन समाचार का पता लगाने में स्टाइलोमेट्रिक अंतर्दृष्टि', 'ga': 'Clark Kent ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 4: Léargais Stiliméadracha ar Bhrath Nuacht Hipirpháirtí', 'ka': 'Clark Kent at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Stylometric Insights in Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'hu': 'Clark Kent a SemEval-2019 4. feladaton: Stylometrikus betekintések a hiperpartizánokba', 'el': 'Κλαρκ Κεντ στο έργο 4: Στυλομετρικές Γνώσεις στην Ανίχνευση Υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων', 'it': "Clark Kent al SemEval-2019 Task 4: Approfondimenti Stilometrici nell'Iperpartisan News Detection", 'mk': 'Кларк Кент на SemEval-2019 задача 4: Стилометрички инспективи за детекција на хиперпартисанските вести', 'lt': 'Clark Kent, SemEval-2019, 4 užduotis: Stilometriniai tyrimai hiperpartizmo žinių aptikimui', 'kk': 'Кларк Кент жарым- 2019 тапсырма 4: Стилометриялық институттарды Hyperpartisan жаңалықтарды анықтау', 'mt': 'Clark Kent f’SemEval-2019 Task 4: Stylometric Insights into Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'ms': 'Clark Kent di SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Penglihatan Stilometrik ke Pengesanan Berita Hyperpartisan', 'ml': 'ക്ലാര്\u200dക്ക് കെന്റ് സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 4: ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസാന്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്ത ഡിറ്റീഷനിലേക്ക് സ്റ്റൈലോമി', 'mn': 'Кларк Кент, SemEval-2019 Тапсыг 4: Стилометрийн Институт Хиперпартизан Хэдээлэл', 'no': 'Clark Kent at semiEval-2019 Task 4: Stylometric Insights into Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'pl': 'Clark Kent w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 4: Stylometryczne wglądy w wykrywanie wiadomości hiperpartyjnych', 'ro': 'Clark Kent la SemEval-2019 Task 4: Insights Stylometric into Hyperpartizan News Detection', 'sr': 'Clark Kent na semiEval-2019 zadatak 4: Stylometrički insisti u hiperpartisan News Detection', 'si': 'ක්ලාක් කෙන්ට් සෙම්වෙල්-2019 වැඩ 4: ස්ටිලොමෙට්\u200dරික් ඉන්සිට්ට්ස් හිපර්පාර්ටිසන් වාර්තාව පරික්ෂණය', 'so': 'Clark Kent at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Stylometric Insights into Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'sv': 'Clark Kent på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 4: Stylometriska insikter i hyperpartisan Nyhetsdetektering', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணியில் கிளார்க் கென்ட்', 'ur': 'سیم اول-2019 ٹاکس 4 میں کلارک کنٹ: ہیپر پارٹیسان نیویس ڈیکسٹ میں استیلومتریک اینسیٹ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Clark Kent trong nhiệm vụ Semkhai ly-thẩm 9 4: Tinh tướng trong việc trinh sát tin tức Hyperdu', 'nl': 'Clark Kent bij SemEval-2019 Taak 4: Stylometrische Inzichten in Hyperpartisan Nieuws Detectie', 'hr': 'Clark Kent na semiEval-2019 zadatak 4: Stylometrički Insights u Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'id': 'Clark Kent di SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Penglihatan Stilometrik ke Deteksi Berita Hyperpartisan', 'de': 'Clark Kent bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 4: Stylometrische Einblicke in hyperparteiische Nachrichtenerkennung', 'ko': '클라크 켄트(Clark Kent)가Sem Eval-19 임무4: 초당파 뉴스 검측에 대한 풍속 통찰', 'bg': 'Кларк Кент на Задача 4: Стилометрични прозрения в откриването на хиперпартизани новини', 'da': 'Clark Kent på SemEval-2019 Opgave 4: Stylometrisk indsigt i hyperpartisan Nyheder Detection', 'tr': 'Clark Kent at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Stylometric Insights into Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'fa': 'کلارک کنت در پایین اول-2019 کار ۴: استیلومتریک Insights into Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'am': 'ስራ 4: ስታሌometric Insights to Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'sw': 'Clark Kent akiwa SemEval-2019 Vazifa 4: Vifaa vya Usolometric kwa Utafiti wa Habari za Hyperpartisan', 'af': 'Clark Kent by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 4: Stylometric Insights in Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'hy': 'Քլարկ Քենթը, 2019 թվականի "Սեմեվալ" 4-րդ հանձնարարությունում. Հիպերպարտեզիան նորությունների հայտնաբերման ոճիլիմետրիկ հետազոտություններ', 'sq': 'Clark Kent në SemEval-2019 Task 4: Stylometric Insights into Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৪: হাইপার্পার্টিস্যান নিউজ ডিটেক্টরের স্টাইলোমিক ইনসাইট', 'cs': 'Clark Kent na SemEval-2019 Úkol 4: Stylometrické pohledy na detekci hyperstranických zpráv', 'et': 'Clark Kent SemEval-2019 ülesandel 4: Stülomeetrilised ülevaated hüperpartisansete uudiste tuvastamisest', 'az': 'Clark Kent at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Stylometric Insights in Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'fi': 'Clark Kent SemEval-2019 Task 4: Stylometric Insights into Hyperpartisan News Detection -tapahtumassa', 'bs': 'Clark Kent na semiEval-2019 zadatak 4: Stylometrički Insights u Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'ca': 'Clark Kent a SemEval-2019 Task 4: Stylometric Insights into Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'jv': 'New Person', 'he': 'קלארק קנט בסמיוול-2019 משימה 4: חיפוש סטילומטרי בחדשות היפרפרטיזן', 'ha': 'Label', 'sk': 'Clark Kent na SemEval-2019 naloga 4: stilometrični vpogledi v hiperpartizansko zaznavanje novic', 'bo': 'Clark Kent at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Stylometric Insights into Hyperpartisan News Detection'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present a news bias prediction system, which we developed as part of a SemEval 2019 task. We developed an XGBoost based system which uses character and word level n-gram features represented using TF-IDF, count vector based correlation matrix, and predicts if an input news article is a hyperpartisan news article. Our model was able to achieve a precision of 68.3 % on the test set provided by the contest organizers. We also run our model on the BuzzFeed corpus and find XGBoost with simple character level N-Gram embeddings to be performing well with an accuracy of around 96 %.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos um sistema de previsão de viés de notícias, que desenvolvemos como parte de uma tarefa do SemEval 2019. Desenvolvemos um sistema baseado em XGBoost que usa recursos de n-gram em nível de caractere e palavra representados usando TF-IDF, matriz de correlação baseada em vetor de contagem e prevê se um artigo de entrada de notícias é um artigo de notícias hiperpartidário. Nosso modelo conseguiu atingir uma precisão de 68,3% no conjunto de teste fornecido pelos organizadores do concurso. Também executamos nosso modelo no corpus BuzzFeed e descobrimos que o XGBoost com embeddings N-Gram de nível de caractere simples está funcionando bem com uma precisão de cerca de 96%.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos un sistema de predicción de sesgos de noticias, que desarrollamos como parte de una tarea de SemEval 2019. Desarrollamos un sistema basado en XGBoost que utiliza características de n-gramas a nivel de caracteres y palabras representadas mediante TF-IDF, matriz de correlación basada en vectores de recuento y predice si un artículo de noticias de entrada es un artículo de noticias hiperpartidista. Nuestro modelo logró una precisión del 68,3% en el conjunto de pruebas proporcionado por los organizadores del concurso. También ejecutamos nuestro modelo en el corpus de BuzzFeed y descubrimos que XGBoost con incrustaciones simples de N-Gram a nivel de caracteres funciona bien con una precisión de alrededor del 96%.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم نظام التنبؤ بالتحيز الإخباري ، والذي قمنا بتطويره كجزء من مهمة SemEval 2019. لقد طورنا نظامًا قائمًا على XGBoost يستخدم ميزات n-gram على مستوى الأحرف والكلمات ممثلة باستخدام TF-IDF ، ومصفوفة الارتباط القائمة على العد المتجه ، ويتوقع ما إذا كانت مقالة إخبارية مُدخلة عبارة عن مقالة إخبارية شديدة الحزبية. استطاع نموذجنا تحقيق دقة قدرها 68.3٪ في مجموعة الاختبار التي قدمها منظمو المسابقة. نقوم أيضًا بتشغيل نموذجنا على BuzzFeed corpus ونجد XGBoost بمستوى حرف N-Gram البسيط لحفلات الزفاف لأداء جيد مع دقة تصل إلى حوالي 96٪.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons un système de prédiction des biais d'actualités, que nous avons développé dans le cadre d'une tâche SemEval 2019. Nous avons développé un système basé sur XGBoost qui utilise des fonctions de n-gramme au niveau des caractères et des mots représentées par TF-IDF, une matrice de corrélation basée sur le vecteur de comptage, et qui prédit si un article d'actualité en entrée est un article de presse hyperpartisan. Notre modèle a pu atteindre une précision de 68,3\xa0% sur le set de test fourni par les organisateurs du concours. Nous exécutons également notre modèle sur le corpus BuzzFeed et constatons que XGBoost avec des intégrations N-Gram simples au niveau des caractères fonctionne bien avec une précision d'environ 96\xa0%.", 'zh': '本文中,我发一新闻偏差测统,此为SemEval 2019务之一体也。 开一基于XGBoost之统,当用TF-IDF之符,与单词级n-gram特征,计数向量相关矩阵,而占输新闻文,非超党新闻文也。 吾侪之试组织者集上致68.3%之精。 行 BuzzFeed 语料库上,简字符级 N-Gram 嵌 XGBoost ,准确率约为 96%。', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2019タスクの一環として開発したニュースバイアス予測システムを紹介する。XGBoostベースのシステムを開発し、TF - IDF、カウントベクトルベースの相関行列を使用して表現される文字およびワードレベルのn - gram特徴を使用し、入力されたニュース記事が超党派のニュース記事であるかどうかを予測した。当社のモデルは、コンテスト主催者が提供するテストセットで68.3 ％の精度を達成することができました。また、BuzzFeedコーパスでモデルを実行し、シンプルな文字レベルのN - Gram埋め込みを備えたXGBoostが約96%の精度で良好に機能していることを発見しました。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम एक समाचार पूर्वाग्रह भविष्यवाणी प्रणाली पेश करते हैं, जिसे हमने एक SemEval 2019 कार्य के हिस्से के रूप में विकसित किया है। हमने एक XGBoost आधारित प्रणाली विकसित की है जो TF-IDF का उपयोग करके प्रतिनिधित्व की गई चरित्र और शब्द स्तर n-ग्राम सुविधाओं का उपयोग करती है, वेक्टर आधारित सहसंबंध मैट्रिक्स की गिनती करती है, और भविष्यवाणी करती है कि क्या एक इनपुट समाचार लेख एक हाइपरपार्टिसन समाचार लेख है। हमारा मॉडल प्रतियोगिता आयोजकों द्वारा प्रदान किए गए परीक्षण सेट पर 68.3% की सटीकता प्राप्त करने में सक्षम था। हम BuzzFeed कॉर्पस पर भी अपना मॉडल चलाते हैं और लगभग 96% की सटीकता के साथ अच्छी तरह से प्रदर्शन करने के लिए सरल चरित्र स्तर एन-ग्राम एम्बेडिंग के साथ XGBoost पाते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем систему предсказания предвзятости новостей, которую мы разработали в рамках задачи SemEval 2019. Мы разработали систему на основе XGBoost, которая использует функции n-грамм на уровне символов и слов, представленные с использованием TF-IDF, матрицы корреляции на основе векторов подсчета, и прогнозирует, является ли вводимая новостная статья гиперпартийной новостной статьей. Наша модель смогла достичь точности 68,3% на тестовом наборе, предоставленном организаторами конкурса. Мы также запускаем нашу модель на корпусе BuzzFeed и находим XGBoost с простыми вложениями N-Gram на уровне символов, чтобы хорошо работать с точностью около 96%.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair córas tuar claonta nuachta, a d’fhorbair muid mar chuid de thasc SemEval 2019. D’fhorbraíomar córas bunaithe ar XGBoost a úsáideann gnéithe n-gram leibhéal carachtair agus focal arna léiriú ag baint úsáide as TF-IDF, maitrís comhghaoil bunaithe ar veicteoir comhaireamh, agus a thuar más airteagal nuachta hipearpháirteach é alt nuachta ionchuir. Bhí ár múnla in ann cruinneas 68.3% a bhaint amach ar an tacar tástála a chuir eagraithe an chomórtais ar fáil. Reáchtálaimid ár múnla ar chorpas BuzzFeed freisin agus aimsímid go bhfuil XGBoost le leabaithe N-Gram ar leibhéal carachtair shimplí ag feidhmiú go maith le cruinneas thart ar 96%.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ახალგაზრულების წარმოდგენების სისტემა, რომელიც ჩვენ განვითარებდით 2019 წარმოდგენების ნაწილი. Name ჩვენი მოდელი შეიძლება 68.3% წარმოდგენა კონტესტის ორგანზიზიტორიების შესაძლებლობა. ჩვენ ასევე ჩვენი მოდელს BuzzFeed კორპუსში გავაკეთებთ და XGBoost-ს პროგრამეტური სიმბოლო N-გრამის სიმბოლოებით გავაკეთებთ, რომელიც საკმაოდ 96% უნდა გავაკეთებთ.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a SemEval 2019 feladatának részeként kidolgozott hírfejlesztési előrejelző rendszert. Kifejlesztettünk egy XGBoost alapú rendszert, amely karakter- és szószintű n-gram funkciókat használ TF-IDF segítségével, vektoros korrelációs mátrixot számol, és előrejelzi, hogy egy bemeneti hírek hiperpartizán hírek. Modellünk 68,3%-os pontosságot tudott elérni a versenyszervezők által biztosított tesztkészleten. Modellünket a BuzzFeed korpuszon is futtatjuk, és úgy találjuk, hogy az XGBoost egyszerű karakterszintű N-Gram beágyazásokkal jól teljesít, mintegy 96%-os pontossággal.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε ένα σύστημα πρόβλεψης προκαταλήψεων ειδήσεων, το οποίο αναπτύξαμε ως μέρος μιας εργασίας SemEval 2019. Αναπτύξαμε ένα βασισμένο σύστημα το οποίο χρησιμοποιεί χαρακτηριστικά γραμμάτων επιπέδου χαρακτήρων και λέξεων που αντιπροσωπεύονται χρησιμοποιώντας τον πίνακα συσχέτισης με βάση το διανυσματικό μέτρημα, και προβλέπει εάν ένα άρθρο ειδήσεων εισόδου είναι ένα υπερκομματικό άρθρο ειδήσεων. Το μοντέλο μας κατάφερε να επιτύχει ακρίβεια 68,3% στο σετ δοκιμών που παρείχαν οι διοργανωτές του διαγωνισμού. Επίσης, τρέχουμε το μοντέλο μας στο σώμα και βρίσκουμε ότι το XGBoost με απλές ενσωμάτωσης N-Gram επιπέδου χαρακτήρων αποδίδει καλά με ακρίβεια περίπου 96%.', 'it': "In questo articolo, presentiamo un sistema di predizione del bias delle notizie, che abbiamo sviluppato nell'ambito di un compito SemEval 2019. Abbiamo sviluppato un sistema basato su XGBoost che utilizza caratteristiche n-gram a livello di caratteri e parole rappresentate utilizzando TF-IDF, matrice di correlazione basata su vettore di conteggio, e predice se un articolo di notizie di input è un articolo di notizie iperpartigiane. Il nostro modello è stato in grado di raggiungere una precisione del 68,3% sul set di test fornito dagli organizzatori del concorso. Eseguiamo anche il nostro modello sul corpus BuzzFeed e troviamo che XGBoost con semplici incorporazioni N-Gram a livello di caratteri stia funzionando bene con una precisione di circa il 96%.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome naujienų sąžiningumo prognozavimo sistemą, kurią sukūrėme kaip 2019 m. SemEval užduoties dalį. We developed an XGBoost based system which uses character and word level n-gram features represented using TF-IDF, count vector based correlation matrix, and predicts if an input news article is a hyperpartisan news article.  Mūsų modelis galėjo pasiekti 68,3 % tikslumą konkurso organizatorių pateikto bandymo rinkinio atžvilgiu. Mes taip pat veikiame savo model į BuzzFeed korpus ir rasime XGBoost su paprastu charakterio lygiu N-Gram įdėjinių, kad būtų gerai veikiama, tiksliai apie 96 %.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, 2019 жылдың жарым-Eval тапсырмасының бір бөлігі ретінде жаңалық тапсырмаларды бақылау жүйесін таңдаймыз. Біз XGBoost негіздеген жүйесін жасадық. Бұл таңбалар мен сөз деңгейінің n- грамма мүмкіндіктерін TF- IDF, кореляциялық матрицасын негіздеген вектордың саны және келтірілген жаңалық мақаласы гиперпартизан жаңалық Біздің үлгіміз конкурс орындаушыларының сынақтарында 68,3% деңгейін жеткізе алады. Біз сондай-ақ BuzzFeed корпус үлгісімізді жегуіміз және XGBoost-ді қарапайым таңбалар деңгейінде N-Gram ендіру үшін 96% деңгейінде дұрыс жұмыс істеу үшін табуыз.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, претставуваме систем за предвидување на предвидувањата на вестите, кој го развивме како дел од задачата SemEval 2019. Развивме систем базиран на XGBoost кој користи карактеристики на симбол и зборно ниво n-грам претставени со TF-IDF, број на вектори базирана корелација матрица и предвидува дали внесена вест статија е хиперпартисанска вест статија. Нашиот модел успеа да постигне прецизност од 68,3 отсто на тестот обезбеден од организаторите на натпреварот. Ние, исто така, го водиме нашиот модел на корпусот BuzzFeed и најдеме XGBoost со едноставно ниво на карактер N-Gram вложени да функционираат добро со точност од околу 96 отсто.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan sistem ramalan bias berita, yang kami mengembangkan sebagai sebahagian dari tugas SemEval 2019. Kami mengembangkan sistem berasaskan XGBoost yang menggunakan ciri-ciri aksara dan aras perkataan n-gram yang mewakili menggunakan TF-IDF, menghitung matriks korelasi berasaskan vektor, dan meramalkan jika artikel berita input adalah artikel berita hyperpartisan. Model kami mampu mencapai ketepatan 68.3% pada set ujian yang diberikan oleh pengatur kontes. Kami juga menjalankan model kami pada BuzzFeed corpus dan mencari XGBoost dengan tahap aksara sederhana N-Gram untuk berjalan dengan tepatnya sekitar 96%.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d പ്രവചന സിസ്റ്റം കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. അത് സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ജോലിയില്\u200d ഒരു ഭാഗമായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വ ടിഎഫ്- ഐഡിഎഫ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന അക്ഷരത്തിന്റെയും വാക്കിന്റെയും നിലവിലുള്ള n-ഗ്രാമിന്റെയും പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d എക്സ്ജിബൂസ്റ്റിന്റെയും അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു സിസ നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രതിയോഗിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d നല്\u200dകിയ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്\u200dറെ സെറ്റിന്\u200dറെ പരിശോധനത്തില്\u200d 68.3% പ്രിസിസ്റ്റ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ബുസ്ഫീഡ് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d നടത്തുകയും എക്സ്ജിബൂസ്റ്റിനെ കണ്ടെത്തുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. എളുപ്പമുള്ള അക്ഷരരൂപത്തില്\u200d N', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw sistema ta’ tbassir ta’ preġudizzju għall-a ħbarijiet, li żviluppajna bħala parti minn kompitu SemEval 2019. Żviluppajna sistema bbażata fuq XGBoost li tuża karatteristiċi n-gram tal-karattru u tal-livell tal-kelma rrappreżentati bl-użu ta’ TF-IDF, matriċi ta’ korrelazzjoni bbażata fuq il-vetturi, u tbassar jekk artikolu tal-a ħbarijiet tal-input huwiex artikolu tal-aħbarijiet iperpartiġjani. Il-mudell tagħna kien kapaċi jikseb preċiżjoni ta’ 68.3% fuq is-sett tat-test ipprovdut mill-organizzaturi tal-kompetizzjonijiet. Aħna nħaddmu wkoll il-mudell tagħna fuq il-BuzzFeed corpus u nsibu XGBoost b’inkorporazzjonijiet sempliċi fil-livell ta’ karattru N-Gram li qed jaħdmu tajjeb b’preċiżjoni ta’ madwar 96 %.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид 2019 оны SemEval-ын ажлын нэг хэсэг болсон мэдээллийн өргөн тодорхойлолтын системийг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид XGBoost-ын үндсэн системийг хөгжүүлсэн. ТF-IDF, векторын үндсэн харилцааны матриц ашиглаж, харилцааны харилцааны матриц ашиглаж, харилцааны мэдээллийн баримт гиперпартизан мэдээллийн баримт гэдгийг хэлж байна. Бидний загвар нь тэмцээний зохион байгуулагчдын туршилтын үнэ цэнэтэй 68.3% хүртэл хүргэж чадсан. Мөн бид BuzzFeed корпус дээр загварыг удирдаж, XGBoost-г энгийн харилцааны N-Gram-ын түвшинд жинхэнэ хэмжээтэй олж байна. 96% нь тодорхой.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi eit nyhetsforsiktssystem for forhåndsvising, som vi utvikla som del av en semiEval 2019 oppgåve. Vi utvikla eit XGBoost-basert system som brukar n-gram-funksjonar for teikn og ordnivå, representert med TF-IDF, tellar vektorbasert korrelasjonsmatrise, og forventar om ein inndata-nyhetsglasse er ein hyperpartisan nyhetsglasse. Modellen vårt var i stand til å oppnå ein presisjon på 68,3% på testen sett av kontekstorganisatorene. Vi køyrer også modellen vårt på BuzzFeed corpus og finn XGBoost med enkle karakternivå N-Gram-innbygging som skal utførast godt med nøyaktighet rundt 96%.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy system przewidywania białości wiadomości, który opracowaliśmy w ramach zadania SemEval 2019. Opracowaliśmy system oparty na XGBoost, który wykorzystuje funkcje n-gramowe na poziomie znaków i słów reprezentowane przy użyciu TF-IDF, liczenie wektorowej macierzy korelacji i przewiduje, czy wejściowy artykuł wiadomości jest hiperspartykułem wiadomościowym. Nasz model był w stanie osiągnąć precyzję 68,3% na zestawie testowym dostarczonym przez organizatorów konkursu. Uruchamiamy również nasz model na korpusie BuzzFeed i stwierdzimy, że XGBoost z prostymi osadzeniami N-Gram na poziomie znaków działa dobrze z dokładnością około 96%.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm un sistem de predicție a știrilor, pe care l-am dezvoltat ca parte a unei sarcini SemEval 2019. Am dezvoltat un sistem bazat pe XGBoost care utilizează caracteristici de nivel de caracter și cuvânt n-gram reprezentate folosind TF-IDF, matrice de corelație bazată pe vectori numărători, și previne dacă un articol de știri de intrare este un articol de știri hiperpartizan. Modelul nostru a reușit să atingă o precizie de 68,3% pe setul de test furnizat de organizatorii concursului. De asemenea, rulăm modelul nostru pe corpul BuzzFeed și găsim XGBoost cu încorporări simple de nivel de caractere N-Gram pentru a performa bine cu o precizie de aproximativ 96%.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි ආරංචිත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්නම්, අපි 2019 වැඩේ සේම්වල් කොටසක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වුනා. Name අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක සංස්ථාපකයෙන් දෙන්න පුළුවන් 68.3% තියෙන්නේ පරීක්ෂණාවට. අපි බුස්ෆීඩ් කෝර්පුස් එක්ක අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක පටන් ගත්තා XGBoost එක්ක සාමාන්\u200dය ස්ථානය N-Gram ස්ථානයෙන් හොඳින් සැලසුම් කර', 'so': 'Warqadan waxan ku qornaa nidaam wax sii sheegidda, taasoo aan u horumarinay sida qayb ka mid ah shaqada SemEval 2019. Waxaan horumarinnay nidaam XGBoost oo isticmaalaya xaraf iyo qoraal n-gram gaar ah oo ka tirsan isticmaalka TF-IDF, xisaabta vector ku saleysan xiriir matrix, waxaana sii sheegaysaa haddii qoraalka input news uu yahay warqad hyperpartisan news. Tusaalkayagii wuxuu gaadhi karaa qiyaastii 68.3 boqolkiiba oo ku saabsan tijaabada ay qabanqaabiyayaashu diyaariyeen. Sidoo kale waxaynu ku soconnaa muusikada BuzzFeed-ka, waxaana ka helaynaa XGBoost oo ku yaala heerka sahlan ee heerka N-Gram, si aad ugu saxdaan qiyaastii 96 boqolkiiba.', 'sv': 'I den här uppsatsen presenterar vi ett prediktionssystem för nyhetsbias, som vi utvecklat som en del av SemEval 2019-uppgiften. Vi utvecklade ett XGBoost baserat system som använder tecken- och ordnivå n-gram funktioner representerade med TF-IDF, räkna vektorbaserad korrelationsmatris, och förutspår om en indata nyhetsartikel är en hyperpartisan nyhetsartikel. Vår modell kunde uppnå en precision på 68,3% på provuppsättningen från tävlingsarrangörerna. Vi kör också vår modell på BuzzFeed-korpusen och finner att XGBoost med enkla N-Gram-inbäddningar presterar bra med en noggrannhet på cirka 96%.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo sistem predviđanja vijesti, koji smo razvili kao deo zadatka iz poluvale 2019. godine. Razvili smo sistem bazirani n a XGBoost koji koristi karakterske i rečne funkcije n-grama predstavljene korištenjem TF-IDF, matrice korelacije bazirane na vektoru, i predviđaju da li je članak za ulazne vesti hiperpartizanski novinski članak. Naš model je uspeo da postigne preciznost od 68,3% na testu koji su odredili organizatori natjecanja. Takoðe vodimo naš model na BuzzFeed korpusu i pronaðemo XGBoost sa jednostavnim ulogama na nivou N-Grama da se dobro izvršava sa preciznošću oko 96%.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு செய்தி பியாஸ் எதிர்பார்ப்பு முறைமையை கொண்டுள்ளோம், அதை நாம் செம்Eval 2019 பணியின் பக நாங்கள் ஒரு XGBoost அடிப்படையிலான அமைப்பை உருவாக்கினோம். அது TF- IDF பயன்படுத்தி எழுத்து மற்றும் சொல்லு நிலை n- gram குணங்களை பயன்படுத்தி, நெறியின் இணைப்பு மதிப்பை  எங்கள் மாதிரி போட்டியாளர்கள் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட சோதனையின் அமைப்பில் 68.3% துல்லியமானதை அடைக்க முடியவில்லை. நாம் புஸ்பீட் கார்புஸ் மீது எங்கள் மாதிரியை இயக்கி எளிய எழுத்து நிலை N-Gram உள்ளடக்கங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் எளிதான எழுத்து நிலை 96% சர', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے ایک خبریں پیش بینی سیستم کی پیش بینی کی، جسے ہم نے نصف Eval 2019 کی تابع کے حصہ میں تولید کیا ہے. ہم نے ایک XGBoost بنیادی سیسٹم کو ایجاد کیا ہے جو شخص اور کلمات سطح n-گرم فائدے استعمال کرتا ہے جو TF-IDF کے مطابق نمایش کی گئی ہے، ویکتور بنیاد کی تعلق ماتریکس کا شمار کرتا ہے، اور اس کی پیش بینی کرتا ہے کہ کوئی اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا ہمارے مدل نے مسابقات سازمان کرنے والوں کے ذریعہ تست پر 68.3% کی دقیق حاصل کر سکا تھا۔ ہم نے BuzzFeed کورپوس پر ہمارا موڈل بھی چلایا اور XGBoost کو سادہ شخص سطح N-Gram ایمبڈینگ کے ساتھ دیکھا کہ 96% کی دقیق کام کریں۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz bir xabar tarqatish tizimni hosil qilamiz. Biz SemEval 2019 vazifa bir qismi deb yaratdik. Biz XGBoost asosida yaratilgan tizimni yaratdik. TF- IDF yordamida belgi va soʻzning n- gram imkoniyatlarini foydalanadi, vectorning asosida bogʻ'liq matrix boʻyicha hisoblash mumkin va kiritish maqola hyperpartisan maqola deb hisoblash mumkin. Бизнинг модел тажовузкорлар тақдим этилган синовлар таркибида 68.3% аниқни топа олмади. Biz BuzzFeed kompyuterdagi modelimizni bajaramiz va XGBoost bilan oddiy harf darajasi N-Gram bilan boshlanamiz va 96 foiz davomida yaxshi bajarish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đưa ra một hệ thống dự đoán thiên vị tin tức, mà chúng tôi đã phát triển như một phần nhiệm vụ SemEvol. Chúng tôi đã phát triển một hệ thống dựa trên XGBboost, dùng tính n ăng nhân cách và từ cấp n-gram đại diện qua TF-IDF, đếm véc- tơ tương đương ma trận, và dự đoán nếu một bài báo tin nhập là một bài báo tin về tin lớn. Mô hình của chúng tôi có khả năng đạt được độ chính xác 68.3=) trên bộ thử được cung cấp bởi các tổ chức cuộc thi. Chúng tôi cũng chạy mô hình của chúng tôi trên tập thể BuzzFeed và tìm thấy XGBboost với những rủi ro đơn giản cung cấp N-Gram để được thực hiện tốt với độ chính xác khoảng 96=.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме система за прогнозиране на предразсъдъци на новините, която разработихме като част от задача. Разработихме система, базирана на XGBoost, която използва символи и думи на ниво n-грам функции, представени чрез TF-IDF, брои векторна корелационна матрица и прогнозира дали входната новина е хиперпартизана новинарска статия. Нашият модел успя да постигне прецизност от 68.3% на тестовия комплект, предоставен от организаторите на конкурса. Също така пускаме модела си в корпуса и откриваме, че с прости вграждания на ниво символи се справя добре с точност около 96%.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi et nyhedsforudsigelsessystem, som vi har udviklet som led i en SemEval 2019 opgave. Vi har udviklet et XGBoost baseret system, der bruger tegn- og ordniveau n-gram funktioner repræsenteret ved hjælp af TF-IDF, tælle vektorbaseret korrelationsmatrix, og forudsiger, om en input nyhedsartikel er en hyperpartisan nyhedsartikel. Vores model var i stand til at opnå en præcision på 68,3% på testsættet leveret af konkurrencearrangørerne. Vi kører også vores model på BuzzFeed-korpusset og finder, at XGBoost med enkle N-Gram-indlejringer fungerer godt med en nøjagtighed på omkring 96%.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo sistem predviđanja vijesti, koji smo razvili kao dio zadatka iz polovice 2019. godine. Razvili smo sistem bazirani n a XGBoost koji koristi karakterske i rečeničke funkcije n-grame predstavljene koristeći TF-IDF, matricu korelacije na temelju vektora, i predviđaju je li članak za ulazne vijesti hiperpartizan novinski članak. Naš model je uspio postići preciznost 68,3% na testu koje su odredili organizatori natjecanja. Također vodimo naš model na BuzzFeed korpusu i nađemo XGBoost s jednostavnim razinama karaktera N-Gram integracijama kako bi se dobro izvršilo s preciznošću oko 96%.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir ein News Bias Vorhersagesystem vor, das wir im Rahmen einer SemEval 2019 Aufgabe entwickelt haben. Wir haben ein XGBoost-basiertes System entwickelt, das N-Gramm-Funktionen auf Zeichen- und Wortebene verwendet, die mit TF-IDF dargestellt werden, eine vektorbasierte Korrelationsmatrix zählt und vorhersagt, ob ein Input-Nachrichtenartikel ein hyperparteiischer Nachrichtenartikel ist. Unser Modell konnte eine Präzision von 68,3% auf dem Testset der Veranstalter erreichen. Wir führen unser Modell auch auf dem BuzzFeed-Korpus aus und finden heraus, dass XGBoost mit einfachen N-Gram-Einbettungen auf Zeichenebene mit einer Genauigkeit von rund 96%.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we een nieuws bias voorspellingssysteem, dat we hebben ontwikkeld als onderdeel van een SemEval 2019 taak. We ontwikkelden een XGBoost gebaseerd systeem dat gebruik maakt van teken- en woordniveau n-gram functies vertegenwoordigd met behulp van TF-IDF, tellen vector gebaseerde correlatie matrix, en voorspelt of een invoernieuwsartikel een hyperpartisan nieuwsartikel is. Ons model kon een precisie van 68,3% bereiken op de testset van de wedstrijdorganisatoren. We draaien ons model ook op het BuzzFeed corpus en vinden dat XGBoost met eenvoudige N-Gram embeddings op tekenniveau goed presteert met een nauwkeurigheid van ongeveer 96%.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 뉴스 편견 예측 시스템을 제시했는데 이것은 우리가SemEval 2019 임무의 일부로 개발한 것이다.우리는 TF-IDF가 표시하는 문자와 단어 등급의 n-gram 특징, 계수 벡터를 바탕으로 하는 관련 행렬을 사용하고 입력한 뉴스 기사가 초당파 뉴스 기사인지 예측하는 XGboost 기반 시스템을 개발했다.우리의 모델은 경기 조직자가 제공한 테스트 집합에서 68.3%의 정밀도를 달성할 수 있다.BuzzFeed 자료 라이브러리에서 모델을 실행했는데 간단한 문자급 N-Gram이 끼워진 XGboost가 양호하고 정확도가 약 96% 라는 것을 발견했다.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan sistem prediksi bias berita, yang kami mengembangkan sebagai bagian dari tugas SemEval 2019. Kami mengembangkan sistem berdasarkan XGBoost yang menggunakan karakter dan karakter tingkat kata n-gram yang mewakili menggunakan TF-IDF, menghitung matriks korelasi berdasarkan vektor, dan memprediksi apakah artikel berita masukan adalah artikel berita hyperpartisan. Model kami mampu mencapai presisi 68,3% pada set tes yang diberikan oleh organisasi kontes. Kami juga menjalankan model kami di BuzzFeed corpus dan menemukan XGBoost dengan karakter tingkat sederhana N-Gram embedding untuk bekerja dengan baik dengan akurasi sekitar 96%.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما سیستم پیش بینی\u200cهای پیش بینی\u200cهای خبری را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، که به عنوان بخشی از یک وظیفه نیم\u200cEval 2019 توسعه دادیم. ما سیستم بنیادی XGBoost را توسعه کردیم که از ویژگی\u200cهای نوشته\u200cای و سطح کلمه n-گرم استفاده می\u200cکند که با استفاده از TF-IDF نشان داده می\u200cشود، ماتریکس ارتباط بر اساس ویکتور حساب می\u200cکند، و پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکند آیا یک مقاله نوشته مدل ما قادر بود دقیق 68.3 درصد در آزمایش که توسط سازمان\u200cکنندگان رقابت داده شده بود به رسیدن. ما همچنین مدل خود را روی شرکت BuzzFeed اداره می کنیم و XGBoost را با سطح شخصیت ساده N-Gram پیدا می کنیم که با دقیق حدود 96 درصد انجام می دهند.', 'sw': 'In this paper, we present a news bias prediction system, which we developed as part of a SemEval 2019 task.  Tumeunda mfumo wa msingi wa XGBoost unaotumia tabia n a vipengele vya neno na gram ambavyo vinawakilisha kwa kutumia TF-IDF, kuhesabu utaratibu wa mahusiano yanayotokana na vector, na kutabiri kama makala ya habari ya input ni makala ya habari yenye upande wa habari. Mfano wetu uliweza kufikia kiasi cha asilimia 68.3 katika kipimo cha jaribio kilichotolewa na waandaaji wa mashindano. Pia tunaendesha mifano yetu kwenye makampuni ya BuzzFeed na kutafuta XGBoost kwa kiwango rahisi cha tabia cha N-Gram ili kufanya vizuri na uhakika wa takribani asilimia 96.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një sistem parashikimi të paragjykimit të lajmeve, që ne e zhvilluam si pjesë e një detyre SemEval 2019. Kemi zhvilluar një sistem bazuar n ë XGBoost që përdor karaktere dhe karaktere të nivelit të fjalës n-gram të përfaqësuar duke përdorur TF-IDF, numëruar matricën e korrelacionit bazuar në vektor dhe parashikon nëse një artikull i lajmeve të hyrjes është një artikull i lajmeve hiperpartizane. Modeli ynë ishte në gjendje të arrijë një saktësi prej 68.3% në grupin e testit të ofruar nga organizatorët e konkursit. Ne gjithashtu drejtojmë modelin tonë në korpus BuzzFeed dhe gjejmë XGBoost me një nivel karakteri të thjeshtë N-Gram të jetë duke ecur mirë me një saktësi prej rreth 96%.', 'tr': "Bu gazetde, Täzelikleriň önüm namaýyşlaryň sistemasyny we 2019-nji ýyldan bölegi hökmünde geliştirdik. Biz XGBoost tabanlı bir sistemi geliştirdik ki, TF-IDF kullanarak karakter ve kelime seviyesi n-gram özelliklerini kullanır, vektöre tabanlı bir correlasyon matrisi kullanır ve giriş haberleri bir hiperpartisan haberler maddesi olup olmadığın ı tahmin ediyor. Biziň nusgymyz konkursa düzenleyicilerinde 68.3% dyrlyklygyny başarmady. Biz hem BuzzFeed korpusynda modelimizi ýöredik we XGBoost'i ýeňil karakter derejesi bilen N-Gram guramlarymyz 96% daýyk bilen dogrylyk bilen tapdyk.", 'am': 'በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የዜና ውይይት የውይይት ስርዓት የሳምEval 2019 ስራ ክፍል ያሳየነው፡፡ TF-IDF በተጠቃሚ የXGBoost መሠረት እና የቃላት ደረጃ n-gram ምርጫዎችን የሚጠቀም የXGBoost ስርዓት መፍጠር ነው፤ vector-based correlation matrix እና የinput news article hyperpartisan news article እንደ ሆነ መፍጠር ይቻላል፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን የንቅናቄው ተቃዋሚዎች የተሰናከሉትን ፈተና ማግኘት 68.3 በመቶ አግኝቷል፡፡ በቡዛFeed ኮርፓስ ሞዴልናችንን እናገራለን እና በ96 በመቶ የሚያስፈልገውን ቀላል የፊደል አካላት ከ-ግራም አካባቢዎች ጋር XGBoost እናግኘዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք նորությունների կողմնակի կանխատեսման համակարգ, որը մենք զարգացել ենք որպես 2019 թվականի "ՍեմԵվալ" խնդրի մաս: Մենք զարգացրեցինք XԳԲուստի հիմնված համակարգ, որը օգտագործում է բնորոշ և բառի մակարդակի n-գրամ առանձնահատկություններ, որոնք ներկայացված են օգտագործելով ԹՖ-IDF, հաշվարկելով վեկտորների հիմնված կոռելացիայի մատրիքսը, և Մեր մոդելը կարողացավ հասնել 68.3 տոկոսի ճշգրտությունը մրցակցության կազմակերպողների տրամադրված փորձարկումների վրա: Մենք նաև կառավարում ենք մեր մոդելը Buzz Fod կորպոսի վրա և գտնում ենք XGBOst-ը, որը պարզ կերպարի մակարդակի N-Գրամ ներդրումներով լավ է աշխատում մոտ 96 տոկոսի ճշգրտությամբ:', 'af': "In hierdie papier stel ons 'n nuusvoorskoustelsel voorskou, wat ons as deel van 'n semiEval 2019 taak ontwikkel het. Ons het 'n XGBoost gebaseerde stelsel ontwikkel wat karakter en woord vlak n- gram funksies gebruik word deur TF- IDF, tel vektor gebaseerde korrelasie matriks, en voorskou as 'n invoer nuus artikel 'n hiperpartisan nuus artikel is. Ons model was in staat om 'n presisie van 68.3% te bereik op die toets stel wat deur die konkurs organiseerders verskaf word. Ons hardloop ook ons model op die BuzzFeed corpus en vind XGBoost met eenvoudige karaktervlak N-Gram inbettings om goed te doen met 'n presisie van omtrent 96%.", 'bn': 'In this paper, we present a news bias prediction system, which we developed as part of a SemEval 2019 task.  আমরা এক্সজিবুস্ট ভিত্তিক সিস্টেম তৈরি করেছি যেখানে টিএফ-আইডিএফ ব্যবহার করে অক্ষর এবং শব্দের স্তরের n-gram বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে, ভেক্টর ভিত্তিক সংযোগ ম্যাট আমাদের মডেল প্রতিযোগিতাদের প্রতিযোগিতার প্রতিযোগিতাদের প্রদান করা পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষায় ৬৮. আমরা বাজ ফেড কোর্পাসে আমাদের মডেল চালাই এবং এক্সিজিবুস্ট খুঁজে বের করি সাধারণ চরিত্রের স্তর N-গ্রামের স্তরে যাতে ৯৬ শতাংশের সঠিকভাব', 'az': "Bu kańüńĪzda, 2019-in yarńĪm Eval iŇüinin bir par√ßas ńĪ olaraq x…ôb…ôrl…ôr t…ôdbir t…ôdbir sistemini g√∂st…ôririk. Biz XGBoost tabanlńĪ bir sistemi yaratdńĪq ki, TF-IDF vasit…ôsil…ô g√∂st…ôril…ôn n-gram f…ôrqli karakterl…ôri v…ô s√∂z seviyy…ôsini istifad…ô edir, vektor tabanlńĪ correlation matrisi sayńĪr v…ô bir x…ôb…ôr m…ôktubumu hiperpartisan x…ôb…ôr m…ôktubumu olduńüuna t…ômin edir. Bizim modell…ôrimiz m√ľharib…ô m√ľharib…ô√ßil…ôrin t…ôyin etdiyi sńĪnaqda 68,3% qiym…ôti baŇüa √ßatdńĪ. Biz d…ô BuzzFeed korpusu modell…ôrimizi idar…ô edirik v…ô XGBoost'u basit karakter seviyy…ôti N-Gram inbingl…ôri il…ô yaxŇüńĪ iŇül…ôdirik ki, t…ôr…ôfind …ôn 96% …ôdal…ôtli olaraq yaxŇüńĪ iŇül…ôdirik.", 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo sistem predviđanja vijesti, koji smo razvili kao deo zadatka iz polovice 2019. godine. Razvili smo sistem bazirani n a XGBoost koji koristi karakterske i rečne funkcije n-grama predstavljene korištenjem TF-IDF-a, matrice korelacije bazirane na vektoru, i predviđaju da li je članak za ulazne vijesti hiperpartizanski novinski članak. Naš model je uspio postići preciznost od 68,3% na testu koje su odredili organizatori natjecanja. Također vodimo naš model na BuzzFeed korpusu i nađemo XGBoost sa jednostavnim ulogama na nivou N-Gram koji će dobro provesti sa preciznošću oko 96%.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme systém predikce bias zpráv, který jsme vyvinuli v rámci úlohy SemEval 2019. Vyvinuli jsme systém založený na XGBoost, který využívá funkce n-gramu na úrovni znaků a slov reprezentované pomocí TF-IDF, korelační matice založené na vektorech a předpovídá, zda je vstupní zpravodajský článek hyperstranickým článkem. Náš model byl schopen dosáhnout přesnosti 68,3% na testovací sadě poskytnuté organizátory soutěže. Náš model také spustíme na korpusu BuzzFeed a zjišťujeme, že XGBoost s jednoduchými vloženími N-Gram na úrovni znaků funguje dobře s přesností kolem 96%.', 'ca': "En aquest article, presentem un sistema de predicció de bias de notícies, que vam desenvolupar com part d'una tasca SemEval 2019. Vam desenvolupar un sistema basat en XGBoost que utilitza caracteres i caracteres n-gram de nivell de paraules representats utilitzant TF-IDF, matriu de correlació basat en vectors i prediu si un article d'entrada és un article hiperpartisan de notícies. El nostre model va aconseguir una precisió del 68,3% en el conjunt de proves proporcionat pels organitzadors del concurs. També fem el nostre model al corpus BuzzFeed i trobem XGBoost amb simples incorporacions de nivell de caràcter N-Gram que funcionen bé amb una precisió d'aproximadament 96%.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame uudiste eelarvamuste prognoosimise süsteemi, mille töötasime välja osana SemEval 2019 ülesandest. Töötasime välja XGBoost-põhise süsteemi, mis kasutab märgi- ja sõnataseme n-grammi funktsioone, mida esindatakse TF-IDF-i abil, loendusvektoripõhise korrelatsioonimaatriksi abil ning prognoosib, kas sisenduudisartikkel on hüperpartisanne uudisartikkel. Meie mudel saavutas võistluse korraldajate antud testikomplekti täpsuse 68,3%. Me kasutame oma mudelit ka BuzzFeed korpusel ja leiame, et XGBoost lihtsate N-Gram-taseme manustamistega toimib hästi umbes 96% täpsusega.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme uutisvinojen ennustusjärjestelmän, jonka kehitimme osana SemEval 2019 -tehtävää. Kehitimme XGBoost-pohjaisen järjestelmän, joka käyttää merkki- ja sanatason n-gram-ominaisuuksia TF-IDF:n, count vektoripohjaisen korrelaatiomatriisin avulla ja ennustaa, onko syöttöuutisartikkeli hyperpartisaani uutisartikkeli. Mallimme onnistui saavuttamaan 68,3% tarkkuuden kilpailun järjestäjien toimittamassa testisarjassa. Käytämme malliamme myös BuzzFeed-korpusella ja havaitsemme, että XGBoost, jossa on yksinkertaiset N-Gram-upotukset, toimii hyvin ja tarkkuus on noin 96%.', 'jv': 'Nang pemilih iki, kita nyimpen sistem perbudhakan kanggo ngerasar barang, awak dhéwé nggawe ngupakan karo nggawe sistem seminval 2011. We expanded a n XGBust basic System that use character and word quality n-gram parameters represented use T F-ID F, count vector supported coreletion utex, and preview If an input message message message is a caperpartisan new section. If you do not use a single set of information boxes, you can use that instead of a single set of information boxes. model dhéwé iso nggawe barang kelas 64.3% supoyo tentang kanggo ngilangno atik-atik tentang. Awak dhéwé mulai model sing ditambah ning Buzza Eat dumadhi iki ngono gawe XGBust karo perusahaan nambah layang cara N-Gram sing bisa diagram barang apik dhéwé, awak dhéwé ning awak dhéwé, 60%.', 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo sistem napovedovanja pristranskosti novic, ki smo ga razvili v okviru naloge SemEval 2019. Razvili smo sistem, ki temelji na XGBoostu, ki uporablja znakovne in besedne funkcije n-gramskega nivoja, predstavljene s TF-IDF, število vektorskih korelacijskih matric, in napoveduje, ali je vhodni članek hiperpartizanski članek. Naš model je dosegel 68,3% natančnost na testnem kompletu organizatorjev tekmovanja. Naš model izvajamo tudi na korpusu BuzzFeed in ugotovimo, da XGBoost s preprostimi vdelavami N-Gram stopnje znakov dobro deluje z natančnostjo približno 96%.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da wani na'urar bastarwa na basĩri, wanda muka develope kamar rabin aikin SemEV 2019. Mun ƙãga wani matsayi n a XGBoost wanda ke amfani da karatasi da maganar daraja n-gram masu daidaita da TF-IDF, da ƙidãya matrix da ke danna haɗi matriki, kuma mun yi amfani da idan an gabatar da wani makala na ɗabi'a cikin yanzu ta zama wata jumperpartsan na lãbãri. Tuduniyarmu ya iya sãmu taƙaita na 68.3% a kan jarraba wanda aka ƙayyade wa mai ƙidido. Tuna tafiyar da misalinmu kan makarantin BuzzFeed kuma munã sami XGBoost da zane-zane cikin daraja na N-Gram da za'a yi aiki da taƙaitacce a tsakanin 96%.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים מערכת חיזוי חיזוי חדשות, שפיתחנו כחלק ממשימה SemEval 2019. פיתחנו מערכת מבוססת על XGBoost אשר משתמשת באופי ורמת מילים n-gram מוצגת באמצעות TF-IDF, ספירת מטריקס הקשר מבוסס על וקטורים, וחזוי אם מאמר חדשות כניסה הוא מאמר חדשות hyperpartisan. המודל שלנו הצליח להשיג מדויק של 68.3% על קבוצת המבחנים שנספקה על ידי מארגני התחרות. אנחנו גם מנהלים את הדוגמא שלנו על הקורפוס של באזפוד ומצאים XGBoost עם רמת אופי פשוטה N-גרם תוכניות כדי להופיע היטב עם מדויקה של כ-96%.', 'bo': 'དེ་ལྟ་ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གསར་འགོད་ཀྱི་ལུགས་སྔོན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་སྟོན་ཡོད། We developed a n XGBoost based system which uses character and word level n-gram features represented using TF-IDF, count vector based correlation matrix, and predicts if an input news article is a hyperpartisan news article. ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་དབྱིབས་རྩོལ་སྒྲིག་མཁན་གྱི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གིས་68.3%རྒྱ་ཚད་ལེན་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབུགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་BuzzFeed corpus་ལ་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་བྱས་ནས་XGBoost རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Dick-Preston and Morbo at SemEval-2019 Task 4 : Transfer Learning for Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'ar': 'ديك بريستون وموربو في مهمة SemEval-2019 4: نقل التعلم لاكتشاف الأخبار شديدة الحزبية', 'pt': 'Dick-Preston e Morbo na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 4: Transferência de Aprendizagem para Detecção de Notícias Hiperpartidárias', 'fr': 'Dick-Preston et Morbo au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 4\xa0: Apprentissage par transfert pour la détection hyperpartisane des actualités', 'es': 'Dick-Preston y Morbo en la Tarea 4 de SemEval-2019: Transferir el aprendizaje para la detección de noticias hiperpartidistas', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のDick - PrestonとMorboタスク4 ：ハイパーパーパーティサンニュース検出のための転送学習', 'zh': 'Dick-Preston与Morbo在SemEval-2019务4:超党新闻检者迁学', 'ru': 'Дик-Престон и Морбо на SemEval-2019 Задача 4: Передача обучения для обнаружения гиперпартийных новостей', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 4 पर डिक-प्रेस्टन और मॉर्बो: हाइपरपार्टिसन समाचार का पता लगाने के लिए स्थानांतरण सीखना', 'ga': 'Dick-Preston agus Morbo ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 4: Foghlaim a Aistriú le haghaidh Braite Nuachta Hyperpartisan', 'el': 'Ντικ-Πρέστον και Μόρμπο στο έργο 4: Μεταφορά Μάθησης για την Ανίχνευση Υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων', 'ka': 'Dick-Preston და Morbo semiEval-2019 მოქმედება 4: ჰიპერპორტისანის განახლებისთვის გასწავლება', 'hu': 'Dick-Preston és Morbo a SemEval-2019 4. feladat: Transzfer tanulás hiperpartizán hírek felismerése', 'it': 'Dick-Preston e Morbo al SemEval-2019 Task 4: Transfer Learning per il rilevamento di notizie iperpartigiane', 'lt': 'Dick-Preston and Morbo at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Transfer Learning for Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'kk': 'Дик- Престон және Морбо жарым- 2019 тапсырмасында 4- тапсырма: Hyperpartisan жаңалықтарды анықтау үшін оқыту', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 4- ല്\u200d ഡിക്ക്- പ്രെസ്റ്റോണും മോര്\u200dബോയും: ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസാന്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്ത ഡിറ്റീഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Dick-Preston u Morbo fis-SemEval-2019 Kompitu 4: Tagħlim tat-Trasferiment għad-Detezzjoni tal-Aħbarijiet Iperkartisani', 'mn': 'Дик-Престон болон Морбо SemEval-2019 Тапсыг 4: Хиперпартизан мэдээллийн нээлттэй Трансфер суралцах', 'no': 'Dick-Preston og Morbo på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 4: Overføringslæring for Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'pl': 'Dick-Preston i Morbo na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 4: Transfer Learning dla wykrywania hiperpartyjnych wiadomości', 'ro': 'Dick-Preston și Morbo la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 4: Transfer Learning pentru detectarea știrilor hiperpartizane', 'sr': 'Dick-Preston i Morbo na semiEval-2019 zadatku 4: Naučenje prijenosa za hiperpartisan novine', 'mk': 'Дик-Престон и Морбо на SemEval-2019 задача 4: Трансферско учење за детекција на хиперпартисански вести', 'si': 'Name', 'ms': 'Dick-Preston dan Morbo di SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Pemindahan Belajar untuk Pengesanan Berita Hyperpartisan', 'so': 'Dick-Preston and Morbo at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Transfer Learning for Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 4: Hyperpartisan செய்தியை கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான மாற்றுக', 'sv': 'Dick-Preston och Morbo på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 4: Överföring av lärande för hyperpartisan Nyhetsdetektion', 'ur': 'دیک-پرستون اور موربو سیم ایول-2019 ٹاکس ۴ میں: ہیپر پارٹیسان خبروں کی آشنائی کے لئے ترنسفر سیکھنا', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifa 4: Hyperpartisan yangiliklarini aniqlash uchun Transfer Learn', 'vi': 'Dick-Preston và Morco tại Semkhai-2009 Task 4: truyền học cho trinh sát tin tức du liệt.', 'hr': 'Dick-Preston i Morbo na semiEval-2019 zadatku 4: Naučenje prijenosa za otkrivanje Hyperpartisan vijesti', 'de': 'Dick-Preston und Morbo bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 4: Transfer Learning zur hyperparteiischen Nachrichtenerkennung', 'bg': 'Дик-Престън и Морбо на Задача 4: Трансферно обучение за откриване на хиперпартизани новини', 'nl': 'Dick-Preston en Morbo bij SemEval-2019 Taak 4: Transfer Learning voor hyperpartisane nieuwsdetectie', 'da': 'Dick-Preston og Morbo på SemEval-2019 Opgave 4: Overførsel af læring til hyperpartisan Nyhedsdetektion', 'fa': 'Dick-Preston and Morbo at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Transfer Learning for Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'id': 'Dick-Preston dan Morbo di SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Transfer Learning for Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'sw': 'Dick-Preston na Morbo katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 4: Kusoma Ufunzi kwa Kutambua Habari za Hyperpartisan', 'tr': 'Dick-Preston and Morbo at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Transfer Learning for Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'af': 'Dick-Preston en Morbo by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 4: Oordrag leer vir Hyperpartisan Nuusdeteksie', 'ko': 'Dick Preston과 Morbo가Sem Eval-19 임무4: 초당파 뉴스 검측의 이전 학습', 'sq': 'Dick-Preston dhe Morbo në SemEval-2019 Task 4: Transfer Learning for Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'am': 'Dick-Preston and Morbo at SemEval-2019 ስራ 4: Transfer Learn for Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯-এর কাজ ৪: হাইপার্পার্টিস্যান নিউজ ডিটেক্টরের জন্য ট্রান্সফারেন্স শিক্ষা', 'hy': 'Dick-Preston and Morbo at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Transfer Learning for Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'bs': 'Dick-Preston i Morbo na semiEval-2019 Task 4: Naučenje prijenosa za detekciju novina hiperpartisan', 'et': 'Dick-Preston ja Morbo SemEval-2019 ülesandel 4: siirdeõpe hüperpartisanide uudiste tuvastamiseks', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 G칬z톛l 4: Hyperpartisan Haber Detection 칲칞칲n 칐yr톛nm톛 칐yr톛nm톛si', 'cs': 'Dick-Preston a Morbo na SemEval-2019 Úkol 4: Transfer učení pro detekci hyperstranických zpráv', 'ca': 'Dick-Preston i Morbo a SemEval-2019 Task 4: Transfer Learning for Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'fi': 'Dick-Preston ja Morbo SemEval-2019 Task 4: Transfer Learning for Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'jv': 'Dik-Preston lan Marbo nang seminval-2011 task 4: transfer Learning for Typerpartisan New detection', 'ha': 'Dick-Preston and Morbo at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Transfer Learning for Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'sk': 'Dick-Preston in Morbo na SemEval-2019 naloga 4: prenosno učenje za odkrivanje hiperpartizanskih novic', 'he': 'דיק-פרסטון ומורבו בסמיוול-2019 משימה 4: לימוד העברה לגלות חדשות היפרפרטיזן', 'bo': 'Dick-Preston and Morbo at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Transfer Learning for Hyperpartisan News Detection'}
{'en': 'In a world of information operations, influence campaigns, and fake news, classification of news articles as following hyperpartisan argumentation or not is becoming increasingly important. We present a deep learning-based approach in which a pre-trained language model has been fine-tuned on domain-specific data and used for classification of news articles, as part of the SemEval-2019 task on hyperpartisan news detection. The suggested approach yields accuracy and F1-scores around 0.8 which places the best performing classifier among the top-5 systems in the competition.', 'ar': 'في عالم العمليات المعلوماتية ، وحملات التأثير ، والأخبار المزيفة ، أصبح تصنيف المقالات الإخبارية على أنها تتبع الجدل الحزبي أم لا ذا أهمية متزايدة. نقدم نهجًا قائمًا على التعلم العميق حيث تم ضبط نموذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا على البيانات الخاصة بالمجال واستخدامه لتصنيف المقالات الإخبارية ، كجزء من مهمة SemEval-2019 الخاصة باكتشاف الأخبار الحزبية. ينتج عن النهج المقترح دقة ونتائج F1 حوالي 0.8 مما يضع المصنف الأفضل أداءً بين أفضل 5 أنظمة في المنافسة.', 'es': 'En un mundo de operaciones de información, campañas de influencia y noticias falsas, cada vez es más importante clasificar los artículos de noticias según la argumentación hiperpartidista o no. Presentamos un enfoque basado en el aprendizaje profundo en el que se ha ajustado un modelo de lenguaje previamente entrenado en datos específicos del dominio y se utiliza para la clasificación de artículos de noticias, como parte de la tarea Semeval-2019 sobre la detección hiperpartidista de noticias. El enfoque sugerido produce una precisión y puntuaciones de F1 de alrededor de 0.8, lo que coloca al clasificador con mejor rendimiento entre los 5 mejores sistemas de la competencia.', 'fr': "Dans un monde d'opérations d'information, de campagnes d'influence et de fake news, la classification des articles de presse selon qu'ils suivent ou non une argumentation hyperpartisane devient de plus en plus importante. Nous présentons une approche basée sur le deep learning dans laquelle un modèle de langage pré-formé a été affiné sur des données spécifiques à un domaine et utilisé pour la classification des articles de presse, dans le cadre de la tâche SEMEVAL-2019 sur la détection hyperpartisane des actualités. L'approche suggérée donne une précision et des scores F1 autour de 0,8, ce qui place le classificateur le plus performant parmi les 5 meilleurs systèmes de la compétition.", 'pt': 'Em um mundo de operações de informação, campanhas de influência e notícias falsas, a classificação de artigos de notícias como seguindo ou não argumentação hiperpartidária está se tornando cada vez mais importante. Apresentamos uma abordagem baseada em aprendizado profundo em que um modelo de linguagem pré-treinado foi ajustado em dados específicos de domínio e usado para classificação de artigos de notícias, como parte da tarefa SemEval-2019 sobre detecção de notícias hiperpartidárias. A abordagem sugerida produz precisão e pontuações F1 em torno de 0,8, o que coloca o classificador com melhor desempenho entre os 5 principais sistemas da competição.', 'ja': '情報操作、影響キャンペーン、フェイクニュースの世界では、ニュース記事を超党派の議論に従うか従わないかの分類がますます重要になってきています。私たちは、超党派ニュース検出に関するSemEval -2019タスクの一部として、事前にトレーニングされた言語モデルがドメイン固有のデータで微調整され、ニュース記事の分類に使用されている深層学習ベースのアプローチを提示します。提案されたアプローチは、精度を生み出し、F 1スコアは0.8前後であり、競合他社の上位5つのシステムの中で最高のパフォーマンスを発揮する分類子を配置します。', 'zh': '一息操作,影响力动假新闻世,归新闻文章为循超党派论证转重。 设深学之法,其预训语言模形已微特定领域之数,施于新闻文之类,以为SemEval-2019超党新闻检之一体。 议法生精F1得分约为0.8,此性之最佳者,为竞前5之统。', 'hi': 'सूचना संचालन, प्रभाव अभियानों और नकली समाचारों की दुनिया में, हाइपरपार्टिसन तर्क के बाद या नहीं के रूप में समाचार लेखों का वर्गीकरण तेजी से महत्वपूर्ण होता जा रहा है। हम एक गहरी सीखने-आधारित दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं जिसमें एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल को डोमेन-विशिष्ट डेटा पर ठीक किया गया है और समाचार लेखों के वर्गीकरण के लिए उपयोग किया जाता है, हाइपरपार्टिजन समाचार का पता लगाने पर SemEval-2019 कार्य के हिस्से के रूप में। सुझाए गए दृष्टिकोण से सटीकता और एफ 1-स्कोर 0.8 के आसपास उत्पन्न होता है जो प्रतियोगिता में शीर्ष -5 प्रणालियों के बीच सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन करने वाले क्लासिफायर को रखता है।', 'ru': 'В мире информационных операций, кампаний влияния и фейковых новостей все большее значение приобретает классификация новостных статей как следующих гиперпартийной аргументации или нет. Мы представляем подход, основанный на глубоком обучении, в котором предварительно обученная языковая модель была доработана на конкретных данных домена и использовалась для классификации новостных статей, как часть задачи SemEval-2019 по гиперпартийному обнаружению новостей. Предлагаемый подход дает точность и F1-оценку около 0,8, что ставит лучший классификатор в топ-5 систем в конкурсе.', 'ga': 'I ndomhan oibríochtaí faisnéise, feachtais tionchair, agus nuacht bhréige, tá sé ag éirí níos tábhachtaí ailt nuachta a rangú mar a leanann argóintí hipearpháirteacha nó nach leanann. Cuirimid cur chuige atá bunaithe ar fhoghlaim dhomhain i láthair ina ndéantar mionchoigeartú ar mhúnla teanga réamh-oilte ar shonraí a bhaineann go sonrach leis an bhfearann agus inar úsáideadh é chun ailt nuachta a rangú, mar chuid de thasc SemEval-2019 ar bhrath nuachta hipearpháirteach. Cruthaíonn an cur chuige molta cruinneas agus scóir F1 thart ar 0.8 rud a chuireann an t-aicmitheoir is fearr i measc na 5 chóras is fearr sa chomórtas.', 'el': 'Σε έναν κόσμο των επιχειρήσεων πληροφόρησης, των εκστρατειών επιρροής και των ψευδών ειδήσεων, η ταξινόμηση των άρθρων ειδήσεων ως ακολούθων υπερκομματικών επιχειρημάτων ή όχι γίνεται όλο και πιο σημαντική. Παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση βασισμένη στη βαθιά μάθηση στην οποία ένα προ-εκπαιδευμένο γλωσσικό μοντέλο έχει προσαρμοστεί σε συγκεκριμένα δεδομένα τομέα και χρησιμοποιείται για την ταξινόμηση άρθρων ειδήσεων, ως μέρος της εργασίας για την ανίχνευση υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων. Η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση αποδίδει ακρίβεια και βαθμολογίες γύρω από το 0.8, γεγονός που τοποθετεί τον καλύτερο βαθμολογητή ανάμεσα στα κορυφαία 5 συστήματα στον διαγωνισμό.', 'hu': 'Az információs műveletek, befolyásolási kampányok és hamis hírek világában egyre fontosabbá válik a hírek besorolása hiperpartizán érvelést követő vagy sem. Egy olyan mélytanuláson alapuló megközelítést mutatunk be, amelyben egy előre képzett nyelvi modellt finomhangoltunk a domain-specifikus adatokra és használtunk a hírek osztályozására a SemEval-2019 hiperpartizán hírek felismerésével foglalkozó feladat részeként. A javasolt megközelítés pontosságot és F1 pontszámot eredményez 0,8 körül, ami a legjobb teljesítményű osztályozót helyezi a verseny 5 legjobb rendszere közé.', 'ka': 'ინფორმაციის პერაციაციის მსოფლიოში, კამპანიების შესახებ და ტალქტური ინფორმაციების კლასიფიკაცია, ახალგაზრულების კონფიკაცია, როგორც ახალგაზრულების შემდეგ ჰიპერპ ჩვენ მივიღეთ ძალიან სწავლის მიზეზი პროგრამა, რომელიც წინ სწავლილი ენის მოდელის მონაცემებზე სპექტიფიკური მონაცემებზე გამოყენებულია და გამოყენებულია ინფორმაციის მონაცემების კლასიფიკაციაში, როგ ოპველჲზვნთწრ ოპთლთფაი თჱეყლზაგა ოპაგთლნჲჟრ თ F1-ჟოაპრთრვ ჲკჲლჲ 0,8, კჲთრჲ ნაი-ეჲბპთწრ კლაჟთტვპ ჱაეყლზაგა ნაი-ეჲბპთწრ კლაჟთტვპ', 'it': "In un mondo di operazioni di informazione, campagne di influenza e fake news, la classificazione degli articoli di notizie come segue o meno argomentazioni iperpartigiane sta diventando sempre più importante. Presentiamo un approccio basato sul deep learning in cui un modello linguistico pre-addestrato è stato perfezionato su dati specifici del dominio e utilizzato per la classificazione degli articoli di notizie, nell'ambito del compito SemEval-2019 sul rilevamento delle notizie iperpartigiane. L'approccio proposto produce precisione e F1-punteggi intorno a 0,8 che colloca il classificatore più performante tra i primi 5 sistemi della competizione.", 'kk': 'Мәлімет операцияларының әлемінде кампанияларына, жалғыз жаңалықтарды, жаңалық мақалаларын гиперпартияның аргументациясына келесі ретінде салыстыру немесе өте маңызды болмайды. Біз оқытуға негізделген тәртібін таңдаймыз. Алдын- ала оқыту тіл үлгісі доменге ерекше деректерге дұрыс түзетілген, және жаңалық мақалаларды шектеу үшін қолданылады. HalfEval-2019 тапсырмасының бірінші бөл Келтірілген тәсілі 0,8 тоқтағы дұрыс және F1- нұсқалары бар, бұл тәсіліктің жоғары 5 жүйелердің ең жақсы классификаторын орнатады.', 'lt': 'Informacinių operacijų, įtakos kampanijoms ir suklastotoms naujienoms pasaulyje naujienų straipsnių klasifikavimas kaip po hiperpartinių argumentų arba tampa vis svarbesnis. Pateikiame giliai mokymosi pagrindu grindžiamą metodą, pagal kurį iš anksto parengtas kalbos modelis buvo tiksliai pritaikytas prie konkrečios srities duomenų ir naudojamas naujienų straipsnių klasifikavimui, kaip dalis SemEval-2019 užduoties dėl hiperpartiško naujienų aptikimo. Siūlomas metodas rodo tikslumą ir F1 rezultatus apie 0,8, todėl geriausiai veikiantys klasifikatoriai konkuruoja tarp geriausių 5 sistemų.', 'mk': 'Во светот на информациски операции, кампањите на влијание и лажни вести, класификацијата на вести како следење на хиперпартиските аргументи или не станува сé важна. We present a deep learning-based approach in which a pre-trained language model has been fine-tuned on domain-specific data and used for classification of news articles, as part of the SemEval-2019 task on hyperpartisan news detection.  The suggested approach yields accuracy and F1-scores around 0.8 which places the best performing classifier among the top-5 systems in the competition.', 'ms': 'In a world of information operations, influence campaigns, and fake news, classification of news articles as following hyperpartisan argumentation or not is becoming increasingly important.  Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan berdasarkan belajar yang mendalam di mana model bahasa yang dilatih-dilatih telah disesuaikan dengan baik pada data khusus domain dan digunakan untuk klasifikasi artikel berita, sebagai sebahagian dari tugas SemEval-2019 untuk pengesan berita hyperpartisan. Pendekatan yang disarankan memberikan ketepatan dan skor-F1 sekitar 0.8 yang menempatkan pengklasifikasi prestasi terbaik di antara sistem top-5 dalam pertandingan.', 'ml': 'വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ ലോകത്തില്\u200d, പ്രഭാവങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും, കള്ള വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200dക്കും, ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസ്സാന്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ പിന്നാലെ വാ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കാനുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള ഒരു മാതൃകയുണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d മുന്\u200dപ് പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷയുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d വിശിഷ് നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന പ്രോഗ്രാന്തിയുടെ അടുത്തുള്ള പ്രക്രിയയും എഫ്\u200c1 സ്കോര്\u200d പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമാക്കുന്നു. അത് പ്രതിയോ', 'mt': 'F’dinja ta’ operazzjonijiet ta’ informazzjoni, kampanji ta’ influwenza, u a ħbarijiet foloz, il-klassifikazzjoni ta’ oġġetti tal-aħbarijiet bħala wara argumentazzjoni iperpartizjana jew mhux qed issir dejjem aktar importanti. Aħna nippreżentaw approċċ profond ibbażat fuq it-tagħlim li fih mudell lingwistiku mħarreġ minn qabel ġie a ġġustat bir-reqqa fuq dejta speċifika għad-dominju u użat għall-klassifikazzjoni tal-artikoli tal-aħbarijiet, bħala parti mill-kompitu SemEval-2019 dwar id-detezzjoni tal-aħbarijiet iperpartiġjani. L-approċċ issuġġerit jagħti preċiżjoni u punteġġi F1 madwar 0.8 li jpoġġi l-klassifikatur bl-aħjar prestazzjoni fost l-aqwa ħames sistemi fil-kompetizzjoni.', 'mn': 'Мэдээллийн үйл ажиллагааны ертөнцөд, кампанийг нөлөөлдөг, хуурамч мэдээ, мэдээллийн баримтуудыг гипер хэсгүүдийн тухай хуваалцах эсвэл илүү чухал болдог. Бид суралцах сургалтын үндсэн арга замыг тайлбарлаж өгөгдлийн тодорхой мэдээлэл дээр суралцаж, мэдээлэл баримтуудын хэлбэрээр SemEval-2019 оны ажлын нэг хэсэг болсон. Энэ санал дэвшүүлсэн арга нь 0.8 тойрог тохиромжтой болон F1-н тойромжтой хэмжээсүүд юм. Энэ нь өрсөлдөөнд хамгийн дээд 5 системийн хамгийн сайн ажиллах хэмжээсүүд байдаг.', 'pl': 'W świecie operacji informacyjnych, kampanii wpływowych i fake news, klasyfikacja artykułów wiadomościowych jako następujących argumentacji hiperpartyjnych lub nie staje się coraz ważniejsza. Prezentujemy podejście oparte na głębokim uczeniu, w ramach którego wstępnie przeszkolony model językowy został dostrojony na danych specyficznych dla domeny i wykorzystywany do klasyfikacji artykułów wiadomościowych, w ramach zadania SemEval-2019 dotyczącego wykrywania wiadomości hiperpartyjnych. Proponowane podejście daje dokładność i wyniki F1 około 0,8, co umieszcza najlepszą klasyfikację wśród najlepszych systemów w konkursie.', 'ro': 'Într-o lume a operațiunilor de informare, campaniilor de influență și știrilor false, clasificarea articolelor de știri ca urmare a argumentării hiperpartizane sau nu devine din ce în ce mai importantă. Prezentăm o abordare bazată pe învățare profundă, în care un model lingvistic pre-instruit a fost reglat fin pe date specifice domeniului și utilizat pentru clasificarea articolelor de știri, ca parte a sarcinii SemEval-2019 privind detectarea știrilor hiperpartizane. Abordarea sugerată oferă acuratețe și F1-scoruri în jurul valorii de 0,8, ceea ce plasează cel mai performant clasificator printre primele 5 sisteme din competiție.', 'no': 'I eit verda med informasjonsoperasjonar, påvirkar kampanjonar, og falske nyhetar, klassifisering av nyttikler som følgjande hyperpartisan-argumentasjon eller ikkje blir viktig. Vi presenterer ein dyp læringsbasert tilnærming der ein først læringsspråk-modell har blitt fint oppsett på domenespesifikke data og brukt for klassifisering av nye artiklar, som del av semiEval-2019-oppgåva om hyperpartisan news-oppdaging. Dette tilgjengelege tilnærminga gjer nøyaktighet og F1- poeng rundt 0,8 som plasserer den beste utføringsglassifiseren mellom dei øvste 5- systema i konkurransen.', 'si': 'තොරතුරු වැඩසටහන් ලෝකයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ බොහොම වාර්තාවක්, වාර්තාවක් වැඩසටහන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්නේ න අපි ගොඩක් ඉගෙනීම් අධාරිත ප්\u200dරවේශයක් පෙන්වන්නේ, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරපු භාෂාවක් මොඩේන් විශේෂ දත්තේ හොඳ සැකසුම් කරලා තියෙන්නේ, සම ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට හරියටම සහ F1-ස්කෝර් 0.8 වටිනවා, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට පද්ධති 5 පද්ධතියේ හොඳම ව', 'so': 'In a world of information operations, influence campaigns, and fake news, classification of news articles as following hyperpartisan argumentation or not is becoming increasingly important.  Waxaan keenaynaa qaab aad u weyn oo waxbarasho ah, kaas oo lagu sameynayo model afka hore oo lagu bartay macluumaad gaar ah oo domain-specific ah, waxaana loo isticmaalaa fasaxa warqadaha warbixinta, sida qayb ka mid ah shaqada SemEval-2019 oo ku saabsan heshiiska macluumaadka ee hyperpartisan. Dhaqdhaqaaqa la soo jeeday waxay soo bixisaa saxda iyo kooxda F1 oo ku dhow 0.8, taasoo lagu dhigaa fasaxa ugu wanaagsan nidaamka ugu sarreeya 5 nidaamka.', 'sr': 'U svijetu informacionih operacija, utiču na kampanje i lažne vijesti, klasifikacija novinskih članaka kao slijedeća hiperpartizanska argumentacija ili ne postaje sve važnije. Predstavljamo dubok pristup na učenju u kojem je predobučeni jezički model ispravno određen na specifičnim podacima domena i koristio se za klasifikaciju novinskih članaka, kao deo zadatka semiEval-2019 o otkrivanju hiperpartizanskih novina. Predloženi pristup pruža tačnost i F1 rezultate oko 0,8, koje postavlja najbolji izvršni klasifikator među najvišim 5 sistemima u konkurenciji.', 'sv': 'I en värld av informationsverksamhet, influensekampanjer och fake news, klassificering av nyhetsartiklar som följer hyperpartisan argumentation eller inte blir allt viktigare. Vi presenterar ett djupinlärningsbaserat tillvägagångssätt där en färdigutbildad språkmodell har finjusterats på domänspecifik data och använts för klassificering av nyhetsartiklar, som en del av SemEval-2019-uppgiften om hyperpartisan nyhetsdetektering. Det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet ger noggrannhet och F1-poäng runt 0,8 vilket placerar den bäst presterande klassificeraren bland de 5 bästa systemen i tävlingen.', 'ta': 'தகவல் செயல்பாடுகளின் உலகத்தில், விளைவாக்குதல், பொய் செய்திகள் மற்றும் பொய்யான செய்திகளின் வகைப்படுத்தல், அதிக முக்கியமான வார்த்தைகள நாம் ஒரு ஆழமான கற்றல் அடிப்படையிலான முன்பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட மொழி மாதிரி ஒரு முன்பு பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது டோமைன் குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல் மீது நன்றாக துண்டிக் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாடு சரியான மற்றும் F1- மதிப்பெண்கள் 0. 8 ஆகும். இது மேல்- 5 முறைமைகளில் சிறந்த செயல்பாட்டு வகுப்ப', 'ur': 'خبرتی عملیات کے دنیا میں، کمپینڈ کی تاثیر کرتا ہے، اور جھوٹی خبر، خبرتی لاکھوں کی کلیسی کرتا ہے جیسے ہایرپارٹیسمن کی بحث کے پیچھے یا زیادہ اہم نہیں ہوتا۔ ہم ایک عمیق سیکھنے کی بنیادی طریقہ پیش آموزش کی زبان موڈل کو ڈومین کے خاص ڈیٹے پر خوب تنظیم کیا گیا ہے اور نیویس لکھنے کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا ہے، ہائیپر پارٹیسون نیویس شناسی کے ذریعے سیم Eval-2019 کا ایک حصہ۔ پیشنهاد کی تقریبا 0.8 کے ارتفاع میں صحیح اور F1-اسکوروں کا ثابت ہوتا ہے جو سب سے بہترین کاربردار کو مسابقات میں چھوڑ دیتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Maʼlumotlar amallar dunyoda, kampeni, falsk xabar va xabar tarkibini hyperpartisan talabatlarini keyin tarjima qilish yoki juda muhim bo'lmaydi. Biz juda o'rganish asosiy o'rganish usulini hozir qildik. Bu tildan oldin o'rganish modeli domen-specific maʼlumot bilan yaxshi o'xshash bo'lgan va xabar maqolalarini tahrirlash uchun ishlatiladi. SemEval-2019, hyperpartisan news aniqlashning vazifasi bir qismi. Talab qilingan usul esa 0.8 dan foydalanuvchi F1 qiymatga tayyorlaydi. Bu muammolarning yuqori-5 tizimidagi eng eng yaxshi darajasini boshlaydi.", 'vi': 'Trong một thế giới của các thao tác thông tin, các chiến dịch ảnh hưởng, và tin giả tạo, việc phân loại các bài báo như theo các bài nghiên cứu du kích hay không đang trở nên quan trọng. Chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp dựa trên học sâu, trong đó một mô hình ngôn ngữ được đào tạo kỹ lưỡng được chỉnh sửa cẩn thận trên các dữ liệu đặc trưng miền và được dùng để phân loại các bài báo, như một phần trong nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 9 về việc phát hiện tin tức cao du kích. Cách tiếp cận đề nghị cung cấp độ chính xác và số F1-điểm quanh 0.8, nơi phân loại có trình độ cao nhất đặt trong các hệ thống đỉnh-5 trong cuộc thi.', 'nl': 'In een wereld van informatieoperaties, beïnvloedingscampagnes en fake news wordt het classificeren van nieuwsberichten als volgt op hyperpartisane argumentatie of niet steeds belangrijker. We presenteren een deep learning-gebaseerde aanpak waarbij een vooraf getraind taalmodel is verfijnd op domeinspecifieke gegevens en gebruikt voor classificatie van nieuwsberichten, als onderdeel van de SemEval-2019 taak over hyperpartizane nieuwsdetectie. De voorgestelde aanpak levert nauwkeurigheid en F1-scores rond 0,8 op, wat de best presterende classificator plaatst onder de top-5 systemen in de competitie.', 'bg': 'В свят на информационни операции, кампании за влияние и фалшиви новини класификацията на новинарските статии като следващи хиперпартизанска аргументация или не става все по-важна. Представяме подход, основан на дълбоко обучение, при който предварително обучен езиков модел е фино настроен върху специфични за домейна данни и използван за класификация на новинарски статии, като част от задачата за откриване на хиперпартизани новини. Предложеният подход дава точност и резултати около 0,8, което поставя най-добре представящия класификатор сред топ-5 системи в състезанието.', 'da': 'I en verden af informationsoperationer, indflydelseskampagner og fake news bliver klassificeringen af nyhedsartikler som følger hyperpartisan argumentation eller ej stadig vigtigere. Vi præsenterer en dyb læringsbaseret tilgang, hvor en forududdannet sprogmodel er blevet finjusteret på domænespecifikke data og brugt til klassificering af nyhedsartikler, som en del af SemEval-2019-opgaven om hyperpartisan nyhedsdetektion. Den foreslåede fremgangsmåde giver nøjagtighed og F1 scorer omkring 0,8, hvilket placerer den bedste klassificering blandt de 5 bedste systemer i konkurrencen.', 'hr': 'U svijetu informacionih operacija, utjecaju na kampanje i lažne vijesti, klasifikacija novinskih članaka kao slijedeća hiperpartizanska argumentacija ili ne postaje sve važnije. Predstavljamo dubok pristup na osnovu učenja u kojem je predobučeni jezički model ispravljen na specifičnim podacima domena i koristio se za klasifikaciju novinskih članaka, kao dio zadatka semiEval-2019 o otkrivanju hiperpartizanskih vijesti. Predloženi pristup pruža točnost i rezultate F1 oko 0,8, što stavlja najbolji učinkoviti klasifikator među najvišim 5 sustavima u natjecanju.', 'de': 'In einer Welt von Informationsoperationen, Einflusskampagnen und Fake News gewinnt die Klassifizierung von Nachrichtenartikeln als hyperparteiische Argumentation oder nicht an Bedeutung. Im Rahmen der SemEval-2019-Aufgabe zur hyperparteiischen Nachrichtenerkennung präsentieren wir einen Deep Learning-basierten Ansatz, bei dem ein vortrainiertes Sprachmodell auf domänenspezifischen Daten verfeinert und zur Klassifizierung von Nachrichtenartikeln verwendet wurde. Der vorgeschlagene Ansatz liefert Genauigkeit und F1-Punkte um 0,8, was den leistungsstärksten Klassifikator unter den Top-5-Systemen im Wettbewerb platziert.', 'ko': '정보 조작, 영향력 운동, 가짜 뉴스로 가득 찬 세계에서 뉴스 기사가 초당파 변론의 분류를 따르는지 여부가 점점 중요해지고 있다.우리는 깊이 있는 학습을 바탕으로 하는 방법을 제시했다. 그 중에서 미리 훈련된 언어 모델은 특정 분야의 데이터에 따라 미세하게 조정되었고 뉴스 기사의 분류에 사용되었다. 이것은SemEval-2019 초당파 뉴스 검측 임무의 일부분이다.권장하는 방법은 정밀도가 높고 F1 점수가 0.8 정도이며 성능이 가장 좋은 분류기를 경쟁 중인 5위 시스템에 두는 것이다.', 'fa': 'در دنیای عملیات اطلاعات، کمپانی\u200cها و خبرهای دروغ، فرقه\u200cبندی مجموعه\u200cهای اخبار به عنوان تعریف مجموعه\u200cهای هیپر پارتیسان، تأثیر می\u200cدهد، یا به شدت مهم\u200cتر نمی\u200cشود. ما روش عمیق یادگیری را نشان می دهیم که یک مدل زبان پیش آموزش بر اطلاعات ویژه\u200cهای دومین استفاده می\u200cشود و به عنوان بخشی از وظیفه semiEval-2019 در مورد شناسایی خبرهای هوپر پارتیسان استفاده می\u200cشود. این دستور پیشنهاد دقیقات و امتیاز F1 در حدود 0.8 ارائه می\u200cدهد که بهترین راهنمایی\u200cکننده\u200cای در سیستم\u200cهای بالا-5 در رقابت قرار می\u200cدهد.', 'id': 'In a world of information operations, influence campaigns, and fake news, classification of news articles as following hyperpartisan argumentation or not is becoming increasingly important.  Kami mempersembahkan pendekatan berdasarkan belajar yang mendalam di mana model bahasa yang dilatih-dilatih telah disesuaikan dengan baik pada data spesifik domain dan digunakan untuk klasifikasi artikel berita, sebagai bagian dari tugas SemEval-2019 pada deteksi berita hyperpartisan. pendekatan yang disarankan memberikan akurasi dan skor F1 sekitar 0,8 yang menempatkan klasifikasi prestasi terbaik diantara sistem top-5 dalam kompetisi.', 'sw': 'Katika ulimwengu wa shughuli za taarifa, ushawishi wa kampeni, na habari potofu, usambazaji wa makala za habari kama kufuatia mazungumzo yanayohusiana na watu wengi au hayajazidi kuwa muhimu. Tunaweza kutoa mbinu yenye msingi wa kujifunza, ambapo mwelekeo wa lugha iliyoendelea umekuwa na ujuzi mzuri wa taarifa maalum za ndani na kutumika kwa ajili ya kutangaza makala za habari, kama sehemu ya kazi ya SemEval-2019 kuhusu kutambuliwa kwa upande wa habari. Matokeo yaliyopendekezwa yanatoa ukweli na vipindi vya F1 takribani 0.8 ambavyo vinavyoweka vizuri zaidi katika mfumo wa juu-5 katika mashindano hayo.', 'af': "In 'n wêreld van inligting operasies, influens kampanye en falske nuus, klasifikasie van nuus artikels as volgende hyperpartisan argumentasie of nie word vermeerder belangrik nie. Ons stel 'n diep onderwerp-gebaseerde toegang waarin 'n vooraf-onderwerp taal model is fyn-tuned op domein-spesifieke data en gebruik word vir klasifikasie van nuusartikels, as deel van die SemEval-2019 taak op hiperpartisan nuusbeskrywing. Die voorgestelde toegang gee presies en F1-telling rondom 0.8 wat plaas die beste uitvoerde klassifiseerder tussen die boonste-5 stelsels in die samenskap.", 'tr': 'Maglumat işleriniň dünýäde, kampanýýalaryň we ýalňyş haberleri täsirleýär, täzelikler maňatynyň klasifikasy hiperpartisanyň tartışmagyna görä däldir ýa-da has möhüm bolup ýok. Biz özümizden öwrenmeli derin bir nusga görkezip otyrýarys. Öňki öwrenmeli dil nusgasyny domain-specific data we täzelikleriň klasifikasy üçin ullanýarys. SemEval-2019 täzelikleriniň bir bölegi bolsa hiperpartisan täzelikleri gözetlemegi üçin ullanýarys. Bu teklip eden ýagdaý 0.8 daşlyk we F1 sany 0.8 üstünde takyklaýar we 5 üst sistemalaryň arasynda gowy synplanlaýar.', 'hy': 'Ինֆորմացիոն գործողությունների աշխարհում ազդեցություն ունեն քարոզարշավներում և կեղծ նորություններում, նորությունների հոդվածների դասակարգումը համարվում է հիպերկայացի բանավեճերի հետևից կամ ոչ, դառնում է ավելի կարևոր: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք խորը ուսումնասիրության հիմնված մոտեցում, որտեղ նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելը լավ կազմակերպել է բնագավառի մասնավոր տվյալների վրա և օգտագործվել է նորությունների հոդվածների դասակարգման համար, որպես մաս ՍեմԷվալ 2019-ի հիպերկուսային նորությունների հայ Առաջարկված մոտեցումը ստանում է ճշգրտություն և F1-գնահատականներ՝ մոտ 0.8, ինչը տեղադրում է լավագույն արդյունավետ դասակարգիչը մրցակցության ամենալավ 5 համակարգերի մեջ:', 'sq': 'Në një botë të operacioneve të informacionit, fushatave të ndikimit dhe lajmeve të rreme, klasifikimi i artikujve të lajmeve si pas argumenteve hiperpartizane ose jo po bëhet gjithnjë e më i rëndësishëm. Ne paraqesim një qasje të thellë bazuar në mësim në të cilën një model gjuhësh të paratrajnuar është rregulluar mirë në të dhënat specifike në domeni dhe përdoret për klasifikimin e artikujve të lajmeve, si pjesë e detyrës SemEval-2019 për zbulimin e lajmeve hiperpartizane. Përqasja e sugjeruar jep saktësi dhe rezultate F1 rreth 0.8, gjë që vë klasifikuesin më të mirë me rezultate midis 5 sistemeve më të mirë në garë.', 'am': 'በሀገር መረጃ አቀማመጥ፣ የዘመቻ ዘመቻ እና የሐሰት ዜና፣ የዜና ጽሑፎች ክፍል፣ አፍሪፖርቲካዊ ግንኙነት በተከተለ ወይም በአደጋጋጋሚ ግንኙነት እንዳይሆን መግለጫ አይሆንም፡፡ ቀድሞ ተማሪ የቋንቋ ምሳሌ በዶሜን-specific ዳታ የተጠቃሚ እና የዜና ቃላትን ለመግለጽ የተጠቃሚ ጥያቄን እናደርጋለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት የ0.8 ነጥብ እና የF1 ነጥብ ትክክለኛ ነው፤ በዚህም ተቃውሞው በላይኛው-5 ሲስተካከል የበለጠ ትክክለኛውን ክፍል የሚያደርግ ነው።', 'ca': "In a world of information operations, influence campaigns, and fake news, classification of news articles as following hyperpartisan argumentation or not is becoming increasingly important.  Presentam un enfocament profund basat en l'aprenentatge en el qual un model de llenguatge pré-entrenat s'ha ajustat a dades específices per domini i s'ha utilitzat per classificar articles de notícies, com part de la tasca SemEval-2019 sobre la detecció hiperpartisan de notícies. L'enfocament suggerit produeix precisió i puntuacions F1 al voltant de 0,8, cosa que posa el classificador de millor rendiment entre els cinc millors sistemes de la competició.", 'bs': 'U svijetu informacionih operacija, utjecaju na kampanje i lažne vijesti, klasifikacija novinskih članaka kao slijedeća hiperpartizanska argumentacija ili ne postaje sve važnije. Predstavljamo dubok pristup na osnovu učenja u kojem je predobučeni jezički model ispravljen na specifičnim podacima domena i koristio se za klasifikaciju novinskih članaka, kao dio zadataka semiEval-2019 o otkrivanju hiperpartizanskih vijesti. Predloženi pristup pruža preciznost i F1 rezultate oko 0,8, koje postavlja najbolji izvršni klasifikator među najvišim 5 sistemima u konkurenciji.', 'az': 'Malümat operasyonların dünyasında, kampanya və sahte xəbərlər təsir edir, xəbər məktublarını hiperpartisan argumentasyonu ilə dəyişdirmək və ya daha da mövcuddur. Biz dərin öyrənmə təhsil edilmiş dil modeli domain-specific məlumatlarında təmizlənmiş və haber məlumatlarının klasifikasyonu üçün istifadə edilmiş halda, Hiperpartisan xəbərləri keşfetməsi üçün semiEval-2019 işin in bir parças ı olaraq təhsil edilmiş bir təhsil modeli göstəririk. Təsdiq edilən tərzim 0,8 ətrafında doğruluğu və F1 nöqtələrini təşkil edir ki, bu tərzdə ən yaxşı tərzdə 5 sistemlərin arasında ən yaxşısını təşkil edir.', 'bn': 'তথ্য অপারেশন, প্রভাবিত প্রচারণা এবং মিথ্যা সংবাদ, হাইপার্পার্টিস্যানিস্তান যুক্তি নিয়ে সংবাদ প্রবন্ধের পর সংবাদ প্রবন্ধের ব আমরা একটি গভীর শিক্ষা ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করেছি যেখানে প্রাক্তন প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেল ডোমেইন-নির্দিষ্ট তথ্যের উপর ভালোভাবে সুন্দর করা হয়েছে এবং সংবাদ প্র প্রস্তাবিত পদক্ষেপের ফলে প্রায় ০.', 'fi': 'Tiedotustoiminnan, vaikutuskampanjoiden ja valeuutisten maailmassa uutisartikkeleiden luokittelu hyperpartisaanisen argumentoinnin mukaisiksi tai ei-mukaisiksi on yhä tärkeämpää. Esittelemme syväoppimiseen perustuvan lähestymistavan, jossa esikoulutettua kielimallia on hiottu verkkotunnuskohtaiseen tietoon ja käytetty uutisartikkeleiden luokitteluun osana SemEval-2019 hyperpartisaanien uutisten havaitsemista koskevaa tehtävää. Ehdotettu lähestymistapa tuottaa tarkkuuden ja F1-pisteet noin 0,8, mikä asettaa parhaiten suoriutuneen luokittelijan kilpailun 5 parhaan järjestelmän joukkoon.', 'cs': 'Ve světě informačních operací, vlivných kampaní a falešných zpráv je klasifikace zpravodajských článků jako následující hyperstranickou argumentaci či nikoli stále důležitější. Představujeme přístup založený na hlubokém učení, v němž byl předškolený jazykový model doladěn na doménově specifických datech a použit pro klasifikaci zpravodajských článků, jako součást úlohy SemEval-2019 o detekci hyperstraněných zpráv. Navrhovaný přístup přináší přesnost a F1 skóre kolem 0,8, což umístí nejlepší klasifikátor mezi nejlepší pěti systémy v soutěži.', 'et': 'Infooperatsioonide, mõjukampaaniate ja valeuudiste maailmas muutub uudisartiklite klassifitseerimine hüperpartisansete argumentide järgimiseks või mitte üha olulisemaks. Tutvustame sügavõppepõhist lähenemisviisi, kus eelõpetatud keelemudelit on täpsustatud domeenispetsiifiliste andmete põhjal ja kasutatud uudisteartiklite klassifitseerimiseks osana SemEval-2019 ülesandest hüperpartisaansete uudiste tuvastamiseks. Soovitatud lähenemine annab täpsuse ja F1-skoori ligikaudu 0,8, mis asetab parima tulemusega klassifitseerija võistluse 5 parima süsteemi hulka.', 'jv': 'Nang barêng-barêng sing perusahaan informasi, mengkasakno kampanyen, lan luwih sing gak adhil, kelas alam sing perusahaan kelas nang cukup operasi sing dikarepaké perusahaan aleman sing apik dhéwé, or a mbok saiki akeh lanjut. We present a deep Learn-supported method in that a before-cured language model has been Fin-tuned on domain-special data and used for category of new Artiles, as parts of the semiinval-2011 task on caperpartisan media detection. Ndoleh sing paling nggawe geranglanggar kuwi kesempatan lan punika F1 sing paling 0.8 sing paling apik sing larang langgar sapa-5 sistem sing wis ana sakjane kanggo nguasai perusahaan langgar.', 'he': 'בעולם של מבצעי מידע, קמפיינות השפעה, וחדשות מזויפות, מסווג של מאמרים חדשות כעקב טיעון היפרפרטיזני או לא הופך חשוב יותר ויותר. אנחנו מציגים גישה עמוקה מבוססת על לימוד שבה דוגמא שפה מאומנת מראש התאימה על נתונים ספציפיים לתחום והשתמשה להקליטה של מאמרים חדשות, כחלק מהמשימה SemEval-2019 על גילוי חדשות היפרפטיות. הגישה המוצעת נותנת מדויקה ו-F1-נקודות בסביבות 0.8, מה שמסביר את המסגרת הכי טובה בין המערכות הכי טובות בתחרות.', 'sk': 'V svetu informacijskih operacij, vplivnih kampanj in lažnih novic postaja klasifikacija novičarskih člankov po hiperpartizanski argumenti ali ne vse pomembnejša. V okviru naloge SemEval-2019 o hiperpartizanskem odkrivanju novic predstavljamo pristop, ki temelji na globinskem učenju, pri katerem je bil predhodno usposobljen jezikovni model natančno nastavljen na podlagi domenskih podatkov in uporabljen za klasifikacijo novinarskih člankov. Predlagani pristop prinaša natančnost in rezultate F1 okoli 0,8, kar uvršča najboljši klasifikator med najboljše 5 sistemov v tekmovanju.', 'ha': 'A cikin wata duniya masu amfani da information, sai ta yi amfani da akan aiki, da kuma lãbãri na ƙarya, mai rarrabẽwa ga makala na lãbãri kamar sun bi muhimmin da ake yi wa muhimmada ko kuma bai zama mai ƙara muhimmin ba. Tuna halatar da wani matsayi mai ƙara da aka sanar da shi a kan wata misalin harshen da aka yi wa tunkuɗe wa masu tsari a danne-Domen da aka yi amfani da shi dõmin rarrabe masu takarda na takardar lãbãri, kamar rabin aikin SemEal-2019 a kan ganin maferpartsan news. Tsarin da aka buƙata, yana fitar da tsari na F1-score cire 0.8, wanda ke sanya mafi kyaun fassarar da shi a tsakanin-5 na ƙari.', 'bo': 'In a world of information operations, influence campaigns, and fake news, classification of news articles as following hyperpartisan argument or not becoming increasingly important. We present a deep learning-based approach in which a pre-trained language model has been fine-tuned on domain-specific data and used for classification of news articles, as part of the SemEval-2019 task on hyperpartisan news detection. དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་འགྲོ་བ་དེ་ཉིན་འགྱུར་བའི་ཚད་དང་ F1་འགྲེལ་གྱི་ཚད་0.8 སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཡོད། དེ་ནི་སྒྲུང་ཕྱོགས་ནང་གི་མཐོ་འགོད་པ་ལས་ཆ'}
{'en': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval-2019 Task 4 : The Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'ar': 'كلية هارفي مود في SemEval-2019 المهمة 4: جهاز كشف الأخبار الحزبي كلينت بوكانان', 'pt': 'Harvey Mudd College na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 4: Detector de notícias hiperpartidárias de Clint Buchanan', 'fr': 'Harvey Mudd College au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 4\xa0: Le détecteur de nouvelles hyperpartisan de Clint Buchanan', 'es': 'Tarea 4 de Harvey Mudd College en Semeval-2019: El detector hiperpartidista de noticias de Clint Buchanan', 'hi': 'हार्वे Mudd कॉलेज SemEval-2019 कार्य 4 में: क्लिंट बुकानन Hyperpartisan समाचार डिटेक्टर', 'zh': '哈维穆德学院在SemEval-20194:克林特·布坎南超党新闻探测器', 'ja': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval -2019タスク4 ：クリント・ブキャナン超党派ニュース検出器', 'ru': 'Колледж Харви Мадда в SemEval-2019 Задача 4: Гиперпартизанский детектор новостей Клинта Бьюкенена', 'ga': 'Coláiste Harvey Mudd ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 4: Brathadóir Nuachta Hyperpartisan Clint Buchanan', 'ka': 'ჰაპვი მუდი კოლეჯაში SemEval-2019 დავალება 4: კლინტი ბუკანან ჰიპერპორტიზანი ინფორმაციის დეტექტორი', 'hu': 'Harvey Mudd College a SemEval-2019 4. feladat: Clint Buchanan hiperpartizán hírek detektor', 'el': 'Κολλέγιο Harvey Mudd στο SemEval-2019 Εργασία 4: Ο Υπερκομματικός Ανιχνευτής ειδήσεων Clint Buchanan', 'kk': 'Харви Мудд колледжі жарым- 2019 жылы 4- тапсырма: Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'lt': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval-2019 Task 4: The Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'ms': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval-2019 Task 4: The Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'it': 'Harvey Mudd College al SemEval-2019 Task 4: Il rivelatore di notizie iperpartigiane Clint Buchanan', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 4-ല്\u200d ഹാര്\u200dവി മുഡ്ഡ് കോളേജ്: ക്ലിന്റ് ബച്ചന്\u200d ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസാന്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Харви Мудд коллежийн SemEval-2019 ажил 4: Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'mk': 'Харви Муд колеџ на SemEval-2019 задача 4: Хиперпартисанскиот новински детектор на Клинт Бјукенан', 'mt': 'Harvey Mudd College f’SemEval-2019 Task 4: The Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'no': 'Harvey Mudd College at semiEval-2019 Task 4: Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'ro': 'Colegiul Harvey Mudd la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 4: Detectorul de știri hiperpartizan Clint Buchanan', 'si': 'Harvey Mudd College at semeval-2019 Job 4: The Klint Buhanin Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'pl': 'Harvey Mudd College w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 4: Nadpartyjny detektor wiadomości Clinta Buchanana', 'sr': 'Harvey Mudd koledž na semiEvalu-2019. zadatak 4. Klint Buchanan Hyperpartisan News Detektor', 'so': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval-2019 Task 4: The Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'ta': 'செம்Eval-2019 பணி 4- ல் ஹார்வி முட்ட் கல்லூரி: கிளியன் புசானான் ஹைப்பர்பார்சின் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பான்', 'sv': 'Harvey Mudd College på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 4: Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'ur': 'ہروی مود کالج سیم ایول-2019 ٹاکس ۴ میں: کلینٹ بوچان ہیرپارٹیسان نیویس ڈیٹاکٹر', 'uz': 'SemEval-2019 Vazifa 4- yildagi Harvey Mudd College: Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'vi': 'Harvey Mudd College ở Semkhai ly-thẩm tê Task 4: Chi tiết kiệm tin tức Hyperdu côn', 'bg': 'Колежът Харви Мъд в Задача 4: Хиперпартизанският детектор на новините на Клинт Бюканън', 'da': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval-2019 Opgave 4: Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan Nyhedsdetektor', 'hr': 'Harvey Mudd koledž na semiEval-2019. zadatak 4: Detektor za novine Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan', 'nl': 'Harvey Mudd College bij SemEval-2019 Taak 4: De Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan Nieuws Detector', 'de': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 4: Der Clint Buchanan Hyperparteiische Nachrichtendetektor', 'id': 'Harvey Mudd College di SemEval-2019 Task 4: The Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'ko': '하비무드대학SemEval-2019임무4: 클린트 부칸난 초당파 뉴스탐지기', 'fa': 'کالج هاروی مود در ماموریت ۲۰۱۹ کار ۴: کارآگاه خبرهای کلینت بوچانان هیپر پارتیسان', 'sw': 'Chuo Kikuu cha Harvey Mudd katika SemEval-2019 Task 4: Mtetezi wa Habari za Kikundi Buchanan Hyperpartisan', 'tr': 'Harvey Mudd Koleji SemEval-2019 Görev 4: The Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan Haýsy Detector', 'sq': 'Harvey Mudd College në SemEval-2019 Task 4: Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'af': 'Harvey Mudd College by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 4: Die Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan Nuusdetektor', 'am': 'ስራ 4:', 'hy': 'Հարվի Մուդդի քոլեջը Սեմեվալ 2019 թ.-ի 4. հանձնարարությունը. Քլինտ Բյուքենանի հիպերպարտեզիանի նորությունների հայտնաբերողը', 'az': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৪-এ হার্ভি মুদ্দ কলেজ: ক্লায়েন্ট বুচনান হাইপার্পার্সিন নিউজ ডিটেক্টর', 'bs': 'Harvey Mudd koledž na semiEval-2019. zadatak 4: detektor novina Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan', 'ca': 'Harvey Mudd College a SemEval-2019 Task 4: The Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'et': 'Harvey Muddi Kolledž SemEval-2019 ülesanne 4: Clint Buchanani hüperpartisanide uudiste detektor', 'cs': 'Harvey Mudd College na SemEval-2019 Úkol 4: Clint Buchanan Hyperpartyzánní detektor zpráv', 'fi': 'Harvey Mudd College SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 4: Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'jv': 'Herveye Mudde kolèh nang semebal-2011 task 4: The Clit Buhann Hyerpartisan New detector', 'ha': 'Harve Mud College at SemEV-2019 Tafiyar 4: The Clant Bucanan Hyperpartsan News', 'bo': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval-2019 Task 4: The Clint Buchanan Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'he': "קולג' הארווי מוד בסמיוול-2019 משימה 4: חוקר חדשות היפרפרטיזן של קלינט בייקנן", 'sk': 'Harvey Mudd College na SemEval-2019 Naloga 4: Hiperpartizanski detektor novic Clinta Buchanana'}
{'en': 'We investigate the recently developed Bidi- rectional Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) model (Devlin et al. 2018) for the hyperpartisan news detection task. Using a subset of hand-labeled articles from SemEval as a validation set, we test the performance of different parameters for BERT models. We find that accuracy from two different BERT models using different proportions of the articles is consistently high, with our best-performing model on the validation set achieving 85 % accuracy and the best-performing model on the test set achieving 77 %. We further determined that our model exhibits strong consistency, labeling independent slices of the same article identically. Finally, we find that randomizing the order of word pieces dramatically reduces validation accuracy (to approximately 60 %), but that shuffling groups of four or more word pieces maintains an accuracy of about 80 %, indicating the model mainly gains value from local context.', 'fr': "Nous étudions le modèle BERT (Bidi- rectional Encoder Representations from Transformers) récemment développé (Devlin et al. 2018) pour la tâche de détection hyperpartisane de nouvelles. En utilisant un sous-ensemble d'articles étiquetés à la main de SemEval comme ensemble de validation, nous testons les performances de différents paramètres pour les modèles BERT. Nous constatons que la précision de deux modèles BERT différents utilisant des proportions différentes d'articles est constamment élevée, notre modèle le plus performant sur le jeu de validation atteignant 85\xa0% de précision et le modèle le plus performant sur l'ensemble de test atteignant 77\xa0%. Nous avons également déterminé que notre modèle présente une forte cohérence, en étiquetant les tranches indépendantes du même article de manière identique. Enfin, nous constatons que la randomisation de l'ordre des mots réduit considérablement la précision de la validation (à environ 60\xa0%), mais que le mélange de groupes de quatre mots ou plus maintient une précision d'environ 80\xa0%, ce qui indique que le modèle gagne principalement de la valeur dans le contexte local.", 'es': 'Investigamos el modelo Bidi- rectional Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) desarrollado recientemente (Devlin et al. 2018) para la tarea de detección hiperpartidista de noticias. Utilizando un subconjunto de artículos etiquetados a mano de SemEval como conjunto de validación, probamos el rendimiento de diferentes parámetros para los modelos BERT. Encontramos que la precisión de dos modelos BERT diferentes que utilizan diferentes proporciones de los artículos es consistentemente alta, con nuestro modelo de mejor rendimiento en el conjunto de validación que logra una precisión del 85% y el modelo de mejor rendimiento en el conjunto de prueba alcanza el 77%. Además, determinamos que nuestro modelo exhibe una fuerte consistencia, etiquetando las rebanadas independientes del mismo artículo de manera idéntica. Finalmente, encontramos que aleatorizar el orden de las palabras reduce drásticamente la precisión de la validación (hasta aproximadamente un 60%), pero que mezclar grupos de cuatro o más fragmentos de palabras mantiene una precisión de alrededor del 80%, lo que indica que el modelo gana valor principalmente del contexto local.', 'ar': 'نحن نحقق في تمثيلات التشفير ثنائية الاتجاه التي تم تطويرها مؤخرًا من نموذج المحولات (BERT) (Devlin et al. 2018) لمهمة الكشف عن الأخبار شديدة الحزبية. باستخدام مجموعة فرعية من المقالات ذات العلامات اليدوية من SemEval كمجموعة تحقق من الصحة ، نقوم باختبار أداء المعلمات المختلفة لنماذج BERT. وجدنا أن الدقة من نموذجين مختلفين من BERT باستخدام نسب مختلفة من المقالات عالية باستمرار ، حيث حقق نموذجنا الأفضل أداءً في مجموعة التحقق دقة 85٪ وأفضل نموذج أداء في مجموعة الاختبار حقق 77٪. لقد قررنا أيضًا أن نموذجنا يُظهر تناسقًا قويًا ، حيث يقوم بتسمية الشرائح المستقلة لنفس المقالة بشكل متماثل. أخيرًا ، وجدنا أن التوزيع العشوائي لترتيب قطع الكلمات يقلل بشكل كبير من دقة التحقق (إلى ما يقرب من 60٪) ، ولكن هذا الخلط بين المجموعات المكونة من أربع قطع كلمات أو أكثر يحافظ على دقة تبلغ حوالي 80٪ ، مما يشير إلى أن النموذج يكتسب قيمة بشكل أساسي من السياق المحلي.', 'pt': 'Investigamos o modelo Bidirecional Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) recentemente desenvolvido (Devlin et al. 2018) para a tarefa de detecção de notícias hiperpartidárias. Usando um subconjunto de artigos rotulados à mão do SemEval como um conjunto de validação, testamos o desempenho de diferentes parâmetros para modelos BERT. Descobrimos que a precisão de dois modelos BERT diferentes usando proporções diferentes dos artigos é consistentemente alta, com nosso modelo de melhor desempenho no conjunto de validação atingindo 85% de precisão e o modelo de melhor desempenho no conjunto de teste atingindo 77%. Determinamos ainda que nosso modelo apresenta forte consistência, rotulando fatias independentes do mesmo artigo de forma idêntica. Finalmente, descobrimos que randomizar a ordem das palavras reduz drasticamente a precisão da validação (para aproximadamente 60%), mas que embaralhar grupos de quatro ou mais palavras mantém uma precisão de cerca de 80%, indicando que o modelo ganha valor principalmente do contexto local.', 'ru': 'Мы исследуем недавно разработанную модель двунаправленных представлений кодировщика от трансформаторов (BERT) (Devlin et al. 2018) для задачи обнаружения гиперпартийных новостей. Используя подмножество меченых вручную изделий SemEval в качестве валидационного набора, мы тестируем производительность различных параметров для моделей BERT. Мы обнаружили, что точность двух разных моделей BERT с использованием различных пропорций изделий является неизменно высокой, при этом наша наиболее эффективная модель на наборе валидации достигает 85% точности, а наиболее эффективная модель на наборе испытаний достигает 77%. Мы также определили, что наша модель демонстрирует сильную консистенцию, одинаково маркируя независимые срезы одного и того же изделия. Наконец, мы обнаружили, что рандомизация порядка слов резко снижает точность проверки (примерно до 60%), но перемешивание групп из четырех или более слов поддерживает точность около 80%, указывая на то, что модель в основном получает значение из локального контекста.', 'ja': '私たちは、最近開発された超党派ニュース検出タスクのためのトランスフォーマー（ BERT ）モデル（ Devlin et al. 2018 ）からのBid - rectional Encoder Representationsを調査します。SemEvalの手書きラベルの付いた記事のサブセットを検証セットとして使用して、BERTモデルのさまざまなパラメータのパフォーマンスをテストします。異なる割合の物品を使用した2つの異なるBERTモデルからの精度は一貫して高く、検証セットで最高性能のモデルは85 ％の精度を達成し、テストセットで最高性能のモデルは77 ％を達成しています。さらに、我々のモデルが強い一貫性を示し、同じ物品の独立したスライスを同一に標識することを決定した。最後に、ワードピースの順序をランダム化すると、検証精度が劇的に低下することがわかります（約60%）。しかし、4つ以上のワードピースのグループをシャッフルすると、約80%の精度が維持され、モデルが主にローカルコンテキストから価値を得ることを示します。', 'hi': 'हम हाइपरपार्टिजन समाचार का पता लगाने के कार्य के लिए ट्रांसफॉर्मर (BERT) मॉडल (Devlin et al. 2018) से हाल ही में विकसित बीड़ी-रिक्शनल एनकोडर प्रतिनिधित्व की जांच करते हैं। एक सत्यापन सेट के रूप में SemEval से हाथ से लेबल लेखों के एक सबसेट का उपयोग करते हुए, हम BERT मॉडल के लिए विभिन्न मापदंडों के प्रदर्शन का परीक्षण करते हैं। हम पाते हैं कि लेखों के विभिन्न अनुपातों का उपयोग करके दो अलग-अलग BERT मॉडल से सटीकता लगातार उच्च है, सत्यापन सेट पर हमारे सबसे अच्छे प्रदर्शन वाले मॉडल के साथ 85% सटीकता प्राप्त करना और परीक्षण सेट पर सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन करने वाला मॉडल 77% प्राप्त करना। हमने आगे निर्धारित किया कि हमारा मॉडल मजबूत स्थिरता प्रदर्शित करता है, एक ही लेख के स्वतंत्र स्लाइस को समान रूप से लेबल करता है। अंत में, हम पाते हैं कि शब्द के टुकड़ों के क्रम को यादृच्छिक करने से नाटकीय रूप से सत्यापन सटीकता (लगभग 60% तक) कम हो जाती है, लेकिन चार या अधिक शब्द टुकड़ों के फेरबदल समूह लगभग 80% की सटीकता बनाए रखते हैं, यह दर्शाता है कि मॉडल मुख्य रूप से स्थानीय संदर्भ से मूल्य प्राप्त करता है।', 'zh': '臣等考近发自变形金刚(BERT)双向令编码器示(Devlin等,2018),施于超党新闻检。 用SemEval工标文子集为验集,试BERT模形异参数之性。 吾见比例之文二BERT其准确性素高,吾于验集上最佳者至于85%之准确率,而试集上之至者至于77%。 益定吾形之强一致性,同文之独切。 最后,见随机化单词片段次第大大降低验准确性(约为60%),而四或更多单词片段随机组约80%之准确性,此模形主于本地上下文中得直也。', 'ga': "Déanaimid imscrúdú ar an tsamhail Bidi- rectional Ionchódóra Léirithe ó Chlaochladáin (BERT) (Devlin et al. 2018) a forbraíodh le déanaí don tasc braite nuachta hyperpartisan. Ag baint úsáide as fo-thacar d'earraí lámh-lipéadaithe ó SemEval mar thacar bailíochtaithe, déanaimid tástáil ar fheidhmíocht paraiméadair éagsúla le haghaidh samhlacha BERT. Feicimid go bhfuil cruinneas ó dhá mhúnla BERT difriúla ag baint úsáide as comhréireanna difriúla de na hailt go comhsheasmhach ard, agus an tsamhail is fearr feidhmíochta ar an tacar bailíochtaithe ag baint amach cruinneas 85% agus an tsamhail is fearr feidhmíochta ar an tacar tástála ag baint amach 77%. Chinneamar freisin go léiríonn ár múnla comhsheasmhacht láidir, ag lipéadú slisní neamhspleácha den alt céanna go comhionann. Mar fhocal scoir, feicimid go laghdaíonn randamach ord na bpíosaí focal cruinneas bailíochtaithe go mór (go timpeall 60%), ach go gcoinníonn suaitheadh grúpaí de cheithre phíosa focal nó níos mó cruinneas de thart ar 80%, rud a léiríonn go mbaineann an tsamhail go príomha le luach ón gcomhthéacs áitiúil.", 'el': 'Ερευνούμε το πρόσφατα ανεπτυγμένο δικατευθυνόμενο μοντέλο κωδικοποιητών από μετασχηματιστές (κ.α.) για την υπερκομματική αποστολή ανίχνευσης ειδήσεων. Χρησιμοποιώντας ένα υποσύνολο χειροποίητων ετικετών από το ως σύνολο επικύρωσης, δοκιμάζουμε την απόδοση διαφορετικών παραμέτρων για μοντέλα BERT. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι η ακρίβεια από δύο διαφορετικά μοντέλα που χρησιμοποιούν διαφορετικές αναλογίες των άρθρων είναι σταθερά υψηλή, με το καλύτερο μοντέλο στο σύνολο επικύρωσης να επιτυγχάνει ακρίβεια 85% και το καλύτερο μοντέλο στο σύνολο δοκιμής να επιτυγχάνει 77%. Διαπιστώσαμε επίσης ότι το μοντέλο μας παρουσιάζει ισχυρή συνέπεια, επισημαίνοντας ανεξάρτητες φέτες του ίδιου άρθρου με ταυτόσημο τρόπο. Τέλος, διαπιστώνουμε ότι η τυχαιοποίηση της σειράς των κομματιών λέξεων μειώνει δραματικά την ακρίβεια επικύρωσης (περίπου 60%) αλλά ότι η ανακατανομή ομάδων τεσσάρων ή περισσότερων κομματιών λέξεων διατηρεί μια ακρίβεια περίπου 80%, υποδεικνύοντας ότι το μοντέλο αποκτά αξία κυρίως από το τοπικό πλαίσιο.', 'hu': 'A transzformátorokból származó Bidi-rektionális kódoló reprezentációk (BERT) modellt (Devlin et al. 2018) vizsgáljuk hiperpartizán hírek felismeréséhez. A SemEval kézzel jelölt cikkeinek egy részhalmazát használva validálási készletként teszteljük a BERT modellek különböző paramétereinek teljesítményét. Két különböző BERT modell pontosságának következetesen magas a pontossága, amelyek a termékek különböző arányait használják: a legjobb teljesítményű modellünk az érvényesítési készleten 85%-os pontosságot, a legjobb teljesítményű modellünk pedig a tesztkészleten 77%-os pontosságot ért el. Megállapítottuk továbbá, hogy modellünk erős konzisztenciát mutat, ugyanazon cikk független szeleteit azonos módon címkézve. Végül megállapítjuk, hogy a szódarabok sorrendjének véletlenszerűsítése jelentősen csökkenti az érvényesítési pontosságot (körülbelül 60%-ra), de hogy a négy vagy több szódarabot tartalmazó keverőcsoportok pontossága 80%-os marad, ami azt jelenti, hogy a modell főként helyi kontextusból nyer értéket.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ახლა განვითარებული Bidi- რექციონალური ინფორმაციის გამოსახულებების გამოსახულებების (BERT) მოდელზე (Devlin et al. 2018) ჰიპერპორტისანური ინფორმაციის განახულებაზე. SemEval-ის პრობლემეტრების სესბექტის გამოყენება როგორც გადაწყენება, ჩვენ განსხვავებული პარამეტრების გამოყენებას BERT მოდელებისთვის გამოყენებთ. ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ორი განსხვავებული BERT მოდელიდან განსხვავებული პროპორციების გამოყენება არსებობით უფრო მეტია, რომელიც ჩვენი უკეთესი მოდელის გამოყენება 85% წესია და უკეთესი მოდელის გამოყენება 77% წესია. ჩვენ დავიწყვიეთ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი იქნება ძალიან კონსტენსტურობას, რომელიც იგივე არსებულ არსებულ არსებულ ნაწილის ნიშნავს. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ სიტყვების ნაწილის შემდეგ ეპამატიკურად გავაკეთება სიტყვების ნაწილის შესაბამისი დამატებით (დამატებით 60%), მაგრამ ეს საშუალებული ჯგუფები ოთხი ან მეტი სიტყვების ნაწილის ნაწილი', 'it': "Investighiamo il modello BERT (Devlin et al. 2018) di recente sviluppo per il compito di rilevamento delle notizie iperpartigiane. Utilizzando un sottoinsieme di articoli etichettati a mano di SemEval come set di convalida, testiamo le prestazioni di diversi parametri per i modelli BERT. Troviamo che l'accuratezza di due diversi modelli BERT che utilizzano proporzioni diverse degli articoli è costantemente elevata, con il nostro modello più performante sul set di convalida che raggiunge l'85% di precisione e il modello più performante sul set di test raggiunge il 77%. Abbiamo inoltre determinato che il nostro modello presenta una forte consistenza, etichettando le fette indipendenti dello stesso articolo in modo identico. Infine, troviamo che la randomizzazione dell'ordine dei pezzi di parole riduce drasticamente l'accuratezza di convalida (a circa il 60%), ma che la mescolanza di gruppi di quattro o più pezzi di parole mantiene una precisione di circa l'80%, indicando che il modello guadagna principalmente valore dal contesto locale.", 'kk': 'Біз жаңа жаңа жасалған Bidi- директорлық кодтардың түрлендіруші (BERT) үлгісінен (Devlin et al. 2018) гиперпартизалық жаңалықтарды анықтау тапсырмасы үшін зерттеуді зерттеудік. Біз BERT үлгілерінің әртүрлі параметрлерінің ішкі параметрлерін тексереміз. Біз мақалалардың әртүрлі пропорцияларын қолдану үшін екі әртүрлі BERT моделінің дұрыстығын табыламыз. Біздің дұрыстығымыз 85% дұрыстығын жеткізу үлгісімен 77% дегенді тексеру үлгісінің ең жақсы үлгісін жеткіземіз. Біз өзіміздің моделіміз бір мақаланың тәуелсіз бөлшектерін бір мақаланың тәуелсіздігін көрсетеді. Соңында біз сөздің бөлшектерінің ретін кездейсоқ түрде тексеру дұрыстығын (барлық 60%) қысқартады, бірақ төрт немесе бірнеше сөздің бөлшектерінің бөлшектерінің бөлшектерінің бөлшектері 80% деген дұрыстығын сақтайды, ол үлгісін негізінде жерг', 'ms': 'Kami menyelidiki Perwakilan Pengekod Bidi-rectional yang baru-baru ini dikembangkan dari model Transformers (BERT) (Devlin et al. 2018) untuk tugas pengesan berita hyperpartisan. Menggunakan subset artikel ditabel tangan dari SemEval sebagai set pengesahihan, kami menguji prestasi parameter berbeza untuk model BERT. Kami mendapati bahawa ketepatan dari dua model BERT yang berbeza menggunakan proporsi berbeza artikel secara konsisten tinggi, dengan model terbaik kami pada set pengesahihan mencapai ketepatan 85% dan model terbaik pada set ujian mencapai 77%. Kami juga menentukan bahawa model kami menunjukkan konsistensi yang kuat, mengetikkan potongan independen artikel yang sama dengan sama. Finally, we find that randomizing the order of word pieces dramatically reduces validation accuracy (to approximately 60%), but that shuffling groups of four or more word pieces maintains an accuracy of about 80%, indicating the model mainly gains value from local context.', 'lt': 'Mes tiriame neseniai sukurtą Bidi- rectional Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) model į (Devlin et al. 2018), skirtą hiperpartiziniam naujienų aptikimui. Naudodami SemEval rankiniu ženklu pažymėtų gaminių pogrupį kaip patvirtinimo rinkinį, bandome skirtingų BERT modelių parametrų veiksmingumą. Matome, kad tikslumas iš dviejų skirtingų BERT modelių, naudojančių skirtingas gaminių proporcijas, yra nuosekliai aukštas, o mūsų geriausiai veikiantis patvirtinimo rinkinio model is siekia 85 % tikslumo, o geriausiai veikiantis bandymo rinkinio modelis siekia 77 %. Be to, mes nustatėme, kad mūsų modelis turi tvirtą nuoseklumą, žymint nepriklausomus to paties straipsnio gabalus vienodai. Galiausiai nustatome, kad atsitiktinės atrankos būdu suskirstyti žodžių gabalėlius labai sumažina patvirtinimo tikslumą (iki maždaug 60 %), tačiau kad keturių ar daugiau žodžių gabalėlių maišymo grupių tikslumas išlieka maždaug 80 %, o tai rodo, kad modelis iš esmės gauna vertę iš vietos konteksto.', 'mk': 'Ние го истражуваме неодамна развиениот Биди- рекционален кодер претставувања од моделот Трансформери (BERT) (Devlin et al. 2018) за хиперпартиска задача за детекција на вести. Користејќи подгрупа рачно означени статии од SemEval како валидација, ја тестираме извршноста на различните параметри за моделите BERT. Најдовме дека точноста од двата различни BERT модели користејќи различни пропорции на статиите е константно висока, со нашиот најдобро исполнет модел на валидацијата постигнувајќи точност од 85 отсто и најдобро исполнетиот модел на тестот постигнувајќи 77 отсто. Понатаму утврдивме дека нашиот модел покажува силна константност, со идентично означување на независни парчиња од истата статија. Конечно, откриваме дека распоредувањето на редот на парчиња на зборови драматично ја намалува точноста на валидацијата (на околу 60 отсто), но дека групите со четири или повеќе парчиња на зборови одржуваат точноста од околу 80 отсто, што индицира дека моделот главно добива вредност од локалниот контекст.', 'ml': 'അടുത്തുതന്നെ വികസിച്ച ബിദി- സെക്രട്ടിക്കല്\u200d എന്\u200dകോഡിന്\u200dറെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d (ബെര്\u200dടി) മോഡലില്\u200d നിന്നും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200d സെമ്എവാലില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള കൈകൊടുത്തിട്ടുള്ള വസ്തുക്കളുടെ അടുത്ത് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ശരിയായ സെറ്റ് ആയിരിക്കുന്നു. ബെര്\u200dട് ബെര്\u200dട്ടി മോഡലുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന രണ്ട് ബെര്\u200dട്ടി മോഡലുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും ഉയര്\u200dന്നുപോകുന്നതാണ് എന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d തീരുമാനിച്ചു, നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ശക്തിയോടെ പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു, സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായ ഒരു ലേബിളിന അവസാനം, വാക്കുകളുടെ ക്രമീകരണത്തിന്റെ ക്രമീകരിക്കുന്നത് സ്വഭാവികമായി നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നതാണെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു, പക്ഷെ നാലോ കൂടുതല്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ കൂട്ടത്ത', 'mt': 'Aħna ninvestigaw il-mudell Bidi-rectional Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) (Devlin et al. 2018) żviluppat reċentement għall-kompitu ta’ individwazzjoni tal-aħbarijiet iperpartiġjani. Bl-użu ta’ sottosett ta’ oġġetti ttikkettati bl-idejn minn SemEval bħala sett ta’ validazzjoni, a ħna ntestjaw il-prestazzjoni ta’ parametri differenti għall-mudelli BERT. Aħna nsibu li l-preċiżjoni minn żewġ mudelli BERT differenti li jużaw proporzjonijiet differenti tal-oġġetti hija konsistentement għolja, bil-mudell tagħna bl-aħjar prestazzjoni fuq is-sett ta’ validazzjoni jilħaq il-preċiżjoni ta’ 85% u l-mudell bl-aħjar prestazzjoni fuq is-sett ta’ ttestjar jilħaq 77%. Aħna ddeterminat ukoll li l-mudell tagħna juri konsistenza qawwija, bit-tikkettar ta’ biċċiet indipendenti tal-istess artikolu b’mod identiku. Fl-aħħar nett, isibu li l-għażla aleatorja tal-ordni tal-biċċiet tal-kliem tnaqqas b’mod drammatiku l-preċiżjoni tal-validazzjoni (għal madwar 60 %), iżda li l-gruppi ta’ ċaqliq ta’ erba’ biċċiet tal-kliem jew aktar iżommu preċiżjoni ta’ madwar 80 %, li tindika li l-mudell prinċipalment jikseb valur mill-kuntest lokali.', 'no': 'Vi undersøker dei nyleg utviklingane Bidi- rektusjonelle koderingsrepresentasjonane frå transformeringsmodellen (BERT) (Devlin et al. 2018) for oppgåva for hyperpartisan- informasjonsoppdaging. Bruk ein subgruppe av artiklar med håndmerket frå halvEval som eit valeringssett, tester vi utviklinga av ulike parametrar for BERT-modeller. Vi finn at nøyaktighet frå to forskjellige BERT-modeller som brukar forskjellige proporsjonar av artikkelene er konsistentlig høg, med vår beste utføringsmodul på validasjonen sett til 85% nøyaktighet og den beste utføringsmedulen på testsettet til 77%. Vi bestemte meir at modellen vårt viser sterk konsistens og merker uavhengige sliser av det same artikkelen identisk. I slutt finn vi at tilfeldige rekkefølgje av orddeler dramatisk reduserer valeringsnøyaktighet (til omtrent 60%), men at skuffgrupper med fire eller fleire orddeler held eit nøyaktighet på omtrent 80%, som viser modellen hovudsakelig får verdien frå lokale kontekst.', 'pl': 'Badamy niedawno opracowany model koderów dwukierunkowych z transformatorów (BERT) dla zadania wykrywania wiadomości hiperpartyjnych. Korzystając z podzbioru ręcznie etykietowanych artykułów z SemEval jako zestawu walidacji, testujemy wydajność różnych parametrów dla modeli BERT. Uważamy, że dokładność dwóch różnych modeli BERT wykorzystujących różne proporcje artykułów jest konsekwentnie wysoka, a nasz najlepiej wydajny model na zestawie walidacyjnym osiąga dokładność 85% a najlepiej wydajny model na zestawie testowym osiąga 77%. Dodatkowo ustaliliśmy, że nasz model wykazuje silną spójność, oznaczając niezależne plasterki tego samego artykułu identycznie. Wreszcie okazujemy się, że randomizowanie kolejności fragmentów słowa dramatycznie zmniejsza dokładność walidacji (do około 60%) ale że mieszanie grup czterech lub więcej fragmentów słowa utrzymuje dokładność około 80%, wskazując, że model zyskuje wartość głównie z lokalnego kontekstu.', 'ro': 'Investigăm recent dezvoltat modelul de reprezentare bidirecțională a codoarelor de la transformatori (BERT) (Devlin et al. 2018) pentru activitatea de detectare a știrilor hiperpartizane. Folosind un subset de articole etichetate manual de la SemEval ca set de validare, testăm performanța diferiților parametri pentru modelele BERT. Considerăm că acuratețea a două modele BERT diferite care utilizează proporții diferite ale articolelor este în mod constant ridicată, modelul nostru cel mai performant pe setul de validare atinge o acuratețe de 85%, iar modelul cel mai performant pe setul de testare atinge 77%. De asemenea, am stabilit că modelul nostru prezintă consistență puternică, etichetând feliile independente ale aceluiași articol identic. În cele din urmă, constatăm că randomizarea ordinii pieselor de cuvinte reduce dramatic acuratețea validării (la aproximativ 60%), dar că grupurile de amestecare a patru sau mai multe piese de cuvinte menține o acuratețe de aproximativ 80%, indicând modelul câștigă în principal valoare din contextul local.', 'mn': 'Бид саяхан хөгжсөн Bidi-rectional Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) model (Devlin et al. 2018) for the hyperpartisan news detection task. SemEval-ын гараар нэрлэгдсэн баримтуудыг шийдвэрлэх хэмжээний хувьд бид BERT загварын өөр параметрын үйлдвэрлэлийг шалгаж байна. Бид 2 өөр БЕРТ загварын зөв загвараас өөр пропорцийг ашиглаж байгааг олж мэднэ. Манай хамгийн сайн дасгал загвар нь 85% зөв болон 77% хүртэл туршилтын хамгийн сайн дасгал загварыг ашиглаж байна. Бид дахиад загварын загвар нь ижил хэвлэлийн тусгаарлагдмал хэлбэрүүдийг илэрхийлж чадна. Эцэст нь бид үг хэсгүүдийн дарааллыг санамсаргүй багасгах нь зөв байдлыг (ойролцоогоор 60%) хүртэл багасгаж байна. Гэхдээ дөрвөн эсвэл олон үг хэсгүүдийн хэсгүүд нь 80%-ын зөв байдлыг харуулж байна. Энэ загварыг ихэвчлэн орчин орчин', 'si': 'අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා අලුත් විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන බිඩී- රෙක්ටියෝන්සියල් එන්කෝඩර් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය (BERT) මොඩේල් (Devlin et al. 2018) හා Name අපි හොයාගන්නවා වෙනස් BERT මොඩල් දෙකක් වලින් වෙනස් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරමාණය පාවිච්චි කරනවා කියලා, අපේ හොඳම ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා 85% හරියත අපි තව තීරණය කළා අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක වගේම ශක්තිමත්වය ප්\u200dරදේශය කරනවා කියලා, එකම ලේඛනයේ ස්වතුත්වයින් ස්ව අන්තිමේදී, අපි හොයාගන්නේ වචන කොටස් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට පරික්ෂා කරනවා කියලා වචන කොටස් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට පරික්ෂා කරනවා (60%) වලට, ඒත් ඒ වචන කොටස් හත', 'so': "Waxaynu baaraynaa macluumaadkii ugu dambeysay ee Bidi-rectional Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) model (Devlin et al. 2018) for the hyperpartisan news detection mission. Using a subset of hand-labeled articles from SemEval as a validation set, we test the performance of different parameters for BERT models.  Waxaan ognahay in saxda labada noocyo oo kala duduwan ee BERT lagu isticmaalayo noocyada kala duduwan ee qoraalku waa mid aad u sareeya, waxaana sameynaya modelkayaga ugu wanaagsan ee saxda saxda 85 boqolkiiba iyo modelka ugu fiican ee sameynta imtixaanka oo gaadhaya 77 boqolkiiba. Sidoo kale waxaan go'aannay in modellkayagu uu muujiyo iswaafaqnimo xoog leh, oo ku qorayo noocyo xor ah oo isku qoran. Ugu dambaysta waxaan helaynaa in lagu beddelo nidaamka qeybaha hadalka si rasmi ah u hoosaysiiyo saxda xaqiiqnimada (qiyaastii 60 boqolkiiba), laakiin kooxa afarta ama wax ka badan oo hadalka lagu qeybeeyo waxay haystaan saxda qiyaastii 80 boqolkiiba, taasoo tusinaya tusaalka ugu horeysa qiimaha laga helaa xiliga deegaanka.", 'sv': 'Vi undersöker den nyligen utvecklade Bidi- rektional Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) modellen (Devlin et al. 2018) för hyperpartisan nyhetsdetekteringsuppgift. Med hjälp av en delmängd handmärkta artiklar från SemEval som valideringssats testar vi prestandan för olika parametrar för BERT-modeller. Vi finner att noggrannheten från två olika BERT-modeller med olika proportioner av artiklarna är konsekvent hög, med vår bästa modell på valideringsuppsättningen uppnår 85% noggrannhet och den bästa modellen på provuppsättningen uppnår 77%. Vi fastställde vidare att vår modell uppvisar en stark konsistens och märkte oberoende skivor av samma artikel på samma sätt. Slutligen konstaterar vi att slumpmässig ordning på ordbitar dramatiskt minskar valideringsnoggrannheten (till cirka 60%), men att blandningsgrupper om fyra eller fler ordbitar bibehåller en noggrannhet på cirka 80%, vilket indikerar att modellen främst vinner värde från lokal kontext.', 'sr': 'Istražujemo nedavno razvijene predstave Bidi-rekcionalnog kodera iz modela transformera (BERT) (Devlin et al. 2018) za hiperpartizanski zadatak otkrivanja vijesti. Koristeći podskup članaka sa ruke označenih od SemEval kao set za validaciju, testiramo provedbu različitih parametara za BERT modele. Nalazimo da je tačnost od dva različita modela BERT-a koristeći različite proporcije članaka konstantno visoka, sa našim najboljim modelom na validaciji postavljajući 85% tačnost i najboljim modelom na testu ostvarujući 77%. Dalje smo odlučili da naš model pokazuje jaku konsekvenciju, označavajući nezavisne komade iste članaka identično. Konačno, našli smo da slucajno smanjenje reda rijeèi dramatično smanjuje taènost validacije (na približno 60%), ali ta grupa šifriranja četiri ili više reèi dijela održava taènost oko 80%, ukazujući na model uglavnom dobija vrijednost iz lokalnog konteksta.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் சமீபத்தில் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட பிடி- திருத்தி குறியீட்டாளர் மாதிரி மாதிரி( BERT) மாதிரி( டெப்லின் மற்றும் அல் 2018) அதிபெர்பார்ப SemEval லிருந்து கையிடப்பட்ட கட்டுரைகளின் துணை பயன்படுத்தி சரிபார்ப்பு அமைப்பாக, BERT மாதிரிகளுக்கு வேறு அளபுருக்களின் செயல நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கும் பிரெட் மாதிரிகளில் இருந்து வேறு வித்திய பொருட்களின் வித்தியாசமான பங்குகளை பயன்படுத்தும் சரியான மதிப்பும் தெளிவாக இருக்கும் என்பது,  நாங்கள் மேலும் உறுதிப்படுத்தி நம் மாதிரி வலிமையான ஒத்திசையை காண்பிக்கிறது, ஒரே கட்டுரையை அடையாளமாக சுதந்த கடைசியாக, வார்த்தை துண்டுகளின் வரிசையை முறைப்படுத்துவது செல்லுபடியாக சரியானத்தை குறைக்கும் என்பதை நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம். ஆனால் நான்கு அல்லது மேலும் வார்த', 'ur': 'ہم نے اچھی طرح تغییر پھیلانے والے (BERT) موڈل (Devlin et al. 2018) کے لئے ہیپر پارٹیسان خبروں شناسایی کے لئے Bidi-rectional Encoder Representations کی تحقیق کی۔ SemEval کے ہاتھ لیبل لکھے ہوئے لکھے لکھے ہوئے لکھے ہوئے پاسسٹ کے استعمال کرتے ہیں، ہم BERT موڈل کے لئے مختلف پارامیٹروں کی عملکرد کا امتحان کرتے ہیں. ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ دو مختلف BERT موڈل سے مختلف مقداروں کے مطابق مطابق بالا ہے، ہمارے بہترین عمل موڈل کے ساتھ 85% دقیق تک پہنچ رہے ہیں اور 77% تک پہنچ رہے ہیں، اور بہترین عمل موڈل کے مطابق. ہم نے اس سے زیادہ فیصلہ کیا کہ ہماری مدل ایک ہی مقالہ کے مستقل خفیہ ٹکڑے کو مضبوط ثابت کرتا ہے۔ آخر میں، ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ کلمات ٹکڑوں کے دستور کی تصادفی کرنا (تقریباً 60%) کی تصدیق کم کر دیتا ہے، لیکن چار یا زیادہ کلمات ٹکڑوں کے گروہوں میں چلنے والے گروہوں نے تقریباً 80% کی تصدیق رکھی ہے، جو مدل کو محلی کنٹنسیٹ سے معلوم کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Yaqinda tuzilgan Bidi- ta'lim kodlash muvaffaqiyatlaridan (BERT) modeli (Devlin et al. 2018) qidirishni o'rganamiz. @ info: status Biz o'ylaymiz, bu ikkita boshqa BERT modellaridan boshqa maqolalarning turli qismlari bilan ishlatilgan imkoniyatlarni ko'rsatish mumkin, biz haqiqiqiy bajarish modelimizda 85% foydalanishi mumkin va 77%imkoniyatiningeng yaxshi bajarish modeli bajarishi mumkin. Biz bir necha ko'rsatganimiz, modelimiz bir maqola shaxsiy qismlarni ko'rsatadi. Keyin biz so'zlar tartibini taʼminlovchi soʻzni aniqlashni aniqlash mumkin, lekin 4 yoki ko'proq so'zlar guruhini ajratish mumkin 80%, bu modelni asosiy lokal muvaffaqiyatlaridan foydalanishini anglatadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi điều tra các đơn vị bảo mật trực tiếp được phát triển gần đây từ mô hình transforms (BERT) của Devlin et al. 208) cho nhiệm vụ phát hiện tin tức du kích. Sử dụng một nhóm các công cụ được dán nhãn bằng tay từ SemEvol để làm bộ phận thẩm tra, chúng tôi kiểm tra khả năng ứng dụng của các tham số khác nhau cho mô hình BERT. Chúng tôi thấy độ chính xác từ hai mô- đun thực phẩm khác nhau sử dụng các chiều khác nhau của các bài báo luôn cao, với mô hình hiệu quả tốt nhất của chúng tôi trên bộ sửa giải đạt độ chính xác cao 85. Chúng tôi xác định rằng mô hình của chúng tôi có độ đồng nhất, chúng tôi chọn các phần độc lập của cùng một bài như nhau. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi thấy ngẫu nhiên kích thích thứ tự các tác phẩm từ đã giảm triệt để độ chính xác xác xác xác xác xác của miếng (tới khoảng một mươi=)) nhưng cách cách phân phối nhóm bốn hay nhiều chữ vẫn giữ độ chính xác của khoảng 80=, ngụ ý kiểu đó chỉ tăng giá trị từ ngữ cảnh địa phương.', 'bg': 'Проучваме наскоро разработения модел Бидирекционални кодери от трансформатори (Девлин и др. 2018) за хиперпартизанската задача за откриване на новини. Използвайки поднабор от ръчно маркирани статии от СемЕвал като комплект за валидиране, тестваме ефективността на различни параметри за моделите. Установяваме, че точността от два различни модела, използващи различни пропорции на статиите, е последователно висока, като нашият най-ефективен модел в комплекта за валидиране постига 85% точност, а най-добрият модел в комплекта за тестване постига 77%. Освен това установихме, че нашият модел показва силна консистенция, етикетирайки независими парчета от една и съща артикула еднакво. И накрая, откриваме, че случайността на реда на частите на думата значително намалява точността на валидиране (до приблизително 60%), но разбъркването на групи от четири или повече части на думата поддържа точност от около 80%, което показва, че моделът печели стойност главно от локалния контекст.', 'nl': 'We onderzoeken het recent ontwikkelde Bidi-rectionale Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) model (Devlin et al. 2018) voor de hyperpartisane nieuwsdetectie taak. Met behulp van een subset handgelabelde artikelen van SemEval als validatieset testen we de prestaties van verschillende parameters voor BERT-modellen. We vinden dat de nauwkeurigheid van twee verschillende BERT-modellen met verschillende verhoudingen van de artikelen consistent hoog is, waarbij ons best presterende model op de validatieset 85% nauwkeurigheid bereikt en het best presterende model op de testset 77%. We hebben verder vastgesteld dat ons model een sterke consistentie vertoont, waarbij onafhankelijke plakjes van hetzelfde artikel identiek worden gelabeld. Tot slot vinden we dat het randomiseren van de volgorde van woordstukken de validatienauwkeurigheid drastisch vermindert (tot ongeveer 60%) maar dat het schudden van groepen van vier of meer woordstukken een nauwkeurigheid van ongeveer 80% behoudt, wat aangeeft dat het model vooral waarde wint uit de lokale context.', 'da': 'Vi undersøger den nyligt udviklede Bidi- rektionale Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) model (Devlin et al. 2018) til opgaven med hyperpartisan nyhedsdetektering. Ved hjælp af et delsæt af håndmærkede artikler fra SemEval som valideringssæt tester vi ydeevnen af forskellige parametre for BERT-modeller. Vi finder, at nøjagtigheden fra to forskellige BERT-modeller, der anvender forskellige proportioner af artiklerne, er konsekvent høj, idet vores bedst ydende model på valideringssættet opnår 85% nøjagtighed, og den bedst ydende model på testsættet opnår 77%. Vi fastslog endvidere, at vores model udviser stærk konsistens og mærker uafhængige skiver af samme artikel identisk. Endelig finder vi, at randomisering af ordstykkernes rækkefølge reducerer valideringsnøjagtigheden dramatisk (til ca. 60%), men at blandingsgrupper på fire eller flere ordstykker bevarer en nøjagtighed på ca. 80%, hvilket indikerer, at modellen primært vinder værdi fra lokal kontekst.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen das kürzlich entwickelte bidirektionale Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT)-Modell (Devlin et al. 2018) für die hyperparteiische Nachrichtenerkennung. Anhand einer Teilmenge handbeschrifteter Artikel von SemEval als Validierungsset testen wir die Leistungsfähigkeit verschiedener Parameter für BERT-Modelle. Wir stellen fest, dass die Genauigkeit von zwei verschiedenen BERT-Modellen mit unterschiedlichen Anteilen der Artikel konstant hoch ist, wobei unser leistungsstärkstes Modell für den Validierungssatz 85% Genauigkeit und das leistungsstärkste Modell für den Testsatz 77% erreicht. Wir haben ferner festgestellt, dass unser Modell eine starke Konsistenz aufweist und unabhängige Scheiben desselben Artikels identisch beschriftet. Schließlich stellen wir fest, dass die Randomisierung der Reihenfolge von Wortstücken die Validierungsgenauigkeit drastisch reduziert (auf etwa 60%) aber dass das Mischen von Gruppen von vier oder mehr Wortstücken eine Genauigkeit von etwa 80% beibehält, was bedeutet, dass das Modell hauptsächlich Wert aus dem lokalen Kontext gewinnt.', 'hr': 'Istražujemo nedavno razvijene predstave Bidi-rekcionalnog kodera iz modela transformera (BERT) (Devlin et al. 2018) za zadatak otkrivanja hiperpartizanskih vijesti. Koristeći podskup članaka s rukama označene od SemEval kao komplet za validaciju, testiramo učinkovitost različitih parametara za BERT modele. Nalazimo da je preciznost iz dva različita modela BERT-a koristeći različite proporcije članaka konsekventno visoka, s našim najboljim modelom utvrđivanja postavljanja tačnosti 85% i najboljim modelom ispitivanja ostvarivanja 77%. Dalje smo odlučili da naš model pokazuje jaku konsistenciju, označavajući nezavisne dijelove iste članaka identično. Konačno, našli smo da slučajno smanjenje reda riječi djelovanja dramatično smanjuje tačnost validacije (na približno 60%), ali ta skupina šifriranja četiri ili više djelovanja riječi održava tačnost oko 80%, ukazujući na model uglavnom dobija vrijednost iz lokalnog konteksta.', 'ko': '최근 초당파 뉴스 감지 임무를 위해 개발된 트랜스포머(BERT) 모델(Devlin et al.2018) 양방향 인코더 표시를 연구했다.SemEval에서 온 스티커 라벨 글의 서브집합을 검증 집합으로 사용하여, 우리는 버트 모델의 서로 다른 매개 변수의 성능을 테스트했다.우리는 서로 다른 비율의 문장을 사용하는 두 개의 서로 다른 BERT 모델의 정확도가 시종 높다는 것을 발견했다. 우리는 검증집에서 가장 잘 표현한 모델이 85%에 달했고 테스트집에서 가장 잘 표현한 모델이 77%에 달했다.우리는 우리의 모델이 매우 강한 일치성을 가지고 같은 문장의 독립된 부분을 똑같이 표기한다는 것을 더욱 확정했다.마지막으로 우리는 랜덤화된 단어의 순서가 검증 정확도(약 60%)를 현저히 낮출 수 있음을 발견했다. 그러나 4개 이상의 단어의 무작위 그룹은 약 80%의 정확도를 유지했다. 이것은 이 모델이 주로 현지 상하문에서 가치를 얻는다는 것을 나타낸다.', 'id': 'Kami menyelidiki pembangunan Bidi- rectional Encoder Representations dari model Transformers (BERT) (Devlin et al. 2018) untuk tugas deteksi berita hyperpartisan. Menggunakan subset artikel yang ditabel tangan dari SemEval sebagai set validasi, kami menguji prestasi dari parameter berbeda untuk model BERT. Kami menemukan bahwa akurasi dari dua model BERT yang berbeda menggunakan proporsi berbeda dari artikel secara konsisten tinggi, dengan model terbaik kami pada set validasi mencapai akurasi 85% dan model terbaik pada set tes mencapai 77%. We further determined that our model exhibits strong consistency, labeling independent slices of the same article identically.  Akhirnya, kami menemukan bahwa menganalisasi perintah potongan kata dramatis mengurangi akurasi validasi (sekitar 60%), tetapi kelompok yang menggeser empat atau lebih potongan kata mempertahankan akurasi sekitar 80%, menunjukkan model terutama mendapatkan nilai dari konteks lokal.', 'sw': 'We investigate the recently developed Bidi- rectional Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) model (Devlin et al. 2018) for the hyperpartisan news detection task.  Kwa kutumia viungo vya makala vilivyowekwa mkono kutoka SemEval kama seti ya uhakika, tunajaribu utendaji wa vipimo tofauti kwa mifano ya BERT. Tunapata uhakika kutoka mifano miwili tofauti ya BERT kwa kutumia sehemu tofauti ya makala hizo ni kubwa zaidi, pamoja na modeli yetu bora ya kufanya kazi kwenye kituo hiki cha uhakika kinachofikia asilimia 85 na modeli bora ya kufanya kazi katika seti ya jaribio linalofikia asilimia 77. Tuliamua zaidi kuwa mifano yetu inaonyesha umuhimu mkubwa, unaonyesha vipande huru vya makala hiyo kwa kiasi kikubwa. Hatimaye, tunagundua kwamba kuboresha amri ya vipande vya maneno vimepunguza ukweli wa uhalisia (takribani asilimia 60), lakini makundi ya vipande nne au zaidi ya maneno yanaendelea kuwa sahihi kwa takriban asilimia 80, ikionyesha msimamo huo hasa unapata thamani kutoka kwenye mazingira ya eneo hilo.', 'sq': 'Ne hetojmë përfaqësimet e kodifikuesve Bidi- rectional nga modeli i Transformers (BERT) (Devlin et al. 2018) për detyrën e zbulimit të lajmeve hiperpartizane. Duke përdorur një nëngrup artikujsh me etiketë dore nga SemEval si një grup validimi, ne testojmë performancën e parametrave të ndryshëm për modelet BERT. Ne zbulojmë se saktësia nga dy modele të ndryshme BERT duke përdorur proporcione të ndryshme të artikujve është vazhdimisht e lartë, me modelin tonë më të mirë në sistemin e vlerësimit që arrin saktësinë 85% dhe modelin më të mirë në sistemin e testimeve që arrin 77%. Ne përcaktuam më tej se modeli ynë ekspozon konsistencë të fortë, duke etiketuar pjesë të pavarura të të njëjtit artikull në mënyrë identike. Më në fund, gjejmë se rastësizimi i rendit të pjesëve të fjalës redukton dramatikisht saktësinë e vlerësimit (në rreth 60%), por se grupet e përziera prej katër ose më shumë pjesëve të fjalës mbajnë një saktësi prej rreth 80%, duke treguar se modeli kryesisht fiton vlerë nga konteksti lokal.', 'fa': 'ما به اخیر توسعه\u200cهای نمایش\u200cهای ابتدال\u200cکننده\u200cهای ابتدال\u200cکننده\u200cها (BERT) از مدل\u200cهای ابتدال\u200cکننده\u200cها (Devlin et al. 2018) برای کشف اخبار hyperpartisan تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. با استفاده از زیر دستی از مقاله\u200cهای برچسب\u200cشده از SemEval به عنوان مجموعه تأیید، عملکرد پارامتر مختلف برای مدل BERT را امتحان می\u200cکنیم. ما متوجه شدیم که دقیقات از دو مدل BERT متفاوت با استفاده از مقادیر متفاوت از مقاله ها به طور کامل بالا است، با بهترین مدل اجرای ما در مورد تأیید کردن مجموعه\u200cای که 85 درصد دقیقات را می\u200cرساند و بهترین مدل اجرای تأیید که 77 درصد را می\u200cرساند. ما دیگر تصمیم گرفتیم که مدل ما هماهنگی قوی را نمایش می\u200cدهد، برچسب\u200cهای مستقل از یک مقاله مشابه می\u200cکند. بالاخره، ما فهمیدیم که تصادفی کردن سفارش قطعه\u200cهای کلمه\u200cها دقیقات تایید را (به حدود ۶۰%) کاهش می\u200cدهد، ولی این گروه\u200cهای چهار یا بیشتر قطعه\u200cهای کلمه\u200cها دقیقات حدود ۸۰ درصد را حفظ می\u200cکند، که مدل اصلاً ارزش\u200cهای محلی را از محیط', 'tr': "Ýakyndaky Bidi-rectional Ködler Taýýarlamalaryň (BERT) nusgasyny (Devlin et al. 2018) hiperpartisanyň täzeliklerini açmak üçin ylşyryldyk. SemEval'dan elimden etiket edilen makalarynyň bir toparyny deňlenmek üçin ullanýarys. BERT modelleri üçin farklı parameterleriň eserini barlaýarys. Munuň iki dürli BERT modellerinden edilşiklik gabdalyň farklı proporsiýalaryny ulanan dyggaty ýokarda ýokarda ýokardan tapýarys. Munuň iň gowy taýýarlyk modimiz 85% dogrylygyny ýetýär we testiň düzümlerindeki iň gowy taýýarlyk modeli 77%-ä ýetişýär. Biz daşyrdan çykardyk, nusgamyzyň güýçli bir maksadyň töweregini beýleki şekilde etiketleýän şeklini görkezmäge karar berdik. Soňunda, söz biçimleriniň arasynda taýýarlanmagynyň dogrylygyny azaltýar (ýakyn 60%), ýöne bu dört ýa-da köp söz biçimleriniň toparynyň dykkalygyny 80% ýa-da sabitleýändigini görkeýäris. Şol modeliniň esasy ýerli kontekstden deň gazanýandygyny görkezýär.", 'af': "Ons ondersoek die onlangs ontwikkelde Bidi- reguele enkoder voorstellings van Transformers (BERT) model (Devlin et al. 2018) vir die hiperpartisan nuusbeskrywing taak. Gebruik ons 'n subartikel van hand- etiketeerde artikels van SemEval as 'n geldigheidstel, toets ons die prestasie van verskillende parameters vir BERT modelle. Ons vind dat waarskynlik van twee verskillende BERT modele gebruik verskillende proporsie van die artikels is konsistentlik hoog, met ons beste uitvoerde model op die geldigheidstel tot 85% waarskynlik en die beste uitvoerde model op die toets stel tot 77%. Ons het verder bepaal dat ons model sterk konsistensie uitbied, die etiket van onveilige slippe van dieselfde artikel identies. Eindelik, ons vind dat die volgorde van woord stukke dramatiese verduur waarskynlikheid (tot omtrent 60%), maar daardie verduur groepe van vier of meer woord stukke hou 'n waarskynlikheid van omtrent 80%, wat die model hoofsaaklik waarde van plaaslike konteks kry.", 'am': 'በአሁኑ ጊዜ የቢዲ-አስተዳዳደር የፊርፖርተር (BERT) ሞዴል (Devlin et al. 2018) ለhyperpartisan ዜና ማግኘት ስራ እናመርመራለን፡፡ የSemEval ጽሑፎችን በመጠቀም የBERT ዓይነቶች የልዩ አካላት ማድረግ እናሞክራለን፡፡ በሁለት ልዩ BERT ዓይነቶች ላይ በተለየ ጽሑፎችን የሚጠቀም እርግጠኛ ነው፡፡ ዳግመኛም ሞዴሌያችን የነፃ ሥርዓት እና በአንድ ጽሑፍ በተለየ ጥያቄ እንዲያስተካክሉ አረጋገጥን፡፡ በመጨረሻውም የቃላትን ክፍሎች በቁጥጥር የሚያሳፍር እርግጠኝነት (እስከ 60%) የሚያጎድል እንደሆነ እናገኘዋለን፤ ነገር ግን የአራቱ ወይም የበዛ የቃላት ክፍሎች በቁጥጥር የሚቆርጥ ቁጥጥር 80 በመቶ ያህል ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք վերջերս զարգացած Երկու ուղղությամբ կոդավորվող ներկայացումները Transforme (BER) մոդելուց (Devin et al. 2018) հիպերկայացի նորությունների հայտնագործման համար: Օգտագործելով SEM-ի ձեռքով նշված հոդվածների մի ենթախումբ որպես հավասարման խումբ, մենք ստուգում ենք BER մոդելների տարբեր պարամետրերի արտադրողությունը: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ երկու տարբեր BER մոդելների ճշգրտությունը, որոնք օգտագործում են հոդվածների տարբեր համեմատությունները, մշտապես բարձր է, մեր լավագույն արդյունավետության մոդելը հասնում է 85 տոկոսի ճշգրտությունը, իսկ փորձարկման մոդելը հասնում է 77 տոկոսի Մենք նաև որոշեցինք, որ մեր մոդելը ցույց է տալիս ուժեղ համապատասխանություն, նույնպես նույն հոդվածի անկախ կտորները պիտակելով: Վերջապես, մենք հայտնաբերեցինք, որ բառերի կարգը պատահական վերադառնալը դրամական նվազեցնում է հավասարման ճշգրտությունը (մոտավորապես 60 տոկոսի), բայց չորս կամ ավելի բառերի խառնվող խմբերը պահպանում են մոտավորապես 80 տոկոսի ճշգրտությունը, որը ցույց է տալիս, որ մոդելը գլ', 'az': 'Biz yenidən ürəkləndirilmiş Bidi-rectional Encoder Tərcümələrindən (BERT) modeli (Devlin et al. 2018) hyperpartisan xəbərləri keşfetməsi üçün təhsil edirik. SemEval təsdiqləmə quruluğu kimi əl etiketli maddələrin subgruplarını istifadə edirək, BERT modellərinin farklı parametrlərin performansını sınayırıq. Biz məlumatların müxtəlif proporsiyalarını istifadə edən iki müxtəlif BERT modellərin doğruluğunu görürük. Bizim təsdiqləmə qurulduğumuz ən yaxşı modellərimiz 85% ədaləti və testdə 77% ola biləcək ən yaxşı modellərimiz. Daha sonra, modellərimizin möhkəm bir sürəkliyi göstərir, eyni maddənin bağımsız parçalarını etiketləyirik. Sonunda, söz parçalarının sırasını təhsil edilməsi dramatik olaraq təsdiqləmə doğruluğunu (yaxın 60%) dəyişdirir, amma bu dörd ya da çox söz parçalarının dəyişiklik dəyişiklik dəyişiklik dəyişiklikləri 80%-dən müəyyən edir, modelinin çox yüksək məlumatlardan qiyməti alır.', 'bn': 'আমরা সম্প্রতি বিদি সংস্কারের প্রতিনিধিত্ব বিদি সংস্কারের প্রতিনিধি (বিএরটি) মডেল (ডেভেরলিন এন্ট আল ২০১৮) হাইপার্পার্টিস্যান সংব সেমভাল থেকে হাতে লেবেল করা প্রবন্ধ ব্যবহার করে বৈধ সেট হিসেবে আমরা বিবেরেট মডেলের জন্য বিভিন্ন পারামিটারের প্রদর্শনের পরীক্ষা  আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে এই প্রবন্ধের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভাগের মডেল ব্যবহার করা থেকে সঠিকভাবে বিবেরেটি থেকে স আমরা আরো সিদ্ধান্ত নিয়েছিলাম যে আমাদের মডেল শক্তিশালী সংস্থা প্রদর্শন করে, একই প্রবন্ধের স্বাধীন স্থানীয় স্লাই অবশেষে, আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে শব্দের ক্ষেত্রের নির্দেশ নির্ধারণের ক্ষেত্রে ন্যায়বিচ্ছিন্ন করা মূল্য কমে (প্রায় ৬০ শতাংশ) কিন্তু চার বা বেশী শব্দ বিভিন্ন দলের ব', 'bs': 'Istražujemo nedavno razvijene predstave Bidi-rekcionalnog kodera iz modela transformera (BERT) (Devlin et al. 2018) za zadatak otkrivanja hiperpartizanskih vijesti. Koristeći podskup članaka s rukama označene od SemEval kao set za validaciju, testiramo učinkovitost različitih parametara za BERT modele. Nalazimo da je preciznost iz dva različita modela BERT-a koristeći različite proporcije članaka konstantno visoka, s našim najboljim modelom za validaciju postavljajući 85% tačnost i najboljim modelom na testu ostvarujući 77%. Dalje smo odlučili da naš model pokazuje jaku konsekvenciju, označavajući nezavisne dijelove iste članaka identično. Konačno, našli smo da randomiziranje reda riječi djelovanja dramatično smanjuje tačnost validacije (na približno 60%), ali ta skupina šifriranja četiri ili više komada riječi održava tačnost oko 80%, ukazujući na model uglavnom dobija vrijednost iz lokalnog konteksta.', 'ca': "Investiguem el model Bidi-rectional Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) (Devlin et al. 2018) recentment desenvolupat per la tasca de detecció hiperpartisana de notícies. Utilitzant un subconjunt d'articles etiquetats a mà de SemEval com un conjunt de validació, testem el rendiment de diferents paràmetres dels models BERT. Trobem que la precisió de dos models BERT diferents que utilitzen diferents proporcions d'articles és constantment alta, amb el nostre model de millor rendiment en el conjunt de validació aconseguint una precisió del 85% i el model de millor rendiment en el conjunt de prova aconseguint un 77%. També vam determinar que el nostre model mostrava una forta consistencia, etiquetant imatges independents del mateix article idènticament. Finalment, trobem que aleatoritzar l'ordre de les peces de paraules redueix dramàticament la precisió de validació (a aproximadament 60%), però que els grups de quatre o més peces de paraules que mexeren mantenen una precisió d'aproximadament 80%, indicant que el model guanya valor principalment del context local.", 'et': 'Uurime hiljuti välja töötatud Bidi- rectional Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) mudelit (Devlin jt. 2018) hüperpartisansete uudiste tuvastamise ülesandeks. Kasutades valideerimiskomplektina SemEvali käsitsi märgistatud artiklite alamhulka, testime BERT mudelite erinevate parameetrite jõudlust. Leiame, et kahe erineva BERT mudeli täpsus, mis kasutavad artiklite erinevaid proportsioone, on pidevalt kõrge, meie parima tulemusega mudel valideerimiskomplektis saavutab 85% täpsuse ja parima tulemusega mudel testikomplektis saavutab 77%. Lisaks tegime kindlaks, et meie mudel näitab tugevat järjepidevust, märgistades sama toote sõltumatud viilud identselt. Lõpuks leiame, et sõnatükkide järjestuse randomiseerimine vähendab märkimisväärselt valideerimise täpsust (ligikaudu 60%), kuid neljast või enamast sõnatükist koosnevate rühmade segamine säilitab täpsuse umbes 80%, mis näitab, et mudel saab peamiselt väärtust kohalikust kontekstist.', 'cs': 'Vyšetřujeme nedávno vyvinutý model Bidirektiálního kódování reprezentace transformátorů (BERT) pro úlohu detekce hyperpartizánních zpráv. Pomocí podmnožiny ručně označených článků ze SemEvalu jako validační sady testujeme výkonnost různých parametrů pro BERT modely. Zjišťujeme, že přesnost ze dvou různých modelů BERT používajících různé proporce článků je trvale vysoká, přičemž náš nejlépe výkonný model na validační sadě dosahuje přesnosti 85% a nejlépe výkonný model na testovací sadě dosahuje 77%. Dále jsme zjistili, že náš model vykazuje silnou konzistenci a označuje nezávislé řezy stejného výrobku stejně. Nakonec zjišťujeme, že randomizace pořadí slovních kusů dramaticky snižuje přesnost validace (přibližně 60%) ale že míchání skupin čtyř či více slovních kusů udržuje přesnost asi 80%, což znamená, že model získává hodnotu především z lokálního kontextu.', 'fi': 'Tutkimme äskettäin kehitettyä Bidi- rectional Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) -mallia (Devlin et al. 2018) hyperpartisaanien uutisten havaitsemiseen. Testaamme BERT-mallien eri parametrien suorituskykyä käyttämällä SemEvalin käsin merkittyjä artikkeleita validointisarjana. Havaitsemme, että tarkkuus kahdesta eri BERT-mallista, joissa käytetään eri osuuksia artikkeleista, on johdonmukaisesti korkea. Parhaiten suorituskykyinen mallimme validointisarjassa saavuttaa 85% tarkkuuden ja parhaiten suorituskykyinen malli testisarjassa 77%. Lisäksi totesimme, että mallimme on erittäin yhtenäinen ja että se merkitään samasta tuotteesta riippumattomat viipaleet identtisesti. Lopuksi toteamme, että sanakappaleiden järjestyksen satunnaistaminen vähentää merkittävästi validoinnin tarkkuutta (noin 60%), mutta että neljän tai useamman sanakappaleen sekoitusryhmän tarkkuus säilyy noin 80%, mikä osoittaa, että malli saa arvoa pääasiassa paikallisesta kontekstista.', 'jv': "We've istraed the recent Developer Bidi-rectal Ngawe ngubah menehi kelompok manut-etiket aturan sampeyan winih Sampeyan ingkang as set, kita ujian perusahaan dadi parameters gak nggawe model BERT. Awak dhéwé nglanggar nganggo kesalakno ing model BERT sampeyan gak iki, nik akeh sampeyan ingkang sampeyan kalah dumadhi dhéwé, nganggo model sing gak dhéwé iso nggawe balitasi ditambah sing nambah dhéwé, ngono model sing apik dhéwé, dadi alam sing gak dhéwé, lan akeh dumadhi sing paling dhéwé.  Awak dhéwé ngerti dadi, model nambarang nggawe nguasakno, ngono nggawe stampen diolah sing artiklo koyok ngono cah saben. Finger", 'sk': 'Za nalogo hiperpartizanskega odkrivanja novic smo raziskali nedavno razvit model BERT (Devlin et al. 2018). Z uporabo podnabora ročno označenih člankov SemEval kot validacijskega niza testiramo delovanje različnih parametrov za BERT modele. Ugotavljamo, da je natančnost dveh različnih BERT modelov, ki uporabljajo različne deleže člankov, dosledno visoka, naš najboljši model na kompletu validacije dosega 85% natančnost, najboljši model na kompletu pa 77%. Poleg tega smo ugotovili, da ima naš model močno konsistenco in da enako označuje neodvisne rezine istega izdelka. Nazadnje ugotavljamo, da naključno razporejanje vrstnega reda delov besed dramatično zmanjšuje natančnost preverjanja (na približno 60%), vendar pa mešanje skupin štirih ali več delov besed ohranja natančnost približno 80%, kar kaže, da model pridobi vrednost predvsem iz lokalnega konteksta.', 'ha': "Tuna ƙidãya a yanzu ta buɗe Bidi-rekidal Encoder Repositions from Transformers (BERT) Model (Devlin et al. 2018) for the Hiperpartan News Find. Yi amfani da wani ƙarani na rubutu da hannayen da aka rubũta daga SemEal kamar tsarin gaske, za'a jarraba aikin parameters daban wa misali na BERT. Tuna gane cewa tsari daga misãlai biyu biyu daban BERT da ke amfani da rabo daban-nau'i cikin rubutun na ƙaranci, kuma da misãlai masu yin amfani da baƙata masu gyarawa a kan tsarin da za'a gaskata rasa 85% da sami'in da aka samu da shi a kan jarraba tsarin ya kai kai shekara 77%. Mun ƙara fatawa cẽwa misalinmu yana bayan wata tamkar da ba, kuma yana sanar da wasu irin na'ura da ba'a sani ba. Ga ƙarshe, za mu gane cewa, a randalar da tarakin takardar maganar, yana ƙara kima mai inganci (taki 60%), kuma amma idan an cire ƙungiyõyi na huɗu ko da sauri na tsari, yana da taƙaitaccen tsakanin 80%, kuma yana nuna misalin ya ƙari kima daga mazaɓan lokaci.", 'he': 'אנו חוקרים את מייצגי קודד בידי-תיקון המפותחים לאחרונה מהמודל Transformers (BERT) (Devlin et al. 2018) עבור משימת גילוי חדשות hyperpartisan. בשימוש תחתונה של מאמרים עם תווית יד מ SemEval כקבוצה אישור, אנו בודקים את ביצועים של פרמטרים שונים לדוגמנים BERT. אנו מוצאים כי מדויקת משני דוגמנים BERT שונים בשימוש במפורסמות שונות של המאמרים היא גבוהה באופן קבוע, עם המודל הכי טוב שלנו על קבוצת האישור להשיג מדויקת 85% והמודל הכי טוב על קבוצת הבדיקות להשיג 77%. קבענו נוסף שמודל שלנו מציג תואמות חזקה, תווים חתיכות עצמאות של אותו מאמר באופן זהה. סוף סוף, אנו מוצאים שפעולה אקראית של פיסות מילים מפחידה דרמטית את מדויקת האישור (ל-60% בערך), אך קבוצות המעורבות של ארבעה או יותר פיסות מילים שומרות מדויקת של כ-80%, שמצביעות על הדוגמא מרוויחה בעיקר ערך מהקשר המקומי.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཉེ་ཆར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་Bidi-rectional Encoder Representations from Transformers (BERT) model (Devlin et al. 2018) for the hyperpartisan news detection task. Using a subset of hand-labeled articles from SemEval as a validation set, we test the performance of different parameters for BERT models. We find that accuracy from two different BERT models using different proportions of the articles is consistently high, with our best-performing model on the validation set achieving 85% accuracy and the best-performing model on the test set achieving 77%. The best-performing model on the test set achieving 77%. ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གཅིག་མཚུངས་གཅིག་གི་རྣམ་པ་གསལ་མཐོང་བ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། མཐའ་མར་དུ། འུ་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་ཐ་སྙད་ཆ་རིམ་གྱི་གོ་རིམ་བཟོ་བ་ནི་ཕན་ཚུན་དག་ཚད་དམར་བ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval-2019 Task 4 : The D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'fr': 'Harvey Mudd College au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 4\xa0: Le détecteur de nouvelles hyperpartisan D.X. Beaumont', 'pt': 'Harvey Mudd College no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 4: O D.X. Detector de notícias hiperpartidárias Beaumont', 'es': 'Tarea 4 de Harvey Mudd College en Semeval-2019: El detector hiperpartidista de noticias de D.X. Beaumont', 'ja': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval -2019 Task 4: The D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'zh': '哈维穆德学院在SemEval-2019务4:D.X.博蒙特超党新闻探测器', 'ar': 'كلية هارفي مود في SemEval-2019 المهمة 4: منطقة D.X. مكشاف أخبار بومونت الحزبي', 'hi': 'हार्वे Mudd कॉलेज SemEval-2019 टास्क 4 में: डी.एक्स. ब्यूमोंट Hyperpartisan समाचार डिटेक्टर', 'ru': 'Колледж Harvey Mudd на SemEval-2019 Задача 4: Гиперпартизанский детектор новостей D.X. Beaumont', 'ga': 'Coláiste Harvey Mudd ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 4: An D.X. Brathadóir Nuachta Hyperpartisan Beaumont', 'ka': 'ჰაპვი მდე კოლეჯაში SemEval-2019 დავალება 4: D.X. ბუმონტი ჰიპერპორტიზანი ინფორმაციის ევტექტორი', 'el': 'Κολλέγιο Harvey Mudd στο SemEval-2019 Εργασία 4: Ο Υπερκομματικός Ανιχνευτής ειδήσεων D.X. Beaumont', 'hu': 'Harvey Mudd College a SemEval-2019 4. feladat: A D.X. Beaumont hiperpartizán hírek detektor', 'it': 'Harvey Mudd College a SemEval-2019 Task 4: Il rivelatore di notizie iperpartigiane D.X. Beaumont', 'kk': 'Харви Мудд колледжі жарым-2019 тапсырмасының 4- тапсырмасы: D.X. Биумонт гиперпартизан жаңалық детекторы', 'mk': 'Харви Муд колеџ на SemEval-2019 задача 4: Д.Х. Бомонт Хиперпартисан новински детектор', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 4-ല്\u200d ഹാര്\u200dവി മുഡ്ഡ് കോളേജ്: ഡി.എക്സ്. ബീയൂമോണ്ട് ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസാന്\u200d നിവാര്\u200dത്ത ഡിക്ട', 'mn': 'Харви Мудд коллежийн SemEval-2019 ажил 4: D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'ms': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval-2019 Task 4: The D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'lt': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval-2019 Task 4: The D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'mt': 'Harvey Mudd College f’SemEval-2019 Task 4: The D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'pl': 'Harvey Mudd College w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 4: Wykrywacz wiadomości nadpartyjnych D.X. Beaumont', 'no': 'Harvey Mudd College at semiEval-2019 Task 4: D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'sr': 'Harvey Mudd College na semiEval-2019 Task 4: D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'ro': 'Colegiul Harvey Mudd la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 4: Detectorul de știri hiperpartizan D.X. Beaumont', 'so': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval-2019 Task 4: The D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'sv': 'Harvey Mudd College på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 4: D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'si': 'හර්වී මුඩ් කාලෙජ්ජාව සෙම්වෙල්-2019 වැඩ 4: D.X. බුමෝන්ට් හායිපර්පාර්ටිසන් වාර්තාව පරීක්ෂකය', 'ta': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval-2019 Task 4: The D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'ur': 'ہروی مود کالج سیم اول-2019 ٹاکس 4: ڈی.کس. بیومونت ہیرپارٹیسان نیویس ڈیٹاکٹر', 'uz': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval-2019 Task 4: The D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'vi': 'Harvey Mudd College ở Semkhai ly-thẩm 9 Task 4: D.X. Beaumont thung lũng Hyperdu mục truyền tin.', 'bg': 'Колежът Харви Мъд в СемЕвал-2019 Задача 4: Хиперпартизанският детектор за новини на Д.Х. Бомонт', 'nl': 'Harvey Mudd College bij SemEval-2019 Taak 4: De D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan Nieuws Detector', 'da': 'Harvey Mudd College på SemEval-2019 Opgave 4: D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan Nyhedsdetektor', 'hr': 'Harvey Mudd College na semiEval-2019 zadatku 4: D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'id': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval-2019 Task 4: The D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'de': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 4: Der D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'ko': '하비무드대학SemEval-19임무4:D.X.보몬트초당파뉴스탐지기', 'fa': 'کالج هاروی مود در مامور ۲۰۱۹ کار ۴: کارآگاه اخبار بیومونت هوپر پارتیسان', 'sw': 'Chuo Kikuu cha Harvey Mudd katika SemEval-2019 Kazi 4: Mtetezi wa habari wa D X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan', 'af': 'Harvey Mudd College by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 4: Die D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan Nuusdetektor', 'tr': 'SemEval-2019 Görev 4: The D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan Haberpartisan Detector', 'sq': 'Harvey Mudd College në SemEval-2019 Task 4: D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'am': 'የሴምEval-2019 ስራ 4 ሀርቪ ሙዲ ኮሌጅ: ዲ.X. ቢዩኖት Hyperpartisan ዜና አዋቂቃ', 'az': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval-2019 Task 4: The D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৪-এ হার্ভি মুদ্দ কলেজ: ডি. এক্স বিয়ামোন্ট হাইপার্পার্সিন নিউজ ডিটেক্টর', 'hy': 'Հարվի Մուդդի համալսարանը, 2019 թվականի "Սեմեվալ"-ի 4. հանձնարարությունը\' D.X. Բյումոնթ Հիպերպարտիզան նորությունների հայտնաբերողը', 'ca': 'Harvey Mudd College a SemEval-2019 Task 4: The D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'cs': 'Harvey Mudd College na SemEval-2019 Úkol 4: D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartyzánní detektor zpráv', 'et': 'Harvey Muddi kolledž SemEval-2019 ülesanne 4: D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'bs': 'Harvey Mudd College na semiEval-2019 Task 4: D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'fi': 'Harvey Mudd College SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 4: D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'jv': 'Hervey Mudde kolèji nang semebal-2011 task 4: The D.X. Biomont Typerpartisan New detecttor', 'ha': 'Harve Muddan College at SemEV-2019 Task 4: The D.X. Biumont Hyperpartsan News', 'sk': 'Harvey Mudd College na SemEval-2019 Naloga 4: D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartizanski detektor novic', 'he': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval-2019 Task 4: The D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector', 'bo': 'Harvey Mudd College at SemEval-2019 Task 4: The D.X. Beaumont Hyperpartisan News Detector'}
{'en': 'We use the 600 hand-labelled articles from SemEval Task 4 to hand-tune a classifier with 3000 features for the Hyperpartisan News Detection task. Our final system uses features based on bag-of-words (BoW), analysis of the article title, language complexity, and simple sentiment analysis in a naive Bayes classifier. We trained our final system on the 600,000 articles labelled by publisher. Our final system has an accuracy of 0.653 on the hand-labeled test set. The most effective features are the Automated Readability Index and the presence of certain words in the title. This suggests that hyperpartisan writing uses a distinct writing style, especially in the title.', 'fr': "Nous utilisons les 600 articles étiquetés à la main de SemEval Task 4 pour régler manuellement un classificateur avec 3 000 fonctionnalités pour la tâche Hyperpartisan News Detection. Notre système final utilise des fonctionnalités basées sur le sac de mots (BoW), l'analyse du titre de l'article, la complexité de la langue et une analyse simple des sentiments dans un classificateur bayésien naïf. Nous avons formé notre système final sur les 600 000 articles étiquetés par l'éditeur. Notre système final a une précision de 0,653 sur l'ensemble de test étiqueté à la main. Les fonctionnalités les plus efficaces sont l'index de lisibilité automatique et la présence de certains mots dans le titre. Cela suggère que l'écriture hyperpartisane utilise un style d'écriture distinct, en particulier dans le titre.", 'es': 'Usamos los 600 artículos etiquetados a mano de la tarea 4 de SemEval para ajustar a mano un clasificador con 3000 funciones para la tarea de detección de noticias hiperpartidistas. Nuestro sistema final utiliza funciones basadas en bolsa de palabras (BoW), análisis del título del artículo, complejidad del lenguaje y análisis simple de sentimientos en un clasificador bayes ingenuo. Entrenamos a nuestro sistema final sobre los 600 000 artículos etiquetados por el editor. Nuestro sistema final tiene una precisión de 0.653 en el conjunto de prueba etiquetado a mano. Las funciones más eficaces son el Índice de legibilidad automatizado y la presencia de ciertas palabras en el título. Esto sugiere que la escritura hiperpartidista utiliza un estilo de escritura distinto, especialmente en el título.', 'ar': 'نستخدم 600 مقالة معنونة يدويًا من SemEval Task 4 لضبط المصنف يدويًا مع 3000 ميزة لمهمة Hyperpartisan News Detection. يستخدم نظامنا النهائي ميزات تستند إلى حقيبة الكلمات (BoW) ، وتحليل عنوان المقالة ، وتعقيد اللغة ، وتحليل المشاعر البسيط في مصنف Bayes الساذج. قمنا بتدريب نظامنا النهائي على 600000 مقالة تم تصنيفها بواسطة الناشر. تبلغ دقة نظامنا النهائي 0.653 في مجموعة الاختبار الموصوفة يدويًا. أكثر الميزات فاعلية هي مؤشر القراءة الآلي ووجود كلمات معينة في العنوان. يشير هذا إلى أن الكتابة الحزبية تستخدم أسلوب كتابة مميزًا ، خاصة في العنوان.', 'pt': 'Usamos os 600 artigos rotulados à mão da Tarefa 4 do SemEval para ajustar manualmente um classificador com 3.000 recursos para a tarefa de detecção de notícias do Hyperpartisan. Nosso sistema final usa recursos baseados em bag-of-words (BoW), análise do título do artigo, complexidade da linguagem e análise simples de sentimentos em um classificador Bayes ingênuo. Treinamos nosso sistema final nos 600.000 artigos rotulados por editora. Nosso sistema final tem uma precisão de 0,653 no conjunto de teste rotulado à mão. Os recursos mais eficazes são o Índice de Legibilidade Automatizado e a presença de certas palavras no título. Isso sugere que a escrita hiperpartidária usa um estilo de escrita distinto, especialmente no título.', 'ja': 'SemEvalタスク4の600の手書きラベルの記事を使用して、ハイパーパーパーティサンニュース検出タスクの3000の機能を備えた分類子を手動で調整します。私たちの最終的なシステムは、単語袋（ BoW ）、記事タイトルの分析、言語の複雑さ、および稚拙なベイズ分類器での単純な感情分析に基づいた機能を使用しています。私たちは、出版社によってラベル付けされた60万の記事について、最終的なシステムをトレーニングしました。当社の最終システムは、手書きラベルの付いた試験器の精度が0.653です。最も効果的な機能は、自動可読性インデックスとタイトル内の特定の単語の存在です。これは、特にタイトルに超党派的な書き方が明確な書き方を使用していることを示唆しています。', 'zh': '吾以 SemEval Task 4 中 600 篇手动标记之文手动调 3000 功能之器,施于超党新闻检。 终于单词囊 (BoW)、文章题析、言语复杂性素贝叶斯分类器简情析之功。 版商标记之600,000文终系之培训。 吾曹终系手动标记之测试集上准确率为0.653。 至效自可读性索引,标题单词存。 此明超党用独行风格,特在标题中也。', 'hi': 'हम Hyperpartisan समाचार का पता लगाने कार्य के लिए 3000 सुविधाओं के साथ एक क्लासिफायर हाथ धुन करने के लिए SemEval कार्य 4 से 600 हाथ से लेबल लेख का उपयोग करें। हमारी अंतिम प्रणाली बैग-ऑफ-वर्ड्स (BoW), लेख शीर्षक का विश्लेषण, भाषा जटिलता, और एक भोले Bayes क्लासिफायर में सरल भावना विश्लेषण के आधार पर सुविधाओं का उपयोग करती है। हमने प्रकाशक द्वारा लेबल किए गए 600,000 लेखों पर अपनी अंतिम प्रणाली को प्रशिक्षित किया। हमारे अंतिम सिस्टम में हाथ से लेबल किए गए परीक्षण सेट पर 0.653 की सटीकता है। सबसे प्रभावी विशेषताएं स्वचालित पठनीयता सूचकांक और शीर्षक में कुछ शब्दों की उपस्थिति हैं। इससे पता चलता है कि हाइपरपार्टिसन लेखन एक अलग लेखन शैली का उपयोग करता है, खासकर शीर्षक में।', 'ru': 'Мы используем 600 статей SemEval Task 4 с ручной маркировкой, чтобы вручную настроить классификатор с 3000 функциями для задачи Hyperpartisan News Detection. Наша финальная система использует особенности, основанные на мешке слов (BoW), анализе названия статьи, сложности языка и простом анализе настроений в наивном классификаторе Байеса. Мы обучили нашу финальную систему 600 000 статей, помеченных издателем. Наша конечная система имеет точность 0,653 на наборе испытаний с ручной маркировкой. Наиболее эффективными признаками являются Автоматизированный индекс удобочитаемости и наличие определенных слов в названии. Это говорит о том, что гиперпартиканское письмо использует особый стиль письма, особенно в названии.', 'ga': 'Bainimid úsáid as an 600 alt lámh-lipéadaithe ó Thasc SemEval 4 chun aicmitheoir a dhéanamh de láimh le 3000 gné don tasc Braite Nuachta Hyperpartisan. Úsáideann ár gcóras deiridh gnéithe atá bunaithe ar mhála focal (BoW), anailís ar theideal an ailt, castacht teanga, agus anailís shimplí ar mheon in aicmitheoir naive Bayes. Chuireamar oiliúint ar ár gcóras deiridh ar na 600,000 alt atá lipéadaithe ag an bhfoilsitheoir. Tá cruinneas 0.653 ag ár gcóras deiridh ar an tacar tástála lipéadaithe láimhe. Is iad na gnéithe is éifeachtaí ná an tInnéacs um Inléiteacht Uathoibrithe agus láithreacht focail áirithe sa teideal. Tugann sé seo le tuiscint go n-úsáideann scríbhneoireacht hipearpháirteach stíl scríbhneoireachta ar leith, go háirithe sa teideal.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ გამოყენებთ 600 ხელის მარტიკულები SemEval Task 4-დან, რომელიც კლასიფიკაციას 3000 ფუნქციებით Hyperpartisan News Detection მოვლენისთვის. ჩვენი ბოლო სისტემის გამოყენება სიტყვების ფუნქციები (BoW), წილაკის სათაური, ენის კომპლექსიტების ანალიზაციის, და მარტივი სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციის ნაირი ბაიზის კ ჩვენ დასაწყისი სისტემა 600 000 არქილზე, რომელიც პოვექტირებით აღწერა. ჩვენი საბოლოო სისტემა 0,653-ის მართლა შენიშვნელოვანი ტესტის შესახებ. ყველაზე ეფექტიური ფუნქციები არის ავტომატიური კითხვის ინდექსი და სხვა სიტყვების სახელში. ეს იტყვებს, რომ ჰიპერპორტიანი წერილება გამოყენება განსხვავებული წერილების სტილი, განსაკუთრებით სათაუროში.', 'hu': 'A SemEval Task 4 600 kézzel jelölt cikke segítségével kézzel hangolhatunk egy 3000 funkcióval rendelkező osztályozót a Hyperpartisan News Detection feladathoz. A végső rendszerünk a szavak zsákján (BoW), a cikk címének elemzésén, a nyelvi összetettségen és egyszerű érzelmek elemzésén alapuló funkciókat használ egy naiv Bayes osztályozóban. A végső rendszerünket a kiadó által címkézett 600 000 cikkre képeztük. A végső rendszerünk pontossága 0,653 a kézzel jelölt tesztkészleten. A leghatékonyabb funkciók az automatizált olvashatósági index és bizonyos szavak jelenléte a címben. Ez arra utal, hogy a hiperpartizán írás különböző írási stílust használ, különösen a címben.', 'it': "Usiamo i 600 articoli etichettati a mano di SemEval Task 4 per sintonizzare manualmente un classificatore con 3000 funzionalità per il compito Hyperpartisan News Detection. Il nostro sistema finale utilizza funzionalità basate su bag-of-words (BoW), analisi del titolo dell'articolo, complessità linguistica e semplice analisi sentimentale in un ingenuo classificatore Bayes. Abbiamo addestrato il nostro sistema finale sui 600.000 articoli etichettati dall'editore. Il nostro sistema finale ha una precisione di 0,653 sul set di test etichettato a mano. Le caratteristiche più efficaci sono l'indice di leggibilità automatizzato e la presenza di determinate parole nel titolo. Questo suggerisce che la scrittura iperpartigiana utilizza uno stile di scrittura distinto, soprattutto nel titolo.", 'kk': 'Біз 4- ден SemEval тапсырмасынан 600 қолмен жарлық мақалаларды қолдану үшін Hyperpartisan жаңалық тапсырмасының 3000 мүмкіндіктері бар классификациясын қолдану үшін қолданымыз. Біздің соңғы жүйеміз мақалалардың айдарын, тілдердің комплекстері және найтивті Bayes классификациясындағы қарапайым сезімдердің анализациясын қолданады. Біз ең соңғы жүйемізді басып шығарушының атауы 600 000 мақала туралы оқыдық. Біздің соңғы жүйемізде 0,653 тест жиынында дұрыс бар. Ең эффективті мүмкіндіктері - Автоматты оқу мүмкіндігі индексі және айдарында кейбір сөздер бар. Бұл гиперпартияның жазуының түрлі жазу стилін қолданатын сипаттамасы, әсіресе айдарында.', 'el': 'Χρησιμοποιούμε τα 600 χειρόγραφα άρθρα από την εργασία για να συντονίσουμε με το χέρι έναν ταξινομητή με χαρακτηριστικά 3000 για την εργασία ανίχνευσης υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων. Το τελικό μας σύστημα χρησιμοποιεί χαρακτηριστικά βασισμένα σε σάκο λέξεων (BoW), ανάλυση του τίτλου του άρθρου, πολυπλοκότητα της γλώσσας και απλή ανάλυση συναισθημάτων σε έναν αφελές ταξινομητή Μπέγιες. Εκπαιδεύσαμε το τελικό μας σύστημα στα 600.000 άρθρα που επισημαίνονται από τον εκδότη. Το τελικό σύστημά μας έχει ακρίβεια 0.653 στο χέρι-μαρκαρισμένο σύνολο δοκιμής. Τα πιο αποτελεσματικά χαρακτηριστικά είναι ο αυτοματοποιημένος δείκτης αναγνωσιμότητας και η παρουσία ορισμένων λέξεων στον τίτλο. Αυτό υποδηλώνει ότι η υπερκομματική γραφή χρησιμοποιεί ένα ξεχωριστό στυλ γραφής, ειδικά στον τίτλο.', 'ms': 'Kami menggunakan 600 artikel yang ditabel tangan dari SemEval Task 4 untuk tune tangan klasifikasi dengan 3000 ciri-ciri untuk tugas pengesan berita Hyperpartisan. Our final system uses features based on bag-of-words (BoW), analysis of the article title, language complexity, and simple sentiment analysis in a naive Bayes classifier.  Kami melatih sistem terakhir kami pada 600,000 artikel yang ditabel oleh penerbit. Sistem terakhir kita mempunyai ketepatan 0.653 pada set ujian yang ditabel tangan. Fungsi yang paling berkesan ialah Indeks Pembacaan Automatik dan kehadiran perkataan tertentu dalam tajuk. Ini menunjukkan bahawa tulisan hiperpartisan menggunakan gaya tulisan yang berbeza, terutama dalam tajuk.', 'mk': 'We use the 600 hand-labelled articles from SemEval Task 4 to hand-tune a classifier with 3000 features for the Hyperpartisan News Detection task.  Нашиот финален систем користи карактеристики базирани на торба на зборови (BoW), анализа на насловот на статијата, јазичка комплексност и едноставна анализа на чувствата во наивен класификатор на Bayes. Го трениравме нашиот финален систем на 600.000 статии означени од издавачот. Нашиот финален систем има точност од 0,653 на рачно означениот тест сет. Најефикасните карактеристики се Индексот на автоматизирана читливост и присуството на одредени зборови во титулата. Ова укажува на тоа дека хиперпартискиот пишување користи различен стил на пишување, особено во титулата.', 'lt': 'Naudojame 600 rankiniu ženklu pažymėtų SemEval 4 užduoties straipsnių, kad rankiniu būdu pritaikytume klasifikatorių su 3000 požymių hiperpartizmo naujienų aptikimo užduotims. Mūsų galutinėje sistemoje naudojami požymiai, pagrįsti žodžių maišeliu (BoW), gaminio pavadinimo analize, kalbos sudėtingumu ir paprasta jausmų analize naiviame Bayes klasifikatoriuje. Mes išmokėme savo paskutinę sistemą 600 000 straipsnių, pažymėtų leidėjo. Mūsų galutinė sistema turi 0,653 tikslumo rankiniu bandymų rinkiniu. Veiksmingiausi požymiai yra Automatinio skaitomumo indeksas ir tam tikrų žodžių buvimas pavadinime. This suggests that hyperpartisan writing uses a distinct writing style, especially in the title.', 'mn': 'Бид SemEval Task 4-ээс 600 гар нэрлэгдсэн баримтуудыг ашиглаж, Hyperpartisan News Detection ажлын 3000 хувилбартай хуваалцагчдыг гараар хуваалцах хэрэгтэй. Бидний сүүлийн систем үг (BoW) дээр үндсэн өөрчлөлтийг ашигладаг. Бидний бичгийн нэр, хэл төвөгтэй байдлын шинжилгээний шинжилгээ ашигладаг. Бид сүүлийн системийг хэвлэгч нарын нэрлэгдсэн 600 мянган бүтээгдэхүүн дээр суралцаж өгсөн. Манай сүүлийн систем гартай тест хэмжээнд 0.653 тодорхой байдаг. Хамгийн үр дүнтэй зүйлс бол Автоматик унших чадварын индекс, нэр дэвшүүлэгт зарим үгнүүд байдаг. Энэ нь гипер хэсгүүдийн бичил нь өөр өөр бичил хэлбэрийг ашигладаг, ялангуяа нэр хэлбэрээр.', 'mt': 'We use the 600 hand-labelled articles from SemEval Task 4 to hand-tune a classifier with 3000 features for the Hyperpartisan News Detection task.  Is-sistema finali tagħna tuża karatteristiċi bbażati fuq borża tal-kliem (BoW), analiżi tat-titolu tal-artikolu, kumplessità lingwistika, u analiżi sempliċi tas-sentimenti f’klassifikatur naïve Bayes. Taħriġna s-sistema finali tagħna dwar is-600,000 artikolu ttikkettati mill-pubblikatur. Is-sistema finali tagħna għandha preċiżjoni ta’ 0.653 fuq is-sett tat-test bit-tikketta tal-idejn. L-aktar karatteristiċi effettivi huma l-Indiċi Awtomatiku tal-Readability u l-preżenza ta’ ċerti kliem fit-titolu. Dan jissuġġerixxi li l-kitba iperpartizjana tuża stil distint tal-kitba, speċjalment fit-titolu.', 'no': 'Vi bruker 600 handmerket artikkela frå semiEval oppgåve 4 for å handsetja ei klassifisering med 3000 funksjonar for oppgåva for Hyperpartisan News Detection. Sistemet vårt siste bruker funksjonar basert på bagen av ord (BoW), analysen av artikkeltittet, språk kompleksitet og enkelt sentimentanalyse i ein naive Bayes- klassifisering. Vi lærte det siste systemet vårt på 600 000 artiklar som er merket av publiserande. Det siste systemet vår har eit nøyaktig 0,653 på testsettet med håndmerket. Dei mest effektive funksjonane er den automatiske lesabilitetsindeksen og eksisterende ord i tittelen. Dette tyder på at hyperpartisan skriving brukar ein skildande skriftstil, spesielt i tittelen.', 'pl': 'Używamy 600 ręcznie etykietowanych artykułów SemEval Task 4 do ręcznego dostrojenia klasyfikatora z funkcjami 3000 do zadania Hyperpartisan News Detection. Nasz ostateczny system wykorzystuje funkcje oparte na torbie słów (BoW), analizie tytułu artykułu, złożoności języka oraz prostej analizie sentymentów w naiwnym klasyfikatorze Bayesa. Przeszkoliliśmy nasz ostateczny system na 600.000 artykułach etykietowanych przez wydawcę. Nasz ostateczny system ma dokładność 0.653 na ręcznie etykietowanym zestawie testowym. Najbardziej skutecznymi funkcjami są automatyczny indeks czytelności oraz obecność określonych słów w tytule. Sugeruje to, że pisanie hyperpartyzanckie wykorzystuje odrębny styl pisania, zwłaszcza w tytule.', 'sr': 'Koristimo 600 članaka sa ruke označenih od pola evalnog zadatka 4 kako bi se ruke uključili klasifikatoru sa 3000 karakteristika za zadatak hiperpartizanske novine. Naš konačni sistem koristi karakteristike na temelju torbe reči (BoW), analize titula članaka, kompleksnosti jezika i jednostavne analize sentiment a u naivnom klasifikatoru Bayes. Obučavali smo naš poslednji sistem na 600.000 članaka označenih izdavačima. Naš poslednji sistem ima taènost od 0,653 na setu testa. Najefikasnije karakteristike su Automatski Indeks Readability i prisustvo određenih reči u naslovu. Ovo predlaže da hiperpartisan pisanje koristi različit stil pisanja, posebno u naslovu.', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d ടാസ്ക് 4-ല്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള 600 കൈകൊണ്ടുള്ള പേരുകള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസാന്\u200d നിവാര്\u200dത്ത ഡിറ്റീഷന്\u200d  നമ്മുടെ അവസാന സിസ്റ്റം ബാഗ് ഓഫ് വാക്കുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വിശേഷങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, ലേഖനത്തിന്റെ തലക്കെട്ട We trained our final system on the 600,000 articles labelled by publisher.  Our final system has an accuracy of 0.653 on the hand-labeled test set.  ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിശേഷതകള്\u200d സ്വയം സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമാക്കിയ വീണ്ടും സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നതും തലക്കെട്ടില്\u200d ചില ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസ്സാന്\u200d എഴുതുന്നത് വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഒരു എഴുതുന്ന രീതിയാണ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് എന്ന്', 'si': 'අපි හයිපර්පාර්ටිසන් වාර්තාව හොයාගන්න වැඩසටහන් විශේෂකය 3000 තියෙන ලේබල් 600 ක් භාවිත කරනවා. අපේ අන්තිම පද්ධතිය භාවිතා කරනවා බෑග් වචන (BoW) වලින් අධික විශේෂය, භාෂාව සංකෘතිය, සහ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂණ විශ අපි අපේ අන්තිම පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරකාශකයෙන් ලේබල් 600,000ක් තියෙනවා. අපේ අන්තිම පද්ධතියේ අත්තිම පරීක්ෂණ සෙට් එකේ 0.653 ක් තියෙනවා. ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂතාවක් තමයි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක කියවන්න පුළුවන් සංකේතය සහ විශ මේක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා හායිපර් පාර්ටිසන් ලියනය විශේෂ ලියනය පාවිච්චි කරනවා, විශේෂය', 'so': 'Waxaynu isticmaalnaa 600 warqadaha la qoray ee laga soo qoray SemEval Task 4 si aan gacanta ugu qorno fasax leh 3000 gaar ah oo loo sameeyo shuqulka garsooridda ee Hyperpartisan News. nidaamkayaga ugu dambeeya wuxuu isticmaalaa tayooyin ku saleysan baaskii ku qoran (BoW), baaritaanka warqada title, qalabka complex, iyo baaritaanka maandooriyaha fudud oo ku qoran naïve Bayes. Waxaana ku tababarinnay nidaamka ugu dambeeya ee warqadaha la qoray warqadaha warqadaha warqadaha kasoo baxa 600,000. Our final system has an accuracy of 0.653 on the hand-labeled test set.  Xiriikhda ugu shaqeeya waxyaabaha ugu saabsan waa Index u gaar ah ee dib u noqoshada iyo heysta hadal cayiman oo ku qoran title. Taas waxaa loola jeedaa in qoraalka hyperpartisan uu isticmaalaa qaab qoraal gaar ah, khusuusan ku qoran title.', 'sv': 'Vi använder de 600 handmärkta artiklarna från SemEval Task 4 för att handjustera en klassificerare med 3000 funktioner för Hyperpartisan News Detection uppgiften. Vårt slutliga system använder funktioner baserade på bag-of-words (BoW), analys av artikelns titel, språkkomplexitet och enkel sentimentalanalys i en naiv Bayes klassificerare. Vi utbildade vårt slutliga system på de 600 000 artiklar som märkts av utgivaren. Vårt slutliga system har en noggrannhet på 0,653 på den handmärkta testuppsättningen. De mest effektiva funktionerna är Automatisk läsbarhet Index och förekomsten av vissa ord i titeln. Detta tyder på att hyperpartisan skrivning använder en distinkt skrivstil, särskilt i titeln.', 'ro': 'Folosim cele 600 de articole etichetate manual din SemEval Task 4 pentru a regla manual un clasificator cu 3000 de caracteristici pentru activitatea Hyperpartisan News Detection. Sistemul nostru final folosește caracteristici bazate pe sac-of-words (BoW), analiza titlului articolului, complexitatea limbii și analiza simplă a sentimentelor într-un clasificator naiv Bayes. Am instruit sistemul nostru final pe cele 600.000 de articole etichetate de editor. Sistemul nostru final are o precizie de 0,653 pe setul de testare etichetat manual. Cele mai eficiente caracteristici sunt Indicele de citire automată și prezența anumitor cuvinte în titlu. Acest lucru sugerează că scrierea hiperpartizană folosește un stil distinct de scriere, în special în titlu.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் செம்Eval பணியில் இருந்து 600 கையில் குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட கட்டுரைகளை பயன்படுத்தி 3000 குணங்களுடன் ஒரு வகுப்பாளரை கையில் எடுத்து கொள்க எங்கள் இறுதியாக அமைப்பு பாக்- வார்த்தைகளை அடிப்படையில் பயன்படுத்துகிறது, கட்டுரைய தலைப்பு, மொழி சிக்கல், மற்றும் சுலபமான உணர்வு ஆய்வு ப We trained our final system on the 600,000 articles labelled by publisher.  எங்கள் இறுதி அமைப்பு கையில் குறிப்பிட்ட சோதனை அமைப்பில் 0.653 சரியாக உள்ளது. மிகவும் விருப்பமுள்ள குணங்கள் தானாக திருத்தமுடியும் சுட்டி மற்றும் தலைப்பில் சில வார்த்தைகளின் இரு இது ஹைப்பர்பார்சன் எழுத்து வித்தியாசமான எழுத்து பாணியை பயன்படுத்துகிறது, குறிப்பாக தலைப்பில்.', 'ur': 'ہم ہیپر پارٹیسون نیویس ڈک ٹاکس کے لئے 3000 فرصت کے ساتھ ایک کلاسیر کو ہاتھ ٹونڈ کرنے کے لئے 600 ہاتھ لکڑے لکڑے استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ ہماری آخری سیسٹم باتوں کے بوگ (بوW) پر بنیاد رکھتا ہے، لکھائی کے سرليک، زبان پیچیدگی، اور ساده احساسات تحلیل کے استعمال کرتا ہے ایک نائب بیز کلیسٹر میں. ہم نے اپنی آخری سیسٹم کو 600 ہزار لکھائی پر آموزش دی۔ ہماری آخری سیسٹم کے ہاتھ لکڑی کی تست سٹ پر 0.653 کی دقیق ہے. سب سے اثر فائدہ اضافہ کرنا یہ ہے کہ آٹوٹیڈ پڑھنے کے قابلیت انڈکس اور تایٹل میں چند کلمات کے موجود ہیں. یہ اس بات سے پیش کرتا ہے کہ ہیپر پارتیسون لکھنے کی ایک مختلف لکھنے کی طرح استعمال کرتا ہے، مخصوصاً تایٹل میں۔', 'uz': "We use the 600 hand-labelled articles from SemEval Task 4 to hand-tune a classifier with 3000 features for the Hyperpartisan News Detection task.  Bizning oxirgi tizimmiz quyidagi soʻzlar (BoW) asosida, maqola sarlavhasini, tilning murakkablikligini va oddiy hissiyotni aniqlash imkoniyatlaridan foydalanadi. Biz nashriyotga qo'yilgan 600,000 maqolalarni o'rganimiz. Bizning oxirgi tizimimizning 0.653 tashkilotni qo'llangan sinov sohasida aniqlangan. @ info: whatsthis Bu yerda hyperpartisan yozuvchisi sarlavhasida oddiy yozish uslubi ishlatiladi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi sử dụng các bài báo in bằng tay 600 từ SemEvol Task 4 để hiệu chỉnh một người phân loại có giá 30p cho nhiệm vụ trinh sát tin tức Hyperdu kích. Hệ thống cuối cùng của chúng tôi sử dụng các tính năng dựa trên túi chữ (BoW), phân tích tiêu đề bài báo, phức tạp ngôn ngữ, và đơn giản phân tích cảm xúc trong một người phân loại gan dạ của Bayis. Chúng tôi đã huấn luyện hệ thống cuối cùng trên 600,000 Hệ thống cuối cùng của chúng tôi có độ chính xác 0.63n trên bộ thử được nhãn bằng tay. Các tính năng hiệu quả nhất là tính năng nắm vững tự động và sự hiện diện của một vài từ trong tiêu đề. Điều này cho thấy rằng văn phong du kích dùng một cách viết khác biệt, đặc biệt là trong tiêu đề.', 'bg': 'Използваме 600 ръчно обозначени статии от задача 4, за да настроим ръчно класификатор с 3000 функции за задачата Хиперпартизано откриване на новини. Крайната ни система използва функции, базирани на анализ на заглавието на статията, езикова сложност и прост анализ на сантименталността в наивен класификатор на Байс. Обучихме нашата крайна система за 600 000 статии, етикетирани от издателя. Нашата крайна система има точност от 0,653 на ръчно маркирания тест комплект. Най-ефективните функции са индексът за автоматизирана четливост и наличието на определени думи в заглавието. Това предполага, че хиперпартизанското писане използва различен стил на писане, особено в заглавието.', 'nl': 'We gebruiken de 600 handgelabelde artikelen van SemEval Task 4 om een classificator met 3000-functies met de hand af te stemmen voor de Hyperpartisan News Detection taak. Ons uiteindelijke systeem maakt gebruik van functies gebaseerd op bag-of-words (BoW), analyse van de artikeltitel, taalcomplexiteit en eenvoudige sentimentanalyse in een naïeve Bayes classificator. We hebben ons eindsysteem getraind op de 600.000 artikelen gelabeld door uitgever. Ons definitieve systeem heeft een nauwkeurigheid van 0.653 op de hand-gelabelde testset. De meest effectieve functies zijn de Automated Readability Index en de aanwezigheid van bepaalde woorden in de titel. Dit suggereert dat hyperpartisan schrijven een aparte schrijfstijl gebruikt, vooral in de titel.', 'da': 'Vi bruger de 600 håndmærkede artikler fra SemEval Task 4 til at håndtune en klassificering med 3000 funktioner til opgaven Hyperpartisan News Detection. Vores endelige system bruger funktioner baseret på taske-of-words (BoW), analyse af artiklens titel, sprogkompleksitet og simpel sentiment analyse i en naiv Bayes klassificering. Vi trænede vores endelige system på de 600.000 artikler mærket af forlag. Vores endelige system har en nøjagtighed på 0,653 på det håndmærkede testsæt. De mest effektive funktioner er automatiseret læsbarhedsindeks og tilstedeværelsen af visse ord i titlen. Dette tyder på, at hyperpartisan skrivning bruger en særskilt skrivestil, især i titlen.', 'hr': 'Koristimo 600 članaka s ruke označene od pola evalnog zadatka 4 kako bismo nadoknadili klasifikatora s 3000 karakteristika za zadatak otkrivanja Hyperpartisan vijesti. Naš konačni sustav koristi karakteristike na temelju torbe riječi (BoW), analize naslova članaka, složenosti jezika i jednostavne analize osjećanja u naivnom klasifikatoru Bayes. Obučavali smo naš konačni sustav na 600.000 članaka označenih izdavačima. Naš konačni sustav ima točnost od 0,653 na pokretu testa. Najučinkovitija karakteristika su Indeks za automatiziranje čitanja i prisustvo određenih riječi u naslovu. To ukazuje na to da hiperpartisan pisanje koristi različit način pisanja, posebno u naslovu.', 'de': 'Wir verwenden die 600-handbeschrifteten Artikel von SemEval Task 4, um einen Klassifikator mit 3000-Funktionen für die Aufgabe Hyperpartisan News Detection von Hand abzustimmen. Unser finales System verwendet Funktionen basierend auf Bag-of-Words (BoW), Analyse des Artikeltitels, Sprachkomplexität und einfache Stimmungsanalyse in einem naiven Bayes Klassifikator. Wir schulten unser Endsystem auf den 600.000 Artikeln, die vom Verlag gekennzeichnet sind. Unser endgültiges System hat eine Genauigkeit von 0.653 auf dem handbeschrifteten Testsatz. Die effektivsten Funktionen sind der automatisierte Lesbarkeitsindex und das Vorhandensein bestimmter Wörter im Titel. Dies deutet darauf hin, dass hyperparteiisches Schreiben einen ausgeprägten Schreibstil verwendet, insbesondere im Titel.', 'id': 'Kami menggunakan 600 artikel yang ditabel tangan dari SemEval Task 4 untuk mengatur tangan sebuah klasifikasi dengan 3000 fitur untuk tugas Deteksi Berita Hyperpartisan. Sistem akhir kami menggunakan fitur berdasarkan tas-kata (BoW), analisis judul artikel, kompleksitas bahasa, dan analisis sentimen sederhana dalam klasifikasi Bayes naif. Kami melatih sistem terakhir kami pada 600.000 artikel yang ditabel oleh penerbit. Our final system has an accuracy of 0.653 on the hand-labeled test set.  Karakteristik yang paling efektif adalah Indeks Pembacaan Otomatis dan kehadiran kata-kata tertentu di tajuk. Ini menunjukkan bahwa tulisan hyperpartisan menggunakan gaya tulisan yang berbeda, terutama dalam judul.', 'ko': 'SemEval Task 4의 600개의 손으로 태그를 붙인 기사를 사용하여 초당파 뉴스 검색 작업을 위해 3000개의 특징을 가진 분류기를 수동으로 조정합니다.우리의 최종 시스템은 소박한 베일러스 분류기에서 단어 패키지(BoW), 글 제목 분석, 언어 복잡성과 간단한 감정 분석 기능을 사용한다.우리는 상표 주석을 출판한 60만 편의 문장에 근거하여 최종 시스템에 대해 교육을 진행하였다.우리의 최종 시스템은 커서 테스트 집합의 정밀도가 0.653이다.가장 효과적인 기능은 자동으로 읽을 수 있는 색인과 제목의 일부 단어입니다.초당파 창작이 특히 제목에서 독특한 창작 풍격을 사용했음을 보여준다.', 'fa': 'ما از مطالعه\u200cهای ۶۰۰ دستی با علامت\u200cگذاری دستی از کار ۱۴ تا یک محرمانه با ۳۰۰۰ ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cشناسی Hyperpartisan استفاده کنیم. سیستم نهایی ما از ویژه\u200cها بر اساس کیف کلمات (BoW) استفاده می\u200cکند، تحلیل عنوان مقاله، پیچیدگی زبان، و تحلیل احساسات ساده در یک محرمانه\u200cگر ساده بیز است. ما سیستم نهایی خود را روی ۶۰۰۰۰۰ مقاله ای که توسط منتشر کننده مشخص شده آموزش دادیم. سیستم نهایی ما دقیق 0.653 در مجموعه آزمایش با علامت دست دارد. بزرگترین ویژگی\u200cهای موثر اینه که Index Readability Automated و presence of certain words in the title. این پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که نوشتن هیپر پارتیسان از طریق نوشتن متفاوتی استفاده می\u200cکند، مخصوصا در عنوان عنوان.', 'sw': 'Tunatumia makala 600 zilizotajwa mikononi kutoka kazi ya SemEval 4 ili kumweka mwandishi mwenye vipengele 3000 kwa ajili ya kazi ya Kuchunguza Habari za Hyperpartisan. Mfumo wetu wa mwisho unatumia vipengele vilivyo kwenye mfuko wa maneno (BoW), uchambuzi wa makala hiyo, utata wa lugha, na uchambuzi wa hisia rahisi katika mgawanyiko wa Bayes. We trained our final system on the 600,000 articles labelled by publisher.  Mfumo wetu wa mwisho una uhakika wa 0.653 kwenye seti ya jaribio lililowekwa mkono. Tamko zenye ufanisi zaidi ni Index ya Uhuru na uwepo wa maneno fulani kwenye kichwa cha habari. Hii inapendekeza kwamba kuandika kwa upande mkubwa hutumia mtindo wa kuandika tofauti, hasa kwenye kichwa cha habari.', 'tr': "Biz SemEval Task 4'den 600 elimde etiketli makamları kullanırız ve 3000 özellikleri Hyperpartisan Haberleri Tanıma görevi için elimize koyuyoruz. Biziň soňky sistemamyz (BoW) sözleriň bagly çyzgylygyna daýanýar, maksadyň sözbaşynyň, dilleriň sarhoşlyklarynyň analizi we nadir Bayes klasifikatynda ýeňil duýgular analizi ullanýar. Biz soňky sistemamyzy basypçy tarapyndan etiket edilen 600,000 makala hakynda okadyk. Biziň soňky sistemimizde 0.653 derejesi elimde etilen testiň düzümi bar. Iň täsirli karakterleriň Automatik Otomatik Okamak Indeksidir we sözleriň belli sözleriň bar. Bu hiperpartisanyň ýazmasynyň sözbaşy ýazma stilini ulanýandygyny maslahat berýär.", 'sq': 'Ne përdorim 600 artikuj me etiketë dore nga SemEval Task 4 për të rregulluar me dorë një klasifikues me 3000 funksione për detyrën e Detektimit të Lajmeve Hyperpartizane. Our final system uses features based on bag-of-words (BoW), analysis of the article title, language complexity, and simple sentiment analysis in a naive Bayes classifier.  Kemi trajnuar sistemin tonë përfundimtar në 600,000 artikuj të etiketuar nga botuesi. Sistemi ynë përfundimtar ka një saktësi 0.653 në grupin e testit me etiketë dore. Karakteristikat më efektive janë Indeksi i lexueshmërisë së Automatizuar dhe prania e disa fjalëve në titull. Kjo sugjeron se shkrimi hiperpartizan përdor një stil shkrimi të veçantë, veçanërisht në titull.', 'am': 'ከሴmEval ስራ 4 የ600 እጃቸውን ተለብጠው ጽሑፎችን ለHyperpartisan ዜና ማግኘት ስራ 3,000 እጃቸውን ለማድረግ እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ Our final system uses features based on bag-of-words (BoW), analysis of the article title, language complexity, and simple sentiment analysis in a naive Bayes classifier.  የፍጻሜውን ስርዓታችንን በጋዜጠኛ በ600 ሺህ ጽሑፎች ላይ አስተማርነው፡፡ የፍጻሜው ስርዓታችን የ0.653 እጃቸውን በጽሑፍ ፈተና ላይ ነው፡፡ የተጠቃሚ ምርጫዎች የራሱ አቀማመጥ ማውጣት ማውጫ ናቸው፡፡ ይህ የhyperpartisan ጽሑፍ የተለየ ጽሑፎችን በተለየ ጽሑፍ ዓይነት እንዲጠቀም ያስባል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք օգտագործում ենք 600 ձեռքով նշանակված հոդվածները, որոնք պատրաստվում են ՍեմԷվալ 4-ից, որպեսզի կարգավորենք դասակարգիչը 3000 հատկություններով Հիպերպարտեզիան նորությունների հայտնաբերման գործի համար: Մեր վերջնական համակարգը օգտագործում է առանձնահատկություններ, որոնք հիմնված են բառերի պայուսակի (BoW), հոդվածի անվանության վերլուծության, լեզվի բարդության և պարզ զգացմունքների վերլուծության վրա անիվ Bayes դասակարգում: Մենք սովորեցրեցինք մեր վերջին համակարգը 600,000 հոդվածների վրա, որոնք պիտակում էին հրատարակչի կողմից: Մեր վերջնական համակարգը ունի 0.653 ճշգրտություն ձեռքով նշված փորձարկումների համակարգում: Ամենաարդյունավետ հատկություններն են Ավտոմացված կարդալիության ինդեքսը և որոշ բառերի գոյությունը վերնագիրում: Սա նշանակում է, որ հիպերկայացի գրությունը օգտագործում է առանձնահատուկ գրողական ոճ, հատկապես վերնագիրը:', 'af': "Ons gebruik die 600 hand- etiketeerde artikels van SemEval Opdrag 4 na hand- tune 'n klassifiseerder met 3000 funksies vir die Hyperpartisan Nuusbeskrywing taak. Ons eindelike stelsel gebruik funksies gebaseer op sak van woorde (BoW), analiseer van die artikel titel, taal kompleksiteit en eenvoudige sentimentanaliseer in 'n naive Bayes klassifiseerder. Ons het ons eindelike stelsel opgelei op die 600,000 artikels wat deur die publiseer gemerk is. Ons eindelike stelsel het 'n presisie van 0. 653 op die hand-etiket toets stel. Die mees effektiewe funksies is die Automatiese Leesbaardeks en die voorsiening van sekere woorde in die titel. Hierdie stel voorstel dat hiperpartisan skryfing 'n eienskaplike skryfstyl gebruik, veral in die titel.", 'az': 'Biz HalfEval Task 4-dən 600 əl etiketli məktublarını Hyperpartisan Haqqı İnternet görevi üçün 3000 xüsusiyyətləri ilə əl-düzəltmək üçün istifadə edirik. Bizim son sistemimiz sözlərin torbasına (BoW) dayanan, məktub başlığının, dil kompleksitəsinin analizisini və naif Bayes klasifikatının basit hiss analizisini istifadə edir. Biz sonuncu sistemimizi 600.000 məktublara təhsil etdik. Bizim son sistemimiz əl etiketli sınama qutusunda 0,653 ədaləti var. Ən efektiv xüsusiyyətlər Avtomatik oxuyabilən Indeks və başlıqda bəzi sözlərin varlığıdır. Bu, hiperpartisan yazmağı müxtəlif yazmaq stilini istifadə edir, özlərinə də başlıqda.', 'bn': 'আমরা সেমভাল টাস্ক ৪ থেকে ৬০০ হাতের চিত্রিত প্রবন্ধ ব্যবহার করি হাইপার্পার্টিস্যান নিউজ ডিটেক্টরিশন কাজের জন্য ৩০০০ বিশেষকের হ Our final system uses features based on bag-of-words (BoW), analysis of the article title, language complexity, and simple sentiment analysis in a naive Bayes classifier.  আমরা প্রকাশিত ৬০০,০০০ প্রবন্ধগুলোতে আমাদের শেষ ব্যবস্থা প্রশিক্ষণ দিয়েছি। আমাদের শেষ ব্যবস্থা হাতের লেবেলেড সেটে ০.653 এর সঠিকভাবে আছে। সবচেয়ে কার্যকর বৈশিষ্ট্য হচ্ছে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে পুনর্বাসনের সূচী এবং শিরোনামে নির্দিষ্ট শব্দের উপস্থ এটি পরামর্শ দেয় যে হাইপার্পার্সিন লেখা একটি বিশেষ লেখার ধরন ব্যবহার করে, বিশেষ করে শিরোনামে।', 'bs': 'Koristimo 600 članaka na rukama označenih od pola evalnog zadatka 4 kako bi se rukopisali klasifikatorom sa 3000 karakteristika za zadatak detekcije Hyperpartisan Novosti. Naš konačni sistem koristi karakteristike na temelju torbe riječi (BoW), analize naslova članaka, kompleksnosti jezika i jednostavne analize osjećaja u naivnom klasifikatoru Bayes. Obučavali smo naš konačni sistem na 600.000 članaka označenih izdavačima. Naš konačni sistem ima preciznost od 0,653 na pokretu testa. Najučinkovitije karakteristike su Automatski Indeks za čitanje i prisustvo određenih riječi u naslovu. To predlaže da hiperpartisan pisanje koristi različit pisanje stila, posebno u naslovu.', 'ca': "Utilitzem els 600 articles etiquetats a mà de SemEval Task 4 per ajustar a mà un classificador amb 3000 característiques per la tasca de detecció hiperpartisana de notícies. El nostre sistema final utilitza característiques basades en la borsa de paraules (BoW), anàlisi del títol de l'article, complexitat lingüística i anàlisi de sentiments senzills en un classificador naiu de Bayes. Vam entrenar el nostre sistema final en 600.000 articles etiquetats per l'editor. El nostre sistema final té una precisió de 0,653 en el conjunt de proves etiquetat a mà. Les característiques més efectives són l'Índix de Llegibilitat Automàtica i la presença de certes paraules al títol. This suggests that hyperpartisan writing uses a distinct writing style, especially in the title.", 'cs': 'Používáme 600 ručně označené články SemEval Task 4 k ručnímu ladění klasifikátoru s funkcemi 3000 pro úlohu detekce hyperpartizánních zpráv. Náš finální systém využívá funkce založené na sáčku slov (BoW), analýze názvu článku, složitosti jazyka a jednoduché analýze sentimentů v naivním Bayesově klasifikátoru. Náš finální systém jsme trénovali na 600.000 článcích označených vydavatelem. Náš finální systém má přesnost 0,653 na ručně označené testovací sadě. Nejúčinnějšími funkcemi jsou automatizovaný index čitelnosti a přítomnost určitých slov v názvu. To naznačuje, že hyperstranické psaní používá výrazný styl psaní, zejména v názvu.', 'et': 'Me kasutame SemEval Task 4 600 käsitsi märgistatud artiklit, et käsitsi häälestada 3000 funktsiooniga klassifikaatorit Hyperpartisan News Detection ülesandeks. Meie lõplik süsteem kasutab funktsioone, mis põhinevad sõnakotil (BoW), artikli pealkirja analüüsil, keele keerukusel ja lihtsal sentimentaalüüsil naiivses Bayesi klassifikaatoris. Me koolitasime oma lõpliku süsteemi 600 000 artikli kohta, mille kirjastaja on märgistanud. Meie lõpliku süsteemi täpsus käsitsi märgistatud katsekomplektil on 0,653. Kõige tõhusamad funktsioonid on automatiseeritud loetavusindeks ja teatud sõnade olemasolu pealkirjas. See viitab sellele, et hüperpartisanne kirjutamine kasutab eraldiseisvat kirjutamisstiili, eriti pealkirjas.', 'fi': 'Käytämme SemEval Task 4:n 600 käsin merkittyä artikkelia, joilla on 3000 ominaisuutta Hyperpartisan News Detection -tehtävään. Lopullinen järjestelmämme käyttää ominaisuuksia, jotka perustuvat sanapussiin (BoW), artikkelin otsikon analyysiin, kielen monimutkaisuuteen ja yksinkertaiseen tunteiden analyysiin naiivilla Bayesin luokittelijoilla. Koulutimme lopullisen järjestelmämme kustantajan merkitsemien 600 000 artikkelin pohjalta. Lopullisen järjestelmämme tarkkuus on 0,653 käsin merkityssä testisarjassa. Tehokkaimpia ominaisuuksia ovat automaattinen luettavuusindeksi ja tiettyjen sanojen läsnäolo otsikossa. Tämä viittaa siihen, että hyperpartisaaninen kirjoittaminen käyttää erillistä kirjoitustyyliä, erityisesti otsikossa.', 'he': 'אנחנו משתמשים ב-600 מאמרים עם תווית יד מ-SemEval משימה 4 כדי לארגן ידיים מסווג עם 3000 תכונות עבור משימה גילוי חדשות היפרפרטיזן. המערכת הסופית שלנו משתמשת במיוחדים מבוססים על תיק המילים (BoW), ניתוח של כותר המאמר, מורכבת השפה, וניתוח רגשות פשוט בקליסדר בייס נאיבי. אימנו את המערכת האחרונה שלנו על 600,000 מאמרים שמתווימים על ידי המפיץ. למערכת הסופית שלנו יש מדויקה של 0.653 על קבוצת המבחנים המתוויפת ביד. המאפיינים הכי יעילים הם אינדקס קריאות אוטומטית והנוכחות של מילים מסוימות בתואר. This suggests that hyperpartisan writing uses a distinct writing style, especially in the title.', 'sk': 'Uporabljamo 600 ročno označenih člankov iz SemEval Task 4 za ročno nastavitev klasifikatorja s 3000 funkcijami za opravilo Hyperpartizana zaznavanje novic. Naš končni sistem uporablja funkcije, ki temeljijo na vrečki besed (BoW), analizi naslova članka, jezikovni kompleksnosti in preprosti analizi sentimenta v naivnem Bayesovem klasifikatorju. Naš končni sistem smo usposobili na 600.000 člankih, ki jih je označil založnik. Naš končni sistem ima natančnost 0,653 na ročno označenem testnem kompletu. Najučinkovitejše funkcije so indeks avtomatizirane berljivosti in prisotnost določenih besed v naslovu. To kaže, da hiperpartizansko pisanje uporablja različen slog pisanja, zlasti v naslovu.', 'jv': "We use the 60 hand-label Artiles from semiinval task 4 to hand-tune a category with 30 00 options for the Typerpartisan New detection task. Sistem anyir sistem tukulah sistem sistem sistem digawe-sistem sing basa ning bagi-of-words (Bow), akeh unalahsi layar, penjelongkamu kelas, lan sampeyan sampeyan sampeyan kanggo kelas nang unave bayes tau. Awak dhéwé ngeremusi sistem tukulah kanggo 6.000 sing ditambah kanggo ngirim barang kanggo ngirim barang. Sistem tukulah barêng-barêng saiki wis kelas 0. Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog Iki suggeruju akeh, sampeyan nggambar textattr", 'ha': 'Tuna amfani da 600-rubutun da aka rubuta daga SemEal Taimar 4 zuwa-tune wani mai classifiser da 3,000 na fassarar wa aikin Hiperpartsan News Ana amfani da tsari na ƙarshen ayukanmu na amfani da masu bassi-masu-faɗi (BoW), Anarari kan makala na takardan rubutun, da masu sauƙi cikin fasalin na Bayes. Mun sanar da na ƙarami a kan makala 600,000 da aka sanar da shi na fassarar. Tsarinmu na ƙarami yana da tsari na 0.653 a kan tsarin jarraba da hannayen da aka yi rubũtãwa. @ action: button Wannan yana son cẽwa rubũtun Hyperpartan na yi amfani da wata salo mai rarraba rubũtãwa, da haske cikin suna.', 'bo': 'We use the 600 hand-labelled articles from SemEval Task 4 to hand-tune a classifier with 3000 features for the Hyperpartisan News Detection task. ང་ཚོའི་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་མ་ལག ང་ཚོའི་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་མ་ལག་གི་རྩིས་ཐོག་མིང་དཔྱད་པ་ཞིག་གིས་དཔྱད་བྱས་པ ང་ཚོའི་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་མ་ལག་གི་ལག་ཁྱེར་གྱི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ཚད་ལྟར་0.653ཙམ་བདེ་སྟངས་ཡོད། ནུས་ཡོད་ཐག་ཆེ་ཤོས་བའི་ཆེ་ཆུང་དེ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཀློག་འཇུག་ནུས་ཀྱི་ཟུར་ཐོ འདིས་འབྲི་བ་ཆ་མཉམ་གྱི་འབྲི་བ་དེ་ལ་ཁྱད་པར་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ་ཅིག་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Spider-Jerusalem at SemEval-2019 Task 4 : Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'ar': 'Spider-Jerusalem في SemEval-2019 المهمة 4: الكشف عن الأخبار الحزبية', 'fr': 'Spider-Jerusalem au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 4\xa0: Détection hyperpartisane des actualités', 'pt': 'Spider-Jerusalem na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 4: Detecção de notícias hiperpartidárias', 'es': 'Spider-Jerusalem en Semeval-2019 Tarea 4: Detección de noticias hiperpartidistas', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019タスク4 ：ハイパーパーパーティサンニュース検出でのスパイダーエル', 'ru': 'Паук-Егерь на SemEval-2019 Задача 4: Обнаружение гиперпартийных новостей', 'zh': 'иңҳиӣӣиҖ¶и·Ҝж’’еҶ·еңЁSemEval-2019еҠЎ4:и¶…е…ҡж–°й—»жЈҖ', 'hi': 'स्पाइडर-यरूशलेम में SemEval-2019 कार्य 4: Hyperpartisan समाचार का पता लगाने', 'ga': 'Damhán alla Iarúsailéim ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 4: Brath Nuachta Hyperpartisan', 'ka': 'Spider-Jerusalem at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'el': 'Αράχνη-Ιερουσαλήμ στο έργο 4: Ανίχνευση υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων', 'hu': 'Spider-Jeruzsálem a SemEval-2019 4. feladat: Hyperpartizán hírek felismerése', 'kk': 'Жаңалық тапсырма 4: Hyperpartisan жаңалық анықтау', 'lt': '„Spider-Jerusalem“ programos „SemEval-2019“ 4 užduotis: hiperpartizmo žinių aptikimas', 'it': 'Spider-Jerusalem a SemEval-2019 Task 4: Rilevazione di notizie iperpartigiane', 'mk': 'Пајак-Ерусалим на SemEval-2019 задача 4: Детектирање на хиперпартисански вести', 'ms': 'Spider-Jerusalem di SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Pengesanan Berita Hyperpartisan', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 4: ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസാന്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്ത ഡിറ്റീഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Spider-Jerusalem f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 4: Sejbien tal-Aħbarijiet Hyperpartisan', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгч-Иерусалим нь SemEval-2019 ажил 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'no': 'Spider-Jerusalem ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'pl': 'Pająk-Jerozolima na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 4: Wykrywanie wiadomości hiperpartyjnych', 'ro': 'Spider-Ierusalim la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 4: Detectarea știrilor hiperpartizane', 'sr': 'Spider-Jerusalem na semiEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'sv': 'Spider-Jerusalem på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Spider-Jerusalem ee SemEval-2019 Shaqada 4: Wararka Hyperpartisan', 'ur': 'سیم ایولی-2019 ٹاکس 4 میں اسپیڈر-جرسلیم: ہیپر پارٹیسون خبروں کی آشنائی', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 செயல் 4: ஹைப்பர்பார்சன் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பு', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Spider-Jerusalem tại dịch vụ Semkhai quật 4: Thông báo Hyperdu', 'bg': 'Спайдър-Йерусалим на Задача 4: Откриване на хиперпартизани новини', 'nl': 'Spider-Jeruzalem op SemEval-2019 Taak 4: Hyperpartisan Nieuws Detectie', 'hr': 'Spider-Jerusalem na semiEval-2019 zadatak 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'da': 'Spider-Jerusalem på SemEval-2019 Opgave 4: Opdagelse af hyperpartisan nyheder', 'de': 'Spider-Jerusalem bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 4: Überparteiliche Nachrichtenerkennung', 'fa': 'عنکبوت-اورژانسل در نیم اول-2019 کار چهار: شناسایی اخبار هایپر پارتیسان', 'ko': '거미 예루살렘이Sem Eval-2019 미션4: 초당파 뉴스 검출', 'sw': 'Mpiga-Jerusalem kwenye SemEval-2019 Kazi 4: Utafiti wa Habari za Upinzani', 'af': 'Spider- Jerusalem by SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 4: Hyperpartisan Nuus Opdekking', 'id': 'Spider-Jerusalem di SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Deteksi Berita Hyperpartisan', 'sq': 'Spider-Jerusalem në SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'tr': 'Spider-Jerusalem at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'hy': '«Spider-Երուսաղեմը»-2019 թվականի «Սիմեվալ-2019» 4-րդ հանձնարարությունը՝ Հիպերպարտիզան նորությունների հայտնաբերումը', 'am': 'ስራ 4:', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯-এর স্পাইডার-জেরুজালেম: হাইপার্পার্টিসান নিউজ ডিটেকটিশন', 'az': 'Örümcə-Yerusalem, yarısı-2019 Gözəl 4: Hyperpartisan Haber Detection', 'cs': 'Pavoučí Jeruzalém na SemEval-2019 Úkol 4: Detekce hyperstranických zpráv', 'bs': 'Spider-Jerusalem na semiEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'ca': 'Spider-Jerusalem a SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'fi': 'Spider-Jerusalem SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'et': 'Spider-Jeruusalemm SemEval-2019 ülesandel 4: hüperpartisanide uudiste tuvastamine', 'jv': 'spider-jerusam at semiinval-2011 task 4: Typerpartisan New detection', 'sk': 'Spider-Jeruzalem na SemEval-2019 naloga 4: Hiperpartizansko odkrivanje novic', 'ha': 'Spider-Jerusalem at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'he': '"ספיידר-ירושלים" בסמיוול-2019 משימה 4:', 'bo': 'Spider-Jerusalem at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our system for detecting hyperpartisan news articles, which was submitted for the shared task in SemEval 2019 on Hyperpartisan News Detection. We developed a Support Vector Machine (SVM) model that uses TF-IDF of tokens, Language Inquiry and Word Count (LIWC) features, and structural features such as number of paragraphs and hyperlink count in an article. The model was trained on 645 articles from two classes : mainstream and hyperpartisan. Our system was ranked seventeenth out of forty two participating teams in the binary classification task with an accuracy score of 0.742 on the blind test set (the accuracy of the top ranked system was 0.822). We provide a detailed description of our preprocessing steps, discussion of our experiments using different combinations of features, and analysis of our results and prediction errors.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظامنا لاكتشاف المقالات الإخبارية شديدة الحزبية ، والتي تم إرسالها للمهمة المشتركة في SemEval 2019 على Hyperpartisan News Detection. قمنا بتطوير نموذج آلة متجه الدعم (SVM) الذي يستخدم TF-IDF من الرموز المميزة ، وميزات الاستعلام عن اللغة وعدد الكلمات (LIWC) ، والميزات الهيكلية مثل عدد الفقرات وعدد الارتباطات التشعبية في المقالة. تم تدريب النموذج على 645 مقالة من فئتين: السائدة والحزبية المفرطة. احتل نظامنا المرتبة السابعة عشرة من بين اثنين وأربعين فريقًا مشاركًا في مهمة التصنيف الثنائي بدرجة دقة 0.742 في مجموعة الاختبار الأعمى (كانت دقة النظام المصنف الأعلى 0.822). نقدم وصفًا مفصلاً لخطوات المعالجة المسبقة الخاصة بنا ، ومناقشة تجاربنا باستخدام مجموعات مختلفة من الميزات ، وتحليل نتائجنا وأخطاء التنبؤ.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre système de détection des articles de presse hyperpartisans, qui a été soumis pour la tâche partagée dans SemEval 2019 sur Hyperpartisan News Detection. Nous avons développé un modèle de machine à vecteurs de support (SVM) qui utilise TF-IDF de jetons, les fonctionnalités LIWC (Language Inquiry and Word Count) et des caractéristiques structurelles telles que le nombre de paragraphes et le nombre de liens hypertexte dans un article. Le modèle a été formé sur 645 articles de deux classes\xa0: mainstream et hyperpartisan. Notre système a été classé dix-septième sur quarante-deux équipes participantes à la tâche de classification binaire avec un score de précision de 0,742 sur le set de test à l'aveugle (la précision du système le mieux classé était de 0,822). Nous fournissons une description détaillée de nos étapes de prétraitement, une discussion de nos expériences utilisant différentes combinaisons de caractéristiques et une analyse de nos résultats et des erreurs de prédiction.", 'es': 'Este documento describe nuestro sistema para detectar artículos de noticias hiperpartidistas, que se envió para la tarea compartida en SemEval 2019 sobre Detección de noticias hiperpartidistas. Desarrollamos un modelo de máquina de vectores de soporte (SVM) que utiliza TF-IDF de tokens, funciones de consulta de idioma y recuento de palabras (LIWC) y características estructurales como el número de párrafos y el recuento de hipervínculos en un artículo. El modelo se formó en 645 artículos de dos clases: mainstream e hiperpartidista. Nuestro sistema ocupó el decimoséptimo lugar de los cuarenta y dos equipos participantes en la tarea de clasificación binaria con una puntuación de precisión de 0.742 en el conjunto de pruebas ciegas (la precisión del sistema mejor clasificado fue de 0.822). Proporcionamos una descripción detallada de nuestros pasos de preprocesamiento, el análisis de nuestros experimentos con diferentes combinaciones de funciones y el análisis de nuestros resultados y errores de predicción.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nosso sistema para detectar artigos de notícias hiperpartidários, que foi enviado para a tarefa compartilhada no SemEval 2019 sobre Detecção de notícias hiperpartidárias. Desenvolvemos um modelo Support Vector Machine (SVM) que usa TF-IDF de tokens, recursos de Language Inquiry e Word Count (LIWC) e recursos estruturais, como número de parágrafos e contagem de hiperlinks em um artigo. O modelo foi treinado em 645 artigos de duas classes: mainstream e hiperpartidário. Nosso sistema foi classificado em décimo sétimo de quarenta e duas equipes participantes na tarefa de classificação binária com uma pontuação de precisão de 0,742 no conjunto de teste cego (a precisão do sistema mais bem classificado foi de 0,822). Fornecemos uma descrição detalhada de nossas etapas de pré-processamento, discussão de nossos experimentos usando diferentes combinações de recursos e análise de nossos resultados e erros de previsão.', 'ja': '本稿では，超党派ニュース検出に関するSemEval 2019の共有タスクのために提出された超党派ニュース記事を検出するためのシステムについて述べる。トークンのTF - IDF、Language Inquiry and Word Count (LIWC)機能、および記事の段落数やハイパーリンク数などの構造的機能を使用するSupport Vector Machine (SVM)モデルを開発しました。このモデルは、主流派と超党派の2つのクラスの645の記事でトレーニングされました。私たちのシステムは、バイナリ分類タスクに参加した42チーム中17位で、盲検試験セットの精度スコアは0.742であった（トップランクシステムの精度は0.822であった）。私たちは、前処理ステップの詳細な説明、異なる機能の組み合わせを使用した実験の議論、および結果と予測誤差の分析を提供します。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर हाइपरपार्टिसन समाचार लेखों का पता लगाने के लिए हमारी प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है, जिसे हाइपरपार्टिजन न्यूज डिटेक्शन पर सेमइवल 2019 में साझा कार्य के लिए प्रस्तुत किया गया था। हमने एक समर्थन वेक्टर मशीन (एसवीएम) मॉडल विकसित किया है जो टोकन, भाषा पूछताछ और वर्ड काउंट (LIWC) सुविधाओं के TF-IDF का उपयोग करता है, और संरचनात्मक सुविधाओं जैसे कि पैराग्राफ की संख्या और किसी लेख में हाइपरलिंक गिनती। मॉडल को दो वर्गों से 645 लेखों पर प्रशिक्षित किया गया था: मुख्यधारा और अतिदलीय। हमारी प्रणाली को अंधा परीक्षण सेट पर 0.742 के सटीकता स्कोर के साथ बाइनरी वर्गीकरण कार्य में 42 भाग लेने वाली टीमों में से सत्रहवें स्थान पर रखा गया था (शीर्ष रैंक प्रणाली की सटीकता 0.822 थी)। हम अपने प्रीप्रोसेसिंग चरणों का एक विस्तृत विवरण प्रदान करते हैं, सुविधाओं के विभिन्न संयोजनों का उपयोग करके हमारे प्रयोगों की चर्चा करते हैं, और हमारे परिणामों और भविष्यवाणी त्रुटियों का विश्लेषण करते हैं।', 'zh': '本文引我辈以检测超党新闻文章之统,当为SemEval 2019中超党新闻检测共享之。 发一向量机(SVM),用TF-IDF之令牌,问字数计(LIWC)功能及文章段落数、超链接数等。 其模形于二类645篇,练于主流、超党派。 二元四十二参赛行伍第十七位,盲测组准确度分为0.742(前系统准确率为0.822)。 备言吾预处理步骤,论用异实验,而论吾所失。', 'ru': 'В данной статье описывается наша система обнаружения гиперпартизанских новостных статей, которая была представлена для разделяемой задачи в SemEval 2019 на Hyperpartisan News Detection. Мы разработали модель поддерживающей векторной машины (SVM), которая использует TF-IDF токенов, функции языкового запроса и подсчета слов (LIWC), а также структурные особенности, такие как количество абзацев и количество гиперссылок в статье. Модель была подготовлена по 645 статьям из двух классов: "мейнстрим" и "гиперпартизан". Наша система заняла семнадцатое место из сорока двух команд-участников в задаче бинарной классификации с точностью 0,742 на слепом тестовом наборе (точность топовой рейтинговой системы составила 0,822). Мы предоставляем подробное описание наших этапов предварительной обработки, обсуждение наших экспериментов с использованием различных комбинаций признаков, а также анализ наших результатов и ошибок прогнозирования.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcóras chun ailt nuachta hyperpartisan a bhrath, a cuireadh isteach don tasc roinnte in SemEval 2019 ar Bhrath Nuacht Hyperpartisan. D’fhorbraíomar samhail Meaisín Veicteoir Tacaíochta (SVM) a úsáideann TF-IDF de chomharthaí, gnéithe Fiosrúcháin Teanga agus Comhaireamh Focal (LIWC), agus gnéithe struchtúracha ar nós líon na n-alt agus comhaireamh hipearnasc in alt. Cuireadh oiliúint ar an tsamhail ar 645 alt ó dhá rang: príomhshrutha agus hyperpartisan. Rangaíodh ár gcóras sa seachtú háit déag as daichead a dó fhoireann rannpháirteach sa tasc aicmithe dénártha le scór cruinnis de 0.742 ar an tacar tástála dall (b é cruinneas an chórais barrrangaithe ná 0.822). Cuirimid cur síos mionsonraithe ar ár gcéimeanna réamhphróiseála, plé ar ár dturgnaimh ag baint úsáide as teaglaim éagsúla de ghnéithe, agus anailís ar ár dtorthaí agus earráidí tuar.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημά μας για την ανίχνευση υπερκομματικών ειδησεογραφικών άρθρων, το οποίο υποβλήθηκε για την κοινή εργασία στο SemEval 2019 για την Ανίχνευση υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων. Αναπτύξαμε ένα μοντέλο διανυσματικής μηχανής υποστήριξης που χρησιμοποιεί μάρκες, χαρακτηριστικά γλωσσικής έρευνας και αριθμού λέξεων (και δομικά χαρακτηριστικά όπως αριθμός παραγράφων και αριθμός υπερσυνδέσμων σε ένα άρθρο. Το μοντέλο εκπαιδεύτηκε σε 645 άρθρα από δύο τάξεις: κυρίαρχη και υπερκομματική. Το σύστημά μας κατατάχθηκε 17η από σαράντα δύο ομάδες που συμμετείχαν στην εργασία δυαδικής ταξινόμησης με βαθμολογία ακρίβειας 0.742 στο σετ τυφλών (η ακρίβεια του κορυφαίου συστήματος ήταν 0.822). Παρέχουμε λεπτομερή περιγραφή των βημάτων προεπεξεργασίας μας, συζήτηση των πειραμάτων μας χρησιμοποιώντας διαφορετικούς συνδυασμούς χαρακτηριστικών, ανάλυση των αποτελεσμάτων και των σφαλμάτων πρόβλεψης.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány ismerteti a hiperpartizán hírek felismerésére szolgáló rendszerünket, amelyet a SemEval 2019 Hyperpartizán hírek felismeréséről szóló közös feladatra küldtek be. Kifejlesztettünk egy SVM (Support Vector Machine) modellt, amely TF-IDF tokeneket, Language Inquiry and Word Count (LIWC) funkciókat, valamint olyan strukturális funkciókat használ, mint a bekezdések száma és a hivatkozások száma egy cikkben. A modellt 645 cikkre képezték két osztályból: mainstream és hiperpartizán. Rendszerünk a bináris osztályozásban részt vevő negyvenkét csapat közül tizenhetedik helyen állt, a vak tesztkészleten 0,742 pontossági pontszámmal (a legmagasabb rangú rendszer pontossága 0,822 volt). Részletes leírást nyújtunk előfeldolgozási lépéseinkről, kísérleteink különböző funkciók kombinációjával történő beszélgetéséről, eredményeink és előrejelzési hibáink elemzéséről.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი ჩვენი სისტემა, რომელიც ჰიპერპორტიზანი ახალგაზრულების განახლებისთვის, რომელიც SemEval 2019 წლის საზოგაზრულებაში ჰიპერპორტიზანი ახალგაზრულების განა ჩვენ განვიყენეთ მხარდაჭერების გვექტორის მაქსინი (SVM) მოდელი, რომელიც TF-IDF გამოყენებს სიტყვების შესახებ, სიტყვების შესახებ და სიტყვების შესახებ (LIWC) და სტრუქტური ფუნქციები, როგორც მოდელი 645 წესებით ორი კლასიდან განაკეთებული იყო: სამუშაო და ჰიპერპორტიზანი. ჩვენი სისტემმა 40-დან ორი კლასიფიკაციის დაწყვეტილი კონფიკაციის საქაღალდეში იყო 17-დან დაწყვეტილი კონფიკაცია, რომელიც 0.742 წერტილის წერტილის წერტილის წერტილის წერტილის წერტილის წერტილის წერტილი ჩვენ ჩვენი წინაპროცემის წინაპროცესის განსაზღვრებული გამოყენება, ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტების განსაზღვრების გამოყენება განსხვავებული ფუნქციების კომბიუციების და ჩვენ', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз Hyperpartisan жаңалық мақалаларды анықтау үшін жүйемізді таңдайды. Бұл 2019 жылы SemEval 2019 жылы Hyperpartisan жаңалықтарды анықтау үшін ортақтастырылған тапсырмаға жіберілді. Біз белгілер, тіл сұрау және сөз саны (LIWC) мүмкіндіктерін қолданатын вектор машинасы (SVM) үлгісін жасадық. Бұл мақаланың параграфиялар мен гиперсілтемелердің саны секілді құрылғылар. Бұл үлгі екі сыныптан 645 мақаладан оқылған: негізгі және гиперпартизан. Біздің жүйеіміз 40-ден екі қатысушылық топтардан 17-ші ретінде қатысушылық тапсырмасында 0,742 деген дұрыс сынақтар жиынында (жоғарғы жоғарғы жоғарғы жүйеңіздің дұрыс 0,822 болды). Біз өзіміздің алдын- процессердің қадамдарының егжей- тегжейлі сипаттамасын береміз, өзіміздің тәжірибелерімізді түрлі мүмкіндіктердің жинақтауын, нәтижелеріміз', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma mūsų hiperpartinių naujienų aptikimo sistema, kuri buvo pateikta bendrai užduotims 2019 m. SemEval dėl hiperpartinių naujienų aptikimo. Sukūrėme paramos vektoriaus mašinos (SVM) model į, kuriame naudojami simboliai TF-IDF, kalbos tyrimo ir žodžių skaičiaus (LIWC) savybės ir struktūrinės savybės, pvz., straipsnių skaičius ir hiperlinkių skaičius. Modelis buvo apmokytas 645 dviejų klasių straipsniais: pagrindiniu ir hiperpartiniu. Mūsų sistema buvo suskirstyta į septynioliktą iš keturiasdešimt dviejų dalyvaujančių komandų dviejose klasifikavimo užduotyse, o aklo bandymo rinkinio tikslumas buvo 0,742 (aukščiausio rango sistemos tikslumas buvo 0,822). Mes pateikiame išsamų mūsų parengiamųjų veiksmų aprašymą, diskusiją apie mūsų eksperimentus naudojant skirtingus požymių derinius ir mūsų rezultatų bei prognozių klaidų analizę.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il nostro sistema per la rilevazione di articoli di notizie iperpartigiane, che è stato presentato per il compito condiviso in SemEval 2019 su Hyperpartisan News Detection. Abbiamo sviluppato un modello SVM (Support Vector Machine) che utilizza TF-IDF di token, funzionalità Language Inquiry e Word Count (LIWC) e caratteristiche strutturali come il numero di paragrafi e il numero di collegamenti ipertestuali in un articolo. Il modello è stato addestrato su 645 articoli di due classi: mainstream e iperpartisan. Il nostro sistema si è classificato diciassettesimo su quarantadue squadre partecipanti al compito di classificazione binaria con un punteggio di precisione di 0,742 sul set di test ciechi (l'accuratezza del sistema di classifica superiore era di 0,822). Forniamo una descrizione dettagliata dei nostri passaggi di pre-elaborazione, discussione dei nostri esperimenti utilizzando diverse combinazioni di caratteristiche e analisi dei nostri risultati e errori di previsione.", 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашиот систем за детектирање на хиперпартиски вести, кој беше поднесен за заедничката задача во SemEval 2019 за Хиперпартиска вести детективација. We developed a Support Vector Machine (SVM) model that uses TF-IDF of tokens, Language Inquiry and Word Count (LIWC) features, and structural features such as number of paragraphs and hyperlink count in an article.  Моделот беше обучен на 645 статии од две класи: мејнструм и хиперпартијан. Нашиот систем беше рангиран на седумнаесет од четириесет и два тима учествувачки во бинарната класификација задача со точност од 0,742 на слепот тест сет (точноста на највисокиот рангиран систем беше 0,822). Ние обезбедуваме детално опис на нашите препроцесивни чекори, дискусија за нашите експерименти користејќи различни комбинации на карактеристики, и анализа на нашите резултати и грешки во предвидувањето.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem kita untuk mengesan artikel berita hiperpartisan, yang dihantar untuk tugas berkongsi di SemEval 2019 tentang pengesan berita hiperpartisan. Kami mengembangkan model Mesin Vektor Sokongan (SVM) yang menggunakan TF-IDF token, ciri-ciri Pertanyaan Bahasa dan Kiraan Kata (LIWC), dan ciri-ciri struktur seperti bilangan paragraf dan kiraan hyperlink dalam artikel. Model telah dilatih pada 645 artikel dari dua kelas: stream utama dan hyperpartisan. Sistem kami ditangkap ke-17 daripada empat puluh dua pasukan yang berpartisipasi dalam tugas kelasukan binari dengan skor ketepatan 0.742 pada set ujian buta (ketepatan sistem tertinggi ditangkap adalah 0.822). Kami menyediakan keterangan terperinci langkah-langkah pemprosesan kami, perbincangan eksperimen kami menggunakan kombinasi yang berbeza ciri-ciri, dan analisis keputusan dan ralat ramalan kami.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний системийг Hyperpartisan мэдээллийг олох боломжтой. 2019 оны SemEval-д Hyperpartisan News Detection-д хэвлэгдсэн ажлын тухай хэвлэгдсэн. Бид туслах вектор машин (SVM) загварын загварыг бүтээсэн. ТF-IDF нь тодорхойлолт, хэл судалгаа, үг тоо (LIWC) болон хэлбэрийн тоо болон хэлбэрийн тоо, хэлбэрийн тоо болон бүтэц загваруудыг бүтээсэн. Энэ загвар хоёр ангидаас 645 баримт суралцагдсан: ерөнхийлөгч, гиперпартизан. Бидний систем дөрвөн дөрвөн хоёр багтаас 17-р дүрслэгдсэн бөгөөд хоёр нь хоёр дахь дүрслэлийн даалгаврын даалгаврын даалгаврын даалгаврын даалгаврын тоо нь 0.742-тай дүрслэгдсэн бөгөөд хараагүй шалгалтын даалгаврын тоо ( Бид өмнө үйлдвэрлэлийн алхам, туршилтын талаар өөр өөр өөрчлөлтийг ашиглаж, үр дүнг, таамаглах алдааны шинжилгээ өгдөг.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema tagħna biex jinstabu artikoli tal-aħbarijiet iperpartiġjani, li tressqet għall-kompitu kondiviż f’SemEval 2019 dwar l-Iskopru tal-Aħbarijiet Hyperpartiġjani. Żviluppajna mudell ta’ Makkinarju ta’ Appoġġ (SVM) li juża TF-IDF ta’ tokens, karatteristiċi ta’ Inkjesta Lingwika u Għadd ta’ kliem (LIWC), u karatteristiċi strutturali bħall-għadd ta’ paragrafi u l-għadd ta’ hyperlinks f’artikolu. Il-mudell ġie mħarreġ fuq 645 artikolu minn żewġ klassijiet: mainstream u hyperpartisan. Is-sistema tagħna kienet ikklassifikata fis-sebgħin minn erbgħin u erbgħin tim parteċipanti fil-kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni binarja b’punteġġ ta’ preċiżjoni ta’ 0.742 fuq is-sett tat-test għamja (il-preċiżjoni tas-sistema kklassifikata fl-ogħla livell kienet ta’ 0.822). Aħna nipprovdu deskrizzjoni dettaljata tal-passi ta’ qabel il-proċess tagħna, diskussjoni tal-esperimenti tagħna bl-użu ta’ kombinazzjonijiet differenti ta’ karatteristiċi, u analiżi tar-riżultati tagħna u żbalji ta’ tbassir.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet vårt for å finna hyperpartisan nytt- artiklar, som vart sendt til delt oppgåve i semiEval 2019 på Hyperpartisan News Detection. Vi utvikla eit støtte vektormaskin (SVM) modell som brukar TF-IDF av teikn, språkksøk og ordtellingsfunksjonar (LIWC), og strukturelle funksjonar som talet på paragraf og hyperlink i eit artikel. Modellen ble trent på 645 artiklar frå to klasser: mainstream og hyperpartisan. Sistemet vårt vart rankert sedentende ut av førti to deltakende grupper i binærklassifikasjonen med eit nøyaktig poeng 0,742 på blinde testsettet (nøyaktighet på den øvre rangerte systemet var 0,822). Vi gjev ein detaljert skildring av våre førehandsamingssteg, diskusjon av eksperimentene våre med forskjellige kombinasjonar av funksjonar, og analyse av våre resultat og forhåndsamingsfeil.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz system wykrywania hyperpartyzanckich artykułów wiadomościowych, który został zgłoszony do wspólnego zadania w SemEval 2019 na Hyperpartyzan News Detection. Opracowaliśmy model wsparcia wektorowego maszyny (SVM), który wykorzystuje TF-IDF tokenów, funkcje języka zapytania i liczby słów (LIWC) oraz funkcje strukturalne, takie jak liczba akapitów i liczba hiperłączy w artykule. Model został przeszkolony na 645 artykułach z dwóch klas: mainstream i hyperpartyzant. Nasz system znalazł się na XVII spośród czterdziestu dwóch drużyn uczestniczących w zadaniu klasyfikacji binarnej z wynikiem dokładności 0,742 na zestawie testów ślepych (dokładność najwyższej klasyfikacji systemu wynosiła 0,822). Zapewniamy szczegółowy opis naszych etapów przetwarzania wstępnego, omówienie naszych eksperymentów z wykorzystaniem różnych kombinacji cech oraz analizę naszych wyników i błędów przewidywania.', 'ml': 'This paper describes our system for detecting hyperpartisan news articles, which was submitted for the shared task in SemEval 2019 on Hyperpartisan News Detection.  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന വെക്റ്റര്\u200d യന്ത്രം (SVM) മോഡല്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് ടിഎഫ്- ഐഡിഎഫിന്\u200dറെ ഒപ്പുകള്\u200d, ഭാഷ അന്വേഷണം, വാക്ക് കണക്കിന്\u200dറെ (LIWC)  രണ്ടു ക്ലാസുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും 645 ല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരുന്നു: പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സ ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ നാല്പത്തേഴാമത്തേത് രണ്ടു പങ്കാളികളുടെ ടീമില്\u200d നിന്നും പങ്കാളികളായിരുന്നു. ബൈനരി ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d ജോലിയില്\u200d പങ്കാ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രിപ്പോര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്ന പടികളെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു, വ്യത്യസ്ത പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളെക്കുറിച', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul nostru de detectare a articolelor de știri hiperpartizane, care a fost trimis pentru sarcina partajată în SemEval 2019 privind detectarea știrilor hiperpartizane. Am dezvoltat un model de Suport Vector Machine (SVM) care utilizează TF-IDF de jetoane, caracteristici Language Inquiry și Word Count (LIWC) și caracteristici structurale, cum ar fi numărul de paragrafe și numărul de hyperlink-uri într-un articol. Modelul a fost instruit pe 645 de articole din două clase: mainstream și hiperpartizan. Sistemul nostru a fost clasat pe locul 17 din patruzeci și două de echipe participante la sarcina de clasificare binară cu un scor de precizie de 0.742 pe setul de teste blind (acuratețea sistemului clasat de top a fost de 0.822). Oferim o descriere detaliată a pașilor noștri de pre-procesare, discuții despre experimentele noastre folosind diferite combinații de caracteristici și analiza rezultatelor noastre și erorile de predicție.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem za otkrivanje hiperpartizanskih novinskih članaka, koji je podignut za zajednički zadatak u semiEvalu 2019. o detekciji hiperpartizanskih novina. Razvili smo model podrške vektora (SVM), koji koristi TF-IDF znakova, ispitivanja jezika i broj riječi (LIWC), i strukturne karakteristike poput broja paragrafa i broja hiperlinka u članku. Model je obučen na 645 članaka iz dva razreda: glavni i hiperpartisan. Naš sistem je bio u redovima sedamnaestog od četrdeset dvoje sudjelujućih timova u zadatku binarne klasifikacije sa tačnim rezultatom od 0,742 na setu slepih testova (tačnost najvišeg reda sistema je 0,822). Mi pružamo detaljno opis naših koraka preobrađivanja, diskusiju o našim eksperimentima koristeći različite kombinacije karakteristika, i analizu naših rezultata i pogreška predviđanja.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ පද්ධතිය හායිපර්පාර්ටිසන් වාර්තාවක් හොයාගන්න විදිහට විස්තර කරනවා, ඒක හායිපර්පාර්ටිසන් වාර්තාව හ අපි උදව් වෙක්ටර් යන්ත්\u200dරය (SVM) නිර්මාණයක් විස්තර කරලා තියෙන්නේ TF-IDF ටොකන්ස්, භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය සහ වචන ගණනය (LIWC) විශේෂතාවක්, සහ සංස් මොඩේල් 645 පිළිතුරු දෙකක් වලින් පිළිතුරු කරලා තියෙනවා: ප්\u200dරධාන සහ හ හායිපර්පාර්ටිසන්. අපේ පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණා සැකසුම් වෙනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණා සැකසුම් හතරවෙනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණා සැකසුම් වෙනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණා සැකසුම් වෙනුවෙන් සැ අපි අපේ පරීක්ෂණ පැත්තක් ගැන විස්තර විස්තර විස්තර කරන්න, අපේ පරීක්ෂණ පැත්තක් ගැන, අපේ පරීක්ෂණ පැත්තක් ගැන වෙනස්', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka aan helno qoraallada warqadaha aad u qabsato, kaas oo loo dhiibay shaqada la qaybsan ee SemEval 2019 ku saabsan heshiiska warqada Hyperpartisan. Waxaannu horumarinnay muusiko kaalmada Vector (SVM) oo isticmaalaya TF-IDF calaamado, luuqada baaritaanka iyo lambarka (LIWC), iyo tusaale ahaan tirada saqafka iyo tirada hyperlink oo kale. Tusaale waxaa lagu tababariyey 645 xarumo oo laga helay labada fasalka: mid badan iyo mid aad u badatay. Our system was ranked seventeenth out of forty two participating teams in the binary classification task with an accuracy score of 0.742 on the blind test set (the accuracy of the top ranked system was 0.822).  Waxaannu qoraynaa sawir cad oo ka mid ah tallaabooyinkeenna hore-baaraandegista, baaraandegista jirrabadeenna oo isticmaalaya isku xiriir kala duduwan, baaritaanka arimahayaga iyo khilaafkayada la sii sheegayo.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt system för detektering av hyperpartisan nyhetsartiklar som lämnades in för den delade uppgiften i SemEval 2019 om hyperpartisan News Detection. Vi har utvecklat en SVM-modell (Support Vector Machine) som använder TF-IDF av tokens, Language Inquiry and Word Count (LIWC) funktioner och strukturella funktioner som antal stycken och hyperlänkar i en artikel. Modellen tränades på 645 artiklar från två klasser: mainstream och hyperpartisan. Vårt system rankades sjuttone av fyrtiotvå deltagande lag i binära klassificeringsuppgifter med en noggrannhetspoäng på 0,742 på blindprovet (noggrannheten i det topprankade systemet var 0,822). Vi ger en detaljerad beskrivning av våra förberedande steg, diskussion av våra experiment med olika kombinationer av funktioner, samt analys av våra resultat och förutsägelsefel.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் ஹைப்பர்பெர்பார்சின் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான எங்கள் அமைப்பை விவரிக்கிறது, அது செம்வால் 2019ல் பகிர்ந்த பணிக்கு கூட நாங்கள் ஒரு ஆதரவு நெறிய இயந்திரம் (SVM) மாதிரி உருவாக்கினோம். அது TF- IDF குறிப்புகள், மொழி கேள்வி மற்றும் வார்த்தை எண்ணிக்கைகள் (LIWC) குணங்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறது, மற் Name எங்கள் கணினியில் நான்பது இரண்டு பகிர்ந்துகொள்ளும் குழுக்களில் இருந்து வகுப்பு பணியில் பதினாவது முறை நிறுவப்பட்டுள்ளது குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பி நாம் எங்கள் முன்செயல்படுத்தல் படிகளைப் பற்றி விவரமான விவரங்களை கொடுக்கிறோம், எங்கள் பரிசோதனைகளைப் பற்றி விவாதமான குணங்களை பயன்படுத்த', 'ur': 'This paper describes our system for detecting hyperpartisan news articles, which was submitted for the shared task in SemEval 2019 on Hyperpartisan News Detection. ہم نے ایک پشتیبانی ویکتور ماشین (SVM) موڈل ایجاد کی جو ٹوکنوں, زبان سوال اور ویڈ گنٹ (LIWC) کے ٹوکنوں کے TF-IDF کو استعمال کرتا ہے اور ایک لکھی میں پراگراف اور ہیرلینک گنٹ کی تعداد کے مطابق استعمال کرتا ہے۔ مدل دو کلاس سے 645 لکھوں پر آموزش کی گئی تھی: mainstream اور hyperpartisan. ہمارا سیستم چالیس دو گروہوں میں سے ساتھینٹا درجہ تھا جو دو گروہوں میں شامل ہوا تھا ان دونوں گروہوں میں جو اندھے ٹیسٹ پر 0.742 کا سچ تھا۔ ہم نے اپنے پیش پردازش قدموں کی تفصیل دی ہے، ہمارے آزمائش کے بارے میں مختلف فرصت کے مطابق بحث کے مطابق، اور ہمارے نتائج اور پیش بینی خطاؤں کی تحلیل کے مطابق۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz Hyperpartisan news maqolalarini aniqlashning tizimimizni anglatadi, bu xabarlarni SemEval 2019da hisoblashtirilgan vazifani aniqlash uchun yaratiladi. Biz qoʻllash vositasi (SVM) modelini yaratdik. Ushbu maqola uchun TF- IDF imkoniyatlaridan foydalanadi. Name Bizning tizimimiz ikki boshqa bir darajadagi ikki guruhga qisqaruvchi bo'lgan ikki guruhdan 19 ta'limdan boshlangan va ko'p sinov sohasida 0.742 darajasi (eng yuqori sinov tizimning 0.822 tashkilligi 0.822 edi). Biz preprocessor orqali haqida taʼrif qilamiz, bizning tajribalarimizni boshqa bir xil bir xil birikmalar bilan talab qilamiz, natijalarimizni va oldinga xatolarni aniqlash.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống phát hiện tin tức du kích của chúng tôi, được gửi đến cho nhiệm vụ chia sẻ tại Semkhai thác tức cao du kích. Chúng tôi đã phát triển một mô hình cỗ máy phát hỗ trợ (SVM) dùng năng lực điều tra ngôn ngữ và từ tính năng điều tra ngôn ngữ và từ từ (LIW) và các tính năng cấu trúc như số đoạn và số lượng siêu liên kết trong một bài báo. The model was educated on 645 articles ở two class: đời chính thống và Hyperdu kích. Hệ thống của chúng tôi được xếp hạng mười bốn mươi hai đội trong nhiệm vụ phân hạng nhị phân loại với điểm chính xác của 0.72 trên bộ thử nghiệm mù (độ chính xác của hệ thống hạng cao là 0.82). Chúng tôi cung cấp một mô tả chi tiết về bước xử lý trước, thảo luận về thí nghiệm của chúng tôi sử dụng các kết hợp các tính năng khác nhau, và phân tích kết quả và lỗi dự đoán của chúng tôi.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва нашата система за откриване на хиперпартизани новинарски статии, които бяха изпратени за споделената задача в СемЕвал 2019 по откриване на хиперпартизани новини. Разработихме модел на машина за вектори за поддръжка (СВМ), който използва функции за запитване на езици и брой думи (СВТ), както и структурни характеристики като брой абзаци и брой хипервръзки в дадена статия. Моделът е обучен върху 645 статии от два класа: мейнстрийм и хиперпартизан. Нашата система беше класирана на 17-то място от четиридесет и двама участващи отбора в задачата за двоична класификация с оценка на точност 0.742 на комплекта от слепи тестове (точността на най-високо класираната система беше 0.822). Ние предоставяме подробно описание на нашите стъпки за предварителна обработка, обсъждане на нашите експерименти, използвайки различни комбинации от функции, както и анализ на нашите резултати и прогнозни грешки.', 'nl': "Dit artikel beschrijft ons systeem voor het detecteren van hyperpartisane nieuwsartikelen, dat is ingediend voor de gedeelde taak in SemEval 2019 op Hyperpartisan Nieuwsdetectie. We ontwikkelden een Support Vector Machine (SVM) model dat TF-IDF van tokens, Language Inquiry en Word Count (LIWC) functies gebruikt, en structurele functies zoals aantal alinea's en aantal hyperlinks in een artikel. Het model werd getraind op 645 artikelen uit twee klassen: mainstream en hyperpartisan. Ons systeem werd zeventiende van veertig twee deelnemende teams in de binaire classificatietaak gerangschikt met een nauwkeurigheidsscore van 0.742 op de blinde testset (de nauwkeurigheid van het hoogste klassement was 0.822). We geven een gedetailleerde beschrijving van onze preprocessing stappen, bespreking van onze experimenten met behulp van verschillende combinaties van functies, en analyse van onze resultaten en voorspellingsfouten.", 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores system til detektering af hyperpartisan nyhedsartikler, som blev indsendt til den delte opgave i SemEval 2019 om hyperpartisan nyhedsdetektion. Vi har udviklet en Support Vector Machine (SVM) model, der bruger TF-IDF af tokens, Language Inquiry og Word Count (LIWC) funktioner og strukturelle funktioner såsom antal afsnit og hyperlinktælling i en artikel. Modellen blev uddannet på 645 artikler fra to klasser: mainstream og hyperpartisan. Vores system blev rangeret syttende ud af 42 deltagende hold i den binære klassificering opgave med en nøjagtighed score på 0,742 på blind test sæt (nøjagtigheden af det toprangerede system var 0,822). Vi giver en detaljeret beskrivelse af vores forberedende trin, diskussion af vores eksperimenter ved hjælp af forskellige kombinationer af funktioner og analyse af vores resultater og forudsigelsesfejl.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sustav za otkrivanje hiperpartizanskih novinskih članaka, koji je podignut za zajednički zadatak u semiEvalu 2019. o otkrivanju Hyperpartisan vijesti. Razvili smo model podrške vektorskih strojeva (SVM), koji koristi TF-IDF znakova, karakteristike ispitivanja jezika i broja riječi (LIWC), te strukturne karakteristike poput broja paragrafa i broja hiperlinka u članku. Model je obučen na 645 članaka iz dvije klase: glavni i hiperpartisan. Naš sustav je bio u redovima sedamnaestog od četrdeset dvojice sudjelujućih timova u zadatku za binarnu klasifikaciju s preciznim rezultatom od 0,742 na setu slijepih testova (preciznost najvišeg reda sustava je 0,822). Mi pružamo detaljno opis naših koraka preobrađivanja, raspravu o našim eksperimentima koristeći različite kombinacije karakteristika, i analizu naših rezultata i pogreška predviđanja.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem kita untuk mendeteksi artikel berita hiperpartisan, yang dikirim untuk tugas berbagi di SemEval 2019 pada Deteksi berita hiperpartisan. Kami mengembangkan model Pembantu Mesin Vektor (SVM) yang menggunakan TF-IDF token, Pertanyaan Bahasa dan Fungsi Jumlah Kata (LIWC), dan karakteristik struktur seperti jumlah paragraf dan jumlah hyperlink dalam sebuah artikel. Modelnya dilatih pada 645 artikel dari dua kelas: mainstream dan hyperpartisan. Sistem kami ditangkap ke-17 dari empat puluh dua tim yang berpartisipasi dalam tugas klasifikasi binari dengan skor akurasi 0,742 pada set tes buta (akurasi sistem tertinggi ditangkap adalah 0,822). Kami menyediakan deskripsi terperinci dari langkah-langkah pemroses kami, diskusi eksperimen kami menggunakan kombinasi berbagai ciri-ciri, dan analisis hasil dan kesalahan prediksi kami.', 'ko': '본고는 우리가 초당파 뉴스 기사를 검출하는 시스템을 묘사하는데 이 시스템은 2019년 SemEval이 초당파 뉴스 검출에 관한 공유 임무에서 제출한 것이다.우리는 TF-IDF 태그, 언어 조회와 단어 계수(LIWC) 특징, 문장의 단락수와 하이퍼링크 계수 등 구조적 특징을 사용하는 벡터기(SVM) 모델을 개발했다.이 모델은 주류와 초당파 두 가지 유형의 645편의 훈련을 받았다.우리 시스템은 42개 이원 분류 임무에 참여한 팀 중 17위, 블라인드 테스트 집합에서의 정확도는 0.742(상위 시스템의 정확도는 0.822)로 나타났다.우리는 예처리 절차를 상세하게 묘사하고 서로 다른 특징 조합을 사용하는 실험을 토론했으며 결과와 예측 오차를 분석했다.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unser System zur Erkennung hyperparteiischer Nachrichtenartikel, das für die gemeinsame Aufgabe in SemEval 2019 auf Hyperparteiischer Nachrichtenerkennung eingereicht wurde. Wir haben ein SVM-Modell (Support Vector Machine) entwickelt, das TF-IDF von Token, Language Inquiry und Word Count (LIWC) Funktionen und strukturelle Merkmale wie die Anzahl der Absätze und die Anzahl der Hyperlinks in einem Artikel verwendet. Das Modell wurde an 645 Artikeln aus zwei Klassen trainiert: Mainstream und Hyperpartei. Unser System wurde siebzehnter von zweiundvierzig teilnehmenden Teams in der binären Klassifikationsaufgabe mit einer Genauigkeit von 0,742 auf dem Blind-Test-Set (die Genauigkeit des am besten platzierten Systems war 0,822). Wir bieten eine detaillierte Beschreibung unserer Vorverarbeitungsschritte, Diskussion unserer Experimente mit verschiedenen Kombinationen von Merkmalen und Analyse unserer Ergebnisse und Vorhersagefehler.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم ما را برای شناسایی مجموعه\u200cهای خبرهای هوپر پارتیسان توصیف می\u200cکند، که برای کار مشترک در SemEval 2019 در مورد شناسایی خبرهای هوپر پارتیسان فرستاده شده است. ما یک مدل واکتور پشتیبانی (SVM) را توسعه کردیم که از نشانه\u200cهای TF-IDF استفاده می\u200cکند، تحقیقات زبان و شماره کلمات (LIWC) ویژگی\u200cهای ساختاری مانند تعداد پاراگراف و شماره\u200cهای لینک در یک مقاله استفاده می\u200cکند. Model was trained on 645 articles from two classes: mainstream and hyperpartisan. سیستم ما هفتاد و هفتاد از چهل و دو تیم شرکت کننده در وظیفه\u200cی گروه\u200cهای گروه\u200cهای دوگانه با امتیاز دقیق 0.742 در مجموعه آزمایش کور (دقیق سیستم بالای درجه 0.822 بود). ما توضیح جزئیات از قدم\u200cهای پیش\u200cپردازی\u200cمون را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهیم، بحث از آزمایش\u200cهایمان را با استفاده از ترکیب\u200cهای مختلف ویژه\u200cها، و تحلیل نتایج\u200cهایمان و اشتباهی پیش\u200cبینی\u200cمون را می', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wetu kwa kutambua makala za habari za watu wengi, ambazo zilitolewa kwa ajili ya kazi ya ushirikiano jijini SemEval 2019 kuhusu Utafiti wa Habari za Hyperpartisan. We developed a Support Vector Machine (SVM) model that uses TF-IDF of tokens, Language Inquiry and Word Count (LIWC) features, and structural features such as number of paragraphs and hyperlink count in an article.  Mfano huo ulifundishwa katika makala 645 kutoka darasa mbili: vikuu na upande mkubwa. Mfumo wetu ulikuwa wa rangi ya kumi na saba kati ya timu mbili washiriki katika kazi ya usambazaji binabinafsi kwa kiwango sahihi cha 0.742 kwenye seti ya vipofu (uhakika wa mfumo wa juu ulikuwa wa 0.822). Tunatoa maelezo ya kina kuhusu hatua zetu za upasuaji, kujadili majaribio yetu kwa kutumia miungano tofauti ya tabia, na uchambuzi wa matokeo yetu na makosa ya kutabiri.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf ons stelsel om hiperpartisan nuus artikels te ontdek, wat is voorgestuur vir die gedeelde taak in SemEval 2019 op Hyperpartisan Nuus Opdekking. Ons het 'n ondersteunde vektor masjien (SVM) model ontwikkel wat TF- IDF van tokens gebruik, Taal Inquiry en Woord Tel (LIWC) funksies, en strukturele funksies soos aantal paragraaf en hiperlink tel in 'n artikel. Die model is opgelei op 645 artikels van twee klasse: mainstream en hyperpartisan. Ons stelsel was sewentiende van veertig twee deelnadeerde teams in die binêre klasifikasie taak met 'n presisie telling van 0.742 op die blinde toets stel (die presisie van die bo rangeerde stelsel was 0.822). Ons verskaf 'n gedetale beskrywing van ons voorafverwerking stappe, diskusie van ons eksperimente met verskillende kombinasies van funksies en analisie van ons resultate en voorskou foute.", 'am': 'ይህም ገጽ የhyperpartisan ዜና ጽሑፎችን ለማግኘት ስርዓታችንን ይናገራል፡፡ ይህም በሴምEval 2019 ላይ በተካፈሉት የዜና ግንኙነት ማግኘት ነው፡፡ የድጋፍ መክፈቻ (SVM) ምሳሌ ሠንተናል፡፡ ሞዴል ከሁለቱ ደረጃዎች በ645 ጽሑፎች ላይ ተማርቷል፡፡ አርባ ሁለት ተካያፊዎች ቡድን አሥራ ሰባት ተካሄደው በሁለተኛው ክፍል ሥራ ውስጥ የ0.742 የዕውር ፈተና ጥሩ ነው (በላይኛው ክፍል 0.822 ነው) የፕሮግራም ደረጃችንን እናሳውቃለን፣ የፍሬዎቻችንና የቅድመት ስህተታችንን በተለያዩ ግንኙነት እና ፍሬዎቻችንን እናስተምር፡፡', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz hiperpartisanyň täzeliklerini tanamak üçin sistemimizi, Hyperpartisan Haýry Deteksiýasynda SemEval 2019-nji ýylda üýtgedildi. Biz TF-IDF tokens, dil soragy we söz sany (LIWC) hatlarynyň sany ýaly paragraflar we hyperlinkler sany ýaly bir nusgasyny geliştirdik. Bu model iki sınıftan 645 makala öwrenildi: mainstream we hyperpartisan. Biziň sistemamyz 24-nji ýyldan ikinji topardan ikinji toparda paýlaşýardy. Öňki işlemegimiziň adımlarymyň detayly tassyýany, deneylerimiziň üýtgeşmeleriň üýtgeşmelerini we netijelerimiziň we öngörüm hatalarymyzyň bardygyny görüşýäris.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր համակարգը հիպերկայացի նորությունների հայտնաբերման համար, որը ներկայացվել է 2019 թվականի "Հիպերկայացի նորությունների հայտնաբերման" համագործակցության համար: Մենք զարգացրեցինք մի աջակցության մեքենայի (ՍՎՄ) մոդել, որը օգտագործում է ֆիլմերի, լեզվի հետազոտության և բառերի հաշվարկի (ԼիՎԿ) առանձնահատկություններ, ինչպես նաև կառուցվածքային առանձնահատկություններ, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ պարագաների Մոդելը կրթություն ստացավ 645 հոդվածի վրա երկու դասից՝ հիմնական և հիպերկայացի: Մեր համակարգը դասակարգված էր քառասուներկուսից երկու մասնակցություն ունեցող թիմերից յոթներորդ, որոնց ճշգրտությունը կույր փորձարկման համակարգում 0,742 էր (ամենաբարձր դասակարգված համակարգի ճշգրտությունը 0,82 էր): Մենք տրամադրում ենք մեր նախագործող քայլերի մանրամասն նկարագրությունը, մեր փորձարկումների քննարկումը օգտագործելով տարբեր հատկանիշների համադրումներ, մեր արդյունքների վերլուծությունը և կանխատեսման սխալները:', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan sistemin tonë për zbulimin e artikujve të lajmeve hiperpartizane, që u paraqit për detyrën e përbashkët në SemEval 2019 për zbulimin e lajmeve hiperpartizane. Kemi zhvilluar një model të Meksikës së Vektorit të Mbështetjes (SVM) që përdor TF-IDF të shenjave, karakteristikat e kërkimit të gjuhës dhe numrit të fjalëve (LIWC) dhe karakteristikat strukturore të tilla si numri i paragrafeve dhe numri i hiperlinkeve në një artikull. The model was trained on 645 articles from two classes: mainstream and hyperpartisan.  Sistemi ynë u rendit i shtatëmbëdhjetë nga dyzet ekipe pjesëmarrëse në detyrën e klasifikimit binar me një pikë saktësie 0.742 në grupin e testit të verbër (saktësia e sistemit të renditur më të lartë ishte 0.822). Ne ofrojmë një përshkrim të hollësishëm të hapave tona të përgatitjes, diskutim të eksperimenteve tona duke përdorur kombinime të ndryshme të karakteristikave, dhe analizë të rezultateve tona dhe gabimeve parashikimi.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem za otkrivanje hiperpartizanskih novinskih članaka, koji je podignut za zajednički zadatak u semiEvalu 2019. o otkrivanju Hyperpartisan News. Razvili smo model podrške vektora (SVM), koji koristi TF-IDF znakova, karakteristike ispitivanja jezika i broja riječi (LIWC), i strukturne karakteristike poput broja paragrafa i broja hiperlinka u članku. Model je obučen na 645 članaka iz dva razreda: glavni i hiperpartisan. Naš sistem je bio u redovima sedamnaestog od četrdeset dvoje sudjelujućih timova u zadatku binarne klasifikacije sa preciznim rezultatom od 0,742 na setu slepih testova (preciznost najvišeg reda sistema je 0,822). Mi pružamo detaljno opis naših koraka preobrađivanja, diskusiju o našim eksperimentima koristeći različite kombinacije karakteristika, i analizu naših rezultata i pogreška predviđanja.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা হাইপার্পার্পার্টিসান নিউজ ডিটেক্টরেশনের জন্য আমাদের সিস্টেমের ব্যাখ্যা করছে। আমরা একটি সমর্থিত ভেক্টর মেশিন (এসভিএম) মডেল তৈরি করেছি যা টিএফ-আইডিএফ প্রমাণ, ভাষা অনুসন্ধান এবং শব্দ কাউন্ট ব্যবহার করেছে এবং কাঠামোর বৈশিষ্ট্য, যেমন প্যাপ্যাক্ট এই মডেলটি দুই শ্রেণীর প্রবন্ধে প্রশিক্ষণ করা হয়েছে: মূলধারার এবং হাইপার্পার্সিন। আমাদের সিস্টেম ৪০ টি অংশগ্রহণকারীদের মধ্যে বাইনারি শ্রেণীবিভাগের কাজে অংশগ্রহণকারীদের মধ্যে ৭২টি ব্যবস্থা করা হয়েছে যার ফলে অন্ধ পরীক্ষার স আমরা আমাদের প্রোপ্রেসিং পদক্ষেপের বিস্তারিত বর্ণনা দিয়েছি, আমাদের পরীক্ষা সম্পর্কে আলোচনা করছি বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্যের ব্যবহার করে এব', 'az': 'Bu kağıt Hyperpartisan haber məktullarını keşfetmək üçün sistemimizi, Hyperpartisan Haber Detection haqqında SemEval 2019-in paylaşılan iş üçün göndərildi. Biz TF-IDF möcüzələrini, dil soruşması və Kelimi Sayı (LIWC) özelliklərini və paragrafların sayı və hiperlinki sayı kimi strukturlu möcüzələri yaratdıq. Model iki sınıftan 645 maddə təhsil edildi: mainstream və hyperpartisan. Sistemimiz qırmızca iki dəstədən yeddi-yeddi səf çəkildi, iki dəstədə səf çəkildi, kor sınama qutusunda 0,742 dəstədir (ən yüksək səf sisteminin doğruluğu 0,822 idi). Biz əvvəlcə işləmə adımlarımızın detaylı təsbiqlərini, eksperimentlərimizin müxtəlif fəaliyyətlərin birləşdirilməsini və sonuçlarımızın analizi və tədbir hatalarımızın mübahisəsini təmin edirik.', 'ca': "This paper describes our system for detecting hyperpartisan news articles, which was submitted for the shared task in SemEval 2019 on Hyperpartisan News Detection.  Vam desenvolupar un model de Support Vector Machine (SVM) que utilitza TF-IDF de fitxes, característiques de Language Inquiry i Word Count (LIWC), i característiques estructurals com el nombre de paràgrafs i hiperlinks en un article. El model va ser entrenat en 645 articles de dues classes: mainstream i hiperpartisan. El nostre sistema va ser classificat al 17 de cada 42 equips que participaven en la tasca de classificació binaria amb una puntuació de precisió de 0,742 en el conjunt de proves cecs (la precisió del sistema de classement superior era de 0,822). Oferecem una descripció detallada de les nostres etapes de preparació, la discussió dels nostres experiments fent servir diferents combinacions de característiques, i l'anàlisi dels nostres resultats i els nostres errors de predicció.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš systém pro detekci hyperpartyzánních zpravodajských článků, který byl odeslán pro sdílený úkol v SemEvalu 2019 na Hyperpartyzánní detekci zpráv. Vyvinuli jsme model SVM (Support Vector Machine), který využívá TF-IDF tokenů, jazykové dotazy a počet slov (LIWC) funkce a strukturální funkce, jako je počet odstavců a počet hypertextových odkazů v článku. Model byl trénován na 645 článcích ze dvou tříd: mainstream a hyperpartyzán. Náš systém byl sedmnáctý ze čtyřiceti dvou zúčastněných týmů binární klasifikace s přesnostním skórem 0,742 na slepé testovací sadě (přesnost nejvyššího hodnoceného systému byla 0,822). Poskytujeme detailní popis našich kroků předzpracování, diskusi našich experimentů s využitím různých kombinací vlastností a analýzu našich výsledků a chyb predikce.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie hüperpartisanide uudisteartiklite tuvastamise süsteemi, mis esitati SemEval 2019. aastal hüperpartisanide uudiste tuvastamise jagatud ülesandeks. Töötasime välja tugivektori masina (SVM) mudeli, mis kasutab TF-IDF märkide, keele päringu ja sõnade arvu (LIWC) funktsioone ning struktuurilisi funktsioone, nagu lõikude arv ja hüperlinkide arv artiklis. Mudeli koolitati 645 artikli kahest klassist: mainstream ja hüperpartisan. Meie süsteem oli kahekümne kahe osaleva meeskonna hulgast kaheteistkümnendal kohal täpsuskooriga 0,742 pimetestide komplektis (kõige paremini järjestatud süsteemi täpsus oli 0,822). Esitame üksikasjaliku kirjelduse eeltöötluse etappidest, arutleme oma katseid erinevate funktsioonide kombinatsioonide abil ning analüüsime tulemusi ja prognoosimisvigu.', 'fi': 'Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ artikkelissa kuvataan hyperpartisaanien uutisartikkeleiden havaitsemista koskevaa jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ﾃ､mme, joka lﾃ､hetettiin jaettuun tehtﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､n SemEval 2019 -tapahtumassa Hyperpartisan News Detection. Kehitimme SVM (Support Vector Machine) -mallin, joka kﾃ､yttﾃ､ﾃ､ TF-IDF-merkkejﾃ､, Language Inquiry ja Word Count (LIWC) -ominaisuuksia sekﾃ､ rakenteellisia ominaisuuksia, kuten kappaleiden mﾃ､ﾃ､rﾃ､ﾃ､ ja hyperlinkkien mﾃ､ﾃ､rﾃ､ﾃ､ artikkelissa. Malli on koulutettu 645 artikkeliin kahdesta luokasta: mainstream ja hyperpartisan. Jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､mme sijoittui kahdestakymmenestﾃ､toista binﾃ､ﾃ､riluokitustehtﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､n osallistuneesta tiimistﾃ､ seitsemﾃ､ntenﾃ､toista tarkkuudella 0,742 sokkotestissﾃ､ (korkeimman pistemﾃ､ﾃ､rﾃ､n tarkkuus oli 0,822). Tarjoamme yksityiskohtaisen kuvauksen esikﾃ､sittelyvaiheistamme, keskustelun kokeistamme eri ominaisuuksien yhdistelmillﾃ､ sekﾃ､ analyysin tuloksista ja ennustevirheistﾃ､.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki diperawa sistem awakdhéwé nggawe barang urip-urip kanggo nggawe barang urip, iki diputara ono nggawe task nang seminval 2011 nang Hyerpartisan New detection. We opened a supported vector Masine (SVM) model that use T F-ID F of token, Language Inquery and Word count (LIWC) parameters, and structural parameters like number of paragraphs and caprlink count in an Articulo. paragraphs Sistem awak dhéwé wis digaweh sing seperapung liyane sing wis ana ing panjuru maneh sing dumadhi iki, nik sekondiki dibenakno sing dirampakan 0. Awak dhéwé nggawe ndheke gedung nggawe barang nggawe barang-ingkang nggawe perusahaan, nggawe barang nggawe Perintah dhéwé nggambar perusahaan sampeyan karo nggawe Perintah kanggo ngerasakno', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את המערכת שלנו לגלות מאמרים חדשות hiperpartisan, שנשלחו למשימה המשותפת בסימוול 2019 על גילוי חדשות Hyperpartisan. פיתחנו מודל מכונת קטור תמיכה (SVM) שמשתמש בטלפון TF-IDF של סימנים, חוקר שפת וספירת מילים (LIWC), וכמויות מבנה כמו מספר פרגסטים וספירת היפרלינקים במאמר. המודל הואמן על 645 מאמרים משני כיסות: מיינסטרם והיפרטיזן. המערכת שלנו הוצבעה ב-17 מתוך 42 קבוצות משתתפות במשימת ההקלטה הבינרית עם נקודת מדויקה של 0.742 על קבוצת הבדיקות העיוורות (מדויקת המערכת העליונה הייתה 0.822). אנחנו מספקים תיאור מפורט של צעדינו המתייחסים, דיון על הניסויים שלנו בשימוש שילובים שונים של תכונות, וניתוח של התוצאות שלנו ושגיאות צפייה.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana na tsarin mu na gane makala na tsumarni na Hyperpartsan, wanda aka saka wa yin shirin aikin da aka raba shi a Semeval 2019 a kan Hiperpartsan News Mun developed wani misalin Mataimakin Mataimakin (SV M) wanda ke amfani da TF-IDF na shiryoyin ayukan ayukan ayukan, Kyaure da Label na Kalmar (LIWC), da masu tsari na masu motsi kamar yawan fassaran da ƙidãya na jumla. An sanar da shirin ayuka a kan karatun 645 na daga fasa biyu: ƙarami da babban rabo. Ana ranar kasarsa bakin jama'a saba'in da suka haɗa jama'a biyu cikin aikin fasalin biyu na biyu, kuma an sami wani nau'i mai daidaita na 0.742 a kan jarraba makãho (rasmi na sarki da aka rana shi ya zama 0.822). Tuna bayyana wani daki-daki a kan hanyõyinmu da za'a yi kawaici, kuma muna jãyayya masu jarrabai da ke amfani da wasu misãlai na daban-daban, da kuma misãli ga matsalayinmu da kuskure-bayani.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naš sistem za odkrivanje hiperpartizanskih novic, ki so bili predloženi za skupno nalogo v SemEvalu 2019 o Hyperpartizanskem odkrivanju novic. Razvili smo model SVM (Support Vector Machine), ki uporablja TF-IDF žetonov, funkcije povpraševanja jezikov in štetja besed (LIWC) ter strukturne funkcije, kot so število odstavkov in število hiperpovezav v članku. Model je bil usposobljen na 645 člankih iz dveh razredov: mainstream in hiperpartizanski. Naš sistem je bil uvrščen na sedemnajsto od dveh sodelujočih ekip v nalogi binarne klasifikacije z oceno natančnosti 0,742 na slepih testnih nizih (natančnost najbolj uvrščenega sistema je bila 0,822). Zagotavljamo podroben opis naših korakov predobdelave, razpravo o naših eksperimentih z uporabo različnih kombinacij funkcij ter analizo naših rezultatov in napovednih napak.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We developed a Support Vector Machine (SVM) model that uses TF-IDF of tokens, Language Inquiry and Word Count (LIWC) features, and structural features such as number of paragraphs and hyperlink count in an article. མ་དབྱིབས་འདི་དག་གྲྭར་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་རྣམ་གྲངས་645ཙམ་གླེང་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། མ་ལག་དང་གྲངས་ཤིག་མ ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་དབྱིབས་ཞིབ་ཚད་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཕྱོགས་གཅིག་ལས་བཅུ་བཞི་པ་ལས་བཅུ་གཉིས་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་ང་ཚོའི་སྔོན་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་གྱི་གྲོང་རིམ་གྱི་གསལ་བཤད་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་དཔེ་ཚོར་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འབྲེ'}
{'en': 'Steve Martin at SemEval-2019 Task 4 : Ensemble Learning Model for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'ar': 'ستيف مارتن في SemEval-2019 المهمة 4: نموذج التعلم الجماعي لاكتشاف الأخبار الحزبية التشعبية', 'es': 'Steve Martin en la Tarea 4 de SemEval-2019: Modelo de aprendizaje conjunto para detectar noticias hiperpartidistas', 'pt': 'Steve Martin no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 4: Modelo de aprendizado conjunto para detectar notícias hiperpartidárias', 'fr': "Steve Martin au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 4\xa0: Modèle d'apprentissage d'ensemble pour détecter les actualités hyperpartisanes", 'ja': 'SemEval -2019タスク4 ：超党派ニュースを検出するためのアンサンブルラーニングモデルのスティーブ・マーティン', 'zh': '史蒂夫·马丁在SemEval-2019务4:以检测超党新闻集成模范', 'hi': 'स्टीव मार्टिन SemEval-2019 कार्य 4 पर: Hyperpartisan समाचार का पता लगाने के लिए Ensemble लर्निंग मॉडल', 'ru': 'Стив Мартин на SemEval-2019 Задача 4: Ансамблевая модель обучения для обнаружения гиперпартийных новостей', 'ga': 'Steve Martin ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 4: Samhail Foghlama Ensemble chun Nuacht Hipirpháirtí a Bhrath', 'ka': 'სტივი მარტინი SemEval-2019 საქმე 4: ჰიპერპორტიზანის აღმოჩენისთვის სწავლების მოდელი', 'hu': 'Steve Martin a SemEval-2019 4. feladat: Ensemble Learning Model for Detection Hyperpartizán Hírek', 'el': 'Στηβ Μάρτιν στο έργο 4: Μοντέλο μάθησης συνόλων για την ανίχνευση υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων', 'it': "Steve Martin al SemEval-2019 Task 4: Modello di apprendimento dell'Ensemble per il rilevamento di iperpartigiani", 'kk': 'Steve Martin at semiEval-2019 Task 4: Ensemble Learning Model for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'lt': 'Steve Martin SemEval-2019 4 užduotis: Ensemble Learning Model for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'mk': 'Стив Мартин на SemEval-2019 задача 4: Ensemble Learning Model for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'ms': 'Steve Martin di SemEval-2019 Task 4: Ensemble Learning Model for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'mt': 'Steve Martin f’SemEval-2019 Task 4: Ensemble Learning Model for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'ml': 'സെമ്മെവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 4- ല്\u200d സ്റ്റീവ് മാര്\u200dട്ടിന്\u200d: ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസിന്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിന', 'pl': 'Steve Martin w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 4: Model uczenia się zespołu do wykrywania hiperpartyjnych wiadomości', 'ro': 'Steve Martin la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 4: Modelul de învățare al ansamblului pentru detectarea hiperpartizanului Noutăți', 'no': 'Steve Martin at semiEval-2019 Task 4: Ensemble Learning Model for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'sr': 'Steve Martin na semiEval-2019 zadatku 4: Model učenja za otkrivanje hiperpartizanskih vesti', 'si': 'ස්ටීව් මාර්ටින් සෙම්වෙල්-2019 වැඩ 4: හායිපර් පාර්ටිසන් වාර්තාව හොයාගන්න සඳහා ඉගෙනීම් මොඩල්', 'so': 'Steve Martin at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Ensemable Learning Model for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Task 4: Ensemble Learning Model for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'sv': 'Steve Martin på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 4: Ensemble Learning Model för att upptäcka hyperpartisan Nyheter', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 செயல் 4- ல் ஸ்டீவ் மார்டின்: Hyperpartisan செய்திகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க சார்ந்த படிப்பு மாதிரி:', 'ur': 'استیو مارٹین سیم ایول-2019 ٹاکس ۴ میں: ہیپر پارٹیسان خبروں کی شناسایی کے لئے مزید سیکھنے کی موڈل', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Steve Martin tại Semkhai-thẩm 9 Task 4: Ensemble Learning Model for trinh sát Hyperdu kích News', 'bg': 'Стив Мартин в Задача 4: Модел за обучение на ансамбъл за откриване на хиперпартизани новини', 'da': 'Steve Martin ved SemEval-2019 Opgave 4: Ensemble Learning Model til detektering af hyperpartisan Nyheder', 'hr': 'Steve Martin na semiEval-2019 zadatku 4: Model učenja za otkrivanje hiperpartisan vijesti', 'nl': 'Steve Martin bij SemEval-2019 Taak 4: Ensemble Learning Model voor het opsporen van hyperpartisan Nieuws', 'de': 'Steve Martin bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 4: Ensemble Learning Model zur Erkennung hyperparteiischer Nachrichten', 'id': 'Steve Martin di SemEval-2019 Task 4: Ensemble Learning Model for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'ko': '스티브 마틴이SemEval-2019임무4: 초당파 뉴스를 검출하는 통합 학습 모델', 'fa': 'استیو مارتین در ماشین ۲۰۱۹ کار ۴: Model Learning Ensemble for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'sw': 'Steve Martin katika kazi ya SemEval-2019', 'tr': 'Steve Martin at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Ensemble Learning Model for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'af': 'Steve Martin by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 4: Ensemble Learning Model for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'sq': 'Steve Martin në SemEval-2019 Task 4: Ensemble Learning Model for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'am': 'ስምEval-2019 ስራ 4: Hyperpartisan ዜና ለማግኘት ተማሪ ሞዴል', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কার্যক্রম ৪-এ স্টিভ মার্টিন: হাইপার্পার্টিস্যান নিউজ ডিটেক্টরের জন্য শিক্ষা মোডেল', 'hy': 'Սթիվ Մարտինը 2019 թվականի "Սեմեվալ" 4-րդ հանձնարարում. Հիպերպարտիզան նորությունների հայտնաբերման համակարգ սովորելու մոդել', 'az': 'Steve Martin at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Ensemble Learning Model for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'bs': 'Steve Martin na semiEval-2019 zadatku 4: Model učenja za otkrivanje Hyperpartisan vijesti', 'ca': 'Steve Martin a SemEval-2019 Task 4: Ensemble Learning Model for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'et': 'Steve Martin SemEval-2019 ülesandel 4: Ensemble Learning Model for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'cs': 'Steve Martin na SemEval-2019 Úkol 4: Souborový vzdělávací model pro detekci hyperstranických novinek', 'fi': 'Steve Martin SemEval-2019 Task 4: Ensemble Learning Model for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'jv': 'Stiv Martin at semebal-2011 task 4: ENsemble Learning model for detecting Typerpartisan New', 'sk': 'Steve Martin na SemEval-2019 naloga 4: Model učenja ansambla za odkrivanje hiperpartizanskih novic', 'he': 'סטיב מרטין בסמיוול-2019 משימה 4: מודל למידה סמוי לגלות חדשות היפרפרטיזן', 'ha': '@ info: status', 'bo': 'Steve Martin at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Ensemble Learning Model for Detecting Hyperpartisan News'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our submission to task 4 in SemEval 2019, i.e., hyperpartisan news detection. Our model aims at detecting hyperpartisan news by incorporating the style-based features and the content-based features. We extract a broad number of feature sets and use as our learning algorithms the GBDT and the n-gram CNN model. Finally, we apply the weighted average for effective learning between the two models. Our model achieves an accuracy of 0.745 on the test set in subtask A.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة تقديمنا للمهمة 4 في SemEval 2019 ، أي الكشف عن الأخبار الحزبية. يهدف نموذجنا إلى الكشف عن الأخبار الحزبية من خلال دمج الميزات القائمة على الأسلوب والميزات المستندة إلى المحتوى. نستخرج عددًا كبيرًا من مجموعات الميزات ونستخدم كخوارزميات تعلمنا GBDT ونموذج n-gram CNN. أخيرًا ، قمنا بتطبيق المتوسط المرجح للتعلم الفعال بين النموذجين. يحقق نموذجنا دقة قدرها 0.745 في مجموعة الاختبار في المهمة الفرعية أ.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre soumission à la tâche 4 du SemEval 2019, c'est-à-dire la détection hyperpartisane des actualités. Notre modèle vise à détecter les actualités hyperpartisanes en intégrant les fonctionnalités basées sur le style et les fonctionnalités basées sur le contenu. Nous extrayons un grand nombre d'ensembles de caractéristiques et utilisons comme algorithmes d'apprentissage le modèle GBDT et le modèle N-gramme CNN. Enfin, nous appliquons la moyenne pondérée pour un apprentissage efficace entre les deux modèles. Notre modèle atteint une précision de 0,745 sur le jeu de test de la sous-tâche A.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nossa submissão à tarefa 4 no SemEval 2019, ou seja, detecção de notícias hiperpartidárias. Nosso modelo visa detectar notícias hiperpartidárias, incorporando os recursos baseados em estilo e os recursos baseados em conteúdo. Extraímos um grande número de conjuntos de recursos e usamos como algoritmos de aprendizado o modelo GBDT e o modelo n-gram CNN. Por fim, aplicamos a média ponderada para aprendizagem efetiva entre os dois modelos. Nosso modelo atinge uma precisão de 0,745 no conjunto de teste na subtarefa A.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestro envío a la tarea 4 en SemEval 2019, es decir, la detección de noticias hiperpartidistas. Nuestro modelo tiene como objetivo detectar noticias hiperpartidistas mediante la incorporación de las funciones basadas en el estilo y las funciones basadas en el contenido. Extraemos un gran número de conjuntos de funciones y utilizamos como algoritmos de aprendizaje el modelo GBDT y el modelo CNN de n-gram. Finalmente, aplicamos la media ponderada para un aprendizaje efectivo entre los dos modelos. Nuestro modelo alcanza una precisión de 0.745 en la prueba establecida en la subtarea A.', 'ja': '本稿では、2019年のSemEvalタスク4への提出、すなわち超党派ニュース検出について説明する。私たちのモデルは、スタイルベースの機能とコンテンツベースの機能を組み込むことで、超党派的なニュースを検出することを目的としています。私たちは、幅広い数の特徴セットを抽出し、GBDTおよびn - gram CNNモデルを学習アルゴリズムとして使用します。最後に、2つのモデル間の効果的な学習のために加重平均を適用します。当社のモデルは、サブタスクAの試験器で0.745の精度を達成しています。', 'zh': '本文述我等于SemEval 2019中提交的职务4,即超党新闻检测。 吾道合之于式,而检之于新闻。 多取特征集,以GBDTn-gram CNN为学算法。 最后,我们应用加权平均值在两个模样之间有效学。 吾形于子职 A 之试集上成 0.745 之精。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval 2019 में कार्य 4 के लिए हमारे सबमिशन का वर्णन करता है, यानी, हाइपरपार्टिसन समाचार का पता लगाना। हमारे मॉडल का उद्देश्य शैली-आधारित सुविधाओं और सामग्री-आधारित सुविधाओं को शामिल करके हाइपरपार्टिसन समाचार का पता लगाना है। हम सुविधा सेट की एक विस्तृत संख्या निकालने और हमारे सीखने के एल्गोरिदम जीबीडीटी और एन-ग्राम सीएनएन मॉडल के रूप में उपयोग करते हैं। अंत में, हम दो मॉडलों के बीच प्रभावी सीखने के लिए भारित औसत लागू करते हैं। हमारा मॉडल सबटास्क ए में सेट किए गए परीक्षण पर 0.745 की सटीकता प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наше участие в задаче 4 в SemEval 2019, то есть обнаружение гиперпартийных новостей. Наша модель нацелена на обнаружение гиперпартийных новостей путем включения в них функций, основанных на стиле, и функций, основанных на контенте. Мы извлекаем большое количество наборов признаков и используем в качестве наших алгоритмов обучения модель GBDT и n-gram CNN. Наконец, мы применяем средневзвешенное значение для эффективного обучения между двумя моделями. Наша модель достигает точности 0,745 на тестовом наборе в подзадаче А.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár n-aighneacht do thasc 4 in SemEval 2019, i.e., braite nuachta hyperpartisan. Tá sé mar aidhm ag ár múnla nuacht hyperpartisan a bhrath trí na gnéithe stíl-bhunaithe agus na gnéithe bunaithe ar ábhar a ionchorprú. Bainimid amach líon leathan tacair gnéithe agus úsáidimid an GBDT agus an tsamhail CNN n-gram mar halgartaim foghlama. Ar deireadh, cuirimid an meán ualaithe i bhfeidhm don fhoghlaim éifeachtach idir an dá mhúnla. Baineann ár múnla amach cruinneas 0.745 ar an tástáil a leagtar i bhfothasc A.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει την υποβολή μας στο έργο 4 στο SemEval 2019, δηλαδή την ανίχνευση υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων. Το μοντέλο μας στοχεύει στην ανίχνευση υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων ενσωματώνοντας τα χαρακτηριστικά που βασίζονται στο στυλ και τα χαρακτηριστικά που βασίζονται στο περιεχόμενο. Εξαγάγουμε ένα ευρύ αριθμό χαρακτηριστικών και χρησιμοποιούμε ως μαθησιακούς αλγόριθμους το μοντέλο και το μοντέλο Ν-γραμμάτων. Τέλος, εφαρμόζουμε τον σταθμισμένο μέσο όρο για αποτελεσματική μάθηση μεταξύ των δύο μοντέλων. Το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει ακρίβεια 0.745 στο σύνολο δοκιμής στο δευτερεύον έργο Α.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2019 4. feladatához való benyújtásunkat, azaz hiperpartizán hírek felismerését. Modellünk célja a hiperpartizán hírek felismerése a stílusalapú funkciók és a tartalom alapú funkciók beépítésével. Számos funkciókészletet bontunk ki, és tanulási algoritmusként használjuk a GBDT és az n-gram CNN modellt. Végül a két modell közötti hatékony tanulás súlyozott átlagát alkalmazzuk. Modellünk 0,745 pontos pontosságot ér el az A részfeladat tesztkészletén.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აღწერს ჩვენი სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო 2019 წლის სამუშაო, ანუ ჰიპერპორტიზანი ინფორმაცია. ჩვენი მოდელის მიზეზი იქნება ჰიპერპორტიზანი ინფორმაციის განახლებას, სტილის ბაზეული ფუნქციების და ინფორმაციის ბაზეული ფუნქციების შექმნა. ჩვენ უფრო დიდი ფუნქციების რაოდენობა გამოვიყენებთ და გამოყენებთ როგორც ჩვენი სწავლის ალგორიტემი GBDT და n-გრამის CNN მოდელის. საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ ეფექტიური მასწავლებისთვის განსაზღვრებული საშუალოდ გამოყენებთ. ჩვენი მოდელი 0,745 წარმოდგენა წარმოდგენა ტესტის შესახებ A-ში.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive la nostra presentazione al compito 4 di SemEval 2019, ovvero il rilevamento di notizie iperpartigiane. Il nostro modello mira a rilevare notizie iperpartigiane incorporando le funzionalità basate sullo stile e le funzionalità basate sui contenuti. Estrarremo un ampio numero di set di funzionalità e usiamo come nostri algoritmi di apprendimento il GBDT e il modello CNN n-gram. Infine, applichiamo la media ponderata per l'apprendimento efficace tra i due modelli. Il nostro modello raggiunge una precisione di 0,745 sul set di test nel sottotask A.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinamas mūsų pristatymas prie 2019 m. SemEval 4 užduoties, t. y. hiperpartizinio naujienų aptikimo. Mūsų modeliu siekiama nustatyti hiperpartines naujienas, įtraukiant stiliu grindžiamas savybes ir turiniu grindžiamas savybes. Mes išimame daugybę požymių rinkinių ir kaip mokymosi algoritmai naudojame GBDT ir n-gramo CNN model į. Finally, we apply the weighted average for effective learning between the two models.  Mūsų modelis pasiekia 0,745 tikslumą A pakopoje esančiame bandymų rinkinyje.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2019 жылдың жаңалық тапсырмасына 4- тапсырмаға жіберілуімізді, т. е. гиперпартизалық жаңалықтарды анықтау. Біздің үлгіміз гиперпартиялық жаңалықтарды табу үшін стильді негізделген мүмкіндіктерді мен мазмұның негізделген мүмкіндіктерін ендіріп тұрады. Біз GBDT және n-грамм CNN үлгісін үйрену алгоритмдеріміз ретінде көптеген қасиеттерді тарқатып қолданамыз. Соңында, екі үлгілер арасындағы оқыту үшін орташа жиілікті қолданамыз. Біздің үлгіміз A суретінде сынақтар жиынында 0,745 деген дұрыс жеткізеді.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашето поднесување на задачата 4 во SemEval 2019, точно, хиперпартиска новинска детекција. Нашиот модел има за цел да ги детектира хиперпартиските вести преку вклучување на стилови базирани карактеристики и содржини базирани карактеристики. We extract a broad number of feature sets and use as our learning algorithms the GBDT and the n-gram CNN model.  Конечно, го применуваме тежираниот просек за ефикасно учење помеѓу двата модели. Нашиот модел постигнува точност од 0,745 на тестот во подпрашањето А.', 'ms': 'Kertas in i menjelaskan penghantaran kami ke tugas 4 di SemEval 2019, iaitu pengesan berita hyperpartisan. Model kami bertujuan untuk mengesan berita hyperpartisan dengan memasukkan ciri-ciri berdasarkan gaya dan ciri-ciri berdasarkan kandungan. Kami mengekstrak sejumlah besar set ciri-ciri dan menggunakan sebagai algoritma pembelajaran kami model GBDT dan n-gram CNN. Akhirnya, kita gunakan rata-rata berat untuk mempelajari efektif antara kedua-dua model. Model kita mencapai ketepatan 0.745 pada set ujian dalam subtask A.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019-ല്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ പണിയില്\u200d നാലിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനം വിവരിക്കുന്നുണ്ട്, അതായത് ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസന്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുവാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. രീതിയിലുള്ള പ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വിശാലമായ സംഖ്യസജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുകയും പഠിക്കുന്ന ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകളായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്ന അവസാനം, ഈ രണ്ടു മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d സാധാരണമായ പഠനത്തിനായി തൂക്കം ശരാശരി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഒരു പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ സെറ്റ് എയില്\u200d നിന്നും 0.745 ന്റെ കൃത്യമായി പ്രാപിക്കുന്നു.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver vår tilføring til oppgåva 4 i semiEval 2019, t.d. hyperpartisan news-oppdaging. Modellen vårt mål å finna hyperpartisan nyhetar ved å inkludere stilbaserte funksjonar og innhaldsbaserte funksjonar. Vi ekstraherer eit brett tal av funksjonssett og bruker som læringsalgoritmen våre GBDT og n-gram CNN-modellen. I slutt bruker vi gjennomsnittet vekt for effektiv læring mellom dei to modelane. Modellen vårt oppnår eit nøyaktig 0,745 på testsettet i underspørjinga A.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje naszą zgłoszenie do zadania 4 w SemEval 2019, tj. wykrywanie wiadomości hyperpartyzanckich. Nasz model ma na celu wykrywanie wiadomości hyperpartyzanckich poprzez włączenie funkcji opartych na stylu i funkcji opartych na treści. Wydobywamy szeroką liczbę zestawów funkcji i wykorzystujemy jako nasze algorytmy uczenia się GBDT i n-gram CNN model. Na koniec stosujemy średnią ważoną dla efektywnego uczenia się między dwoma modelami. Nasz model osiąga dokładność 0,745 na zestawie testowym w podzadaniu A.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас 2019 оны SemEval 2019 оны 4-р ажлын даалгаврыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бидний загварын зорилго нь хэлбэрээр суурилсан харилцаа болон сорилтуудын үндсэн харилцаа нэмэгдүүлснээр гиперпартизан мэдээг олох зорилго юм. Бид маш олон сонирхолтой хэмжээсүүдийг суралцах алгоритмыг GBDT болон n-грамм CNN загвар гэж ашиглаж байна. Эцэст нь бид хоёр загварын хоорондоо үр дүнтэй суралцах дундаж жингийг ашиглаж байна. Бидний загвар А доогуур асуултын шалгалтын тодорхой 0.745 байдаг.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie prezentarea noastră la sarcina 4 din SemEval 2019, adică detectarea știrilor hiperpartizane. Modelul nostru vizează detectarea știrilor hiperpartizane prin încorporarea caracteristicilor bazate pe stil și a caracteristicilor bazate pe conținut. Extragem un număr larg de seturi de caracteristici și folosim ca algoritmi de învățare modelul GBDT și n-gram CNN. În cele din urmă, aplicăm media ponderată pentru învățarea eficientă între cele două modele. Modelul nostru atinge o precizie de 0,745 pe setul de testare din subsarcina A.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše podnošenje zadatku 4 u semiEvalu 2019, tj. hiperpartizanskom detektivu vesti. Naš model je cilj otkrivanja hiperpartizanskih vijesti uključujući karakteristike na stilu i karakteristike na sadržaju. Izvučemo širok broj setova karakteristika i koristimo kao n a še algoritme učenja GBDT i n-gram CNN model a. Napokon, primjenjujemo prosjek težine za učenje između dva modela. Naš model postiže tačnost od 0,745 na testu u podpitanju A.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vår inlämning till uppgift 4 i SemEval 2019, dvs hyperpartisan nyhetsdetektering. Vår modell syftar till att upptäcka hyperpartisan nyheter genom att införliva stilbaserade funktioner och innehållsbaserade funktioner. Vi extraherar ett brett antal funktionsuppsättningar och använder som våra inlärningsalgoritmer GBDT och n-gram CNN modellen. Slutligen tillämpar vi det viktade genomsnittet för effektivt lärande mellan de två modellerna. Vår modell uppnår en noggrannhet på 0,745 på provuppsättningen i deluppgift A.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ වැඩේ 4 වැඩේ සෙම්වෙල් 2019 වල, ඉතින්, හායිපර්පාර්ටිසන් වාර්තාව හොයාගන්න. අපේ මොඩල් අදහස් කරනවා හායිපර් පාර්ටිසන් වාර්තාවක් හොයාගන්න, ශේලි අධාරිත විශේෂතාවක් සහ සාමාවි අපි ප්\u200dරශ්ණ අංකයක් අරගෙන ඉගෙන ගන්න සහ අපේ ඉගෙන ගන්න ඇල්ගෝරිතම් වලින් භාවිත කරන්න. අන්තිමේදී, අපි මොඩේල් දෙකක් අතර ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් සාමාන්\u200dය භාවිත කරන්නේ. අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක හරියටම 0.745 වෙනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණය A සබ්ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sottomissjoni tagħna għall-kompitu 4 f’SemEval 2019, jiġifieri l-individwazzjoni tal-aħbarijiet iperpartiġjani. Il-mudell tagħna għandu l-għan li jidentifika aħbarijiet iperpartiġjani billi jinkorpora l-karatteristiċi bbażati fuq l-istil u l-karatteristiċi bbażati fuq il-kontenut. Aħn a n ġibdu għadd wiesa’ settijiet ta’ karatteristiċi u nużaw bħala l-algoritmi tagħna tat-tagħlim il-mudell GBDT u n-gram CNN. Fl-aħħar nett, napplikaw il-medja peżata għat-tagħlim effettiv bejn iż-żewġ mudelli. Il-mudell tagħna jikseb preċiżjoni ta’ 0.745 fuq is-sett tat-test fis-sottotalba A.', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran warqaddayada loo soo diro shaqo 4 e e SemEval 2019, tusaale ahaan baaritaanka warbixinta hyperpartisan. Tusaale ahaan waxaa loogu talagalay in aad soo ogaato warar aad u qabsataan, in uu ku qoro qalabka qaabka ah iyo tababarada waxyaabaha ku qoran. Waxaynu soo saarnaa kooxo badan oo ballan ah, waxaana isticmaalaynaa algoreemada waxbarashada GBDT iyo modelka n-gram CNN. Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu isticmaalnaa wastaaqiga miisaanka ah si aan u barano waxbarashada faa’iido leh labada model dhexdooda. Tusaalkayagu wuxuu gaadhaa saxda 0.745 oo ku qoran imtixaanka sub-safka A.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval 2019-ல் எங்கள் செயல் 4 க்கு கூறுதலை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, அதாவது, அதிகப்பெரிய செய்தி கண்டறிதல். பாணி அடிப்படையிலுள்ள குணங்களையும் உள்ளடக்கங்களையும் சேர்த்து செய்து கொண்டு எங்கள் மாதிரியின் செய்திகளை கண்டறி நாங்கள் ஒரு விரிவான குணங்கள் அமைப்புகளை வெளியேற்றுகிறோம் மற்றும் எங்கள் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் படிப்பின் வரையறைகளை GBDT மற்ற இறுதியில், இந்த இரண்டு மாதிரிகளுக்கிடையில் வெளிப்படையான கற்றலுக்கு நாம் சராசரி பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். எங்கள் மாதிரி A துணை பணியில் அமைக்கப்பட்ட சோதனையின் சரியான 0.745-ன் மதிப்பை பெறுகிறது.', 'ur': 'This paper describes our submission to task 4 in SemEval 2019, i.e., hyperpartisan news detection. ہماری مدل کا ارادہ ہے کہ ہیرپارٹیسون خبروں کا اظہار کرنا چاہے اس طرح استیل پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں اور منزل پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں۔ ہم ایک پھیلائی سیٹ کی وسیع تعداد اور استعمال کرتے ہیں GBDT اور n-gram CNN موڈل کے طور پر۔ آخر میں ہم دونوں نمڈلوں کے درمیان مفید سیکھنے کے لئے میانہ وزن کے معاملہ میں استعمال کرتے ہیں. ہماری مدل ایک ٹیس سٹ پر 0.745 کی دقیق پہنچتی ہے.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz SemEval 2019 yildagi 4 vazifani aytishimizni anglatadi, huddi hyperpartisan xabar topish. Bizning modelimiz uslub-asosidagi xususiyatlarni va tarkibi xususiyatlarni birlashtirish uchun hyperpartisan xabarlarni aniqlashga ega bo'ladi. Biz bir necha xil moslamalarni chiqaramiz va biz o'rganish algoritlarimizni GBDT va n-gram CNN modeli sifatida ishlatimiz. Endi, biz ikki modellar orasidagi ta'lim o'rganishga o'xshash o'rtacha o'zaro qilamiz. Bizning modelimiz A'da tizim tugmasini 0.745 ta'minligini topadi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả sự phục tùng của chúng ta với nhiệm vụ 4 tại SemEvl 2009, tức là phát hiện tin tức du kích. Mục tiêu của chúng ta là phát hiện tin tức du kích bằng cách nhập vào các tính chất phong cách và tính chất nội dung. Chúng tôi trích xuất một số bộ hiệu và sử dụng làm thuật toán học của chúng tôi. GBT và n-gram cho cấu hình CNN. Cuối cùng, chúng ta áp dụng trung bình cân bằng cho việc học hỏi hiệu quả giữa hai mẫu. Mẫu của chúng tôi đạt độ chính xác 0.745 trên mẫu thử được đặt theo chữ A.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва нашето представяне на задача 4 в т.е. хиперпартизанско откриване на новини. Нашият модел има за цел да открива хиперпартизани новини чрез включване на стилово-базираните функции и функциите, базирани на съдържание. Извличаме широк брой функции и използваме като алгоритми за обучение модела ГБДТ и н-грамовия модел. Накрая, прилагаме среднопретеглената стойност за ефективно обучение между двата модела. Нашият модел постига точност от 0,745 на тестовия комплект в подзадача А.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše podnošenje zadatku 4 u poluvolji 2019., tj. hiperpartisan otkrivanje vijesti. Naš model je cilj otkrivanja hiperpartizanskih vijesti uključujući karakteristike na stilu i karakteristike na sadržaju. Izvučemo širok broj setova funkcija i koristimo kao n a še algoritme učenja GBDT i n-gram CNN model a. Napokon, primjenjujemo prosječni težini za učenje između dva modela. Naš model postiže točnost od 0,745 na testu u podpitanju A.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores indsendelse til opgave 4 i SemEval 2019, dvs. hyperpartisan nyhedsdetektion. Vores model har til formål at opdage hyperpartisan nyheder ved at indarbejde stilbaserede funktioner og indholdsbaserede funktioner. Vi udtrækker et bredt antal funktionssæt og bruger GBDT og n-gram CNN modellen som vores læringsalgoritmer. Endelig anvender vi det vægtede gennemsnit for effektiv læring mellem de to modeller. Vores model opnår en nøjagtighed på 0,745 på testsættet i underopgave A.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft onze inzending aan taak 4 in SemEval 2019, dat wil zeggen hyperpartizane nieuwsdetectie. Ons model is gericht op het detecteren van hyperpartizan nieuws door de style-based features en de content-based features op te nemen. We extraheren een breed aantal feature sets en gebruiken als onze leeralgoritmen het GBDT en het n-gram CNN model. Ten slotte passen we het gewogen gemiddelde toe voor effectief leren tussen de twee modellen. Ons model bereikt een nauwkeurigheid van 0.745 op de testset in subtaak A.', 'de': 'Dieses Papier beschreibt unsere Einreichung zu Aufgabe 4 in SemEval 2019, d.h. hyperparteiische Nachrichtenerkennung. Unser Modell zielt darauf ab, hyperparteiische Nachrichten zu erkennen, indem die stilbasierten und inhaltsbasierten Funktionen integriert werden. Wir extrahieren eine Vielzahl von Merkmalen und verwenden als Lernalgorithmen das GBDT und das n-Gramm CNN Modell. Schließlich wenden wir den gewichteten Durchschnitt für effektives Lernen zwischen den beiden Modellen an. Unser Modell erreicht eine Genauigkeit von 0,745 auf dem Prüfsatz in Teilaufgabe A.', 'ko': '본고는 우리가 2019년 3월에 제출한 임무 4, 즉 초당파 뉴스 검측을 묘사한다.우리의 모델은 스타일에 기반한 특징과 내용에 기반한 특징을 결합시켜 초당파 뉴스를 검출하는 데 목적을 두고 있다.우리는 대량의 특징 집합을 추출하고 GBDT와 n-gram CNN 모델을 우리의 학습 알고리즘으로 사용했다.마지막으로 우리는 두 모델 간의 효과적인 학습에 가중치를 평균적으로 사용할 것이다.우리의 모형은 하위 임무 A의 테스트 집합에서 0.745의 정밀도에 이르렀다.', 'id': 'Kertas in i menjelaskan pengiriman kami ke tugas 4 di SemEval 2019, yaitu deteksi berita hyperpartisan. Model kami bertujuan untuk mendeteksi berita hyperpartisan dengan memasukkan ciri-ciri berbasis gaya dan ciri-ciri berbasis isi. Kami mengekstrak sejumlah besar set fitur dan menggunakan sebagai algoritma belajar kita GBDT dan n-gram CNN model. Akhirnya, kita menggunakan rata-rata berat untuk belajar efektif antara dua model. Model kita mencapai akurasi 0,745 pada set tes di subtask A.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ تسلیم کردن ما به وظیفه ۴ در سامیاول 2019، یعنی شناسایی اخبار هایپر پارتیسان را توصیف می\u200cکند. مدل ما هدف دارد که اخبار هایپر پارتیزان را پیدا کنیم با توجه به ویژه\u200cهای بنیاد سبک و ویژه\u200cهای بنیاد محتویات باشد. ما تعداد گسترده\u200cای از مجموعه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cها را خارج می\u200cکنیم و به عنوان الگوریتم\u200cهای یادگیری ما برای GBDT و مدل n-gram CNN استفاده می\u200cکنیم. بالاخره، ما متوسط وزن را برای یادگیری موثر بین دو مدل استفاده می کنیم. مدل ما دقیق 0.745 در مجموعه آزمایش در زیر سوال A رسیده است.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea ujumbe wetu wa kazi 4 jijini SemEval 2019, yaani, utambulisho wa habari zenye matukio mengi. Mfano wetu unalenga kugundua habari za watu wengi kwa kuingiza tabia za msingi na tabia za maudhui. Tunatoa baadhi ya seti pana n a kutumia kama miolori yetu ya kujifunza GBDT na modeli ya CNN. Mwisho, tunatumia wastani mzito wa kujifunza kwa ufanisi kati ya mifano miwili. Mfano wetu unapata uhakika wa 0.745 kwenye jaribio lililowekwa kwenye kazi ya A.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz biziň rugsatymyzy SemEval 2019-nji ýylda 4-nji täblisaňy tanyşdyrýar. Biziň modelimiz hiperpartisany täzelikleri we daşary daşarylan özellikleri aňlap tapmakdyr. Biz bir n äçe möhüm düzümleri çykarýarys we GBDT we n-gram CNN nusgasyny öwrenmek Algoritmalarymyz ýaly ullanýarys. Soňunda, iki modeller arasynda etkinlik öwrenmek üçin ortalama çölegi uygulaýarys. Biziň nusgamyz 0,745-yň dogrylygyny A subtask setinde barýar.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe ons onderskrywing na taak 4 in SemEval 2019, t.d., hyperpartisan nuusbeskrywing. Ons model doen doel om hiperpartisan nuus te ontdek deur die styl-gebaseerde funksies en die inhoud-gebaseerde funksies te inkorporeer. Ons uitpak 'n breë nommer van funksie stel en gebruik as ons leer algoritme die GBDT en die n-gram CNN model. Eindelik het ons die gewigte gemiddelde aanwend vir effektief leer tussen die twee modele. Ons model bereik 'n presisie van 0,745 op die toets stel in subvraag A.", 'sq': 'Kjo letër përshkruan dorëzimin tonë në detyrën 4 në SemEval 2019, që do të thotë zbulimin e lajmeve hiperpartizane. Modeli ynë synon të zbulojë lajmet hiperpartizane duke përfshirë karakteristikat bazuar në stil dhe karakteristikat bazuar në përmbajtje. We extract a broad number of feature sets and use as our learning algorithms the GBDT and the n-gram CNN model.  Më në fund, ne aplikojmë mesataren e peshuar për mësimin efektiv midis dy modeleve. Modeli ynë arrin një saktësi 0.745 në test in e vendosur në subtaqesën A.', 'am': 'ይህም ገጽ በሴmEval 2019 ለስራ 4 አቀናኝነታችንን ይናገራል፤ አፍሪካዊ ዜና ማግኘት ነው፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን የዓይነ ሥርዓት እና የውይይት ባሕላዊ ምርጫዎችን በመጠቀም የhyperpartisan ዜናዎችን ማግኘት ነው፡፡ የGBDT እና የn-gram CNN ሞዴል ሆነን እንደተማርነው የፊደል ምርጫዎችን እናወጣለን፡፡ በመጨረሻውም በሁለቱ ዓይነቶች መካከል ለጥቅም ትምህርት ለመጠቀም በሚዛን ብዛት እናደርጋለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን በ አ ስራ ውስጥ የፈተናውን የ0.745 እርግጠኛ አግኝቷል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր ներկայացումը 2019 թվականի "ՍեմԵվալ" 4-ի հանձնարարության համար, այսինքն\' հիպերկուսային նորությունների հայտնաբերումը: Մեր մոդելը նպատակն է հայտնաբերել հիպերկայացի նորությունները, ներառելով ոճով հիմնված հատկությունները և պարունակությունով հիմնված հատկությունները: Մենք բազմաթիվ հատկություններ ենք ստանում և որպես ուսուցման ալգորիթմներ ենք օգտագործում ԳԲԴԹ և n-գրամ CNN մոդելը: Վերջապես, մենք կիրառում ենք երկու մոդելների միջև արդյունավետ սովորելու համար: Our model achieves an accuracy of 0.745 on the test set in subtask A.', 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪt 2019-in SemEval 2019-d…ô, hiperpartisan x…ôb…ôrl…ôri keŇüfetm…ôsi √ľ√ß√ľn 4-ci i Ňül…ôdiyimizi t…ôsdiql…ôyir. Bizim modell…ôrimiz hiperpartisan x…ôb…ôrl…ôrini istifad…ô edil…ôn Ňü…ôkill…ôri v…ô i√ß…ôrisind…ô tabanlńĪ x√ľsusiyy…ôtl…ôri inkiŇüaf etm…ôk ist…ôyir. GBDT v…ô n-gram CNN modelini √∂yr…ônm…ôk algoriml…ôrimiz kimi geniŇü bir sayńĪ f…ôrqli setl…ôri √ßńĪxarńĪrńĪq v…ô istifad…ô edirik. Sonunda, iki modell…ôrin arasńĪnda etkili √∂yr…ônm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn ortalama ańüńĪrlńĪńüńĪnńĪ uygulayńĪq. Bizim modelimiz A subtask sńĪnamasńĪnda 0,745 d…ôqiqliyin…ô nail ola bil…ôr.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল ২০১৯-এ আমাদের কাজ ৪-এর প্রতি আমাদের প্রতিবেদন বর্ণনা করেছে, যেমন হাইপার্পার্টিস্যান সং আমাদের মডেলের উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে হাইপার্পার্সিন সংবাদ খুঁজে বের করার, স্টাইল ভিত্তিক বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং বিষয়বস্তুর বৈশ আমরা ব্যাপক সংখ্যা ব্যবহার করি এবং জিবিডিটি এবং n-গ্রাম সিএনএন মডেল হিসেবে ব্যবহার করি। শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা দুই মডেলের মধ্যে কার্যকর শিক্ষার জন্য ওজনের গড়ি প্রয়োগ করি। আমাদের মডেলটি সাবটাস এ-এর পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষায় ০.৭৪৫ এর সঠিকভাবে অর্জন করে।', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše podatke na zadatak 4 u semiEvalu 2019, tj. hiperpartisan detektiv vijesti. Naš model je cilj otkrivanja hiperpartizanskih vijesti uključujući karakteristike na stilu i karakteristike na sadržaju. Izvučemo širok broj setova karakteristika i koristimo kao n a še algoritme učenja GBDT i n-gram CNN model a. Napokon, primjenjujemo prosjek težine za učenje između dva modela. Naš model postiže točnost od 0,745 na testu u podpitanju A.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu la nostra subministració a la tasca 4 de SemEval 2019, és a dir, la detecció de notícies hiperpartisanes. El nostre model mira a detectar notícies hiperpartisanes incorporant les característiques basades en l'estil i les característiques basades en el contingut. Extraem un gran nombre de conjunts de característiques i utilitzem com algoritmes d'aprenentatge el model GBDT i n-gram CNN. Finalment, aplicam la mitjana ponderada per a l'aprenentatge efectiu entre els dos models. El nostre model aconsegueix una precisió de 0,745 en el conjunt d'exàmens de la subtanya A.", 'cs': 'Tento příspěvek popisuje naše podání úkolu 4 v SemEvalu 2019, tedy hyperstranické detekce zpráv. Náš model se zaměřuje na detekci hyperstranických zpráv začleněním funkcí založených na stylu a obsahu. Extrahujeme široký počet sad funkcí a jako naše učební algoritmy používáme GBDT a n-gram CNN model. Nakonec aplikujeme vážený průměr pro efektivní učení mezi oběma modely. Náš model dosahuje přesnosti 0,745 na zkušební sadě v podúkolu A.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse meie esitamist SemEval 2019. aasta ülesandele 4, st hüperpartisansete uudiste tuvastamisele. Meie mudeli eesmärk on tuvastada hüperpartisanseid uudiseid, lisades stiilipõhised funktsioonid ja sisupõhised funktsioonid. Me ekstraheerime laia hulga funktsioonikomplekte ja kasutame oma õppealgoritmidena GBDT ja n-grammi CNN mudelit. Lõpuks rakendame kaalutud keskmist efektiivseks õppimiseks kahe mudeli vahel. Meie mudel saavutab alaülesande A testikomplekti täpsuse 0,745.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan tehtävään 4 siirtymistämme SemEval 2019 eli hyperpartisaanien uutisten havaitsemiseen. Mallimme pyrkii havaitsemaan hyperpartisaaneja yhdistämällä tyyliin ja sisältöön perustuvat ominaisuudet. Keräämme laajan määrän ominaisuuksia ja käytämme oppimisalgoritmeina GBDT- ja n-gramman CNN-mallia. Lopuksi sovellamme painotettua keskiarvoa tehokkaaseen oppimiseen näiden kahden mallin välillä. Mallimme saavuttaa 0,745 tarkkuuden alatehtävän A testisarjassa.', 'jv': 'This paper describs the current report to task 4 in semebal 2011, i.e. a, super-partisan information detection. http://t.co/ENCYCYCYCYCYCYCYCYCYCYCYCYCYCYCYCYCYCYCYCYC We model goal at detecting lime Awak dhéwé butuh sistem sing dibutuhke lan nambah tanggal nggawe Algorithm GBDT karo model n-gram. Lha wih-wih, kita gampang kuwi nggambar deweke nggawe layar-layar iki model. model nambah ono wektu kelas barang 0.485 neng ujian seng pangan A', 'ha': 'Wannan takardan na faÉ—aÉ—a musuluntmu zuwa aikin 4 a SemEV 2019, misali, ganin mafarin news. Tuduniyarmu na aimar ka sami babban lĂŁbĂŁri da aka samu cikin salo da aka sala shi. Kana fiÉ—e wasu masu amfani da ko kuma muna amfani da algoritori masu sani kamar shirin GBDT da n a n-gram CNN. Gani, MunĂŁ nuna nauyi wa matsayin da aka yi wa karatun mafiya amfani a tsakanin misalin biyu. Misalinmu ya sami tsari na 0.745 a kan jarraba wanda ke cikin sub-aikin A.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje našo predložitev nalogi 4 v SemEval 2019, tj. hiperpartizansko odkrivanje novic. Naš model je namenjen odkrivanju hiperpartizanskih novic z vključitvijo slogovnih funkcij in vsebinskih funkcij. Izvlečemo široko število naborov funkcij in kot naši učni algoritmi uporabljamo model GBDT in n-gramski CNN. Na koncu uporabljamo tehtano povprečje za učinkovito učenje med obema modeloma. Naš model dosega natančnost 0,745 na testnem kompletu v podnalogi A.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את ההעברה שלנו למשימה 4 בסמיוול 2019, כלומר, גילוי חדשות היפרפרטיזנית. המודל שלנו מתכוון לגלות חדשות היפרפרטיזניות על ידי הכילוי של תכונות המבוססים בסגנון והתכונות המבוססים בתוכן. אנו מוציאים מספר רחב של תכונות ומשתמשים כאלגוריתמים הלימודים שלנו מודל ה-GBDT ו-n-gram CNN. סוף סוף, אנחנו משתמשים בממוצע המשקל ללמוד יעיל בין שני הדוגמנים. המודל שלנו משיג מדויקה של 0.745 על קבוצת הבדיקה בתא-שאלה A.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་བྱ་ཚིག་ལ་འཇུག་ཟམ་པ་༡༢༠༩་ལོགས་སྐབས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཐོག་གཙང་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Our model aims to detect hyperpartisan news by incorporating the style-based features and the content-based features. ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆེ་བའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དང་བེད་སྤྱོད་རོགས མཐའ་མར་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་མི་དབྱིབས་གཉིས་དབར་གྱི་བསྒྱུར་རིམ་གྱི་ཚད་རྒྱ་ནུས་ཀྱི་སྤྲོད་དུ་འཇུག་གི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཕྱོགས་A ཡི་ནང་གི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཚད་ལྟར་0.745ལས་བདེ་སྟངས་འཛུགས་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Team Fernando-Pessa at SemEval-2019 Task 4 : Back to Basics in Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'ar': 'فريق فرناندو بيسا في SemEval-2019 المهمة 4: العودة إلى الأساسيات في الكشف عن الأخبار شديدة الحزبية', 'es': 'El equipo Fernando-Pessa en la Tarea 4 de SemEval-2019: Regreso a lo básico en la detección de noticias hiperpartidistas', 'fr': "L'équipe Fernando-Pessa au SEMEVAL-2019 Task 4\xa0: Retour aux bases de la détection hyperpartisane des actualités", 'pt': 'Equipe Fernando-Pessa na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 4: De volta ao básico na detecção de notícias hiperpartidárias', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のチームFernando - Pessaタスク4 ：ハイパーパーパーティサンニュース検出の基本に戻る', 'zh': 'Fernando-Pessa团队在SemEval-2019务4:还超党新闻检测之基础知识', 'hi': 'टीम फर्नांडो-पेसा सेमेवल-2019 टास्क 4 पर: हाइपरपार्टिजन न्यूज डिटेक्शन में मूल बातें पर वापस', 'ru': 'Команда Фернандо-Песса на SemEval-2019 Задача 4: Назад к основам в гиперпартийном обнаружении новостей', 'ga': 'Foireann Fernando-Pessa ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 4: Ar Ais go Bunús i mBraith Nuacht Hyperpartisan', 'ka': 'ჯგუფი ფერნანდო-პესსა SemEval-2019 დავალება 4: დაბრუნდეთ ბაზიკში Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'hu': 'Fernando-Pessa csapat a SemEval-2019 4. feladaton: Vissza a hiperpartizánok alapjaihoz Hírek felismerése', 'el': 'Ομάδα Φερνάντο-Πέσα στο έργο 4: Επιστροφή στα βασικά στην ανίχνευση υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων', 'it': 'Team Fernando-Pessa al SemEval-2019 Task 4: Ritorno alle basi nel rilevamento delle notizie iperpartigiane', 'kk': 'Фернандо- Песса тобы жалпы 2019 жылы 4- тапсырмасында: Hyperpartisan жаңалықтарды анықтау', 'mk': 'Тим Фернандо-Песа на SemEval-2019 задача 4: Врати се на основата во детективата на хиперпартисанските вести', 'lt': 'Fernando-Pessa grupė 2010–2019 m. pusėje 4 užduotis: grįžti prie pagrindinių hiperpartinių naujienų aptikimo', 'ms': 'Pasukan Fernando-Pessa di SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Kembali ke Basis dalam Pengesanan Berita Hyperpartisan', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 4: ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസാന്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്ത ഡിറ്റീഷനിലേക്ക് തിരിച്ചുപോകുക', 'mt': 'It-Tim Fernando-Pessa fis-SemEval-2019 Kompitu 4: Ritorn għall-Bażiċi fid-Detezzjoni tal-Aħbarijiet Hyperpartisan', 'mn': 'Фернандо-Песса баг SemEval-2019 ажил 4: Хиперпартизан мэдээллийн нээлттэй буцаад', 'no': 'Gruppe Fernando-Pessa på semiEval-2019 Oppgåve 4: Tilbake til basisk i Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'sr': 'Tim Fernando-Pessa na semiEval-2019 Task 4: Vratiti se na osnovu u detekciji novina hiperpartisan', 'ro': 'Echipa Fernando-Pessa la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 4: Înapoi la elementele de bază în detectarea știrilor hiperpartizane', 'pl': 'Zespół Fernando-Pessa na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 4: Powrót do podstaw w wykrywaniu wiadomości hiperpartyjnych', 'si': 'Fernando-Pessa කණ්ඩායම සෙම්වෙල්-2019 වැඩ 4: ආපහු පාර්ටිසන් වාර්තාව හොයාගන්න', 'so': 'Kooxda Fernando-Pessa ee SemEval-2019 Task 4: Ku noqo Basics in Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'sv': 'Team Fernando-Pessa på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 4: Tillbaka till grunderna i hyperpartisan Nyhetsdetektering', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 செயல் 4: ஹைப்பர்பார்டிசன் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பில் அடிப்படைகளுக்கு திரும்பு', 'ur': 'ٹیم فرناندو-پیسا سیم ایول-2019 ٹاکس ۴: ہیپر پارٹیسان نیویس ڈیکس میں واپس جاؤ', 'uz': 'SemEval-2019 Vazifa 4: Hyperpartisan Newspaper Detection asosida qaytib borish', 'vi': 'Đội Fernando-Pessa tại SemEvl-209 Task 4: Back to Basics in Hyperdu hist news trinh sát', 'bg': 'Екип Фернандо-Песа на Задача 4: Обратно към основите в откриването на хиперпартизани новини', 'nl': 'Team Fernando-Pessa bij SemEval-2019 Taak 4: Back to Basics in Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'da': 'Team Fernando-Pessa på SemEval-2019 Opgave 4: Tilbage til grundlæggende elementer i hyperpartisan Nyheder Detection', 'hr': 'Tim Fernando-Pessa na semiEval-2019 zadatak 4: Vratiti se na osnovu u otkrivanju Hyperpartisan vijesti', 'de': 'Team Fernando-Pessa bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 4: Zurück zu den Grundlagen der hyperparteiischen Nachrichtenerkennung', 'ko': 'Fernando Pessa팀이Sem Eval-19 임무4: 초당파 뉴스 검측의 기초로 돌아가기', 'id': 'Tim Fernando-Pessa di SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Kembali ke dasar dalam Deteksi Berita Hyperpartisan', 'sw': 'Timu Fernando-Pessa katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 4: Kurudi kwenye misingi ya Habari za Hyperpartisan', 'fa': 'تیم فرناندو-پیسا در شمیEval-2019 کار ۴: برگشتن به اساسی در بازرسی خبرهای هوپر پارتیسان', 'tr': 'Topum Fernando-Pessa at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Back to Basics in Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'af': 'Skep Fernando-Pessa by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 4: Terug na Basiese in Hyperpartisan Nuus Opdekking', 'sq': 'Ekipi Fernando-Pessa në SemEval-2019 Detyra 4: Kthimi në bazë në zbulimin e lajmeve hiperpartizane', 'am': 'የሴmEval-2019 ስራ 4: ወደ Hyperpartisan ዜና ማውጣት ወደ መሠረት ተመለሱ', 'hy': 'Ֆերնանդո-Պեսսայի թիմը ՍեմԵվալ 2019 թվականին 4. հանձնարարություն. Հիպերպարտիզան նորությունների հայտնաբերման հիմքերին վերադառնալը', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Takım Fernando-Pessa 4: Hyperpartisan Haber Görünüşünün Basisinə Dönüş', 'bs': 'Tim Fernando-Pessa na semiEval-2019 Task 4: Vratiti se na osnovu u detekciji novina hiperpartisan', 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৯-এর কাজ ৪: হাইপার্পার্পার্টিসান নিউজ ডিটেক্টরেশনে ফিরে যাও', 'ca': "L'equip Fernando-Pessa a SemEval-2019 Task 4: Back to Basics in Hyperpartisan News Detection", 'cs': 'Tým Fernando-Pessa na SemEval-2019 Úkol 4: Zpět k základům v detekci hyperstranických zpráv', 'et': 'Fernando-Pessa meeskond SemEval-2019 ülesandel 4: tagasi põhimõtete juurde hüperpartisanide uudiste tuvastamisel', 'fi': 'Team Fernando-Pessa SemEval-2019 Task 4: Takaisin perusperiaatteisiin Hyperpartisan News Detectionissa', 'jv': 'Grup Ternando-Pessa nang semebal-2011 task 4: Back to basic in Typerpartisan New detection', 'ha': 'Taimar 4: Back to Basics in Hyperpart News', 'sk': 'Ekipa Fernando-Pessa na SemEval-2019 naloga 4: Nazaj na osnove v hiperpartizanskem odkrivanju novic', 'he': 'צוות Fernando-Pessa ב SemEval-2019 משימה 4: חזרה לבסיסים בחיפוש חדשות היפרפרטיזן', 'bo': 'ཚོ་ཁག་པོ Fernando-Pessa at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Back to Basics in Hyperpartisan News Detection'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our submission to the SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detection task. Our system aims for a linguistics-based document classification from a minimal set of interpretable features, while maintaining good performance. To this goal, we follow a feature-based approach and perform several experiments with different machine learning classifiers. Additionally, we explore feature importances and distributions among the two classes. On the main task, our model achieved an accuracy of 71.7 %, which was improved after the task’s end to 72.9 %. We also participate on the meta-learning sub-task, for classifying documents with the binary classifications of all submitted systems as input, achieving an accuracy of 89.9 %.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة تقديمنا إلى مهمة الكشف عن الأخبار الحزبية في SemEval 2019. يهدف نظامنا إلى تصنيف المستندات المستند إلى علم اللغة من مجموعة صغيرة من الميزات القابلة للتفسير ، مع الحفاظ على الأداء الجيد. لتحقيق هذا الهدف ، نتبع نهجًا قائمًا على الميزات ونجري العديد من التجارب باستخدام مصنفات مختلفة للتعلم الآلي. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، فإننا نستكشف أهمية الميزات والتوزيعات بين الفئتين. في المهمة الرئيسية ، حقق نموذجنا دقة بلغت 71.7٪ ، والتي تم تحسينها بعد انتهاء المهمة إلى 72.9٪. نشارك أيضًا في المهمة الفرعية للتعليم التلوي ، لتصنيف المستندات بالتصنيفات الثنائية لجميع الأنظمة المقدمة كمدخلات ، وتحقيق دقة قدرها 89.9٪.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre soumission à la tâche SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detection. Notre système vise une classification des documents basée sur la linguistique à partir d'un ensemble minimal de caractéristiques interprétables, tout en maintenant de bonnes performances. Pour ce faire, nous suivons une approche basée sur les fonctionnalités et effectuons plusieurs expériences avec différents classificateurs d'apprentissage automatique. De plus, nous explorons l'importance et la distribution des entités entre les deux classes. Sur la tâche principale, notre modèle a atteint une précision de 71,7\xa0%, qui a été améliorée à 72,9\xa0% après la fin de la tâche. Nous participons également à la sous-tâche de méta-apprentissage, qui consiste à classer les documents avec les classifications binaires de tous les systèmes soumis en entrée, avec une précision de 89,9\xa0%.", 'es': 'Este documento describe nuestro envío a la tarea de detección de noticias hiperpartidistas de SemEval 2019. Nuestro sistema apunta a una clasificación de documentos basada en la lingüística a partir de un conjunto mínimo de funciones interpretables, manteniendo al mismo tiempo un buen rendimiento. Para lograr este objetivo, seguimos un enfoque basado en funciones y realizamos varios experimentos con diferentes clasificadores de aprendizaje automático. Además, exploramos la importancia de las funciones y las distribuciones entre las dos clases. En la tarea principal, nuestro modelo logró una precisión del 71,7%, que se mejoró una vez finalizada la tarea al 72,9%. También participamos en la subtarea de meta-aprendizaje, para clasificar documentos con las clasificaciones binarias de todos los sistemas enviados como entrada, logrando una precisión del 89,9%.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nossa submissão à tarefa SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detection. Nosso sistema visa uma classificação de documentos baseada em linguística a partir de um conjunto mínimo de recursos interpretáveis, mantendo um bom desempenho. Para isso, seguimos uma abordagem baseada em recursos e realizamos vários experimentos com diferentes classificadores de aprendizado de máquina. Além disso, exploramos as importâncias e distribuições dos recursos entre as duas classes. Na tarefa principal, nosso modelo alcançou uma precisão de 71,7%, que foi aprimorada após o término da tarefa para 72,9%. Também participamos da subtarefa de meta-aprendizagem, para classificar documentos com as classificações binárias de todos os sistemas submetidos como entrada, alcançando uma precisão de 89,9%.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detectionタスクへの提出について説明します。当社のシステムは、優れたパフォーマンスを維持しながら、最小限の一連の解釈可能な機能から、言語学に基づく文書分類を目指しています。この目標を達成するために、私たちは特徴ベースのアプローチに従い、異なる機械学習分類子を使用していくつかの実験を行います。さらに、2つのクラス間の機能のインポートと分布を探ります。メインタスクでは、当社のモデルは71.7 ％の精度を達成し、タスク終了後に72.9 ％に向上しました。提出されたすべてのシステムのバイナリ分類を入力として文書を分類するメタラーニングサブタスクにも参加し、89.9 ％の精度を実現しています。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detection कार्य के लिए हमारे सबमिशन का वर्णन करता है। हमारी प्रणाली का उद्देश्य अच्छे प्रदर्शन को बनाए रखते हुए व्याख्यायोग्य विशेषताओं के न्यूनतम सेट से भाषाविज्ञान-आधारित दस्तावेज़ वर्गीकरण है। इस लक्ष्य के लिए, हम एक सुविधा-आधारित दृष्टिकोण का पालन करते हैं और विभिन्न मशीन लर्निंग क्लासिफायरके साथ कई प्रयोग करते हैं। इसके अतिरिक्त, हम दो वर्गों के बीच सुविधा महत्व और वितरण का पता लगाते हैं। मुख्य कार्य पर, हमारे मॉडल ने 71.7% की सटीकता हासिल की, जिसे कार्य के अंत के बाद 72.9% तक सुधारा गया था। हम मेटा-लर्निंग उप-कार्य पर भी भाग लेते हैं, इनपुट के रूप में सभी प्रस्तुत प्रणालियों के बाइनरी वर्गीकरण के साथ दस्तावेजों को वर्गीकृत करने के लिए, 89.9% की सटीकता प्राप्त करने के लिए।', 'zh': '本文介于SemEval 2019超党新闻检勘之交。 吾之系统,于最小之说,盖语言学之文档类,兼保持良好之性也。 所以然者,循其所以然,而用其机器学分类器实验。 此外讨了这两类间的特征重要分布。 大务成于71.7%准确率,终于72.9%。 参以元学之任,以二元之类输文档,致89.9%之准确率。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наше участие в задаче SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detection. Наша система нацелена на лингвистическую классификацию документов из минимального набора интерпретируемых признаков при сохранении хорошей производительности. Для этого мы используем функциональный подход и проводим несколько экспериментов с различными классификаторами машинного обучения. Кроме того, мы изучаем особенности импорта и распределения между двумя классами. По основной задаче наша модель достигла точности 71,7%, что улучшилось после окончания задания до 72,9%. Мы также участвуем в подзадаче метаобучения, для классификации документов с двоичными классификациями всех представленных систем в качестве входных, достигая точности 89,9%.', 'ga': "Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár n-aighneacht do thasc Brath Nuacht Hyperpartisan SemEval 2019. Tá sé mar aidhm ag ár gcóras aicmiú doiciméad bunaithe ar theangeolaíocht ó thacar íosta de ghnéithe inmhínithe, agus feidhmíocht mhaith á chothabháil ag an am céanna. Chuige seo, leanaimid cur chuige gné-bhunaithe agus déanaimid roinnt turgnamh le haicmitheoirí éagsúla meaisínfhoghlama. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid iniúchadh ar thábhacht gnéithe agus ar dháiltí i measc an dá rang. Ar an tasc is mó, d'éirigh lenár múnla cruinneas 71.7% a bhaint amach, a feabhsaíodh tar éis dheireadh an tasc go 72.9%. Glacaimid páirt freisin san fhothasc meitea-fhoghlama, chun doiciméid a rangú le haicmí dénártha na gcóras go léir a chuirtear isteach mar ionchur, ag baint amach cruinneas 89.9%.", 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detection feladatra való benyújtásunkat. Rendszerünk célja a nyelvészeti alapú dokumentumok besorolása minimális értelmezhető jellemzőkből, jó teljesítmény fenntartása mellett. Ennek érdekében funkcióalapú megközelítést követünk, és több kísérletet végezünk különböző gépi tanulási osztályozókkal. Emellett feltárjuk a funkciók fontosságát és elosztását a két osztály között. A fő feladat tekintetében modellünk 71,7%-os pontosságot ért el, ami a feladat befejezése után 72,9%-ra javult. Részt veszünk a metatanulás alcsoportban is, melynek célja, hogy a dokumentumokat bemenetként osztályozzuk az összes benyújtott rendszer bináris osztályozásával, 89,9%-os pontosságot érjünk el.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει την υποβολή μας στην εργασία ανίχνευσης υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων. Το σύστημά μας στοχεύει σε μια γλωσσική ταξινόμηση εγγράφων από ένα ελάχιστο σύνολο ερμηνευτών χαρακτηριστικών, διατηρώντας παράλληλα την καλή απόδοση. Για το σκοπό αυτό, ακολουθούμε μια προσέγγιση βασισμένη σε χαρακτηριστικά και διεξάγουμε διάφορα πειράματα με διαφορετικούς ταξινομητές μηχανικής μάθησης. Επιπλέον, διερευνούμε τις εισαγωγές και διανομές χαρακτηριστικών μεταξύ των δύο κατηγοριών. Στην κύρια εργασία, το μοντέλο μας πέτυχε μια ακρίβεια 71.7%, η οποία βελτιώθηκε μετά το τέλος της εργασίας σε 72.9%. Συμμετέχουμε επίσης στο υποσύστημα μετα-μάθησης, για την ταξινόμηση εγγράφων με τις δυαδικές ταξινομήσεις όλων των υποβαλλόμενων συστημάτων ως εισαγωγή, επιτυγχάνοντας ακρίβεια 89,9%.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი ჩვენი სამუშაო სამუშაო 2019 წლის ჰიპერპორტიზანი ნუზების განახლების დავაწერა. ჩვენი სისტემის მიზეზი ლინგურისტიკური დოკუმენტის კლასიფიკაციის მიზეზი მინიმალური განსხვავებელი ფუნქციებისგან, რომლებიც კარგი გამოყენება. ამ მიზეზისთვის, ჩვენ განვითარებთ განსხვავებული მაქინის სწავლების კლასიფიკაციებით განსხვავებული ექსპერიმენტების გადავითარებთ. დამატებით, ჩვენ შევხედავთ ორი კლასის შორის მნიშვნელობა და განყოფილება. მაგალითად ჩვენი მოდელი 71,7%-ის წარმოდგენა, რომელიც მოქმედების ბოლოდან 72,9%-ის დასასრულებაში გააკეთებულია. ჩვენ ასევე მეტა-სწავლების საკუთარი საქმე დავწყებთ, რომ კლასიფიკაცია დოკუმენტების ბინარი კლასიფიკაციაში ყველა გადატანებული სისტემის სისტემის გამოყენებაში, როგორც 89,9% წ', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinamas mūsų pranešimas SemEval 2019 hiperpartisan News Detection uždaviniui. Mūsų sistema siekiama kalbomis pagrįsto dokumentų klasifikavimo iš minimalių aiškinamųjų savybių rinkinio ir kartu išlaikyti gerus rezultatus. Šiuo tikslu mes vadovaujamės savybėmis pagrįstu požiūriu ir atliekame keletą eksperimentų su skirtingais mašinų mokymosi klasifikatoriais. Be to, mes tiriame ypatumus ir paskirstymus tarp dviejų klasių. Pagrindinėje užduotyje mūs ų modelis pasiek71,7 proc. tikslumo, kuris buvo pagerintas pasibaigus užduotiui iki 72,9 proc. Mes taip pat dalyvaujame metamokymosi papunktyje, kad dokumentai būtų klasifikuojami pagal dvigubą visų pateiktų sistemų klasifikaciją kaip duomenys, siekiant 89,9 proc. tikslumo.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2019 жылы жаңалық тапсырманың SemEval 2019- іне жіберімізді таңдайды. Біздің жүйеміз лингвистикалық құжаттарды түрлендіру үшін, жақсы әрекеттерді сақтау кезінде, түрлендіруі мүмкіндіктердің төменгі жиынынан келтірілген. Бұл мақсатта, біз қасиеттерді негіздеген тәсілді және бірнеше машина оқыту классификациясының бірнеше тәжірибелерін істейміз. Қосымша, екі сыныптың маңызды және тарату мүмкіндіктерін зерттейміз. Негізгі тапсырма үлгісінде 71,7% деген дұрыс жеткізді, бұл тапсырманың соңында 72,9% дегенге жақсартылды. Біз сондай-ақ мета оқыту ішкі тапсырмасына қатысу үшін, барлық жүйелердің бинарлық классификацияларына қатысу үшін, 89,9% деген дұрыс жеткіземіз.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive la nostra presentazione al compito SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detection. Il nostro sistema mira a una classificazione dei documenti basata sulla linguistica a partire da una serie minima di caratteristiche interpretabili, pur mantenendo buone prestazioni. A questo scopo, seguiamo un approccio basato sulle funzionalità ed eseguiamo diversi esperimenti con diversi classificatori di machine learning. Inoltre, esploriamo le importanze e le distribuzioni delle funzionalità tra le due classi. Sul compito principale, il nostro modello ha raggiunto una precisione del 71,7%, che è stata migliorata dopo la fine del compito al 72,9%. Partecipiamo anche al sub-task meta-learning, per classificare i documenti con le classificazioni binarie di tutti i sistemi presentati come input, raggiungendo una precisione dell'89,9%.", 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашето поднесување на SemEval 2019 Хиперпартисанска новинска детективна задача. Нашиот систем има за цел класификација на документи базирани на лингвистика од минимален сет на интерпретабилни карактеристики, истовремено одржувајќи добри резултати. За оваа цел, следиме пристап базиран на карактеристики и спроведуваме неколку експерименти со различни класификатори за машинско учење. Additionally, we explore feature importances and distributions among the two classes.  Во врска со главната задача, нашиот модел постигна точност од 71,7 отсто, која беше подобрена по завршувањето на задачата на 72,9 отсто. Ние, исто така, учествуваме во подзадачата за метаучење, за класификација на документите со бинарните класификации на сите поднесени системи како влог, постигнувајќи точност од 89,9 отсто.', 'mt': "Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sottomissjoni tagħna lis-SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detection task. Is-sistema tagħna timmira għal klassifikazzjoni tad-dokumenti bbażata fuq il-lingwistika minn sett minimu ta’ karatteristiċi interpretabbli, filwaqt li żżomm prestazzjoni tajba. Għal dan il-għan, nisegwu approċċ ibbażat fuq il-karatteristiċi u nagħmlu diversi esperimenti b’klassifikaturi differenti tat-tagħlim bil-magni. Barra minn hekk, nesploraw importanzi u distribuzzjonijiet karatteristiċi fost iż-żewġ klassijiet. Fuq il-kompitu ewlieni, il-mudell tagħna kiseb preċiżjoni ta’ 71.7%, li tjiebet wara t-tmiem tal-kompitu għal 72.9%. Aħna qed jipparteċipaw ukoll fis-sottokompitu ta' meta-tagħlim, għall-klassifikazzjoni tad-dokumenti bil-klassifikazzjonijiet binarji tas-sistemi kollha sottomessi bħala input, li jiksbu preċiżjoni ta' 89.9%.", 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസാന്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ ജോലിയെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d നിലനിര്\u200dത്തുമ്പോള്\u200d ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള രേഖകളുടെ വി ഈ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്, നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ മെഷീന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. കൂടാതെ, ഈ രണ്ട് ക്ലാസിന്റെ ഇടയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതും വിഭാഗങ്ങളും പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലിയില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d 71.7% കൃത്യമായി എത്തി. ജോലി അവസാനിച്ചതിനു ശേഷം അത് മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തി. എല്ലാ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെയും ബൈനര്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷഷനുമായി രേഖകള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നതിനായി മെറ്റി-പഠിക്കുന്ന ഉപാധിയിലും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പങ്കെടു', 'ms': 'This paper describes our submission to the SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detection task.  Our system aims for a linguistics-based document classification from a minimal set of interpretable features, while maintaining good performance.  Untuk tujuan ini, kita mengikuti pendekatan berdasarkan ciri-ciri dan melakukan beberapa eksperimen dengan klasifikasi pembelajaran mesin yang berbeza. Selain itu, kami mengeksplorasi penting ciri-ciri dan distribusi di antara dua kelas. Pada tugas utama, model kita mencapai ketepatan 71.7%, yang diperbaiki selepas tugas berakhir ke 72.9%. Kami juga berpartisipasi dalam sub-tugas meta-belajar, untuk mengklasifikasikan dokumen dengan klasifikasi binari semua sistem yang dihantar sebagai input, mencapai ketepatan 89.9%.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver vår tilføring til semiEval 2019-oppgåva for Hyperpartisan News Detection. Sistemet vårt mål er å gjera eit klassifikasjon på språkbasert dokument frå ein minimal sett av tolkbare funksjonar, mens det gjer godt utvikling. For dette målet følgjer vi ein funksjonsbasert tilnærming og utfører fleire eksperimenter med ulike maskinelæringsklassifikatorar. I tillegg utforskar vi funksjonar for importering og distribusjon mellom dei to klassene. På hovudoppgåva fikk modellen vårt nøyaktig 71,7%, som vart forbetra etter slutten av oppgåva til 72,9%. Vi deltar også på underoppgåva med metalæring, for å klassifisera dokument med binærklassifikasjonane av alle sendte systema som inndata, og når det er nok nøyaktig av 89,9 %.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie prezentarea noastră la sarcina SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detection. Sistemul nostru urmărește o clasificare bazată pe lingvistică a documentelor dintr-un set minim de caracteristici interpretabile, menținând în același timp performanțe bune. În acest scop, urmăm o abordare bazată pe caracteristici și efectuăm mai multe experimente cu diferiți clasificatori de învățare automată. În plus, explorăm importanțele și distribuțiile caracteristicilor între cele două clase. Pe sarcina principală, modelul nostru a obținut o precizie de 71,7%, care a fost îmbunătățită după încheierea sarcinii la 72,9%. Participăm, de asemenea, la subsarcina meta-learning, pentru clasificarea documentelor cu clasificările binare ale tuturor sistemelor depuse ca input, obținând o acuratețe de 89,9%.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje naszą zgłoszenie do zadania SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detection. Nasz system ma na celu klasyfikację dokumentów opartych na językowości z minimalnego zbioru cech interpretowalnych, przy jednoczesnym zachowaniu dobrej wydajności. W tym celu stosujemy podejście oparte na funkcjach i przeprowadzamy kilka eksperymentów z różnymi klasyfikatorami uczenia maszynowego. Dodatkowo badamy importy funkcji i dystrybucje pomiędzy dwie klasy. W zadaniu głównym nasz model osiągnął dokładność 71,7%, która została poprawiona po zakończeniu zadania do 72,9%. Uczestniczymy również w podzadaniu meta-learning, do klasyfikacji dokumentów z klasyfikacjami binarnymi wszystkich zgłoszonych systemów jako danych wejściowych, osiągając dokładność 89,9%.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний SemEval 2019 оны гиперпартизан мэдээллийн нээлтийн ажлыг тайлбарладаг. Бидний систем хэлний үндсэн баримтуудын хувьд сайн үйл ажиллагааг хадгалах үед бага хэмжээний хэмжээсүүдийн хуваалцааны зорилго юм. Энэ зорилгоонд бид өөр өөр машин суралцах хичээлийн хуваарьтай олон туршилтуудыг дагадаг. Мөн бид хоёр хичээлийн хоорондын чухал, хуваарилалтыг судалж байна. Манай загвар 71.7%-ийн тодорхойлолтой болсон. Энэ нь ажлын төгсгөлийн дараа 72.9%-д сайжруулсан. Бид мөн мета суралцах суб-задалга дээр оролцож байна. Бүх сургалтын системийн хоёр дахь хувилбарын баримтуудыг 89.9% тодорхойлж байна.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje našu predanost zadatku za detekciju novina Hiperpartisan 2019. Naš sistem je cilj za klasifikaciju dokumenta na jeziku iz minimalnog set a interpretabilnih karakteristika, dok održava dobru funkciju. Do ovog cilja, pratimo pristup na osnovu karakteristika i izvršimo nekoliko eksperimenata sa različitim klasifikatorima učenja mašine. Osim toga, istražujemo važnosti i raspodjele među dva klasa. Na glavnom zadatku, naš model je ostvario tačnost 71,7%, koja je poboljšana nakon kraja zadatka do 72,9%. Takoðe sudjelujemo u podzadatku metaučenja, za klasifikaciju dokumenta sa binarnim klasifikacijama svih podignutih sustava kao ulaz, ostvarivši taènost od 89,9%.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ සේම්වේල් 2019 හායිපර්පාර්ටිසන් වාර්තාව හොයාගන්න වැඩක් විස්තර කරනවා. අපේ පද්ධතිය යුක්තිය භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක විශේෂයක් විශේෂ කරනවා, හොඳ ප්\u200dරභාවිත විශේෂතාවක් තියාගන මේ අදහසට, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අධාරිත විදියට පස්සෙන් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා, වෙනස් පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණ කර තවත්, අපි පරීක්ෂණ දෙකක් අතර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ විතරයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා. ප්\u200dරධාන කාර්යයෙන්, අපේ මොඩේල් 71.7% තියෙනවා, ඒක වැඩේ අවසාන 72.9% තියෙනවා. අපි ඒවගේම මෙටා-ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, සියළු පද්ධතියේ බායිනාර් විශ්ලේෂණ වලින් පද්ධතියේ පද්ධතියේ අවශ්\u200dය', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran warqaddayada loo soo dirayo xafiiska baaritaanka warqada ee SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan. Systemkaygu wuxuu ku qoran yahay fasaxa dukumentiyada ee luqada ku saleysan oo ka soo qoran noocyo ugu yar oo turjuman, iyadoo ku sii soconaya tababar wanaagsan. To this goal, we follow a feature-based approach and perform several experiments with different machine learning classifiers.  Sidoo kale waxaynu baaraynaa muhiim iyo qaybsan labada fasalka. Shaqada muhiimka ah modellkayagii wuxuu gaadhay saxda 71.7%, taas oo horumarinayay kadib dhamaadkii shaqadu wuxuu gaadhay 72.9%. Waxaynu sidoo kale ka qeybqaadannaa shaqada hoos-barashada meta-aadka, si aan u kala qaybsanno dukumentiyada labada nooc oo kala duduwan nidaamka oo dhan u soo dhiibna sida input oo kale, si saxda 89,9%.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt bidrag till SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detection uppgiften. Vårt system syftar till en lingvistisk dokumentklassificering utifrån en minimal uppsättning tolkningsbara funktioner, samtidigt som goda resultat bibehålls. För detta ändamål följer vi ett funktionsbaserat tillvägagångssätt och utför flera experiment med olika maskininlärningsklassificerare. Dessutom undersöker vi betydelser och distributioner av funktioner mellan de två klasserna. På huvuduppgiften uppnådde vår modell en noggrannhet på 71,7%, vilket förbättrades efter uppgiftens slut till 72,9%. Vi deltar också i meta-learning-underuppgiften, för att klassificera dokument med binära klassificeringar av alla inlämnade system som indata, vilket uppnår en noggrannhet på 89,9%.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் SemEval 2019 ஹைப்பர்பார்டிசன் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பு பணிக்கு எங்கள் submissionை விவரிக்கிறது. எங்கள் அமைப்பு சிறிய மொழிகளில் அடிப்படையான ஆவண வகைப்பாட்டை பாதுகாக்கும் போது, நல்ல செயல்பாட்டை பாதுகாக்கும் போது,  இந்த இலக்குக்கு, நாம் ஒரு குணங்களை அடிப்படையாக செயல்படுத்தி பல்வேறு இயந்திரம் கற்று வகுப்பாளர்களை செயல்படுத்துக மேலும், இந்த இரண்டு வகுப்புகளின் மதிப்புகள் மற்றும் பங்கீடுகளை கண்டறிகிறோம். முக்கிய பணியில், எங்கள் மாதிரி 71.7 சதவிகிதத்தின் சரியாக பெற்றது, இது செயல் முடிந்த பிறகு 72.9%. நாம் மெடா கற்றல் துணை பணியில் பகிர்ந்து கொள்கிறோம், அனைத்து வழங்கப்பட்ட முறைமைகளின் இருநிலை வகைப்புகளை உள்ளீட்டாக வகுப்பதற்கான ஆவணங்களை வகு', 'ur': 'This paper describes our submission to the SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detection task. ہمارا سیستم ایک زبان شناسی کے بنیاد دار ڈکومکسٹ کلاسپیٹ کے لئے مطابق ہے ایک کم تعبیر قابل تعبیر کے سیٹ سے، جب کہ اچھی عملکرد کی حفاظت کرتی ہے۔ اس مقصد کی طرف، ہم ایک فرصت بنیادی طریقہ کے پیچھے چلتے ہیں اور مختلف ماشین سیکھنے کے کلاسپیر کے ساتھ بہت سے تجربے کرتے ہیں. اور ہم دونوں کلاس کے درمیان اہل اور تقسیم کا اضافہ کرتے ہیں۔ ہماری مدل 71.7% کی دقیق پہنچ گئی، جو کام کے پانے کے بعد 72.9% تک بہتر ہوئی۔ ہم مٹا-سیکھنے کے ساب-ٹاکس پر بھی مشارکت کرتے ہیں، تمام مسائل سیستموں کے دوئینی کلاسیفوں کے ساتھ سندھائے جاتے ہیں، 89.9%.', 'uz': "Bu sahifa SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan xabar topish vazifasini aytadi. Our system aims for a linguistics-based document classification from a minimal set of interpretable features, while maintaining good performance.  Bu maqsadga, biz tashkilotning asosiy usuli bilan bajaramiz va boshqa mashinalar o'rganish sinflarini bajaramiz. Ko'pchilik, biz ikki sinfdagi muhim va tarqatishni ko'rib chiqaramiz. Mavzu vazifasida modelmiz 71.7%'ning tashkilotlari 72.9%'ga o'tib ketdi. Biz meta-o'rganish sub-vazifasiga qayta ishlatamiz, hamma kompyuterning ikki darajasini kiritish uchun hujjatlarni o'rganish uchun bir xil darajaga ega bo'ladimiz, 89.9%'ga erishish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả việc chúng ta phục vụ trinh sát tin tức trinh thám Semkhai ly 209. Hệ thống của chúng tôi nhằm mục đích phân loại tài liệu ngôn ngữ học từ một số chi tiết có thể giải thích tối thiểu, trong khi duy trì hiệu suất tốt. Để đạt được mục đích, chúng tôi theo một phương pháp có tính năng và thực hiện nhiều thí nghiệm với các phân loại máy móc khác nhau. Ngoài ra, chúng tôi khám phá sự quan trọng và phân chia giữa hai lớp. Trong phần chính nhiệm vụ, mô hình của chúng ta đã đạt được độ chính xác 77=, đã được cải thiện sau khi nhiệm vụ này kết thúc 72.9 Name Chúng tôi cũng tham gia vào công việc phân bổ các meta-Learning, để phân loại các tài liệu bằng các phân loại nhị phân các hệ thống được gửi làm nhập, để đạt độ chính xác của 89.9 Name', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва нашето представяне на задачата за откриване на новини. Нашата система се стреми към лингвистична класификация на документите от минимален набор от интерпретируеми характеристики, като същевременно поддържа добра производителност. За целта следваме функционален подход и извършваме няколко експеримента с различни класификатори за машинно обучение. Освен това, ние изследваме вноса на функции и дистрибуции между двата класа. По основната задача моделът ни постигна точност от 71.7%, която след края на задачата беше подобрена до 72.9%. Участваме и в подзадачата мета-обучение, за класифициране на документи с двоичната класификация на всички подадени системи като вход, постигайки точност 89.9%.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores indsendelse til SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detection opgave. Vores system sigter mod en lingvistisk-baseret dokumentklassificering ud fra et minimalt sæt fortolkelige funktioner, samtidig med at der opretholdes god ydeevne. Til dette formål følger vi en funktionsbaseret tilgang og udfører flere eksperimenter med forskellige maskinindlæringsklassificere. Derudover undersøger vi vigtigheder og distributioner af funktioner blandt de to klasser. På hovedopgaven opnåede vores model en nøjagtighed på 71,7%, hvilket blev forbedret efter opgavens afslutning til 72,9%. Vi deltager også i metalæring-underopgaven, hvor vi klassificerer dokumenter med de binære klassifikationer af alle indsendte systemer som input, hvilket opnår en nøjagtighed på 89,9%.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft onze inzending aan de SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detection taak. Ons systeem streeft naar een taalkundige documentclassificatie vanuit een minimale set interpreteerbare kenmerken, met behoud van goede prestaties. Hiervoor volgen we een feature-based aanpak en voeren we verschillende experimenten uit met verschillende machine learning classificatoren. Daarnaast onderzoeken we feature importances en distributies tussen de twee klassen. Op de hoofdtaak bereikte ons model een nauwkeurigheid van 71,7%, die werd verbeterd na het einde van de taak tot 72,9%. We nemen ook deel aan de meta-learning subtaak, voor het classificeren van documenten met de binaire classificaties van alle ingediende systemen als input, met een nauwkeurigheid van 89,9%.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše podnošenje zadatku za otkrivanje novina hiperpartisan 2019. Naš sustav cilja za klasifikaciju dokumenta na jezičkim temeljima iz minimalnog skupa interpretabilnih karakteristika, dok održava dobru funkciju. Do ovog cilja, pratimo pristup na osnovu karakteristika i izvršimo nekoliko eksperimenata sa različitim klasifikatorima učenja strojeva. Osim toga, istražujemo važnosti i raspodjele među dvije klase. Na glavnom zadatku, naš model je ostvario tačnost 71,7%, što je poboljšano nakon kraja zadatka do 72,9%. Također sudjelujemo u podzadatku metaučenja, za klasifikaciju dokumenta sa binarnim klasifikacijama svih podanih sustava kao ulaz, ostvarivanje točnosti od 89,9%.', 'de': 'Dieses Papier beschreibt unsere Einreichung zur SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detection Aufgabe. Unser System zielt auf eine linguistisch-basierte Dokumentenklassifizierung ab, die aus einem minimalen Satz von interpretierbaren Merkmalen bei gleichzeitiger Aufrechterhaltung guter Leistung besteht. Dazu verfolgen wir einen funktionsbasierten Ansatz und führen mehrere Experimente mit verschiedenen Klassifikatoren des maschinellen Lernens durch. Zusätzlich untersuchen wir Feature Importe und Distributionen zwischen den beiden Klassen. Bei der Hauptaufgabe erreichte unser Modell eine Genauigkeit von 71,7%, die nach Ende der Aufgabe auf 72,9% verbessert wurde. Wir beteiligen uns auch an der Meta-Learning Teilaufgabe, um Dokumente mit den binären Klassifizierungen aller eingereichten Systeme als Input zu klassifizieren, um eine Genauigkeit von 89,9%.', 'id': 'This paper describes our submission to the SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detection task.  Sistem kita bermaksud untuk klasifikasi dokumen berdasarkan bahasa dari set minimal karakteristik yang dapat diterjemahkan, sementara mempertahankan prestasi yang baik. Untuk tujuan ini, kita mengikuti pendekatan berdasarkan fitur dan melakukan beberapa eksperimen dengan klasifikasi belajar mesin yang berbeda. Selain itu, kami mengeksplorasi penting karakteristik dan distribusi di antara dua kelas. Pada tugas utama, model kita mencapai akurasi 71,7%, yang diperbaiki setelah tugas berakhir ke 72,9%. Kami juga berpartisipasi dalam sub-tugas meta-belajar, untuk mengklasifikasi dokumen dengan klasifikasi binari dari semua sistem yang dikirim sebagai input, mencapai akurasi 89,9%.', 'ko': '본고는 우리가 SemEval 2019 초당파 뉴스 검측 임무에 제출한 상황을 묘사한다.우리의 시스템은 가장 작은 해석 가능한 특징에서 언어학을 바탕으로 한 문서를 분류하고 좋은 성능을 유지하는 데 목적을 두고 있다.이 목표를 실현하기 위해 우리는 특징을 바탕으로 하는 방법을 채택했고 서로 다른 기계 학습 분류기로 몇 가지 실험을 진행했다.그 밖에 우리는 이 두 종류 간의 특징적 중요성과 분포를 탐구했다.주요 임무 중 우리의 모델의 정확도는 71.7%에 달했고 임무가 끝난 후에 72.9%로 높아졌다.우리는 또한 원 학습 서브 임무에 참여했고 모든 제출 시스템의 2진법 분류를 입력으로 문서를 분류했는데 정확도는 89.9%에 달했다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ تحویل ما را به کار شناسایی خبرهای هوپر پارتیسان ۲۰۱۹ توصیف می کند. سیستم ما به عنوان یک گروهی سند بر اساس زبان\u200cشناسی از یک مجموعه کمینه از ویژگی\u200cهای تفسیر قابل تعریف است، در حالی که عملکرد خوبی را حفظ می\u200cکند. برای این هدف، ما یک روش بر اساس ویژه\u200cهای ویژه پیروی می\u200cکنیم و چند آزمایش با گروه\u200cهای یادگیری ماشین\u200cهای مختلف انجام می\u200cدهیم. اضافه\u200cای از این، ما مهم\u200cهای ویژه و توزیع بین دو کلاس تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. در وظیفه اصلی، مدل ما دقیق 71.7 درصد را رسید، که بعد از پایان وظیفه 72.9 درصد بهتر شد. ما همچنین در زیر کار یادگیری متا شرکت می\u200cکنیم، برای تحریک کردن مدارک\u200cهای دویینی از همه سیستم\u200cهای تحویل داده به عنوان ورودی، با رسیدن دقیق ۹۸.۹ درصد.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea ujumbe wetu wa SemEval 2019 Mpango wa Kuchunguza Habari za Hyperpartisan. Mfumo wetu unalenga kutafsiri nyaraka inayotumika kwa lugha kutoka kwenye seti ndogo ya tafsiri, wakati wa kuendelea utendaji mzuri. Kwa lengo hili, tunafuata mbinu yenye msingi na kufanya majaribio kadhaa yenye wataalamu wa kujifunza mashine tofauti. Kwa nyongeza, tunagundua umuhimu na usambazaji kati ya darasa hizo mbili. Katika kazi kuu, mfano wetu ulipata uhakika wa asilimia 71.7, ambao uliongezeka baada ya mwisho wa kazi hadi asilimia 72.9. Pia tunashiriki katika jukumu la kujifunza kwa ujumbe wa mafunzo, kwa ajili ya kutangaza nyaraka kwa makusanyiko binafsi ya mifumo yote yaliyotumiwa kama input, na kupata uhakika wa asilimia 89.9.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf ons onderskrywing aan die SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan Nuusbeskrywing taak. Ons stelsel doel doen vir 'n lingwisiese-gebaseerde dokumentklasifikasie van' n minimale stel van uitleggbare funksies, terwyl die goeie prestasie onderhou. Na hierdie doel, ons volg 'n funksie-gebaseerde toegang en uitvoer verskeie eksperimente met verskillende masjien leer klassifiseerders. In addition, we explore feature importations and distribution among the two classes. Op die hoofde taak het ons model 'n presies van 71,7%, wat was verbeter na die einde van die taak tot 72,9%. Ons het ook gedeeld op die meta-leer sub-taak, vir die klassifisering van dokumente met die binêre klasifikasie van alle ingestuurde stelsels as invoer, met 'n presisiteit van 89.9%.", 'tr': "Bu häzir 2019-nji ýylda SemEval'iň jemgyýetimizi Hyperpartisan Haýsy Taýýarlama görevini tassyýar. Biziň sistemamyz, lingwistiki tabanly sened klasifikasyny iň kiçi bir terjime edip biljek özelliklerden bejermek üçin maksady edýär. Bu maksada üçin biz özellikleriň üstüne daýan bir ýazşyga taýýar edýän we farklı maşynyň öwrenmegi klassifikatlary bilen birnäçe deneyler etdik. Hem biz iki synpyň arasynda özellikleriň wajyplaryny we paýlaşmalaryny keşfetýäris. Ana zadyň üstünde biziň nusgymyz 71,7%-iň dogrylygyny ýetdi, bu işiň soňunda 72,9%-a düzeldi. Biz hem meta-öwrenmeniň sub-zadynda hemme gelin sistemalaryň ikinji klasifikasyyla daýat bolup, 89.9% dogrylygyna ulaşýarys.", 'sq': "Ky artikull përshkruan dorëzimin tonë në detyrën e zbulimit të lajmeve hiperpartizane SemEval 2019. Sistemi ynë synon një klasifikim dokumentesh bazuar në gjuhë nga një sërë minimale karakteristike të interpretueshme, duke mbajtur performancë të mirë. Për këtë qëllim, ne ndjekim një qasje bazuar në karakteristika dhe kryejmë disa eksperimente me klasifikues të ndryshëm të mësimit të makinave. Përveç kësaj, ne eksplorojmë rëndësitë dhe shpërndarjet midis dy klasave. On the main task, our model achieved an accuracy of 71.7%, which was improved after the task's end to 72.9%.  Ne gjithashtu marrim pjesë në nëndetyrën e meta-mësimit, për klasifikimin e dokumenteve me klasifikimet binare të të gjitha sistemeve të paraqitura si input, duke arritur një saktësi prej 89.9%.", 'am': 'This paper describes our submission to the SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detection task.  የቋንቋ ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ-based ሰነድ ክፍተቶችን መግለጫ ነው፡፡ ለዚህ መግለጫ፣ የተመሳሳይን የሥርዓት ሥርዓት እንከተላለን፣ በተለየ የመኪና ትምህርት ትምህርት የሚያስተምሩትን ብዙዎችን ፈተናዎች እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም በሁለቱ ደረጃዎች መካከል የውርደት እና መከፈቻን እንፈልጋለን፡፡ በዋነኛው ስራ ሞዴላታችን 71.7 በመቶ አግኝቷል፤ ከስራው በኋላ 72.9 በመቶ ተደግፎ ነበር፡፡ አዲስ ሰነዱን በጥያቄ እንደሚደረግ የጥያቄውን ሁሉ ለጥያቄ ማድረግ እናጋራለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր ներկայացումը 2019 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" Հիպերպարտիզան նորությունների հայտնաբերման գործին: Մեր համակարգը նպատակն է լեզվաբանական հիմնված փաստաթղթերի դասակարգումը մեկնաբանելի հատկանիշների միմինալ շարքից, միևնույն ժամանակ պահպանելով լավ արդյունք: Այս նպատակին մենք հետևում ենք առանձնահատկություններով հիմնված մոտեցումներին և կատարում ենք մի քանի փորձեր տարբեր մեքենային ուսումնասիրության դասակարգերի հետ: Ավելին, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք երկու դասարանների միջև կարևորություններ և տարածումներ: Հիմնական խնդրի վրա մեր մոդելը հասավ 71.7 տոկոսի ճշգրիտության, որը բարելավվեց խնդրի ավարտից մինչև 72.9 տոկոս: Մենք նաև մասնակցում ենք մետա-սովորելու ենթախնդրի վրա, որպեսզի փաստաթղթերը դասակարգենք բոլոր ներկայացված համակարգերի երկու դասակարգումներով որպես ներմուծք, ստանալով 89.9 տոկոսի ճշգրտություն:', 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪt bizim SemEval 2019 Hiperpartisan Haber Detection iŇüin…ô t…ôsdiql…ônm…ôyimizi t…ôsdiql…ôyir. Sistemimiz dilind…ô olanńĪ t…ôfsil edil…ô bil…ôn t…ôrzl…ôrin minimal bir qurduńüu t…ôrzl…ôrind…ôn, yaxŇüńĪ performansńĪ qoruyark…ôn, dilind…ô tabanlńĪ d√∂k√ľm klasifikasyonu t…ôsdiql…ôm…ôy…ô m…ôqs…ôd edir. Bu m…ôqs…ôdil…ô, f…ôrqli t…ôrzd…ô t…ôr…ôfind…ôn uyub, m√ľxt…ôlif maŇüńĪn √∂yr…ônm…ôsi klasifikatorlarńĪ il…ô bir ne√ß…ô eksperimenti ed…ôrik. ∆Źksin…ô, iki sńĪnńĪf arasńĪnda m√∂vcuddurlarńĪ v…ô dańüńĪtńĪmlarńĪ keŇüfetirik. Ana iŇüd…ô modelimiz 71,7%-in dońüruluńüuna nail oldu, bu iŇüin sonundan 72,9%-…ô q…ôd…ôr yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪ. Biz d…ô meta-√∂yr…ônm…ô apa g√∂revi il…ô, b√ľt√ľn g√∂nd…ôrilmiŇü sisteml…ôrin ikili klasifikasyonunla birlikd…ô bel…ôlikl…ô bel…ôlikl…ô d…ôyiŇüdiririk, 89.9% d…ôyiŇüdirilm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল ২০১৯ হাইপার্পার্টিসান নিউজ ডিটেকশন কাজের প্রতি আমাদের জরুরী বর্ণনা করেছে। আমাদের সিস্টেমের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে ভাষাভিত্তিক নথিপত্রের বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক বিষয়বস্তুর ক্লাসাফিকেশনের কাছ থেকে একটি নি এই লক্ষ্যে আমরা একটি বৈশিষ্ট্য ভিত্তিক উপায় অনুসরণ করি এবং বিভিন্ন মেশিন শিক্ষা শ্রেণীদের সাথে বেশ কিছু পরীক্ষা  এছাড়াও আমরা দুই শ্রেণীর মধ্যে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ এবং বিতরণের বৈশিষ্ট্য অনুসন্ধান করি। প্রধান কাজে আমাদের মডেল ৭১. আমরা মেটা-শিক্ষা সাব-কাজে অংশগ্রহণ করি, যাতে সকল সিস্টেম ইনপুট হিসেবে বাইনারি বিভাগের ডকুমেন্টগুলো বিশ্লেষণ করার জন্য, ৮৯.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje našu predanost zadatku za detekciju Hyperpartisan Novosti u semiEvalu 2019. Naš sistem cilja za klasifikaciju dokumenta na jezicima iz minimalnog set a interpretabilnih karakteristika, dok održava dobru funkciju. Do ovog cilja, pratimo pristup na osnovu karakteristika i izvršimo nekoliko eksperimenata sa različitim klasifikatorima učenja mašine. Osim toga, istražujemo važnosti i raspodjele među dva klasa. Na glavnom zadatku, naš model je ostvario tačnost 71,7%, koja je poboljšana nakon kraja zadatka do 72,9%. Također sudjelujemo u podzadatku metaučenja, za klasifikaciju dokumenta sa binarnim klasifikacijama svih podanih sustava kao ulaz, ostvarivanje tačnosti od 89,9%.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu la nostra presentació a la tasca de detecció de notícies hiperpartisanes SemEval 2019. El nostre sistema mira a una classificació de documents basada en la lingüística d'un conjunt mínim de característiques interpretables, mantenint un bon rendiment. A aquest objectiu, seguim un enfocament basat en característiques i fem varis experiments amb diferents classificadors d'aprenentatge màquinari. A més, explorem les importàncies i distribucions de característiques entre les dues classes. En la tasca principal, el nostre model va aconseguir una precisió del 71,7%, que va millorar després del final de la tasca al 72,9%. We also participate on the meta-learning sub-task, for classifying documents with the binary classifications of all submitted systems as input, achieving an accuracy of 89.9%.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje naše podání k úkolu SemEval 2019 Hyperpartyzánní detekce zpráv. Náš systém si klade za cíl klasifikovat dokumenty založené na lingvistice z minimální sady interpretovatelných prvků při zachování dobrého výkonu. K tomuto cíli sledujeme přístup založený na funkcích a provádíme několik experimentů s různými klasifikátory strojového učení. Kromě toho zkoumáme importy funkcí a distribuce mezi oběma třídami. Na hlavním úkolu dosáhl náš model přesnosti 71,7%, která byla po skončení úkolu zlepšena na 72,9%. Podílíme se také na meta-learningovém subúkolu, který zařazuje dokumenty s binárními klasifikacemi všech odeslaných systémů jako vstup, dosahuje přesnosti 89,9%.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie esitamist SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detection ülesandele. Meie süsteemi eesmärk on keeleteadusel põhinev dokumentide klassifitseerimine minimaalsetest tõlgendatavatest omadustest, säilitades samas hea jõudluse. Selleks järgime funktsioonipõhist lähenemisviisi ja teeme mitmeid katseid erinevate masinõppe klassifikaatoritega. Lisaks uurime funktsioonide importi ja jaotusi kahe klassi vahel. Põhiülesandes saavutas meie mudel täpsuse 71,7%, mida parandati pärast ülesande lõppu 72,9%ni. Samuti osaleme metaõppe alamülesandes dokumentide klassifitseerimiseks sisendina kõigi esitatud süsteemide binaarsete klassifikatsioonidega, saavutades täpsuse 89,9%.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan, miten olemme osallistuneet SemEval 2019 Hyperpartisan News Detection -tehtävään. Järjestelmämme tähtää kielitieteelliseen asiakirjaluokitukseen pienistä tulkittavista ominaisuuksista pitäen samalla yllä hyvää suorituskykyä. Tätä varten noudatamme ominaisuuspohjaista lähestymistapaa ja suoritamme useita kokeiluja eri koneoppimisen luokittelijoilla. Lisäksi tutkimme ominaisuuksien tuontia ja jakelua näiden kahden luokan välillä. Päätehtävässä mallimme tarkkuus oli 71,7%, mikä parani tehtävän päätyttyä 72,9 prosenttiin. Osallistumme myös meta-oppimisen alitehtävään, jossa dokumentit luokitellaan kaikkien lähetettyjen järjestelmien binääriluokituksilla syötteenä, jolloin tarkkuus on 89,9%.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na faɗaɗa'inmu zuwa the SemEal 2019 Hyperpartsan News Find. Yaurinmu na yi amfani da fasalin takardar da aka ƙayyade linguistic, daga wata matsayi masu fassarawa da ake fassara, a lokacin da za'a tsare aikin ƙwarai. Ga wannan goa, munã bi wata matsayi mai bascan da ko kuma munã samun wasu jarrabo da za'a sanar da zane-zane daban. Da wannan, Munã jarraba muhimmada da rabon darafõfi biyu. Ga aikin muhimmi, misalinmu ya sami tsari na 71.7%, wanda aka ƙara bayan an ƙara aikin da shi zuwa 42.9%. We also participate on the meta-learning sub-task, for classifying documents with the binary classifications of all submitted systems as input, achieving an accuracy of 89.9%.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje našo predložitev naloge odkrivanja novic SemEval 2019 Hyperpartizana. Naš sistem si prizadeva za jezikoslovno klasifikacijo dokumentov iz minimalnega nabora razložljivih značilnosti, hkrati pa ohranja dobro delovanje. V ta namen sledimo funkcijskemu pristopu in izvajamo več eksperimentov z različnimi klasifikatorji strojnega učenja. Poleg tega raziskujemo uvoz funkcij in distribucije med obema razredoma. Pri glavni nalogi je naš model dosegel natančnost 71,7%, kar je bilo po koncu naloge izboljšano na 72,9%. Sodelujemo tudi pri metaučni podnalogi za klasifikacijo dokumentov z binarnimi klasifikacijami vseh predloženih sistemov kot vhodno točnostjo 89,9%.', 'jv': 'This paper description we are being sent to the seminval 2011 Typerpartisan New detection task. Sistem awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan kanggo kelas nggawe barang langgar aturan anyar tentang kanggo nguasai perbudhakan Ditungane kuwi, kita sumungo diandelah sing paling karo perusahaan lan uga bantuan ingkang samihan karo sekondiki panggon samihan Mungkin, kita isih pengguna perusahaan anyari nggawe Kasama karo segala apat. Nampun ingkang malah, model nambah sakjane sampeyan 75,7%, olèh dumadhi kapan mulai sisara ingkang 75.9%. Awak dhéwé mulai nggambar meta-Learning Sub-task gak, nggawe kelas dokumen karo klawisiyé binari nggambar sistem sing bisa nggawe input, iso dianggawe barang nggawe 480.9%.', 'bo': 'ཤོག ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཡིག་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་ནི་ཕན་ཚུན་འབྲེལ་ཆེ་ཆུང་བའི་སྒྲིག To this goal, we follow a feature-based approach and perform several experiments with different machine learning classifiers. འོ་ན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་དང་དབྱེ་རྩལ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་གཟུགས་རིས་འདིས་མཐའ་དབྱིབས་71.7%, དེ་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་མཇུག་གི་རྗེས་སུ་ཡར་རྒྱས་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་meta-learning sub-task(sub-task)ལ་ཡིག་ཆ་འདིའི་ནང་འཇུག་བྱས་པའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡིག་ཆ་རྣམས་ཉར་འཇུག་བྱེད་པའི་ལག་ཁྱེར་གྱི་གཉིས་ཆ་ཤས་ཆ་ཤས་ནང', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את ההעברה שלנו למשימת גילוי חדשות היפרפרטיזן 2019. Our system aims for a linguistics-based document classification from a minimal set of interpretable features, while maintaining good performance.  למטרה הזו, אנו עוקבים אחרי גישה מבוססת על תכונות ובצעים מספר ניסויים עם מסמכים שונים ללמוד מכונות. בנוסף, אנו חוקרים חשיבות ומפיצות בין שני הכיתות. במשימה העיקרית, המודל שלנו השיג מדויקה של 71.7%, אשר השתפר לאחר סוף המשימה ל-72.9%. אנו משתתפים גם בתפקיד המטה-לימוד, כדי להקליף מסמכים עם ההקליזציות הבינריות של כל המערכות המועברות כתוצאה, להשיג מדויקה של 89.9%.'}
{'en': 'Team Jack Ryder at SemEval-2019 Task 4 : Using BERT Representations for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'ar': 'فريق جاك رايدر في SemEval-2019 المهمة 4: استخدام تمثيلات BERT للكشف عن أخبار الحزب التشعبي', 'fr': "L'équipe Jack Ryder au SEMEVAL-2019 Task 4\xa0: Utiliser les représentations BERT pour détecter les actualités hyperpartisanes", 'pt': 'Equipe Jack Ryder na Tarefa 4 do SemEval-2019: Usando representações BERT para detectar notícias hiperpartidárias', 'es': 'El equipo Jack Ryder en la Tarea 4 de SemeVal-2019: Uso de representaciones de BERT para detectar noticias hiperpartidistas', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019タスク4のチームジャック・ライダー：超党派ニュースの検出にBERT表現を使用する', 'zh': '团队 Jack Ryder 在 SemEval-2019 务 4:用 BERT 检超党新闻', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 4 पर टीम जैक राइडर: हाइपरपार्टिसन समाचार का पता लगाने के लिए BERT प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग करना', 'ru': 'Команда Джека Райдера на SemEval-2019 Задача 4: Использование представлений BERT для обнаружения гиперпартийных новостей', 'ga': 'Foireann Jack Ryder ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 4: Léirithe BERT a Úsáid chun Nuacht Hyperpartisan a Bhrath', 'ka': 'ჯექი პაიდერი SemEval-2019 სამუშაო დავალება 4: BERT გამოყენება ჰიპერპორტიზანის ნუზების განახლებისთვის გამოყენება', 'hu': 'Jack Ryder csapat a SemEval-2019 4. feladatában: BERT reprezentációk használata hiperpartizánok észleléséhez Hírek', 'el': 'Ομάδα Τζακ Ράιντερ στο έργο 4: Χρήση αντιπροσωπειών για την ανίχνευση υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων', 'it': 'Team Jack Ryder al SemEval-2019 Task 4: Utilizzo delle rappresentanze BERT per rilevare le notizie iperpartigiane', 'lt': 'Ekipa Jack Ryder 2010 m. SemEval-2019 4 užduotis: BERT atstovybių naudojimas hiperpartinių naujienų aptikimui', 'mk': 'Тим Џек Рајдер на SemEval-2019 задача 4: Користење на BERT претставувања за детектирање на хиперпартисански вести', 'kk': 'Жаңалықтарды анықтау үшін BERT таңбаларын қолдану', 'ms': 'Pasukan Jack Ryder di SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Menggunakan Perwakilan BERT untuk mengesan Berita Hyperpartisan', 'mt': 'Tim Jack Ryder f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 4: Użu tar-Rappreżentanzi BERT għad-Detezzjoni ta’ Aħbarijiet Iperkartisani', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Task 4: BERT Representations for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 4-ലെ ടീം ജാക്ക് റൈഡര്\u200d: ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസാന്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d ഡിറ്റീറ്റിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന', 'no': 'Gruppe Jack Ryder på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 4: Bruk BERT- representasjonar for oppdaging av Hyperpartisan News', 'pl': 'Zespół Jack Ryder w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 4: Wykorzystanie reprezentacji BERT do wykrywania hiperpartyjnych wiadomości', 'ro': 'Echipa Jack Ryder la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 4: Utilizarea reprezentanțelor BERT pentru detectarea știrilor hiperpartizane', 'sr': 'Tim Jack Ryder na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 4: Koristenje predstavnika BERT za otkrivanje hiperpartisan vijesti', 'si': 'ජැක් රායිඩර් කණ්ඩායම් සම්වෙල්-2019 වැඩ 4: BERT ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය භාවිතා කරනවා Hyperpartisans වාර්තාවක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනව', 'so': 'Team Jack Ryder at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Using BERT representations for detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'sv': 'Team Jack Ryder på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 4: Använda BERT-representationer för att upptäcka hyperpartisan Nyheter', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 4 ல் ஜாக் ரைட்டர் குழு: ஹைப்பர்பார்டிசன் செய்திகளை கண்டறிதலுக்கான பெர்டி பிரிட் குறிப்பிடங்களை பயன', 'ur': 'ٹیم جک رایدر کے ساتھ سیم اول-2019 ٹاکس ۴ میں: ہیپر پارٹیسان خبروں کی شناسایی کے لئے BERT روشنی استعمال کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đội Jack Ryder ở Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-209: Sử dụng các đài quan sát BERT để phát hiện tin du kích Hyperdu.', 'hr': 'Tim Jack Ryder na zadatku 4: Koristenje predstavnika BERT-a za otkrivanje Hyperpartisan vijesti', 'bg': 'Екип Джак Райдър на Задача 4: Използване на представителствата на BERT за откриване на хиперпартизани новини', 'nl': 'Team Jack Ryder bij SemEval-2019 Taak 4: BERT vertegenwoordigingen gebruiken voor het opsporen van hyperpartisan nieuws', 'da': 'Team Jack Ryder ved SemEval-2019 Opgave 4: Brug af BERT-repræsentationer til detektering af hyperpartisan Nyheder', 'de': 'Team Jack Ryder bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 4: BERT-Repräsentanzen zur Erkennung überparteilicher Nachrichten nutzen', 'id': 'Tim Jack Ryder di SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Menggunakan Perwakilan BERT untuk Detektif Berita Hyperpartisan', 'ko': 'Jack Ryder팀이Sem Eval-19 퀘스트 4:버트 표현법으로 초당파 뉴스 검출', 'fa': 'تیم جک رایدر در کار ۱۹۲۹: استفاده از نمایندگان BERT برای شناسایی اخبار هایپر پارتیسان', 'sw': 'Timu Jack Ryder katika SemEval-2019 Task 4: Utumiaji wa Mawakilishi ya BERT kwa Kuchunguza Habari za Hyperpartisan', 'tr': 'Tim Jack Ryder at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Using BERT Representations for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'af': 'Skep Jack Ryder by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 4: Gebruik van BERT-voorstellings vir ontdekking van Hyperpartisan Nuus', 'sq': 'Ekipi Jack Ryder në SemEval-2019 Task 4: Using BERT Representations for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'hy': 'Թամը Ջեք Ռայդեր, 2019 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" 4-րդ հանձնարարում. BER-ի ներկայացումների օգտագործումը հիպերպարտիզան նորությունների հայտնաբերման համար', 'am': 'የሳምEval-2019 ስራ 4 የቡሬት ፕሬዚደንት ለHyperpartisan ዜና ማረጋገጥ', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan Haqqalarını keşfetmek üçün BERT Təşkilatlarını istifadə edir', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ টাস্ক ৪-এর টিম জ্যাক রিডার: হাইপার্পার্টিস্যান নিউজ ডিটেক্টরের জন্য বেরেটি প্রতিনিধি ব্যবহার', 'cs': 'Tým Jack Ryder na SemEval-2019 Úkol 4: Využití zastoupení BERT pro detekci hyperstranických zpráv', 'bs': 'Tim Jack Ryder na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 4: Koristiti predstave BERT za otkrivanje hiperpartisan vijesti', 'ca': "L'equip Jack Ryder a SemEval-2019 tasca 4: Utilitzar representacions BERT per detectar notícies hiperpartisanes", 'fi': 'Team Jack Ryder SemEval-2019 Task 4: BERT-edustustojen käyttäminen hyperpartisaanien uutisten havaitsemisessa', 'et': 'Meeskond Jack Ryder SemEval-2019 ülesandel 4: BERT esinduste kasutamine hüperpartisanide avastamiseks', 'jv': 'Grup Jack Rider at seminval-2011 task 4: Using BERT representations for detecting Typerpartisan New', 'sk': 'Ekipa Jack Ryder na SemEval-2019 naloga 4: Uporaba BERT predstavništev za odkrivanje hiperpartizanskih novic', 'ha': 'Taimar 4: Yin amfani da BERT Repositories for Finding Hyperpartsan News', 'he': 'Team Jack Ryder at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Using BERT Representations for Detecting Hyperpartisan News', 'bo': 'Team Jack Ryder at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Using BERT Representations for Detecting Hyperpartisan News'}
{'en': 'We describe the system submitted by the Jack Ryder team to SemEval-2019 Task 4 on Hyperpartisan News Detection. The task asked participants to predict whether a given article is hyperpartisan, i.e., extreme-left or extreme-right. We proposed an approach based on BERT with fine-tuning, which was ranked 7th out 28 teams on the distantly supervised dataset, where all articles from a hyperpartisan / non-hyperpartisan news outlet are considered to be hyperpartisan / non-hyperpartisan. On a manually annotated test dataset, where human annotators double-checked the labels, we were ranked 29th out of 42 teams.', 'ar': 'نحن نصف النظام الذي قدمه فريق Jack Ryder إلى SemEval-2019 Task 4 حول Hyperpartisan News Detection. طلبت المهمة من المشاركين توقع ما إذا كانت مقالة معينة شديدة التحزب ، أي أقصى اليسار أو أقصى اليمين. لقد اقترحنا نهجًا يعتمد على BERT مع الضبط الدقيق ، والذي احتل المرتبة السابعة من بين 28 فريقًا في مجموعة البيانات الخاضعة للإشراف عن بُعد ، حيث تُعتبر جميع المقالات من منفذ إخباري شديد الحزبية / غير حزبي مفرط الحزبية / غير متشدد. في مجموعة بيانات اختبار مشروحة يدويًا ، حيث قام المعلقون البشريون بمراجعة الملصقات مرتين ، تم تصنيفنا في المرتبة 29 من بين 42 فريقًا.', 'fr': "Nous décrivons le système soumis par l'équipe Jack Ryder à la tâche 4 de SEMEVAL-2019 sur la détection hyperpartisane des actualités. La tâche demandait aux participants de prédire si un article donné était hyperpartisan, c'est-à-dire d'extrême gauche ou d'extrême droite. Nous avons proposé une approche basée sur BERT avec peaufinage, qui a été classée 7e sur 28 équipes sur l'ensemble de données supervisées à distance, où tous les articles d'un organe de presse hyperpartisan/non hyperpartisan sont considérés comme hyperpartisan/non hyperpartisans. Sur un jeu de données de test annoté manuellement, où des annotateurs humains ont vérifié les étiquettes, nous avons été classés 29e sur 42 équipes.", 'es': 'Describimos el sistema enviado por el equipo de Jack Ryder a la Tarea 4 de SemeVal-2019 sobre detección de noticias hiperpartidistas. La tarea pedía a los participantes que predijeran si un artículo determinado es hiperpartidista, es decir, de extrema izquierda o extrema derecha. Propusimos un enfoque basado en BERT con ajuste fino, que ocupó el séptimo lugar de 28 equipos en el conjunto de datos supervisado a distancia, donde todos los artículos de un medio de comunicación hiperpartidista o no hiperpartidista se consideran hiperpartidistas o no hiperpartidistas. En un conjunto de datos de prueba anotado manualmente, en el que los anotadores humanos verificaron dos veces las etiquetas, obtuvimos el puesto 29 de 42 equipos.', 'pt': 'Descrevemos o sistema enviado pela equipe de Jack Ryder à Tarefa 4 do SemEval-2019 na detecção de notícias hiperpartidárias. A tarefa pediu aos participantes para prever se um determinado artigo é hiperpartidário, ou seja, extrema-esquerda ou extrema-direita. Propusemos uma abordagem baseada no BERT com ajuste fino, que ficou em 7º lugar entre 28 equipes no conjunto de dados supervisionado à distância, onde todos os artigos de uma agência de notícias hiperpartidária/não hiperpartidária são considerados hiperpartidários/não hiperpartidários. Em um conjunto de dados de teste anotado manualmente, onde anotadores humanos verificaram os rótulos, ficamos em 29º lugar entre 42 equipes.', 'ja': 'ハイパーパーパーティサンニュース検出に関するSemEval -2019タスク4にJack Ryderチームが提出したシステムについて説明します。タスクは、特定の記事が超党派的であるかどうか、すなわち極左か極右かを予測するよう参加者に求めた。遠隔監視されたデータセットで28チーム中7位にランクされたBERTに基づく微調整アプローチを提案し、超党派/非超党派ニュースメディアのすべての記事は超党派/非超党派とみなされました。人間の注釈者がラベルを再確認した手動注釈付きテストデータセットでは、42チーム中29位にランクされました。', 'zh': '述Jack Ryder团队SemEval-2019 Task 4超党新闻检测之统。 其参与者占给定之文为超党,即极左犹极右也。 臣等条上BERT微调之法,远程督数集28一团队中排名第7位,自超党/非超党新闻媒体诸文皆以为超党派/非超党。 手动注之测试数据集,人工之注者审检标签,于42团队中排名第29位。', 'hi': 'हम जैक राइडर टीम द्वारा Hyperpartisan समाचार का पता लगाने पर SemEval-2019 कार्य 4 के लिए प्रस्तुत प्रणाली का वर्णन करते हैं। कार्य ने प्रतिभागियों को यह अनुमान लगाने के लिए कहा कि क्या कोई दिया गया लेख हाइपरपार्टिसन है, यानी, चरम-बाएं या चरम-दाएं। हमने ठीक-ट्यूनिंग के साथ BERT पर आधारित एक दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तावित किया, जिसे दूर से पर्यवेक्षित डेटासेट पर 28 टीमों में से 7 वें स्थान पर रखा गया था, जहां एक हाइपरपार्टिसन / गैर-हाइपरपार्टिजन समाचार आउटलेट से सभी लेखों को हाइपरपार्टिसन / गैर-हाइपरपार्टिजन माना जाता है। मैन्युअल रूप से एनोटेट किए गए परीक्षण डेटासेट पर, जहां मानव एनोटेटरों ने लेबल की दोबारा जांच की, हमें 42 टीमों में से 29 वें स्थान पर रखा गया था।', 'ru': 'Мы описываем систему, представленную командой Джека Райдера в Задаче 4 SemEval-2019 по обнаружению гиперпартийных новостей. Задача попросила участников предсказать, является ли данная статья гиперпартийной, то есть крайне-левой или крайне-правой. Мы предложили подход, основанный на BERT с точной настройкой, который занял 7-е место среди 28 команд в наборе данных под дистанционным наблюдением, где все статьи из гиперпартийных/негиперпартийных новостных изданий считаются гиперпартийными/негиперпартийными. На тестовом наборе данных с ручными аннотациями, где человеческие аннотаторы перепроверяли этикетки, мы заняли 29-е место из 42 команд.', 'ga': 'Déanaimid cur síos ar an gcóras a chuir foireann Jack Ryder isteach chuig Tasc 4 SemEval-2019 ar Bhrath Nuacht Hyperpartisan. D’iarr an tasc ar rannpháirtithe a thuar cé acu an bhfuil alt tugtha hyperpartisan, i.e., foircneacha clé nó foircneacha ar dheis. Mholamar cur chuige bunaithe ar BERT le mionchoigeartú, a rangaíodh sa 7ú háit as 28 foireann ar an tacar sonraí i bhfad i gcéin, áit a meastar go bhfuil gach alt ó asraon nuachta hipearpháirteach/neamh-hyperpartisan hyperpartisan/neamh-hyperpartisan. Ar thacar sonraí tástála anótáilte de láimh, inar seiceáladh anótálaithe daonna na lipéid faoi dhó, rangaíodh muid sa 29ú háit as 42 fhoireann.', 'hu': 'Leírjuk a Jack Ryder csapat által benyújtott rendszert a SemEval-2019 feladat 4 Hyperpartisan News Detection. A feladat arra kérte a résztvevőket, hogy jósolják meg, hogy egy adott cikk hiperpartizán, azaz szélső bal vagy szélső jobb. A BERT alapján finomhangoló megközelítést javasoltunk, amely a távolról felügyelt adatkészletben 28 csapat közül a 7. helyen állt, ahol egy hiperpartizán/nem hiperpartizán hírlap összes cikke hiperpartizánnak/nem hiperpartizánnak minősül. Egy manuálisan jegyzetelt tesztadatkészleten, ahol az emberi jegyzetelők kétszer ellenőrizték a címkéket, 42 csapat közül a 29. helyen álltunk.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ დავწერეთ სისტემა, რომელიც Jack Ryder-ის ჯგუფი SemEval-2019-ის სამუშაო სამუშაო 4 დავაწერეთ Hyperpartisan News Detection-ზე. დავალება მომეხმარებელი დაწყვეტილება, რომ დაწყვეტილი статილია თუ არა ჰიპერპორტისან, ანუ, კექტრემი-მარცხენა ან კექტრემი-მარცხენა. ჩვენ გვეძლევა BERT-ის დაბაზეული პროგრამა, რომელიც შვიდიდან 28 ჯგუფი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში, სადაც ყველა წილაკი ჰიპერპორტისან/არ-ჰიპერპორტისან ახალგაზეების გარეშე იყო ჰიპერპორტისან/არ-ჰიპერ პირდაპირად მონაცემებული მონაცემების შესახებ, სადაც ადამიანური ანტოტორიები გადამოწმენეთ ლაბეტები, ჩვენ 42 ჯგუფიდან 29-ჯგუფიდან ვიყავით.', 'el': 'Περιγράφουμε το σύστημα που υποβλήθηκε από την ομάδα Τζακ Ράιντερ στην εργασία 4 για την ανίχνευση υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων. Η εργασία ζήτησε από τους συμμετέχοντες να προβλέψουν αν ένα συγκεκριμένο άρθρο είναι υπερκομματικό, δηλαδή ακραίο-αριστερό ή ακροδεξιό. Προτείναμε μια προσέγγιση βασισμένη στο BERT με τελειοποίηση, η οποία κατατάχθηκε 7η από τις 28 ομάδες στο απομακρυσμένα εποπτευόμενο σύνολο δεδομένων, όπου όλα τα άρθρα από ένα υπερκομματικό/μη υπερκομματικό ειδησεογραφικό κανάλι θεωρούνται υπερκομματικά/μη υπερκομματικά. Σε ένα χειροκίνητα σχολιασμένο σύνολο δεδομένων δοκιμών, όπου οι ανθρώπινοι σχολιαστές διπλοέλεγξαν τις ετικέτες, κατατάξαμε 29οι από τις 42 ομάδες.', 'it': 'Descriviamo il sistema presentato dal team Jack Ryder al Task 4 SemEval-2019 sul rilevamento di notizie iperpartigiane. Il compito ha chiesto ai partecipanti di prevedere se un dato articolo è iperpartigiano, cioè estrema sinistra o estrema destra. Abbiamo proposto un approccio basato su BERT con fine-tuning, che si è classificato 7 ° su 28 squadre sul set di dati supervisionati a distanza, dove tutti gli articoli di una testata iperpartigiana/non iperpartigiana sono considerati iperpartigiani/non iperpartigiani. Su un set di dati di test annotati manualmente, dove gli annotatori umani hanno controllato due volte le etichette, siamo stati al 29esimo posto su 42 squadre.', 'lt': 'Mes apibūdiname Jack Ryder komandos pateiktą sistemą SemEval-2019 4 užduotį dėl hiperpartinių naujienų aptikimo. Užduotis paprašė dalyvių nuspėti, ar konkretus straipsnis yra hiperpartiškas, t. y. ekstremalios kairės arba ekstremalios dešinės. Mes pasiūlėme metodą, pagrįstą BERT su patobulinimu, kuris buvo priskirtas 7-ajai iš 28 toli prižiūrimos duomenų rinkinio komandoms, kur visi hiperpartiškos ir (arba) ne hiperpartiškos žinių rinkinio straipsniai laikomi hiperpartiškomis ir (arba) ne hiperpartiškomis. Rankiai anotuotame bandymų duomenų rinkinyje, kuriame žmonių anotatoriai dvigubai patikrino etiketes, mes buvome 29-oje iš 42 komandų.', 'kk': 'Біз Jack Ryder командасынан Hyperpartisan жаңалықтарды анықтау үшін 4- тапсырма жүйесін таңдадық. Тапсырма қатысушыларға келтірілген мақаланың гипер- партизан болып көрсетілсін деп сұрады, мысалы, сол жақтан жоғары немесе оң жақтан жоғары. Біз BERT бағдарламасына негізделген тәртібін таңдадық. Бұл 7-ші 28 бағдарламасын қашықтағы деректер жинағында тәртіпті, бұл жерде гиперпартизан/гиперпартизан емес жаңалықтардың барлық мақалалары гиперпартизан/гиперпартизан емес деп ойлайды. Қолмен белгіленген сынақ деректер жиынында, адамдардың белгілері жарлықтарды екі рет тексергенде, біз 42 топтың 29- ші ретінде болдық.', 'mk': 'Го опишуваме системот пренесен од тимот Џек Рајдер на SemEval-2019 задача 4 за Хиперпартиска новинска детекција. Задачата побара од учесниците да предвидат дали одредена статија е хиперпартизана, односно екстремно лево или екстремно десно. Ние предложивме пристап базиран на БЕРТ со финетизирање, кој беше рангиран на 7-ми од 28 тимови на далечно надгледуваниот податок, каде сите статии од хиперпартиски/нехиперпартиски вести се сметаат за хиперпартиски/нехиперпартиски. На рачно анотираниот тестовички податок, каде човечките анотатори двојно ги проверија етикетите, бевме рангирани 29-ти од 42 тимови.', 'ms': 'Kami menggambarkan sistem yang dihantar oleh pasukan Jack Ryder kepada SemEval-2019 Tugas 4 tentang Pengesanan Berita Hyperpartisan. Tugas meminta peserta untuk meramalkan sama ada artikel tertentu adalah hyperpartisan, iaitu ekstrim-kiri atau ekstrim-kanan. Kami mencadangkan pendekatan berdasarkan BERT dengan penyesuaian yang ditetapkan ke-7 daripada 28 pasukan pada set data yang diawasi jauh, di mana semua artikel dari keluaran berita hyperpartisan/bukan-hyperpartisan dianggap sebagai hyperpartisan/bukan-hyperpartisan. Dalam set data ujian yang dicatat secara manual, di mana penganotator manusia memeriksa dua kali lipat, kami dipilih ke-29 daripada 42 pasukan.', 'mt': 'Aħna niddeskrivu s-sistema ppreżentata mit-tim Jack Ryder lis-SemEval-2019 Task 4 dwar l-Iskopru tal-Aħbarijiet Hyperpartisan. Il-kompitu talab lill-parteċipanti biex jipprevedu jekk artikolu partikolari huwiex iperpartisan, jiġifieri, estrem-xellug jew estrem-lemin. Aħna pproponejna approċċ ibbażat fuq BERT b’a ġġustament fin, li kien ikklassifikat is-seba’ minn 28 tim fuq sett ta’ dejta sorveljat mill-bogħod, fejn l-oġġetti kollha minn ħbarijiet iperpartisani/mhux iperpartisani jitqiesu bħala iperpartisani/mhux iperpartisani. Fuq sett ta’ dejta tat-testijiet annotati manwalment, fejn l-annotaturi umani kkontrollaw id-doppju t-tikketti, inkunu kklassifikati fid-29 minn 42 tim.', 'ml': 'We describe the system submitted by the Jack Ryder team to SemEval-2019 Task 4 on Hyperpartisan News Detection.  ഈ ജോലി പങ്കാളികളോട് ആവശ്യപ്പെട്ടു. കൊടുത്ത ഒരു ലേഖനം ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിയന്\u200d ആണോ എന്ന് പ്രവചിക്കാന്\u200d ആവശ്യപ്പെട്ടു. അത ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ബെര്\u200dട്ടിനെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കി നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിച്ചു നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിച്ചു. അത് അകലെയുള്ള സൂക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d നിന്ന് എഴുന്നാമത്തെ ടീമില്\u200d നിന്നും നിര്\u200d കൈകാര്യമായി പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d, മനുഷ്യന്\u200d അംഗീകരിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d ആ ലേബിളില്\u200d ഇരട്ടി പരിശോധിച്ചിരുന്നു, ഞങ്ങള', 'mn': 'Бид Jack Ryder багийн SemEval-2019 Хиперпартизан мэдээллийн нээлттэй 4-р ажлын тухай системийг тайлбарлаж байна. Тайлбар нь оролцогчдыг өгсөн өгүүлбэр нь гипер хэсэг эсвэл хамгийн зүүн эсвэл хамгийн баруун. Бид БЕРТ-г сайхан зохицуулах боломжтой аргыг санал болгосон. Энэ нь далайн ажиглагдсан өгөгдлийн сангийн 7-аас 28 баг байсан бөгөөд гиперпартизан/гиперпартизан биш мэдээллийн бүх баримтууд гиперпартизан/гиперпартизан биш гэж үздэг. Хүмүүсийн анзаарагчид тэмдэглэлийг хоёр дахин шалгаж байхад бид 42 багтаас 29-р шалгаж байлаа.', 'no': 'Vi beskriver systemet som Jack Ryder-gruppa sendt til semiEval-2019 oppgåve 4 om Hyperpartisan News Detection. Oppgåva spurte deltakarane om ein gitt artikkel er hyperpartisan, dvs. ekstremt-venstre eller ekstremt-høgre. Vi foreslåde ein tilnærming basert på BERT med fine-tuning, som var rankert 7. ut 28 grupper på den langt oversikte datasettet, der alle artiklar frå ei hyperpartisan/ikkje-hyperpartisan news outlet er anslått som hyperpartisan/ikkje-hyperpartisan. På ein manuelt oppmerking av test dataset, der menneske annotatorar dobbelt kontrollere etikettene, var vi sett 29. av 42 grupper.', 'pl': 'Opisujemy system zgłoszony przez zespół Jacka Rydera do SemEval-2019 Task 4 na Hyperpartyzan News Detection. Zadanie poprosiło uczestników o przewidzenie, czy dany artykuł jest nadpartyjny, czyli skrajnie lewicowy czy skrajnie prawicowy. Zaproponowaliśmy podejście oparte na BERT z precyzyjnym dostrajaniem, które zdobyło siódmą pozycję 28-drużyn na zbiorze danych nadzorowanych daleko, w którym wszystkie artykuły z hiperspartyzacyjnego/niehiperspartyzacyjnego punktu informacyjnego uważane są za hiperspartyzacyjne/niehiperspartyzacyjne. Na ręcznie adnotatowanym zestawie danych testowych, w którym ludzie adnotatorzy dwukrotnie sprawdzali etykiety, byliśmy na 29-tym miejscu spośród 42-tych zespołów.', 'ro': 'Descriem sistemul trimis de echipa Jack Ryder la SemEval-2019 Task 4 privind detectarea știrilor hiperpartizane. Sarcina a cerut participanților să prezică dacă un anumit articol este hiperpartizan, adică extrem-stânga sau extrem-dreapta. Am propus o abordare bazată pe BERT cu ajustare fină, care a fost clasată pe locul 7 din 28 de echipe pe setul de date supravegheat la distanță, unde toate articolele dintr-un post de știri hiperpartizan/non-hiperpartizan sunt considerate hiperpartizan/non-hiperpartizan. Pe un set de date de test adnotat manual, unde adnotatorii umani au verificat de două ori etichetele, am fost pe locul 29 din 42 de echipe.', 'si': 'අපි ජැක් රායිඩර් කණ්ඩායමේ පද්ධතිය සේම්වල්-2019 වැඩ 4 වැඩේ හායිපර්පාර්ටිසන් වාර්තාව හොයාගන්න. කාර්ය අංකයෙන්ට කිව්වා දෙන්න පිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළිපිළි අපි BERT සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරවේශ කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ඒක 7වෙනි 28 කණ්ඩායම් ප්\u200dරවේශ කරලා තියෙන්නේ දුරස්ථ පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ, හැම ප්\u200dරවේශයක්ම හැම ප්\u200dරවේශයක පරීක්ෂණ දත්ත සෙට් එකේ මනුෂ්\u200dයයෝ නිර්දේශකයෝ ලබේල් එක දෙකක් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා, අපි කණ්ඩායම් 42 වලින් 29', 'sr': 'Opišemo sistem podignut tim Džeka Rajdera u zadatak 4 za Hyperpartisan News Detection. Taj zadatak je tražio sudionike da predvide da li je određeni članak hiperpartisan, tj. ekstremno levo ili ekstremno desno. Predložili smo pristup na temelju BERT-a sa finom prilagodbom, koji je postavljen 7. od 28 timova na daljnjem nadzornom setu podataka, gdje se smatra da su svi članovi iz hiperpartizanskog/ne-hiperpartizanskog novinskog izveštaja hiperpartizan/ne-hiperpartizan. Na ruèno annotiranom testnom setu podataka, gde su ljudski annotatori dvostruko provjerili etikete, bili smo 29. iz 42 tima.', 'sv': 'Vi beskriver det system som Jack Ryder-teamet skickat in till SemEval-2019 Task 4 om Hyperpartisan News Detection. Uppgiften bad deltagarna att förutsäga om en viss artikel är hyperpartisan, dvs extrem-vänster eller extrem-höger. Vi föreslog ett tillvägagångssätt baserat på BERT med finjustering, som rankades 7:e av 28 lag på den fjärrövervakade datauppsättningen, där alla artiklar från en hyperpartisan/icke-hyperpartisan nyhetskanal anses vara hyperpartisan/icke-hyperpartisan. På ett manuellt kommenterat testdataset, där mänskliga kommentatorer dubbelkollade etiketterna, hamnade vi på 29:e plats av 42 lag.', 'so': 'Waxaan qoraynaa nidaamka ay kooxda Jack Ryder u soo dhiibeen SemEval-2019 Shaqada 4 ee ku saabsan baaritaanka News Hyperpartisan. Shaqadu wuxuu weyddiiyey kuwa ka shaqeeya in uu sii sheego in warqad la qoray uu yahay mid aad u khiyaaneeya, tusaale ahaan bidixda aad u fog ama aad u midig. Waxaannu soo jeednay qaab ku saleysan BERT oo ku qoran hagaajinta, kaas oo laga soo sawiray koox 7aad oo ka mid ah 28 koox oo ka mid ah meesha laga ilaaliyey macluumaadka oo dhan oo laga soo qoray qoraalka warbixinta ee hyperpartisan/non-hyperpartisan, waxaa looga tiriyaa inay tahay hyperpartisan/non-hyperpartisan. Taariikhda baaritaanka ee si gacan ah loo isticmaalay, meesha ay cadaaladaha dadku labanlaab u fiiriyeen, waxaa lana safray 29aad oo 42 koox ka mid ah.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் ஜாக் ரைட்டர் குழுவின் வழங்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பை விவரிக்கிறோம் ஹைப்பர்பார்டிசன் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பு மீத கொடுக்கப்பட்ட கட்டுரையில் அதிகப்பெரிய பிரிவாளராக இருக்குமா என்று கேட்கப்பட்ட செயல் பங்கீட்டாளர்களிடம் கேட்டார் நாங்கள் BERT அடிப்படையில் ஒரு செயல்பாட்டை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், அது தூரத்தில் கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட தரவுத்தளத்தின் மீது ஏழாவது இருந்த 28 குழுக்கள் வரையப்பட்டது, அதில் ஹைப்பர்பிஸ ஒரு கைமுறையாக குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட சோதனை தரவுத்தளத்தில், மனித அறிவிப்பாளர்கள் சிட்டைகளை இரட்டிப்பாக சரிபார்த்தார்கள், 42 குழ', 'ur': 'ہم نے جک رایدر ٹیم کے ذریعہ سیسٹم کو سیم Eval-2019 ٹاکس ۴ کے ذریعہ Hyperpartisan News Detection پر پیش کیا ہے۔ اس کام نے شرکت کرنے والوں سے پوچھا تھا کہ ان سے پیش بینی کریں کہ کیا ایک لکھی ہوئی ہے کہ ہیرپارٹیسان ہے، یعنی extreme-left یا extreme-right. ہم نے BERT کے بنیاد پر ایک طریقہ پیش کیا تھا جو دور نظر رکھی ہوئی ڈاٹ سٹ پر 7th out 28 ٹیموں پر تھا، جہاں تمام articles from a hyperpartisan/non-hyperpartisan news outlet are considered hyperpartisan/non-hyperpartisan. ہم 42 ٹیموں میں سے 29 درجے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Biz SemEval-2019 uchun Jak Ryder guruhi Hyperpartisan News Tayyorligini aniqlash uchun 4 vazifani aytib beramiz. Name Biz BERT asosida yaxshi bog'liq bo'lgan bir usul bilan boshlagan, bu maʼlumotlar tarkibida 7-birinchi guruhdan boshlanadi. Bu yerda hyperpartisan/hyperpartisan xabar tarkibidagi hamma maqolalar hyperpartisan/hyperpartisan emas deb hisoblanadi. On a manually annotated test dataset, where human annotators double-checked the labels, we were ranked 29th out of 42 teams.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi mô tả hệ thống do đội Jack Ryder gửi nhiệm vụ Semkhai thác tin tức Hyperdu. Nhiệm vụ yêu cầu các diễn viên dự đoán nếu một bài báo được đưa ra là lưỡng đảng, tức là cánh tả trái hay cánh tả. Chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp dựa trên giao thông BERT với độ nghiên cứu chín, được xếp hạng bảy đội 28 trên bộ dữ liệu được giám sát xa, nơi tất cả các bài viết từ một tin tức cao du kích và không-cường-du kích được xem là lưỡng đảng. Trên bộ dữ liệu thử được ghi chú bằng tay, nơi nhà biên niên ghi chú đã kiểm tra nhãn hiệu, chúng ta được xếp hạng 29th bên ngoài đội phát-ra-2.', 'nl': 'We beschrijven het systeem dat door het Jack Ryder team is ingediend bij SemEval-2019 Task 4 op Hyperpartisan News Detection. De taak vroeg deelnemers om te voorspellen of een bepaald artikel hyperpartijdig is, dat wil zeggen extreem links of extreem rechts. We stelden een aanpak voor gebaseerd op BERT met fine-tuning, die op de zevende plaats van 28-teams stond op de afstand begeleide dataset, waarbij alle artikelen van een hyperpartizan/niet-hyperpartizan nieuwsset als hyperpartizan/niet-hyperpartizan worden beschouwd. Op een handmatig geannoteerde testdataset, waar menselijke annotatoren de labels dubbel controleerden, stonden we op de 29ste plaats van 42 teams.', 'bg': 'Описваме системата, подадена от екипа на Джак Райдър на задача 4 за откриване на хиперпартизани новини. Задачата изисква участниците да предскажат дали дадена статия е хиперпартизан, т.е. крайно ляво или крайно дясно. Предложихме подход, базиран на БЕРТ с фина настройка, който се класира на 7-о място от 28 отбора в дистанционно контролирания набор от данни, където всички статии от хиперпартизан/нехиперпартизан новинарски канал се считат за хиперпартизан/нехиперпартизан. На ръчно анотирани тестови данни, където човешките анотатори провериха два пъти етикетите, бяхме на 29-то място от 42 отбора.', 'hr': 'Opišemo sistem podignut tim Jack Rydera u zadatak 4 za otkrivanje Hyperpartisan vijesti. Taj zadatak je tražio sudionike da predviđaju je li određeni članak hiperpartisan, tj. ekstremno lijevo ili ekstremno desno. Predložili smo pristup na temelju BERT-a s finom prilagodbom, koji je postavljen 7. od 28 timova na daljnjem nadzornom setu podataka, gdje se smatra da su svi članovi iz hiperpartizanskog/ne-hiperpartizanskog novinskog izlaza hiperpartizan/ne-hiperpartizan. Na ručno annotiranom testnom setu podataka, gdje su ljudski annotatori dvostruko provjerili etikete, bili smo 29. iz 42 tima.', 'da': 'Vi beskriver systemet indsendt af Jack Ryder-teamet til SemEval-2019 Task 4 om Hyperpartisan News Detection. Opgaven bad deltagerne om at forudsige, om en given artikel er hyperpartisan, dvs. ekstrem venstre eller ekstrem højre. Vi foreslog en tilgang baseret på BERT med finjustering, som blev placeret 7. ud af 28 hold på det fjernt overvågede datasæt, hvor alle artikler fra et hyperpartisan/ikke-hyperpartisan nyhedsbureau betragtes som hyperpartisan/ikke-hyperpartisan. På et manuelt kommenteret testdatasæt, hvor menneskelige kommentatorer dobbelttjekkede etiketterne, blev vi rangeret 29. ud af 42 hold.', 'ko': 'Jack Ryder팀이 Sem Eval-2019 미션 4에 제출한 초당파 뉴스 검측 시스템을 묘사했습니다.이 임무는 참가자들에게 극좌인지 극우인지 초당파인지 예측할 것을 요구한다.우리는 원격 감시 데이터가 집중된 28개 팀 중 7위를 차지한 마이크로스피커를 기반으로 한 BERT 방법을 제시했다. 그 중에서 초당파 / 비초당파 뉴스 매체의 모든 글은 초당파 / 비초당파로 여겨진다.인공적으로 표시된 테스트 데이터 집합에서 인류 주석원이 라벨에 대해 이중 검사를 실시했는데 우리는 42개 팀 중 29위에 올랐다.', 'de': 'Wir beschreiben das System, das vom Jack Ryder-Team an SemEval-2019 Task 4 zur Hyperpartisan News Detection eingereicht wurde. Die Aufgabe bat die Teilnehmer, vorherzusagen, ob ein bestimmter Artikel hyperparteiisch ist, d.h. extrem links oder extrem rechts. Wir schlugen einen Ansatz vor, der auf BERT mit Feinabstimmung basiert, der den siebten Platz unter den 28-Teams im fernüberwachten Datensatz erreichte, bei dem alle Artikel einer hyperparteiischen/nicht-hyperparteiischen Nachrichtenagentur als hyperparteiisch/nicht-hyperparteiisch betrachtet werden. Auf einem manuell kommentierten Testdatensatz, bei dem menschliche Annotatoren die Labels doppelt überprüften, wurden wir 29ter von 42 Teams.', 'id': 'Kami menggambarkan sistem yang dikirim oleh tim Jack Ryder ke SemEval-2019 Task 4 pada Deteksi Berita Hyperpartisan. The task asked participants to predict whether a given article is hyperpartisan, i.e., extreme-left or extreme-right.  Kami mengusulkan pendekatan berdasarkan BERT dengan penyesuaian, yang dipilih ke-7 dari 28 tim di dataset yang diawasi jauh, di mana semua artikel dari berita hyperpartisan/non-hyperpartisan dianggap sebagai hyperpartisan/non-hyperpartisan. Dalam set data tes yang dicatat secara manual, di mana anotator manusia memeriksa dua kali lipat, kami berada di peringkat 29 dari 42 tim.', 'sw': 'Tunaelezea mfumo uliotolewa na timu ya Jack Ryder kwa ajili ya SemEval-2019 kazi 4 kuhusu Utafiti wa Habari za Hyperpartisan. Kazi hiyo iliwaomba washiriki kutabiri ikiwa makala iliyotolewa ni ya upande mkubwa, yaani kushoto kulia au kulia zaidi. Tulipendekeza mbinu inayotokana na BERT yenye mafanikio mazuri, ambayo ilichelewa kwa timu ya 7 kati ya 28 kwenye seti ya taarifa zinazofuatiliwa mbali, ambapo makala zote kutoka kwenye vyombo vya habari vya upeperpartisan/wasio na upeperparti vinaonekana kuwa na upande mkubwa/wasio na upeperparty. Katika seti ya taarifa za majaribio yaliyochapishwa kwa mikononi, ambapo watangazaji wa binadamu walichungulia mabango mara mbili, tulikuwa na rangi ya 29 kati ya timu 42.', 'fa': 'ما سیستم را توسط تیم جک رایدر به ماموریت ۲۰۱۹ در مورد شناسایی اخبار هایپر پارتیسان توصیف می کنیم. این وظیفه از شرکتگران خواست پیش بینی کنند که آیا یک مقاله داده شده hyperpartisan است، یعنی extreme-left یا extreme-right. ما پیشنهاد دادیم یک روش بر اساس BERT با تغییر درست کردن، که در مجموعه داده های دور و دور نظر گرفته شده است، که همه مقاله های از یک اخبار های هیپر پارتیسان/غیر هیپر پارتیسان به عنوان هیپر پارتیسان/غیر هیپر پارتیسان به عنوان هیپر پارتیسان می گویند. در یک مجموعه اطلاعات آزمایش دستی که به دست داده شده بود، جایی که آزمایشگران انسان دو بار بررسی کردند، ما 29م از 42 گروه درجه گرفتیم.', 'af': "Ons beskrywe die stelsel wat deur die Jack Ryder-span aan SemEval-2019-taak 4 aangestuur is op Hyperpartisan Nuus-beskrywing. Die taak het deelnimmers gevra om te voorskou of 'n gegewe artikel hiperpartisan is, bv. ekstrem-links of ekstrem-regs. Ons het 'n toegang voorgestel gebaseer op BERT met fyn-tuning, wat was rankeerd 7de uit 28 teams op die afgeleë ondersoekte datastel, waar alle artikels van 'n hyperpartisan/non-hyperpartisan nuusuitset aangesien word as hyperpartisan/non-hyperpartisan. Op 'n handaangekies toets datastel, waar menslike annotators dubbel-gekyk het die etikette, was ons 29de van 42 teams rangeer.", 'am': 'የJack Ryder ቡድን ለሴmEval-2019 ስራ 4 በHyperpartisan ዜና ውይይት የተገኘውን ስርዓት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ስራው ተካሪዎችን የተሰጠ ጽሑፍ አፍሪካዊ መሆኑን ለማወቅ ጠይቋል፤ ምሳሌ እጅግ-ግራ ወይም እጅግ ቀኝ ነው፡፡ በሀገር በተጠበቀው ዳታተር ላይ የ7ኛ የ28 ቡድን ደረጃዎች በተደረገ BERT የተመሳሳይ ሥርዓት አቀረብነው፤ ከhyperpartisan/hyperpartisan የዜና ዕቅድን የሁሉም ጽሑፎች hyperpartisan/non-hyperpartisan እንደተቈጠሩ ነው፡፡ በሥቃይ የፍተና ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም፣ የሰው ማስታወቂያዎች የምልክቶችን ሁለት እጥፍ በመጠየቅ፣ ከ42 ቡድን 29ኛ ደረጃዎች ነበር፡፡', 'sq': 'Ne e përshkruajmë sistemin e dërguar nga ekipi Jack Ryder në SemEval-2019 Task 4 për Detektimin e lajmeve hiperpartizane. Detyra u kërkoi pjesëmarrësve të parashikojnë nëse një artikull i caktuar është hiperpartizan, pra ekstrem-majtas apo ekstrem-djathtas. Ne propozuam një qasje të bazuar në BERT me rregullim të mirë, e cila u rendit e shtata nga 28 ekipe në grupin e të dhënave të mbikqyrura nga larg, ku të gjitha artikujt nga një dalje lajmesh hiperpartizane/jo hiperpartizane konsiderohen si hiperpartizane/jo hiperpartizane. Në një grup të dhënash testimi të anotuar manualisht, ku anotatorët njerëzorë kontrolluan dyfishtë etiketat, ne ishim të renditur në 29 nga 42 ekipe.', 'tr': "Biz Jack Ryder toparynyň SemEval-2019 Taýgyna 4-nji Taýgyna ýazylýarys Görev i ştirakçilerden berilen makala hiperpartisan dälmidigini tahmin etmegini sorady Biz BERT'a fin-tuning bilen daýan ýan bir approach teklip etdik. Bu ýerde ýokarydan 28 topar daýatlarynda 7-nji we 28 topar taýýarlandyrylýar. Bu ýerde hiperpartisan/jan-hiperpartisanyň hemme makalary hiperpartisan/jan-hiperpartisan hasaplanýar. Adamlar täzelikleriň etiketlerini elimden duýdurýan testiň setiginde, 42 topardan 29-nji derejesi bardyk.", 'bs': 'Opišemo sistem podignut tim Jack Rydera u zadatak 4 za hiperpartisan novine. Taj zadatak je tražio sudionike da predviđaju da li je određeni članak hiperpartisan, tj. ekstremno-lijevo ili ekstremno-desno. Predložili smo pristup na temelju BERT-a sa finom prilagodbom, koji je postavljen 7. od 28 timova na daljnjem nadzornom setu podataka, gdje se smatra da su svi članovi iz hiperpartizanskog/ne-hiperpartizanskog novinskog outleta hiperpartizan/ne-hiperpartizan. Na ručno annotiranom testnom setu podataka, gdje su ljudski annotatori dvostruko provjerili etikete, bili smo 29. iz 42 tima.', 'bn': 'আমরা হাইপার্পার্পার্টিস্যান নিউজ ডিটেক্টরের জন্য জ্যাক রাইডার টিম দ্বারা প্রদান করেছিলাম। এই কাজটি অংশগ্রহণকারীদের প্রশ্ন করেছে যে একটি প্রবন্ধটি হাইপার্পার্টিস্টান, যেমন অতিরিক্ত বা অতিরিক্ত ডান। We proposed an approach based on BERT with fine-tuning, which was ranked 7th out 28 teams on the distantly supervised dataset, where all articles from a hyperpartisan/non-hyperpartisan news outlet are considered to be hyperpartisan/non-hyperpartisan.  হ্যান্ডাম্পানিক পরীক্ষার ডাটাসেটে, যেখানে মানুষের বিষয়টি দ্বিগুণ পরীক্ষা করেছে লেবেলের দ্বিগুণ পরীক্ষা করেছে, আমরা', 'ca': "Descrivem el sistema submetit per l'equip Jack Ryder a SemEval-2019 Task 4 on Hyperpartisan News Detection. La tasca va demanar als participants que predíssin si un article és hiperpartisan, és a dir, extrem esquerra o extrem dreta. We proposed an approach based on BERT with fine-tuning, which was ranked 7th out 28 teams on the distantly supervised dataset, where all articles from a hyperpartisan/non-hyperpartisan news outlet are considered to be hyperpartisan/non-hyperpartisan.  En un conjunt de dades de prova anotats manualment, on els anotators humans van comprobar doblement les etiquetes, vam ser classificats en 29 d'entre 42 equips.", 'az': "Biz Jack Ryder ekibi'nin Hyperpartisan Haberləri keşfetməsi barəsində 4-ci Görevə 4 təyin etdiyi sistemi təsdiqləyirik. Gözəl i ştirakçıların təmin edilmiş məsələnin hiperpartisan olmasını təmin etməsini istədi, yani extreme-left və ya extreme-right olmasını təmin edir. Beləliklə, BERT tərəfindən təklif etdik ki, uzaq təhlükəsizli verilən qutularda 7-ci ilə 28 dəstə təklif edilmişdi. Bütün məktublar hiperpartisan/non-hyperpartisan xəbərlər qutusundan hyperpartisan/non-hyperpartisan kimi hesab edilmişdir. Əl əlində bildirilmiş sınama verilər qutusunda, insan annotatorlarının etiketlərini iki dəfə yoxladığı yerdə, biz 42 dəfərdən 29 dəf idik.", 'hy': 'Մենք նկարագրում ենք համակարգը, որը Ջեք Ռայդերի թիմը ներկայացրել է 2019 թվականի "Սեմեվալ-2019"-ի "Հիպերպարտիզան նորությունների հայտնաբերման" 4-ի հանձնարարությանը: Հարցը խնդրեց մասնակիցներին կանխատեսել, թե արդյոք տվյալ հոդվածը գերկայացի է, այսինքն, ծայրահեղ ձախ կամ ծայրահեղ աջ: Մենք առաջարկեցինք BER-ի վրա հիմնված մոտեցում, որի հիմքը բարձրացված էր, որը հեռավորաբար վերահսկված տվյալների համակարգում գտնվում էր 28-րդ խմբի 7-րդ դասակարգում, որտեղ բոլոր հոդվածները հիպերկայացի և ոչ հիպերկայացի լրատվյալների միջոցով համարվում են հիպերկայացի և Ձեռքով գրված փորձարկումների տվյալների համակարգում, որտեղ մարդկային գրողները երկու անգամ ստուգեցին պիտակները, մենք համարվում էինք 42 թիմերից 29-րդ դասակարգում:', 'cs': 'Popisujeme systém předložený týmem Jacka Rydera SemEval-2019 Task 4 na detekci hyperstranických zpráv. Úkol požádal účastníky, aby předpověděli, zda je daný článek hyperstranický, tj. extrémně levý nebo extrémně pravicový. Navrhli jsme přístup založený na BERT s jemným laděním, který byl sedmý z 28 týmů na vzdáleně dohlíženém datovém souboru, kde jsou všechny články z hyperstranizánního/nehyperstranizánního zpravodajství považovány za hyperstranizánní/nehyperstranizánní zpravodajství. Na ručně anotovaném testovacím datovém setu, kde lidé anotátoři dvakrát zkontrolovali štítky, jsme byli ze 42ti týmů na 29tém místě.', 'et': 'Kirjeldame Jack Ryderi meeskonna poolt SemEval-2019 ülesandele 4 Hyperpartisan News Detection esitatud süsteemi. Ülesanne palus osalejatel ennustada, kas antud artikkel on hüperpartisanne, st äärmuslik vasak või äärmuslik parem. Pakkusime välja lähenemisviisi, mis põhineb peenhäälestusega BERT-il, mis oli kaugjärelevalve all olevas andmekogumis 28 meeskonnast seitsmendal kohal, kus kõik hüperpartisani/mitte-hüperpartisani uudistekontakti artiklid loetakse hüperpartisaniks/mitte-hüperpartisaniks. Käsitsi annoteeritud testiandmekogumil, kus inimannotaatorid kontrollisid etiketeid topelt, saime 42 meeskonnast 29. koha.', 'fi': 'Kuvaamme Jack Ryder -tiimin toimittaman järjestelmän SemEval-2019 Task 4 on Hyperpartisan News Detection. Tehtävässä pyydettiin osallistujia ennustamaan, onko tietty artikkeli hyperpartisaani eli äärivasemmisto vai äärioikeisto. Ehdotimme lähestymistapaa, joka perustuu BERT:hen hienosäätimellä, joka sijoittui seitsemänneksi 28 tiimin joukosta etävalvotussa aineistossa, jossa kaikki hyperpartisaanin/ei-hyperpartisaanin uutistoimiston artikkelit katsotaan hyperpartisaaneiksi/ei-hyperpartisaaneiksi. Manuaalisesti merkityssä testiaineistossa, jossa ihmismerkinnät tarkistivat merkinnät kahdesti, olimme sijalla 29 42 tiimistä.', 'jv': 'We rambarang sistem ngewehku Jack Rider group kang seminval-2011 task 4 nang Typerpartisan New detection The task requested partipartipartipartitions to Preview is a given section is iperpartisan, i.e. extreme-left or extreme-right. We proposal an method supported on BERT with Fin-tuning, that was ranged 7 th out 30 trim on the Distant super-Vised dataset, Where all Artiles from a guierpartisan/not-guierpartisan media outlet are contextual to be the guierpartisan/not-guierpartisan. Mungkin nganggo manut sing dadi dong manut, kawur nyong pada dadi sing nganggo cara-cara sing ujian, kawur ne, dadi seneng pisan-warni bot sing katêpakan bot sing katêpakan bot.', 'ha': "Tuna bayyana al'amarin da aka wajabta aikin jack Ryter zuwa SemEV-2019 Kayan aiki ya tambayi mãsu shirki su gane ko wani makala da aka bai wa wani abu ya zama mai rufe, misali, mai hagu ko mai dama mai girma. Mun buɗa wani matsayi a kan BERT da tunkuɗe mai kyau, wanda aka ranka jama'a 7 daga 28 a kan tsarin da aka nĩsantar da shi, a inda duk makala daga wani hotel na Hyperpartan/non-Hyperpartan na gaskiyar lãbãri ana ƙaddara shi kamar a zama Hyperpartan/non-Hyperpartan. Daga wani tsarin jarrabo da hannayen aka sanar da shi, a inda matangaren mutane suka yi bincike alama biyu, za'a ranar mu 29 daga jama'a 42.", 'he': "אנחנו מתארים את המערכת שנשלחה על ידי צוות ג'ק ריידר לסימוול-2019 משימה 4 על גילוי חדשות היפרפרטיזן. המשימה ביקשה מהמשתתפים לחזות אם מאמר מסוים הוא היפרפרטיזני, כלומר, קיצוני שמאל או קיצוני ימין. הצענו גישה מבוססת על BERT עם התרגיל, שהייתה מוצבת ב-7 מתוך 28 קבוצות על קבוצת המידע המבוקחת מרחוק, שבו כל המאמרים ממציאת חדשות היפרפרטיזנית/לא היפרטיזנית נחשבים היפרטיזנית/לא היפרטיזנית. על קבוצת נתונים מבחנים שנעטפה ידנית, שבו המעטפים האנושיים בדקו כפול את התוויות, היינו בדרגה 29 מתוך 42 קבוצות.", 'sk': 'Opisujemo sistem, ki ga je ekipa Jack Ryder predložila SemEval-2019 nalogi 4 o zaznavanju hiperpartizanskih novic. Opravilo je od udeležencev pozvalo, naj napovejo, ali je določen članek hiperpartizanski, tj. skrajna levica ali skrajna desnica. Predlagali smo pristop, ki temelji na BERT s finim uravnavanjem, ki je bil na 7. mestu med 28 ekipami na daljnem nadzorovanem naboru podatkov, kjer se vsi članki iz hiperpartizanskega/nehiperpartizanskega novičarstva štejejo za hiperpartizanske/nehiperpartizanske. Na ročno označenem testnem naboru podatkov, kjer so človeški označevalci dvakrat preverili oznake, smo bili uvrščeni na 29. mesto od 42 ekip.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་གིས་ལ་ཇེག་རིཌ་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ལ་SemEval-2019 ལས་ཀ་གནད་སྡུད་བཞིན་པ་(Hyperpartisan News Detection)ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྲིད་བྱུ བྱ་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཞུགས་བྱས་དེ་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་མིན་ན་བཟོ་རྣམས་མེད། ང་ཚོས་BERT བརྟེན་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱས་པའི་གནད་དོན་ཞིག་གི་ཕྱོགས་གནད་དོན་ཡོད། On a manually annotated test dataset, where human annotators double-checked the labels, we were ranked 29th out of 42 teams.'}
{'en': 'Team Kit Kittredge at SemEval-2019 Task 4 : LSTM Voting System', 'ar': 'Team Kit Kittredge في SemEval-2019 المهمة 4: نظام التصويت LSTM', 'pt': 'Equipe Kit Kittredge na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 4: Sistema de Votação LSTM', 'es': 'Team Kit Kittredge en Semeval-2019 Tarea 4: Sistema de Votación LSTM', 'fr': 'Team Kit Kittredge au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 4\xa0: Système de vote LSTM', 'ja': 'チームキットKittredge at SemEval -2019タスク4 ： LSTM投票システム', 'zh': '团队套件Kittredge在SemEval-2019务4:LSTM投票系统', 'ru': 'Team Kit Kittredge на SemEval-2019 Задача 4: Система голосования LSTM', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 4 पर टीम किट Kittredge: LSTM मतदान प्रणाली', 'ga': 'Team Kit Kittredge ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 4: Córas Vótála LSTM', 'ka': 'კოდის Kittredge SemEval-2019 სამუშაო დავალება 4: LSTM დავალების სისტემა', 'el': 'Ομάδα Κιτ Κίτρετζ στο έργο 4: Σύστημα ψηφοφορίας LSTM', 'hu': 'Team Kit Kittredge a SemEval-2019 4. feladat: LSTM szavazási rendszer', 'mk': 'Team Kit Kittredge at SemEval-2019 Task 4: LSTM Voting System', 'it': 'Team Kit Kittredge al SemEval-2019 Task 4: LSTM Voting System', 'kk': 'Топ Kit Kittredge жарым- 2019 тапсырмасы 4: LSTM дауыс жүйесі', 'ms': 'Team Kit Kittredge at SemEval-2019 Task 4: LSTM Voting System', 'mn': 'Баг Kit Kittredge at SemEval-2019 Task 4: LSTM Voting System', 'no': 'GruppeKit Kittredge ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 4: LSTM stemmesystemet', 'lt': 'Grupės rinkinys „SemEval-2019“ 4 užduotis: LSTM balsavimo sistema', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 4: LSTM വോട്ട് സിസ്റ്റം', 'mt': 'Kittredge tat-Tim f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 4: Sistema tal-Votazzjoni LSTM', 'ro': 'Team Kit Kittredge la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 4: Sistemul de vot LSTM', 'so': 'Team Kit Kittredge at SemEval-2019 Task 4: LSTM Voting System', 'pl': 'Zestaw zespołu Kittredge na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 4: System głosowania LSTM', 'si': 'කණ්ඩායම Kit KitTredgat at Halfeval-2019 Label 4: LSTM Voting System', 'sr': 'Tim Kit Kittredge na semiEval-2019 Task 4: LSTM glasački sistem', 'sv': 'Team Kit Kittredge på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 4: LSTM röstningssystem', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 ல் குழு கிட் கிட்ட்ரெட்ஜ் செயல் 4: LSTM Voting System', 'ur': 'ٹیم کیٹ کیٹریج سیم Eval-2019 ٹاکس 4: LSTM وٹنگ سیسٹم میں', 'vi': 'Đội Kit Kittredge at SemEvl-thẩm 9 Task 4: LSTM Voting system', 'uz': 'Vazifa 4: LSTM Voting System', 'bg': 'Екип Китридж на Задача 4: Система за гласуване', 'hr': 'Tim Kit Kittredge na semiEval-2019 zadatak 4: LSTM glasački sustav', 'nl': 'Team Kit Kittredge op SemEval-2019 Taak 4: LSTM Stemsysteem', 'da': 'Team Kit Kittredge på SemEval-2019 Opgave 4: LSTM stemmesystem', 'de': 'Team Kit Kittredge bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 4: LSTM Voting System', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019 회의에서의 Kittredge 팀 임무 4:LSTM 투표 시스템', 'sw': 'Timu Kit Kittredge katika SemEval-2019 Kazi 4: Mfumo wa kura wa LSTM', 'af': 'Skep Kit Kittredge by SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 4: LSTM Bestuuringstelsel', 'tr': 'Tim Kit Kittredge at SemEval-2019 Task 4: LSTM Voting System', 'id': 'Team Kittredge di SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: LSTM Voting System', 'fa': 'Team Kit Kittredge at SemEval-2019 Task 4: LSTM Voting System', 'hy': 'Team Kit Kittredge at SemEval-2019 Task 4: LSTM Voting System', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2019 কাজ ৪: এলএসএমএস ভোট সিস্টেম', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Task 4: LSTM Seçim Sistemi', 'am': 'የቡድን ኪt Kittredge at SemEval-2019 ስራ 4: LSTM Voting System', 'sq': 'Grupi Kittredge në SemEval-2019 Task 4: LSTM Voting System', 'et': 'Meeskonna Kit Kittredge SemEval-2019 ülesanne 4: LSTM hääletussüsteem', 'fi': 'Team Kit Kittredge SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 4: LSTM Äänestysjärjestelmä', 'bs': 'Tim Kit Kittredge na semiEval-2019 Task 4: LSTM glasački sustav', 'ca': 'Equipament Kittredge a SemEval-2019 Task 4: LSTM Voting System', 'cs': 'Team Kit Kittredge na SemEval-2019 Úkol 4: LSTM Hlasovací systém', 'jv': 'Text', 'sk': 'Team Kit Kittredge na SemEval-2019 Naloga 4: LSTM glasovalni sistem', 'ha': 'QScriptBreakpointsModel', 'he': 'Team Kit Kittredge at SemEval-2019 Task 4: LSTM Voting System', 'bo': 'Team Kit Kittredge at SemEval-2019 Task 4: LSTM Voting System'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the approach of team Kit Kittredge to SemEval-2019 Task 4 : Hyperpartisan News Detection. The goal was binary classification of news articles into the categories of biased or unbiased. We had two software submissions : one a simple bag-of-words model, and the second an LSTM (Long Short Term Memory) neural network, which was trained on a subset of the original dataset selected by a voting system of other LSTMs. This method did not prove much more successful than the baseline, however, due to the models’ tendency to learn publisher-specific traits instead of general bias.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نهج فريق Kit Kittredge في SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. كان الهدف هو التصنيف الثنائي للمقالات الإخبارية إلى فئات "متحيزة" أو "غير متحيزة". كان لدينا برنامجان مقدمان: أحدهما نموذج بسيط لحقيبة الكلمات ، والثاني شبكة عصبية LSTM (ذاكرة قصيرة المدى) ، والتي تم تدريبها على مجموعة فرعية من مجموعة البيانات الأصلية التي تم اختيارها بواسطة نظام تصويت لـ LSTMs الأخرى. لم تثبت هذه الطريقة نجاحًا أكبر بكثير من خط الأساس ، وذلك بسبب ميل النماذج إلى تعلم السمات الخاصة بالناشر بدلاً من التحيز العام.', 'es': 'Este documento describe el enfoque del equipo Kit Kittredge para la Tarea 4 de SemeVal-2019: Detección de noticias hiperpartidistas. El objetivo era la clasificación binaria de los artículos de noticias en las categorías de «sesgados» o «imparciales». Tuvimos dos presentaciones de software: una, un modelo simple de bolsa de palabras, y la segunda, una red neuronal LSTM (memoria a corto plazo), que se entrenó en un subconjunto del conjunto de datos original seleccionado por un sistema de votación de otros LSTM. Sin embargo, este método no demostró ser mucho más exitoso que la línea de base, debido a la tendencia de los modelos a aprender rasgos específicos de los editores en lugar de sesgos generales.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit l'approche de l'équipe Kit Kittredge pour SemEval-2019 Task 4\xa0: Hyperpartisan News Detection. L'objectif était de classer de manière binaire les articles de presse dans les catégories «\xa0biaisées\xa0» ou «\xa0impartiales\xa0». Deux logiciels ont été soumis\xa0: l'un était un simple modèle de sac de mots, et le second un réseau de neurones LSTM (Long Short Term Memory), qui a été formé sur un sous-ensemble de l'ensemble de données original sélectionné par un système de vote d'autres LSTM. Cette méthode ne s'est toutefois pas avérée beaucoup plus efficace que la méthode de référence, en raison de la tendance des modèles à apprendre des traits spécifiques à l'éditeur au lieu d'un biais général.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve a abordagem da equipe Kit Kittredge para a Tarefa 4 do SemEval-2019: detecção de notícias hiperpartidárias. O objetivo era a classificação binária de artigos de notícias nas categorias de “tendencioso” ou “imparcial”. Tínhamos duas submissões de software: um modelo simples de saco de palavras e o segundo uma rede neural LSTM (Long Short Term Memory), que foi treinada em um subconjunto do conjunto de dados original selecionado por um sistema de votação de outros LSTMs. No entanto, esse método não se mostrou muito mais bem-sucedido do que a linha de base, devido à tendência dos modelos de aprender características específicas do editor em vez do viés geral.', 'ja': '本稿では、Kit KittredgeチームのSemEval -2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detectionへのアプローチについて述べる。目標は、ニュース記事を「偏っている」または「偏っていない」カテゴリにバイナリ分類することでした。2つのソフトウェアが提出されました。1つは単純な単語バッグモデルで、2つ目はLSTM （ Long Short Term Memory ）ニューラルネットワークで、他のLSTMの投票システムによって選択された元のデータセットのサブセットでトレーニングされました。しかし、この方法は、一般的なバイアスの代わりに出版社固有の形質を学習するモデルの傾向のため、ベースラインよりもはるかに成功していないことが証明された。', 'zh': '本文述Kit Kittredge团队SemEval-2019务4:超党新闻检之法。 以新闻文二元为有偏见、无偏见之类。 吾有二软件:一曰单词囊,二曰LSTM(长短期记)神经网络,其他LSTM投票系统原始数据集子集上教之。 然而无比基线成功者,以其向学出版商特定,非常见也。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर टीम किट किट्रेज के दृष्टिकोण का वर्णन करता है सेमेवल-2019 टास्क 4: हाइपरपार्टिजन न्यूज डिटेक्शन के लिए। लक्ष्य "पक्षपाती" या "निष्पक्ष" की श्रेणियों में समाचार लेखों का द्विआधारी वर्गीकरण था। हमारे पास दो सॉफ़्टवेयर सबमिशन थे: एक एक साधारण बैग-ऑफ-वर्ड्स मॉडल, और दूसरा एक एलएसटीएम (लॉन्ग शॉर्ट टर्म मेमोरी) तंत्रिका नेटवर्क, जिसे अन्य एलएसटीएम की मतदान प्रणाली द्वारा चुने गए मूल डेटासेट के सबसेट पर प्रशिक्षित किया गया था। यह विधि बेसलाइन की तुलना में बहुत अधिक सफल साबित नहीं हुई, हालांकि, सामान्य पूर्वाग्रह के बजाय प्रकाशक-विशिष्ट लक्षणों को सीखने के लिए मॉडल की प्रवृत्ति के कारण।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается подход команды Kit Kittredge к задаче 4 SemEval-2019: обнаружение гиперпартийных новостей. Целью была бинарная классификация новостных статей по категориям «предвзято» или «непредвзято». У нас было два представления программного обеспечения: одно - простая модель мешка слов, а второе - нейронная сеть LSTM (Long Short Term Memory), которая обучалась на подмножестве исходного набора данных, выбранного системой голосования других LSTM. Этот метод оказался не намного более успешным, чем базовый, однако, из-за тенденции моделей изучать специфические для издателя черты вместо общей предвзятости.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar chur chuige na foirne Kit Kittredge maidir le Tasc 4 SemEval-2019: Brath Nuachta Hyperpartisan. Ba é an sprioc a bhí ann ná ailt nuachta a aicmiú go dénártha sna catagóirí “claonta” nó “neamhchlaonta”. Bhí dhá iarratas bogearraí againn: ceann amháin ar mhúnla mála focal simplí, agus ar an dara ceann líonra néarúil LSTM (Cuimhne Gearrthéarmach Fadtéarmach), a cuireadh oiliúint ar fho-thacar den bhunthacar sonraí a roghnaigh córas vótála LSTManna eile. Ní raibh an modh seo i bhfad ní ba rathúla ná an bunlíne, áfach, mar gheall ar chlaonadh na samhlacha tréithe sainiúla an fhoilsitheora a fhoghlaim in ionad an laofachta ghinearálta.', 'ka': "ამ დოკუმენტი დააწერა Kit Kittredge ჯგუფის მიღება SemEval-2019 დავალება 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. მისამართი იყო ბინარი კლასიფიკაცია ინფორმაციის არქილეების კოტეგორიაში 'დაკავშირებული' ან 'დაკავშირებული' კატეგორიაში. ჩვენ გვაქვს ორი პროგრამეტური მომხმარება: ერთი მარტივი სიტყვების მოდელი, მეორე LSTM (მარტივი კროტრამეტური მეხმარება) ნეიროლური ქსელი, რომელიც მოიცემულია პროგრამეტური მონაცემების სპესტიდან,  მაგრამ ეს მეთოდი არ იყო უფრო წარმატებულია, ვიდრე ბაზილური წარმატებით, მაგრამ მოდელური ტენდენციის შესაძლებლობად განსწავლა განსაკუთრებული განსაკუთრებელი განსა", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει την προσέγγιση της ομάδας στην εργασία 4: Ανίχνευση υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων. Στόχος ήταν η δυαδική ταξινόμηση των ειδησεογραφικών άρθρων στις κατηγορίες "προκατειλημμένων" ή "αμερόληπτων". Είχαμε δύο υποβολές λογισμικού: το ένα ένα απλό μοντέλο σακούλας λέξεων και το δεύτερο ένα νευρωνικό δίκτυο το οποίο εκπαιδεύτηκε σε ένα υποσύνολο του αρχικού συνόλου δεδομένων που επιλέχθηκε από ένα σύστημα ψηφοφορίας άλλων LSTMs. Ωστόσο, η μέθοδος αυτή δεν αποδείχθηκε πολύ πιο επιτυχημένη από τη βασική βάση, λόγω της τάσης των μοντέλων να μαθαίνουν συγκεκριμένα χαρακτηριστικά εκδότη αντί για γενική προκατάληψη.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja Kit Kittredge csapatának megközelítését a SemEval-2019 4. feladat: hiperpartizán hírek felismerése. A cél a hírek bináris besorolása volt a "elfogult" vagy "elfogulatlan" kategóriákba. Két szoftver beadványunk volt: az egyik egy egyszerű tasak-of-words modell, a másik pedig egy LSTM (Long Short Term Memory) neurális hálózat, amelyet az eredeti adatkészlet egy részhalmazára készítettünk, amelyet más LSTM szavazórendszer választott ki. Ez a módszer azonban nem bizonyult sokkal sikeresebbnek az alapnál, mivel a modellek hajlamosak az általános elfogultság helyett kiadóspecifikus tulajdonságokat tanulni.', 'it': 'Questo articolo descrive l\'approccio del team Kit Kittredge a SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. L\'obiettivo era la classificazione binaria degli articoli di notizie nelle categorie "parziali" o "imparziali". Abbiamo avuto due presentazioni software: uno un semplice modello bag-of-words, e il secondo una rete neurale LSTM (Long Short Term Memory), che è stata addestrata su un sottoinsieme del dataset originale selezionato da un sistema di voto di altri LSTM. Questo metodo non si è rivelato molto più efficace rispetto al basale, tuttavia, a causa della tendenza dei modelli ad apprendere tratti specifici dell\'editore invece di pregiudizi generali.', 'kk': "Бұл қағаз Kit Kittredge тобының жарым- 2019 жылы 4- тапсырмасына қатынасын таңдайды: Hyperpartisan жаңалықтарды анықтау. Мақсатты жаңалық мақалалардың бинарлық түрлендірімі 'тәуелсіз' немесе 'тәуелсіз' санаттарында. Біздің екі бағдарламаның қарапайым сөздер үлгісі бар, екіншісі басқа LSTM (ұзын қысқа уақыт жады) невралдық желісі. Бұл басқа LSTMs байлау жүйесінің бастапқы деректер қорларының астында оқылған. Бұл әдіс негізгі жолдан артық істемейді, бірақ үлгілер үлгілерін басып шығарушының ерекше қасиеттерін оқыту үшін, жалпы тәжірибелердің орнына, жалпы тәжірибелерд", 'ms': "This paper describes the approach of team Kit Kittredge to SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection.  Tujuan adalah klasifikasi binari artikel berita ke dalam kategori 'biased' atau 'unbiased'. Kami mempunyai dua penghantaran perisian: satu model beg-perkataan sederhana, dan kedua rangkaian saraf LSTM (Memori Jarak Panjang), yang dilatih pada subset set data asal yang dipilih oleh sistem pemilihan LSTM lain. This method did not prove much more successful than the baseline, however, due to the models' tendency to learn publisher-specific traits instead of general bias.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašomas komandos Kittredge metodas, kaip laikytis „SemEval-2019“ 4 užduoties: hiperpartinė naujienų aptikimas. Tikslas buvo dviejų naujienų straipsnių klasifikavimas į „nešališkas“ arba „nešališkas“ kategorijas. Turėjome du programinės įrangos pranešimus: vieną paprastą žodžių maišelio model į, antrą – LSTM (ilgalaikė trumpalaikė atmintis) nervinį tinklą, kuris buvo apmokytas iš pradinio duomenų rinkinio pogrupio, pasirinkto kitų LSTM balsavimo sistemos. Tačiau šis metodas nebuvo daug sėkmingesnis nei pradinis, nes modeliai linkę mokytis leidėjams būdingų savybių, o ne bendro pobūdžio.', 'mk': "This paper describes the approach of team Kit Kittredge to SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection.  The goal was binary classification of news articles into the categories of 'biased' or 'unbiased'.  We had two software submissions: one a simple bag-of-words model, and the second an LSTM (Long Short Term Memory) neural network, which was trained on a subset of the original dataset selected by a voting system of other LSTMs.  Сепак, овој метод не се покажа многу поуспешен од основата, поради тенденцијата на моделите да научат специфични предмети за издавачите наместо општите предмети.", 'mt': "This paper describes the approach of team Kit Kittredge to SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection.  The goal was binary classification of news articles into the categories of 'biased' or 'unbiased'.  Kellna żewġ sottomissjonijiet ta’ softwer: wieħed mudell sempliċi ta’ borża ta’ kliem, u t-tieni netwerk newrali ta’ LSTM (Memorja fuq terminu qasir twil), li ġie mħarreġ fuq sottosett tad-dejta oriġinali magħżul minn sistema tal-vot ta’ LSTMs oħra. Madankollu, dan il-metodu ma weriex ħafna aktar suċċess mil-linja bażi, minħabba t-tendenza tal-mudelli li jitgħallmu karatteristiċi speċifiċi għall-pubblikaturi minflok preġudizzju ġenerali.", 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d കിറ്റ് കിട്ട്രെഡ്ജിന്റെ സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2019 ടാസ്ക് 4: ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസാന്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d ഡിറ്റീഷന്\u200d. ഈ ലക്ഷ്യം വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ ബൈനര്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കേഷനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് രണ്ടു സോഫ്റ്റ്\u200cവെയര്\u200d സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടായിരുന്നു: ഒരു സാധാരണ വാക്കുകളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d, രണ്ടാമതായി ഒരു LSTM (നീളം ചെറുതായ ടെര്\u200dമ്മെമ്മറി) നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d  ഈ രീതിയില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തേക്കാള്\u200d വിജയിച്ചിട്ടില്ല, എന്നാലും പൊതുവായ പ്രസിദ്ധീകരണം പഠിക്കാനുള്ള മോഡലുകളുടെ സാധ്', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver tilnærminga til gruppa Kit Kittredge til semiEval- 2019 Oppgåve 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Målet var binær klassifikasjon av nye artiklar i kategoriane av «biased» eller «unbiased». Vi hadde to programtillegg: ein enkel tekst- modell, og den andre ein LSTM (lange kortmannomsikt) neuralnettverk, som ble trengt på ein undersett av den opprinnelige datasettet valde av eit stemmesystemet av andre LSTMs. Denne metoden viste ikkje mykje meir suksessfulle enn baselinja, men på grunn av modellen til å lære publiseringsspesifikke eigenskapar i staden for generelle forsikt.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас Kit Kittredge багийн SemEval-2019-ийн ажил 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection-ын аргыг тайлбарладаг. Цаг нь мэдээллийн баримтуудын хоёр давхар хуваалцаа байсан. Бидэнд хоёр програм хангамж өгсөн байлаа: нэг нь энгийн цэцэг үг загвар, хоёр дахь нь LSTM (Удаан богино хугацааны санамж) мэдрэлийн сүлжээ, бусад LSTMs-ын сонгогдсон эхний өгөгдлийн сангийн суурь дээр сургалт авсан. Гэхдээ энэ арга нь суурь шугамнаас илүү амжилттай байхгүй. Тиймээс загварын хандлага нь хэвлэгч нарийн тодорхой чанарыг суралцахын оронд ерөнхий өрөөсгөл байдал юм.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie abordarea echipei Kit Kittredge față de SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Scopul a fost clasificarea binară a articolelor de știri în categoriile "părtinitoare" sau "imparțiale". Am avut două propuneri software: unul un model simplu de tip sac-of-words, iar al doilea o rețea neurală LSTM (Long Short Term Memory), care a fost instruită pe un subset al setului de date original selectat de un sistem de vot al altor LSTM. Această metodă nu s-a dovedit mult mai reușită decât cea de bază, totuși, datorită tendinței modelelor de a învăța trăsături specifice editorului în loc de prejudecată generală.', 'si': "මේ පත්තරේ කණ්ඩායම Kit KitTredgගේ ප්\u200dරවේශය සම්වේල- 2019 වැඩ 4: Hyperpartisans වාර්තාව පරීක්ෂණය. අලක්ෂණය 'ප්\u200dරතික්ෂිත' නැත්තම් 'ප්\u200dරතික්ෂිත' නැත්තම් 'ප්\u200dරතික්ෂිත' නැත්තම් වර්ගයක් වලින්  අපිට සොෆ්ටවේර් දෙකක් තියෙනවා: එක සරල බෑග් වචන් මොඩල් එකක්, දෙවෙනි LSTM (ලොකු කොටුර් වාර්තාවක් මතකයි) න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය, ඒක අනිත් LSTMs ගේ විශ්ව ඒත් මේ විධානය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් ඉගෙන ගන්න සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ විශේෂ ව", 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje pristup tima Kit Kittredge na pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Cilj je bio binarna klasifikacija novinskih članaka u kategorije "predrasude" ili "nepristrasne". Imali smo dve podatke softvera: jedan je jednostavan model reči, a drugi je LSTM (dugotrajna memorija) neuralna mreža, koja je obučena na podskupu originalne podatke koje je odabrala glasački sistem drugih LSTMsa. Ova metoda nije dokazala mnogo uspešniji od početne linije, međutim, zbog tendencije modela naučiti specifične osobine izdavača umjesto općeg predrasuda.', 'ta': "இந்த காகிதம் கிட் கிட்ட்ரெட்ஜ் செம்Eval-2019 பணி 4: ஹைப்பர்பார்சன் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பு. இலக்கு செய்தி கட்டுரைகளின் இருமுறை வகைப்படுத்தல் அல்லது 'எதிர்பார்க்கப்படாத' வகுப்பில் உள்ளது. எங்களுக்கு இரண்டு மென்பொருள் கொடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது: ஒரு எளிய பாக்- வார்த்தை மாதிரி, மற்றும் இரண்டாவது ஒரு LSTM (நீண்ட நினைவகம்) புதிய வலைப்பின்னல், இது மற்ற LSTMs வே This method did not prove much more successful than the baseline, however, due to the models' tendency to learn publisher-specific traits instead of general bias.", 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje podejście zespołu Kit Kittredge do SemEval-2019 Zadanie 4: Hyperpartyzan News Detection. Celem była binarna klasyfikacja artykułów wiadomościowych w kategoriach "stronniczy" lub "niestronniczy". Mieliśmy dwa zgłoszenia oprogramowania: jeden prosty model torby słów, a drugi sieć neuronową LSTM (Long Short Term Memory), która została przeszkolona na podzbiorze oryginalnego zbioru danych wybranego przez system głosowania innych LSTMów. Metoda ta nie okazała się jednak znacznie bardziej skuteczna niż bazowa, ze względu na tendencję modeli do uczenia się cech specyficznych dla wydawców zamiast ogólnego uprzedzenia.', 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaa ku qoran qaabka kooxda Kit Kittredge loo sameeyo SemEval-2019 Shaqada 4: Dalbashada Habeenka ee Hyperpartisan. Ujeedku wuxuu ahaa kooxaha warqadaha warqadaha oo labaad ah oo loo kala soocay qaybaha 'biased' ama 'aan beddelmin'. Waxaannu haynay laba isbitaal oo software ah: mid u sahlan qaab fudud oo hadal ah, kan kalena shabakadda neurada ee LSTM (Long Term Term Memory), kaas oo lagu baray koob ka mid ah danbiyada asalka ah oo la doortay nidaamka voting oo kale LSTMs. Midabkan ma uu cadeyn mid ka liibaan sameynta asalka, habase yeeshee qaababka modellada darteed ay u bartaan baabuurta cayiman oo ay ka bedeshaan baayacsiga guud.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver hur team Kit Kittredge förhåller sig till SemEval-2019 Uppgift 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Målet var binär klassificering av nyhetsartiklar i kategorierna "partisk" eller "opartisk". Vi hade två programbidrag: en enkel bag-of-words modell, och den andra ett LSTM (Long Short Term Memory) neuralt nätverk, som tränats på en delmängd av den ursprungliga datauppsättningen vald av ett röstsystem av andra LSTM. Metoden visade sig dock inte vara mycket mer framgångsrik än baslinjen på grund av modellernas tendens att lära sig förlagsspecifika egenskaper istället för allmän bias.', 'ur': "This paper describes the approach of team Kit Kittredge to SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. موقع یہ تھا کہ خبریں لکھوں کی دوئینی کلاسیفوں میں 'غرض' یا 'غرض' کی کلاسیفوں میں۔ ہمارے پاس دو سوفٹر ڈیٹسٹ ڈیٹسٹ کا سادہ سادھا سادھا سادھا سادھا سادھا سادھا سادھا سادھا سادھا سادھا، اور دوسرا ایک LSTM (لانگی کوٹر ٹرمر میمورور) نیورال نیورل نیٹ ورک، جو ایک سادھا ڈیٹسٹ کے سادھ یہ طریقہ بنیادی لین سے بہت زیادہ موفق نہیں تھا، لیکن، نمونڈلوں کی ترتیب کے سبب، عمومی رغبت کے بغیر پردازگار ویژگی کا سیکھنا چاہتے تھے.", 'uz': "Bu sahifa SemEval-2019 Vazifa 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection team Kit Kittredge'ning qismini anglatadi. The goal was binary classification of news articles into the categories of 'biased' or 'unbiased'.  Bizda ikkita dastur imkoniyatlari bor: bir oddiy soʻzlar modeli, birinchi LSTM (Long Term xotirasi) tarmoq, biri boshqa LSTM tizimi tomonidan tanlangan asl maʼlumotlar tarmoqda o'rgandi. Bu usul asosiy satridan ko'proq muvaffaqiyatli topilmadi, ammo modellarning tuzuvchilari uchun umumiy tizimni o'rganish uchun.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả cách thức điều tra của đội Kit Kittredge với nhiệm vụ SemEvl-thẩm 9 4: trinh sát tin tức Hyperdu. Mục tiêu là phân loại nhị phân loại các bài báo trong các loại "thiên vị" hoặc "không bị thao túng". Chúng tôi có hai phần mềm: một phần mềm đơn giản, và một phần mạng thần kinh của LSTM (Ký Ức Dài Hạn) đã được đào tạo trên một nhóm dữ liệu gốc được chọn bởi một hệ thống bỏ phiếu của các tập tin khác. Tuy nhiên, nhờ có xu hướng học về đặc điểm của người mẫu thay vì thiên vị chung, nó không thành công nhiều hơn so với cơ sở cơ bản.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва подхода на екипа Кит Китридж към задача 4: Хиперпартизано откриване на новини. Целта беше двоична класификация на новинарските статии в категориите "предубедени" или "безпристрастни". Имахме две софтуерни предложения: едната е модел с прости думи и втората е невронна мрежа, която е обучена върху поднабор от оригинални данни, избрана от система за гласуване на други ЛТМ. Този метод обаче не се оказа много по-успешен от базовата база, поради тенденцията на моделите да научат специфични за издателите черти вместо общо пристрастие.', 'nl': "Dit artikel beschrijft de aanpak van team Kit Kittredge naar SemEval-2019 Taak 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Het doel was binaire classificatie van nieuwsberichten in de categorieën 'bevooroordeeld' of 'onbevooroordeeld'. We hadden twee software inzendingen: één een eenvoudig zak-met-woorden model, en de tweede een LSTM (Long Short Term Memory) neuraal netwerk, dat werd getraind op een subset van de oorspronkelijke dataset geselecteerd door een stemsysteem van andere LSTMs. Deze methode bleek echter niet veel succesvoller dan de baseline, vanwege de tendens van de modellen om uitgeverspecifieke eigenschappen te leren in plaats van algemene vooroordelen.", 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt den Ansatz des Teams Kit Kittredge zu SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Ziel war die binäre Klassifizierung von Nachrichtenartikeln in die Kategorien "voreingenommen" oder "unvoreingenommen". Wir hatten zwei Software-Einreichungen: eines ein einfaches Wortbeutel-Modell und das zweite ein LSTM (Long Short Term Memory)-neuronales Netzwerk, das auf einer Teilmenge des ursprünglichen Datensatzes trainiert wurde, der von einem Abstimmungssystem anderer LSTMs ausgewählt wurde. Diese Methode erwies sich jedoch nicht viel erfolgreicher als die Baseline, da die Modelle tendenziell publisherspezifische Merkmale anstelle allgemeiner Bias erlernen.', 'ko': "본고는 Kit Kittredge팀이Sem Eval-19 임무4: 초당파 뉴스 검측에 대한 방법을 묘사한다.뉴스 기사를'편견이 있다'또는'편견이 없다'두 종류로 나누는 것이 목표다.우리는 두 가지 소프트웨어를 제출했다. 하나는 간단한 단어봉투 모델이고, 다른 하나는 LSTM(장-단기기억) 신경 네트워크이다. 이것은 다른 LSTM의 투표 시스템이 선택한 원시 데이터 집합의 서브집합에서 훈련된 것이다.그러나 모델은 일반적인 편견이 아니라 출판사 특유의 특징을 배우는 경향이 있기 때문에 이런 방법은 기선보다 더 성공적이라는 것이 증명되지 않았다.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ دستور تیم Kit Kittredge را به دستور نیمه سال ۲۰۱۹ توصیف می\u200cکند: شناسایی اخبار Hyperpartisan. هدف قسمت دویینی از مقاله\u200cهای خبری در قسمت\u200cهای « متفاوت » یا « متفاوت » بود. ما دو تنظیم نرم\u200cافزار داشتیم: یکی یک مدل کلمه ساده بود، و دوم یک شبکه عصبی LSTM (حافظه کوتاه زمان طولانی) که در یک زیر مجموعه داده\u200cهای اصلی توسط سیستم رای دیگر LSTMs انتخاب شده بود. ولی این روش بیشتر از خط پایین موفقیت را ثابت نکرد، به دلیل نقش مدلها برای یاد گرفتن ویژه های مخصوص منتشر کننده به جای توجه عمومی.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver holdets tilgang til SemEval-2019 Opgave 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Målet var binær klassificering af nyhedsartikler i kategorierne "partisk" eller "upartisk". Vi havde to softwareindsendelser: den ene en simpel pose-of-words model, og den anden et LSTM (Long Short Term Memory) neuralt netværk, som blev trænet på en delmængde af det oprindelige datasæt udvalgt af et stemmesystem af andre LSTM\'er. Denne metode viste sig imidlertid ikke at være meget mere vellykket end baseline på grund af modellernes tendens til at lære udgiverspecifikke træk i stedet for generel bias.', 'sw': "Gazeti hili linaelezea mbinu ya timu ya Kit Kittredge kwa SemEval-2019 Kazi 4: Utafiti wa Habari za Kiperpartisan. Lengo lilikuwa kutangazwa kwa makala binafsi za habari katika makundi ya 'upinzani' au 'kutokupendelea'. Tulikuwa na ujumbe wa programu mbili: moja ya mifano rahisi ya maneno, na pili ya mtandao wa neura wa LSTM (Kumbukumbu ya muda mrefu wa muda mrefu), ambayo ilifundishwa katika mfululizo wa taarifa za asili zilizochaguliwa na mfumo wa upigaji kura wa mwingine wa LSTM. Hata hivyo, kwa sababu ya tabia ya mifano ya kujifunza tabia maalum badala ya upendeleo wa jumla.", 'tr': "Bu kagyz Kit Kittredge toparyň ýarymyny SemEval-2019 Taýgyna 4: Hyperpartisan Haýsy Taýýarlamak Mazmunlar 'biased' ýa 'biased' kategoriýasynda täzelikler sanlarynyň ikinji sanlary boldy. Bizde iki softwaryň gaýd edilmesi bar: biri basit bir bag üçin sözler modeli we ikinjisi bir LSTM (Uzun Gaýd Taýdan Memory) neural syýasy bar. Bu ýerde başga LSTMsiň saýlaw sistemi tarafından seçildi ilkinji datawatlaryň subsütesinde eğlenýärdi. Bu yöntem basit çyzygyndan has hem üstünlikli kanıtlanmady, ýöne nusgalaryň üýtgetmeginiň örän nusgalary üýtgetmek üçin nusgalaryň özelliklerini umumy bias yerine öwrenmek üçin.", 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die toegang van team Kit Kittredge na SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 4: Hyperpartisan Nuusbeskrywing. Die doel was binêre klasifikasie van nuus artikels in die kategorie van 'biased' of 'unbiased'. Ons het twee sagteware onderskrywings gehad: een 'n eenvoudige sak van woorde model, en die tweede 'n LSTM (Lang Kort Term Geheue) neuralnetwerk, wat op 'n subartikel van die oorspronklike datastel gekies is deur 'n stemstelsel van ander LSTMs. Hierdie metode het nie baie meer suksesvol bevestig as die basislien, maar vanweë die modele se tendensie om publiseer-spesifieke eienskappe te leer in plaas van algemene bias.", 'id': "Kertas ini menjelaskan pendekatan tim Kit Kittredge ke SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Deteksi Berita Hyperpartisan. The goal was binary classification of news articles into the categories of 'biased' or 'unbiased'.  Kami memiliki dua pengiriman perangkat lunak: satu model tas-kata sederhana, dan kedua jaringan saraf LSTM (Long Term Memory), yang dilatih pada subset dataset asli yang dipilih oleh sistem pemilihan LSTM lainnya. Metode ini tidak membuktikan jauh lebih sukses dari dasar dasar, bagaimanapun, karena cenderung model untuk belajar ciri-ciri spesifik penerbit selain bias umum.", 'am': "ይህ ገጽ የኬት Kittredge የሴmEval-2019 ስራ 4: Hyperpartisan ዜና መግለጫ ይዘረዝራል፡፡ ጉዳዩ የዜና ጽሑፎች በ'ብሔራዊ' ወይም 'ያልተቃወመ' ክፍሎች የሁለተኛ ክፍል ነው፡፡ ሁለትም የሶፍትዌር ዝርዝሮች ነበሩብን፤ አንዱ ቀላል የቃላት ዓይነት ሞዴል፥ ሁለተኛውም የLSTM (ረጅም የረጅም ጊዜ ማስታወሻ) የኔራዊ መረብ ነው፡፡ ይህ ሥርዓት በጥቅምት ላይ ከመስመር ይልቅ እጅግ ያማረ አልነበረም፤ ነገር ግን በሙሉ ብሔራዊ ብሔራዊ ጥያቄን ለመማር የሞዴል ድጋፍ ነው፡፡", 'sq': "Ky dokument përshkruan qasjen e ekipit Kittredge në SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. The goal was binary classification of news articles into the categories of 'biased' or 'unbiased'.  We had two software submissions: one a simple bag-of-words model, and the second an LSTM (Long Short Term Memory) neural network, which was trained on a subset of the original dataset selected by a voting system of other LSTMs.  Kjo metodë nuk u tregua shumë më e suksesshme se baza, megjithatë, për shkak të prirjes së modeleve për të mësuar karakteristika specifike botuesve në vend të paragjykimit të përgjithshëm.", 'az': "Bu kağıt Kit Kittredge tayfasının yaxınlığını semiEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan Haqq Detection tərzini təsdiqləyir. Məqsəd 'biased' ya da 'biased' kategoriyalarına xəbər maddələrinin ikili klasifikasyonu idi. Bizim iki yazılım təklif etdik: birinin basit çərgə-söz modeli, ikincisi də LSTM (Uzun Qısqa-Term Memory) nöral şəklində, başqa LSTMs sistemindən seçilmiş orijinal veri setinin subgrupında təhsil edildi. Lakin bu metod, modellərin təsiri təsirlərini öyrənmək üçün təsirlərindən çox başarılı göstərilmədi.", 'bn': "This paper describes the approach of team Kit Kittredge to SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection.  লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে সংবাদ প্রবন্ধের বাইনারি শ্রেণীবিভাগ 'বিদ্বেষ' অথবা 'অবিদ্বেষী' বিভাগের মধ্যে। আমাদের দুটি সফটওয়্যার প্রদান করা হয়েছে: একটি সাধারণ ব্যাগ-অফ-ওয়ার্ড মডেল এবং দ্বিতীয় একটি LSTM (লম্বা সংক্ষিপ্ত টার্ম ম মেমোরি) নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক, যা অন্যান্য LST এই পদ্ধতি বেস্ট লাইনের চেয়ে বেশি সফল হয়নি, তবে সাধারণ বিষয়ের বদলে প্রকাশক-নির্দিষ্ট ব্যাপার শিক্ষা প্রকাশ করার কারণে মডেলের স্ব", 'ca': 'This paper describes the approach of team Kit Kittredge to SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection.  L\'objectiu era la classificació binaria dels articles de notícies en les categories de "biased" o "unbiased". Vam tenir dues presentacions de software: un model simple de borsa de paraules, i el segon una xarxa neuronal LSTM (Long Short Term Memory), que va ser entrenada en un subconjunt del conjunt de dades originals seleccionat per un sistema de votació d\'altres LSTM. No obstant això, aquest mètode no va resultar molt més èxit que la base, degut a la tendència dels models d\'aprendre trets específics per a l\'editor en comptes de bias general.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje pristup tima Kit Kittredge na pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Cilj je bio binarna klasifikacija novinskih članaka u kategorije "predrasude" ili "nepristrasne". Imali smo dvije podatke softvera: jedan je jednostavan model reči, a drugi je LSTM (dugoročna uspomena) neuralna mreža, koja je obučena na podskupu originalnog seta podataka odabrana glasačkim sistemom drugih LSTMsa. Ova metoda nije dokazala mnogo uspješniji od početne linije, međutim, zbog tendencije modela naučiti specifične osobine izdavača umjesto općeg predrasuda.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje přístup týmu Kit Kittredge k SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartizánní detekce zpráv. Cílem bylo binární klasifikace zpravodajských článků do kategorií "zaujatých" nebo "nezaujatých". Měli jsme dva softwarové příspěvky: jednoduchý model sáčku slov a druhý neuronovou síť LSTM (Long Short Term Memory), která byla trénována na podmnožině původních dat vybraných hlasovacím systémem jiných LSTMů. Tato metoda se však neprokázala mnohem úspěšnější než základní základní metoda, protože modely místo obecné zaujatosti učí specifické vlastnosti vydavatelů.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse Kit Kittredge meeskonna lähenemist SemEval-2019 ülesandele 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Eesmärk oli uudisartiklite binaarne klassifitseerimine kategooriatesse "erapooletud" või "erapooletud". Meil oli kaks tarkvara esitamist: üks lihtne sõnakott-of-word mudel ja teine LSTM (Long Short Term Memory) närvivõrk, mida koolitati algse andmekogumi alamhulgal, mis valiti teiste LSTMde hääletussüsteemi poolt. See meetod ei osutunud aga algtasemest palju edukamaks, kuna mudelid kalduvad õppima kirjastajaspetsiifilisi tunnuseid üldise eelarvamuse asemel.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan Kit Kittredgen lähestymistapaa SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection -tiimiin. Tavoitteena oli uutisartikkelien binäärinen luokittelu kategorioihin "puolueellinen" tai "puolueeton". Meillä oli kaksi ohjelmistoa: yksi yksinkertainen sanapussimalli ja toinen LSTM (Long Short Term Memory) -neuroverkko, joka koulutettiin alkuperäisen aineiston osajoukkoon, jonka valitsi muiden LSTMien äänestysjärjestelmä. Menetelmä ei kuitenkaan osoittautunut paljon menestyksekkäämmäksi kuin perusmalli, koska mallien taipumus oppia julkaisijakohtaisia ominaisuuksia yleisen puolueen sijaan.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է խմբի "Կիթտրեդջի" մոտեցումը "ՍեմԵվալ 2019"-ի 4. հանձնարարությանը\' Հիպերպարտիզան նորությունների հայտնաբերումը: Նրա նպատակը նորությունների երկու հոդվածների դասակարգումն էր «կողմնակի» կամ «անկողմնակի» խմբերի մեջ: Մենք ունեինք երկու ծրագրային հաղորդակցություն. մեկը պարզ բառերի մոդել, երկրորդը՝ LSMT (երկար կարճ ժամանակի հիշողություն) նյարդային ցանց, որը պատրաստվել է այլ LSMT-ների քվեարկելու համակարգի ընտրված սկզբնական տվյալների ենթախումբի վրա: This method did not prove much more successful than the baseline, however, due to the models\' tendency to learn publisher-specific traits instead of general bias.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje pristup tima Kit Kittredge na pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Cilj je bio binarna klasifikacija novinskih članaka u kategorije "predrasude" ili "nepristrasne". Imali smo dvije podatke softvera: jedan je jednostavan model riječi, a drugi je LSTM (dugotrajna uspomena) neuralna mreža, koja je obučena na podskupu originalne podatke koje je izabrala glasački sustav drugih LSTMsa. Ova metoda nije dokazala mnogo uspješniji od početne linije, međutim, zbog tendencije modela naučiti specifične osobine izdavača umjesto općeg pristrasnosti.', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah iki rambaran kelas kang sampeyan Kit Kittridget Samsul-2011 task 4: Hyerpartisan New detection. goal Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing durung-sistem: sampeyan sistem sing ngawe barang-sistem, lan sekondi sing uwis kiban sekond (mempernik sistem Latar Perintah Ketokan) Metu iki ora bisa ngomongke akeh sing luwih apik liyane karo perusahaan anyar, dadi sing nik nggawe model kuwi tindakan kanggo ngerasakno perusahaan-perusahaan kanggo ngerasakno', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje pristop ekipe Kit Kittredge k nalogi SemEval-2019 4: Hyperpartizansko detekcijo novic. Cilj je bila binarna klasifikacija novinarskih člankov v kategorije "pristranski" ali "nepristranski". Predložili smo dve programski opremi: ena je preprost model z vrečko besed in druga nevronsko omrežje LSTM (Long Short Term Memory), ki je bila usposobljena na podmnožici izvirnega nabora podatkov, ki ga je izbral glasovalni sistem drugih LSTMs. Ta metoda pa se ni izkazala za veliko uspešnejša od osnovne vrednosti, vendar zaradi nagnjenosti modelov k učenju lastnosti, specifičnih za založnike, namesto splošne pristranskosti.', 'ha': "Wannan karatun na describe the way of team Kit Kittredge to SemEV-2019 Tafiyar 4: Hyperpartsan News Ferration. Gagon ya kasance raba-biyu mai rarraba makala na lãbãri cikin sunan 'bi'a' ko 'bane'. Mun samu da shaidar ayuka biyu: ɗayan misali mai sauƙi na-faɗi, kuma guda na jerin LSSM (Narrajin Ƙarafu Naurar Aiki), wanda aka sanar da shi a ƙarƙashin danne na farko da aka zãɓe shi na wani na'urar voice na daban LTRM. Wannan shiryarwa ba ta gaskata mafi mafanici ba daga layin basuɓa, kuma amma, wa'anar kwamfyutan misãlai za'a karanta shigo-bayani masu buɗe-buƙata, musamman tebur-bayani.", 'bo': "ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ekipa Kit Kittredge དེ་ལ་SemEval-2019 ལས་ཀ་གནད་སྡུད་འདོར་བཞིན་ཡོད། Hyperpartisan News Detection དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་བརྡ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་གི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་གཉིས་པ་་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནི་ 'biased'ཡང་ན་ 'unbiased'་གི་དབྱེ་རིམ། We had two software submissions: one a simple bag-of-words model, and the second an LSTM (Long Short Term Memory) neural network, which was trained on a subset of the original dataset selected by a voting system of other LSTMs. འོན་ཀྱང་། ཐབས་ལམ་འདིས་གཞི་རྩལ་ལས་ལྡན་བ་ལས་གྲངས་འབོར་མི་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། མིན་དཔེ་གཞི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་བསྒྲགས་བྱེད་པའི་རྒྱུ་དང", 'he': "העיתון הזה מתאר את הגישה של הקבוצה Kit Kittredge ל SemEval-2019 משימה 4: גילוי חדשות היפרפרטיזן. The goal was binary classification of news articles into the categories of 'biased' or 'unbiased'.  We had two software submissions: one a simple bag-of-words model, and the second an LSTM (Long Short Term Memory) neural network, which was trained on a subset of the original dataset selected by a voting system of other LSTMs.  This method did not prove much more successful than the baseline, however, due to the models' tendency to learn publisher-specific traits instead of general bias."}
{'en': 'Team Peter Brinkmann at SemEval-2019 Task 4 : Detecting Biased News Articles Using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'ar': 'فريق بيتر برينكمان في SemEval-2019 المهمة 4: الكشف عن المقالات الإخبارية المتحيزة باستخدام الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية', 'fr': "L'équipe Peter Brinkmann à SEMEVAL-2019 Task 4\xa0: Détecter les articles de presse biaisés à l'aide de réseaux de neurones convoluti", 'es': 'El equipo Peter Brinkmann en la Tarea 4 de SemEval-2019: Detección de artículos de noticias sesgados mediante redes neuronales convolucionales', 'pt': 'Equipe Peter Brinkmann no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 4: Detectando artigos de notícias tendenciosos usando redes neurais convolucionais', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のチームPeter Brinkmannタスク4 ：畳み込みニューラルネットワークを使用した偏ったニュース記事の検出', 'ru': 'Команда Питера Бринкмана на SemEval-2019 Задача 4: Обнаружение предвзятых новостных статей с использованием сверточных нейронных сетей', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 4 पर टीम पीटर ब्रिंकमैन: Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग कर पक्षपाती समाचार लेख का पता लगाना', 'zh': '团队 Peter Brinkmann 在 SemEval-2019 务 4:用卷积神经网络检新闻文', 'ga': 'Foireann Peter Brinkmann ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 4: Ailt Nuachta Claonta a Bhrath Ag Úsáid Líonraí Néaracha Comhdhlúite', 'ka': 'კომპერი ბრინკმანი SemEval-2019 საქმე 4: დაახლოების გასაგების აღმოჩენა კონტუალური ნეირალური ქსელების გამოყენება', 'hu': 'Peter Brinkmann csapat a SemEval-2019 4. feladatában: Eltévesztett hírek felismerése konvolúciós neurális hálózatokkal', 'el': 'Ομάδα Πίτερ Μπρίνκμαν στο έργο 4: Ανίχνευση προκατειλημμένων άρθρων ειδήσεων χρησιμοποιώντας τα εξελικτικά Νευρικά Δίκτυα', 'it': 'Team Peter Brinkmann al SemEval-2019 Task 4: Individuare articoli di notizie distorti utilizzando reti neurali convoluzionali', 'lt': 'Peter Brinkmann komanda 2010–2019 m. pusėje 4 užduotis: nustatyti netinkamus naujienų straipsnius naudojant konvoliucinius nervinius tinklus', 'mk': 'Тим Питер Бринкман на SemEval-2019 задача 4: Детектирање навредени вести со користење на конволуционалните неурални мрежи', 'kk': 'Питер Бринкман тобы жарым- 2019 тапсырманың 4- тапсырмасында: Қосымша невралдық желілерді қолданып, жаңалық мақалаларды анықтау', 'ms': 'Pasukan Peter Brinkmann di SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Mengesan Artikel Berita Biased menggunakan Rangkaian Neural Convolutional', 'mt': 'Tim Peter Brinkmann f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 4: Detezzjoni ta’ Artikoli ta’ Aħbarijiet Biżżati bl-Użu ta’ Netwerks Newrali Konveoluzzjonali', 'ml': 'ടീം പീറ്റര്\u200d ബ്രിങ്ക്മാന്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 4: കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റുവര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ബൈസ് സ', 'mn': 'Питер Бринкманын баг SemEval-2019 Тапсын 4: Хүмүүсийн мэдээллийн баримтуудыг олох', 'pl': 'Zespół Peter Brinkmann z SemEval-2019 Zadanie 4: Wykrywanie postrzeganych artykułów wiadomościowych za pomocą konwolucyjnych sieci neuronowych', 'no': 'Gruppen Peter Brinkmann på halvEval-2019 oppgåve 4: Finn forstørre nyhetsinnstillingar ved bruk av konvolusjonelle neiralnettverk', 'sr': 'Tim Peter Brinkmann na zadatku 4. polevala 2019: Otkrivanje članaka za veće vijesti korištenje konvolucionalnih nervnih mreža', 'ro': 'Echipa Peter Brinkmann la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 4: Detectarea articolelor de știri distorsionate folosind rețelele neuronale convoluționale', 'si': 'පීටර් බ්\u200dරින්ක්මන්න් කණ්ඩායම් සම්වේල්-2019 වැඩක් 4: සාමාන්\u200dය නිර්මාණික ජාලවාර්ක්ස් භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝ', 'sv': 'Team Peter Brinkmann på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 4: Att upptäcka snedvridna nyhetsartiklar med hjälp av konvulutionella neurala nätverk', 'so': 'Team Peter Brinkmann at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Detecting Biased News Articles using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'ta': 'Team Peter Brinkmann at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Detecting Biased News Articles Using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'ur': 'ٹیم پیٹر برینک منن کے سام ایول-2019 ٹاکس ۴ میں: کانڈیونل نیورل نیٹورک کے استعمال سے بیزار نویس لکھے ہوئے معلومات کا تلاش کرنا', 'uz': 'SemEval-2019 Vazifa 4: Tashqi yoyilgan yangiliklar maqolalarini aniqlash', 'vi': 'Đội Peter Brinkman ở Semkhai-thẩm 9 Task 4: Việc điều tra tin tức bị vạch trắng thông qua mạng thần kinh có liên hệ', 'bg': 'Екип Питър Бринкман на Задача 4: Откриване на предубедени новинарски статии чрез конвелуционни неврални мрежи', 'hr': 'Tim Peter Brinkmann na zadatku 4. poluvremenog razdoblja 2019: Otkrivanje članaka za razvijene vijesti Koristeći konvolucionalne neurone mreže', 'da': 'Team Peter Brinkmann ved SemEval-2019 Opgave 4: Opdagelse af dårlige nyhedsartikler ved hjælp af konvulutionelle neurale netværk', 'de': 'Team Peter Brinkmann auf der SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 4: Vorurteile mit Hilfe von Convolutional Neuronal Networks erkennen', 'id': 'Tim Peter Brinkmann di SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Detektif Artikel Berita Biased Menggunakan Rangkaian Neural Konvelusional', 'nl': 'Team Peter Brinkmann bij SemEval-2019 Taak 4: Vooringenomen nieuwsberichten detecteren met behulp van convolutionele neurale netwerken', 'sw': 'Timu Peter Brinkmann wa SemEval-2019 Kazi 4: Kuchunguza Makala ya Habari zilizotolewa kwa kutumia mitandao ya kijamii ya kujitolea', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019 퀘스트 4: 권적신경 네트워크를 이용하여 편견이 있는 뉴스 기사를 검출한다', 'fa': 'تیم پیتر برینک\u200cمانن در ماموریت ۲۰۱۹ کار ۴: شناسایی مجموعه\u200cهای خبرهای بیشتر از استفاده از شبکه\u200cهای عصبی معمولی', 'tr': 'Team Peter Brinkmann at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Detecting Biased News Articles Using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'am': 'የቲም ጴጥሮስ Brinkmann በSemEval-2019 ስራ 4: የነፃ ዜና አርክስቶች በመጠቀም ላይ Convolution Neural Network', 'hy': 'Փիթեր Բրինքմանը 2019 թվականի "Սեմեվալ"-ի 4-րդ հանձնարարությունում. բացահայտել կեղծ նորությունների հոդվածներ՝ օգտագործելով հակառավարական նյարդային ցանցեր', 'sq': 'Ekipi Peter Brinkmann në SemEval-2019 Detyra 4: Detektimi i artikujve të lajmeve të këqija duke përdorur rrjetet nervore konvolutive', 'af': 'Skep Peter Brinkmann by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 4: Opdekking van vergroot Nuus Artikels wat gebruik Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerke', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Task 4: Böyük Haber Malümatlarını İşləyir', 'ca': "L'equip Peter Brinkmann a SemEval-2019 Task 4: Detecting Biased News Articles Using Convolutional Neural Networks", 'bn': 'পিটার ব্রিঙ্ক্মান সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৪: বাইজেড নিউজ আর্টিকেল ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে', 'cs': 'Tým Peter Brinkmann na SemEval-2019 Úkol 4: Detekce zaujatých zpravodajských článků pomocí konvelučních neuronových sítí', 'bs': 'Tim Peter Brinkmann na zadatku 4. poluvremenog izvješća: otkrivanje članaka za veće vijesti korišćenja konvolucionalnih neuronskih mreža', 'et': 'Meeskond Peter Brinkmann SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 4: Eelarvamuste avastamine konvolutsiooniliste neurovõrkude abil', 'fi': 'Tiimi Peter Brinkmann SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 4: Biased News Articles using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'jv': 'Grup Pedro Brengmann at seminval-2011 task 4: detecting Biasad New Artises Using convolution Neral networks', 'ha': 'Team Peter brinkman at SemEal-2019 Tax 4: Finding Bised News artics Using Conenvonal Neural Networks', 'sk': 'Ekipa Peter Brinkmann na SemEval-2019 Naloga 4: Odkrivanje pristranskih novic s konvolucijskimi nevronskimi omrežji', 'bo': 'Team Peter Brinkmann at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Detecting Biased News Articles Using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'he': 'צוות פיטר ברינקמן בסמיוול-2019 משימה 4: גילוי חומרי חדשות מעורבים'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present an approach for classifying news articles as biased (i.e., hyperpartisan) or unbiased, based on a convolutional neural network. We experiment with various embedding methods (pretrained and trained on the training dataset) and variations of the convolutional neural network architecture and compare the results. When evaluating our best performing approach on the actual test data set of the SemEval 2019 Task 4, we obtained relatively low precision and accuracy values, while gaining the highest recall rate among all 42 participating teams.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons une approche pour classer les articles de presse comme biaisés (c'est-à-dire hyperpartisans) ou non biaisés, sur la base d'un réseau neuronal convolutif. Nous expérimentons diverses méthodes d'intégration (préentraînées et entraînées sur le jeu de données d'entraînement) et des variations de l'architecture du réseau neuronal convolutif et comparons les résultats. Lors de l'évaluation de notre approche la plus performante sur l'ensemble de données de test réel de la tâche 4 du SemEval 2019, nous avons obtenu des valeurs de précision et de précision relativement faibles, tout en obtenant le taux de rappel le plus élevé parmi les 42 équipes participantes.", 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم نهجًا لتصنيف المقالات الإخبارية على أنها متحيزة (أي شديدة الحزبية) أو غير متحيزة ، بناءً على شبكة عصبية تلافيفية. نجرب طرق التضمين المختلفة (التي تم تدريبها مسبقًا وتدريبها على مجموعة بيانات التدريب) والاختلافات في بنية الشبكة العصبية التلافيفية ومقارنة النتائج. عند تقييم نهجنا الأفضل أداءً على مجموعة بيانات الاختبار الفعلية لمهمة SemEval 2019 4 ، حصلنا على قيم دقة ودقة منخفضة نسبيًا ، مع الحصول على أعلى معدل استدعاء بين جميع الفرق المشاركة البالغ عددها 42 فريقًا.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos un enfoque para clasificar los artículos de noticias como sesgados (es decir, hiperpartidistas) o imparciales, basado en una red neuronal convolucional. Experimentamos con varios métodos de incrustación (preentrenados y entrenados en el conjunto de datos de entrenamiento) y variaciones de la arquitectura de la red neuronal convolucional y comparamos los resultados. Al evaluar nuestro enfoque de mejor rendimiento en el conjunto de datos de prueba real de la Tarea 4 de SemEval 2019, obtuvimos valores de precisión y precisión relativamente bajos, al tiempo que obtuvimos la tasa de retirada más alta entre los 42 equipos participantes.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos uma abordagem para classificar artigos de notícias como tendenciosos (ou seja, hiperpartidários) ou imparciais, com base em uma rede neural convolucional. Experimentamos vários métodos de incorporação (pré-treinados e treinados no conjunto de dados de treinamento) e variações da arquitetura de rede neural convolucional e comparamos os resultados. Ao avaliar nossa abordagem de melhor desempenho no conjunto de dados de teste real da Tarefa 4 do SemEval 2019, obtivemos valores de precisão e exatidão relativamente baixos, enquanto obtivemos a maior taxa de recall entre todas as 42 equipes participantes.', 'ja': '本稿では、畳み込みニューラルネットワークに基づいて、ニュース記事を偏った（すなわち、超党派的な）または偏りのないものに分類するアプローチを提示する。畳み込みニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャの様々な埋め込み方法（トレーニングデータセットについて事前にトレーニングされ、トレーニングされた）とバリエーションを実験し、結果を比較します。SemEval 2019タスク4の実際の試験データセットに関する当社の最高のパフォーマンスアプローチを評価する際には、42の参加チームの中で最高のリコール率を獲得しながら、比較的低い精度と精度の値を取得しました。', 'zh': '本文之中,立一基于卷积神经网络新闻文章分类为偏见(即超党)无偏见之法。 尝试诸嵌法(于训练数据集上预练)卷积神经网络架构之变体,较之。 于SemEval 2019 Task 4之实测试数据集上估吾最佳之法,得对下之精准确度,而于诸42参赛团队中得最高之率。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम समाचार लेखों को पक्षपातपूर्ण (यानी, हाइपरपार्टिसन) या निष्पक्ष के रूप में वर्गीकृत करने के लिए एक दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जो एक कनवल्शनल तंत्रिका नेटवर्क पर आधारित है। हम विभिन्न एम्बेडिंग विधियों (प्रशिक्षण डेटासेट पर पूर्वप्रशिक्षित और प्रशिक्षित) और कनवल्शनल तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर की विविधताओं के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं और परिणामों की तुलना करते हैं। SemEval 2019 टास्क 4 के वास्तविक परीक्षण डेटा सेट पर हमारे सर्वोत्तम प्रदर्शन दृष्टिकोण का मूल्यांकन करते समय, हमने सभी 42 भाग लेने वाली टीमों के बीच उच्चतम याद दर प्राप्त करते हुए अपेक्षाकृत कम परिशुद्धता और सटीकता मूल्य प्राप्त किए।', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы представляем подход к классификации новостных статей как предвзятых (т.е. гиперпартизанских) или непредвзятых, основанных на сверточной нейронной сети. Мы экспериментируем с различными методами встраивания (предварительно обученными и обученными на обучающем наборе данных) и вариациями сверточной архитектуры нейронной сети и сравниваем результаты. Оценивая наш наилучший подход к фактическому набору тестовых данных задачи 4 SemEval 2019, мы получили относительно низкие значения точности и прецизионности, при этом получив наивысший показатель отзыва среди всех 42 команд-участниц.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid cur chuige i láthair maidir le hailt nuachta a rangú mar ailt claonta (i.e. hyperpartisan) nó neamhchlaonta, bunaithe ar ghréasán néarúil comhbheartaithe. Déanaimid turgnamh le modhanna leabaithe éagsúla (réamhoilte agus oilte ar an tacar sonraí oiliúna) agus le héagsúlachtaí ar ailtireacht líonra conbhlóideach néarchóras agus déanaimid comparáid idir na torthaí. Agus ár gcur chuige feidhmíochta is fearr á measúnú againn ar thacar sonraí tástála iarbhír Thasc 4 SemEval 2019, fuaireamar luachanna beachtas agus cruinnis measartha íseal, agus bhaineamar an ráta aisghairme is airde amach i measc na 42 fhoireann rannpháirteacha ar fad.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk egy olyan megközelítést, amellyel a híreket elfogultnak (azaz hiperpartizánnak) vagy elfogulatlannak minősíthetjük, konvolúciós neurális hálózat alapján. Kísérletezünk különböző beágyazási módszerekkel (az edzési adatokra előkészített és képzett) és a konvuluációs neurális hálózat architektúrájának variációival, és összehasonlítjuk az eredményeket. A SemEval 2019 Task 4 aktuális tesztadatkészletén a legjobb teljesítményű megközelítésünk értékelésekor viszonylag alacsony pontossági és pontossági értékeket értünk el, miközben a legmagasabb visszahívási arányt értük el mind a 42 résztvevő csapat közül.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση για την ταξινόμηση των ειδησεογραφικών άρθρων ως προκατειλημμένα (δηλαδή υπερκομματικά) ή αμερόληπτα, βασισμένα σε ένα σύνθετο νευρωνικό δίκτυο. Πειραματιζόμαστε με διάφορες μεθόδους ενσωμάτωσης (προετοιμασμένες και εκπαιδευμένες στο σύνολο δεδομένων εκπαίδευσης) και παραλλαγές της αρχιτεκτονικής του νευρικού δικτύου και συγκρίνουμε τα αποτελέσματα. Κατά την αξιολόγηση της καλύτερης απόδοσης προσέγγισής μας στο πραγματικό σύνολο δεδομένων δοκιμής της εργασίας 4, λάβαμε σχετικά χαμηλές τιμές ακρίβειας και ακρίβειας, ενώ κερδίσαμε το υψηλότερο ποσοστό ανάκλησης μεταξύ όλων των 42 συμμετεχόντων ομάδων.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ახალგაზრულების კლასიფიკაციის მიღება, როგორც წარმოდგენა (ჰიპერპორტიზანი) ან არ წარმოდგენა, კონტუალური ნეიროლური ქსელის ბაზაზე. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტირებით განსხვავებული მონაცემებით (მონაცემებით და განსწავლებით მონაცემებით მონაცემებით) და კონგულურონალური ნეიროლური ქსელის აქტიქტიქ როცა ჩვენი უკეთესი გავაკეთებული მონაცემების რეალური ტესტის მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში 2019 წლის 4. დავაკეთებთ, ჩვენ მივიღეთ relatively low precision and accuracy values, როცა ყველა 42 მონაცემებული კონფიგურაციის უფ', 'it': "In questo articolo, presentiamo un approccio per classificare gli articoli di notizie come parziali (cioè iperpartigiani) o imparziali, basati su una rete neurale convoluzionale. Sperimentiamo vari metodi di embedding (pre-addestrati e addestrati sul set di dati di allenamento) e variazioni dell'architettura della rete neurale convoluzionale e confrontiamo i risultati. Nel valutare il nostro approccio con le migliori prestazioni sul set di dati di test effettivi del Task 4 SemEval 2019, abbiamo ottenuto valori di precisione e precisione relativamente bassi, ottenendo al contempo il più alto tasso di richiamo tra tutti i 42 team partecipanti.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, жаңалық мақалаларды қалыптастыру (т. е. гиперпартизан) немесе қалыптастырылмаған невралдық желіне негізделген жағдай көрсетеді. Біз әртүрлі ендіру әдістерімен (оқыту деректер жиынына ауыстырылған және оқыту жасалған) және конволюционалдық невралдық желінің архитектурасының түрлендіріміз және нәтижелері Жалпы 2019 жылдың 4- тапсырмасының Шындығындағы тесті деректер жиынында ең дұрыс және дұрыс мәндерімізді бағалағанда, 42 қатысушылардың ең жоғары еске салу жиынын алдық.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome metodą, pagal kurį naujienų straipsniai klasifikuojami kaip šališki (t. y. hiperpartiški) arba nešališki, pagrįsti konvoliuciniu nervų tinklu. We experiment with various embedding methods (pretrained and trained on the training dataset) and variations of the convolutional neural network architecture and compare the results.  When evaluating our best performing approach on the actual test data set of the SemEval 2019 Task 4, we obtained relatively low precision and accuracy values, while gaining the highest recall rate among all 42 participating teams.', 'mk': 'In this paper, we present an approach for classifying news articles as biased (i.e., hyperpartisan) or unbiased, based on a convolutional neural network.  Експериментираме со различни методи на вградување (претренирани и обучени на наборот на податоци за обука) и варијации на конволуционалната нервна мрежа архитектура и ги споредуваме резултатите. Кога го оценувавме нашиот најдобар пристап кон вистинскиот сет на тестови податоци од SemEval 2019 задачата 4, добивме релативно ниска прецизност и прецизност вредности, додека добивме највисока стапка на повлекување помеѓу сите 42 тимови учествувачки.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan pendekatan untuk mengklasifikasi artikel berita sebagai biased (iaitu hyperpartisan) atau tidak biased, berdasarkan rangkaian saraf konvolutional. Kami eksperimen dengan pelbagai kaedah penyembedding (berlatih dan dilatih pada set data latihan) dan variasi arkitektur rangkaian saraf konvolusi dan membandingkan hasilnya. Apabila menilai pendekatan yang terbaik pada set data ujian sebenar SemEval 2019 Task 4, kami mendapat nilai ketepatan dan ketepatan relatif rendah, sementara mendapatkan kadar pengingatan tertinggi di antara semua 42 pasukan yang berpartisipasi.', 'mt': 'In this paper, we present an approach for classifying news articles as biased (i.e., hyperpartisan) or unbiased, based on a convolutional neural network.  Aħna ninsperimentaw b’diversi metodi ta’ inkorporazzjoni (imħarrġa minn qabel u mħarrġa fuq is-sett ta’ dejta ta’ taħriġ) u varjazzjonijiet tal-arkitettura tan-netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali u nqabblu r-riżultati. Meta vvalutaw l-approċċ tagħna bl-aħjar prestazzjoni dwar is-sett attwali tad-dejta tat-test tas-SemEval 2019 Task 4, kisbu valuri relattivament baxxi ta’ preċiżjoni u preċiżjoni, filwaqt li kisbu l-ogħla rata ta’ ġbir lura fost it-42 tim parteċipanti kollha.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ ലേഖനങ്ങള്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു പ്രായോഗ്യം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവന്നുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അത്  നമ്മള്\u200d വിവിധ രീതികളുമായി പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു (പരിശീലനത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d നിന്നും പരിശീലിക്കുകയും ചെയ്തു) വ്യത്യാസങ്ങളുമാ സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ടാസ്ക് 4-ന്റെ യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഡേറ്റാ സെറ്റില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തിയപ്പോള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കുറച', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид мэдээллийн баримтуудыг хувьсгал гэх мэт (ихэвчлэн гиперпартизан) эсвэл хувьсгал байдлаар хичээлдэг аргыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид олон төрлийн солилцох аргыг (сургалтын өгөгдлийн сургуульд суралцсан болон сургалтын төлөө) болон солилцох мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектурын өөрчлөлтийг туршиж, үр дүнг харьцуулж байна. SemEval 2019 Task 4-ийн жинхэнэ тест өгөгдлийн хувьд хамгийн сайн ажиллах аргыг үнэлэхэд бид харьцангуй бага тодорхойлолт, зөв утгыг олж авсан ба 42 оролцогчдын хамгийн өндөр санах хурдыг олж авсан.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi ein tilnærming for å klassifisera nye artiklar som biased (t.d. hyperpartisan) eller ugjennomsiktig, basert på eit konvolusjonell neuralnettverk. Vi eksperimenterer med ulike innbyggingsmetodar (pretrained and trained on the training dataset) og variasjonar av konvolusjonell neural network architecture og samanliknar resultatene. Når vi evaluerer det beste utføringsdata vårt på det faktiske testdatasettet av halvEval 2019 oppgåva 4, fikk vi relativt lav nøyaktighet og nøyaktighet verdiar, mens vi får den høgste rekningsstaten mellom alle 42 deltakarane.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm o abordare pentru clasificarea articolelor de știri ca părtinitoare (adică hiperpartizană) sau imparțială, bazată pe o rețea neuronală convoluțională. Experimentăm diferite metode de încorporare (pre-instruite și instruite pe setul de date de instruire) și variații ale arhitecturii rețelei neuronale convoluționale și comparăm rezultatele. Atunci când evaluăm abordarea noastră cea mai bună performanță pe setul real de date de testare al SemEval 2019 Task 4, am obținut valori relativ scăzute de precizie și precizie, obținând în același timp cea mai mare rată de rechemare în rândul tuturor celor 42 de echipe participante.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy podejście do klasyfikacji artykułów wiadomościowych jako stronniczych (tj. nadpartyjnych) lub bezstronnych, opartych na konwolucyjnej sieci neuronowej. Eksperymentujemy z różnymi metodami osadzania (wstępnie przeszkolonymi i przeszkolonymi na zbiorze danych treningowych) oraz wariantami architektury konwolucyjnej sieci neuronowej i porównujemy wyniki. Oceniając nasze najlepiej wydajne podejście na rzeczywistym zbiorze danych testowych SemEval 2019 Task 4, uzyskaliśmy stosunkowo niskie wartości precyzji i dokładności, przy jednoczesnym uzyskaniu najwyższego wskaźnika odzyskiwania wśród wszystkich 42 uczestniczących zespołów.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo pristup klasifikaciji novinskih članaka kao predrasude (tj. hiperpartisan) ili nepristrasne, na osnovu konvolucionalne neuralne mreže. Eksperimentiramo sa različitim metodama ugrađenja (pretkišena i obučena na setu podataka obuke) i varijacijom konvolucionalne neuralne mreže arhitekture i uspoređujemo rezultate. Kada smo procenili naš najbolji pristup ispitivanja podataka o stvarnoj skupini ispitivanja zadatka 4 iz polovine 2019, dobili smo relativno nisku preciznost i preciznost vrijednosti, dok smo dobili najvišu stopu sjećanja među svim 42 sudjelujućim timovima.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තට, අපි ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න (ඉතින්, හායිපර්පාර්ටිසියාන්) නැති විදි අපි විවිදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට පරීක්ෂා කරනවා (ප්\u200dරීට්\u200dරීන් කරලා තොරතුරු සටහනේ ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණා කරලා තියෙනවා) සහ සම්බන්ධ අපේ හොඳම පරීක්ෂණ දත්ත සූදානම් සේම්වේල් 2019 වැඩක් 4 ගැන විශ්වාස කරන්න වෙලාවට, අපිට සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂයෙන් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙ', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaynaa qaab a an u qorno warqadaha warqada e e warqadda u qoran sida mid la khiyaaneeyey (tusaale ahaan hyperpartisan) ama aan la khiyaaneyn, iyadoo lagu saleyn karo shabakadda neurada oo kamid ah. Waxaannu ku tijaabinaynaa qaabooyin kala duduwan oo ku habboon (tababarinta iyo waxbarashada) iyo kala duwanaanshaha dhismaha shabakadda neurada ah, waxayna isbarbarbartaan midhihiisa. Markii aan qiimeynayno habka sameynta ee ugu wanaagsan ee lagu qoray saxda tijaabada ee shuqulka 4 ee SemEval 2019, waxaan helay qiimaha saxda iyo saxda, isla markaasna waxaan ka helay boqolkiiba xusuusta ugu sarreeya ee kooxda wadajirka oo dhan 42.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi ett tillvägagångssätt för att klassificera nyhetsartiklar som partiskt (dvs hyperpartisan) eller opartiskt, baserat på ett konvulutivt neuralt nätverk. Vi experimenterar med olika inbäddningsmetoder (förberedda och tränade på träningsdatauppsättningen) och variationer av den konvulutionella neurala nätverksarkitekturen och jämför resultaten. När vi utvärderade vårt bästa tillvägagångssätt på den faktiska testdatauppsättningen för SemEval 2019 Task 4 fick vi relativt låga precisions- och noggrannhetsvärden, samtidigt som vi fick den högsta återkallelsefrekvensen bland alla 42 deltagande team.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் செய்தி கட்டுரைகளை பிரித்து வகுப்பதற்கு ஒரு வழியில் கொண்டு வருகிறோம் ஒரு செய்தி பிரிவாக (அதாவது, hyperpartisan) அல்லது  நாம் பல்வேறு உள்ளமைப்பு முறைகளைக் கொண்டு பரிசோதிக்கிறோம் (பயிற்சி தகவல் அமைப்புகள் மீது பரிசோதிக்கப்பட்டு பயிற்சி செய்து) மற்றும SemEval 2019 செயல் 4 வேலையின் உண்மையான சோதனை தரவு அமைப்பில் எங்கள் சிறந்த செயல்படுத்தல் வழியை மதிப்பிடும் போது, நாங்கள் குறைந்த த துல்லியமான மதிப்புகளையு', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک طریقہ پیش کریں گے کہ خبروں کے معاملات کو بغیر منطقی (یعنی hyperpartisan) یا بغیر منطقی بنایا جائے۔ ہم مختلف انڈینگ طریقے سے آزمائش کرتے ہیں (تدریس ڈیٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کی گئی اور تدریس کی گئی) اور مختلف نئورل نیٹ ورک ساختاری کی مختلف تدریج کرتے ہیں اور نتائج کو مقایسہ کرتے ہیں۔ جبکہ ہمارے بہترین انجام دینے کے طریقے کا ارزش کرتا تھا جبکہ SemEval 2019 ٹاکس 4 کی حقیقی امتحان ڈیٹ سٹ پر، ہم نے نسبتا کم دقیق اور دقیق ارزش حاصل کی، حالانکہ تمام 42 شرکت گروہوں میں سب سے بہترین یاد لینے کا ارزش حاصل کرتا تھا.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz xabar maqolalarini bir qanday bogʻ'liq (m.g. hyperpartisan) yoki o'xshash tarmoq asosida o'zgartirish imkoniyatlariga ega qilamiz. Biz har xil tarkib metodlari bilan o'rganamiz (taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar sohasida tajriba qilamiz) va butunlay tarmoq maktablarining o'zgarishlarini va natijalarni kamaytirimiz. SemEval 2019 Vazifaning 4 vazifasi haqiqiqiy qilayotganda bizning eng yaxshi bajarish usulini qiymatlashimiz mumkin, va 42 bo'lgan guruhlarning hammasidagi eng eng chegara xotiraga yetganimiz.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp cho việc phân loại các bài báo có vẻ thiên vị (tức là lưỡng đảng) hoặc đơn giản, dựa trên một mạng thần kinh rối loạn. Chúng tôi thử nghiệm với các phương pháp lắp ghép khác nhau (premưa và đào tạo trên bộ dữ liệu huấn luyện) và các biến đổi cấu trúc kết cấu mạng thần kinh và so sánh kết quả. Khi đánh giá phương pháp hiệu quả tốt nhất của chúng ta trên tập đoàn dữ liệu thử nghiệm thật sự trong nhiệm vụ SemEvol 4, chúng ta đã đạt được giá trị độ chính xác và độ chính xác tương đối thấp, đồng thời đạt được tỉ lệ thu hồi cao nhất của tất cả các đội 2 tham gia.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме подход за класифициране на новинарските статии като предубедени (т.е. хиперпартизани) или безпристрастни, базирани на конволюционна невронна мрежа. Експериментираме с различни методи за вграждане (предварително тренирани и обучени върху набора от данни за обучение) и вариации на архитектурата на конволюционната невронна мрежа и сравняваме резултатите. При оценката на най-добрия ни подход върху действителния набор от тестови данни на задача 4, ние получихме сравнително ниски стойности на точност и точност, като същевременно постигнахме най-висок процент на изтегляне от всички 42 участващи екипа.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo pristup klasifikaciji novinskih članaka kao predrasude (tj. hiperpartisan) ili nepristrasne, na temelju konvolucionalne neuralne mreže. Eksperimentiramo s različitim metodama uključenja (pretkišena i obučena na setu podataka obuke) i varijacije konvolucionalne strukture neuralne mreže i uspoređujemo rezultate. Procjenjujući naš najbolji pristup ispitivanja podataka o stvarnoj skupini ispitivanja zadatka 4 iz polovine 2019, dobili smo relativno nisku preciznost i preciznost vrijednosti, dok smo dobili najvišu stopu sjećanja među svim 42 sudjelujućim timovima.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we een aanpak voor het classificeren van nieuwsberichten als biased (d.w.z. hyperpartisan) of onpartijdig, gebaseerd op een convolutioneel neuraal netwerk. We experimenteren met verschillende embedding methodes (vooraf getraind en getraind op de trainingsdataset) en variaties van de convolutionele neurale netwerkarchitectuur en vergelijken de resultaten. Bij het evalueren van onze best presterende aanpak op de feitelijke testgegevensset van de SemEval 2019 Task 4 hebben we relatief lage precisie- en nauwkeurigheidswaarden verkregen, terwijl we de hoogste terugroepaciteit van alle 42 deelnemende teams behaalden.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi en tilgang til klassificering af nyhedsartikler som partiske (dvs. hyperpartisan) eller upartiske, baseret på et konvulutivt neuralt netværk. Vi eksperimenterer med forskellige indlejringsmetoder (foruddannet og trænet på træningsdatasættet) og variationer af den konvulutive neurale netværksarkitektur og sammenligner resultaterne. Ved evalueringen af vores bedst ydende tilgang på det faktiske testdatasæt af SemEval 2019 Task 4 opnåede vi relativt lave præcisions- og nøjagtighedsværdier, samtidig med at vi opnåede den højeste tilbagekaldelsesprocent blandt alle 42 deltagende teams.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag präsentieren wir einen Ansatz zur Klassifizierung von Nachrichtenartikeln als voreingenommen (d.h. hyperparteiisch) oder unvoreingenommen, basierend auf einem convolutionalen neuronalen Netzwerk. Wir experimentieren mit verschiedenen Einbettungsmethoden (vortrainiert und trainiert auf dem Trainingsdatensatz) und Variationen der convolutionalen neuronalen Netzwerkarchitektur und vergleichen die Ergebnisse. Bei der Bewertung unseres leistungsstärksten Ansatzes am tatsächlichen Testdatensatz der SemEval 2019 Task 4 konnten wir relativ niedrige Genauigkeits- und Genauigkeitswerte erzielen und gleichzeitig die höchste Rückrufrate unter allen 42-teilnehmenden Teams erzielen.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan pendekatan untuk mengklasifikasi artikel berita sebagai bias (i.e., hyperpartisan) atau tidak bias, berdasarkan jaringan saraf konvolusi. Kami eksperimen dengan berbagai metode penerbangan (dilatih dan dilatih di dataset pelatihan) dan variasi arkitektur jaringan saraf konvolusi dan membandingkan hasilnya. Ketika mengevaluasi pendekatan terbaik kami pada set data ujian sebenarnya dari SemEval 2019 Task 4, kami mendapat nilai presisi dan akurasi relatif rendah, sementara mendapatkan tingkat pengingat tertinggi di antara semua 42 tim yang berpartisipasi.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 권적신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 한 뉴스 문장의 분류 방법을 제시하여 편향(즉 초당파)과 무편향으로 나눈다.우리는 각종 삽입 방법(훈련 데이터 집합에서 예훈련과 훈련)과 권적신경 네트워크 구조의 변화를 실험하고 그 결과를 비교했다.SemEval 2019 임무 4에 대한 실제 테스트 데이터 세트에서 우리가 가장 잘 표현한 방법을 평가할 때 우리는 상대적으로 낮은 정밀도와 정확도 값을 얻었고 모든 42개 참여팀 중 가장 높은 리콜율을 얻었다.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda, täzelikler maýdanlary tertiblemek üçin bir ýalaýyşy görkezip berýäris (hem hiperpartisan) ýa-da tertiblenmegiz üçin tertiblenýäris. Biz çeşitli birleşme yöntemleri (eğitim verileri üzerinde pretrained ve eğitimli) ve konvolucional neural ağ arhitekteginiň çeşitlerini denedik ve netijeleri karşılaştırıyoruz. SemEval 2019 Görevi 4'iniň iň gowy bellenen ýagdaýymyzy deňleýände, bütün 42 takımlaryň arasynda iň yüksek hatlaryň derejesini aldık.", 'af': "In hierdie papier stel ons 'n toegang voor die klassifisering van nuus artikels as biased (i.e. hyperpartisan) of onbiased, gebaseer op 'n konvolusionele neuralnetwerk. Ons eksperimenteer met verskillende inbêring metodes (voorreen en opgelei op die opvoering datastel) en variasies van die konvolusionele neuralnetwerk-arkitektuur en vergelyk die resultate. Wanneer ons beste uitvoerde toegang te evalueer op die werklike toets data stel van die SemEval 2019 Opdrag 4, het ons relativief lae presisie en presisie waardes ontvang, terwyl ons die hoogste rekening tempo onder al 42 deelnaamde teams ontvang het.", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک روش برای کلاس کردن مجموعه های اخبار را به عنوان تغییر (یعنی hyperpartisan) یا غیر تغییر داده\u200cایم، بر اساس یک شبکه عصبی معمولی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. ما با روش\u200cهای مختلف پیدا کردن آزمایش می\u200cکنیم (در مجموعه داده\u200cهای آموزش آموزش) و تغییر\u200cهای معماری شبکه عصبی متفاوتی و نتیجه\u200cها را مقایسه می\u200cکنیم. وقتی بهترین روش انجام ما را در مجموعه داده\u200cهای آزمایش واقعی از کار چهارم سال ۲۰۱۹ ارزش دقیق و دقیق نسبتا کم گرفتیم، در حالی که بالاترین رقم یادآوری از همه 42 تیم شرکت می\u200cکنند.', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili, tunaweka mbinu ya kutangaza makala za habari kama upendeleo wa upendeleo (yaani upande wa kiasi kikubwa) au kinyume cha kibaguzi, kwa kutumia mtandao wa kikatili wa neura. Tunajaribu kwa njia mbalimbali za mipango (kutengeneza na kufundishwa kwenye seti ya mafunzo) na mabadiliko ya ujenzi wa mtandao wa neurali na kulinganisha matokeo. Wakati tukiangalia hatua yetu bora zaidi ya upatikanaji wa taarifa za jaribio halisi za kazi ya SemEval 2019, tulipata thamani ndogo ya urahisi na sahihi, wakati tukipata kiwango kikubwa cha kukumbuka kati ya timu 42 za ushiriki.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një qasje për klasifikimin e artikujve të lajmeve si të paragjykuar (pra, hiperpartizan) apo të papërgjykuar, bazuar në një rrjet nervor konvolutiv. Eksperimentojmë me metoda të ndryshme të përfshirjes (të stërvitura dhe të stërvitura në grupin e të dhënave të stërvitjes) dhe variacione të arkitekturës konvolutive të rrjetit nervor dhe krahasojmë rezultatet. Kur vlerësonim qasjen tonë më të mirë të rezultateve në grupin e të dhënave të testit të SemEval 2019 Task 4, kemi fituar vlera relativisht të ulëta preçizioni dhe saktësi, duke fituar normën më të lartë të tërheqjes midis të 42 ekipave pjesëmarrëse.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የዜናውን ጽሑፎች እንደ ተቃዋሚ (አፍሪካዊ) ወይም ያልተቃወመ ጥያቄ በመጠቀም የናውሬል መረብ በመጠቀም ላይ ለመለየፍ ልማድ እናቀርባታለን፡፡ በተለያዩ አካባቢ ሥርዓቶች (ትምህርት ዳታተር ማስተማርን እናስተማርናለን) እና የጠንካራ መረብ መሠረት ልዩነት እና ፍሬቶችን እናስተያይዛለን፡፡ የሴmEval 2019 ስራ 4 በሚደረገው የድምፅ ዳታዎችን በማስተዋል ጊዜ፣ የእውነትን ውጤት እና የእውነትን ዋጋ አግኝተናል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք նորությունների հոդվածները դասակարգելու որպես կողմնակալ (այսինքն, հիպերմաստիզան) կամ անկողմնակալ, հիմնված կոնվոլյուցիոն նյարդային ցանցի վրա: Մենք փորձում ենք տարբեր ներդրման մեթոդներ (նախապատրաստված և վարժեցված ուսումնասիրության տվյալների համակարգում) և համեմատում ենք համընդհանուր նյարդային ցանցի ճարտարապետության տարբերությունները: Երբ մենք գնահատում էինք մեր լավագույն արդյունավետ մոտեցումը 2019 թ. Սեմեվալ 4-ի իրական փորձարկման տվյալների համակարգի վերաբերյալ, մենք ստացանք համեմատաբար ցածր ճշգրտություն և ճշգրտություն արժեքներ, մինչդեռ ստացանք ամենաբարձ', 'az': "Bu kağızda, xəbər məktullarını tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə seçmək üçün tərzdə göstəririk. Biz müxtəlif inbing metodları ilə (təhsil veri qutusu ilə təhsil edilmiş və təhsil edilmiş) və konvolucional nöral ağ arhitektarının dəyişiklikləri və sonuçlarını salıb. SemEval 2019 Görevi 4'nin ən yaxşı təhsil etdiyimiz təhsil qutusunda təhsil etdiyimiz zaman, 42 istifadə edən dəstələrin ən yüksək hatırlama dərəcəsini qəbul etdik.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায় আমরা সংবাদ প্রবন্ধ বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের ভিত্তিতে সংবাদ প্রবন্ধ বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন (যেমন হাইপার্পার আমরা বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতির মাধ্যমে পরীক্ষা করছি (প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য সম্পর্কে প্রশিক্ষণ ও প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করি) এবং সংশ্লিষ্ট যখন সেমইভাল ২০১৯ টাস্ক ৪-এর প্রকৃত পরীক্ষার তথ্য সেটে আমাদের সবচেয়ে ভালো প্রদর্শনের চেষ্টা পরীক্ষা সম্পর্কে মূল্যের বিষয়টি পরীক্ষা করা হয়, তখন আমরা প্রায়', 'ca': "En aquest article, presentem un enfocament per classificar articles de notícies com biasats (i.e., hiperpartisans) o imparcials, basats en una xarxa neural convolucionada. Experimentem amb diversos mètodes d'incorporació (pré-entrenats i entrenats en el conjunt de dades d'entrenament) i variacions de l'arquitectura convolutiva de la xarxa neuronal i comparem els resultats. Quan vam evaluar el nostre enfocament de millor rendiment en el conjunt de dades de prova real de la tasca 4 de SemEval 2019, vam obtenir valors relativament baixos de precisió i precisió, alhora que vam guanyar la tasa de recuperació més alta de tots els 42 equips participants.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme přístup pro klasifikaci zpravodajských článků jako zaujatých (tj. hyperpartyzánních) nebo nezaujatých, založených na konvoluční neuronové síti. Experimentujeme s různými metodami vkládání (předtrénovanými a trénovanými na tréninkovém datovém souboru) a variacemi architektury konvoluční neuronové sítě a porovnáváme výsledky. Při hodnocení našeho nejlepšího přístupu na skutečné sadě testovacích dat úlohy SemEval 2019 4 jsme získali relativně nízké hodnoty přesnosti a přesnosti, přičemž jsme získali nejvyšší míru volání ze všech 42 zúčastněných týmů.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös esitame lähenemisviisi uudisteartiklite liigitamiseks erapooletuks (s.t. hüperpartisanideks) või erapooletuks, mis põhineb konvolutsioonilisel närvivõrgul. Katsetame erinevaid manustamismeetodeid (eeltreenitud ja treenitud treeningu andmekogumi alusel) ja konvolutsioonivõrgu arhitektuuri variatsioone ning võrdleme tulemusi. Meie parima tulemusega lähenemisviisi hindamisel SemEval 2019 ülesande 4 tegelike testiandmete kogumi põhjal saavutasime suhteliselt madalad täpsus- ja täpsusväärtused, saavutades samas kõigi 42 osaleva meeskonna seas kõrgeima tagasikutsumise määra.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo pristup klasifikaciji novinskih članaka kao predrasude (tj. hiperpartisan) ili nepristrasne, na temelju konvolucionalne neuralne mreže. Eksperimentiramo sa različitim metodama ugrađenja (pretkišena i obučena na setu podataka obuke) i varijacijom konvolucionalne neuralne mreže arhitekture i uspoređujemo rezultate. Kada smo procjenjivali naš najbolji pristup provedbi na stvarnom skupu ispitivanja podataka zadatka 4 iz polovine 2019, dobili smo relativno niske precizne i precizne vrijednosti, dok smo dobili najvišu stopu sjećanja među svim 42 sudjelujućim timovima.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esitellään lähestymistapa uutisartikkeleiden luokitteluun puolueellisiksi (hyperpartisaaneiksi) tai puolueettomiksi, joka perustuu konvolutionaaliseen neuroverkkoon. Kokeilemme erilaisia sulautusmenetelmiä (esikoulutettuja ja koulutettuja harjoitusaineistosta) ja konvolutionaalisen neuroverkon arkkitehtuurin variaatioita ja vertaamme tuloksia. Arvioidessamme parhaiten suoriutuvaa lähestymistapaamme SemEval 2019 Task 4:n varsinaisessa testiaineistossa saimme suhteellisen alhaiset tarkkuus- ja tarkkuusarvot, samalla kun saavutimme korkeimman palautusasteen kaikista 42 tiimistä.', 'jv': 'Nan pemilih iki, kita sadhaya akses kanggo kelas pertualisi unalah Awak dhéwé éntuk karo sistem sing sampeyan embedding Isopo awakdhéwé nglanggar aturan sing luwih nggawe gerakan kanggo ngerasah dadi sing bakal terus kanggo Kemerdekaan Samsul 2011 task 4, kéné awak dhéwé butawak dhéwé kesempatan lan kara-teka sing apik dhéwé, sampeyan kuwi wis alah gak dhéwé beraksi sing gak nggawe 49', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã zuwa wani mataimaki wa su rarraba makala na lãbãri kamar da aka bi'a (misali, Hyerpartan) ko wanda ba'a sãɓa ba, a kan wani shirin neural na ɗabi'a. Za jarraba da wasu hanyõyi masu fitarwa (aka bakarata kuma aka sanar da shi a kan tsarin database) da variants na tsarin tsarin jerin neural na sami matsayin. A lokacin da muka ƙaddara mafi kyaun hanyarmu ga jarrabon data masu gaskiya na tsari na aikin Semeval 2019, sai muka sãmi kimar da hakki, kuma a lokacin da za'a sami rabon tunãtarwa tsakanin duk jama'a 42.", 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo pristop za klasifikacijo novinarskih člankov kot pristranske (tj. hiperpartizanske) ali nepristranske, ki temelji na konvolucionalni nevronski mreži. Eksperimentiramo z različnimi metodami vgradnje (predtreniranimi in usposobljenimi na naboru podatkov o treningu) in variacijami arhitekture konvolucijskega živčnega omrežja ter primerjamo rezultate. Pri ocenjevanju našega najboljšega pristopa na dejanskem naboru preskusnih podatkov naloge 4 SemEval 2019 smo dosegli relativno nizke vrednosti natančnosti in natančnosti, medtem ko smo dosegli najvišjo stopnjo odpoklica med vsemi 42 sodelujočimi ekipami.', 'bo': 'འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གསར་འགོད་ཀྱི་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་སྦྱོར་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདྲ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་སླར་མཐུད་ནུས་ཡོད་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་དགའ་གཙོ་བ་ཡོད་པའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཚོར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་སྐབས། རྒྱལ་ཁབ་2019 ལྟ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལྡན་གྱི་ཚད་ལྡན་དེ་ཉུང་ཚད་ལྡན་', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים גישה להקליזת מאמרים חדשות כמו מועמדים (כלומר, hyperpartisan) או לא מועמדים, מבוססים על רשת עצבית משתנה. אנו מנסים עם שיטות שונות של פיתוח (מאומנים מראש ומאמנים על קבוצת נתונים האימונים) ובורציונות של ארכיטקטורת הרשת העצבית השתנית ושווה את התוצאות. כשהערכנו את הגישה הטובה ביותר שלנו על קבוצת הנתונים האמיתית של משימה "SemEval 2019" 4, השגנו ערכים מדויקים ודויקים נמוכים יחסית, בזמן שזכינו לקצב הזיכרון הגבוה ביותר בין כל 42 קבוצות השתתפות.'}
{'en': 'Team Peter-Parker at SemEval-2019 Task 4 : BERT-Based Method in Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'fr': "L'équipe Peter-Parker au SEMEVAL-2019 Task 4\xa0: Méthode basée sur BERT pour la détection hyperpartisane des actualités", 'pt': 'Equipe Peter-Parker no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 4: Método baseado em BERT na detecção de notícias hiperpartidárias', 'ar': 'فريق Peter-Parker في SemEval-2019 Task 4: أسلوب قائم على BERT في الكشف عن الأخبار شديدة الحزبية', 'es': 'El equipo Peter-Parker en la Tarea 4 de Semeval-2019: Método basado en BERT en la detección de noticias hiperpartidistas', 'ru': 'Команда Питера-Паркера на SemEval-2019 Задача 4: Метод на основе BERT в обнаружении гиперпартийных новостей', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のチームPeter - Parkerタスク4 ：超党派ニュース検出におけるBERTベースの方法', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019团队Peter-Parker务4:超党遣新闻检中基于BERT法', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 4 पर टीम पीटर-पार्कर: हाइपरपार्टिसन समाचार का पता लगाने में BERT-आधारित विधि', 'ga': 'Foireann Peter-Parker ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 4: Modh Bunaithe ar BERT i mBraith Nuacht Hyperpartisan', 'ka': 'კომპერ-პერკერი SemEval-2019 საქმე 4: BERT- დაბაზეული მეტიე ჰიპერპორტიზანის ახალგაზების განახლებაში', 'el': 'Ομάδα Πίτερ-Πάρκερ στο έργο 4: Μέθοδος με βάση τον BERT στην ανίχνευση υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων', 'hu': 'Peter-Parker csapat a SemEval-2019 4. feladatában: BERT-alapú módszer a hiperpartizán hírek felismerésében', 'it': 'Team Peter-Parker al SemEval-2019 Task 4: Metodo basato su BERT nella rilevazione di notizie iperpartigiane', 'kk': 'Питер- Паркер тобы жарым- 2019 тапсырмасының 4- тапсырмасы: BERT- негізінде Hyperpartisan жаңалықтарды анықтау әдісі', 'lt': '„Peter-Parker“ komanda „SemEval-2019“ 4 užduotis: BERT pagrįstas metodas hiperpartinių žinių aptikimui', 'mk': 'Team Peter-Parker at SemEval-2019 Task 4: BERT-Based Method in Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'ms': 'Pasukan Peter-Parker di SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Kaedah Berasas BERT dalam Pengesanan Berita Hyperpartisan', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 4: ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസാന്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്ത ഡിറ്റീഷനിലെ ബെര്\u200dട്ടി- ബേസ്റ്റ് മാറ്റം', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Баг Питер-Паркер ажил 4: BERT-ын үндсэн Method in Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'mt': 'Tim Peter-Parker f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 4: Metodu bbażat fuq BERT fid-Detezzjoni ta’ l-Aħbarijiet Hyperpartisan', 'no': 'Gruppe Peter-Parker på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 4: BERT-basert metode i Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'pl': 'Zespół Peter-Parker w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 4: Metoda oparta na BERT w wykrywaniu wiadomości hiperpartyjnych', 'ro': 'Echipa Peter-Parker la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 4: Metoda bazată pe BERT în detectarea știrilor hiperpartizane', 'sr': 'Tim Peter-Parker na semiEval-2019 Task 4: metod na BERT-bazi u hiperpartisan News Detection', 'si': 'පීටර්-පාර්කර් කණ්ඩායම් සම්වේල්-2019 වැඩ 4: BERT-ආධාරිත පද්ධතිය Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'so': 'Team Peter-Parker at SemEval-2019 Task 4: BERT-Based Method in Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'sv': 'Team Peter-Parker på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 4: BERT-baserad metod i hyperpartisan Nyhetsdetektering', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 செயல் 4: ஹைப்பர்பார்சின் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பானில் பீட்டர் பார்க்கர்', 'ur': 'ٹیم پیٹر-پارکر سیم ایول-2019 ٹاکس 4: BERT-Based Method in Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'uz': 'SemEval-2019 Vazifa 4: Hyperpartisan news detection uchun BERT asosiy usuli', 'vi': 'Đội Peter-Parker tại SemEvl-209 Task 4: Nghiên cứu dựa trên BERT trong trinh sát báo Hyperdu kích', 'bg': 'Екип Питър-Паркър на Задача 4: Метод за откриване на хиперпартизани новини', 'da': 'Team Peter-Parker ved SemEval-2019 Opgave 4: BERT-baseret metode i hyperpartisan nyhedsdetektion', 'nl': 'Team Peter-Parker bij SemEval-2019 Taak 4: BERT-gebaseerde methode in hyperpartizane nieuwsdetectie', 'de': 'Team Peter-Parker auf der SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 4: BERT-basierte Methode zur hyperparteiischen Nachrichtenerkennung', 'ko': 'Sem Eval-2019 미션4의 Peter Parker 팀: 버트 기반 초당파 뉴스 검출 방법', 'id': 'Tim Peter-Parker di SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Metode Berdasarkan BERT dalam Deteksi Berita Hyperpartisan', 'sw': 'Timu Peter-Parker katika SemEval-2019 Kazi 4: Utawala wa BERT-msingi katika Utafiti wa Habari za Hyperpartisan', 'fa': 'تیم پیتر-پارکر در پایین اول-۲۰۱۹ کار ۴: روش بنیاد BERT در بازرسی اخبار هایپر پارکیسن', 'tr': 'Tim Peter-Parker at SemEval-2019 Task 4: BERT-Based Method in Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'af': 'Skep Peter- Parker by SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 4: BERT- Based Method in Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'sq': 'Ekipi Peter-Parker në SemEval-2019 Task 4: BERT-based Method in Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'am': 'የሴምEval-2019 ስራ 4: በሃፕርፋስታን ዜና መግለጫ BERT-Based method', 'hr': 'Tim Peter-Parker na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 4: metod na BERT-u otkrivanju novina Hyperpartisan', 'hy': 'Փիթեր-Պարքերի թիմը Սեմեվալ-2019 թվականին 4. հանձնարարությունը. BER-ի հիպերպարտիզան նորությունների հայտնաբերման մեթոդը', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৪: হাইপার্পার্টিস্যান নিউজ ডিটেক্টরেশনে বেরেট-ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি', 'bs': 'Tim Peter-Parker na pola Evala-2019. zadatak 4: metod na BERT-bazi u hiperpartisan News Detection', 'ca': "L'equip Peter-Parker a SemEval-2019 Task 4: BERT-based Method in Hyperpartisan News Detection", 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Task 4: BERT-Based Method in Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'cs': 'Tým Peter-Parker na SemEval-2019 Úkol 4: Metoda založená na BERT v detekci hyperstranických zpráv', 'et': 'Meeskond Peter-Parker SemEval-2019 ülesandel 4: BERT-põhine meetod hüperpartisanide uudiste tuvastamisel', 'fi': 'Team Peter-Parker SemEval-2019 Task 4: BERT-based method in Hyperpartisan News Detection', 'sk': 'Ekipa Peter-Parker na SemEval-2019 naloga 4: BERT-temeljna metoda pri odkrivanju hiperpartizanskih novic', 'ha': 'Team Peter-Park at SemEal-2019 Tafiyar 4: BERT-Based Method in Hyperpartsan News', 'he': 'צוות פיטר-פארקר בסמיוול-2019 משימה 4: שיטה מבוססת על BERT בחיפוש חדשות היפרפרטיזן', 'jv': 'Grup Pedro-PARKER at semiinval-2011 task 4: BERT-Based Method in Typerpartisan New detection', 'bo': 'Tim Peter-Parker at SemEval-2019 Task 4: BERT-Based Method in Hyperpartisan News Detection'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the team peter-parker’s participation in Hyperpartisan News Detection task (SemEval-2019 Task 4), which requires to classify whether a given news article is bias or not. We decided to use JAVA to do the article parsing tool and the BERT-Based model to do the bias prediction. Furthermore, we will show experiment results with analysis.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit la participation de l'équipe peter-parker à la tâche Hyperpartisan News Detection (SemEval-2019 Task 4), qui nécessite de classer si un article de presse donné est biaisé ou non. Nous avons décidé d'utiliser JAVA pour l'outil d'analyse des articles et le modèle basé sur BERT pour effectuer la prédiction du biais. De plus, nous montrerons les résultats de l'expérience avec analyse.", 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة مشاركة فريق بيتر باركر في مهمة الكشف عن الأخبار الحزبية (SemEval-2019 Task 4) ، والتي تتطلب تصنيف ما إذا كانت مقالة إخبارية معينة متحيزة أم لا. قررنا استخدام JAVA للقيام بأداة تحليل المقالة والنموذج المستند إلى BERT للقيام بتنبؤ التحيز. علاوة على ذلك ، سوف نعرض نتائج التجربة مع التحليل.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe la participación del equipo peter-parker en la tarea de detección de noticias hiperpartidistas (Tarea 4 de SemEval-2019), que requiere clasificar si un artículo de noticias dado es sesgado o no. Decidimos usar JAVA para hacer la herramienta de análisis de artículos y el modelo basado en Bert para hacer la predicción del sesgo. Además, mostraremos los resultados de los experimentos con análisis.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve a participação da equipe Peter-Parker na tarefa Hyperpartisan News Detection (SemEval-2019 Task 4), que exige classificar se uma determinada notícia é tendenciosa ou não. Decidimos usar JAVA para fazer a ferramenta de análise de artigos e o modelo baseado em BERT para fazer a previsão de viés. Além disso, mostraremos os resultados dos experimentos com análise.', 'ja': '本稿では、特定のニュース記事がバイアスであるか否かを分類する必要があるハイパーパーパーティサンニュース検出タスク（ SemEval -2019 Task 4 ）へのチームPeter - Parkerの参加について説明する。JAVAを使用してアーティクル解析ツールを実行し、BERTベースのモデルを使用してバイアス予測を実行することにしました。さらに、解析で実験結果を示す。', 'zh': '本文述peter-parker团队参超党新闻检测(SemEval-2019务4),当求给定新闻文有偏异。 吾决JAVA以为文解析具,而用BERT以为度。 以此观之实验也。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर हाइपरपार्टिजन न्यूज डिटेक्शन टास्क (SemEval-2019 टास्क 4) में टीम पीटर-पार्कर की भागीदारी का वर्णन करता है, जिसके लिए यह वर्गीकृत करने की आवश्यकता होती है कि कोई दिया गया समाचार लेख पूर्वाग्रह है या नहीं। हमने लेख पार्सिंग टूल और BERT-आधारित मॉडल को पूर्वाग्रह भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए जावा का उपयोग करने का फैसला किया। इसके अलावा, हम विश्लेषण के साथ प्रयोग के परिणाम दिखाएंगे।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается участие команды Peter-parker в задаче Hyperpartisan News Detection (SemEval-2019 Task 4), которая требует классифицировать, является ли данная новостная статья предвзятой или нет. Мы решили использовать JAVA для синтаксического анализа статей и модель на основе BERT для предсказания смещения. Кроме того, мы покажем результаты эксперимента с анализом.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar rannpháirtíocht na foirne Peter-parker sa tasc Braite Nuacht Hyperpartisan (SemEval-2019 Tasc 4), a éilíonn a rangú cibé an bhfuil alt nuachta ar leith claonta nó nach bhfuil. Shocraigh muid JAVA a úsáid chun an uirlis parsála ailt a dhéanamh agus an tsamhail bunaithe ar BERT chun an tuar claonta a dhéanamh. Ina theannta sin, taispeánfaimid torthaí turgnaimh le hanailís.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a peter-parker csapat részvételét a Hyperpartisan News Detection feladatban (SemEval-2019 Task 4), amely megköveteli, hogy osztályozza, hogy egy adott cikk elfogult-e vagy sem. Úgy döntöttünk, hogy a JAVA-t használjuk a cikk elemzéséhez, a BERT-alapú modellt pedig az előrejelzés elvégzéséhez. Továbbá elemzéssel bemutatjuk a kísérleti eredményeket.', 'ka': 'ეს დომენტი აღწერს მონაცემების მოთავსება Hyperpartisan News Detection Task-ში (SemEval-2019 Task 4), რომელიც უნდა კლასიფიკაცია, თუ არა მინდა მინდა მინუს ახალგაზრულების მოთავსება ან არა. ჩვენ გავაკეთეთ JAVA-ს გამოყენება მარტიკის პანსტირების ხელსაწყოთა და BERT-based მოდელის გამოყენებას. დამატებით, ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ექსპერიმენტის შედეგები ანალიზით.', 'el': 'Αυτή η εργασία περιγράφει τη συμμετοχή της ομάδας στην εργασία ανίχνευσης υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων (η οποία απαιτεί να ταξινομηθεί εάν ένα συγκεκριμένο άρθρο ειδήσεων είναι προκατάληψη ή όχι. Αποφασίσαμε να χρησιμοποιήσουμε το JAVA για να κάνουμε το εργαλείο ανάλυσης άρθρων και το μοντέλο βασισμένο στο BERT για να κάνουμε την πρόβλεψη προκατάλειψης. Επιπλέον, θα παρουσιάσουμε αποτελέσματα πειραματισμού με ανάλυση.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive la partecipazione del team peter-parker all'attività Hyperpartisan News Detection (SemEval-2019 Task 4), che richiede di classificare se un dato articolo di notizie è bias o meno. Abbiamo deciso di usare JAVA per fare lo strumento di analisi degli articoli e il modello basato su BERT per fare la previsione degli bias. Inoltre, mostreremo i risultati degli esperimenti con analisi.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašomas komandos Peter-Parker dalyvavimas Hyperpartisan News Detection užduotyje (SemEval-2019 užduotis 4), kurioje reikalaujama klasifikuoti, ar tam tikras naujienų straipsnis yra nešališkas, ar ne. Mes nusprendėme naudoti JAVA gaminių analizavimo priemonę ir BERT pagrįstą model į, kad būtų galima daryti sąžiningą prognozę. Be to, atlikdami analizę parodysime eksperimentų rezultatus.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз жаңалық тапсырмасына Hyperpartisan жаңалық анықтау тапсырмасына (SemEval-2019 4 тапсырмасында) бұл команданың паркерінің қатынасын анықтайды. Келтірілген жаңалық мақаланың бақылауы не емес дегенді анықтау керек Біз JAVA мақаланы талдау құралын және BERT негізіндегі үлгісін таңдау үшін қолданатын болдық. Қосымша, анализ туралы тәжірибенің нәтижесін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува учеството на тимот Питер-Паркер во задачата на Хиперпартисанската новинска детективност (SemEval-2019 задача 4), која бара класификација дали одредена новинска статија е пристрасна или не. Одлучивме да ја искористиме ЈАВА за да ја направиме алатката за анализирање на статии и моделот базиран на БЕРТ за да го направиме предвидувањето на предрасудата. Покрај тоа, ќе покажеме експериментални резултати со анализа.', 'ms': "This paper describes the team peter-parker's participation in Hyperpartisan News Detection task (SemEval-2019 Task 4), which requires to classify whether a given news article is bias or not.  Kami memutuskan untuk menggunakan JAVA untuk melakukan alat penghuraian artikel dan model Berasas BERT untuk melakukan ramalan bias. Selain itu, kita akan menunjukkan hasil eksperimen dengan analisis.", 'mt': "This paper describes the team peter-parker's participation in Hyperpartisan News Detection task (SemEval-2019 Task 4), which requires to classify whether a given news article is bias or not.  Aħna ddeċidew li nużaw JAVA biex nagħmlu l-għodda tal-analiżi tal-oġġetti u l-mudell ibbażat fuq BERT biex nagħmlu t-tbassir tal-preġudizzju. Barra minn hekk, se nuru riżultati esperimentali bl-analiżi.", 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dക്കര്\u200d ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപെര്\u200dപ്പാര്\u200dട്ടിസാന്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഡിറ്ററിഷന്\u200d ജോലിയില്\u200d പങ്കെടുക്കുന്നതിനെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു വാ നമ്മള്\u200d ജാവിഎയെ ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d തീരുമാനിച്ചു. ആ ലേഖനത്തിന്റെ പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് ഉപകരണവും ബെര്\u200dട്ടി-ബേസ്റ്റ് മോഡലും പ്ര അതിനുശേഷം, നമുക്ക് പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലം കാണിച്ചു തരാം.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь баг Peter-Parker-ын Hyperpartisan News Detection Task (SemEval-2019 Task 4) дээр оролцохыг тодорхойлж байна. Энэ нь мэдээллийн баримт буруу эсэхийг ангилах хэрэгтэй. Бид JAVA-г хуваалцах хэрэгсэл болон BERT-ын үндсэн загварыг ашиглах гэж шийдсэн. Мөн бид туршилтын үр дүнг шинжилгээр үзүүлье.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver deltakaren av gruppepeter-parker i Hyperpartisan News Detection oppgåva (semiEval-2019 Task 4), som krev å klassifisera om ein gitt nytt- artikkel er bias eller ikkje. Vi bestemte å bruka JAVA for å gjera innlegget for tolking av verktøyet og BERT-basert modellen for å gjera forhåndsvising av forhåndsvising. I tillegg vil vi vise eksperimentresultat med analyse.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje udział zespołu peter-parkera w zadaniu Hyperpartisan News Detection (SemEval-2019 Task 4), które wymaga klasyfikacji, czy dany artykuł jest stronniczy nie. Postanowiliśmy użyć JAVA do wykonania narzędzia parsowania artykułów i modelu opartego na BERT do przewidywania biasu. Ponadto pokażemy wyniki eksperymentu z analizą.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie participarea echipei peter-parker la activitatea Hyperpartisan News Detection (SemEval-2019 Task 4), care necesită clasificarea dacă un anumit articol de știri este părtinitor sau nu. Am decis să folosim JAVA pentru a face instrumentul de analizare a articolelor și modelul bazat pe BERT pentru a face predicția bias. În plus, vom prezenta rezultatele experimentelor cu analiză.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ කණ්ඩායම පිටර්-පාර්කර්ගේ සම්බන්ධය Hyperpartisan s වාර්තාව හොයාගන්න වැඩය (semeval-2019 වැඩය 4) විස්තර කරනවා, ඒකෙන් පුළුවන් වාර් අපි තීරණය කළා JAVA විශ්වාස කරන්න ලේඛනය විශ්ලේෂණ උපකරණය සහ BERT-ආධාරිත මොඩල් විශ්වාස කරන්න. තවත්, අපි පරීක්ෂණයේ විශ්ලේෂණය සමග ප්රයෝජනය පෙන්වන්නම්.', 'so': "Warqadan ayaa ku qoran kooxda peter-parker ka qeybqaadashada xafiiska garta ee Hyperpartisan (SemEval-2019 Shaqo 4), kaas oo u baahan inuu fasaxo warqada warqada la siiyey inuu yahay baas iyo in kale. Waxaynu go'aannay inaan isticmaalno JAVA in aan sameeyo xarunta baaritaanka iyo modelka BERT-aasiga ah si uu u sameeyo wax ka sii sheego bias. Furthermore, waxan tusaynaa resultinta imtixaanka oo lagu sameynayo baaritaanka.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver teamet peter-parkers deltagande i Hyperpartisan News Detection uppgift (SemEval-2019 Task 4), som kräver att klassificera om en viss nyhetsartikel är bias eller inte. Vi bestämde oss för att använda JAVA för att göra artikeltolkningsverktyget och BERT-baserade modellen för att göra bias prediction. Dessutom kommer vi att visa experimentresultat med analys.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sudjelovanje tima peter a-parkera u zadatku Hyperpartisan News Detection (Task 4, semiEval-2019), koji zahtijeva da klasifikuje da li je određeni novinski članak predrasude ili ne. Odlučili smo da koristimo JAVA kako bi napravili alat za analizu članaka i model na BERT-u kako bi napravili predviđanje predrasude. Osim toga, pokazaćemo rezultate eksperimenta sa analizom.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தை குறிப்பிடுகிறது ஹைப்பர்பார்க்கர் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பு பணியில் பங்கீடு (SemEval- 2019 பணி 4), கொடுக்கப்பட்ட செய்தி கட்டுரையை பி நாங்கள் JAVA பயன்படுத்த தீர்மானித்தோம் கட்டுரையை பாசிங் கருவி மற்றும் BERT-அடிப்படையான மாதிரி பியாஸ் முறைமைய மேலும், நாம் சோதனையின் முடிவுகளை ஆராய்ச்சியுடன் காட்டுவோம்.', 'ur': "This paper describes the team peter-parker's participation in Hyperpartisan News Detection task (SemEval-2019 Task 4), which requires to classify whether a given news article is bias or not. ہم نے JAVA کا استعمال کرنا فیصلہ کیا کہ مقالہ پارسینگ تولیل اور BERT-Based موڈل کو پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے استعمال کریں. اس کے علاوہ ہم تحلیل کے ساتھ تجربہ نتائج دکھائیں گے.", 'uz': "Bu hujjat Hyperpartisan News Detection vazifasi (SemEval-2019 Vazifa 4) guruhiga qismini anglatadi. Bu xabar maqola bias yoki boʻlmasligi deb belgilash kerak. Biz JAVA'ni ishlatish uchun maqola parsing asbobi va BERT asosida modelni bajarishni boshlashga qaror qildik. Ko'rib, biz tajriba natijalarini analyzer bilan ko'ramiz.", 'vi': 'Bài báo này mô tả s ự tham gia của nhóm peter-Parker trong nhiệm vụ trinh sát tin tức trinh sát Hyperdu (SemEvl-2009 Task 4), nó cần phân loại xem một bài báo được báo có thiên vị hay không. Chúng tôi quyết định sử dụng Tòa án JAV để làm công cụ phân tích bài báo và mô hình dựa trên BERT để làm dự đoán thiên vị. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi sẽ cho thấy kết quả thí nghiệm.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва участието на екипа на Питър-Паркър в задачата за откриване на новини (Задача 4), която изисква да се класифицира дали дадена новинарска статия е пристрастна или не. Решихме да използваме инструмента за анализ на статиите и базирания модел за прогнозиране на отклонения. Освен това ще покажем резултатите от експеримента с анализ.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver teamets deltagelse i Hyperpartisan News Detection opgave (SemEval-2019 Opgave 4), som kræver at klassificere, om en given nyhedsartikel er bias eller ej. Vi besluttede at bruge JAVA til at udføre artikelanalyseværktøjet og BERT-baseret model til at udføre bias forudsigelse. Desuden vil vi vise eksperimentresultater med analyse.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft de deelname van het team peter-parker aan Hyperpartisan News Detection Task (SemEval-2019 Task 4), waarbij moet worden geclassificeerd of een bepaald nieuwsbericht bias is of niet. We besloten JAVA te gebruiken voor het parsen van artikelen en het BERT-based model om de bias voorspelling te doen. Verder zullen we experimentresultaten laten zien met analyse.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sudjelovanje tima peter-parker a u zadatku Hyperpartisan News Detection (zadatak 4. semiEval-2019), koji zahtijeva klasifikirati je li određeni novinski članak predrasude ili ne. Odlučili smo koristiti JAVA kako bi napravili alat za analizu članaka i model na BERT-u kako bi napravili predviđanje predrasude. Osim toga, pokazat ćemo rezultate eksperimenta s analizom.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt die Teilnahme des Teams Peter-Parker an der Hyperpartisan News Detection Task (SemEval-2019 Task 4), die es erfordert, zu klassifizieren, ob ein bestimmter Nachrichtenartikel Bias ist oder nicht. Wir entschieden uns für JAVA, um das Artikel-Parsing-Tool und das BERT-basierte Modell zu verwenden, um die Bias-Vorhersage durchzuführen. Darüber hinaus werden wir experimentelle Ergebnisse mit Analyse zeigen.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ مشارکت گروه پیتر-پارکر در کار شناسایی خبرهای هیپر پارپارتیسان (ماموریت ۲۰۱۹) را توصیف می\u200cکند که نیازمند است که یک مقاله اخبار به عنوان یک مقاله\u200cای که داده شده بی\u200cنظیر است یا نه. ما تصمیم گرفتیم از JAVA استفاده کنیم تا ابزار تجزیه کردن مقاله و مدل بنیاد BERT را انجام دهیم تا پیش بینی پیش بینی کنند. بعلاوه، نتایج آزمایش را با تحلیل نشان می دهیم.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea ushiriki wa timu ya peter-parker katika kazi ya Uchunguzi wa Habari ya Hyperpartisan (SemEval-2019 Kazi 4), ambayo inahitaji kuelezea ikiwa makala iliyotumiwa na habari ni upendeleo au la. Tuliamua kutumia JAVA kufanya vifaa vya kuchimba makala na mtindo wa msingi wa BERT kufanya utabiri wa upendeleo. Zaidi ya hayo, tutaonyesha matokeo ya majaribio kwa uchambuzi.', 'ko': '본고는peterparker팀이 참여한 초당파 뉴스 검측 임무(SemEval-2019 임무4)를 묘사하는데 이 임무는 주어진 뉴스 문장에 편견이 존재하는지 분류를 요구한다.우리는 JAVA를 문장 해석 도구로 하고, 버트 기반의 모델로 편차 예측을 하기로 결정했다.그 밖에 우리는 분석을 통해 실험 결과를 보여줄 것이다.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan pesertaan tim Peter-Parker dalam tugas Deteksi Berita Hyperpartisan (SemEval-2019 Task 4), yang membutuhkan untuk mengklasifikasi apakah artikel berita tertentu bias atau tidak. We decided to use JAVA to do the article parsing tool and the BERT-Based model to do the bias prediction.  Selain itu, kita akan menunjukkan hasil eksperimen dengan analisis.', 'sq': 'Kjo gazetë përshkruan pjesëmarrjen e ekipit Peter-Parker në detyrën e zbulimit të lajmeve hiperpartizane (SemEval-2019 Task 4), e cila kërkon të klasifikojë nëse një artikull i dhënë i lajmeve është paragjykim apo jo. Ne vendosëm të përdorim JAVA për të bërë mjetin e analizimit të artikujve dhe modelin e bazuar në BERT për të bërë parashikimin e paragjykimit. Përveç kësaj, do të tregojmë rezultatet e eksperimenteve me analizë.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የፌቴር-ፓርክ የኬፕርፓስታን የዜና አቀማመጥ አድራጊ (SemEval-2019 ስራ 4) ተጨማሪ እንዲያስፈልገው ነው፤ የተሰጠው የዜና ጽሑፍ ውይይት ቢሆን ወይም እንዳይሆን መግለጫ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የሕያVA ጽሑፉን ማዘጋጀት እና የBERT-መሠረት ሞዴል ለመሥራት የሕያዋን ጉዳይ ለመጠቀም ወሰንን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የፈተና ፍሬዎችን በማስተዋል እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'tr': "Bu kagyz toparyň peter-parkeryň Hyperpartisan Haýsy Taýýarlama uzmanynda (SemEval-2019 Görev 4), şol bir täzelikler berilen maýdanyň bias ýa-da däldigini belirtmeli. Biz JAVA'ny maksady parslemek aralygyny we BERT tabanly nusgasyny öngörülmek üçin ulanmagy karar berdik. Mundan soňra, synagyň netijelerini analýusiz bilen görkezip bileris.", 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die team peter-parker se deelnadering in Hyperpartisan Nuusbeskrywing taak (SemEval-2019 Opdrag 4), wat benodig na klassifiseer of 'n gegewe nuusartikel bias is of nie. Ons het besluit om JAVA te gebruik om die artikel verwerking hulpmiddel en die BERT-gebaseerde model te doen om die voorskou van voorskou te doen. Ons sal ook eksperimentresultate met analisie wys.", 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է թիմի Պիտեր-Պարքերի մասնակցությունը Հիպերպարտիզան նորությունների հայտնաբերման գործում (ՍեմԷվալ 2019-ի 4 գործը), որը պահանջում է դասակարգել, արդյոք տվյալ նորությունների հոդվածը կողմնակալ է, թե ոչ: Մենք որոշեցինք օգտագործել ՋԱՎԱ հոդվածների վերլուծության գործիքը և BER-ի հիմնված մոդելը կողմնակի կանխատեսման համար: Ավելին, մենք կցույց տանք փորձարկումների արդյունքները վերլուծության միջոցով:', 'az': "Bu kağıt, Hyperpartisan Haber Detection Task (SemEval-2019 Task 4) ilə team peter-parker'ın iştirakçılığını təsdiqləyir. Bu, verilən haqq maddənin bias olduğunu və ya yoxdur. Biz JAVA'yı məktub ayırma aracını və BERT tabanlı modelini tədbirli tədbirli etmək üçün istifadə etmək üçün qərar verdik. Daha sonra, analizi ilə eksperimentin sonuçlarını göstərəcəyik.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি হাইপার্পার্সিন নিউজ ডিটেকশন কাজ (সেমইভাল-২০১৯ টাস্ক ৪) এর অংশগ্রহণের দলের পিটার-পার্কারের অংশগ্রহণের ব্যাখ্যা করেছে, যা একটি  আমরা জাভিএ ব্যবহার করার সিদ্ধান্ত নিয়েছিলাম পার্সিং টুল এবং বের্ট-ভিত্তিক মডেল করার জন্য যাতে এই বিয়ের ভবিষ্যৎবা এছাড়াও, আমরা পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাব বিশ্লেষণের সাথে।', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sudjelovanje tima peter-parker a u zadatku Hyperpartisan News Detection (zadatak 4. semiEval-2019), koji zahtijeva da klasifikuje da li je određeni novinski članak predrasude ili ne. Odlučili smo da koristimo JAVA kako bi napravili alat za analizu članaka i model na osnovu BERT-a da bi napravili predviđanje predrasude. Osim toga, pokazat ćemo rezultate eksperimenta sa analizom.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meeskonna peter-parkeri osalemist Hyperpartisan News Detection ülesandes (SemEval-2019 Task 4), mis nõuab klassifitseerimist, kas antud uudisteartikl on erapooletu või mitte. Otsustasime kasutada JAVA artikli parsimise tööriista ja BERT-põhist mudelit erapooletuse prognoosimiseks. Lisaks näitame katsetulemusi analüüsiga.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu la participació de Peter-Parker en la tasca de detecció de not ícies hiperpartisanes (SemEval-2019 Task 4), que necessita classificar si un article de notícies és bias o no. We decided to use JAVA to do the article parsing tool and the BERT-Based model to do the bias prediction.  A més, mostrarem resultats d'experiments amb l'anàlisi.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje účast týmu peter-parker na úkolu detekce hyperpartizánních zpráv (SemEval-2019 Task 4), který vyžaduje klasifikaci, zda je daný zpravodajský článek zaujatý či nikoliv. Rozhodli jsme se použít JAVA pro analýzu článků a BERT-Based model pro predikci bias. Dále ukážeme výsledky experimentů s analýzou.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan tiimin peter-parkerin osallistumista Hyperpartisan News Detection -tehtävään (SemEval-2019 Task 4), joka edellyttää luokittelua siitä, onko tietty uutisartikkeli puolueellinen vai ei. Päätimme käyttää JAVAa artikkelin jäsennystyökalun tekemiseen ja BERT-pohjaista mallia harhaennusteen tekemiseen. Lisäksi näytämme koetuloksia analyysin avulla.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את השתתפות של הקבוצה פיטר-פארקר במשימת גילוי חדשות היפרפרטיזן (SemEval-2019 Task 4), אשר דורש לקlassifika אם מאמר חדשות מסוים הוא חיוני או לא. החלטנו להשתמש ב-JAVA כדי לעשות את כלי מעבדת המאמרים והמודל מבוסס על BERT כדי לעשות את החיויון ההתאימות. חוץ מזה, נראה תוצאות ניסויים עם ניתוח.', 'jv': "This paper description the group peter-PARKER's partition in Typerpartisan New detection task We DECIDER DECIDER KANGGORKANGGORKANGGORKANGGORKANGGORKANGGORKANGGORKANGGORKANGGORKANGGORKANGGORKANGGORKANGGORKANGGORKANGGORKANGGORKANGGORKANGGOR Lahan luwih, kéné bakal menehi dadi pancening kawit karo edal.", 'ha': "Wannan karatun na faɗa ɗa ma'abũcin Peter-park na haɗin aiki na Hyperpartsan NewsTirkin (Semeval-2019 Tafiyar 4), wanda yana son ta ƙayyade ko kuma ba ya so ba. Suna yarda da mu yi amfani da JAvA ga aikin makala na parse da misalin BERT-Base dõmin ya yi bayani ga basĩri. Furan haka, zã mu nũna matsalan jarrabai da anadi.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་བུ་ཞུ་གཏུག་མཁན་གྱི་དབུལ་གྱི་ཞུ་གཏུག་ཆགས་པ་དེ་གིས་Hyperpartisan News Detection task(SemEval-2019 Task 4)ནང་དུ་འགྲོ་སྲིད་ཡོད་མིན་ནའང་བ་ཞིབ་དག་གི་ We decided to use JAVA to do the article parsing tool and the BERT-Based model to do the bias prediction. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད།', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje sodelovanje ekipe peter-parker v nalogi Hyperpartizanskega odkrivanja novic (naloga SemEval-2019 4), ki zahteva razvrstitev, ali je določen članek pristranski ali ne. Odločili smo se, da uporabimo JAVA za orodje za razčlenitev člankov in BERT-based model za napoved pristranskosti. Poleg tega bomo prikazali rezultate eksperimentov z analizo.'}
{'en': 'Team Xenophilius Lovegood at SemEval-2019 Task 4 : Hyperpartisanship Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'ar': 'فريق Xenophilius Lovegood في SemEval-2019 المهمة 4: تصنيف الحزبية المفرطة باستخدام الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية', 'es': 'El equipo Xenophilius Lovegood en la Tarea 4 de SemEval-2019: Clasificación del hiperpartidismo mediante redes neuronales convolucionales', 'fr': "Team Xenophilius Lovegood au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 4\xa0: Classification de l'hyperpartisanerie à l'aide de réseaux de neurones convolutifs", 'pt': 'Equipe Xenophilius Lovegood na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 4: Classificação do hiperpartidarismo usando redes neurais convolucionais', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019タスク4 ：畳み込みニューラルネットワークを使用した超党派分類におけるチームクセノフィリウス・ラブグッド', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 4 में टीम Xenophilius Lovegood: Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग कर Hyperpartisanship वर्गीकरण', 'zh': 'Xenophilius Lovegood团队在SemEval-2019务4:用卷积神经网络超党类', 'ru': 'Команда Xenophilius Lovegood на SemEval-2019 Задача 4: Классификация гиперпартийности с использованием сверточных нейронных сетей', 'ga': 'Foireann Xenophilius Lovegood ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 4: Aicmiú Hyperpartisanship ag úsáid Líonraí Néaracha Comhdhlúite', 'el': 'Ομάδα Ξενόφιλος Λάβγκουντ στο Εργασία 4: Ταξινόμηση υπερκομματικότητας με χρήση εξελικτικών νευρωνικών δικτύων', 'hu': 'Xenophilius Lovegood csapat a SemEval-2019 4. feladat: hiperpartizániai osztályozás konvolúciós ideghálózatokkal', 'ka': 'Xenophilius Lovegood სამუშაო- 2019 სამუშაო დავალება 4: Hyperpartisanship Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'it': "Team Xenophilius Lovegood a SemEval-2019 Task 4: Classificazione dell'iperpartigianità utilizzando reti neurali convoluzionali", 'lt': '„Xenophilius Lovegood“ komanda „SemEval-2019“ 4 užduotis: hiperpartisanship Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'kk': 'Xenophilius Lovegood тобы жалғыз- 2019 тапсырма 4: Hyperpartisanship классификация', 'mk': 'Тим Ксенофилиј Ловгегуд на SemEval-2019 задача 4: Класификација на хиперпартизанство користејќи конволуционални неврални мрежи', 'ms': 'Pasukan Xenophilius Lovegood di SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Klasifikasi Hyperpartisanship menggunakan Rangkaian Neural Konveolutional', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 4- ലെ ടീം എക്സോനോഫിലിയുസ് ലോവെഗുഡ്: കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഹൈ', 'mn': 'Xenophilius Lovegood баг SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisanship Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'ro': 'Echipa Xenophilius Lovegood la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 4: Clasificarea hiperpartizanatului folosind Rețelele Neurale Convoluționale', 'pl': 'Zespół Xenophilius Lovegood w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 4: Klasyfikacja hiperpartisancji przy użyciu konwolucyjnych sieci neuronowych', 'no': 'Gruppe Xenophilius Lovegood på semiEval- 2019 Oppgåve 4: Hyperpartisanship klassifikasjon ved bruk av konvolusjonelle neiralnettverk', 'sr': 'Tim Xenophilius Lovegood na semiEval-2019 Task 4: Hiperpartisanska klasifikacija korištenjem konvolucionalnih nervnih mreža', 'si': 'සිනෝෆිලියුස් ලෝවෙගුඩ් කණ්ඩායම් සෙම්වෙල්-2019 වැඩ 4: Hyperpartisanship ක්\u200dරාසිකාරියාව භාවිත කරන්න', 'so': 'Qeybta kooxda Xenophilius Lovegood ee SemEval-2019 Shaqada 4: Shaqada Hyperpartisanisation using Convolution Neural Network', 'mt': 'Tim Xenophilius Lovegood f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 4: Klassifikazzjoni tal-iperpartiġjanat bl-użu ta’ Netwerks Newrali Konveoluzzjonali', 'sv': 'Team Xenophilius Lovegood på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 4: Hyperpartisanship klassificering med hjälp av konvulutionella neurala nätverk', 'ta': 'Team Xenophilius Lovegood at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisanship Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'ur': 'سیموئل-2019 ٹاکس 4 میں تیم سینوفیلیوس لوووگود: ہیپر پارٹینسٹ کلاسیفٹ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đội Xennophilius Lovegood thuộc Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-209: Classification with conolutional Neural Networks', 'nl': 'Team Xenophilius Lovegood bij SemEval-2019 Taak 4: Hyperpartisanship Classificatie met behulp van Convolutional Neural Networks', 'bg': 'Екип Ксенофилий Лавгуд в Задача 4: Класификация на хиперпартизанството чрез конвелуционни неврални мрежи', 'da': 'Team Xenophilius Lovegood ved SemEval-2019 Opgave 4: Hyperpartisanship klassificering ved hjælp af konvolutionelle neurale netværk', 'hr': 'Tim Xenophilius Lovegood na semiEval-2019. zadatak 4: Hiperpartisanalna klasifikacija koristeći konvolucionalne neurone mreže', 'de': 'Team Xenophilius Lovegood bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabenstellung 4: Hyperpartisanship Klassifikation mit Hilfe von Convolutional Neural Networks', 'id': 'Tim Xenophilius Lovegood di SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Klasifikasi hiperpartisanship menggunakan Rangkaian Neural Konvelusional', 'ko': 'Xenophilius Lovegood팀이SemEval-2019임무4: 권적신경망으로 초당파 분류', 'fa': 'تیم زینوفیلیوس لووگود در پایگاه ۲۰۱۹ وظیفه ۴: کلاس\u200cسازی پارکیسانسی با استفاده از شبکه\u200cهای عصبی معمولی', 'sw': 'Timu Xenophilius Lovegood katika kazi ya SemEval-2019', 'tr': 'Topar Xenophilius Lovegood at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisanship Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'af': 'Skep Xenophilius Lovegood by SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 4: Hyperpartisanship Klassifikasie gebruik Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerke', 'sq': 'Ekipi Xenophilius Lovegood në SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisanship Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'am': 'የቡድን Xenophilius Lovegood at SemEval-2019 ስራ 4: Hyperpartisanship Classification using Convolution Neural Network', 'hy': 'Xենոֆիլիուս Լովեգուդ թիմը Սեմեվալ-2019 թվականին 4. հանձնարարություն. Հիպերպարտենսային դասակարգում օգտագործելով հակառակցող նեյրոնային ցանցեր', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisanship Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৯ টাস্ক ৪-এ এক্সোনোফিলিয়াস ল্যাভেগুডের দল: কনভোলেশনাল নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে হাইপার্পার্টিশিপ', 'ca': "L'equip Xenophilius Lovegood a SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisanship Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks", 'bs': 'Team Xenophilius Lovegood na semiEval-2019 Task 4: Hiperpartisanska klasifikacija koristeći konvolucionalne neurone mreže', 'cs': 'Tým Xenophilius Lovegood na SemEval-2019 Úkol 4: Klasifikace hyperstranžanství pomocí konvelučních neuronových sítí', 'et': 'Meeskond Xenophilius Lovegood SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 4: Hüperpartisansuse klassifitseerimine konvolutsiooniliste neurovõrkude abil', 'fi': 'Tiimi Xenophilius Lovegood SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 4: Hyperpartisaanship Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks', 'jv': 'Grup XENOPhilium LOVGOD nang seminval-2011 task 4: Typerpartisanness', 'ha': 'Tafiyar 4: Hyperpartsanship Classification by Congolonal Neural Networks', 'he': 'צוות קסנופיליוס לווגוד ב-SemEval-2019 משימה 4: שיעור היפרפרטיזניות', 'sk': 'Ekipa Xenophilius Lovegood na SemEval-2019 Naloga 4: Klasifikacija hiperpartizanije z uporabo konvolucionalnih živčnih omrežij', 'bo': 'Team Xenophilius Lovegood at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisanship Classification using Convolutional Neural Networks'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our system for the SemEval 2019 Task 4 on hyperpartisan news detection. We build on an existing deep learning approach for sentence classification based on a Convolutional Neural Network. Modifying the original model with additional layers to increase its expressiveness and finally building an ensemble of multiple versions of the model, we obtain an accuracy of 67.52 % and an F1 score of 73.78 % on the main test dataset. We also report on additional experiments incorporating handcrafted features into the CNN and using it as a feature extractor for a linear SVM.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظامنا الخاص بمهمة SemEval 2019 4 الخاصة باكتشاف الأخبار شديدة الحزبية. نحن نبني على نهج التعلم العميق الحالي لتصنيف الجملة على أساس الشبكة العصبية التلافيفية. تعديل النموذج الأصلي بطبقات إضافية لزيادة تعبيره وأخيراً بناء مجموعة من إصدارات متعددة من النموذج ، نحصل على دقة 67.52٪ ودرجة F1 73.78٪ على مجموعة بيانات الاختبار الرئيسية. نُبلغ أيضًا عن تجارب إضافية تتضمن ميزات مصنوعة يدويًا في شبكة CNN واستخدامها كمستخرج ميزة لـ SVM خطي.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestro sistema para la Tarea 4 de SemEval 2019 sobre detección de noticias hiperpartidistas. Nos basamos en un enfoque de aprendizaje profundo existente para la clasificación de oraciones basada en una red neuronal convolucional. Modificando el modelo original con capas adicionales para aumentar su expresividad y, finalmente, construir un conjunto de múltiples versiones del modelo, obtenemos una precisión del 67,52% y una puntuación F1 del 73,78% en el conjunto de datos de prueba principal. También informamos sobre experimentos adicionales que incorporan funciones artesanales en la CNN y que lo utilizan como un extractor de funciones para un SVM lineal.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nosso sistema para a Tarefa 4 do SemEval 2019 sobre detecção de notícias hiperpartidárias. Construímos uma abordagem de aprendizado profundo existente para classificação de sentenças com base em uma rede neural convolucional. Modificando o modelo original com camadas adicionais para aumentar sua expressividade e, finalmente, construindo um conjunto de múltiplas versões do modelo, obtemos uma precisão de 67,52% e uma pontuação F1 de 73,78% no conjunto de dados de teste principal. Também relatamos experimentos adicionais incorporando recursos artesanais na CNN e usando-o como um extrator de recursos para um SVM linear.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre système pour le SemEval 2019 Task 4 sur la détection hyperpartisane des actualités. Nous nous appuyons sur une approche d'apprentissage profond existante pour la classification des phrases basée sur un réseau de neurones convolutifs. En modifiant le modèle original avec des couches supplémentaires pour augmenter son expressivité et finalement en construisant un ensemble de versions multiples du modèle, nous obtenons une précision de 67,52\xa0% et un score F1 de 73,78\xa0% sur le jeu de données de test principal. Nous présentons également des expériences supplémentaires intégrant des caractéristiques artisanales dans le CNN et l'utilisant comme extracteur de caractéristiques pour une SVM linéaire.", 'ja': '本稿では、超党派ニュース検出に関するSemEval 2019タスク4のためのシステムについて説明する。私たちは、畳み込みニューラルネットワークに基づいた文章分類のための既存の深層学習アプローチに基づいています。追加のレイヤーで元のモデルを修正してその表現性を高め、最終的に複数のバージョンのモデルのアンサンブルを構築することで、メインテストデータセットで67.52 ％の精度と73.78 ％のF 1スコアを取得します。また、手作りの機能をCNNに組み込み、線形SVMの機能抽出器として使用する追加の実験についても報告しています。', 'zh': '本文介于SemEval 2019 Task 4超党新闻检测系统。 盖卷积神经网络之见有深学以行句类也。 用额外图层改原始模形以增其表现力,而终构数版之集,于主测试数据集上得67.52%之准确率、73.78%之F1分。 告以手工之整合于CNN,以为线性SVM提取器之实验。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर हाइपरपार्टिजन समाचार का पता लगाने पर SemEval 2019 कार्य 4 के लिए हमारे सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है। हम एक Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के आधार पर वाक्य वर्गीकरण के लिए एक मौजूदा गहरी सीखने के दृष्टिकोण पर निर्माण। अपनी अभिव्यंजकता को बढ़ाने के लिए अतिरिक्त परतों के साथ मूल मॉडल को संशोधित करना और अंत में मॉडल के कई संस्करणों की एक टुकड़ी का निर्माण करना, हम मुख्य परीक्षण डेटासेट पर 67.52% की सटीकता और 73.78% का एफ 1 स्कोर प्राप्त करते हैं। हम सीएनएन में हस्तनिर्मित सुविधाओं को शामिल करने और इसे एक रैखिक एसवीएम के लिए एक सुविधा चिमटा के रूप में उपयोग करने वाले अतिरिक्त प्रयोगों पर भी रिपोर्ट करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наша система для задачи 4 SemEval 2019 по обнаружению гиперпартийных новостей. Мы основываемся на существующем подходе глубокого обучения для классификации предложений на основе сверточной нейронной сети. Модификация исходной модели с дополнительными слоями для повышения ее выразительности и, наконец, построение ансамбля из нескольких версий модели, мы получаем точность 67,52% и оценку F1 73,78% на основном тестовом наборе данных. Мы также сообщаем о дополнительных экспериментах, включающих в CNN функции ручной работы и использующих его в качестве извлекателя функций для линейной виртуальной машины защиты.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcóras le haghaidh Tasc 4 SemEval 2019 ar bhrath nuachta hyperpartisan. Tógaimid ar chur chuige domhainfhoghlama atá ann cheana féin maidir le haicmiú pianbhreithe bunaithe ar Líonra Néarthach Comhtháite. Agus an tsamhail bhunaidh á mhodhnú le sraitheanna breise chun a léiritheacht a mhéadú agus ar deireadh ag tógáil ensemble de leaganacha iolracha den mhúnla, faighimid cruinneas 67.52% agus scór F1 de 73.78% ar an bpríomhthacar sonraí tástála. Tuairiscímid freisin ar thurgnaimh bhreise a ionchorpraíonn gnéithe lámhdhéanta isteach sa CNN agus a úsáid mar eastóscadh gné le haghaidh SVM líneach.', 'ka': 'ჩვენი სისტემა SemEval 2019-ის სამუშაო დავაკეთება 4-ზე ჰიპერპორტიზანი ინფორმაციის განახლებაზე. ჩვენ კლასიფიკაციის კლასიფიკაციისთვის მიმდინარე ძალიან სწავლებელი პროგრამეტზე დავყენებთ კონტუალური ნეიროლური ქსელზე. მოდელის მრავალი ვერსინბლის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი მოდელის დამატებით, ჩვენ 67,52% და 73,78% დამატებით მივიღეთ F1 მოდელის შესაბამისი დამატებით. ჩვენ შეგვიძლია დამატებული ექსპერიმენტების შესახებ, რომელიც CNN-ში შექმნილი ფუნქციების შესახებ და გამოიყენებთ ის როგორც ფუნქციების ექსპერიმენტები line', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημά μας για την εργασία 4 για την ανίχνευση υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων. Βασιζόμαστε σε μια υπάρχουσα προσέγγιση βαθιάς μάθησης για την ταξινόμηση προτάσεων βασισμένη σε ένα Σύλληπτο Νευρικό Δίκτυο. Τροποποιώντας το αρχικό μοντέλο με πρόσθετα στρώματα για την αύξηση της εκφραστικότητας του και τελικά χτίζοντας ένα σύνολο πολλαπλών εκδόσεων του μοντέλου, αποκτούμε ακρίβεια 67,52% και βαθμολογία 73,78% στο κύριο σύνολο δεδομένων δοκιμής. Επίσης, αναφέρουμε πρόσθετα πειράματα που ενσωματώνουν χειροποίητα χαρακτηριστικά στο CNN και το χρησιμοποιούν ως εξαγωγέα χαρακτηριστικών για μια γραμμική SVM.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2019 Task 4 rendszerét a hiperpartizán hírek felismerésére. Egy meglévő mélytanulási megközelítésre építünk a mondatok besorolására, amelyek konvolúciós ideghálózaton alapulnak. Az eredeti modell további rétegekkel történő módosításával a modell expresszivitásának növelése érdekében és végül a modell több verziójából álló együttesének kialakításával 67,52%-os pontosságot és 73,78%-os F1 pontszámot érünk el a fő tesztadatokon. További kísérletekről is beszámolunk, amelyek kézzel készített funkciókat foglalnak magukba a CNN-be, és amelyeket lineáris SVM-hez használnak.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il nostro sistema per il SemEval 2019 Task 4 sul rilevamento delle notizie iperpartigiane. Costruiamo su un approccio di deep learning esistente per la classificazione delle frasi basato su una Rete Neurale Convoluzionale. Modificando il modello originale con strati aggiuntivi per aumentarne l'espressività e infine costruendo un insieme di versioni multiple del modello, otteniamo una precisione del 67,52% e un punteggio F1 del 73,78% sul set di dati principali di test. Riportiamo anche su ulteriori esperimenti che incorporano caratteristiche artigianali nella CNN e lo utilizzano come estrattore di funzionalità per una SVM lineare.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2019 жыл бөлшегінің 4- тапсырманың біздің жүйеңізді гиперпартизалық жаңалықтарды анықтау үшін таңдайды. Қосымшалық невралдық желіне негізделген сұлбалардың классификациясы үшін қолданыстағы тәртіпті оқыту арқылы құрамыз. Бастапқы үлгісін қосымша қабаттармен өзгерту үшін оның өрнектілігін өзгерту және соңында үлгісінің бірнеше нұсқаларын құру үшін, негізгі сынақтар жиынында 67,52% және F1 нұсқасы 73,78% болады. Сонымен қатар, қолмен құрылған мүмкіндіктерді CNN-ге ендіру және оны сызық SVM үшін мүмкіндіктерді экстрактор ретінде қолданатын эксперименттер туралы хабарладық.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашиот систем за SemEval 2019 задача 4 за хиперпартиска детекција на вести. We build on an existing deep learning approach for sentence classification based on a Convolutional Neural Network.  Со измена на оригиналниот модел со дополнителни слоеви за зголемување на неговата експресивност и конечно изградба на ансембл на повеќе верзии на моделот, добиваме точност од 67,52 отсто и оценка F1 од 73,78 отсто на главниот тестовен податок. Исто така, известуваме за дополнителни експерименти кои вклучуваат рачно направени карактеристики во ЦНН и го користат како екстрактор на карактеристики за линијарен СВМ.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma mūsų sistema, skirta 2019 m. SemEval 4 uždaviniui dėl hiperpartinių žinių aptikimo. Mes remiamės esamu gilaus mokymosi metodu klasifikuojant sakinius, grindžiamu konvoliuciniu neurologiniu tinklu. Pakeisti pradinį model į papildomais sluoksniais siekiant padidinti jo išraišką ir pagaliau sukurti kelių modelio versijų rinkinį, mes gauname 67,52 % tikslumą ir 73,78 % F1 balas pagrindiniuose bandymų duomenų rinkiniuose. Taip pat pranešame apie papildomus eksperimentus, kuriuose į CNN įtraukiamos rankinės savybės ir naudojamos kaip linijinio SVM savybės ekstraktorius.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem kita untuk SemEval 2019 Tugas 4 mengenai pengesan berita hyperpartisan. Kami membina pada pendekatan pembelajaran yang terdapat dalam untuk klasifikasi kalimat berdasarkan Rangkaian Neural Convolutional. Modifying the original model with additional layers to increase its expressiveness and finally building an ensemble of multiple versions of the model, we obtain an accuracy of 67.52% and an F1 score of 73.78% on the main test dataset.  Kami juga melaporkan eksperimen tambahan yang memasukkan ciri-ciri buatan tangan ke CNN dan menggunakannya sebagai pengekstraktor ciri-ciri untuk SVM linear.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റം സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസാന്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്ത കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനെ വി We build on an existing deep learning approach for sentence classification based on a Convolutional Neural Network.  പ്രധാന പരീക്ഷണ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂടുതല്\u200d തടാകങ്ങള്\u200d വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുവാനും അവസാനം മോഡലിന്റെ പല പതിപ്പുകളുടെയും കൂടുതല്\u200d മാതൃകയുമായി മാറ്റുന്ന മോഡ കൈകൈകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന സിഎന്\u200dഎനിലേക്ക് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന കൂടുതല്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളെപ്പറ്റി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു. അതിനെ', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас 2019 оны SemEval-ын 4-р ажлын системийг гиперпартизан мэдээг олох тухай тайлбарладаг. Бид суралцах гүн гүнзгий суралцах арга зам дээр Конvolutional Neural Network-ын үндсэн үг хуваалцах боломжтой. Эхний загварыг нэмэлт хэлбэрээр өөрчилж, загварын олон хувилбаруудыг нэмэгдүүлэхэд бид 67.52% болон үндсэн мэдээллийн хэлбэрээр F1 тоо 73.78% байна. Мөн бид илүү нэмэлт туршилтуудыг CNN-д гар бүтээгдэхүүнийг нэмж, шулуун SVM-ийн хувьд ашиглаж байна.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema tagħna għas-SemEval 2019 Task 4 dwar id-detezzjoni tal-aħbarijiet iperpartiġjani. Aħna nibnu fuq approċċ eżistenti ta’ tagħlim profond għall-klassifikazzjoni tas-sentenzi bbażat fuq Netwerk Newrali Konveoluzzjonali. Il-modifika tal-mudell oriġinali b’saffi addizzjonali biex tiżdied l-espressività tiegħu u fl-aħħar nett il-bini ta’ ensemble ta’ verżjonijiet multipli tal-mudell, inkisbu preċiżjoni ta’ 67.52% u punteġġ F1 ta’ 73.78% fuq is-sett tad-dejta ewlieni tat-testijiet. Aħna rrappurtaw ukoll esperimenti addizzjonali li jinkorporaw karatteristiċi maħduma bl-idejn fis-CNN u li jużawha bħala estrattur tal-karatteristiċi għal SVM lineari.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet vårt for semiEval 2019 oppgåva 4 om hyperpartisan nyhetsinformasjon. Vi bygger på ein eksisterande dyp læringstilnærming for setningsklassifikasjon basert på eit konvolusjonell neuralnettverk. Endra det opprinnelige modellet med fleire lag for å auka uttrykkeligheten og til slutt bygge eit ensembel av fleire versjonar av modellet, får vi nøyaktig 67,52% og eit F1- poeng med 73,78% på hovuddatasettet. Vi rapporterer også om fleire eksperimenter som inkluderer handskjrafte funksjonar i CNN og brukar det som ein funksjonsekstraktor for ein lineær SVM.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem za semiEval 2019. zadatak 4 o detekciji hiperpartizanskih vesti. Izgradili smo na postojećem dubokom pristupu učenja za klasifikaciju rečenica na osnovu konvolucionalne Neuralne mreže. Upravo modificiranje originalnog modela sa dodatnim slojevima da bi povećali izrazitost i konačno izgradili ensember višestrukih verzija modela, dobili smo tačnost od 67,52% i rezultat F1 od 73,78% na glavnom testnom setu podataka. Takoðe izvještavamo o dodatnim eksperimentima koji ukljuèuju rukopisane funkcije u CNN i koristimo ga kao ekstraktor za linearnu SVM-u.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz system dla SemEval 2019 Task 4 dotyczący wykrywania wiadomości hiperspartyjnych. Opieramy się na istniejącym podejściu głębokiego uczenia do klasyfikacji zdań opartym na Konwolucyjnej Sieci Neuralnej. Modyfikując oryginalny model o dodatkowe warstwy w celu zwiększenia jego ekspresyjności i na koniec budując zespół wielu wersji modelu, uzyskujemy dokładność 67,52% oraz wynik F1 73,78% na głównym zbiorze danych testowych. Raportujemy również o dodatkowych eksperymentach włączających ręcznie wykonane funkcje do CNN i wykorzystujących go jako ekstraktora cech dla liniowego SVM.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul nostru pentru SemEval 2019 Task 4 privind detectarea știrilor hiperpartizane. Ne bazăm pe o abordare existentă de învățare profundă pentru clasificarea frazelor bazată pe o Rețea Neurală Convoluțională. Modificarea modelului original cu straturi suplimentare pentru a crește expresivitatea sa și, în cele din urmă, construirea unui ansamblu de mai multe versiuni ale modelului, obținem o precizie de 67,52% și un scor F1 de 73,78% pe setul principal de date de testare. De asemenea, raportăm despre experimente suplimentare care încorporează caracteristici artizanale în CNN și utiliză-l ca extractor de caracteristici pentru un SVM liniar.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ පද්ධතිය සෙම්වෙල් 2019 වැඩේ 4 වැඩේ හායිපර් පාර්ටිසන් වාර්තාව හොයාගන්න. අපි දැනගෙන ඉගෙනගන්න තියෙන්නේ ගොඩක් අභිවේදනයක් වාර්තාවක් විශේෂය සඳහා වාර්තාවක් සිද්ධ මූලික මෝඩල් එක්ක අතර ස්ථානය සමග විශ්වාස කරන්න සහ අන්තිමේදී මෝඩල් එක්ක විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි මූලික සංවිධානයේ සංවිධානයක් 67.52% සහ F අපි සමහර වාර්තා කරන්නේ අතර පරීක්ෂණාවල් ගැන, අත්තර්පණය සම්පූර්ණය CNN වලට සම්පූර්ණය කරලා ඒක ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ලේ', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka SemEval 2019 shaqo 4 oo ku saabsan baaritaanka warbixinta badan. We build on an existing deep learning approach for sentence classification based on a Convolutional Neural Network.  Isbeddelka modellka asalka ah oo ku qoraya layers dheeraad ah si uu ugu kordhiyo aragtida iyo ugu dambaysta u dhiso tusaale noocyo badan, waxaan helaynaa saxda 67.52% iyo koox F1 oo ah 73.78% oo ku qoran taariikhda imtixaanka ugu weyn. Sidoo kale waxaynu wargelinaynaa jirrabo dheeraad ah oo ku qoraya CNN-da, waxaadna u isticmaalaysaa xarunta SVM.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt system för SemEval 2019 Task 4 om hyperpartisan nyhetsdetektering. Vi bygger på en befintlig djupinlärningsmetod för meningsklassificering baserad på ett Convolutional Neural Network. Genom att modifiera den ursprungliga modellen med ytterligare lager för att öka dess uttrycksfullhet och slutligen bygga en ensemble av flera versioner av modellen, får vi en noggrannhet på 67,52% och en F1 poäng på 73,78% på huvudtestdatauppsättningen. Vi rapporterar också om ytterligare experiment som införlivar handgjorda funktioner i CNN och använder det som en funktionsextraktor för en linjär SVM.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் SemEval 2019 மின்னஞ்சல் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பு மீது எங்கள் அமைப்பை விவரிக்கிறது. நாங்கள் ஒரு தொகுதியான நியூரல் வலைப்பின்னல் அடிப்படையிலான வாக்கியத்தை வகைப்படுத்துவதற்கு ஏற்கனவே உள்ள ஆழம முதல் மாதிரியின் கூடுதல் அடுக்குகளை அதிகரிக்க மற்றும் இறுதியாக மாதிரியின் பல பதிப்புகளை உருவாக்குகிறது, நாம் முக்கிய சோதனை தரவுத்தளத்தில் ஒரு சரியான மதிப்பு 6 நாம் கூடுதல் பரிசோதனைகளை CNN-ல் சேர்க்கும் கையில் சேர்க்கும் பண்புகளை மற்றும் ஒரு கோடு SVM க்கு ஒரு தனிப்பயன் வெளியீட்டாக்', 'ur': 'This paper describes our system for the SemEval 2019 Task 4 on hyperpartisan news detection. ہم ایک عمدہ سیکھنے کی طریقہ پر جماعت کے کلاسپیٹ کے لئے ایک عمدہ سیکھنے کی طریقہ بنا رہے ہیں اصلی موڈل کو اضافہ لہروں کے ساتھ بدل دینا اور آخر میں موڈل کے بہت سی نسخہ کا انٹامبل بنانا، ہم 67.52% اور 73.78% F1 سکوٹ کو پائیں گے۔ ہم نے اضافہ آزمائش کے بارے میں بھی گزارش دی ہے جو اسن سی ان میں ہاتھ کرپٹ کئے ہوئے فرشتوں میں شامل ہوتے ہیں اور اسے خطوط SVM کے لئے ایک فرصت اضافہ کرنے والا بناتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz SemEval 2019, hyperpartisan news aniqlashda vazifaning 4 vazifasini anglatadi. Biz tashqari Neural tarmoq asosida gapiruvchi darajalashtirish uchun muvaffaqiyatli o'rganish muvaffaqiyatlarini yaratimiz. Name Biz CNN'ga qo'llab qo'llangan xossalarni qo'shish uchun qoʻshish imtiyozlar haqida xabar beramiz va uni linear SVM uchun imkoniyatlar ekstrator sifatida foydalanamiz.", 'vi': 'Bài báo này mô tả hệ thống của chúng ta với nhiệm vụ Semkhai mạc 209 về việc phát hiện tin du kích. Chúng tôi dựa trên một phương pháp học sâu về mức độ phân loại án dựa trên mạng thần kinh có liên kết. Thay đổi kiểu mẫu gốc với nhiều lớp thêm để tăng biểu hiện của nó và cuối cùng xây dựng một kết hợp của nhiều phiên bản của mô hình, chúng ta có độ chính xác của 67 Chúng tôi còn báo cáo thêm về các thí nghiệm thêm gắn các tính năng tự động vào CNN và sử dụng nó làm bộ trích xuất cho một SVM tuyến.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва нашата система за задача 4 за откриване на хиперпартизани новини. Ние изграждаме върху съществуващ подход за дълбоко учене за класификация на изреченията въз основа на конвелуционна неврална мрежа. Модифицирайки оригиналния модел с допълнителни слоеве, за да увеличим експресивността му и накрая изграждайки ансамбъл от множество версии на модела, получаваме точност от 67.52% и оценка от 73.78% на основния тестов набор от данни. Също така докладваме за допълнителни експерименти, включващи ръчно изработени функции в CNN и използвайки го като екстрактор на функции за линеен SVM.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem za otkrivanje vijesti u polu Evalu 2019. zadatak 4 o hiperpartizanu. Na postojećem dubokom pristupu učenja za klasifikaciju kazne na temelju konvolucionalne neurone mreže. Upravo modificiranje originalnog modela s dodatnim slojevima kako bi se povećala izrazitost i konačno izgradila ensember višestrukih verzija modela, dobili smo preciznost od 67,52% i rezultat F1 od 73,78% na glavnom testnom setu podataka. Također izvješćujemo o dodatnim eksperimentima uključujući rukopisane karakteristike u CNN-u i koristiti ga kao ekstraktor karakteristike za linearnu SVM-u.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores system til SemEval 2019 Task 4 om hyperpartisan nyhedsdetektering. Vi bygger på en eksisterende deep learning tilgang til sætningsklassificering baseret på et Convolutional Neural Network. Ved at ændre den oprindelige model med yderligere lag for at øge dens udtryksevne og endelig opbygge et ensemble af flere versioner af modellen, opnår vi en nøjagtighed på 67,52% og en F1 score på 73,78% på de vigtigste testdatasæt. Vi rapporterer også om yderligere eksperimenter, der indarbejder håndlavede funktioner i CNN og bruger det som en feature extractor til en lineær SVM.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft ons systeem voor de SemEval 2019 Task 4 op hyperpartizane nieuwsdetectie. We bouwen voort op een bestaande deep learning aanpak voor zinsclassificatie op basis van een Convolutional Neural Network. Door het originele model te wijzigen met extra lagen om de expressiviteit te verhogen en uiteindelijk een ensemble van meerdere versies van het model te bouwen, verkrijgen we een nauwkeurigheid van 67,52% en een F1 score van 73,78% op de belangrijkste test dataset. We rapporteren ook over aanvullende experimenten die handgemaakte functies in de CNN integreren en gebruiken als feature extractor voor een lineaire SVM.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unser System für die SemEval 2019 Task 4 zur hyperparteiischen Nachrichtenerkennung. Wir bauen auf einem bestehenden Deep Learning Ansatz zur Satzklassifizierung auf Basis eines Convolutional Neural Network auf. Durch Modifikation des Originalmodells mit zusätzlichen Ebenen, um seine Ausdruckskraft zu erhöhen und schließlich den Aufbau eines Ensembles aus mehreren Versionen des Modells, erhalten wir eine Genauigkeit von 67,52% und eine F1-Punktzahl von 73,78% auf dem Haupttestdatensatz. Wir berichten auch über zusätzliche Experimente, die handgefertigte Features in das CNN integrieren und es als Feature Extractor für ein lineares SVM verwenden.', 'id': 'This paper describes our system for the SemEval 2019 Task 4 on hyperpartisan news detection.  Kami membangun pendekatan belajar dalam untuk klasifikasi kalimat berdasarkan Jaringan Neural Konvelusional. Mengubah model asli dengan lapisan tambahan untuk meningkatkan ekspresivitasnya dan akhirnya membangun sebuah ensemble dari berbagai versi model, kita mendapatkan akurasi 67,52% dan skor F1 73,78% pada set data ujian utama. Kami juga melaporkan eksperimen tambahan yang memasukkan fitur buatan tangan ke CNN dan menggunakannya sebagai ekstraktor fitur untuk SVM linear.', 'ko': '본고는 SemEval 2019 퀘스트 4에서 초당파 뉴스 검측에 관한 시스템을 묘사한다.우리는 기존의 권적신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 문장 분류 심도 있는 학습 방법을 바탕으로 한다.추가 층을 추가하여 원시 모델을 수정하여 표현 능력을 향상시키고 최종적으로 모델의 여러 버전의 통합을 구축함으로써 우리는 메인 테스트 데이터 집합에서 67.52%의 정확도와 73.78%의 F1 점수를 얻었다.수작업으로 만들어진 특징을 CNN에 통합하고 이를 선형 SVM의 특징 추출기로 사용하는 다른 실험도 보고했다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم ما را برای کشف اخبار هایپر پارتیسان برای تابع ۱۹۲۹ توصیف می\u200cکند. ما بر روی یک روش درس عمیق موجود برای محرمانه کردن مجازات بر اساس یک شبکه عصبی معمولی ساختیم. تغییر مدل اصلی با لایه\u200cهای اضافی برای افزایش استفاده\u200cاش و بالاخره ساختن یک مجموعه از نسخه\u200cهای چندین از مدل، دقیق 67.52% و یک نمونه F1 از 73.78% در مجموعه داده\u200cهای اصلی آزمایش می\u200cگیریم. ما همچنین در مورد آزمایشات اضافه\u200cای گزارش می\u200cکنیم که شامل ویژه\u200cهای دستی\u200cساخته شده\u200cاند در CNN و از آن استفاده می\u200cکنیم به عنوان ویژه\u200cهای اضافه\u200cکننده برای یک SVM خطی.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wetu kwa ajili ya SemEval 2019 Kazi 4 kuhusu kutambuliwa kwa habari za upande mkubwa. Tunajenga kwenye mbinu za kujifunza za kina kwa kutangaza hukumu kwa kutumia Mtandao wa Neural wa Kujitolea. Kubadilisha mtindo wa asili na vipande vya ziada ili kuongeza ufahamu wake na hatimaye kujenga mifano mbalimbali ya mtindo huo, tunapata uhakika wa asilimia 67.52 na score ya F1 ya asilimia 73.78 kwenye seti ya taarifa muhimu. Pia tunaripoti kuhusu majaribio mengine yanayojumuisha vipengele vya mkono vilivyopangwa kwenye CNN na kwa kutumia matumizi yake kama mvuto wa mstari wa SVM.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz 2019-njy SemEval 2019-nji Görevi 4-nji haýratyn tanyş barada sistemimizi tassyýar. Çözümler klasifikasynda bolan derin öwrenmek taýýarlamasynda döredýäris. Öňki nusganyň esasy çykyşlygyny artmak üçin ilat kalamlar bilen üýtgetmek we niň soňunda nusganyň birnäçe wersiýasyny gurmak üçin bu nusganyň derejesi 67.52% we esasy çykyşlygynda F1 अ 73.78% derejesi bar. Biz hem el kesişen örneklerini CNN'a dahil etmek we ony çyzgyly SVM üçin bir örnek çyzgyrjak bolup ulanýarys.", 'sq': 'Kjo letër përshkruan sistemin tonë për SemEval 2019 Task 4 për zbulimin e lajmeve hiperpartizane. Ne ndërtojmë në një metodë ekzistuese mësimi të thellë për klasifikimin e fjalëve bazuar në një rrjet nervor konvolutiv. Ndryshimi i modelit origjinal me shtresa shtesë për të rritur ekspresivitetin e tij dhe më në fund ndërtimi i një ansambli të versioneve të shumta të modelit, ne arrijmë një saktësi prej 67.52% dhe një rezultat F1 prej 73.78% në grupin kryesor të të të dhënave të testit. Ne raportojmë gjithashtu mbi eksperimente shtesë që përfshijnë karakteristika të ndërtuara me dorë në CNN dhe e përdorin atë si një ekstraktor karakteristike për një SVM linear.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf ons stelsel vir die SemEval 2019 Opdrag 4 op hiperpartisan nuusbeskrywing. Ons bou op 'n bestaande diep leer toegang vir seting klasifikasie gebaseer op 'n Konvolusieele Neurale Netwerk. Om die oorspronklike model te verander met addisionele laagte om sy uitdrukking te verhoog en eindelik 'n ensemble van veelvuldige weergawes van die model te bou, kry ons 'n presies van 67.52% en 'n F1 telling van 73.78% op die hoofde toets datastel. Ons rapporteer ook oor addisionele eksperimente wat die handkruipende funksies in die CNN inkorporeer en dit as 'n funksie ekstraktor vir 'n lineêre SVM gebruik.", 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր համակարգը 2019 թվականի "Սեմեվալ 2019"-ի "Հիպերկայացի նորությունների հայտնաբերման" 4-ի համար: Մենք կառուցում ենք գոյություն ունեցող խորը սովորելու մոտեցում նախադասությունների դասակարգման համար, որը հիմնված է հակառավարական նյարդային ցանցի վրա: Փոփոխելով սկզբնական մոդելը ավելացնող շերտերով, որպեսզի բարձրացնենք դրա արտահայտությունը և վերջապես կառուցենք մոդելի բազմաթիվ տարբերակների համակարգը, մենք ստանում ենք 67.52 տոկոսի ճշգրտություն և F1-ի 73.78 տոկոսի հիմնական փորձարկումների տվյալ Մենք նաև զեկույց ենք տալիս ավելին փորձարկումների մասին, որոնք ներառում են ձեռագործված հատկանիշներ CNN-ի մեջ և օգտագործում են այն որպես գծային ԱՎՄ-ի հատկանիշներ ստացող:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt 2019-ci SemEval Task 4 sistemimizi hiperpartisan xəbərləri keşfetməsi haqqında tanıyır. Biz Convolutional Neural Network vasitəsilə cümlələr klasifikasyonu üçün dərin öyrənmə metodlarına qururuq. Vəzifəni artırmaq və modelinin çoxlu versiyonlarının ensembli inşa etmək üçün orijinal modelini əlavə sütunlarla dəyişdirmək üçün 67,52% və başqa sınaq verilənlərin dəyişdirilməsi üçün F1 dəyişdirilməsi 73,78%. Biz də CNN-ə əl yaratdığı xüsusiyyətlər və onu linear SVM üçün xüsusiyyət ekstraktörü olaraq istifadə edirik.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি হাইপার্পার্সিনের সংবাদ সনাক্তির ব্যাপারে আমাদের সিমইভাল ২০১৯ টাকা ৪ কাজের ব্যাখ্য আমরা একটি কনভোলেশনাল নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক ভিত্তিতে বিদ্যমান একটি গভীর শিক্ষার পদ্ধতি নির্মাণ করি। মূল মডেল পরিবর্তন করে তার প্রকৃতি বৃদ্ধি করতে এবং শেষ পর্যন্ত মডেলের বেশ কয়েকটি সংস্করণ তৈরি করতে পারে, আমরা প্রধান পরীক্ষার ডেটাসেটে ৬৭. ৫২% এবং ৭৩. এছাড়াও আমরা সিএনএন-এর মধ্যে অন্তর্ভুক্ত বৈশিষ্ট্যের পরীক্ষা সম্পর্কে রিপোর্ট করি এবং এটি লাইনিয়ার এসভিএমের জন্য এক বৈশিষ্ট্যের এক', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ለSemEval 2019 ስራ 4 ላይ በhyperpartisan ዜና ማግኘት የስርዓታችንን ግለጻል፡፡ በኮንቦሎሳዊ ኔural መረብ ላይ በመሠረት ለፍርድ መግለጫ ጥልቅ ትምህርት መግለጫ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የአድራዊ ሞዴል በተጨማሪው ደረጃዎች ላይ አካሄዱን ለመጨመር እና በኋለኛውም የሞዴል መልዕክቶችን ለመሥራት ምሳሌ አግኝተናል፡፡ እና በCNN ላይ የተጨማሪን እጆቹ እጃቸውን በሚያሳስቡ ስህተቶች ላይ እናስታውቃለን እና ለጥያቄ SVM የስርዓት ምርጫዎች እናስጠጋታለን፡፡', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem za semiEval 2019. zadatak 4 o otkrivanju hiperpartizanskih vijesti. Mi izgradimo na postojećem dubokom pristupu učenja za klasifikaciju kazne na osnovu konvolucionalne neurone mreže. Upravo modificiranje originalnog modela s dodatnim slojevima da bi povećala izrazitost i konačno izgradila ensemble višestrukih verzija modela, dobili smo tačnost od 67,52% i rezultat F1 od 73,78% na glavnom testnom setu podataka. Također izvješćujemo o dodatnim eksperimentima uključujući rukopisane karakteristike u CNN i koristeći ga kao ekstraktor karakteristike za linearnu SVM.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el nostre sistema de la tasca 4 de SemEval 2019 sobre la detecció de notícies hiperpartisanes. Construim un enfocament d'aprenentatge profund existent per a classificar frases basat en una xarxa neuronal convolucional. Modificant el model original amb capes adicionals per augmentar la seva expressivitat i finalment construint un conjunt de múltiples versions del model, obtenim una precisió del 67,52% i una puntuació F1 del 73,78% en el conjunt de dades de prova principal. També informem d'experiments adicionals incorporant característiques artificials al CNN i utilitzant-lo com a extractor de característiques d'un SVM linear.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš systém pro SemEval 2019 Task 4 na detekci hyperstranických zpráv. Stavíme na existujícím přístupu hlubokého učení pro klasifikaci vět založeném na Convoluční neuronové síti. Upravením původního modelu o další vrstvy pro zvýšení jeho expresivity a nakonec sestavením souboru více verzí modelu získáme přesnost 67,52% a F1 skóre 73,78% na hlavním testovacím datu. Podáváme také zprávy o dalších experimentech zahrnujících ručně vyráběné prvky do CNN a využívajících jej jako extraktor prvků pro lineární SVM.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse meie süsteemi SemEval 2019 Task 4 hüperpartisansete uudiste tuvastamiseks. Me tugineme olemasolevale sügavõppe lähenemisviisile lausete klassifitseerimiseks, mis põhineb konvolutsioonilisel neurovõrgustikul. Muudates algset mudelit täiendavate kihtidega, et suurendada selle ekspressiivsust ja ehitades lõpuks mudeli mitmest versioonist koosneva ansambli, saavutame põhiandmekogumi täpsuse 67,52% ja F1 skoori 73,78%. Samuti anname aru täiendavatest katsetest, mis sisaldavad CNN-i käsitöö funktsioone ja kasutavad seda lineaarse SVM-i funktsioonide ekstraktorina.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan järjestelmäämme SemEval 2019 Task 4 hyperpartisaanien uutisten havaitsemista varten. Kehitämme olemassa olevaa syväoppimista lauseiden luokitteluun, joka perustuu konvolutionaaliseen hermoverkostoon. Muokkaamalla alkuperäistä mallia lisäkerroksilla sen ekspressiivisyyden lisäämiseksi ja lopulta rakentamalla joukon mallista useita versioita, saamme 67,52% tarkkuuden ja 73,78% F1-pisteen päätestiaineistosta. Raportoimme myös lisäkokeista, jotka sisälsivät käsin tehtyjä ominaisuuksia CNN:ään ja käyttivät sitä ominaisuuden uuttajana lineaarisessa SVM:ssä.', 'jv': 'Bu peutel rambarang kelompok sistemi kanggo Kemerdekaan seminval 2011 task 4 nang kelompok Haberpartisan. Awakdhéwé nggawe barang nggawe deep-Learn Method kanggo Kemerdekaan Kemerdekaan Rusak nambah model sing dumadhi gambar nganggep Layer dumadhi kanggo nggawe kesempresan sampeyan karo hal dadi wis ambah versi dadi sing model, dhéwé butawak dhéwé wis rakyat sampeyan saboh tanggal sebelah, sampeyan sampeyan kart Awak dhéwé mungko perintah sing tambah nggawe manut karo pawaran manut nang online lan gambar nggawe barang manut karo SVM linear.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naš sistem za nalogo 4 SemEval 2019 o odkrivanju hiperpartizanskih novic. Gradimo na obstoječem pristopu globokega učenja za klasifikacijo stavkov, ki temelji na konvolucijski nevronski mreži. S spremembo originalnega modela z dodatnimi plastmi za povečanje njegove ekspresivnosti in končno izdelavo ansambla več različic modela smo pridobili natančnost 67,52% in rezultat F1 73,78% na glavnem testnem naboru podatkov. Poročamo tudi o dodatnih eksperimentih, ki v CNN vključujejo ročno izdelane funkcije in ga uporabljajo kot ekstraktor funkcij za linearni SVM.', 'ha': "This paper describes our system for the SemEval 2019 Task 4 on hyperpartisan news detection.  Tuna samar da wani matsayi mai ƙaranci ga fassarar azãba a kan kwamfyutan Neural. Yana canza shirin ayuka na farko da zane-zane don ya ƙãra alama masu iya bayyani kuma a ƙarami, za'a samar da wata emboli na tsohon sigogi masu yawa na motel, za'a sami tsari na 67.52% da nau'in F1 na 73.78% kan danne na ƙarami. Tuna buga wani jarrabi masu ƙaranci da ke shigar da wasu feature na hannayen da suka samu cikin CNN kuma Muke amfani da shi kamar wata masu hushi wa SvM mai linja.", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את המערכת שלנו למשימה 4 של SemEval 2019 על גילוי חדשות hyperpartisan. אנו בונים על גישה למידה עמוקה קיימת לסיוג משפטים בהתבסס על רשת נוירולית משתנה. שינוי הדוגמא המקורית עם שכבות נוספות כדי להגביר את היחסינות שלה ולבסוף לבנות אסמבל של גרסאות רבות של הדוגמא, אנחנו מקבלים מדויקה של 67.52% וציון F1 של 73.78% על קבוצת הנתונים המרכזית. We also report on additional experiments incorporating handcrafted features into the CNN and using it as a feature extractor for a linear SVM.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་འཇིག་པ་༢༠༠༩་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་དོན་ལྡན་༤ ང་ཚོས་སྔོན་ཡོད་པའི་སྐྱོན་རིམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱས་པ་ལས་ཚིག་རྟགས་སྔོན་གྱི་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག་དང་མཐ Modifying the original model with additional layers to increase its expressiveness and finally building an ensemble of multiple versions of the model, we obtain an accuracy of 67.52% and an F1 score of 73.78% on the main test dataset. ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་ལག་ཆ་གཞན་ཐོག་ལས་སྙན་ཞུ་བ་ནི་ལག་བཟོས་པའི་ཆ་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཚོས་CNN་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པ་ཞིག་ལ་སྤྱོད་རོགས'}
{'en': 'The Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan News Detector at SemEval-2019 Task 4', 'ar': 'كاشف أخبار سالي سميدلي التشعبي في مسابقة SemEval-2019 4', 'es': 'El detector hiperpartidista de noticias de Sally Smedley en la Tarea 4 de SemEval-2019', 'fr': 'Le détecteur de nouvelles hyperpartisan Sally Smedley à la tâche 4 SEMEVAL-2019', 'pt': 'O detector de notícias hiperpartidário Sally Smedley no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 4', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019タスク4のSally Smedley Hyperpartisanニュース検出器', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019任4者Sally Smedley超党新闻探测器', 'hi': 'सैली Smedley Hyperpartisan समाचार डिटेक्टर SemEval-2019 कार्य 4 पर', 'ru': 'Гиперпартийный новостной детектор Sally Smedley на выставке SemEval-2019 Задача 4', 'ga': 'An Brathadóir Nuachta Hyperpartisan Sally Smedley ag Tasc 4 SemEval-2019', 'hu': 'A Sally Smedley hiperpartizán hírek detektor a SemEval-2019 feladat 4', 'el': 'Ο Υπερκομματικός Ανιχνευτής ειδήσεων Σάλι Σμέντλι στο έργο 4', 'ka': 'Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan News Detector at SemEval-2019 Task 4', 'kk': 'Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan News Detector at semiEval-2019 Task 4', 'it': 'Il rivelatore di notizie iperpartigiane Sally Smedley a SemEval-2019 Task 4', 'mk': 'Сели Смедли Хиперпартисански новински детектор на SemEval-2019 задача 4', 'lt': 'Sally Smedley hiperpartisan News Detector SemEval-2019 4 užduotis', 'ms': 'Pengesan Berita Hyperpartisan Sally Smedley di SemEval-2019 Task 4', 'mt': 'Is-Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan News Detector f’SemEval-2019 Task 4', 'ml': 'സല്ലി സ്മെഡ്ലി ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസിന്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്ത ഡിക്ടറ്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 4', 'mn': 'Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan News Detector at SemEval-2019 Task 4', 'no': 'Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan News Detector at semiEval-2019 oppgåve 4', 'sr': 'Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan News Detector na semiEval-2019 Task 4', 'ro': 'Detectorul de știri hiperpartizan Sally Smedley la SemEval-2019 Task 4', 'pl': 'Wykrywacz wiadomości nadpartyjnych Sally Smedley na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 4', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan News detector at SemEval-2019 Task 4', 'sv': 'Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan Nyhetsdetektor på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 4', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 4 ல் செல்லி ஸ்மெட்லி ஹைப்பர்பார்டிசன் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பான்', 'ur': 'سالی اسمیڈلی ہیپر پارٹیسان نیویس ڈیٹاکٹر سیم اول-2019 ٹاکس 4 میں', 'uz': 'SemEval-2019 Vazifa 4', 'vi': 'The Sally Smedley Hyperdu kích News Deter at SemEvl-209 Task 4', 'bg': 'Сали Смедли Хиперпартизанският новинарски детектор на задача 4', 'hr': 'Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan News Detector na semiEval-2019 zadatku 4', 'da': 'Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan Nyhedsdetektor på SemEval-2019 Opgave 4', 'id': 'Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan News Detector di SemEval-2019 Task 4', 'ko': 'Sally Smedley 초당파 뉴스 탐지기가SemEval-2019 미션4', 'sw': 'Mtetezi wa habari za Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan katika kazi 4 ya SemEval-2019', 'fa': 'بازرس خبرهای سالی اسمیدلی هوپر پارتیسان در ماموریت ۲۰۱۹ شغل ۴', 'nl': 'De Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan Nieuws Detector bij SemEval-2019 Taak 4', 'sq': 'Detektori i lajmeve hiperpartizane Sally Smedley në SemEval-2019 Task 4', 'de': 'Der Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan News Detector bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 4', 'am': 'ስራ 4', 'tr': 'The Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan Haýsy Detector at SemEval-2019 Task 4', 'af': 'Die Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan Nuusdetektor by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 4', 'hy': 'Սալլի Սմիլլի Հիպերպարտիզան նորությունների հայտնաբերողը', 'az': 'Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan Haber Detector at SemEval-2019 Task 4', 'ca': 'The Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan News Detector at SemEval-2019 Task 4', 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৪-এ সালি স্মেডলি হাইপার্পার্সিন নিউজ ডিটেক্টর', 'bs': 'Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan News Detector na semiEval-2019 Task 4', 'cs': 'Detektor hyperpartizánních zpráv Sally Smedley na SemEval-2019 Úkol 4', 'fi': 'Sally Smedley Hyperpartisaani Uutiset Detector SemEval-2019 Task 4', 'et': 'Sally Smedley hüperpartisanide uudiste detektor SemEval-2019 ülesanne 4', 'jv': 'The Sarly Smudey Hyerpartisan New detector at semi-2011 task 4', 'sk': 'Sally Smedley Hyperpartizanski detektor novic na SemEval-2019 naloga 4', 'ha': 'The Sally SmedleHyperpartsan News Finder at SemEal-2019 Tafiyar 4', 'he': 'The Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan News Detector at SemEval-2019 Task 4', 'bo': 'The Sally Smedley Hyperpartisan News Detector at SemEval-2019 Task 4'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our system submitted to the formal run of SemEval-2019 Task 4 : Hyperpartisan news detection. Our system is based on a linear classifier using several features, i.e., 1) embedding features based on the pre-trained BERT embeddings, 2) article length features, and 3) embedding features of informative phrases extracted from by-publisher dataset. Our system achieved 80.9 % accuracy on the test set for the formal run and got the 3rd place out of 42 teams.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظامنا الذي تم تقديمه للتشغيل الرسمي لمهمة SemEval-2019 4: الكشف عن الأخبار الحزبية. يعتمد نظامنا على مصنف خطي يستخدم العديد من الميزات ، على سبيل المثال ، 1) ميزات التضمين استنادًا إلى حفلات زفاف BERT المدربة مسبقًا ، 2) ميزات طول المقالة ، و 3) تضمين ميزات العبارات التثقيفية المستخرجة من مجموعة بيانات الناشر. حقق نظامنا دقة تصل إلى 80.9٪ في مجموعة الاختبار للتشغيل الرسمي وحصل على المركز الثالث من بين 42 فريقًا.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre système soumis à l'exécution formelle de SemEval-2019 Task 4\xa0: Hyperpartisan news detection. Notre système est basé sur un classificateur linéaire utilisant plusieurs fonctionnalités, à savoir 1) des fonctionnalités d'intégration basées sur les intégrations BERT pré-entraînées, 2) des caractéristiques de longueur d'article et 3) des fonctionnalités d'intégration de phrases informatives extraites de l'ensemble de données par éditeur. Notre système a atteint une précision de 80,9\xa0% sur le plateau de test pour la course officielle et a obtenu la 3e place sur 42 équipes.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nosso sistema submetido à execução formal da Tarefa 4 do SemEval-2019: detecção de notícias hiperpartidárias. Nosso sistema é baseado em um classificador linear usando vários recursos, ou seja, 1) recursos de incorporação baseados nos embeddings BERT pré-treinados, 2) recursos de comprimento de artigo e 3) recursos de incorporação de frases informativas extraídas do conjunto de dados do editor. Nosso sistema alcançou 80,9% de acerto no teste definido para a corrida formal e ficou em 3º lugar entre 42 equipes.', 'es': 'Este documento describe nuestro sistema sometido a la ejecución formal de la Tarea 4 de SemeVal-2019: detección de noticias hiperpartidistas. Nuestro sistema se basa en un clasificador lineal que utiliza varias funciones, es decir, 1) incrustar funciones basadas en las incorporaciones BERT previamente entrenadas, 2) funciones de longitud de artículo y 3) funciones de incrustación de frases informativas extraídas del conjunto de datos del editor. Nuestro sistema logró una precisión del 80,9% en la prueba establecida para la prueba formal y obtuvo el tercer lugar de 42 equipos.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan news detectionの正式な実行に提出されたシステムについて説明する。当社のシステムは、いくつかの機能を使用した線形分類器に基づいています。すなわち、1 ）事前にトレーニングされたBERT埋め込みに基づいて機能を埋め込む、2 ）記事の長さの機能、および3 ）バイパブリッシャーデータセットから抽出された情報のあるフレーズの機能を埋め込む。当社のシステムは、フォーマルランのテストセットで80.9 ％の精度を達成し、42チーム中3位に入りました。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наша система, представленная на официальный запуск задачи 4 SemEval-2019: Обнаружение гиперпартийных новостей. Наша система основана на линейном классификаторе, использующем несколько признаков, а именно: 1) признаки встраивания, основанные на предварительно обученных вложениях BERT, 2) признаки длины статьи и 3) признаки встраивания информативных фраз, извлеченных из набора данных издателя. Наша система достигла 80,9% точности на тестовом наборе для формального забега и заняла 3 место из 42 команд.', 'zh': '本文述臣等交SemEval-2019务4:超党派新闻检正运之统。 臣等系统基于线性分类器,该分类器用多特征,即1)基于预练BERT嵌入特徵,2)文章长度特征,及3)从出版商数集取信息短语者嵌之。 统于正行集上至于80.9%准确率,而于42团队中得第三。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2019 कार्य 4 के औपचारिक रन के लिए प्रस्तुत हमारे सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है: हाइपरपार्टिजन समाचार का पता लगाना। हमारी प्रणाली कई विशेषताओं का उपयोग करके एक रैखिक क्लासिफायर पर आधारित है, यानी, 1) पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित BERT एम्बेडिंग के आधार पर सुविधाओं को एम्बेड करना, 2) लेख की लंबाई विशेषताएं, और 3) प्रकाशक डेटासेट से निकाले गए जानकारीपूर्ण वाक्यांशों की विशेषताओं को एम्बेड करना। हमारे सिस्टम ने औपचारिक रन के लिए परीक्षण सेट पर 80.9% सटीकता हासिल की और 42 टीमों में से तीसरा स्थान प्राप्त किया।', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcóras a cuireadh isteach chuig rith foirmiúil SemEval-2019 Tasc 4: Brath nuachta Hyperpartisan. Tá ár gcóras bunaithe ar aicmitheoir líneach a úsáideann gnéithe éagsúla, i.e., 1) gnéithe a leabú bunaithe ar leabú BERT réamh-oilte, 2) gnéithe fad ailt, agus 3) gnéithe frásaí faisnéiseacha a bhaintear as tacar sonraí foilsitheoir a leabú. Bhain ár gcóras cruinneas 80.9% amach ar an tástáil a bhí leagtha síos don rith fhoirmiúil agus fuair sé an 3ú háit as 42 fhoireann.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2019 4. feladat hivatalos futtatásához benyújtott rendszerünket: Hiperpartizán hírek felismerése. Rendszerünk egy lineáris osztályozón alapul, amely több funkciót használ: 1) az előre képzett BERT beágyazásokon alapuló beágyazási funkciókat, 2) a cikkhosszúsági funkciókat és 3) a kiadónként kivont információs kifejezések beágyazási funkcióit. Rendszerünk 80,9%-os pontosságot ért el a hivatalos futásra szánt tesztkészleten és 42 csapat közül harmadik helyezést ért el.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημά μας που υποβλήθηκε στην επίσημη εκτέλεση της εργασίας 4: Υπερκομματική ανίχνευση ειδήσεων. Το σύστημά μας βασίζεται σε έναν γραμμικό ταξινομητή που χρησιμοποιεί διάφορα χαρακτηριστικά, π.χ. 1) δυνατότητες ενσωμάτωσης βασισμένες στις προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωμάτωσεις 2) δυνατότητες μήκους άρθρων και 3) δυνατότητες ενσωμάτωσης ενημερωτικών φράσεων που εξάγονται από το σύνολο δεδομένων του εκδότη. Το σύστημά μας πέτυχε ακρίβεια 80,9% στο δοκιμαστικό σετ για την επίσημη κούρσα και πήρε την τρίτη θέση από τις 42 ομάδες.', 'ka': 'ჩვენი სისტემა, რომელიც SemEval-2019 დავაკეთებული საქმე 4: ჰიპერპორტიზანი ინფორმაცია. ჩვენი სისტემა linear კლასიფიკაციის დაბაზია, რამდენიმე ფუნქციების გამოყენება, მაგალითად, 1) დაყენებული ფუნქციები, რომლებიც უნდა დაყენებული BERT დაყენებზე, 2) წილაკის სიგრძე ფუნქციების სიგრძე და 3) ინფორმა ჟთჟრვმარა ნთ ეჲჟრигნა ოპაგთლნჲჟრ ჲრ 80,9% ნა რვჟრთრვ ჱა ტჲპმალნარა თჱბყპკა თ თჱლთჱა რპვრჲრჲ მწჟრჲ ჲრ 42 რთმა.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il nostro sistema sottoposto all'esecuzione formale di SemEval-2019 Task 4: Rilevamento di notizie iperpartigiane. Il nostro sistema si basa su un classificatore lineare che utilizza diverse funzionalità, ad esempio, 1) funzionalità di incorporamento basate sulle incorporazioni BERT pre-addestrate, 2) caratteristiche di lunghezza degli articoli e 3) funzionalità di incorporazione di frasi informative estratte da set di dati per editore. Il nostro sistema ha raggiunto l'80,9% di precisione sul set di test per la corsa formale e ha ottenuto il terzo posto su 42 squadre.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің жүйемізді жарым- 2019 тапсырмасының официалдық жегуіне жіберілген тапсырма 4: Hyperpartisan жаңалықтарды анықтау. Біздің жүйеміз бірнеше мүмкіндіктерді қолданатын сызық классификациясына негізделген, мысалы, 1) белгілі BERT ендіру мүмкіндіктеріне негізделген, 2) мақалалардың ұзындығы, және 3) мәліметті фразтарды басып шығару Біздің жүйеміз официалдық орындалуының сынақтарында 80,9% дұрыс жеткізді және 42 топтардың 3- ші жерін алды.', 'lt': 'This paper describes our system submitted to the formal run of SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan news detection.  Mūsų sistema grindžiama linijiniu klasifikatoriumi, kuriame naudojami keli požymiai, t. y. 1) įterpiamieji požymiai, grindžiami i š anksto parengtais BERT įterpimais, 2) gaminio ilgio požymiai ir 3) įterpiamieji informacinių frazių, gautų iš šalutinio leidėjo duomenų rinkinio, požymiai. Mūsų sistema pasiekė 80,9 % tikslumo bandymų rinkinyje oficialiam bandymui ir 3 vietą iš 42 komandų.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашиот систем поднесен на официјалната програма на SemEval-2019 задача 4: Хиперпартиска детекција на вести. Our system is based on a linear classifier using several features, i.e., 1) embedding features based on the pre-trained BERT embeddings, 2) article length features, and 3) embedding features of informative phrases extracted from by-publisher dataset.  Нашиот систем постигна 80,9 отсто прецизност на тестот за официјалната трка и го доби третото место од 42 тимови.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem kami dihantar ke jalanan rasmi SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: pengesan berita hiperpartisan. Sistem kami berdasarkan pengeklasifikasi linear menggunakan beberapa ciri, iaitu, 1) penyembelihan ciri-ciri berdasarkan penyembelihan BERT yang dilatih dahulu, 2) ciri-ciri panjang artikel, dan 3) penyembelihan ciri-ciri frasa maklumat yang dikeluarkan dari set data oleh penerbit. Sistem kita mencapai ketepatan 80.9% pada set ujian untuk jalanan rasmi dan mendapat tempat ketiga dari 42 pasukan.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റം സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 4: ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസന്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്ത കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് വിവര നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്താണ് കുറച്ച് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ബെര്\u200dട്ടി അംഗീകരിക്കുന്ന ബിര്\u200dട്ടി അംഗീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്നത്. 2) ലേഖ Our system achieved 80.9% accuracy on the test set for the formal run and got the 3rd place out of 42 teams.', 'mt': 'This paper describes our system submitted to the formal run of SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan news detection.  Is-sistema tagħna hija bbażata fuq klassifikatur linear i li juża diversi karatteristiċi, jiġifieri, 1) karatteristiċi ta’ inkorporazzjoni bbażati fuq inkorporazzjonijiet BERT imħarrġa minn qabel, 2) karatteristiċi ta’ tul ta’ oġġetti, u 3) karatteristiċi ta’ inkorporazzjoni ta’ frażijiet informativi estratti minn sett ta’ dejta tal-pubblikatur sekondarju. Is-sistema tagħna kisbet 80.9% preċiżjoni fuq is-sett tat-test għat-test formali u kisbet it-tielet post minn 42 tim.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний системийг SemEval-2019 ажил 4-ийн официально дамжуулан тайлбарлаж байна: Хиперпартизан мэдээг олох. Бидний систем хэд хэдэн чадварыг ашиглан шугам хэлбэрээр суурилсан, яг л 1) өмнө сургалтын BERT хэлбэрээр суурилсан, 2) хэвлэлийн урт болон 3) хэвлэлийн мэдээллийн хэлбэрээс гаргасан мэдээллийн хэлбэрээр суурилсан. Бидний систем официально дасгалын туршилтын тодорхойлолт дээр 80.9% нь тодорхойлолт гарч 42 багийн 3 орон гарч ирсэн.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet vårt som er sendt til den formelte køyringa av semiEval-2019 oppgåva 4: Hyperpartisan news detection. Systemet vårt er basert på ein lineær klassifiserer med fleire funksjonar, t.d. 1) innebyggingsfunksjonar basert på først trengte BERT-innbygging, 2) artikellengde- funksjonar, og 3) innebygging av informativ frasar som er ekstrahert frå etter publiseringsdatasett. Sistemet vårt oppnådd 80,9% nøyaktighet på testsettet for formelt køyring og fikk den tredje plassen ut av 42 grupper.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz system zgłoszony do formalnego uruchomienia SemEval-2019 Zadanie 4: Hyperpartyzant news detection. Nasz system oparty jest na klasyfikatorze liniowym wykorzystującym kilka funkcji, tj. 1) funkcje osadzania oparte na wstępnie przeszkolonych osadzeniach BERT, 2) funkcje długości artykułu oraz 3) funkcje osadzania fraz informacyjnych wyciąganych z zbioru danych przez wydawcę. Nasz system osiągnął 80,9% dokładności na zestawie testowym do formalnego biegu i zdobył trzecie miejsce z 42 drużyn.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul nostru supus rulării oficiale SemEval-2019 Task 4: Detectarea știrilor hiperpartizane. Sistemul nostru se bazează pe un clasificator liniar care utilizează mai multe caracteristici, de exemplu, 1) caracteristici de încorporare bazate pe încorporările BERT pre-instruite, 2) caracteristici de lungime a articolelor și 3) caracteristici de încorporare a frazelor informative extrase din setul de date al editorului. Sistemul nostru a obținut o precizie de 80,9% pe setul de teste pentru alergarea formală și a obținut locul 3 din 42 de echipe.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ පද්ධතිය සෙම්වෙල්-2019 වැඩේ 4 වැඩේ සාමාන්\u200dය දාලා තියෙනවා: Hyperpartisane වාර්තාව හොයාගන්න. අපේ පද්ධතිය ලේනියාර් විශේෂකයෙක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඉතින්, 1) ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශේෂකයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, 2) ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශේෂකයෙන්, 3) ප්\u200dරයෝජ අපේ පද්ධතිය 80.9% හරියට පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා තුන්වෙනි තැන', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamkan uu u soo dhiibay gobolka rasmiga ah ee SemEval-2019 Shaqada 4: Garashada warbixinta ee Hyperpartisan. Systemkaygu wuxuu ku saleysan yahay kooras liner ah oo isticmaalaya fursad badan, tusaale ahaan 1) oo ku saleysan xariijimo ku saabsan pre-trained BERT embeddings, 2) sharciga dheeraadka ah, iyo 3) oo ku qoran xaraf macluumaad ah oo ka soo baxay qoraal-publisher-set. nidaamkayagii wuxuu gaadhay 80.9% saxda imtixaanka, wuxuuna 42 koox ka soo baxay meeshii saddexaad.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt system som skickats in till den formella körningen av SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan news detection. Vårt system är baserat på en linjär klassificerare som använder flera funktioner, t.ex. 1) inbäddningsfunktioner baserade på förberedda BERT-inbäddningar, 2) artikellängdsfunktioner och 3) inbäddningsfunktioner i informativa fraser som extraheras från enskilda utgivares dataset. Vårt system uppnådde 80,9% noggrannhet på testset för den formella löpningen och fick 3:e plats av 42 lag.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem podignut na formalno trčanje pola evala-2019. zadatak 4: otkrivanje hiperpartizanskih vesti. Naš sistem je baziran na linearnom klasifikatoru koristeći nekoliko karakteristika, tj. 1) ugrađenih karakteristika na osnovu predobučenih integracija BERT-a, 2) karakteristika dužine članaka, i 3) ugrađenih karakteristika informativnih fraza izvlačenih iz grupe podataka izdavača. Naš sistem je ostvario tačnost 80,9% na testu za formalno trčanje i izvukao 3. mesto iz 42 tima.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தை விளக்குகிறது SemEval- 2019 செயல் 4: ஆப்பர்பார்டிஷான் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பு. முன் பயிற்சி பிரெட்டி உள்ளடக்கங்கள், 2) கட்டுரை நீளம் குணங்கள், மற்றும் 3) வெளிப்படுத்தப்பட்ட தகவல் தரவுத்தளத்திலிருந்து வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட தகவல் அமைப்பின் தகவல் சொற்றொடர்களை கொண எங்கள் கணினியில் 80.9% சரியான சரியான பெற்றுவிட்டது வடிவமைப்பு இயக்கும் அமைப்பு மூன்றாம் இடத்தை 42 குழுக்களில் இரு', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ہماری سیسٹم کو سیم Eval-2019 ٹاکس 4 کی رسمی چلنے کی تعریف کرتا ہے: Hyperpartisan news detection. ہمارا سیستم ایک لینیر کلاسیر پر بنیاد ہے کہ بہت سی فرض استعمال کرتا ہے، یعنی 1) پہلے ترسیم کی BERT انڈیینگ پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں، 2) لکھی لانگی فرصت، اور 3) اطلاعات فریزوں کا انڈیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ سے نکالا گیا ہے۔ ہماری سیستم نے 80.9% سطح کو رسمی چلنے کے لئے آزمائش سٹ پر پہنچا اور 42 ٹیموں میں تیسرا جگہ پایا۔', 'uz': 'Bu sahifa SemEval-2019 Vazifa 4: Hyperpartisan news detection tizimimizni yaratish mumkin. Bizning tizimmiz bir nechta taʼminlovchi BERT parametrlaridan foydalanuvchi imkoniyatlarni ishlatish mumkin. 2) maqola uzun imkoniyatlarini va 3) tahrirlash maʼlumot maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi imkoniyatlarni yaratish mumkin. Bizning tizimimiz formal ishga tushirish uchun 80.9% tizimga aniqlangan va 42 guruhdan uchinchi joyga keldi.', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống của chúng tôi được giao cho nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 9 4: phát hiện tin tức trinh thám Hyperdu. Hệ thống của chúng tôi dựa trên một phân loại tuyến, sử dụng nhiều tính năng, v.v. 1) sự nhúng các tính năng dựa trên sự nhúng trong tác dụng của thiếu sót sót sót sót sót sót. 2) tính năng dài dòng, và 3) gồm các đoạn văn bản được trích ra từ bộ dữ liệu của nhà xuất bản. Hệ thống của chúng tôi đã đạt được độ chính xác 80.9. với độ chính xác trong cuộc chạy chính thức và đưa vị trí thứ ba ra khỏi đội Tứ-2.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores system, der er indsendt til den formelle kørsel af SemEval-2019 Opgave 4: Hyperpartisan nyhedsdetektion. Vores system er baseret på en lineær klassificering, der bruger flere funktioner, dvs. 1) indlejringsfunktioner baseret på de forudgående BERT-indlejringer, 2) artikellængdefunktioner og 3) indlejringsfunktioner i informative sætninger udvundet fra hver enkelt udgiver datasæt. Vores system opnåede 80,9% nøjagtighed på testsættet til det formelle løb og fik 3. pladsen ud af 42 hold.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sustav podignut na formalno trčanje zadatka 4. godine: otkrivanje hiperpartizanskih vijesti. Naš sustav se temelji na linearnom klasifikatoru koristeći nekoliko karakteristika, tj. 1) ugrađenih karakteristika temeljnih na predobučenim integracijama BERT-a, 2) karakteristika dužine članaka i 3) ugrađenih karakteristika informativnih fraza izvlačenih iz podataka za izdavač. Naš sustav je ostvario tačnost 80,9% na testu za formalno trčanje i dobio treće mjesto iz 42 tima.', 'nl': 'Deze paper beschrijft ons systeem dat is ingediend bij de formele run van SemEval-2019 Taak 4: Hyperpartisan nieuwsdetectie. Ons systeem is gebaseerd op een lineaire classificator die verschillende functies gebruikt, d.w.z. 1) inbeddingsfuncties gebaseerd op de vooraf getrainde BERT-inbeddings, 2) artikellengtefuncties en 3) inbeddingsfuncties van informatieve zinnen die zijn geëxtraheerd uit de dataset van de uitgever. Ons systeem behaalde 80,9% nauwkeurigheid op de testset voor de formele run en behaalde de 3e plaats van 42 teams.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem kami yang dikirim untuk menjalankan formal SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: deteksi berita hiperpartisan. Sistem kita berdasarkan klasifikasi linear menggunakan beberapa fitur, i.e., 1) memasukkan fitur berdasarkan embedding BERT terlatih sebelumnya, 2) fitur panjang artikel, dan 3) memasukkan fitur frasa informatif yang dikeluarkan dari set data oleh penerbit. Sistem kita mencapai akurasi 80,9% pada set tes untuk jalanan formal dan mendapat tempat ketiga dari 42 tim.', 'ko': '본고는 우리가SemEval-2019 임무4에 제출한 초당파 뉴스 검측이 정식으로 운영되는 시스템을 묘사한다.우리의 시스템은 하나의 선형 분류기를 바탕으로 한다. 이 분류기는 여러 가지 특징을 사용한다. 즉, 1) 미리 훈련된 버트의 삽입 특징을 바탕으로 하고, 2) 문장 길이 특징과 3)publisher 데이터셋에서 추출한 정보 단어의 삽입 특징을 바탕으로 한다.우리 시스템은 정식으로 운영되는 테스트 집합에서 80.9%의 정확도를 기록했고 42개 팀 중 3위를 차지했다.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва нашата система, подадена на официалното изпълнение на Задача 4: Хиперпартизанско откриване на новини. Системата ни се основава на линеен класификатор, използващ няколко функции, т.е. 1) вграждане на функции, базирани на предварително обучените вграждания, 2) функции за дължина на статията и 3) вграждане на информационни фрази, извлечени от набор от данни от издателя. Системата ни постигна 80.9% точност на тестовия комплект за официалното бягане и получи 3-то място от 42 отбора.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz sistemimizi semi-Eval-2019 Görevi 4: Hyperpartisan haberler tanyş edip gönderdi. Biziň sistemimiz birnäçe karakterlerden ullanýan çyzgylyg klasifikatçysyna daýanýar. Mä. 1) öňünden e ğlenen BERT girişimlerine daýanýar karakterlere, 2) maksadyň uzunlygy we 3) düzümlenmäge tarapyndan çykylýan informative frazlerin düzümlerini daýanýar. Sistemimiz formal ylgap testinde 80.9% dogrylygyny ýetdi we 42 topardan 3-nji ýerini aldy.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt unser System, das dem formalen Lauf von SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperparteiische Nachrichtenerkennung unterzogen wurde. Unser System basiert auf einem linearen Klassifikator mit mehreren Funktionen, d.h. 1) Einbettungsfunktionen basierend auf den vorgetrainierten BERT-Einbettungen, 2) Artikellängen-Features und 3) Einbettungsfunktionen von informativen Phrasen, die aus dem Datensatz des Herausgebers extrahiert wurden. Unser System erreichte 80,9% Genauigkeit auf dem Testset für den formalen Lauf und holte den dritten Platz aus 42-Teams.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wetu uliotolewa kwenye mbinu rasmi ya SemEval-2019 Kazi 4: Ugunduzi wa habari za upeperpartisan. Mfumo wetu umejikita na mwandishi wa mistari kwa kutumia vipengele kadhaa, yaani 1) vinavyotumia vipengele vilivyo kwa kutumia vifaa vya vifaa vilivyojifunzwa kabla vya BERT, 2) vipengele vya urefu wa makala, na 3) vinavyoonyesha vipengele vya taarifa zilizotolewa kutoka kwenye seti ya taarifa za mchapishaji. Mfumo wetu ulipata uhakika wa asilimia 80.9 kwenye jaribio la upasuaji rasmi na kupata nafasi ya tatu ya timu 42.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم ما را توضیح می\u200cدهد که به اجرای رسمی عملیات نیم Eval-2019 کار چهار: شناسایی اخبار هایپر پارتیسان است. سیستم ما بر روی یک گروهی خطی با استفاده از چندین ویژه\u200cها، یعنی ۱) ویژه\u200cهای وارد کردن بر اساس اندازه\u200cهای BERT پیش آموزش شده، ویژه\u200cهای طول مقاله ۲) و ۳) ویژه\u200cهای وارد کردن از جمله داده\u200cهای اطلاعاتی که از طریق انتشار داده\u200cها خارج شده است. سیستم ما به 80.9 درصد دقیقاتی در مجموعه آزمایش برای اجرای رسمی رسید و سومین مکان از 42 تیم خارج شد.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የSemEval-2019 ስራ 4 ለፊደርፋዊ ዜና ማግኘት የሰጠን ስርዓታችንን ይናገራል፡፡ ሲስተምረታችን BERT አቀማመጥ፣ 2) የርዝመት ግንኙነት እና 3) የክፍለ መረጃ ቃላትን በመጠቀም ላይ የተመሳሰለ ብሔራዊ ምርጫዎችን በመጠቀም የቆይር ክፍሎች ላይ ነው፡፡ ሲስተምረታችን ለንጹሕ ፈተና ስርዓት 80.9 በመቶ እርግጠኛ አግኝቷል ከ42 ቡድን ሦስተኛውን ስፍራ አገኘን፡፡', 'az': 'Bu kağıt bizim sistemimizi semiEval-2019 Görevi 4: Hyperpartisan xəbərləri keşfetməsi üçün təyin edir. Bizim sistemimiz bir çox fərqli seçimlərdən istifadə edən linear seçimlərə dayanılır, i.e. 1) əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş BERT inşallarına dayanılır, 2) məlumatların uzunluğu fərqli və 3) təhsil edilən informativ frazlərin fərqli seçimlərini daxil edir. Sistemimiz formal fəaliyyətin sınaması üçün 80,9% ədaləti qəbul etdi və üçüncü dəstədən 42 dəstədən istifadə etdi.', 'sq': 'Ky artikull përshkruan sistemin tonë të paraqitur në drejtimin zyrtar të SemEval-2019 Task 4: zbulim i lajmeve hiperpartizane. Sistemi ynë është bazuar në një klasifikues linear duke përdorur disa funksione, i.e., 1) përfshirje të funksioneve bazuar në përfshirjet e paratrajnuara BERT, 2) funksione të gjatësisë së artikujve dhe 3) përfshirje të funksioneve të frazave informative të nxjerra nga grupi i dhënash nga botuesit. Sistemi ynë arriti 80.9% të saktësisë në vëndimin e testit për vrasjen zyrtare dhe mori vendin e tretë nga 42 ekipe.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf ons stelsel voorgestuur na die formele hardloop van SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 4: Hyperpartisan nuusbeskrywing. Ons stelsel is gebaseer op 'n lineêre klassifiseerder wat verskeie funksies gebruik word, t.d., 1) inbêer funksies gebaseer op die voorafgevorderde BERT inbêring, 2) artikel lengte funksies, en 3) inbêer funksies van inligtige frase wat deur publiseer uitgevoer word. Ons stelsel het 80,9% waarskynlik op die toets stel vir die formele hardloop bereik en die derde plek uit 42 teame gekry.", 'bs': 'Ovaj novinar opisuje naš sistem podignut na formalno trčanje zadatka 4: otkrivanje hiperpartizanskih vijesti. Naš sistem se temelji na linearnom klasifikatoru koristeći nekoliko karakteristika, tj. 1) ugrađenih karakteristika na osnovu predobučenih integracija BERT-a, 2) karakteristika dužine članaka i 3) ugrađenih karakteristika informativnih fraza izvučenih iz podataka po izdavaču. Naš sistem je postigao tačnost 80,9% na testu za formalno trčanje i izvukao 3. mjesto iz 42 tima.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el nostre sistema submetit a l'execució formal de SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan news detection. Our system is based on a linear classifier using several features, i.e., 1) embedding features based on the pre-trained BERT embeddings, 2) article length features, and 3) embedding features of informative phrases extracted from by-publisher dataset.  El nostre sistema va aconseguir una precisió del 80,9% en el conjunt d'exàmens oficials i va obtenir el tercer lloc de 42 equips.", 'hy': 'This paper describes our system submitted to the formal run of SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan news detection.  Մեր համակարգը հիմնված է գծային դասակարգչի վրա, որը օգտագործում է բազմաթիվ հատկանիշներ, այսինքն 1) ներգրավող հատկանիշներ, հիմնված նախապատրաստված BER ներգրավման վրա, 2) հոդվածի երկարության հատկանիշներ և 3) ներգրավված ինֆորմատիվ արտահայտությունների հատկանիշներ, որոնք ստա Մեր համակարգը ստացավ 80.9 տոկոս ճշգրտություն պաշտոնական ընթացքում և ստացավ երրորդ տեղը 42 թիմերից:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা আমাদের সিমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৪: হাইপার্পার্টিস্যান সংবাদ আবিষ্কার করা হয়েছে। Our system is based on a linear classifier using several features, i.e., 1) embedding features based on the pre-trained BERT embeddings, 2) article length features, and 3) embedding features of informative phrases extracted from by-publisher dataset.  আমাদের সিস্টেম ফর্মিল চালানোর জন্য পরীক্ষার সেটে ৮০.৯% সঠিকভাবে অর্জন করেছে এবং ৪২ টিম থেকে তৃতীয় স্থান পেয়', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš systém předložený formálnímu běhu SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartyzánní detekce zpráv. Náš systém je založen na lineárním klasifikátoru využívajícím několik funkcí, tj. 1) vkládání funkcí založených na předškolených vloženích BERT, 2) funkce délky článku a 3) vkládání funkcí informačních frází extrahovaných z datové sady vydavatelů. Náš systém dosáhl 80,9% přesnosti na testovací sadě pro formální běh a získal třetí místo ze 42 týmů.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie süsteemi, mis on esitatud SemEval-2019 ülesande 4 ametlikule käivitamisele: hüperpartisanide uudiste tuvastamine. Meie süsteem põhineb lineaarsel klassifitseerijal, mis kasutab mitmeid funktsioone, st 1) eelnevalt väljaõpetatud BERT manustamisel põhinevaid manustamisfunktsioone, 2) artikli pikkuse funktsioone ja 3) avaldajate andmekogumist välja võetud informatiivsete fraaside manustamisfunktsioone. Meie süsteem saavutas 80,9% täpsuse ametliku jooksu testikomplektis ja sai kolmanda koha 42 meeskonnast.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli kuvaa järjestelmäämme, joka on lähetetty SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan news detection -ohjelman viralliseen suorittamiseen. Järjestelmämme perustuu lineaariseen luokittelijaan, joka käyttää useita ominaisuuksia, kuten 1) esikoulutettuihin BERT-upotuksiin perustuvia upotusominaisuuksia, 2) artikkelin pituusominaisuuksia ja 3) julkaisijan aineistosta poimittujen informatiivisten lauseiden upotusominaisuuksia. Järjestelmämme saavutti 80,9% tarkkuuden testisarjassa virallisen juoksun ja sai kolmannen sijan 42 joukkueesta.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki rambaran nggawe sistem sing nyimpen mrupuleh ning semi-2011 task 4: Perintah kapan-kapan barang. Sistem dhéwé wis basa ning kelompok linear sing gambar kelompok karo akeh operasi, dadi, 1) embedding dibutungan sing dibutungan basa karo BERT embedding, 2) akeh tanggal karo ingkang, lan 3) embedding dibutungan informave Frases sing dibutuhke seng-Publiher dataset Sistem awak dhéwé wis rampung 8.9% sing beraksi kanggo ujian sisan kanggo nguasah efem lan mulai 3 sing katèh sing katèh saben katèh, 32.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את המערכת שלנו שנשלחה לרוץ הרשמי של SemEval-2019 משימה 4: גילוי חדשות היפרפרטיזן. המערכת שלנו מבוססת על מסווג לינרי בשימוש במספר תכונות, כלומר, 1) תכונות פיתוח מבוססים על פיתוחים BERT מאומנים מראש, 2) תכונות אורך המאמר, ו-3) תכונות פיתוח של ביטויים מידעיים מווצאים ממערכת נתונים של מפרסמים. המערכת שלנו השיגה מדויקה של 80.9% על המבחן לריצה הרשמית וקיבלה את המקום השלישי מתוך 42 קבוצות.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naš sistem, ki je bil predložen uradnemu zagonu naloge 4 SemEval-2019: Hiperpartizansko odkrivanje novic. Naš sistem temelji na linearnem klasifikatorju, ki uporablja več funkcij, tj. 1) funkcije vdelave na podlagi vnaprej usposobljenih BERT vdelav, 2) funkcije dolžine članka in 3) funkcije vdelave informativnih stavkov, pridobljenih iz nabora podatkov založnika. Naš sistem je dosegel 80,9% natančnost na testnem kompletu za uradni tek in dosegel 3. mesto med 42 ekipami.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana tsarin da aka saka shi zuwa tafiyar aikin da aka rasmi na SemEV-2019 Tafiyar 4: Zani na Hyperpartsan news. Babu tsarin mu, a kan wani daraja mai linja na yi amfani da wasu feature, misali 1) mai ƙunsa da bambanci masu amfani da bambanci masu yin amfani da bajaran BERT-embeddings, 2) da maɓallin durowa, da 3) mai ƙunsa da wasu fassarar masu yiwuwa na fassarar-bayani. Tsarinmu ya sãmu 80.9% na daidaita a kan jarrabi na tafiyar da shirin rasmi kuma ya sami na uku daga jama'a 42.", 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་དོན་ལ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་པ་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལྟར་བཀོད་ཡོད། Our system is based on a linear classifier using several features, i.e., 1) embedding features based on the pre-trained BERT embeddings, 2) article length features, and 3) embedding features of informative phrases extracted from by-publisher dataset. ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག'}
{'en': 'Tintin at SemEval-2019 Task 4 : Detecting Hyperpartisan News Article with only Simple Tokens', 'ar': 'Tintin في SemEval-2019 المهمة 4: الكشف عن مقالة الأخبار الحزبية باستخدام الرموز البسيطة فقط', 'fr': "Tintin à SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 4\xa0: Détecter un article d'actualité hyperpartisan avec uniquement des jetons simples", 'es': 'Tintín en la Tarea 4 de Semeval-2019: Detectar un artículo de noticias hiperpartidista con solo tokens simples', 'pt': 'Tintin no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 4: Detectando o artigo de notícias hiperpartidário com apenas tokens simples', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のTintinタスク4 ：単純なトークンのみで超党派のニュース記事を検出する', 'zh': 'Tintin在SemEval-2019务4:惟简令牌检超党新闻文', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 4 पर Tintin: केवल सरल टोकन के साथ Hyperpartisan समाचार लेख का पता लगाना', 'ru': 'Тинтин на SemEval-2019 Задача 4: Обнаружение гиперпартийной новостной статьи с помощью только простых токенов', 'ga': 'Tintin ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 4: Alt Nuachta Hyperpartisan a Bhrath gan ach Comharthaí Simplí', 'ka': 'Tintin at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Detecting Hyperpartisan News Article with only simple Tokens', 'el': 'Τατουνάκι στο έργο 4: Ανίχνευση υπερκομματικού άρθρου ειδήσεων μόνο με απλά σήματα', 'kk': 'Tintin at semiEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Article with only Simple Tokens', 'hu': 'Tintin a SemEval-2019 4. feladat: Hyperpartizán hírek felismerése csak egyszerű tokenekkel', 'it': "Tintin a SemEval-2019 Task 4: Rilevare l'articolo di notizie iperpartigiane con solo token semplici", 'lt': 'Tintin at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Detecting Hyperpartisan News Article with only Simple Tokens', 'mt': 'Tintin f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 4: Is-Sejbien ta’ l-Artikolu ta’ l-Aħbarijiet Hyperpartisani b’Tokens Simpli biss', 'ml': 'Tintin at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Detecting Hyperpartisan News Article with only Simple Tokens', 'no': 'Tintin på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 4: Finn Hyperpartisan News Article med berre enkle tokens', 'ms': 'Tintin pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Mengesan Artikel Berita Hyperpartisan hanya dengan Token Mudah', 'mn': 'Tintin at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Detecting Hyperpartisan News Article with only Simple Tokens', 'sr': 'Tintin na semiEval-2019 zadatku 4: otkrivanje članaka Hyperpartisan Novosti sa samo jednostavnim Tokenima', 'pl': 'Tintin w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 4: Wykrywanie hyperpartyzanckich wiadomości artykułu tylko za pomocą prostych tokenów', 'mk': 'Tintin на SemEval-2019 задача 4: Детектирање на Хиперпартисански вести со само едноставни токени', 'ro': 'Tintin la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 4: Detectarea articolului de știri hiperpartizan numai cu jetoane simple', 'so': 'Tintin at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Detecting Article of Hyperpartisan News with only simple Tokens', 'sv': 'Tintin på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 4: Att upptäcka hyperpartisan Nyhetsartikel med endast enkla Tokens', 'ur': 'SemEval-2019 ٹاکس 4 میں Tintin: Hyperpartisan News Article with only simple Tokens', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'Я«џЯ»єЯ««Я»ЇEval- 2019 Я«фЯ«БЯ«┐', 'uz': 'SemEval-2019 Vazifani 4:', 'vi': 'Tintin at Semkhai-209 Task 4: trinh sát báo Hyperdu kích chỉ với bút chì đơn giản', 'bg': 'Задача 4: Откриване на новинарска статия с хиперпартизани само с прости токени', 'hr': 'Tintin na semiEval-2019 zadatku 4: otkrivanje članaka Hyperpartisan vijesti sa samo jednostavnim tokenima', 'de': 'Tintin bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 4: Hyperparteiische Nachrichtenartikel nur mit einfachen Token erkennen', 'da': 'Tintin på SemEval-2019 Opgave 4: Opdagelse af hyperpartisan nyhedsartikel med kun enkle poletter', 'nl': 'Kuifje bij SemEval-2019 Taak 4: Hyperpartisan Nieuwsartikel detecteren met alleen Simple Tokens', 'ko': 'Sem Eval-2019에서의 딩딩의 임무4: 초당파 뉴스 문장을 간단한 표기로만 검출', 'sw': 'Tintin akiwa SemEval-2019 Vazifa 4: Kuchungulia Makala ya Habari ya Hyperpartisan yenye Tokens nyepesi pekee', 'tr': 'Tintin at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Detecting Hyperpartisan News Article with only Simple Tokens', 'id': 'Tintin di SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Deteksi Artikel Berita Hyperpartisan dengan hanya Token sederhana', 'af': 'Tintin by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 4: Kies Hyperpartisan Nuus Artikel met slegs eenvoudige Tokens', 'sq': 'Tintin në SemEval-2019 Task 4: Detektimi i artikullit të lajmeve hiperpartizane me vetëm toka të thjeshta', 'fa': 'Tintin at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Detecting Hyperpartisan News Article with only simple Tokens', 'hy': 'Տինտինը, 2019 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" 4-րդ հանձնարարությունում. Հիպերպարտիզան նորությունների հոդվածի հայտնաբերումը միայն պարզ նշաններով', 'az': 'Tintin at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Article with only Simple Tokens', 'ca': 'Tintin a SemEval-2019 Task 4: Detecting Hyperpartisan News Article with only Simple Tokens', 'bs': 'Tintin na semiEval-2019 zadatku 4: otkrivanje članaka Hyperpartisan Novosti sa samo jednostavnim Tokenima', 'am': 'ስራ 4:', 'cs': 'Tintin na SemEval-2019 Úkol 4: Detekce hyperstranických zpráv článku pouze s jednoduchými žetony', 'et': 'Tintin SemEval-2019 ülesandel 4: hüperpartisanide uudiste artikli tuvastamine ainult lihtsate tokenitega', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯-এর কাজ ৪: হাইপার্পার্টিসান নিউজ আর্টিকেল শুধুমাত্র সাধারণ টোকেন', 'fi': 'Tintin SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 4: Hyperpartisan-uutisartikkelin havaitseminen vain yksinkertaisilla poleteilla', 'jv': 'Mintini nang semebal-2011 task 4: detecting Typerpartisan New Artiklo karo only Simple Token', 'sk': 'Tintin na SemEval-2019 naloga 4: odkrivanje hiperpartizanskega novičarskega članka z samo preprostimi žetoni', 'ha': 'Taimar 4', 'bo': 'Tintin at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Detecting Hyperpartisan News Article with only Simple Tokens', 'he': 'Tintin at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Detecting Hyperpartisan News Article with only Simple Tokens'}
{'en': 'Tintin, the system proposed by the CECL for the Hyperpartisan News Detection task of SemEval 2019, is exclusively based on the tokens that make up the documents and a standard supervised learning procedure. It obtained very contrasting results : poor on the main task, but much more effective at distinguishing documents published by hyperpartisan media outlets from unbiased ones, as it ranked first. An analysis of the most important features highlighted the positive aspects, but also some potential limitations of the approach.', 'ar': 'Tintin ، النظام الذي اقترحته CECL لمهمة الكشف عن الأخبار الحزبية في SemEval 2019 ، يعتمد حصريًا على الرموز المميزة التي تشكل المستندات وإجراءات التعلم القياسية الخاضعة للإشراف. لقد حصل على نتائج متناقضة للغاية: ضعيف في المهمة الرئيسية ، لكنه أكثر فاعلية في تمييز الوثائق التي تنشرها وسائل الإعلام شديدة الحزبية عن تلك غير المتحيزة ، حيث احتلت المرتبة الأولى. سلط تحليل لأهم السمات الضوء على الجوانب الإيجابية ، ولكن أيضًا بعض القيود المحتملة للنهج.', 'fr': "Tintin, le système proposé par le CECL pour la tâche Hyperpartisan News Detection de SemEval 2019, repose exclusivement sur les jetons qui composent les documents et sur une procédure d'apprentissage supervisé standard. Il a obtenu des résultats très contrastés\xa0: médiocre sur la tâche principale, mais beaucoup plus efficace pour distinguer les documents publiés par des médias hyperpartisans des documents impartiaux, puisqu'il s'est classé premier. L'analyse des caractéristiques les plus importantes a mis en évidence les aspects positifs, mais également certaines limites potentielles de l'approche.", 'pt': 'Tintin, o sistema proposto pelo CECL para a tarefa Hyperpartisan News Detection do SemEval 2019, é baseado exclusivamente nos tokens que compõem os documentos e em um procedimento padrão de aprendizado supervisionado. Obteve resultados muito contrastantes: pobre na tarefa principal, mas muito mais eficaz em distinguir documentos publicados por meios de comunicação hiperpartidários dos imparciais, pois ficou em primeiro lugar. Uma análise das características mais importantes destacou os aspectos positivos, mas também algumas limitações potenciais da abordagem.', 'es': 'Tintín, el sistema propuesto por el CECL para la tarea de detección hiperpartidista de noticias de SemEval 2019, se basa exclusivamente en los tokens que componen los documentos y un procedimiento de aprendizaje supervisado estándar. Obtuvo resultados muy contrastantes: deficiente en la tarea principal, pero mucho más eficaz para distinguir los documentos publicados por medios hiperpartidistas de los imparciales, ya que ocupó el primer lugar. Un análisis de las características más importantes puso de relieve los aspectos positivos, pero también algunas posibles limitaciones del enfoque.', 'zh': 'Tintin者,CECL为SemEval 2019超党新闻检事之统,专基于文档之令牌准者也。 其得之也异:其大务不善,而区别超党媒体出文与偏见者,以其第一也。 至要析其极,然亦出于潜局限性。', 'ja': 'SemEval 2019のハイパーパーパーティサンニュース検出タスクのためにCECLが提案したシステムであるTintinは、文書を構成するトークンと標準的な監督下学習手順にのみ基づいています。これは非常に対照的な結果を得た。主なタスクでは貧弱であったが、超党派のメディアが公表した文書を偏りのないものと区別するのにはるかに効果的であった。最も重要な特徴の分析は、肯定的な側面だけでなく、アプローチのいくつかの潜在的な制限を強調した。', 'hi': 'Tintin, SemEval 2019 के Hyperpartisan News Detection कार्य के लिए CECL द्वारा प्रस्तावित प्रणाली, विशेष रूप से उन टोकनों पर आधारित है जो दस्तावेजों और एक मानक पर्यवेक्षित सीखने की प्रक्रिया बनाते हैं। इसने बहुत ही विपरीत परिणाम प्राप्त किए: मुख्य कार्य पर खराब, लेकिन निष्पक्ष लोगों से हाइपरपार्टिसन मीडिया आउटलेट्स द्वारा प्रकाशित दस्तावेजों को अलग करने में बहुत अधिक प्रभावी, क्योंकि यह पहले स्थान पर था। सबसे महत्वपूर्ण विशेषताओं के विश्लेषण ने सकारात्मक पहलुओं पर प्रकाश डाला, लेकिन दृष्टिकोण की कुछ संभावित सीमाओं को भी उजागर किया।', 'ru': 'Система Tintin, предложенная CECL для задачи «Обнаружение гиперпартийных новостей» SemEval 2019, основана исключительно на токенах, составляющих документы, и стандартной процедуре обучения под наблюдением. Он добился очень контрастных результатов: плохо справляется с основной задачей, но гораздо эффективнее отличает документы, публикуемые гиперпартийными СМИ, от беспристрастных, так как занимает первое место. Анализ наиболее важных особенностей высветил позитивные аспекты, а также некоторые потенциальные ограничения подхода.', 'ga': "Tá Tintin, an córas atá molta ag an CECL le haghaidh tasc Braite Nuacht Hyperpartisan de SemEval 2019, bunaithe go heisiach ar na comharthaí a chomhdhéanann na doiciméid agus ar ghnáthnós imeachta foghlama maoirsithe. Fuair sé torthaí an-chodarsnachta: lag ar an bpríomhthasc, ach i bhfad níos éifeachtaí ag idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir doiciméid arna bhfoilsiú ag asraonta meán hyperpartisan agus cinn neamhchlaonta, mar a bhí sé ar dtús. Léirigh anailís ar na gnéithe is tábhachtaí na gnéithe dearfacha, ach freisin roinnt teorainneacha a d'fhéadfadh a bheith leis an gcur chuige.", 'ka': 'Tintin, სისტემა, რომელიც CECL-ის გამოყენებულია 2019 წლის SemEval-ის ჰიპერპორტიზანის ახალგაზრულების მონაცემებისთვის, მხოლოდ იქნება, რომელიც დოკუმენტების შექმნა და სტანდარტური მონა ეს ძალიან კონტრესტიური შედეგები მიიღეთ: ბედნიერი მნიშვნელოვანი რაოდენობაში, მაგრამ უფრო ძალიან ეფექტიური დოკუმენტების განსხვავებაში, როგორც პირველი რენექტირებ ყველაზე მნიშვნელოვანი განსაზღვრებების ანალიზაცია დააღწერა პოტიფიკაციური აპექტები, მაგრამ ასევე პოტიციალური განსაზღვრებების განსაზღვრები', 'el': 'Το σύστημα που προτείνεται από το CECL για την αποστολή Ανίχνευσης Υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων της βασίζεται αποκλειστικά στα σήματα που απαρτίζουν τα έγγραφα και μια τυποποιημένη εποπτευόμενη διαδικασία μάθησης. Απέκτησε πολύ αντίθετα αποτελέσματα: φτωχά στην κύρια εργασία, αλλά πολύ πιο αποτελεσματικά στη διάκριση εγγράφων που δημοσιεύονται από υπερκομματικά μέσα ενημέρωσης από αμερόληπτα, καθώς κατατάχθηκε πρώτη. Η ανάλυση των σημαντικότερων χαρακτηριστικών επισήμανε τις θετικές πτυχές, αλλά και ορισμένους πιθανούς περιορισμούς της προσέγγισης.', 'hu': 'A Tintin, a CECL által javasolt rendszer a SemEval 2019 Hyperpartizán News Detection feladatához, kizárólag a dokumentumokat alkotó tokeneken és egy szabványos felügyelt tanulási eljáráson alapul. Nagyon ellentétes eredményeket ért el: a fő feladatban gyenge, de sokkal hatékonyabb megkülönböztetni a hiperpartizán médiumok által publikált dokumentumokat az elfogulatlan dokumentumoktól, mivel az első helyen állt. A legfontosabb jellemzők elemzése rávilágított a megközelítés pozitív szempontjaira, de néhány lehetséges korlátozására is.', 'it': "Tintin, il sistema proposto dalla CECL per il compito Hyperpartisan News Detection di SemEval 2019, si basa esclusivamente sui token che compongono i documenti e su una procedura di apprendimento supervisionata standard. Ha ottenuto risultati molto contrastanti: povero sul compito principale, ma molto più efficace nel distinguere i documenti pubblicati dai media iperpartigiani da quelli imparziali, essendo al primo posto. Un'analisi delle caratteristiche più importanti ha evidenziato gli aspetti positivi, ma anche alcuni potenziali limiti dell'approccio.", 'lt': 'Tintin, CECL pasiūlyta sistema, skirta 2019 m. SemEval hiperpartinių naujienų aptikimo užduotims, grindžiama tik dokumentus sudarančiais ženklais ir standartine prižiūrima mokymosi procedūra. Ji pasiekė labai priešingus rezultatus: pagrindinė užduotis buvo prasta, tačiau daug veiksmingesnė skiriant hiperpartinių žiniasklaidos leidinių paskelbtus dokumentus nuo nešališkų, kaip pirmiausia buvo nustatyta. An analysis of the most important features highlighted the positive aspects, but also some potential limitations of the approach.', 'kk': 'Тинтин, 2019 жыл жаңалық жаңалық тапсырмасының Hyperpartisan News Detection тапсырмасының CECL жүйесі тек құжаттарды жасайтын белгілер мен стандартты басқару процедурына негізделген. Ол өте контрастырлық нәтижелерді алды: негізгі тапсырманың кедей, бірақ гиперпартизалық медиа сызықтарының шығарылған құжаттарды бірінші ретінде бұл құжаттарды таңдау үшін әсер етеді. Ең маңызды мүмкіндіктердің анализиясы оң жақсы аспектерін белгіледі, сондай-ақ кейбір жағдайдың мүмкіндік шектерін де белгіледі.', 'mk': 'Tintin, the system proposed by the CECL for the Hyperpartisan News Detection task of SemEval 2019, is exclusively based on the tokens that make up the documents and a standard supervised learning procedure.  Истиот доби многу контрастични резултати: лоши во главната задача, но многу поефикасни во разликата на документите објавени од хиперпартиските медиуми од непристрасните, како што се рангираше прво. Анализата на најважните карактеристики ги истакна позитивните аспекти, но исто така и некои потенцијални ограничувања на пристапот.', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019-ന്റെ ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസാന്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്തിരിക്കുന്നതിനായി സിസിഎല്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്രത്തിനായി പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ടിറ്റിന്\u200d രേഖകളും സാധാ അത് വളരെ വിരോധമായ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കിട്ടി: പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലിയില്\u200d ദരിദ്രനാണ്, പക്ഷെ ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസാന്\u200d മീഡിയയുടെ പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്ന രേ ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ ഒരു അന്വേഷണം പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു, പക്ഷെ ഈ പ്', 'mt': 'Tintin, is-sistema proposta mis-CECL għall-kompitu Hyperpartisan News Detection ta’ SemEval 2019, hija bbażata esklussivament fuq it-tokens li jiffurmaw id-dokumenti u proċedura standard ta’ tagħlim sorveljata. Hija kisbet riżultati kuntrastanti ħafna: dgħajfa fil-kompitu ewlieni, iżda ħafna aktar effettiva fid-distinzjoni tad-dokumenti ppubblikati minn ħwienet tal-midja iperpartiġjani minn dawk mhux biased, kif kienet ikklassifikata l-ewwel. Analiżi tal-karatteristiċi l-aktar importanti enfasizzat l-aspetti pożittivi, iżda wkoll xi limitazzjonijiet potenzjali tal-approċċ.', 'mn': 'Тинтин, 2019 оны SemEval-ын Hyperpartisan News Detection ажлын CECL-ын санал дэвшүүлсэн систем нь баримтууд болон стандарт удирдлагатай суралцах үйл ажиллагаа үүсгэдэг тэмдэгтийн үндсэн юм. Энэ нь маш эсрэг үр дүнг олсон: үндсэн ажил дээр ядуу, гэхдээ гиперпартизан мэдээллийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчийн баримтуудыг анхны дараа хэвлэгдсэн хэвлэлээс илүү үр дүнтэй болсон. Хамгийн чухал чанарын шинжилгээ нь эерэг асуудлыг тодорхойлдог, мөн зарим боломжтой хязгаарлалтыг тодорхойлдог.', 'ms': 'Tintin, the system proposed by the CECL for the Hyperpartisan News Detection task of SemEval 2019, is exclusively based on the tokens that make up the documents and a standard supervised learning procedure.  Ia mendapat keputusan yang sangat bertentangan: lemah dalam tugas utama, tetapi jauh lebih berkesan dalam membedakan dokumen yang diterbitkan oleh keluaran media hyperpartisan daripada yang tidak biasa, seperti ia ditangkap pertama. Analisis ciri-ciri yang paling penting menyatakan aspek positif, tetapi juga beberapa keterangan potensi pendekatan.', 'pl': 'Tintin, system zaproponowany przez CECL do zadania Hyperpartisan News Detection SemEval 2019, opiera się wyłącznie na tokenach tworzących dokumenty oraz standardowej procedurze nadzorowanego uczenia się. Osiągnęła bardzo kontrastujące wyniki: słabe w głównym zadaniu, ale znacznie skuteczniejsze w odróżnianiu dokumentów publikowanych przez media hiperpartyjne od niestronnych, ponieważ zajęła pierwsze miejsce. Analiza najważniejszych cech podkreśliła pozytywne aspekty, ale także pewne potencjalne ograniczenia tego podejścia.', 'ro': 'Tintin, sistemul propus de CECL pentru activitatea de detectare a știrilor hiperpartizane a SemEval 2019, se bazează exclusiv pe tokenii care alcătuiesc documentele și pe o procedură standard de învățare supravegheată. A obținut rezultate foarte contrastante: slabe pe sarcina principală, dar mult mai eficiente în distingerea documentelor publicate de mass-media hiperpartizane de cele imparțiale, fiind pe primul loc. O analiză a celor mai importante caracteristici a evidențiat aspectele pozitive, dar și unele limitări potențiale ale abordării.', 'sr': 'Tintin, sistem koji je predložio CECL za zadatak detekcije Hyperpartisan News za semiEval 2019, osnovan je samo na znakovima koji sastavljaju dokumente i standardnu proceduru učenja nad nadzorom. Dobio je vrlo kontrastične rezultate: siromašni na glavnom zadatku, ali mnogo efikasniji u razvoju dokumenta objavljenih hiperpartizanskim medijima od nepristrasnih, kao što je prvo postignuo. Analiza najvažnijih karakteristika ukazala je na pozitivne aspekte, ali i neke potencijalne ograničenje pristupa.', 'so': 'Tintin, nidaamka uu CECL ka soo jeedo shaqada xafiiska xafiiska ee Hyperpartisan ee SemEval 2019 waxaa gaar ah oo ku saleysan calaamado sameeya dukumentiyada iyo xiliga waxbarashada ee standard ilaalinaya. Taas waxaa helay matooyin aad u kala duwan: masaakiin ah shaqada ugu horeeya, laakiin aad uga faa’iido badan in loo kala sooco dukumentiyada oo laga soo daabacay jaamacadaha ah oo laga soo daabacay kuwa aan khiyaanayn, siday ugu horraysay. Baaritaanka waxyaabaha ugu muhiimsan waxaa ku qoran dhinacyada suurtagalka ah, laakiin sidoo kale waxaa ka mid ah xaduudaha qaababka ee suurtagalka ah.', 'sv': 'Tintin, det system som CECL föreslagit för uppgiften Hyperpartisan News Detection i SemEval 2019, bygger uteslutande på de tokens som utgör dokumenten och en standardövervakad inlärningsprocess. Det fick mycket kontrasterande resultat: dålig på huvuduppgiften, men mycket effektivare på att skilja dokument som publicerats av hyperpartisan media från opartiska, eftersom det rankades först. En analys av de viktigaste dragen belyste de positiva aspekterna, men också vissa potentiella begränsningar av tillvägagångssättet.', 'si': 'ටින්ටින්, පද්ධතිය සඳහා CECL ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ 2019 සෙම්වල් වලින් වාර්තාව හොයාගන්න ව්\u200dයාපාර්තාවක් සඳහා ස්ථානික පරීක්ෂ ඒක ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට ගත්තා: ප්\u200dරධාන වැඩේ දුර්වල්, නමුත් ප්\u200dරධාන වැඩියාත්මක විදිහට වැ ගොඩක් වැදගත් විශ්ලේෂණයේ විශ්ලේෂණයක් විශ්ලේෂණයක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා, ඒත් විශ්ලේෂ', 'no': 'Tintin, systemet foreslått av CECL for Hyperpartisan News Detection oppgåva i semiEval 2019, er eksklusivt basert på tykkene som lager opp dokumenta og ein standard oversikt læringsprosess. Det fikk veldig kontrastende resultat: fattige på hovudoppgåva, men mykje meir effektiv for å skilja dokument som er publisert av hyperpartisan mediaomrisset frå ugjennomsiktige, slik at det først rangerte. Eit analyse av dei viktigste funksjonane har markert positivne aspektane, men også nokre potensielle grenser for tilnærminga.', 'ta': 'The CECL proposed by the CECL for the Hyperpartisan News Detection task of SemEval 2019, the system is exclusively based on the signs that make up the documents and a standard monitored learning procedure. அது மிகவும் வித்தியாசமான முடிவுகள் கிடைத்தது: முக்கிய பணியில் ஏழைய, ஆனால் மிகவும் பயனுள்ளதாக மேலும் அதிகமாக முதலில் வரிசைப்பட்டுள்ளது  மிகவும் முக்கியமான குணங்களின் ஒரு ஆய்வு, நேர்மையான விளைவுகளை முன்னிலைப்படுத்தி, ஆனால் சில சாத்தியமான வரம்ப', 'ur': 'ٹینٹین، سیسٹم نے CECL کی پیشنهاد کی ہے سیم Eval 2019 کی Hyperpartisan News Detection Task کے لئے، صرف ٹونکوں پر بنیاد ہے جو دکھانے اور استاندارڈ تحقیق کی تعلیم پردازی بناتے ہیں. یہ بہت مخالف نتائج پایا گیا تھا: مسکین کام میں فقیر، لیکن اہپر پارتیسان میڈیا آئٹ کے ذریعے منتشر ہوئے سندھوں کو جدا کرنے کے لئے بہت زیادہ فائدہ دیتا ہے، جیسے وہ پہلے رقم تھا. بہت اہم فرضیات کا تحلیل مثبت الگوں کو مشخص کیا گیا ہے، لیکن اس طریقے کے کچھ امکانات محدودیت بھی مشخص کیا گیا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Bu juda qiziqarli natijalar topildi: asosiy vazifa uchun yoqib, lekin hyperpartisan media yozuvlari tomonidan o'zgartirilgan hujjatlarni o'zgartirish uchun juda ko'proq ishlaydi. Birinchi marta o'zgartirdi. eng muhim xossalarning analyzeri yaxshi darajalarni ko'rsatadi, lekin bu usulning eng muhim chegaralarini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'In, the system proposed by the CCL for the Hyperdu histan news trinh thám nhiệm vụ của SemEvl 209, is only based on the tokens that computer the documents and a chuẩn giám sát educational. Kết quả rất khác nhau: kém về nhiệm vụ chính, nhưng hiệu quả hơn nhiều trong việc phân biệt các tài liệu được xuất bản bởi các phương tiện truyền thông du kích và được phân loại ra trước. Một cuộc phân tích những yếu tố quan trọng đã nhấn mạnh những khía cạnh tích cực, nhưng cũng có những giới hạn tiềm năng của phương pháp.', 'bg': 'Тинтин, системата, предложена от ЦИКЛ за задачата "Хиперпартизано откриване на новини" на СемЕвал 2019, се основава изключително на токените, които съставляват документите и стандартна процедура за контролирано обучение. Тя постига много контрастиращи резултати: слаба по основната задача, но много по-ефективна при разграничаването на документите, публикувани от хиперпартизаните медии, от безпристрастните, тъй като се класира на първо място. Анализът на най-важните характеристики подчерта положителните аспекти, но и някои потенциални ограничения на подхода.', 'nl': 'Kuifje, het systeem voorgesteld door de CECL voor de Hyperpartisan News Detection taak van SemEval 2019, is uitsluitend gebaseerd op de tokens die de documenten vormen en een standaard begeleide leerprocedure. Het behaalde zeer contrasterende resultaten: slecht in de hoofdtaak, maar veel effectiever in het onderscheiden van documenten die door hyperpartisane media worden gepubliceerd van onbevooroordeelde, omdat het op de eerste plaats stond. Een analyse van de belangrijkste kenmerken heeft de positieve aspecten, maar ook enkele potentiële beperkingen van de aanpak benadrukt.', 'da': 'Tintin, det system, der foreslås af CECL til Hyperpartisan News Detection opgaven i SemEval 2019, er udelukkende baseret på de tokens, der udgør dokumenterne, og en standard overvåget læringsprocedure. Det opnåede meget kontrasterende resultater: dårlig på hovedopgaven, men langt mere effektiv til at skelne mellem dokumenter udgivet af hyperpartisan medier og upartiske, da det rangerede først. En analyse af de vigtigste træk fremhævede de positive aspekter, men også nogle potentielle begrænsninger ved tilgangen.', 'hr': 'Tintin, sustav koji je predložio CECL za zadatak otkrivanja Hyperpartisan News za semiEval 2019. godine, osnovan je samo na znakovima koji sastavljaju dokumente i standardnu proceduru učenja nad nadzorom. Dobio je vrlo kontrastične rezultate: siromašni na glavnom zadatku, ali mnogo učinkovitiji u razmjerenju dokumenta objavljenih hiperpartizanskim medijima od nepristrasnih, kao što je prvo postignuta. Analiza najvažnijih karakteristika ukazala je na pozitivne aspekte, ali i neke potencijalne ograničenje pristupa.', 'id': 'Tintin, sistem yang diusulkan oleh CECL untuk tugas Deteksi Berita Hyperpartisan dari SemEval 2019, secara eksklusif berdasarkan token yang membuat dokumen dan prosedur belajar standar yang diawasi. Hal ini mendapat hasil yang sangat bertentangan: buruk dalam tugas utama, tetapi jauh lebih efektif dalam membedakan dokumen yang diterbitkan oleh media hyperpartisan dari yang tidak bias, seperti yang ditangkap pertama. Analisis ciri-ciri yang paling penting menunjukkan aspek positif, tetapi juga beberapa potensi batasan pendekatan.', 'fa': 'Tintin, the system proposed by the CECL for the Hyperpartisan News Detection task of SemEval 2019, is exclusively based on the tokens that make up the documents and a standard supervised learning procedure. نتایج بسیار متقابل تفاوت یافت: فقیر در کار اصلی، ولی بسیار مثبت\u200cتر در اختلاف سند\u200cها که توسط بیرون\u200cهای رسانه\u200cهای هوپر پارتیسان منتشر شده\u200cاند، از بیرون\u200cهای متقابل تفاوت شده\u200cاند، همانطور که اول درجه تحلیل مهمترین ویژه\u200cهای مثبتی\u200cها را مشخص کرد، ولی بعضی محدودیت\u200cهای محدودیت دسترسی را مشخص کرد.', 'de': 'Tintin, das vom CECL für die Hyperpartisan News Detection Task von SemEval 2019 vorgeschlagene System, basiert ausschließlich auf den Tokens, aus denen die Dokumente bestehen, und einem standardisierten überwachten Lernverfahren. Es erzielte sehr kontrastreiche Ergebnisse: schlecht in der Hauptaufgabe, aber viel effektiver bei der Unterscheidung von Dokumenten, die von überparteiischen Medien veröffentlicht wurden, von unvoreingenommenen Medien, da es an erster Stelle stand. Eine Analyse der wichtigsten Merkmale hob die positiven Aspekte, aber auch mögliche Einschränkungen des Ansatzes hervor.', 'sw': 'Tintin, mfumo unapendekezwa na CECL kwa ajili ya kazi ya Uchunguzi wa Habari za Hyperpartisan wa SemEval 2019, unajikita na alama ambazo zinatengeneza nyaraka na utaratibu wa kujifunza kwa kiwango cha kawaida. Ilipata matokeo yanayopingana sana: masikini kwenye kazi kuu, lakini yenye ufanisi zaidi katika kutofautisha nyaraka zilizochapishwa na vyombo vya habari vya kikatili kutoka kwa wale wasio na kibaguzi, kama ilivyokuwa kwa mara ya kwanza. Uchambuzi wa vipengele muhimu zaidi ulionyesha upande chanya, lakini pia baadhi ya vizuizi vya mbinu hizo.', 'ko': 'Tintin은 CECL이 SemEval 2019의 초당적 뉴스 탐지 임무를 위해 제시한 시스템으로 문서를 구성하는 태그와 기준을 바탕으로 하는 감독 학습 프로그램을 기반으로 한다.주요 임무에서는 좋지 않았지만 초당파 매체가 발표한 문건과 편견이 없는 문건을 구분하는 데는 효과가 있었다. 1위를 차지했기 때문이다.가장 중요한 특징에 대한 분석은 이 방법의 적극적인 측면을 두드러지게 했지만 잠재적인 한계도 존재한다.', 'tr': "Tintin, Hyperpartisan Haber Detection görevi için CECL tarafından 2019-nji SemEval'in teklif edilen sistemi, Belgeleri ve standart gözetli öğrenme prosedüsüne dayanarak sembollere dayanmış. Bu netijede örän täsirli netijeler aldy: esasy görelde garyp, ýöne hiperpartisanlar medialar tarapyndan janlaşylan täsirlerden beýleki täsirlerden has kän täsirli boldy. Iň wajyp özellikleriň analyzasy pozitif aspektlerini ýagtylaşdyrdy, ýöne ýagdaýyň käbir mümkinçilikleri hem bellendi.", 'af': "Tintin, die stelsel wat deur die CECL voorgestel het vir die Hyperpartisan Nuus-opdekking taak van SemEval 2019, is eksklusief gebaseer op die tekens wat die dokumente en 'n standaard ondersoekte leer-prosedure maak. Dit het baie kontrastende resultate ontvang: arme op die hoof taak, maar baie meer effektief by die afdeling van dokumente wat deur hiperpartisan media uitgeleë gepubliseer is van onbiaseerde, soos dit eerste rangeer het. 'n Analisie van die mees belangrike eienskappe het die positiewe aspekte verlig, maar ook sommige potentiele beperking van die toegang.", 'hy': 'Տինթին, CECEC-ի առաջարկած համակարգը, որը պատրաստվում է 2019 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" հիպերպարտիզան նորությունների հայտնաբերման համար, հիմնված է միայն փաստաթղթերը բաղկացնող նշանների վրա և ստանդարտ վերահսկված ուսումնական գործընթացի վրա: Այն բավականին հակադրական արդյունքներ ստացավ. աղքատ է հիմնական խնդրի վրա, բայց շատ ավելի արդյունավետ է տարբերակում հիպերկայացի լրատվամիջոցների հրատարակված փաստաթղթերը անկողմնակալից, ինչպիսին առաջին դասակարգում էր: Ամենակարևոր հատկանիշների վերլուծությունը ցույց տվեց դրական ասպեկտները, բայց նաև մոտեցության պոտենցիալ սահմանափակումները:', 'sq': 'Tintin, sistemi i propozuar nga CECL për detyrën e zbulimit të lajmeve hiperpartizane të SemEval 2019, bazohet ekskluzivisht në shenjat që përbëjnë dokumentet dhe një procedurë standard të mbikqyrur mësimi. Ajo fitoi rezultate shumë kontraste: të dobëta në detyrën kryesore, por shumë më efektive në dallimin e dokumenteve të botuara nga publikimet e medias hiperpartizane nga ato të pafajshme, siç renditet i pari. Një analizë e karakteristikave më të rëndësishme theksoi aspektet pozitive, por gjithashtu disa kufizime potenciale të qasjes.', 'am': 'ቲቲntin የኬፍሬፓርቲን ዜና ምርጫዎች የሴmEval 2019 ሰነዱን እና የተጠበቀውን ተማሪ ሥርዓት በሚያሳድጉ ምልክቶች ላይ ብቻ የተመሠረተ ነው፡፡ በጣም ተቃዋሚ ፍሬዎችን አግኝቷል፤ ዋነኛው ስራ ላይ ድሆች ግን በመጀመሪያ እንደተደረገ በhyperpartisan ሚዲያ አውታር የተለየ ሰነጃዎችን ከመለየት ይልቅ የተሻለ ነው፡፡ ከታናቂዎቹ ምርጫዎች ላይ የሚያስተምር የአስቸጋሪውን ነገር ግን የሥርዓት ግንኙነቶችን ያስተካክሉ ነበር፡፡', 'az': 'Tintin, Hyperpartisan News Detection Task üçün CECL təbliğ etdiyi sistem 2019-in SemEval təbliğ etdi, belələri və standart təhlükəsizli öyrənmə prosedüsinə dayanan möcüzələr istisnadır. Bu çox müxtəlif sonuçlar aldı: başqa işlərdə kasıblar idi, amma hiperpartisan media çıxışlarından ilk dərəcədə müəyyən edilən belələri seçmək üçün daha faydalı oldu. Ən möhüm xüsusiyyətlərin analizi pozitif aspektlərini təşkil etdi, lakin bu təsirin bəzi mümkün limitlərini də təşkil etdi.', 'ca': "Tintin, el sistema proposat per la CECL per la tasca de detecció hiperpartisana de SemEval 2019, està basat exclusivament en les fitxes que componen els documents i un procediment d'aprenentatge normalitzat supervisat. Va obtenir resultats molt contrastants: pobres en la tasca principal, però molt més efectius en distingir els documents publicats pels mitjans hiperpartisans d'aquells imparcials, segons la primera classificació. Una anàlisi de les característiques més importants va destacar els aspectes positius, però també algunes limitacions potencials de l'enfocament.", 'bs': 'Tintin, sistem koji je predložio CECL za zadatak otkrivanja Hyperpartisan News za semiEval 2019. godine, osnovan je samo na znakovima koji sastavljaju dokumente i standardnu proceduru učenja nad nadzorom. Dobio je vrlo kontrastične rezultate: siromašni na glavnom zadatku, ali mnogo učinkovitiji u razmjerenju dokumenta objavljenih hiperpartizanskim medijima od nepristrasnih, kao što je prvo postignuta. Analiza najvažnijih karakteristika ukazala je na pozitivne aspekte, ali i neke potencijalne ograničenje pristupa.', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল ২০১৯ সালের হাইপার্পার্টিস্যান নিউজ ডিটেক্টরেশন কাজের জন্য সিসিএল প্রস্তাব করেছেন তিন্তিনি শুধুমাত্র প্রতীকের উপর ভিত্তি করেছেন যা ন It obtained very contrasting results: poor on the main task, but much more effective at distinguishing documents published by hyperpartisan media outlets from unbiased ones, as it ranked first.  সবচেয়ে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বৈশিষ্ট্যের বিশ্লেষণ ইতিবাচক দিকে তুলে ধরেছে, কিন্তু এছাড়াও এই প্রতিযোগিতার কিছু সম্ভ', 'cs': 'Tintin, systém navržený CECL pro úlohu detekce hyperpartizánních zpráv SemEval 2019, je založen výhradně na tokenech, které tvoří dokumenty a standardním postupu dohledu. Dosáhla velmi kontrastních výsledků: špatné na hlavním úkolu, ale mnohem efektivnější při odlišování dokumentů publikovaných hyperpartyzánními médii od nezaujatých, neboť se jednalo o první místo. Analýza nejdůležitějších prvků zdůraznila pozitivní aspekty, ale také některá možná omezení přístupu.', 'fi': 'Tintin, CECL:n SemEval 2019:n Hyperpartisan News Detection -tehtävään ehdottama järjestelmä, perustuu yksinomaan dokumenttien muodostaviin poletteihin ja vakiomuotoiseen valvottuun oppimismenettelyyn. Se sai hyvin ristiriitaisia tuloksia: se oli huono päätehtävässä, mutta paljon tehokkaampi erottaa hyperpartisaanien tiedotusvälineiden julkaisemat asiakirjat puolueettomista, sillä se sijoittui ensimmäisenä. Tärkeimpien piirteiden analyysi toi esiin lähestymistavan myönteisiä näkökohtia mutta myös joitakin mahdollisia rajoituksia.', 'et': 'Tintin, CECLi poolt SemEval 2019 hüperpartisansete uudiste tuvastamise ülesandeks pakutud süsteem, põhineb ainult dokumentide moodustavatel tokenitel ja standardsel järelevalveprotseduuril. Selle tulemused olid väga vastuolulised: põhiülesande täitmisel puudulikud, kuid palju tõhusamad hüperpartisansete meediakanalite avaldatud dokumentide eristamisel erapooletutest, kuna see oli esimene. Kõige olulisemate omaduste analüüs rõhutas lähenemisviisi positiivseid aspekte, kuid ka mõningaid võimalikke piiranguid.', 'jv': 'Mintini, sistem sing nggawe cetol nggo CeCL kanggo Perintah Hyperpartisan New detection task kang seminval 2011, dadi isih dhéwé basa ngono token sing nggawe dokumen lan padha sistem sing ngewehku nggawe aturan awak dhéwé. Rasané luwih jarasai sing paling-jarasai: misirke kuwi wis ana ing nggunian, karo akeh sing luwih apik sing luwih apik penulis dokumen sing dipuluhayo karo hal-perintah median sing wis dipuluhayo, sing paling-perintah sing wis nguasai perusahaan. Ndeleksyon karo akeh sing nggawe barang nggawe ngubah kang angka sing apik, nangé gawe perusahaan limiting kanggo diandeksyon.', 'ha': "Titin, na'urar da aka buɗa na CECL wa aikin zartar da Habari na Hyperpartsan 2019, yana faƙatan a kan alama waɗanda ke samun takardun takardun da wata takardar da aka tsare wa tsarin karatun. Tana sãmu mafiya fassarar fassarar: matalauci ne a kan aikin muhimmi, kuma amma mafi fasahan a wajen rarrabe dokuman da aka nuna na fassarar mutane daga da ba'a yi haƙƙi ba, kamar da ta rana kwanza. Anarari ga masu muhimmi na ƙayyade, ya ƙayyade masu shiryuwa, kuma amma akwai wasu tsaro masu yiwuwa daga mazaɓa.", 'he': 'Tintin, the system proposed by the CECL for the Hyperpartisan News Detection task of SemEval 2019, is exclusively based on the tokens that make up the documents and a standard supervised learning procedure.  הוא השיג תוצאות שונות מאד: עניות במשימה הראשית, אך הרבה יותר יעילות בהבדל מסמכים שהופרסמו על ידי מקומות התקשורת היפרמפרטיזניים מאותם לא משותפים, כפי שהורג קודם. ניתוח של המאפיינים החשובים ביותר הרים את היבטים החיוביים, אך גם כמה מגבלות פוטנציאליות של הגישה.', 'sk': 'Tintin, sistem, ki ga predlaga CECL za nalogo odkrivanja hiperpartizanskih novic SemEval 2019, temelji izključno na žetonih, ki sestavljajo dokumente in standardnem nadzorovanem učnem postopku. Dobila je zelo nasprotne rezultate: slaba pri glavni nalogi, vendar veliko bolj učinkovita pri ločevanju dokumentov, ki jih objavljajo hiperpartizanski mediji, od nepristranskih, saj se je uvrstila na prvo mesto. Analiza najpomembnejših značilnosti je poudarila pozitivne vidike, pa tudi nekatere morebitne omejitve pristopa.', 'bo': 'Tintin, system proposed by the CECL for the Hyperpartisan News Detection task of SemEval 2019, is exclusively based on the tokens that make up the documents and a standard supervised learning procedure. དེ་ནི་གདོང་འབྲེལ་བའི་འབྱུང་བ་མང་ཙམ་ལེན་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། རྩ་བའི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་གཟའ་བོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་། ཡིན་ཡང་ནས་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་འགུལ་ག གལ་ཆེན་ཤོས་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་གིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱས་ཡོད། དཔེར་སྤྱད་པར་ཉེན'}
{'en': 'Vernon-fenwick at SemEval-2019 Task 4 : Hyperpartisan News Detection using Lexical and Semantic Features', 'ar': 'فيرنون-فينويك في SemEval-2019 المهمة 4: الكشف عن الأخبار الحزبية باستخدام الميزات المعجمية والدلالية', 'fr': "Vernon-Fenwick au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 4\xa0: Détection hyperpartisane des actualités à l'aide de fonctionnalités lexicales et sémantiques", 'pt': 'Vernon-fenwick no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 4: Detecção de notícias hiperpartidárias usando recursos lexicais e semânticos', 'es': 'Vernon-fenwick en la Tarea 4 de SemEval-2019: Detección hiperpartidista de noticias mediante funciones léxicas y semánticas', 'zh': 'Vernon-fenwick在SemEval-2019务4:用词汇、语义超党新闻检', 'ja': 'Vernon - fenwick at SemEval -2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection using Lexical and Semantic Features', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 4 पर वर्नोन-फेनविक: लेक्सिकल और सिमेंटिक सुविधाओं का उपयोग करके हाइपरपार्टिसन समाचार का पता लगाना', 'ru': 'Вернон-фенвик на SemEval-2019 Задача 4: Обнаружение гиперпартийных новостей с использованием лексических и семантических особенностей', 'ga': 'Vernon-fenwick ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 4: Brath Nuachta Hyperpartisan ag úsáid Gnéithe Léacsúla agus Séimeantacha', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Vernon-fenwick a SemEval-2019 4. feladat: Hyperpartizán hírek felismerése Lexikai és Szemantikus funkciók segítségével', 'el': 'Εργασία 4: Ανίχνευση υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων με χρήση Λεξικών και Σημαντικών χαρακτηριστικών', 'it': 'Vernon-fenwick al SemEval-2019 Task 4: Rilevazione di notizie iperpartigiane utilizzando funzionalità lessicali e semantiche', 'kk': 'Vernon- fenwick жарым- 2019 тапсырмасының 4- тапсырмасы: Hyperpartisan News Detection using Lexical and Semantic Features', 'lt': 'Vernon-fenwick SemEval-2019 4 užduotis: hiperpartinė naujienų aptikimas naudojant leksinius ir Semantinius požymius', 'mk': 'Вернон-фенвик на SemEval-2019 задача 4: Хиперпартиска новинска детектива користејќи лексикални и семантични функции', 'ms': 'Vernon-fenwick di SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Pengesanan Berita Hyperpartisan menggunakan Ciri-ciri Lexical dan Semantic', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 4: ലെക്സിക്സിക്കലും സെമാന്റിക് വിശേഷങ്ങളും ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസ്സാന്\u200d വെര്\u200dണോന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Vernon-fenwick f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 4: Sejbien ta’ Aħbarijiet Hyperpartisan bl-użu ta’ Karatteristiċi Lessiċi u Semantiċi', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection using Lexical and Semantic Features', 'no': 'Vernon-fenwick ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection using Lexical and Semantic Features', 'pl': 'Vernon-fenwick na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 4: Wykrywanie wiadomości hiperspartyjnych przy użyciu funkcji leksykalnych i semantycznych', 'ro': 'Vernon-fenwick la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 4: Detectarea știrilor hiperpartizane folosind caracteristici lexicale și semantice', 'sr': 'Vernon-fenwick na semiEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection koristeći leksičke i semiantičke karakteristike', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Vernon-fenwick på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection med Lexical och Semantic Features', 'so': 'Vernon-fenwick at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Detection of News Hyperpartisan using Lexical and Semantic Features', 'ta': 'Vernon-fenwick at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection using Lexical and Semantic Features', 'ur': 'ورنون فن ویک سیم اول-2019 ٹاکس 4: ہیپر پارٹیسون خبروں کی آشنائی', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Vernon-fenwick tại SemEvl-209 Task 4: trinh sát tin trinh thám trinh thám bằng ngôn ngữ và Trung chất.', 'bg': 'Върнън-фенуик на Задача 4: Хиперпартизано откриване на новини чрез лексикални и семантични функции', 'nl': 'Vernon-fenwick op SemEval-2019 Taak 4: Hyperpartisane nieuwsdetectie met behulp van Lexische en Semantische kenmerken', 'da': 'Vernon-fenwick ved SemEval-2019 Opgave 4: Hyperpartisan nyhedsdetektion ved hjælp af Lexical og Semantic Features', 'hr': 'Vernon-fenwick na semiEval-2019 zadatak 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection koristeći leksičke i semiantičke funkcije', 'id': 'Vernon-fenwick di SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Deteksi Berita Hyperpartisan menggunakan Features Lexical and Semantic', 'de': 'Vernon-fenwick auf der SemEval-2019 Aufgabenstellung 4: Überparteiliche Nachrichtenerkennung mit Lexika und Semantik', 'ko': '버논 fenwick이SemEval-2019에서의 임무4: 어휘와 의미 특징을 이용한 초당파 뉴스 검측', 'fa': 'Vernon-fenwick در ماموریت ۲۰۱۹ کار ۴: شناسایی اخبار هایپر پارتیسان با استفاده از ویژه های لکسیکال و سیمانتیک', 'sw': 'Vernon-fenwick kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 4: Utafiti wa Habari za Kihisia na Semantic', 'tr': 'Vernon-fenwick at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan Haber Detection using Lexical and Semantic Features', 'af': 'Vernon- fenwick by SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 4: Hyperpartisan Nuus Opdekking gebruik Leksiese en Semantiese Funksies', 'sq': 'Vernon-fenwick në SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection using Lexical and Semantic Features', 'am': 'Vernon-fenwick at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection using Lexical and Semantic Features', 'az': 'Vernon-fenwick at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection using Lexical and Semantic Features', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ টাস্ক ৪: লেক্সিকাল এবং সেমান্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে হাইপার্পার্সিন নিউজ ডিটেশন', 'hy': 'Վերնոն-ֆենվիքսը Սեմեվալ-2019 թվականին 4. հանձնարարությունը. Հիպերպարտենսային նորությունների հայտնաբերումը՝ օգտագործելով լեքսիկական և սեմանտիկ առանձնահատկություններ', 'bs': 'Vernon-fenwick na semiEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection koristeći leksičke i semiantičke karakteristike', 'ca': 'Vernon-fenwick a SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection using Lexical and Semantic Features', 'et': 'Vernon-fenwick SemEval-2019 ülesandel 4: hüperpartisansete uudiste tuvastamine leksiaalsete ja semantiliste funktsioonide abil', 'cs': 'Vernon-fenwick na SemEval-2019 Úkol 4: Detekce hyperstranických zpráv pomocí Lexických a Sémantických funkcí', 'fi': 'Vernon-fenwick SemEval-2019 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 4: Hyperpartisaanien uutisten tunnistus Lexical- ja Semantic-ominaisuuksilla', 'ha': 'Vernon-fenwick at SemEal-2019 Tafiyar 4: Hyperpartsan News Define by Use Lex and Semantic Features', 'he': 'Vernon-fenwick ב SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection using Lexical and Semantic Features', 'sk': 'Vernon-fenwick na SemEval-2019 naloga 4: Hiperpartizansko zaznavanje novic z leksičnimi in semantičnimi funkcijami', 'jv': 'Verno-henWik at semiinval-2011 task 4: Typerpartisan New detection use Leksial and semanti Items', 'bo': 'Vernon-fenwick at SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection using Lexical and Semantic Features'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present our submission for SemEval-2019 Task 4 : Hyperpartisan News Detection. Hyperpartisan news articles are sharply polarized and extremely biased (onesided). It shows blind beliefs, opinions and unreasonable adherence to a party, idea, faction or a person. Through this task, we aim to develop an automated system that can be used to detect hyperpartisan news and serve as a prescreening technique for fake news detection. The proposed system jointly uses a rich set of handcrafted textual and semantic features. Our system achieved 2nd rank on the primary metric (82.0 % accuracy) and 1st rank on the secondary metric (82.1 % F1-score), among all participating teams. Comparison with the best performing system on the leaderboard shows that our system is behind by only 0.2 % absolute difference in accuracy.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos nossa submissão para a Tarefa 4 do SemEval-2019: Detecção de notícias hiperpartidárias. Artigos de notícias hiperpartidários são fortemente polarizados e extremamente tendenciosos (unilaterais). Mostra crenças cegas, opiniões e adesão irracional a um partido, ideia, facção ou pessoa. Através desta tarefa, pretendemos desenvolver um sistema automatizado que possa ser usado para detectar notícias hiperpartidárias e servir como uma técnica de pré-triagem para detecção de notícias falsas. O sistema proposto usa em conjunto um rico conjunto de recursos textuais e semânticos artesanais. Nosso sistema alcançou o 2º lugar na métrica primária (82,0% de precisão) e 1º na métrica secundária (82,1% F1-score), entre todas as equipes participantes. A comparação com o sistema de melhor desempenho na tabela de classificação mostra que nosso sistema está atrasado por apenas 0,2% de diferença absoluta na precisão.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos nuestra presentación para la Tarea 4 de SemEval-2019: Detección de noticias hiperpartidistas. Los artículos de noticias hiperpartidistas están fuertemente polarizados y extremadamente sesgados (unilaterales). Muestra creencias ciegas, opiniones y adhesión irrazonable a un partido, idea, facción o persona. A través de esta tarea, nuestro objetivo es desarrollar un sistema automatizado que pueda usarse para detectar noticias hiperpartidistas y que sirva como técnica de preselección para la detección de noticias falsas. El sistema propuesto utiliza conjuntamente un rico conjunto de características textuales y semánticas hechas a mano. Nuestro sistema obtuvo el segundo puesto en la métrica principal (82,0% de precisión) y el primer puesto en la métrica secundaria (82,1% de puntuación de F1), entre todos los equipos participantes. La comparación con el sistema de mejor rendimiento en la tabla de clasificación muestra que nuestro sistema está retrasado por solo un 0,2% de diferencia absoluta en precisión.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم تقريرنا عن SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. المقالات الإخبارية الحزبية شديدة الاستقطاب ومتحيزة للغاية (من جانب واحد). يظهر معتقدات وآراء عمياء والتزام غير معقول بحزب أو فكرة أو فصيل أو شخص. من خلال هذه المهمة ، نهدف إلى تطوير نظام آلي يمكن استخدامه للكشف عن الأخبار الحزبية ويكون بمثابة تقنية فحص مسبق للكشف عن الأخبار المزيفة. يستخدم النظام المقترح بشكل مشترك مجموعة غنية من الميزات النصية والدلالية المصنوعة يدويًا. حقق نظامنا المرتبة الثانية على المقياس الأساسي (دقة 82.0٪) والمرتبة الأولى على المقياس الثانوي (82.1٪ درجة F1) ، بين جميع الفرق المشاركة. تظهر المقارنة مع أفضل نظام أداء على لوحة المتصدرين أن نظامنا متأخر بنسبة 0.2٪ فقط في الاختلاف المطلق في الدقة.', 'fr': 'Dans cet article, nous présentons notre soumission pour SemEval-2019 Task 4\xa0: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Les articles de presse hyperpartisans sont fortement polarisés et extrêmement biaisés (unilatéraux). Il montre des croyances aveugles, des opinions et une adhésion déraisonnable à un parti, à une idée, à une faction ou à une personne. À travers cette tâche, nous visons à développer un système automatisé pouvant être utilisé pour détecter les nouvelles hyperpartisanes et servir de technique de présélection pour la détection des fausses nouvelles. Le système proposé utilise conjointement un riche ensemble de caractéristiques textuelles et sémantiques artisanales. Notre système a atteint le 2e rang sur la métrique principale (82,0\xa0% de précision) et le 1er rang sur la métrique secondaire (82,1\xa0% F1-score), parmi toutes les équipes participantes. La comparaison avec le système le plus performant du classement montre que notre système est en retard de seulement 0,2\xa0% en termes de précision absolue.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detectionの提出物を紹介する。超党派のニュース記事は極端に二極化し、極端に偏向している（一方的）。それは、盲目的な信念、意見、党、アイデア、派閥、または人物への理不尽な執着を示します。このタスクを通じて、超党派ニュースを検出し、フェイクニュース検出の事前スクリーニング技術として活用できる自動化システムの開発を目指しています。提案されたシステムは、手作りのテキスト機能とセマンティック機能の豊富なセットを共同で使用します。当社のシステムは、すべての参加チームの中で、プライマリメトリックで2位（正確度82.0 ％ ）、セカンダリメトリックで1位（ F 1スコア82.1 ％ ）を達成しました。リーダーボードで最高のパフォーマンスを発揮するシステムと比較すると、当社のシステムは精度にわずか0.2%しか遅れていないことがわかります。', 'zh': '本文交SemEval-2019务4:超党新闻检。 超党新闻文章,锐两极分化偏见(片)。 见盲之信,见政党之心,系私之非理。 因此,我们的开发一自动化系统,可以检测超党派新闻,并为假新闻检测的预选技术。 所建系统共用手工文本及语义特征。 凡参赛行伍,统在第二指标(准确率为82.0%),次指标第一(F1分为82.1%)。 比之排行榜上性最佳者,精度上仅后0.2%绝异也。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम SemEval-2019 कार्य 4 के लिए अपना सबमिशन प्रस्तुत करते हैं: हाइपरपार्टिसन न्यूज डिटेक्शन। Hyperpartisan समाचार लेख तेजी से polarized और बेहद पक्षपाती (एकतरफा) कर रहे हैं. यह एक पार्टी, विचार, गुट या एक व्यक्ति के लिए अंधा विश्वासों, राय और अनुचित पालन को दर्शाता है। इस कार्य के माध्यम से, हम एक स्वचालित प्रणाली विकसित करने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं जिसका उपयोग हाइपरपार्टिसन समाचारों का पता लगाने और नकली समाचार का पता लगाने के लिए प्रीस्क्रीनिंग तकनीक के रूप में काम करने के लिए किया जा सकता है। प्रस्तावित प्रणाली संयुक्त रूप से हस्तनिर्मित पाठ्य और शब्दार्थ सुविधाओं के एक समृद्ध सेट का उपयोग करती है। हमारे सिस्टम ने प्राथमिक मीट्रिक (82.0% सटीकता) पर दूसरी रैंक हासिल की और सभी भाग लेने वाली टीमों के बीच माध्यमिक मीट्रिक (82.1% F1-स्कोर) पर पहला रैंक हासिल किया। लीडरबोर्ड पर सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन करने वाली प्रणाली के साथ तुलना से पता चलता है कि हमारा सिस्टम सटीकता में केवल 0.2% पूर्ण अंतर से पीछे है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем нашу заявку для задачи 4 SemEval-2019: Обнаружение гиперпартийных новостей. Гиперпартийные новостные статьи резко поляризованы и крайне предвзяты (односторонни). Она демонстрирует слепые убеждения, мнения и необоснованную приверженность партии, идее, фракции или человеку. С помощью этой задачи мы стремимся разработать автоматизированную систему, которая может быть использована для обнаружения гиперпартийных новостей и служить в качестве методики предварительного отбора для обнаружения фейковых новостей. Предлагаемая система совместно использует богатый набор текстуальных и семантических особенностей ручной работы. Наша система достигла 2-го места по первичной метрике (82,0% точности) и 1-го места по вторичной метрике (82,1% балла F1) среди всех участвующих команд. Сравнение с лучшей системой в таблице лидеров показывает, что наша система отстает только на 0,2% абсолютной разницы в точности.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid ár n-aighneacht i láthair do Thasc 4 SemEval-2019: Brath Nuacht Hyperpartisan. Tá ailt nuachta Hyperpartisan polaraithe go géar agus thar a bheith claonta (aontaobh). Léiríonn sé creidimh dall, tuairimí agus cloí míréasúnta le páirtí, smaoineamh, dhruid nó duine. Tríd an tasc seo, tá sé mar aidhm againn córas uathoibrithe a fhorbairt a fhéadfar a úsáid chun nuacht hyperpartisan a bhrath agus a fheidhmíonn mar theicníc réamhscagtha chun nuacht bhréige a bhrath. Úsáideann an córas atá beartaithe i gcomhpháirt sraith saibhir de ghnéithe lámhdhéanta téacsúla agus shéimeantacha. Bhain ár gcóras an 2ú céim amach ar an méadrach bunscoile (cruinneas 82.0%) agus an 1ú céim ar an méadrach tánaisteach (82.1% scór F1), i measc na bhfoirne rannpháirteacha go léir. Léiríonn comparáid leis an gcóras is fearr feidhmíochta ar an gclár ceannairí nach bhfuil ár gcóras chun deiridh ach 0.2% de dhifríocht iomlán ó thaobh cruinnis de.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ SemEval-2019 დავამუშავებთ საქმე 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Hyperpartisan news articles are sharply polarized and extremely biased (one side). ეს აჩვენებს ბლეო გულები, მნიშვნები და არაფერიზომი დამატება პოცირებისთვის, იდეა, ფექციის ან ადამიანის შესახებ. ამ დავალების გამოყენებით ჩვენ მინდა ავტომატიური სისტემის განვითარება, რომელიც შეიძლება გამოიყენება ჰიპერპორტიზანი ახალგაზების განახლებისთვის და დავუმუშავოთ როგორც საკუთარ საზოგადომის სისტემის ერთად გამოყენება ბედნიერი ტექსტუალური და ჟენმანტიური განსაზომილებების ნაწილი. ჩვენი სისტემა პირველი მეტრიკის (82,0% სიმართლე) მეტრიკის მეტრიკის მეტრიკის მეტრიკის მეტრიკის მეტრიკის მეტრიკის მეტრიკის მეტრიკის მეტრიკის მეტრიკის მეტრიკის მეტრიკის მეტრიკის მეტრი ჩვენი სისტემა მხოლოდ 0,2% აბსოლუტური განსხვავებაზე იქნება.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε την υποβολή μας για την εργασία 4: Ανίχνευση υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων. Τα υπερκομματικά άρθρα ειδήσεων είναι έντονα πολωμένα και εξαιρετικά προκατειλημμένα (μονόπλευρα). Δείχνει τυφλές πεποιθήσεις, απόψεις και παράλογη προσκόλληση σε ένα κόμμα, μια ιδέα, μια φατρία ή ένα άτομο. Μέσω αυτού του έργου, στοχεύουμε στην ανάπτυξη ενός αυτοματοποιημένου συστήματος που μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί για την ανίχνευση υπερκομματικών ειδήσεων και να χρησιμεύσει ως τεχνική προεξέτασης για την ανίχνευση ψεύτικων ειδήσεων. Το προτεινόμενο σύστημα χρησιμοποιεί από κοινού ένα πλούσιο σύνολο χειροποίητων κειμένων και σημασιολογικών χαρακτηριστικών. Το σύστημά μας πέτυχε τη 2η θέση στην πρωτοβάθμια μέτρηση (ακρίβεια 82,0% ) και την 1η θέση στη δευτεροβάθμια μέτρηση (βαθμολογία 82,1% F1), μεταξύ όλων των συμμετεχόντων ομάδων. Η σύγκριση με το σύστημα καλύτερης απόδοσης στον πίνακα κατάταξης δείχνει ότι το σύστημά μας είναι πίσω από μόνο 0,2% απόλυτη διαφορά ακρίβειας.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection című pályázatunkat. A hiperpartizán hírek élesen polarizáltak és rendkívül elfogultak (egyoldalúak). Vak hiteket, véleményeket és ésszerűtlen ragaszkodást mutat egy párthoz, ötlethez, frakcióhoz vagy egy személyhez. Ezzel a feladattal egy olyan automatizált rendszert fejlesztünk ki, amely hiperpartizán hírek felismerésére és hamis hírek felismerésére használható előzetes vizsgálati technikáként szolgál. A javasolt rendszer közösen gazdag kézzel készített szöveges és szemantikai jellemzőket használ. Rendszerünk a második helyet (82,0% pontosság) és az első helyet (82,1% F1 pontszám) érte el az összes résztvevő csapat között. A ranglistán a legjobb teljesítményű rendszerrel való összehasonlítás azt mutatja, hogy rendszerünk mindössze 0,2%-os abszolút pontossági különbséggel marad le.', 'it': "In questo articolo presentiamo la nostra presentazione per SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Gli articoli iperpartigiani sono fortemente polarizzati ed estremamente parziali (unilaterali). Mostra credenze cieche, opinioni e adesione irragionevole a un partito, un'idea, una fazione o una persona. Attraverso questo compito, miriamo a sviluppare un sistema automatizzato che possa essere utilizzato per rilevare notizie iperpartigiane e servire come tecnica di pre-screening per il rilevamento di fake news. Il sistema proposto utilizza congiuntamente una ricca serie di caratteristiche testuali e semantiche artigianali. Il nostro sistema ha raggiunto il 2° posto sulla metrica primaria (82,0% di precisione) e il 1° posto sulla metrica secondaria (82,1% di punteggio F1), tra tutte le squadre partecipanti. Il confronto con il sistema più performante sulla classifica mostra che il nostro sistema è indietro solo dello 0,2% di differenza assoluta di precisione.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome savo paraišką SemEval-2019 4 užduotis: hiperpartinė naujienų aptikimas. Hiperkartiziniai naujienų straipsniai yra labai poliarizuoti ir labai šališki (vienapusiai). Ji rodo aklus įsitikinimus, nuomones ir nepagrįstą partijos, idėjos, frakcijos ar asmens laikymąsi. Šia užduotimi siekiame sukurti automatizuotą sistemą, kuri galėtų būti naudojama hiperpartizinėms naujienoms aptikti ir naudojama kaip priekinė klastojų naujienų aptikimo metodika. Siūloma sistema kartu naudoja daug rankinių tekstinių ir semantinių savybių. Mūsų sistema iš visų dalyvaujančių grupių pasiekė antrąjį rangą pagal pirminę metrinę (82,0 proc. tikslumą) ir pirmąjį rangą pagal antrinę metrinę (82,1 proc. F1 balas). Palyginus su geriausiai veikiančia pirmaujančioje lentelėje nustatyta, kad mūsų sistema atsilieka tik 0,2 proc. absoliutaus tikslumo skirtumo.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазында, біз бұл жаңалық жаңалық тапсырма 4- жаңалық тапсырма үшін жіберімізді таңдаймыз. Hyperpartisan жаңалықтардың мақалалары жақсы поларизациялық және өте бұрышты (бір жағында). Бұл дұрыс сенімдер, ойлар және бір партияның, идеяның, бөліктерінің немесе адамға қатынасыз қатынасын көрсетеді. Бұл тапсырманың арқылы, гиперпартиялық жаңалықтарды анықтау үшін қолданылатын автоматты түрде жүйені жасау және жалғыз жаңалықтарды анықтау үшін прескриндау техникасы ретінде жұмыс істеу үшін ма Келтірілген жүйе біріктірілген мәтін және семантикалық мүмкіндіктерді қолданады. Біздің жүйеіміз бастапқы метрикалық (82, 0% дұрыс) және екінші метрикалық (82, 1% F1- нүктесі) бірінші ретінде (82, 1% нүктесі) жеткізді. Лидербордың ең жақсы істеу жүйесіне сәйкес, жүйеміздің артында тек 0,2% деген абсолюттік айырмашылығын көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, го претставуваме нашето поднесување за SemEval-2019 задача 4: Хиперпартиска новинска детекција. Хиперпартисанските вести се остро поларизирани и екстремно пристрасни (еднострани). Истиот покажува слепи верувања, мислења и неразумно придржување на партија, идеја, фракција или личност. Со оваа задача, ние имаме за цел да развиеме автоматизиран систем кој може да се користи за детектирање на хиперпартиски вести и да служи како техника за прегледување на лажни вести. Предложениот систем заеднички користи богат набор рачни текстуални и семантични карактеристики. Нашиот систем постигна втор ранг на примарната метрична точност (82,0 отсто) и прв ранг на секундарната метрична точка (82,1 отсто Ф1), меѓу сите учествувачки тимови. Во споредба со најдобриот систем на водечката табла се покажува дека нашиот систем е задоцнет за само 0,2 отсто апсолутна разлика во точноста.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan penghantaran kami untuk SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Pengesanan Berita Hyperpartisan. Artikel berita hiperpartisan dipolerasi dengan tajam dan sangat bias (satu sisi). It shows blind beliefs, opinions and unreasonable adherence to a party, idea, faction or a person.  Melalui tugas ini, kami bertujuan untuk mengembangkan sistem automatik yang boleh digunakan untuk mengesan berita hyperpartisan dan berkhidmat sebagai teknik prescreening untuk pengesan berita palsu. Sistem yang diusulkan menggunakan secara bersama set yang kaya ciri teks dan semantik yang dibuat tangan. Sistem kita mencapai peringkat kedua pada metrik utama (akurat 82.0%) dan peringkat pertama pada metrik sekunder (skor 82.1% F1), di antara semua pasukan yang berpartisipasi. Perbandingan dengan sistem prestasi terbaik pada papan pemimpin menunjukkan bahawa sistem kita berada di belakang hanya dengan 0.2% perbezaan mutlak dalam ketepatan.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw is-sottomissjoni tagħna għas-SemEval-2019 Kompitu 4: Detezzjoni tal-Aħbarijiet Hyperpartisan. L-artikoli tal-aħbarijiet iperpartiġjani huma polarizzati b’mod qawwi u bi preġudizzju estrem (fuq naħa waħda). Hija turi twemmin, opinjonijiet u aderenza mhux raġonevoli għal parti, idea, frazzjoni jew persuna. Permezz ta’ dan il-kompitu, għandna l-għan li niżviluppaw sistema awtomatizzata li tista’ tintuża biex jinstabu a ħbarijiet iperpartiġjani u sservu bħala teknika ta’ preskrining għall-individwazzjoni ta’ aħbarijiet foloz. Is-sistema proposta tuża b’mod konġunt sett għoli ta’ karatteristiċi testwali u semantiċi maħduma bl-idejn. Is-sistema tagħna kisbet it-tieni grad fuq il-metrika primarja (preċiżjoni ta’ 82.0%) u l-ewwel grad fuq il-metrika sekondarja (punteġġ ta’ 82.1% F1), fost it-timijiet parteċipanti kollha. Meta mqabbel mas-sistema bl-aħjar prestazzjoni fuq it-tabella ta’ tmexxija turi li s-sistema tagħna qiegħda lura b’differenza assoluta ta’ 0.2% biss fil-preċiżjoni.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид SemEval-2019-ийн ажил 4: Хиперпартизан мэдээллийн мэдээллийн нээлттэй хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдөж байна. Хиперпартизмын мэдээллийн баримтууд маш хурдан баялагдсан, маш хурдан (нэг талд) байдаг. Энэ нь хараагүй итгэл, үзэл санаа, санаа, хэсэг эсвэл хүн төрөлхтний харилцааныг харуулдаг. Энэ ажлын тулд бид автоматжуулсан системийг хөгжүүлэхийг зориулсан. Хиперпартизан мэдээг олох боломжтой, хуурамч мэдээг олохын тулд хэрэглэгддэг. Зарим санал өгсөн систем нь хамтдаа баян хэлбэрийг ашигладаг. Бидний систем анхны метрик (82.0% тохиромжтой) дээр хоёр дахь хэсэг, хоёр дахь хэсэг (82.1% F1-score), бүх оролцогчдын хамтдаа нэг хэсэг хүртсэн. Лидербордын хамгийн сайн үйлдвэрлэлтийн системтэй харьцуулахад бидний систем зөвхөн 0.2% нь зөвхөн тодорхой ялгаатай байдаг.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi vårt oppføring for semiEval-2019 oppgåve 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Hyperpartisan news articles are sharply polarized and extremely biased (one side). Det viser blinde troff, meningar og uavhengige tilhøyring til ein party, idé, fraksjon eller ein person. Gjennom denne oppgåva, må vi utvikla eit automatisk system som kan brukast til å finna hyperpartisan nytt og tjenera som ein sjirmteknikk for falske informasjon. Systemet foreslått saman brukar ein rikk sett av tekst- og semantiske funksjonar som er laga i håndkopla. Sistemet vårt oppnådd andre rekke på primærmetrisk (82,0% nøyaktighet) og første rekke på sekundær metrisk (82,1% F1- poeng), blant alle deltakarane. Sammenligninga med den beste utføringssystemet på lederbordet viser at systemet vårt er bak bare med 0,2% absolutt forskjell i nøyaktighet.', 'ml': 'In this paper, we present our submission for SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection.  ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപെര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസ്യന്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d കഠിനമായി തെറ്റിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നുണ്ട്. വളരെ തെറ്റായിരിക് അത് കാണിക്കുന്നത് അന്ധത വിശ്വാസം, അഭിപ്രായങ്ങളും ഒരു പാര്\u200dട്ടിയില്\u200d, ആശയം, വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d വ്യക്തിയുട ഈ ജോലിയിലൂടെ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സ്വതന്ത്രികമായ സിസ്റ്റം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഹൈപ്പര്\u200dപാര്\u200dട്ടിസന്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്ത കണ്ടുപിട പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സിസ്റ്റം ഒരു സമ്പന്നതയുള്ള കൈക്രാന്റ് ചെയ്ത ടെക്സ്കൂളിലും സെമാന്റിക്ക് വ നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ രണ്ടാമത്തെ സ്ഥാനത്ത് പ്രധാന മെട്രിക്കില്\u200d എത്തി (82. 0% ശരിയാണ്) സെക്കന്ററര്\u200d മെട്രിക്കില്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ സ്ഥാനത് നേതാവിന്റെ മികച്ച പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തിനെക്കുറിച്ച് താല്\u200dപര്യമാണ് നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy naszą zgłoszenie do SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Nadpartyjne artykuły informacyjne są ostro spolaryzowane i wyjątkowo stronnicze (jednostronne). Pokazuje ślepe przekonania, opinie i nieuzasadnione przywiązanie się do partii, idei, frakcji lub osoby. Dzięki temu zadaniu dążymy do opracowania zautomatyzowanego systemu, który może być wykorzystywany do wykrywania wiadomości hyperpartyzanckich i służyć jako technika wstępnego przesiewania do wykrywania fałszywych wiadomości. Proponowany system wspólnie wykorzystuje bogaty zestaw ręcznie wykonanych funkcji tekstowych i semantycznych. Nasz system osiągnął drugą pozycję w metryce pierwotnej (dokładność 82,0% ) oraz pierwszą w metryce wtórnej (wynik 82,1% F1) wśród wszystkich uczestniczących zespołów. Porównanie z najlepiej wydajnym systemem w klasyfikacji pokazuje, że nasz system jest w tyle zaledwie o 0,2% absolutnej różnicy dokładności.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, vă prezentăm depunerea noastră pentru SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Articolele de știri hiperpartizane sunt extrem de polarizate și extrem de părtinitoare (unilaterale). Arată convingeri oarbe, opinii și aderarea nerezonabilă la un partid, idee, facțiune sau o persoană. Prin această sarcină, ne propunem să dezvoltăm un sistem automatizat care să poată fi utilizat pentru detectarea știrilor hiperpartizane și să servească ca o tehnică de pre-screening pentru detectarea știrilor false. Sistemul propus utilizează în comun un set bogat de caracteristici textuale și semantice lucrate manual. Sistemul nostru a obținut locul 2 la metrica primară (precizie 82,0%) și locul 1 la metrica secundară (scor 82,1% F1), în rândul tuturor echipelor participante. Comparația cu cel mai performant sistem de pe clasament arată că sistemul nostru este în urmă cu doar 0,2% diferență absolută de precizie.', 'so': "Warqadan waxan ku soo bandhignaa warqaddayada SemEval-2019 Shaqada 4: Baaritaanka warqada Hyperpartisan. Warqadaha warbixinta ee Hyperpartisan waa kuwa si adag looga jaraa oo aad looga khiyaaneeyey (onesided). Waxay ku tustaa fikrada indhaha la'aanta, fikrada iyo qofka aan la sharciyeeyn inay u hogaansamaan xafiiska, fikrada, kooxaha ama qof. Shaqadan ayaannu ku talo galaynaa inaan horumarino nidaam iskumar ah oo loo isticmaali karo in la ogaado warar faa'iido ah iyo in loo adeego qalabka horumarinta ee la garto war been ah. Isticmaalka la soo jeeday wuxuu si wadajir ah u isticmaalaa koox taajir ah oo qoraal ah oo gacanta lagu qabanqaabiyay. nidaamkayagii wuxuu gaadhay darajada labaad ee ugu horeeya (82.0% saxda) iyo darajada 1aad ee metricka labaad (82.1% F1 score), kooxda qayb-qaadashada oo dhan. Comparison with the best performing system on the leaderboard shows that our system is behind by only 0.2% absolute difference in accuracy.", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi vårt bidrag till SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Hyperpartisan nyhetsartiklar är skarpt polariserade och extremt partiska (ensidiga). Den visar blinda övertygelser, åsikter och orimlig anslutning till ett parti, en idé, en fraktion eller en person. Genom denna uppgift strävar vi efter att utveckla ett automatiserat system som kan användas för att upptäcka hyperpartisan nyheter och fungera som en förstudieteknik för detektering av falska nyheter. Det föreslagna systemet använder tillsammans en rik uppsättning handgjorda text- och semantiska funktioner. Vårt system uppnådde 2:a rankningen på primärmätaren (82,0% noggrannhet) och 1:a rankningen på sekundärmätaren (82,1% F1-poäng), bland alla deltagande lag. Jämförelse med det bästa presterande systemet på topplistan visar att vårt system ligger efter med endast 0,2% absoluta skillnad i noggrannhet.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo svoju predanost za pola Evala-2019 zadatak 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Hiperpartizanski novinski članovi su oštro polarizani i ekstremno predrasudeni (jednostrano). To pokazuje slijepe verovanje, mišljenje i nepravilno pristupanje zabavi, ideji, frakcije ili osobi. Kroz ovaj zadatak, mi ciljamo da razvijemo automatski sistem koji se može koristiti za otkrivanje hiperpartizanskih vijesti i služimo kao preskrivenu tehniku za lažno otkrivanje vijesti. Predloženi sistem zajedno koristi bogat set tekstualnih i semantičnih karakteristika. Naš sistem je postigao 2. red na primarnoj metrici (tačnost 82,0% i prvi red na sekundarnoj metrici (82,1% F1 rezultat), među svim sudjelujućim timovima. U usporedbi sa najboljim izvršenim sistemom na vodičnoj ploči pokazuje da naš sistem stoji iza samo 0,2% apsolutne razlike u točnosti.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තට, අපි සෙම්වෙල්-2019 වැඩ 4 වෙනුවෙන් අපේ පිළිගන්න පුළුවන්: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Hyperpartisane news texts are sharp polarised and exterminated (one side). ඒක පෙන්වන්නේ අන්ධ විශ්වාස, හිතන්න සහ පාර්ටියක්, අදහසක්, කණ්ඩායමක්, මිනිස්සුවක්. මේ වැඩයෙන් අපි අල්ලගන්නවා ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය පද්ධතියක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් හායිපර් පාර්ටිසන් වාර්තාවක් හොයාගන්න සහ බොරු  ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ විශේෂ සහ සැමැන්තික විශේෂතාවක් භාවිත කරනවා. අපේ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරධාන මෙට්\u200dරික් වල දෙවෙනි ප්\u200dරධාන මෙට්\u200dරික් වල (82.0% සැකසීම) සහ දෙවෙනි මෙට්\u200dරික් වල පළමු ප්\u200dරධාන මෙට්\u200dරික් වල (82 ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතියේ හොඳම ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතිය සමග සම්බන්ධය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පද්ධතිය 0.2% විතරයි ඇත්තටම විතරයි.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் SemEval-2019 செயல் 4: ஹைப்பர்பார்சன் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பு. Hyperpartisan செய்திகளின் கட்டுரைகள் கடுமையாக தீவிரமாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளன மற்றும் மிகவும் பிரிவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளன (ந அது குருட்ட நம்பிக்கைகள், கருத்துக்கள் மற்றும் ஒரு கட்சி, யோசனை, பிரிவு அல்லது ஒரு மனிதனுக்கு சேர்ந்து கொள்ள முடி இந்த பணியின் மூலம், நாம் ஒரு தானியங்கிய அமைப்பை உருவாக்க வேண்டும். அது மிகப்பெரிய செய்திகளை கண்டறிய பயன்படுத்தி பொய் செய்தி கண்டறிய பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பு ஒன்றாக கையாள்நிரல் மற்றும் பெம்பென்டிக் குணங்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறது. எங்கள் அமைப்பு முதல் மெட்ரிக்கு இரண்டாம் நிலை பெற்றுள்ளது (82. 0% சரியாக) மற்றும் இரண்டாம் நிலை மெட்ரிக்கு (82. 1% F1- score) அனைத்து பங்கீடுகள தலைப்புபலகையில் சிறந்த செயல்படுத்தும் அமைப்புடன் ஒப்பிடுவது தெளிவாக சரியான வேறுபாடு மட்டும் தான் எங்கள் கணினி', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم SemEval-2019 ٹاکس چوتھی کے لئے ہماری اطاعت کریں گے: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Hyperpartisan news articles are sharply polarized and extremely biased (single side). یہ اندھے ایمان، نظریں اور بغیر عادلی جماعت، فکرت، فریق یا آدمی کی تعبیر کرتا ہے ہم اس کام کے ذریعہ سے ایک آٹوٹی سیستم کو ایجاد کرنا چاہتے ہیں جو ہیرپارٹیسون خبروں کو پہچان سکتے ہیں اور فریب خبروں کی شناسایی کے لئے ایک پرسکرین ٹیکنیک کے طور پر استعمال کرسکتے ہیں. پیغمبر کی سیسٹم ایک جوڑے سے ایک مالدار مجموعہ سے استعمال کرتا ہے جو ایک ہاتھ پیدا کیے گئے textual اور semantic features. ہماری سیستم نے پہلی میٹریک (82.0% accuracy) پر دوسری رقم پہنچائی اور دوسری میٹریک (82.1% F1-score) پر پہلی رقم پہنچائی، تمام شرکت گروہوں میں۔ لیڈربورڈ کے سب سے بہترین کاربرد سیسٹم سے مقایسہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارا سیسٹم صرف 0.2% دقیق تفاوت کے ذریعہ ہے.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda SemEval-2019 Vazifa 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Hyperpartisan хабарлар maqolalari juda qisqarli polarish va juda qisqat o'ylangan (onesided). Bu ko'rining fikrlarini, fikrlarni va ma'lumot bir guruhga, fikr, guruhga yoki odamga murakkab qilish mumkin. Bu vazifa orqali biz bir avtomatik tizimni aniqlash uchun foydalanishimiz va fake news qidirish uchun foydalanish mumkin. The proposed system jointly uses a rich set of handcrafted textual and semantic features.  Bizning tizimmiz asosiy metrikga ikkinchi darajaga (82. 0% аниқ) va ikkinchi darajaga (82. 1% F1 scori) birinchi darajaga ega bo'ldi, hamma bogʻlovchi guruhlardan birinchi darajaga. Sarlavhasdagi eng eng yaxshi bajarish tizimi bilan birga qisqa ko'rsatish mumkin, bizning tizimmiz faqat 0.2% davomida juda muhimiy o'zgarishga ega.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi xin giới thiệu đơn đề xuất nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 9 Task 4: trinh sát tin tức Hyperdu. Báo chí trinh sát cực đoan cực kỳ thiên lệch. Nó cho thấy niềm tin mù quáng, ý kiến và lòng trung thành với một đảng, ý tưởng, môn phái hay một con người. Qua nhiệm vụ này, chúng tôi muốn phát triển một hệ thống tự động có thể được sử dụng để phát hiện tin du kích và phục vụ cho kỹ thuật báo hiệu giả. Hệ thống được đề xuất sử dụng một hệ thống giàu có các nét văn bản và ngữ pháp. Hệ thống của chúng tôi đạt được hạng hai theo độ chính xác mét chính (82.0=)) và hạng thứ nhất ở trung tâm đo mét thứ hai (82.1=. F1) trong số các đội tham gia. Sự so sánh với hệ thống hiệu suất tốt nhất trên bảng lái cho thấy rằng hệ thống của chúng ta chỉ đứng sau mỗi sự khác biệt tuyệt đối về độ chính xác.', 'bg': 'В тази статия представяме нашето предложение за Задача 4: Хиперпартизанско откриване на новини. Хиперпартизаните новини са рязко поляризирани и изключително предубедени (едностранни). Тя показва слепи вярвания, мнения и неразумно придържане към партия, идея, фракция или човек. Чрез тази задача ние се стремим да разработим автоматизирана система, която да може да се използва за откриване на хиперпартизани новини и да служи като техника за предварителна проверка за откриване на фалшиви новини. Предложената система съвместно използва богат набор от ръчно изработени текстови и семантични характеристики. Системата ни постигна втори ранг по първичен показател (82.0% точност) и първи ранг по вторичен показател (82.1% резултат), сред всички участващи отбори. Сравнението с най-добрата система на класацията показва, че нашата система изостава само с 0.2% абсолютна разлика в точността.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we onze inzending voor SemEval-2019 Taak 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Hyperpartisane nieuwsartikelen zijn scherp gepolariseerd en extreem bevooroordeeld (eenzijdig). Het toont blinde overtuigingen, meningen en onredelijke aanhankelijkheid van een partij, idee, factie of een persoon. Met deze taak willen we een geautomatiseerd systeem ontwikkelen dat gebruikt kan worden om hyperpartisan nieuws te detecteren en dient als prescreening techniek voor fake news detectie. Het voorgestelde systeem maakt gezamenlijk gebruik van een rijke reeks handgemaakte tekstuele en semantische kenmerken. Ons systeem behaalde 2e rang op de primaire metric (82,0% nauwkeurigheid) en 1e rang op de secundaire metric (82,1% F1-score), onder alle deelnemende teams. Vergelijking met het best presterende systeem op het klassement toont aan dat ons systeem slechts 0,2% absoluut verschil in nauwkeurigheid achterlaat.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo podatke za pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Hiperpartizanski novinski članovi su oštre polarizirani i ekstremno predrasudeni (jednostrano). To pokazuje slijepe vjerovanje, mišljenje i nepravilno pristupanje stranci, ideji, skupina ili osobi. Kroz ovaj zadatak, mi ciljamo razviti automatski sustav koji se može koristiti za otkrivanje hiperpartizanskih vijesti i služiti kao preskrivna tehnika za lažno otkrivanje vijesti. Predloženi sustav zajedno koristi bogat skup tekstualnih i semantičnih karakteristika. Naš sustav je postigao 2. redak na primjernoj metrici (preciznost 82,0% i prvi redak na sekundarnoj metrici (82,1% F1 rezultat), među svim sudjelujućim timovima. U usporedbi sa najboljim izvršnim sustavom na vodećoj ploči pokazuje da naš sustav iza nas je samo 0,2% apsolutna razlika u točnosti.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi vores indsendelse til SemEval-2019 Opgave 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Hyperpartisan nyhedsartikler er skarpt polariserede og ekstremt partiske (ensidige). Det viser blinde overbevisninger, meninger og urimelig tilslutning til et parti, idé, fraktion eller en person. Gennem denne opgave sigter vi mod at udvikle et automatiseret system, der kan bruges til at opdage hyperpartisan nyheder og fungere som en forunderscreening teknik til fake news detektion. Det foreslåede system bruger i fællesskab et rigt sæt håndlavede tekst- og semantiske funktioner. Vores system opnåede 2. rang på den primære metric (82,0% nøjagtighed) og 1. rang på den sekundære metric (82,1% F1-score) blandt alle deltagende hold. Sammenligning med det bedst ydende system på ranglisten viser, at vores system er bagud med kun 0,2% absolutte forskel i nøjagtighed.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan pengiriman kami untuk SemEval-2019 Tugas 4: Deteksi Berita Hyperpartisan. Artikel berita hiperpartisan sangat polarised dan sangat biased (satu sisi). Hal ini menunjukkan keyakinan buta, pendapat dan persetujuan tidak masuk akal untuk sebuah parti, ide, fraksi atau seseorang. Melalui tugas ini, kami bertujuan untuk mengembangkan sistem otomatis yang dapat digunakan untuk mendeteksi berita hyperpartisan dan melayani sebagai teknik prescreening untuk deteksi berita palsu. The proposed system jointly uses a rich set of handcrafted textual and semantic features.  Sistem kita mencapai peringkat kedua pada metrik utama (akurasi 82,0%) dan peringkat pertama pada metrik sekunder (skor 82,1% F1), diantara semua tim yang berpartisipasi. Perbandingan dengan sistem prestasi terbaik di papan pemimpin menunjukkan bahwa sistem kita berada di belakang hanya dengan 0,2% perbedaan mutlak dalam akurasi.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는SemEval-2019 임무4: 초당파 뉴스 검측 보고서를 제출했다.초당파의 신문 기사는 극도로 양극화되어 편파적이다.그것은 맹목적인 신앙, 관점, 그리고 한 정당, 사상, 파벌 또는 개인에 대한 불합리한 견지를 나타낸다.이 임무를 통해 우리의 목표는 초당파 뉴스를 검출하고 가짜 뉴스 검출의 예비 선별 기술로 사용할 수 있는 자동화 시스템을 개발하는 것이다.제안된 시스템은 풍부한 수공 텍스트와 의미 특징을 연합하여 사용했다.전체 참가 팀 중 우리 시스템은 1급 지표(82.0%의 정확도)에서 2위, 2급 지표(82.1%의 F1 점수)에서 1위를 차지했다.차트에서 가장 잘 나온 시스템에 비해 우리 시스템은 정확도에서 0.2% 에 불과하다.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir unseren Beitrag für SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection vor. Hyperparteiische Nachrichtenartikel sind stark polarisiert und extrem voreingenommen (einseitig). Sie zeigt blinde Überzeugungen, Meinungen und unvernünftige Zugehörigkeit zu einer Partei, Idee, Fraktion oder einer Person. Mit dieser Aufgabe wollen wir ein automatisiertes System entwickeln, mit dem hyperparteiische Nachrichten erkannt und als Vorscreening-Technik zur Fake News-Erkennung genutzt werden können. Das vorgeschlagene System verwendet gemeinsam eine reiche Reihe von handgefertigten textuellen und semantischen Funktionen. Unser System erreichte den zweiten Rang in der Primärmetrik (82,0% Genauigkeit) und den ersten Rang in der Sekundärmetrik (82,1% F1-Punktzahl) unter allen teilnehmenden Teams. Der Vergleich mit dem leistungsstärksten System in der Rangliste zeigt, dass unser System nur um 0,2% absoluten Genauigkeitsunterschied zurückliegt.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما تحویل ما را برای کشف خبرهای نیمه سال ۲۰۱۹ نشان می دهیم. مقاله\u200cهای خبرهای هوپر پارتیسان به شدت قطعه\u200cای و بسیار متفاوت شده\u200cاند. این باورهای کور، نظریه\u200cها و تعقیب غیر منطقی به گروهی، ایده\u200cها، گروهی یا شخصی را نشان می\u200cدهد. از طریق این کار، ما قصد داریم سیستم اتوماتیک را توسعه کنیم که می تواند برای شناسایی اخبار hyperpartisan استفاده شود و به عنوان تکنیک پیش\u200cنمایش برای شناسایی اخبار دروغ خدمت کنیم. سیستم پیشنهاد با هم از مجموعه ثروتمندی از ویژه\u200cهای متن و semantic ساخته شده دست استفاده می\u200cکند. سیستم ما درجه دوم در متریک اولیه (دقیق 82.0 درصد) و درجه اولیه در متریک دوم (82.1 درصد F1) رسید، بین همه تیم\u200cهای مشترک. در مقایسه با بهترین سیستم اجرا روی بورد رهبر نشان می دهد که سیستم ما فقط با تفاوت کامل 0.2% در دقیق پشت سر است.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunawasilisha ujumbe wetu kwa ajili ya SemEval-2019 kazi 4: Utafiti wa Habari za Kihispania. Makala za habari za upeperushi zinachapishwa vibaya na vinavyovutiwa sana (yanaoneshwa). Inaonyesha imani vipofu, maoni na kujiunga na chama, wazo, makundi au mtu asiye na maana. Kwa kupitia juhudi hili, tunakusudia kuendeleza mfumo wa kujitegemea ambalo unaweza kutumika kutambua habari za watu wengi na kutumika kama teknolojia ya kutambua habari bandia. Mfumo huu unapendekezwa kwa pamoja unatumia seti tajiri za viungo vya teknolojia na semantic. Our system achieved 2nd rank on the primary metric (82.0% accuracy) and 1st rank on the secondary metric (82.1% F1-score), among all participating teams.  Kulinganisha na mfumo mzuri wa kufanya kazi kwenye uongozi unaonyesha kuwa mfumo wetu umebaki kwa asilimia 0.2 tu ya tofauti ya uhakika.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim paraqitjen tonë për SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Artiqet e lajmeve hiperpartizane janë të polarizuara dhe jashtëzakonisht të paragjykuara (të njëanshme). It shows blind beliefs, opinions and unreasonable adherence to a party, idea, faction or a person.  Nëpërmjet kësaj detyre, ne synojmë të zhvillojmë një sistem automatizuar që mund të përdoret për të zbuluar lajmet hiperpartizane dhe të shërbejë si një teknikë parashikimi për zbulimin e lajmeve të rreme. Sistemi i propozuar përdor së bashku një sërë të pasur karakteristikë tekstuale dhe semantike. Sistemi ynë arriti rendin e dytë në metrikën primare (82.0% saktësi) dhe rendin e parë në metrikën sekondare (82.1% rezultat F1), midis të gjitha ekipave pjesëmarrëse. Krahasimi me sistemin më të mirë në tabelë tregon se sistemi ynë është prapa me vetëm 0.2% ndryshim absolut në saktësi.', 'tr': 'Bu kağıt içinde, SemEval-2019 Görevi 4: Hyperpartisan Haberleri Deteksiyonu sunuyoruz. Hyperpartisanyň baglaýyşlary gaty pöleýän we gaty gorkunç(tarapyndan) geçirilýär. Kör ynamlar, düşünekler we oturylyşyk, ideýa, bölümler ýa adama garşylanmaýandygyny görkezýär. Bu buýruk bilen, hiperpartisanlary tanamak üçin ulanylýan awtomatik sistemany geliştirmek we sahyp habarlar tanamak üçin önünde durma tekniki hökmünde alyp biljek bolýarys. Mazmunlar sistemi bilen el çapda metin we semantik düzümlerini ulanýar. Biziň sistemamyz ilkinji metriýada (82.0% dogry) we ikinji metriýada (82.1% F1 noty) ýetdi we ähli bölegiň arasynda 2-nji setir tapyldy. Mümkin başlygdaky iň gowy etmäge sistemasy bilen çykyş sistemimiziň arkasynda diňe 0.2% dogry tapawutlygyny görkezýär.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, ons voorsien ons ondersoek vir SemEval-2019 Taak 4: Hyperpartisan Nuusbesoek. Hyperpartisan nuus artikels is skaars polariseer en ekstrem biased (onesided). Dit wys blinde geloof, besonderhede en onredelike aanhouding aan 'n party, idee, faktie of 'n persoon. Deur hierdie taak, doen ons doel om 'n outomatiese stelsel te ontwikkel wat gebruik kan word om hyperpartisan nuus te ontdek en as 'n voorskrim tekniks te dien vir falske nuusbeskrywing. Die voorgestel stelsel saamstig gebruik 'n ryk stel van handgebruikte tekstuele en semantiese funksies. Ons stelsel het tweede rang op die primêre metrie (82. 0% waarskynlik) en eerste rang op die sekundêre metrie (82. 1% F1- score), onder alle gedeeltende teame bereik. Vergelyking met die beste uitvoerde stelsel op die leierbord vertoon dat ons stelsel agter is deur slegs 0.2% absoluut verskil in presies.", 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ ለሴmEval-2019 ስራ 4 አቀረብናል፡፡ አፍሪካዊ የዜና ጽሑፎች በብርቱ ተጨማሪ እና እጅግ ተቃዋሚ ናቸው፡፡ የዕውር እምነት፣ አሳብ እና የማይፈቀድበት የፓርቲ፣ አእምሮ፣ ክፍል ወይም ሰውን ያሳያል፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ የሐሰት ዜና ማግኘት የተጠቃሚ ዜና ለማግኘት የሚቻለውን የራሳቸውን ስርዓት መፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተገኘው ስርዓት በተጠቃሚ የሀብታም የስህተት እና የsemantic ምርጫዎች ይጠቅማል፡፡ ሲስተምረታችን በመጀመሪያው ሚትሪክ (82.0 በመቶ እርግጠኛ) እና በሁለተኛው ደረጃ (82.1% F1-score) በመጀመሪያው ደረጃ አግኝቷል፡፡ ከመልካም የድምፅ ስርዓት በዋነኛው ቦርድ ላይ ሲያሳየው የስርዓታችን ውጤት በ0.2 በመቶ ብቻ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեր ներկայացումը "ՍեմԷվալ 2019"-ի 4. հանձնարարության համար՝ Հիպերպարտիզան նորությունների հայտնաբերման համար: Հիպերպարտիզան նորությունների հոդվածները խիստ պոլարիզացված են և չափազանց կողմնակի են (միակողմնակի): Այն ցույց է տալիս կոյր համոզմունքներ, կարծիքներ և առանց պատճառի կապվածություն մի կողմի, գաղափարի, ֆակցիայի կամ անձի հետ: Այս խնդրի միջոցով մենք նպատակում ենք զարգացնել ավտոմատիկ համակարգ, որը կարող է օգտագործվել հիպերկայացի նորությունների հայտնաբերման համար և ծառայել որպես կեղծ նորությունների հայտնաբերման նախագծային տեխնիկա: Առաջարկված համակարգը միասին օգտագործում է հսկայական հատկություններ ձեռագործված տեքստալ և սեմանտիկ հատկություններ: Մեր համակարգը հասավ 2-րդ դասին ամենամեծ մետրիկայի (82.0 տոկոս ճշգրտության) և 1-րդ դասին երկրորդ մետրիկայի (82.1 տոկոս F1-դասի) բոլոր մասնակիցների միջև: Համեմատությունը առաջնորդում գտնվող լավագույն համակարգի հետ ցույց է տալիս, որ մեր համակարգը հետևում է միայն 0.2 տոկոսի բացարձակ տարբերության ճշգրտության մեջ:', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের জন্য আমাদের প্রতিবেদন উপস্থাপন করছি: হাইপার্পার্টিস্যান নিউজ ডিটেক্টর হাইপার্পার্সিয়ান সংবাদ প্রবন্ধগুলো কঠিন দূর্নীতি এবং অত্যন্ত বিদ্রোহী (নিজেদের বিরুদ্ধে)। এটি অন্ধ বিশ্বাস, মতামত এবং পার্টি, আইডিয়া, দল বা ব্যক্তির সাথে যোগ দেখায়। এই কাজের মাধ্যমে আমরা একটি স্বয়ংক্রিয় সিস্টেম উন্নয়নের উদ্দেশ্য করছি যা হাইপার্পার্টন সংবাদ সনাক্ত করতে পারে এবং মিথ্যা সংবাদ সনাক্ত করত প্রস্তাবিত সিস্টেম একত্রে একটি সমৃদ্ধ টেক্সচুয়াল এবং সেমেন্টিক বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে। Our system achieved 2nd rank on the primary metric (82.0% accuracy) and 1st rank on the secondary metric (82.1% F1-score), among all participating teams.  নেতৃবোর্ডের সবচেয়ে ভালো প্রদর্শনী সিস্টেমের তুলনায় দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের সিস্টেম সঠিকভাবে শুধুমাত্র ০.', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, halımızı semiEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan Haber Detection göstəririk. Hyperpartisan xəbərlərin məktubları ağır tərzdə polarizlənir və çox tərzdə tərzdə tərzdə edir. Bu, kor inançları, fikirləri və dəstəyə, fikirləri, dəstəyə və ya insana uyğun olmadığını göstərir. Bu işin vasitəsilə, hiperpartisan xəbərləri keşfetmək və sahte xəbərləri keşfetmək üçün istifadə edilən avtomatik sistemi təhsil etmək istəyirik. Təksiyyət sistemi birlikdə müxtəlif əl yaratdığı məktub və semantik özellikləri istifadə edir. Sistemimiz ilk metrik (82.0% ədaləti) və ikinci metrik (82.1% F1-score) arasında ikinci dərəcə başa çatdı. Liderbordların ən yaxşı performans sistemi ilə müqayisədə sistemimizin sadəcə 0,2% ədalətdə müəyyən olduğunu göstərir.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo svoju podatku za pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Hiperpartizanski novinski članovi su oštre polarizirani i ekstremno predrasudeni (jednostrano). To pokazuje slijepe vjerovanje, mišljenje i nepravilno pristupanje stranci, ideji, grupi ili osobi. Kroz ovaj zadatak, mi ciljamo da razvijemo automatski sistem koji se može koristiti za otkrivanje hiperpartizanskih vijesti i služimo kao preskrivenu tehniku za lažno otkrivanje vijesti. Predloženi sistem zajedno koristi bogat set tekstualnih i semantičnih karakteristika. Naš sistem je ostvario 2. red na primjernoj metrici (preciznost 82,0% i prvi red na sekundarnoj metrici (82,1% F1 rezultat), među svim sudjelujućim timovima. U usporedbi sa najboljim izvođačkim sistemom na vodičnoj ploči pokazuje da je naš sistem iza samo 0,2% apsolutne razlike u točnosti.', 'ca': "En aquest article, presentem la nostra presentació per SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection. Els articles hiperpartisos són extremadament polaritzats i extremadament biasitzats (unilaterals). Mostra creences cegues, opinions i adherència irracional a un partit, idea, fracció o a una persona. A través d'aquesta tasca, busquem desenvolupar un sistema automatitzat que pot ser utilitzat per detectar notícies hiperpartisanes i serveixer com una tècnica de preconitació per detectar notícies falses. El sistema proposat utilitza conjuntament un conjunt ric de característiques textuals i semàntiques. El nostre sistema va aconseguir la segona puntuació en la mètrica primària (82,0%) i la primera en la mètrica secundaria (82,1%) entre tots els equips participants. Comparison with the best performing system on the leaderboard shows that our system is behind by only 0.2% absolute difference in accuracy.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme náš příspěvek k SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartyzánní detekce zpráv. Hyperstranické zpravodajské články jsou ostře polarizované a extrémně zaujaté (jednostranné). Ukazuje slepé přesvědčení, názory a nepřiměřenou přilnavost ke straně, idei, frakci nebo osobě. Prostřednictvím tohoto úkolu se snažíme vyvinout automatizovaný systém, který může být použit k detekci hyperpartyzánních zpráv a sloužit jako technika předscreeningu pro detekci falešných zpráv. Navržený systém společně využívá bohatou sadu ručně vytvořených textových a sémantických prvků. Náš systém dosáhl druhého místa na primární metrice (82,0% přesnost) a prvního místa na sekundární metrice (82,1% F1-skóre) mezi všemi zúčastněnými týmy. Srovnání s nejlépe výkonným systémem na žebříčku ukazuje, že náš systém je pozadu pouze o 0,2% absolutní rozdíl v přesnosti.', 'et': 'Selles dokumendis esitame oma ettepaneku SemEval-2019 ülesande 4: hüperpartisanide uudiste tuvastamine. Hüperpartisansed uudisartiklid on järsult polariseeritud ja äärmiselt erapooletud (ühepoolsed). See näitab pimedaid uskumusi, arvamusi ja ebamõistlikku kinnipidamist partei, idee, fraktsiooni või isiku suhtes. Selle ülesande kaudu töötame välja automatiseeritud süsteemi, mida saab kasutada hüperpartisansete uudiste tuvastamiseks ja mida saab kasutada valeuudiste tuvastamise eelkreerimise tehnikana. Kavandatud süsteem kasutab ühiselt rikkalikku kogumit käsitsi valmistatud teksti- ja semantilisi omadusi. Meie süsteem saavutas kõigi osalevate meeskondade seas 2. koha esmasel meetodil (82,0% täpsus) ja 1. koha teisel meetodil (82,1% F1-skoor). Võrdlus parima tulemusega süsteemiga näitab, et meie süsteem on maha jäänud vaid 0,2% absoluutse täpsuse erinevuse võrra.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme artikkelimme SemEval-2019 Task 4: Hyperpartisan News Detection -ohjelmasta. Hyperpartisaaniset uutisartikkelit ovat jyrkästi polarisoituja ja erittäin puolueellisia (yksipuolisia). Se osoittaa sokeita uskomuksia, mielipiteitä ja kohtuutonta sitoutumista puolueeseen, ajatukseen, ryhmittymään tai henkilöön. Tämän tehtävän avulla pyrimme kehittämään automatisoidun järjestelmän, jota voidaan käyttää hyperpartisaanien uutisten havaitsemiseen ja joka toimii esiseulontatekniikana valeuutisten havaitsemiseen. Ehdotettu järjestelmä käyttää yhdessä runsaasti käsityönä tehtyjä tekstuaalisia ja semanttisia ominaisuuksia. Järjestelmämme saavutti 2. sijan ensisijaisessa mittarissa (82,0% tarkkuus) ja 1. sijan toissijaisessa mittarissa (82,1% F1-pisteet) kaikkien osallistuvien joukkueiden joukossa. Vertailu pistetaulukon parhaiten suoriutuvaan järjestelmään osoittaa, että järjestelmämme on jäljessä vain 0,2% tarkkuuserolla.', 'jv': 'Nan pemilih iki, kita menehi nggawe tresnani kanggo seminval-2011 task 4: Typerpartisan New detection. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Rasané awak dhéwé nglanggar, sawar-awak lan or a dhok apa-apa sing nganggep petani, ide, ètèn uwong. Ato nggunakake punika, awak dhéwé iso nggawe sistem sistem sistem sing bisa nguasai perusahaan kanggo keha alam wigatiningan ampar ngênêmên sistem preskrin kanggo keha informasi ngênêmên. Sistem sing dipoleh akeh gunakake ditambang kelas telu nggawe textual karo semanti. Sistem dhéwé wis nambah tanggal 2 rang ning sekondary metir (warn-warni, warn-warni, warn-warni, warn-warni, warn-warni, error message). Ngawe nambah karo sistem sing paling dhéwé nang daftar aturan sing paling dhéwé, nik 0.2% sing paling dhéwé kuwi cah sabên.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da ma'ananmu zuwa SemEV-2019 Taimakon 4: @ info: status Yana nũna makãfin ĩmãni, idãnun da bã ya halatta a cikin ƙungiya, idãnun, ɓangare ko mutane. Ga wannan aikin, munã kwaɗayin mu buɗe wata na'urar farat ɗaya da za'a iya amfani da shi dõmin a gane wa zane-zane na zama mai gaura wa zane-zane na fake. @ info: whatsthis Tsarinmu ya sami daraja na biyu a kan metric na farko (82.0% tsari) da daraja na farko a kan metric na biyu (82.1% F1-score), daga duk jama'a mãsu shirin. Tsariya da mafi kyaun tafiyar da na'urar aiki a kan shaidar-sararin, yana nũna cewa na'urarmu yana baka kawai da asilimin 0.2 na da rabo cikakken cikin taƙaita.", 'sk': 'V tem prispevku predstavljamo našo predstavitev za nalogo 4 SemEval-2019: Hiperpartizansko detekcijo novic. Hiperpartizanski novinarski članki so ostro polarizirani in izredno pristranski (enostranski). Prikazuje slepa prepričanja, mnenja in nerazumno pripadnost stranki, ideji, frakciji ali osebi. S to nalogo želimo razviti avtomatiziran sistem, ki se lahko uporablja za odkrivanje hiperpartizanskih novic in služi kot tehnika predpregleda za odkrivanje lažnih novic. Predlagani sistem skupaj uporablja bogat nabor ročno izdelanih besedilnih in semantičnih značilnosti. Naš sistem je med vsemi sodelujočimi ekipami dosegel 2. mesto na primarni metri (82,0% natančnost) in 1. mesto na sekundarni metri (82,1% F1-rezultat). Primerjava z najbolj uspešnim sistemom na lestvici kaže, da naš sistem zaostaja za samo 0,2% absolutne razlike v natančnosti.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་SemEval-2019 ལ་ངོས་འཛིན་གྱི་འཇུག་སྡོད་བཞིན་པ་: Hyperpartisan News Detection. དྲན་བསྐུལ་གྱི་བརྡ་དོན་ཡིག་ཆ་དེ་ཚོ་ནི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་དང་འཕགས་རིས་ཀྱིས་འགྱུར་སྲོལ་ཡོད། འདིས་བྱས་མཁན་མི་བསམ་བློ་དང་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་དང་། དཀོན་ཕྱོགས་སྡུད་གཅིག་དང་། བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ སྣང་མེད་གང་ཟག འུ་ཅག་གི་བྱ་འགུལ་འདིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་སྒོ་ཕྱེ་བ་དང་། གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་ལག་གིས་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཡིག Our system achieved 2nd rank on the primary metric (82.0% accuracy) and 1st rank on the secondary metric (82.1% F1-score), among all participating teams. ལག་འཁྲིད་ཐོག་གི་བཀོད་སྤྱོད་མ་ལག་གི་ཁྱད་ཚད་ལྡན་པ་དང་མཉམ་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་ནི།', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים את ההעברה שלנו לסימוול-2019 משימה 4: גילוי חדשות היפרפרטיזן. מאמרים חדשות היפרפרטיזניים פוולריזצים באופן חד ומצדיקים ביותר (בצד אחד). זה מראה אמונות עיוורות, דעות וחיבוש לא הגיוני למפלגה, רעיון, פלגה או אדם. באמצעות המשימה הזאת, אנו מתכוונים לפתח מערכת אוטומטית שיכולה להשתמש בכדי לגלות חדשות hyperpartisan ולהשרת כטכניקה מקדימה לגילוי חדשות מזויפות. המערכת המוצעת משתמשת במערכת עשירה של תכונות טקסטוליות וסמנטיות. המערכת שלנו השיגה דרגה שנייה על המטריקה העיקרית (מדויקת 82.0%) והדרגה הראשונה על המטריקה השנייה (נקודת 82.1% F1), בין כל הצוותים המשתתפים. השוואה עם מערכת ההופעה הטובה ביותר על הלוח המנהיג מראה שהמערכת שלנו מאחור על ידי רק 0.2% הבדל מוחלט בדיוק.'}
{'en': 'BLCU_NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 7 : An Inference Chain-based GPT Model for Rumour Evaluation', 'pt': 'BLCU_NLP no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 7: Um modelo GPT baseado em cadeia de inferência para avaliação de rumores', 'ar': 'BLCU_NLP في SemEval-2019 المهمة 7: نموذج GPT المستند إلى سلسلة الاستدلال لتقييم الشائعات', 'es': 'BLCU_NLP en SemEval-2019 Tarea 7: Un modelo GPT basado en la cadena de inferencia para la evaluación de rumores', 'fr': "BLCU_NLP à SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 7\xa0: Un modèle GPT basé sur une chaîne d'inférence pour l'évaluation des rumeurs", 'ja': 'BLCU_NLP at SemEval -2019 Task 7: An Inference Chain - based GPT Model for Rumour Evaluation', 'zh': 'BLCU_NLPŚú®SemEval-2019Śä°7:Śüļšļéśé®ÁźÜšĻčGPT,šĽ•Ťį£Ť®ÄŤĮĄšľį', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 7 पर BLCU_NLP: अफवाह मूल्यांकन के लिए एक अनुमान श्रृंखला-आधारित जीपीटी मॉडल', 'ru': 'BLCU_NLP на SemEval-2019 Задача 7: Модель GPT на основе цепочки выводов для оценки слухов', 'ga': 'BLCU_NLP ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 7: Samhail GPT Bunaithe ar Shlabhra Tátail le haghaidh Meastóireacht Rumor', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εργασία 7: Ένα μοντέλο βασισμένο στην αλυσίδα συμπερασμάτων για την αξιολόγηση φήμων', 'it': 'BLCU_NLP al SemEval-2019 Task 7: Un modello GPT basato sulla catena di inferenza per la valutazione delle voci', 'kk': 'BLCU_ NLP жарым- 2019 тапсырмасында 7. тапсырма: Қайшылық тапсырманың GPT үлгісі', 'lt': 'BLCU_NLP SemEval-2019 7 užduotis: Inferencinės grandinės GPT modelis garsų vertinimui', 'ms': 'BLCU_NLP pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 7: Model GPT berasaskan rantai rujukan untuk Evaluasi Rumor', 'mk': 'BLCU_NLP на SemEval-2019 задача 7: Модел на GPT за евалуација на гласини базиран на инференциска ланец', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 7-ല്\u200d ബിഎല്\u200dസിയൂ NLP: റൂമ്യൂര്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള GPT മോഡല്\u200d', 'hu': 'BLCU_NLP a SemEval-2019 7. feladat: Egy inferencia lánc alapú GPT modell a pletyka értékeléséhez', 'mt': 'BLCU_NLP f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 7: Mudell GPT ibbażat fuq il-Katina ta’ Inferenza għall-Evalwazzjoni tas-Rumur', 'mn': 'BLCU_NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 7: An Inference Chain-based GPT Model for Rumour Evaluation', 'no': 'BLCU_NLP på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 7: Ein GPT-basert GPT-modell for rumour-evaluering', 'pl': 'BLCU_NLP w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 7: Model GPT oparty na łańcuchu wnioskowym do oceny plotek', 'ro': 'BLCU_NLP la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 7: Un model GPT bazat pe lanț de inferențe pentru evaluarea zvonurilor', 'sr': 'BLCU', 'si': 'BLCU_NLP at semeval-2019 Job 7: A Inferne Chain-based GPT Model for Rumina evalution', 'so': 'BLCU_NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 7: A Inference Chain-based GPT Model for Rumor evaluation', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணியில் BLCU_ NLP: குரல் மதிப்பீட்டு செயல்பாட்டிற்கான GPT மாதிரி', 'sv': 'BLCU_NLP på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 7: En Inferensekedjebaserad GPT-modell för utvärdering av rykten', 'ur': 'BLCU_NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 7: An Inference Chain-based GPT Model for Rumour Evaluation', 'uz': 'SemEval-2019 vazifa 7: Qiymatni qiymatish uchun GPT asosida ishlatilgan GPT modeli', 'vi': 'Mô hình GPT dựa vào mạng liên minh cho Đánh giá Rumour', 'hr': 'BLCU', 'da': 'BLCU_NLP ved SemEval-2019 Opgave 7: En Inference Chain-baseret GPT model til rygtevaluering', 'nl': 'BLCU_NLP bij SemEval-2019 Taak 7: Een Inference Chain based GPT Model voor geruchtevaluatie', 'bg': 'Задача 7: Модел за оценка на слуховете, базиран на верига от заключения', 'de': 'BLCU_NLP bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabenstellung 7: Ein inferenzkettenbasiertes GPT-Modell zur Bewertung von Gerüchten', 'fa': 'BLCU', 'id': 'BLCU_NLP di SemEval-2019 Tugas 7: Model GPT berdasarkan rantai Inferensi untuk Evaluasi Rumor', 'sw': 'BLCU_NLP katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 7: Modeli ya GPT yenye msingi wa Uchunguzi wa Uchunguzi', 'ko': 'BLCU NLP가SemEval-19 퀘스트 7: 추리 체인을 바탕으로 하는 루머 평가 GPT 모델', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'ԲԼՔ_ՆԼՊ-ը, 2019-ի կիսագնահատման 7-րդ հանձնարարում. Հաղմուկների գնահատման GPT մոդել', 'tr': 'BLCU_NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 7: An Inference Chain-based GPT Model for Rumour Evaluation', 'sq': 'BLCU_NLP në SemEval-2019 Task 7: An Inference Chain-based GPT Model for Rumor Evaluation', 'bn': 'BLCU_NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 7: An Inference Chain-based GPT Model for Rumour Evaluation', 'ca': 'BLCU_NLP a SemEval-2019 Task 7: A Inference Chain Based GPT Model for Rumor Evaluation', 'am': 'ስራ 7:', 'cs': 'BLCU_NLP na SemEval-2019 Úkol 7: Inferenční řetězcový GPT model pro hodnocení zvěstí', 'et': 'BLCU_NLP SemEval-2019 ülesanne 7: järeldusahelal põhinev GPT mudel kuulujuttude hindamiseks', 'az': "SemEval-2019 Task 7'də BLCU_NLP: Rumour Evaluation Modeli", 'bs': 'BLCU', 'fi': 'BLCU_NLP SemEval-2019 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 7: johtoketjuun perustuva GPT-malli huhujen arviointiin', 'jv': 'CLCU_NLP at seminval-2011 task 7: an Information Method', 'he': 'BLCU_NLP ב SemEval-2019 משימה 7: מודל GPT מבוסס בשרשרת רקע עבור הערכת שמועות', 'ha': 'BLCU_NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 7: An Inference Chain-based GPT Model for Rumour Evaluation', 'sk': 'BLCU_NLP na SemEval-2019 Naloga 7: Model GPT na podlagi verige sklepov za ocenjevanje govoric', 'bo': 'BLCU_NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 7: An Inference Chain-based GPT Model for Rumour Evaluation'}
{'en': 'Researchers have been paying increasing attention to rumour evaluation due to the rapid spread of unsubstantiated rumours on social media platforms, including SemEval 2019 task 7. However, labelled data for learning rumour veracity is scarce, and labels in rumour stance data are highly disproportionate, making it challenging for a model to perform supervised-learning adequately. We propose an inference chain-based system, which fully utilizes conversation structure-based knowledge in the limited data and expand the training data in minority categories to alleviate class imbalance. Our approach obtains 12.6 % improvement upon the baseline system for subtask A, ranks 1st among 21 systems in subtask A, and ranks 4th among 12 systems in subtask B.', 'ar': 'يولي الباحثون اهتمامًا متزايدًا لتقييم الشائعات بسبب الانتشار السريع للشائعات التي لا أساس لها على منصات التواصل الاجتماعي ، بما في ذلك مهمة SemEval 2019 7. ومع ذلك ، فإن البيانات المصنفة لتعلم صحة الشائعات نادرة ، والتسميات في بيانات موقف الشائعات غير متناسبة إلى حد كبير ، مما يجعل إنه يمثل تحديًا للنموذج لأداء التعلم الخاضع للإشراف بشكل مناسب. نقترح نظامًا قائمًا على سلسلة الاستدلال ، والذي يستخدم بشكل كامل المعرفة القائمة على بنية المحادثة في البيانات المحدودة ويوسع بيانات التدريب في فئات الأقليات للتخفيف من عدم توازن الفصل. حصل نهجنا على تحسين بنسبة 12.6٪ على النظام الأساسي للمهمة الفرعية A ، واحتلت المرتبة الأولى بين 21 نظامًا في المهمة الفرعية A ، واحتلت المرتبة الرابعة بين 12 نظامًا في المهمة الفرعية B.', 'es': 'Los investigadores han prestado cada vez más atención a la evaluación de los rumores debido a la rápida propagación de rumores sin fundamento en las plataformas de redes sociales, incluida la tarea 7 de SemEval 2019. Sin embargo, los datos etiquetados para la veracidad de los rumores de aprendizaje son escasos, y las etiquetas en los datos de postura de los rumores son muy desproporcionadas, lo que dificulta que un modelo realice el aprendizaje supervisado de manera adecuada. Proponemos un sistema basado en la cadena de inferencia, que utiliza completamente el conocimiento basado en la estructura de conversación en los datos limitados y amplía los datos de capacitación en categorías minoritarias para aliviar el desequilibrio de clases. Nuestro enfoque obtiene una mejora del 12,6% con respecto al sistema de referencia para la subtarea A, ocupa el primer lugar entre los 21 sistemas de la subtarea A y el cuarto lugar entre los 12 sistemas de la subtarea B.', 'fr': "Les chercheurs accordent une attention croissante à l'évaluation des rumeurs en raison de la propagation rapide de rumeurs non fondées sur les plateformes de médias sociaux, y compris la tâche 7 du SemEval 2019. Cependant, les données étiquetées pour l'apprentissage de la véracité des rumeurs sont rares, et les étiquettes dans les données de position des rumeurs sont très disproportionnées, ce qui rend difficile pour un modèle d'effectuer correctement un apprentissage supervisé. Nous proposons un système basé sur une chaîne d'inférence, qui utilise pleinement les connaissances basées sur la structure de conversation dans les données limitées et élargit les données d'entraînement dans les catégories minoritaires afin de réduire le déséquilibre des classes. Notre approche obtient une amélioration de 12,6\xa0% par rapport au système de base pour la sous-tâche A, se classe 1er parmi 21 systèmes dans la sous-tâche A et se classe 4e parmi 12 systèmes dans la sous-tâche B.", 'pt': 'Os pesquisadores estão prestando cada vez mais atenção à avaliação de rumores devido à rápida disseminação de rumores infundados nas plataformas de mídia social, incluindo a tarefa 7 do SemEval 2019. é um desafio para um modelo realizar o aprendizado supervisionado adequadamente. Propomos um sistema baseado em cadeia de inferência, que utiliza totalmente o conhecimento baseado em estrutura de conversação nos dados limitados e expande os dados de treinamento em categorias minoritárias para aliviar o desequilíbrio de classe. Nossa abordagem obtém 12,6% de melhoria no sistema de linha de base para a subtarefa A, ocupa o 1º lugar entre 21 sistemas na subtarefa A e ocupa o 4º lugar entre 12 sistemas na subtarefa B.', 'ja': '研究者は、SemEval 2019タスク7を含むソーシャルメディアプラットフォーム上で根拠のない噂が急速に広がっているため、噂の評価にますます注意を払っています。しかし、噂の真実性を学習するためのラベル付けされたデータは乏しく、噂のスタンスデータのラベルは非常に不釣り合いであり、モデルが監督学習を適切に実行することは困難である。限られたデータの中で会話構造ベースの知識を十分に活用し、クラスのアンバランスを緩和するために少数のカテゴリのトレーニングデータを拡張する推論チェーンベースのシステムを提案します。我々のアプローチは、サブタスクAのベースラインシステムに対して12.6%の改善を得て、サブタスクAの21のシステムの中で1位であり、サブタスクBの12のシステムの中で4位である。', 'zh': '由于未经证实的讹言在社交媒体平台上迅速传播,包括SemEval 2019务7,研究人们直在更加关注讹言评估。 然学讹言实少,而讹言立场数不成比例高,是使模形难尽行督学也。 建一统于理,统于有限之数,而广少数之练数,以纾班级失衡。 吾法于子职 A 者基线统改于 12.6%,于子务 A 者 21 一统而第一,于子 B 者 12 一统而排名第 4。', 'ru': 'Исследователи уделяют все больше внимания оценке слухов в связи с быстрым распространением необоснованных слухов на социальных медиа-платформах, включая задачу 7 SemEval 2019. Тем не менее, помеченные данные для изучения достоверности слухов скудны, а метки в данных о позиции слухов очень непропорциональны, что затрудняет адекватное обучение под наблюдением модели. Мы предлагаем систему, основанную на цепочке выводов, которая в полной мере использует знания на основе структуры разговоров в ограниченных данных и расширяет учебные данные в категориях меньшинств для уменьшения классового дисбаланса. Наш подход получает улучшение на 12,6% по сравнению с базовой системой для подзадачи А, занимает 1-е место среди 21 системы в подзадаче А и 4-е место среди 12 систем в подзадаче В.', 'hi': 'शोधकर्ता सोशल मीडिया प्लेटफार्मों पर अप्रमाणित अफवाहों के तेजी से प्रसार के कारण अफवाह मूल्यांकन पर बढ़ते ध्यान दे रहे हैं, जिसमें सेमेवल 2019 टास्क 7 भी शामिल है। हालांकि, अफवाह सत्यता सीखने के लिए लेबल किए गए डेटा दुर्लभ हैं, और अफवाह रुख डेटा में लेबल अत्यधिक असंगत हैं, जिससे एक मॉडल के लिए पर्यवेक्षित-सीखने को पर्याप्त रूप से प्रदर्शन करना चुनौतीपूर्ण हो जाता है। हम एक अनुमान श्रृंखला-आधारित प्रणाली का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो सीमित डेटा में वार्तालाप संरचना-आधारित ज्ञान का पूरी तरह से उपयोग करता है और वर्ग असंतुलन को कम करने के लिए अल्पसंख्यक श्रेणियों में प्रशिक्षण डेटा का विस्तार करता है। हमारा दृष्टिकोण सबटास्क ए के लिए बेसलाइन सिस्टम पर 12.6% सुधार प्राप्त करता है, सबटास्क ए में 21 प्रणालियों के बीच 1 वें स्थान पर है, और सबटास्क बी में 12 प्रणालियों के बीच 4 वें स्थान पर है।', 'ga': 'Tá aird mhéadaitheach á tabhairt ag taighdeoirí ar mheastóireacht ráflaí mar gheall ar scaipeadh tapa ráflaí gan bhunús ar ardáin na meán sóisialta, lena n-áirítear tasc SemEval 2019 7. Mar sin féin, tá sonraí lipéadaithe chun fírinneacht ráflaí a fhoghlaim gann, agus tá lipéid i sonraí ráflaí an-díréireach, rud a fhágann go bhfuil dúshlán a bheith ann do shamhail foghlaim faoi mhaoirseacht a dhéanamh go leordhóthanach. Molaimid córas slabhra-bhunaithe tátail, a úsáideann go hiomlán eolas struchtúr-bhunaithe comhrá sna sonraí teoranta agus a leathnaíonn na sonraí oiliúna i gcatagóirí mionlaigh chun éagothroime ranga a mhaolú. Faigheann ár gcur chuige feabhas 12.6% ar an gcóras bonnlíne d’fhothasc A, tá sé sa 1ú háit i measc 21 córas i bhfothasc A, agus sa 4ú háit i measc 12 chóras i bhfothasc B.', 'hu': 'A kutatók egyre nagyobb figyelmet fordítanak a pletykák értékelésére, mivel a megalapozatlan pletykák gyors elterjedtek a közösségi média platformokon, beleértve a SemEval 2019 7. feladatát is. Ugyanakkor a pletykák valódiságának tanulásához szükséges címkézett adatok ritkák, és a pletykák álláspontjában szereplő adatok aránytalanok, ami kihívást jelent egy modell számára a felügyelt tanulás megfelelő végrehajtása. Javasolunk egy következtetési lánc alapú rendszert, amely teljes mértékben kihasználja a beszélgetési struktúra alapú ismereteket a korlátozott adatokban, és kiterjeszti a képzési adatokat kisebbségi kategóriákban az osztályok egyensúlytalanságának enyhítése érdekében. A megközelítésünk 12,6%-os javulást ér el az A résztevékenység alapvető rendszeréhez képest, az A résztevékenység 21 rendszere közül az első helyen, a B résztevékenység 12 rendszere közül pedig a negyedik helyen.', 'el': 'Οι ερευνητές δίνουν αυξανόμενη προσοχή στην αξιολόγηση των φήμων λόγω της ταχείας εξάπλωσης των αβάσιμων φήμων στις πλατφόρμες κοινωνικών μέσων, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της εργασίας 7. Ωστόσο, τα επισημασμένα δεδομένα για την εκμάθηση της αλήθειας των φήμων είναι σπάνια, και οι ετικέτες στα δεδομένα της στάσης των φήμων είναι εξαιρετικά δυσανάλογες, γεγονός που καθιστά δύσκολο για ένα μοντέλο να εκτελεί επαρκώς εποπτευόμενη μάθηση. Προτείνουμε ένα σύστημα βασισμένο στην αλυσίδα συμπερασμάτων, το οποίο χρησιμοποιεί πλήρως τη γνώση βασισμένη στη δομή συνομιλίας στα περιορισμένα δεδομένα και επεκτείνει τα δεδομένα κατάρτισης σε μειονοτικές κατηγορίες για να ανακουφίσει την ταξική ανισορροπία. Η προσέγγισή μας επιτυγχάνει 12,6% βελτίωση έναντι του βασικού συστήματος για την υποταγή Α, κατατάσσεται 1η μεταξύ 21 συστημάτων στην υποταγή Α και κατατάσσεται 4η μεταξύ 12ων συστημάτων στην υποταγή Β.', 'ka': 'პასწავლებელი უფრო მეტი ახალგაზრდება სიტყვების განსაზღვრებისთვის, რადგან სოციალური მედია პლატატრამებში, საკუთარ SemEval 2019 დავალების 7 წლის განსაზღვრებისთვის. მაგრამ, მარტივი მონაცემები სიტყვებისთვის შესწავლისთვის სიტყვებისთვის უფრო ცოტა და სიტყვებისთვის მონაცემები ძალიან განსხვავებელია, რომელიც მარტივი მოდელის შესაძლებლობად დავაკ ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ინფრენციის კვადრატური სისტემა, რომელიც საკუთარი სტრუქტურის უნდა გამოყენება კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის განცემებით და ჩვენი პროგრამა 12,6% უფრო მეტადება საბაზო სისტემაში A, 21 სისტემაში პირველი პროგრამა საბაზო A-ში, და 12 სისტემაში პირველი პროგრამა საბაზო B-ში.', 'it': "I ricercatori hanno prestato sempre maggiore attenzione alla valutazione delle voci a causa della rapida diffusione di voci infondate sulle piattaforme di social media, tra cui SemEval 2019 task 7. Tuttavia, i dati etichettati per l'apprendimento della veridicità delle voci sono scarsi e le etichette nei dati sulle posizioni delle voci sono altamente sproporzionate, rendendo difficile per un modello eseguire adeguatamente l'apprendimento supervisionato. Proponiamo un sistema basato sulla catena di inferenza, che utilizza pienamente le conoscenze basate sulla struttura della conversazione nei dati limitati ed espande i dati di formazione nelle categorie minoritarie per alleviare lo squilibrio delle classi. Il nostro approccio ottiene un miglioramento del 12,6% rispetto al sistema di base per la sottomissione A, si colloca al primo posto tra 21 sistemi nella sottomissione A e al quarto posto tra 12 sistemi nella sottomissione B.", 'lt': 'Researchers have been paying increasing attention to rumour evaluation due to the rapid spread of unsubstantiated rumours on social media platforms, including SemEval 2019 task 7.  However, labelled data for learning rumour veracity is scarce, and labels in rumour stance data are highly disproportionate, making it challenging for a model to perform supervised-learning adequately.  Siūlome išvadų grandine grindžiamą sistemą, kuri visapusiškai naudoja pokalbių struktūra grindžiamas žinias ribotuose duomenise ir išplečia mokymo duomenis mažumų kategorijose, kad būtų sumažintas klasių disbalansas. Mūsų požiūris pasiekia 12,6 % pagerėjimą pagal pradinę A paklausos sistemą, pirmą iš 21 A paklausos sistemų ir ketvirtą iš 12 B paklausos sistemų.', 'kk': 'Исследоварлар социалдық медиа платформаларында, 2019 жылдың 7-ші тапсырмасының шегіндірілмеген жаңалықтарды бағалау үшін көтеріп жатқан жаңалықтарды бағалау үшін көтеріп тұрады. Бірақ дұрыстығын үйрену үшін жарлық деректері жеткілікті емес, және жарлықтардың жарлықтары жарлықтардың көптеген мәліметтері өте қарапайым, бұл үлгісін қарау үшін дұрыс оқыту үшін қиын Біз инференциялық тізбекті негізделген жүйесін ұсынамыз. Бұл шектелген деректерде сұрақ құрылымына негізделген мәліметтерді толық пайдалану және бағыттардың бағыттау деректерін кеңейту үшін Біздің тәсіліміз A- суреттің негізгі жүйесінде 12,6% жақсарту, A- суреттің 21 жүйесінде 1- жол жүйесінде, B- суреттің 12 жүйесінде 4- жол жақсарту.', 'mk': 'Истражувачите привлекуваат сé поголемо внимание на проценката на гласините поради брзото ширење на неоснованите гласини на платформите на социјалните медиуми, вклучувајќи ја и задачата Семевал 2019 7. Сепак, означените податоци за учење на вистинската гласина се ретки, а означените податоци за ставот на гласините се многу непропорционални, што го прави предизвикувачки моделот да изврши соодветно надгледувано учење. Ние предложуваме систем базиран на ланец на инференции, кој целосно го искористува знаењето базирано на структурата на разговорот во ограничените податоци и ги проширува податоците за обука во малцинските категории за да се олесни разрамнотежата на Нашиот пристап постигнува подобрување од 12,6 отсто во основниот систем за подпрашањето А, се рангира прв меѓу 21 систем во подпрашањето А и се рангира четврт меѓу 12 системи во подпрашањето Б.', 'ms': 'Peneliti telah memperhatikan penilaian khabar angin kerana penyebaran cepat khabar angin yang tidak didasarkan pada platform media sosial, termasuk tugas SemEval 2019 7. Namun, data labeled untuk mempelajari kebenaran khabar angin adalah langka, dan label dalam data posisi khabar angin adalah sangat tidak proporsional, membuatnya mencabar untuk model untuk melakukan pembelajaran yang diawasi dengan sesuai. Kami cadangkan sistem berdasarkan rantai kesimpulan, yang menggunakan sepenuhnya pengetahuan berdasarkan struktur perbualan dalam data terbatas dan mengembangkan data latihan dalam kategori minoriti untuk mengurangi ketidakseimbangan kelas. pendekatan kita mendapat penambahan 12.6% pada sistem asas untuk subtask A, baris pertama diantara 21 sistem dalam subtask A, dan baris keempat diantara 12 sistem dalam subtask B.', 'ml': 'സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയ പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ജോലി 7 ഉള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d വേഗത്തില്\u200d പരത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d പരിശോധനാശികള്\u200d കൂ എന്നിട്ടും വാക്കുകള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കുറച്ചു കുറഞ്ഞതാണ്. വ്യാജത്തിന്റെ സ്ഥിതിവിവരങ്ങളിലെ ചിട്ടകങ്ങള്\u200d വളരെ വിരോധമില് സംസാരം അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. അത് സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള അറിവ് പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും ഉപ ഞങ്ങളുടെ വഴിയില്\u200d 12.6% മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. സബ്ബ്ജിസ്റ്റ് A-ന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. 21 സി', 'mt': 'Ir-riċerkaturi qegħdin jagħtu aktar attenzjoni lill-evalwazzjoni tar-rumori minħabba t-tixrid rapidu ta’ rumori mhux sostanzjati fuq pjattaformi tal-midja soċjali, inkluż il-kompitu SemEval 2019 7. However, labelled data for learning rumour veracity is scarce, and labels in rumour stance data are highly disproportionate, making it challenging for a model to perform supervised-learning adequately.  Aħna nipproponu sistema bbażata fuq katina ta’ inferenza, li tuża bis-sħiħ l-għarfien ibbażat fuq l-istruttura tal-konverżjoni fid-dejta limitata u tespandi d-dejta tat-taħriġ fil-kategoriji minoritarji biex itaffi l-iżbilanċ tal-klassi. L-approċċ tagħna jikseb titjib ta’ 12.6% fuq is-sistema bażi għas-sottomistoqsija A, jikklassifika l-ewwel fost 21 sistema fis-sottomistoqsija A, u jikklassifika r-raba’ fost 12-il sistema fis-sottomistoqsija B.', 'mn': 'Судлаачид нийгмийн хэвлэлийн платформад SemEval 2019 ажлын 7 даалгавар дээр нээлттэй сонсолтуудын хурдан тархалтаар ярианы үнэлгээнд анхаарлыг нэмэгдүүлж байна. Гэхдээ шүгэл үнэнийг сурах талаар тэмдэглэгдсэн мэдээллүүд бага байдаг. Шүгэл байдал дээрх мэдээллүүд маш зөрчилдөөн байдаг. Энэ загварыг удирдлагатай суралцах боломжтой болгоход загвар хэцүү болгодог. Бид инференцийн хэлхээ суурилсан системийг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь хязгаарлагдсан мэдээллээр ярилцлагын бүтцийн мэдээллийг бүрэн ашиглаж, бага зэрэг хэлбэрээр сургалтын мэдээллийг нэмэгдүүлдэг. Бидний арга зам нь A-ын суурь асуултын суурь шугам системийн суурь шугам дээр 12.6%-ын сайжруулалт гарч ирнэ, A-ын суурь асуултын 21 системийн 1-р шугам, B-н суурь асуултын 12 системийн 4-р шугам юм.', 'pl': 'Naukowcy zwracają coraz większą uwagę na ocenę plotek ze względu na szybkie rozprzestrzenianie się nieuzasadnionych plotek na platformach mediów społecznościowych, w tym zadanie SemEval 2019 7. Jednakże etykietowane dane służące do nauki prawdziwości plotek są rzadkie, a etykiety w danych dotyczących stanowiska plotek są wysoce nieproporcjonalne, co sprawia, że model musi odpowiednio przeprowadzać naukę nadzorowaną. Proponujemy system oparty na łańcuchu wnioskowania, który w pełni wykorzystuje wiedzę opartą na strukturze konwersacji w ograniczonych danych i rozszerza dane szkoleniowe w kategoriach mniejszościowych, aby złagodzić nierównowagę klasową. Nasze podejście uzyskuje 12,6% poprawy w stosunku do systemu bazowego dla podzadania A, zajmuje pierwsze miejsce wśród 21 systemów w podzadaniu A oraz czwarty wśród dwunastu systemów w podzadaniu B.', 'ro': 'Cercetătorii au acordat o atenție tot mai mare evaluării zvonurilor datorită răspândirii rapide a zvonurilor nefondate pe platformele de socializare, inclusiv sarcina 7 SemEval 2019. Cu toate acestea, datele etichetate pentru a învăța veridicitatea zvonurilor sunt limitate, iar etichetele din datele privind poziția zvonurilor sunt extrem de disproporționate, ceea ce face dificil pentru un model să efectueze în mod adecvat învățarea supravegheată. Propunem un sistem bazat pe lanț de inferență, care utilizează pe deplin cunoștințele bazate pe structura conversației în datele limitate și extinde datele de formare în categoriile minoritare pentru a atenua dezechilibrul claselor. Abordarea noastră obține o îmbunătățire de 12,6% față de sistemul de bază pentru subactivitatea A, ocupă locul 1 dintre 21 de sisteme în subactivitatea A și locul 4 dintre 12 sisteme în subactivitatea B.', 'no': 'Forskere har fått økt oppmerksomhet til å evaluera rumorer på grunn av raskt spreidde av ubstanserte rumorer på sosiale mediaplattformer, inkludert semiEval 2019 oppgåve 7. Men merket data for å lære rumoreverabilitet er kraftig, og merkelappar i rumorestasjonsdata er svært disproportionar, som gjør det vanskeleg for ein modell å utføra supervisert læring. Vi foreslår eit infeksjonskkjede-basert system, som fullstendig brukar samtalestrukturbasert kunnskap i begrensede data og utvidar opplæringsdata i minoritetskategoriar for å redusera klassesimbalans. Nærleiken vårt får 12,6 % forbedring på baselinjesystemet for subtspørjing A, rankar 1 blant 21 systemer i subtspørjing A, og rankar 4 blant 12 systemer i subtspørjing B.', 'sr': 'Istraživači su obraćali veću pažnju na procjenu glasina zbog brzog širenja nepubstanovanih glasina na platformama društvenih medija, uključujući zadatak 7. Međutim, označeni podaci za učenje glasine o istinitosti nisu teški, a etikete u podacima glasine o stanju su veoma neproporcione, čineći da je to izazovno za model odgovarajuće izvršavanje nadzornog učenja. Predlažemo sistem na lancu infekcije, koji potpuno koristi znanje na strukturi razgovora u ograničenim podacima i proširi podatke o obuci u kategorijama manjina kako bi se olakšalo nelegalnost klase. Naš pristup dobija poboljšanje od 12,6% na osnovnom sistemu podpitanja A, redovi 1 među 21 sistema podpitanja A, i redovi 4 među 12 sistema podpitanja B.', 'sv': 'Forskare har ägnat allt större uppmärksamhet åt ryktesutvärdering på grund av den snabba spridningen av ogrundade rykten på sociala medieplattformar, inklusive SemEval 2019 uppgift 7. Märkta data för att lära sig rykten är dock knappa, och märkningar i rykten är mycket oproportionerliga, vilket gör det svårt för en modell att utföra övervakat lärande på ett adekvat sätt. Vi föreslår ett deduktionskedjebaserat system, som fullt ut utnyttjar konversationsstrukturbaserad kunskap i de begränsade data och utökar utbildningsdata i minoritetskategorier för att lindra klassobalans. Vårt tillvägagångssätt uppnår 12,6% förbättring jämfört med baslinjen för deluppgift A, rankas 1:a bland 21 system i deluppgift A, och rankas 4:a bland 12 system i deluppgift B.', 'so': 'Baalimayaal waxey sii dareerayeen qiimeynta qiimeynta warqada ah sababtoo ah dhaqso u kala firaajinta warqada aan suubin oo ku saabsan jardiinada shabakadda bulshada, kuwaas oo ah SemEval 2019 shaqo 7. Si kastaba ha ahaatee macluumaadka la xiriiray barashada hadalka waa yaraan tahay, oo alaabta lagu qorayona waa mid aad u baahan yahay, waxaana ka dhiganaya in loo sameeyo tusaale si ku filan waxbarashada ilaaliya. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa nidaam silsilad ah oo ku saleysan, kaas oo si buuxda ah ugu isticmaalaya aqoonta muuqashada hadalka oo ku saabsan macluumaadka xadhka ah, waxaana ku sii fidinaynaa macluumaadka waxbarashada kooxo ka tirsan si uu u fududeeyo sinaanta fasalka. Dhaqdhaheenna waxay leedahay 12.6% kordhin nidaamka hoose ee A, wuxuuna ka mid yahay 21 nidaam hoose A, wuxuuna ka mid yahay 4aad oo ka mid ah 12 nidaamka subaxda B.', 'si': 'සාමාජික මධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dය නමුත්, කිසිම දේවල් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා තොරතුරු අවශ්\u200dයයි, ඒ වගේම ලේබල් ස්ථානයේ දත්ත ගොඩක් අවශ්\u200dයයි, ඒක පුළුවන් විදිහ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, ඒක සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම සම්පූර්ණයේ සංවාද සංවාද සංවාද සංවාද සංවාදයක අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය 12.6% විශ්වාස කරනවා, A ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය A', 'ta': 'செம்வால் 2019 செயல் 7 உடன் சேமிக்கப்பட்ட விஷயங்களை விரைவாக பரப்பினால் ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்கள் பெரும்பாலும் கவனம் செலுத்துகின்றனர். ஆனால், குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல் கற்றுக்கொள்வது குறைவானது, மற்றும் குரல் நிலைமையில் உள்ள சிட்டைகள் மிகவும் பொருத்தமானது, பாதுகாப்பு பட நாம் சங்கிலியில் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள பேச்சு அடிப்படையான அறிவிப்பை முழுமையாக பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் மற்றும் சிறிய வகுப்புகளில் பயிற்சி தர எங்கள் அணுகல் 12.6% துணை பணி A க்கான அடிப்படையில் மேம்படுத்தப்படும், 21 துணை அமைப்புகளில் முதல் நிலை A, 12 முறைமைகளில் 4 முறையாகும்.', 'ur': 'تحقیقات کرنے والوں نے سوسیل میڈیا پٹرومٹیوں پر سریع پھیلائی ہوئی آواز کی وجہ سے آواز ارزیابی پر اضافہ کی ہے، جیسے SemEval 2019 ٹاکس 7 کے شامل ہے. However, labelled data for learning rumour veracity is scarce, and labels in rumour status data are highly disproportionate, making it difficult for a model to perform supervised-learning adequately. ہم ایک غلط زنجیر کی بنیادی سیستم کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جو کلاس غلطی کو کمزور کرنے کے لئے کامل طور پر مکالمانی ساختار کی بنیادی علم کے مطابق استعمال کرتا ہے۔ ہمارا طریقہ 12.6% سیسٹم پر بنسٹ لین کے لئے اضافہ ہوتا ہے۔ A کے نیچے 21 سیسٹم میں سے اول درجہ ہے اور B کے نیچے 12 سیسٹم میں چوتھا درجہ ہے۔', 'uz': "Taʼminlovchilar SemEval 2019 tashkilotlari 7 davomida muvaffaqiyatlarni tez tarjima qilmagan so'zlarni qiymatga qaramadi. Lekin, asosiy haqida o'rganishni o'rganish uchun tuzilgan maʼlumotlar juda qisqat emas, va xavfsiz holatda taʼminlovchi belgilar juda qiziqarli emas, va bu modelni taʼminlovchi o'rganishga yetarlicha qilishi mumkin. Biz bir chegara asosiy tizimni tasavvur qilamiz. Bu muammolarning chegara maʼlumotidan foydalanadi va cheksiz maʼlumot turlarida taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchi maʼlumotni ko'paytirish uchun sinfning imkoniyatlarini kamaytirish uchun. Bizning usuli sub-vazifa A asosiy tizim asosiy tizimda 12.6% uzoqligini o'zgartiradi, vazifa A tub tizimdagi 21 tizimdagi birinchi darajaga birinchi darajaga va 12 tizimdagi 4 marta birinchi darajaga.", 'vi': 'Các nhà nghiên cứu đang chú ý đến việc đánh giá tin đồn do sự lan rộng nhanh của những tin đồn vô căn cứ trên các phương tiện truyền thông xã hội, bao gồm nhiệm vụ của SemEvol diễn ra 7. Tuy nhiên, dữ liệu được dán nhãn cho tin đồn là rất khan hiếm, và những dữ liệu về vị trí đồn dữ liệu là quá lớn, làm cho mô hình phải thực hiện học giám sát một cách thích hợp. Chúng tôi đề nghị một hệ thống dây chuyền thiên vị, nó sử dụng hoàn to àn kiến thức về cấu trúc đối thoại trong dữ liệu giới hạn và mở rộng dữ liệu đào tạo trong các hạng thiểu số để giảm sự mất cân bằng trong lớp học. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta đạt được 12.6. cải tiến dựa trên hệ thống cơ bản của phụ đề A, cấp thứ nhất trong hệ thống phụ đề A, và xếp thứ bốn trong 12 hệ thống dưới chữ B.', 'da': 'Forskere har været mere opmærksomme på rygtevaluering på grund af den hurtige spredning af ubegrundede rygter på sociale medieplatforme, herunder SemEval 2019 opgave 7. Imidlertid er mærkede data for at lære rygternes sandhed knap, og mærkninger i rygternes holdninger er yderst uforholdsmæssige, hvilket gør det udfordrende for en model at udføre overvåget læring tilstrækkeligt. Vi foreslår et inference chain-baseret system, der fuldt ud udnytter samtalestruktur-baseret viden i de begrænsede data og udvider træningsdata i mindretalskategorier for at lindre klasse ubalance. Vores tilgang opnår 12,6% forbedring i forhold til basissystemet for underopgave A, rangerer 1. blandt 21 systemer i underopgave A og rangerer 4. blandt 12 systemer i underopgave B.', 'nl': 'Onderzoekers besteden steeds meer aandacht aan geruchtenevaluatie door de snelle verspreiding van ongefundeerde geruchten op social media platforms, waaronder SemEval 2019 taak 7. Echter, gelabelde gegevens voor het leren van de waarheidsgetrouwheid van geruchten zijn schaars en labels in geruchtstandpunten zijn zeer onevenredig, waardoor het voor een model moeilijk is om supervised-learning adequaat uit te voeren. We stellen een inferentieketengebaseerd systeem voor, dat volledig gebruik maakt van conversatiestructuurgebaseerde kennis in de beperkte gegevens en de trainingsgegevens uitbreidt in minderheidscategorieën om de onevenwichtigheid van de klassen te verlichten. Onze aanpak verkrijgt 12,6% verbetering ten opzichte van het basissysteem voor subtaak A, rangschikt 1e onder 21 systemen in subtaak A en rangschikt 4e onder 12 systemen in subtaak B.', 'de': 'Aufgrund der raschen Verbreitung unbegründeter Gerüchte auf Social-Media-Plattformen, einschließlich SemEval 2019 Aufgabe 7, haben Forscher der Bewertung von Gerüchten zunehmend Aufmerksamkeit geschenkt. Allerdings sind markierte Daten für das Lernen der Wahrhaftigkeit von Gerüchten rar, und Beschriftungen in Gerüchthaltungsdaten sind in hohem Maße unverhältnismäßig, was es für ein Modell schwierig macht, überwachtes Lernen adäquat durchzuführen. Wir schlagen ein Inferenzkettenbasiertes System vor, das konversationsstrukturbasiertes Wissen in den begrenzten Daten vollständig nutzt und die Trainingsdaten in Minderheitskategorien erweitert, um Klassenungleichgewichte zu lindern. Unser Ansatz erzielt 12,6% Verbesserung gegenüber dem Basissystem für Teilaufgabe A, Rang eins unter 21 Systemen in Teilaufgabe A und Rang vier unter zwölf Systemen in Teilaufgabe B.', 'hr': 'Istraživači obraćaju veću pažnju na procjenu glasina zbog brzog širenja nepotkrivenih glasina na platformama društvenih medija, uključujući zadatak 7. Međutim, označeni podaci za učenje glasine nisu teški, a etikete u podacima o stanju glasina su vrlo nesporazorne, čineći se izazovima model odgovarajući izvršavanju nadzornog učenja. Predlažemo sistem na lancu infekcije, koji potpuno koristi znanje na strukturi razgovora u ograničenim podacima i proširi podatke o obuci u kategorijama manjina kako bi se smanjili nesporaznost klase. Naš pristup dobiva poboljšanje od 12,6% na početnom sustavu podpitanja A, rank 1 među 21 sustavima podpitanja A, i rank 4 među 12 sustavima podpitanja B.', 'id': 'Peneliti telah memperhatikan penilaian rumor karena penyebaran cepat rumor yang tidak didasarkan pada platform media sosial, termasuk tugas SemEval 2019 7. Namun, data yang ditabel untuk mempelajari kebenaran rumor adalah jarang, dan label dalam data posisi rumor adalah sangat tidak proporsional, membuat tantangan untuk model untuk melakukan pengawasan-belajar dengan cukup. Kami mengusulkan sebuah sistem berasaskan rantai, yang sepenuhnya menggunakan pengetahuan berbasis struktur percakapan dalam data terbatas dan memperluas data pelatihan dalam kategori minoritas untuk mengurangi ketidakseimbangan kelas. pendekatan kita mendapatkan peningkatan 12,6% pada sistem dasar untuk subtask A, baris pertama diantara 21 sistem dalam subtask A, dan baris keempat diantara 12 sistem dalam subtask B.', 'bg': 'Изследователите обръщат все повече внимание на оценката на слуховете поради бързото разпространение на неоснователни слухове в социалните медии, включително задача 7. Въпреки това, етикетираните данни за изучаване на истинността на слуховете са оскъдни, а етикетите в данните за позицията на слуховете са силно непропорционални, което прави предизвикателство за модела да извършва адекватно обучение под надзор. Предлагаме система, базирана на верига изводи, която напълно използва знания, базирани на структурата на разговора в ограничените данни и разширява данните за обучение в малцинствени категории, за да облекчи дисбаланса на класовете. Нашият подход постига 12.6% подобрение спрямо базовата система за подзадача А, заема се на първо място сред 21 системи в подзадача А и на четвърто място сред 12 системи в подзадача Б.', 'ko': '확인되지 않은 루머가 소셜미디어 플랫폼(SemEval 2019 task 7 포함)에서 빠르게 퍼지면서 연구자들은 루머 평가에 점점 더 관심을 기울이고 있다.그러나 루머의 진실성을 학습하는 데 사용되는 라벨 데이터가 매우 적고 루머 입장 데이터의 라벨 높이가 비례하지 않기 때문에 모델이 감독 학습을 충분히 집행하기 어렵다.우리는 추리 체인을 바탕으로 하는 시스템을 제시했다. 이 시스템은 유한한 데이터에서 회화 구조를 바탕으로 하는 지식을 충분히 활용하고 소수의 유형에서 훈련 데이터를 확장하여 학급의 불균형을 완화시킨다.우리의 방법은 하위 임무 A의 기선 시스템에서 12.6%의 개선을 얻었고 하위 임무 A의 21개 시스템 중 1위, 하위 임무 B의 12개 시스템 중 4위를 차지했다.', 'sw': 'Watafiti wamekuwa wakitumia mitazamo ya kuongezeka kwa uchunguzi wa uvumi kutokana na kusambaza kwa haraka tetesi za uvumi usiokuwepo katika majukwaa ya mitandao ya kijamii, ikiwa ni pamoja na SemEval 2019 kazi 7. Hata hivyo, taarifa zilizotajwa kwa ajili ya kujifunza ukweli wa uvumi ni nadra, na alama katika taarifa za uvumi hazina upendeleo mkubwa, na inafanya kuwa changamoto kwa mtindo wa kutekeleza kujifunza kwa kutosha. Tunazipendekeza mfumo wa mfumo wa uchunguzi unaotumia ufahamu wa miundombinu ya mazungumzo katika data mpya na kuongeza taarifa za mafunzo katika makundi madogo ili kupunguza usawa wa darasa. Hatua yetu inapata maendeleo ya asilimia 12.6 kwenye mfumo wa msingi wa kazi A, rangi ya kwanza kati ya mfumo wa 21 katika jukumu la A, na inapanda daraja la 4 kati ya mifumo 12 katika kazi ya subira B.', 'tr': 'Araştyranlar sosyal medýat platformlarynda SemEval 2019 görevi 7-nji ýyldan çykyp hasaplamaga üns berýärler. Şuny diýip a ýdyşy öwrenmek üçin etiketlenen maglumatlar ýetginjek däldir we aýdyşynyň durumynda etiketler gaty kynçylyksyz bolýar, gözlemeli öwrenmek üçin örän kynçylyk edip görýär. Biz çykyş halka daýan ýar sistemasyny teklip edip, çykyş sistemasynda çykyş halka daýanýar bilimi ýüze çykýar we az kategoriýalarda okuwçylyk maglumatlaryny azaltmak üçin ullanýar. Biziň ýaryşymyz, A subtask sistemasynda 12.6% gelişmek sistemasynda, A subtask sistemasynda 21 sistemleriň birinji derejesi bar we B subtask sistemasynda 4-nji derejesi bar.', 'am': 'በማኅበራዊ አውታር ሚዲያ መድረክ ውስጥ ስሜምEval 2019 ስራ 7 ስለተካፈለ ፈጥኖ ውሸቶችን በማድረግ አካባቢ እየጨመረ ውጤቶች በማድረግ አካባቢዎች እየጨመረ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን የውይይት ትምህርት ማወቅ የተለየ ዳታ ጥቂት ነው፥ የውይይት የድምፅ መቆጣጠር ዳርቻ እጅግ የማይፈቅድ ነው፤ በሙሉ ተማሪ ለመፈለግ የሚጠቅመውን ምሳሌ ለማድረግ የሚችል ነው፡፡ ሰንሰለቲ የተደረገውን እናስቸጋጅላለን፡፡ አካሄዳችን 12.6 በመቶ አካባቢ ስራ አ ለመደበቂያ ስርዓት የተደረገውን አካል አግኝቷል፡፡', 'hy': 'Researchers have been paying increasing attention to rumour evaluation due to the rapid spread of unsubstantiated rumours on social media platforms, including SemEval 2019 task 7.  Այնուամենայնիվ, խոսքերի ճշմարտության սովորելու համար պիտակ տվյալները հազվադեպ են, և խոսքերի դիրքի տվյալների պիտակները չափազանց չափչափ են, ինչը դժվարանում է մոդելի համար հարմար ուսումնասիրություն կատարել: Մենք առաջարկում ենք եզրակացության շղթայով հիմնված համակարգ, որը ամբողջովին օգտագործում է խոսակցության կառուցվածքի հիմնված գիտելիքը սահմանափակ տվյալներում և ընդլայնում է փոքրության կատեգորիաների ուսումնասիրության տվյալ Մեր մոտեցումը հասնում է 12.6 տոկոսի բարելավման հիմնական համակարգին A-ի ենթահարցում, առաջինն է 21 համակարգի մեջ A-ի ենթահարցում, իսկ չորրորդը՝ 12 համակարգի մեջ B-ի ենթահարցում:', 'fa': 'تحقیقات کنندگان به ارزیابی شایعات بیشتر توجه می کنند به دلیل سریع گسترش شایعات غیرقابل تشخیص دادن در platformهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی، شامل وظیفه\u200cی semiEval 2019 7. با این حال، داده های مشخص شده برای یادگیری شایعه\u200cهای حقیقت کم است، و نقاشی در داده\u200cهای شرایط شایعه\u200cها بسیار غیر مساوی هستند، که برای یک مدل سخت می\u200cگیرند که به طور مناسب یادگیری\u200cهای تحت نظر را انجام دهد. ما یک سیستم بر اساس زنجیر آلودگی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که کاملاً از دانش ساختار مکالمه در داده\u200cهای محدودیت استفاده می\u200cکند و داده\u200cهای آموزش را در kategoriهای کمترین جمعیت گسترش می\u200cدهیم تا نابرابری کلاس را کمتر کند. دستور ما در سیستم بنیادی ۱۲.۶ درصد بهبود یافته است، درجه ۱ بین ۱۲ سیستم در زیر سوال A، و درجه ۴ بین ۱۲ سیستم در زیر سوال B.', 'af': "Resekenaars het verhoog aandag tot rumour evaluering gegee vanweë die vinnige versprei van onsubstansieerde rumours op sosiale media platforme, insluitend SemEval 2019 taak 7. Maar, die gemerkte data vir die leer van rumour waarheid is skaars, en etikette in rumour staanse data is baie onversoenbaar, maak dit vanskerp vir 'n model om die ondersoekte-leer adequate te doen. Ons voorstel 'n inferensie ketting-gebaseerde stelsel, wat volledig gebruik geselstruktuur-gebaseerde kennis in die beperkte data en uitbrei die onderwerking data in mindertipe kategorie om klas-imbalans te verminder. Ons toegang kry 12,6% verbetering op die basisline stelsel vir subtfraag A, rank 1ste onder 21 stelsels in subtfraag A, en rank 4de onder 12 stelsels in subtfraag B.", 'sq': 'Kërkimtarët kanë vënë në rritje vëmendje në vlerësimin e thashethemeve për shkak të përhapjes së shpejtë të thashethemeve të papërtheksuara në platforma të medias sociale, duke përfshirë detyrën SemEval 2019 7. Megjithatë, të dhënat e etiketuara për mësimin e saktësisë së thashethemeve janë të pakta dhe të dhënat e qëndrimit të thashethemeve janë tepër të papërporcionuara, duke e bërë të vështirë që një model të kryejë mësimin e mbikqyrur në mënyrë të përshtatshme. Ne propozojmë një sistem bazuar në zinxhir inference, i cili përdorë plotësisht njohuritë bazuar në strukturën e bisedimeve në të dhënat e kufizuara dhe zgjeron të dhënat e trainimit në kategoritë e pakicave për të lehtësuar paekuilibrin e klasës. Përqasja jonë merr përmirësim prej 12.6% në sistemin bazë për nënpyetjen A, renditet e para midis 21 sistemeve në nënpyetjen A dhe renditet e katërta midis 12 sistemeve në nënpyetjen B.', 'bs': 'Istraživači obraćaju veću pažnju na procjenu glasina zbog brzog širenja nepubstanovanih glasina na platformama društvenih medija, uključujući zadatak 7. polEvala 2019. Međutim, označeni podaci za učenje glasine nisu teški, a etikete u podacima glasine o stanju su veoma nesporazorne, čineći da je to izazovno za model odgovarajuće izvršavanje nadzornog učenja. Predlažemo sistem na lancu infekcije, koji potpuno koristi znanje na strukturi razgovora u ograničenim podacima i proširi podatke o obuci u kategorijama manjina kako bi se olakšalo nelegalnost klase. Naš pristup dobija poboljšanje od 12,6% na osnovnom sistemu podpitanja A, rank 1 među 21 sistema podpitanja A, i rank 4 među 12 sistema podpitanja B.', 'az': 'Araştırmacılar sosyal mediya platformlarında tələb edilməmiş səslərin tez yayılmasına görə səslərin değerlendirməsinə çox dikkat edirlər, həmçinin 2019 semiEval işi 7 də dahil. Ancaq söhbətləri öyrənmək üçün etiketli verilər zəif deyildir, və söhbətlərin məlumatlarında etiketlər çox müqayisədə deyildir, çünki bu modeli gözləyir-öyrənmək üçün çox çətin edir. Biz inference zəncirlə tabanlı sistemi təklif edirik ki, bu müzakirə qurğulu verilər içində müzakirə qurğulu bilgi istifadə edir və qeyri-qeyri kategoriyalar içində təhsil məlumatlarını azaltır. Bizim tərəfimiz A subtask sistemində 12.6%-ni yaxşılaşdırır, A subtask sistemində 21 sistemində 1-ni dərəcə və B subtask sistemində 4-ni dərəcə verir.', 'bn': 'সামাজিক মিডিয়া প্ল্যাটফর্মের দ্রুত গুজব ছড়িয়ে পড়ার কারণে গবেষকেরা গুজবের মূল্যের প্রতি বৃদ্ধি প্রদান করছেন, যার মধ্যে সেমইভাল ২০ তবে গুজবের গুজব শিক্ষা শিখার জন্য লেবেলের তথ্য খুব কম, এবং গুজবের অবস্থানের তথ্যে লেবেল খুব বেশি অসমর্থক, যার ফলে তারা যথেষ্ট পর্যবেক্ষণ-শিক্ষা  আমরা একটি অনফেন্স শেইন ভিত্তিক সিস্টেম প্রস্তাব করি, যা সীমিত তথ্যে আলোচনার কাঠামো ভিত্তিক জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করে এবং সংখ্যালঘু শ্রেণীর বৈষম্য কম Our approach obtains 12.6% improvement upon the baseline system for subtask A, ranks 1st among 21 systems in subtask A, and ranks 4th among 12 systems in subtask B.', 'ca': "Els investigadors han estat prestant cada cop més atenció a l'evaluació de rumors degut a la ràpida difusió de rumors no fundamentats sobre plataformes de mitjans socials, incloent la tasca SemEval 2019 7. Tot i així, les dades etiquetades per aprendre rumores són escases, i les etiquetes en la posició rumores són molt desproporcionates, fent que un model realitzi l'aprenentatge supervisat de manera adequada. Proposem un sistema basat en cadena de inferència, que utilitza plenament el coneixement basat en l'estructura de la conversa en les dades limitades i amplia les dades de formació en categories minoritàries per aliviar l'desequilibri de classe. El nostre enfocament obté una millora del 12,6% en relació amb el sistema de base de la subtanya A, el primer entre 21 sistemes de la subtanya A, i el quart entre 12 sistemes de la subtanya B.", 'cs': 'Výzkumníci věnují stále větší pozornost hodnocení zvěstí kvůli rychlému šíření nepodložených zvěstí na platformách sociálních médií, včetně úkolu SemEval 2019 7. Nicméně, označené údaje pro učení se pravdivosti zvěstí jsou vzácné a označení v údajích o postojích zvěstí jsou vysoce nepřiměřené, což je pro model náročné provádět adekvátně dohledované učení. Navrhujeme systém založený na inferenčním řetězci, který plně využívá znalosti založené na struktuře konverzace v omezených datech a rozšiřuje tréninková data do menšinových kategorií, aby zmírnil třídní nerovnováhu. Náš přístup dosahuje 12,6% zlepšení oproti základnímu systému pro podúkol A, řadí se první mezi 21 systémy v podúkolu A a čtvrté mezi dvanácti systémy v podúkolu B.', 'et': 'Teadlased on pööranud üha enam tähelepanu kuulujuttude hindamisele seoses põhjendamatute kuulujuttude kiire levikuga sotsiaalmeedia platvormidel, sealhulgas SemEval 2019 ülesandega 7. Siiski on märgistatud andmeid kuulujuttude tõesuse õppimiseks vähe ja märgistused kuulujuttude seisukoha andmetes on väga ebaproportsionaalsed, mistõttu on mudeli jaoks keeruline teostada nõuetekohast järelevalveõpet. Pakume välja järeldusahelapõhise süsteemi, mis kasutab piiratud andmetes täielikult vestlusstruktuuripõhiseid teadmisi ja laiendab koolitusandmeid vähemuste kategooriates klasside tasakaalustamatuse leevendamiseks. Meie lähenemisviis saavutab 12,6% võrreldes alamülesande A baassüsteemiga, on alamülesande A 21 süsteemi seas esimene ja alamülesande B 12 süsteemi seas neljas.', 'fi': 'Tutkijat ovat kiinnittäneet yhä enemmän huomiota huhujen arviointiin, koska perusteettomien huhujen nopea leviäminen sosiaalisen median alustoilla, mukaan lukien SemEval 2019 -tehtävä 7. Huhujen totuudenmukaisuuden oppimiseen käytettävät merkinnät ovat kuitenkin niukkoja, ja huhujen asenteiden merkinnät ovat erittäin suhteettomia, minkä vuoksi mallin on haastava suorittaa valvottua oppimista riittävästi. Ehdotamme päättelyketjupohjaista järjestelmää, joka hyödyntää täysin keskustelurakenteeseen perustuvaa tietoa rajoitetussa aineistossa ja laajentaa koulutustietoa vähemmistöryhmissä luokkaepätasapainon lievittämiseksi. Lähestymistapamme parantaa 12,6% alatehtävän A perusjärjestelmää, sijoittuu 1. alatehtävän A 21 järjestelmästä ja 4. alatehtävän B 12 järjestelmästä.', 'jv': 'Rasané awak dhéwé éntuk nglanggar sampek kanggo ngilanggar ngéné gerarané rumor sing nggawe barang nggawe barang tambah kuwi tambah media-sistem, tambah semebal 2011 7. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awak dhéwé ngerasai sistem sing diangkat-diangkat kuwi, sing wis nggawe nguasai perusahaan sistem sing diangkat kuwi nggawe datang nggawe lan tambah bantayan kuwi nggawe kategori sing nyenyane kanggo mbatalé terangké. Awakdhéwé éntuk 12.6% nyebutaké sing nggawe sistem sing basa kanggo nyebutaké A, ditambah basa sing 1-uwong sing sistem sing nyebutaké A, lan basa sing 4th kanggo 12 sistem sing nyebutaké B.', 'he': 'מחקרים שימו תשומת לב גדולה לערכת השמועות בגלל התפשטות מהירה של שמועות לא מוצדקות על פלטפורמות תקשורת חברתית, כולל משימה SemEval 2019 7. בכל אופן, נתונים מסוימים ללמוד את אמת השמועות הם נדירים, ותותונים במצב השמועות הם מיוחדים מאוד, מה שעושה את זה מאתגר עבור מודל לבצע הלימודים המפוקחים בהתאם. אנו מציעים מערכת מבוססת שרשרת התוצאות, אשר משתמשת באופן מלא בידע מבוסס שיחה במידע מוגבל ולהרחיב את נתוני האימונים בקטגוריות מינויות כדי להקל על אי-איזון בכיתה. הגישה שלנו מקבלת שיפור של 12.6% על מערכת הבסיס עבור תחת השאלה A, מגוון ראשון בין 21 מערכות תחת השאלה A, וגוון ארבע בין 12 מערכות תחת השאלה B.', 'sk': 'Raziskovalci posvečajo vse večjo pozornost ocenjevanju govoric zaradi hitrega širjenja neutemeljenih govoric na platformah socialnih medijev, vključno z nalogo 7 SemEval 2019. Vendar pa so označeni podatki za učenje resničnosti govoric redki, oznake v podatkih o stališču govoric pa so zelo nesorazmerne, zaradi česar je za model težko ustrezno izvajati nadzorovano učenje. Predlagamo sistem, ki temelji na verigi sklepanja, ki v omejenih podatkih v celoti uporablja znanje na strukturi pogovora in razširi podatke o usposabljanju v manjšinskih kategorijah za zmanjšanje neravnovesja razredov. Naš pristop dosega 12,6% izboljšanje osnovnega sistema za podnalogo A, uvršča se na 1. mesto med 21 sistemi v podnalogo A in na 4. mesto med 12 sistemi v podnalogo B.', 'ha': "Wata kebuɗe sun yi ƙara wa muhimmin rumi sabõda rapid su wãtsa rumors ba da za'a fassara a kan zangaren mutane na jamii, kamar haka da aikin SemEl 2019 7. A lokacin da aka sanar da data wa zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane ne kaɗan, kuma alama cikin danne-danne na rumor, yana da rabo mai girma, kuma yana sanya ta mai zartar da wani misali da ya cika ma'anar-tsari daidai. Tuna buɗa wani na'urar cire a kan sarƙoƙin, wanda ke amfani da ilmi a kan mazaɓa a cikin data na da ƙetare kuma za mu ƙãra data masu yin amfani da shi a cikin jama'a kaɗan dõmin ya sauƙaƙara balancin daraja. Mataimakinmu na sami 12.6% da ya fi kyauta a kan muhallin aikin a subaikin A, daraja ta kwance daga system 21 cikin subaikin A, kuma yana daraja 4 na 12 na'urar cikin aikin a subaikin B.", 'bo': 'དབྱེ་ཞིབ་པ་ཚོས་གནས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གླེང་སྒྲུང་གི་རྗེས་སུ་བཏོན་གཏོང་བའི་དཀྲོག་གཏོང་ལ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་གཏོང་དུ་གཏོང་དུས་གཏ However, labelled data for learning rumour veracity is scarce, and labels in rumour stance data are highly disproportionate, making it challenging for a model to perform supervised-learning adequately. ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་ལུགས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུད་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཚད་གཞི་རྟེན་གྱི་གཏམ་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ ང་ཚོའི་འདྲི་ཚིག་པར་ཕྱོགས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་རྨང་གཞིའི་ལམ་ལུགས་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་ཡར་རྒྱས་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་སྒོ་ལས་གཟུགས་རིམ་༡༢་ནང་གི་གྲལ་ར'}
{'en': 'CLEARumor at SemEval-2019 Task 7 : ConvoLving ELMo Against Rumors', 'ar': 'CLEARumor في SemEval-2019 Task 7: ConvoLving ELMo ضد الشائعات', 'fr': 'ClearTumor à la tâche 7 de SEMEVAL-2019\xa0: Convoluer ElMo contre les rumeurs', 'es': 'ClearRumor en la Tarea 7 de SemEval-2019: Convolucionar a ELMO contra los rumores', 'pt': 'CLEARumor no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 7: Convolvendo o ELMo contra rumores', 'ja': 'CLEARumor at SemEval -2019 Task 7: ConvoLving ELMo Against Rumors', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 7 पर CLEARumor: अफवाहों के खिलाफ ELMo ConvoLving', 'ru': 'CLEARumor на SemEval-2019 Задача 7: ConvoLving ELMo против слухов', 'zh': 'CLEARumorÕ£¿SemEval-2019Õèí7:ÕÅ¼ELMoÕÅı×«╣×¿Ç', 'ga': 'CLEARumor ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 7: ELMO a Thionscnamh i gCoinne Ráflaí', 'ka': 'CLEARumor at SemEval-2019 Task 7: ConvoLving ELMo against rumors', 'hu': 'CLEARUmor a SemEval-2019 7. feladat: Az ELMo összeállítása a pletykák ellen', 'el': 'Καθήκον 7: Να πείσουμε το ΕΛΜΟ ενάντια στις φήμες', 'it': 'CLEARUmor al SemEval-2019 Task 7: ConvoLving ELMo Contro Rumors', 'lt': 'CLEARumor SemEval-2019 7 užduotis: įtikinti ELMo prieš gandus', 'mk': 'CLEARumor на SemEval-2019 задача 7: Преклучување на ELMo против гласините', 'kk': 'CLEARumor at semiEval-2019 Task 7: ConvoLving ELMo Against Rumor', 'ms': 'CLEARumor di SemEval-2019 Tugas 7: Membunuh ELMo melawan Rumor', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 7: വ്യാജങ്ങള്\u200dക്കെതിരായി ക്ലെയാര്\u200dമോര്\u200d', 'mt': 'CLEARumor f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 7: Konverġenza tal-ELMo kontra s-Rumuri', 'mn': 'ДОХ-2019 оны SemEval-2019 ЦАБ 7: Хүмүүсийн ДОХ-ын ДОХ-ын ДОХ', 'no': 'CLEARumor at semiEval-2019 oppgåve 7: ConvoLving ELMo Against Rumors', 'ro': 'CLEARUmor la SemEval-2019 Task 7: ConvoLving ELMo împotriva zvonurilor', 'pl': 'CLEARUmor na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 7: Przekonanie ELMo przeciwko plotkom', 'sr': 'CLEARumor na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 7: Konvoliranje ELMo protiv glasina', 'sv': 'CLEARUmor på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 7: ConvoLving ELMo mot rykten', 'so': 'QLEARumor at SemEval-2019 Task 7: ConvoLving ELMo Against Rumors', 'si': 'CLEARuMor at Halfeval-2019 Job 7: ConvoLng ELMo Anti Rumons', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 செயல் 7: குறிப்புகளுக்கு எதிராக மாற்றும் ELMo', 'ur': 'سیم اول-2019 ٹاکس ۷ میں کلیر آواز ہے: صدا کے خلاف المو کو آواز کرنا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Rõ ràng tại nhiệm vụ SemEvl-tê 9 7: Bảo chuyển giao giao mạng ElMo chống lại Rumors', 'hr': 'CLEARumor na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 7: uvođenje ELMo protiv glasina', 'nl': 'CLEARumor op SemEval-2019 Taak 7: ELMo overtuigen tegen geruchten', 'bg': 'Задача 7: Конволиране на ЕЛМО срещу слуховете', 'de': 'CLEARumor bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 7: ELMo gegen Gerüchte überzeugen', 'da': 'CLEARUmor på SemEval-2019 Opgave 7: ConvoLving ELMo imod rygter', 'fa': 'CLEARumor at semiEval-2019 Task 7: ConvoLving ELMo Against Rumors', 'ko': 'CLEARumor Sem Eval-2019에서의 퀘스트 7: 엘모를 소집하여 루머에 대항', 'id': 'CLEARumor di SemEval-2019 Tugas 7: Membunuh ELMo melawan Rumor', 'sw': 'CLEARumor at SemEval-2019 Task 7: ConvoLving ELMo Against Rumors', 'af': 'KlEARumor by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 7: Vervoel ELMo teen Rumors', 'tr': 'CLEARumor at SemEval-2019 Task 7: ConvoLving ELMo Against Rumors', 'sq': 'CLEARumor në SemEval-2019 Detyra 7: Konventimi i ELMo kundër zërave', 'hy': 'ՔԼԵՌԷՄՕրը, 2019-ի «ՍեմԵվալ»-ի 7. հանձնարարությունը. համոզել ELMo-ը ձայների դեմ', 'am': 'ስራ 7: ConvoLving ELMo Against Rumors', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৭-এ ক্লেয়ারাম: গুজবের বিরুদ্ধে এলমো ভোট দিচ্ছে', 'ca': 'CLEARumor a SemEval-2019 Task 7: ConvoLving ELMo Against Rumors', 'cs': 'CLEARUmor na SemEval-2019 Úkol 7: Přesvědčení ELMo proti fámům', 'az': 'Söylənməyə qarşı ELMo səslərinə qarşı hökm vermək 7.', 'bs': 'CLEARumor na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 7: uvođenje ELMo protiv glasina', 'fi': 'CLEARumor SemEval-2019 Task 7: ELMo konvertointi huhuja vastaan', 'et': 'CLEARumor SemEval-2019 ülesandel 7: ELMo konvendimine kuulujuttude vastu', 'jv': 'CLETRMO nang semiinval-2011 task 7: conveLging elMo against RMOs', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'CLEARumor na SemEval-2019 naloga 7: konverzija ELMo proti govoricam', 'bo': 'CLEARumor at SemEval-2019 Task 7: ConvoLving ELMo Against Rumors', 'he': 'CLEARumor at SemEval-2019 Task 7: ConvoLving ELMo Against Rumors'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our submission to SemEval-2019 Task 7 : RumourEval : Determining Rumor Veracity and Support for Rumors. We participated in both subtasks. The goal of subtask A is to classify the type of interaction between a rumorous social media post and a reply post as support, query, deny, or comment. The goal of subtask B is to predict the veracity of a given rumor. For subtask A, we implement a CNN-based neural architecture using ELMo embeddings of post text combined with auxiliary features and achieve a F1-score of 44.6 %. For subtask B, we employ a MLP neural network leveraging our estimates for subtask A and achieve a F1-score of 30.1 % (second place in the competition). We provide results and analysis of our system performance and present ablation experiments.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة تقديمنا إلى SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval: تحديد صحة الشائعات ودعمها. شاركنا في كلتا المهمتين الفرعيتين. الهدف من المهمة الفرعية أ هو تصنيف نوع التفاعل بين منشور إشاعة على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ومنشور رد على أنه دعم أو استعلام أو رفض أو تعليق. الهدف من المهمة الفرعية B هو التنبؤ بصحة شائعة معينة. بالنسبة للمهمة الفرعية أ ، قمنا بتنفيذ بنية عصبية قائمة على CNN باستخدام دمج ELMo للنص المنشور جنبًا إلى جنب مع الميزات الإضافية وحققنا درجة F1 تبلغ 44.6٪. بالنسبة للمهمة الفرعية B ، نستخدم شبكة MLP العصبية للاستفادة من تقديراتنا للمهمة الفرعية A وتحقيق درجة F1 بنسبة 30.1٪ (المركز الثاني في المنافسة). نحن نقدم نتائج وتحليل أداء نظامنا ونقدم تجارب الاجتثاث.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestro envío a la Tarea 7 de SemEval-2019: RumoureVal: Determinar la veracidad de los rumores y el apoyo a los rumores. Participamos en ambas subtareas. El objetivo de la subtarea A es clasificar el tipo de interacción entre una publicación rumorosa en las redes sociales y una publicación de respuesta como soporte, consulta, denegación o comentario. El objetivo de la subtarea B es predecir la veracidad de un rumor dado. Para la subtarea A, implementamos una arquitectura neuronal basada en CNN utilizando incrustaciones eLMO de post texto combinadas con funciones auxiliares y logramos una puntuación de F1 del 44,6%. Para la subtarea B, empleamos una red neuronal MLP que aprovecha nuestras estimaciones para la subtarea A y obtenemos una puntuación de F1 del 30,1% (segundo lugar en la competencia). Proporcionamos resultados y análisis del rendimiento de nuestro sistema y presentamos experimentos de ablación.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre soumission à SemEval-2019 Task 7\xa0: RumourEval\xa0: Déterminer la véracité des rumeurs et le support des rumeurs. Nous avons participé aux deux sous-tâches. L'objectif de la sous-tâche A est de classer le type d'interaction entre une publication rumeur sur les réseaux sociaux et une publication de réponse en tant que support, requête, refus ou commentaire. L'objectif de la sous-tâche B est de prédire la véracité d'une rumeur donnée. Pour la sous-tâche A, nous mettons en œuvre une architecture neuronale basée sur CNN en utilisant des intégrations ElMo de post-texte combinées à des fonctionnalités auxiliaires et obtenons un score F1 de 44,6\xa0%. Pour la sous-tâche B, nous utilisons un réseau de neurones MLP utilisant nos estimations pour la sous-tâche A et obtenons un score F1 de 30,1\xa0% (deuxième place de la compétition). Nous fournissons des résultats et des analyses de la performance de notre système et présentons des expériences d'ablation.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nossa submissão à Tarefa 7 do SemEval-2019: RumourEval: determinando a veracidade do rumor e o suporte para rumores. Participamos das duas subtarefas. O objetivo da subtarefa A é classificar o tipo de interação entre uma postagem de mídia social de boato e uma postagem de resposta como suporte, consulta, negação ou comentário. O objetivo da subtarefa B é prever a veracidade de um dado rumor. Para a subtarefa A, implementamos uma arquitetura neural baseada em CNN usando embeddings ELMo de texto de postagem combinados com recursos auxiliares e alcançamos uma pontuação F1 de 44,6%. Para a subtarefa B, empregamos uma rede neural MLP aproveitando nossas estimativas para a subtarefa A e alcançamos uma pontuação F1 de 30,1% (segundo lugar na competição). Fornecemos resultados e análises do desempenho do nosso sistema e apresentamos experimentos de ablação.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval -2019 Task 7: RumourEval: Determining Rumor Veracity and Support for Rumorsへの提出について述べる。両方のサブタスクに参加しました。サブタスクAの目標は、噂のソーシャルメディア投稿と返信投稿の間のやり取りの種類を、サポート、クエリ、拒否、またはコメントとして分類することです。サブタスクBの目標は、与えられた噂の真偽を予測することである。サブタスクAについては、補助機能と組み合わせたポストテキストのELMo埋め込みを使用してCNNベースのニューラルアーキテクチャを実装し、44.6 ％のF 1スコアを達成します。サブタスクBでは、サブタスクAの推定値を活用したMLPニューラルネットワークを採用し、F 1スコア30.1 ％ （コンペティション2位）を達成しています。当社は、システム性能の結果と分析を提供し、アブレーション実験を提示します。', 'zh': '本文述我们提交给SemEval-2019务7:谣言评估:定谣言真实和扶持讹言。 吾与二子。 子职 A 者,将讹言社交媒体帖与复帖之交,类相扶持,询问拒论。 子职 B 者,占给定讹言之实也。 其于子职 A,吾得 CNN 之神经架构,用帖之 ELMo ,以佐功能,以成 44.6% 之 F1 评分。 子职 B,吾用 MLP 神经网络,因吾 A 度,遂 30.1% F1 分数(竞第二)。 共其所以然,而烧蚀实验之。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2019 कार्य 7 के लिए हमारे सबमिशन का वर्णन करता है: अफवाहें: अफवाह सत्यता का निर्धारण और अफवाहों के लिए समर्थन। हमने दोनों उप-कार्यों में भाग लिया। सबटास्क ए का लक्ष्य एक अफवाह सोशल मीडिया पोस्ट और एक उत्तर पोस्ट के बीच बातचीत के प्रकार को समर्थन, क्वेरी, इनकार या टिप्पणी के रूप में वर्गीकृत करना है। सबटास्क बी का लक्ष्य किसी दिए गए अफवाह की सत्यता की भविष्यवाणी करना है। सबटास्क ए के लिए, हम सहायक सुविधाओं के साथ संयुक्त पोस्ट टेक्स्ट के ईएलएमओ एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करके सीएनएन-आधारित तंत्रिका वास्तुकला को लागू करते हैं और 44.6% के एफ 1-स्कोर को प्राप्त करते हैं। सबटास्क बी के लिए, हम एक एमएलपी तंत्रिका नेटवर्क को सबटास्क ए के लिए अपने अनुमानों का लाभ उठाते हैं और 30.1% (प्रतियोगिता में दूसरा स्थान) के एफ 1-स्कोर को प्राप्त करते हैं। हम अपने सिस्टम के प्रदर्शन के परिणाम और विश्लेषण प्रदान करते हैं और एब्लेशन प्रयोगों को प्रस्तुत करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наше представление SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval: Determining Rumour Veracity and Support for Rumors. Мы участвовали в обеих подзадачах. Цель подзадачи А - классифицировать тип взаимодействия между слухами в социальных сетях и ответом на пост как поддержку, запрос, отрицание или комментарий. Цель подзадачи B - предсказать достоверность данного слуха. Для подзадачи А мы реализуем нейронную архитектуру на основе CNN с использованием ELMo-вложений Post text в сочетании со вспомогательными функциями и достигаем F1-оценки 44,6%. Для подзадачи B мы используем нейронную сеть MLP, используя наши оценки для подзадачи A и достигая F1-оценки 30,1% (второе место в конкурсе). Мы предоставляем результаты и анализ производительности нашей системы и представляем эксперименты по абляции.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár n-aighneacht do SemEval-2019 Tasc 7: RumourEval: Cinntíonn Fíorúlacht Rumor agus Tacaíocht do Ráflaí. Ghlacamar páirt sa dá fhothasc. Is é sprioc fhothasc A ná an cineál idirghníomhaíochta idir post ráflaí ar na meáin shóisialta agus post freagartha a rangú mar thacaíocht, ceist, séanadh nó tráchtaireacht. Is é sprioc fhothasc B ná fírinneacht ráfla tugtha a thuar. Maidir le fothasc A, cuirimid ailtireacht néarúil atá bunaithe ar CNN i bhfeidhm ag baint úsáide as leabaithe post-théacs ELMo in éineacht le gnéithe cúnta agus bainimid amach scór F1 de 44.6%. Maidir le fothasc B, bainimid úsáid as líonra néarúil MLP a ghiaráil ár meastacháin d’fhothasc A agus bainimid amach scór F1 de 30.1% (an dara háit sa chomórtas). Cuirimid torthaí agus anailís ar ár bhfeidhmíocht córais ar fáil agus cuirimid i láthair turgnaimh eisiblithe.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი ჩვენი სამუშაო-2019 სამუშაო დავაწერა სამუშაო დავაწერა 7: სამუშაო განსაზღვრება სიტყვების სიტყვების და სამუშაო სიტყვებისთვის. ჩვენ ორივე საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი დავწყოთ. A სტკითხვის მიზეზი არის კლასიფიკაცია სიციალური საზოგადომი მედია პოსტის შორის ინტერფექციის ტიპის და განსხვავების პოსტის, როგორც დაეხმარება, კითხვა, განწორება, ან B სტკითხვის მიზეზი არის დაწყვეტილი სიტყვას. A-ს სტკითხვისთვის, ჩვენ CNN-დაბათებული ნეიროლური აქტიქტიქტურის გამოყენება ELMo ტექსტის დასრულებებით, რომლებიც დახმარებული ფუნქტურებით და 44.6%-ის F1-სტკუნტის შესაძლებლო B წერტილისთვის, ჩვენ მოვიყენებთ MLP ნეიროლური ქსელი, რომელიც ჩვენი წერტილი A წერტილისთვის და მივიღებთ F1 წერტილი 30,1% (მეორე წერტილი კონკრენტებში). ჩვენ ჩვენი სისტემის პროცემენტის შედეგები და ანალიზაცია და ახლა აკეთებული აკეთება ექსპერიმენტები.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval: A pletykák valódiságának meghatározása és a pletykák támogatása. Mindkét részfeladatban részt vettünk. Az A részfeladat célja, hogy egy pletykás közösségi médiabejegyzés és egy válaszolóbejegyzés közötti interakció típusát támogatásként, lekérdezésként, tagadásként vagy megjegyzésként osztályozza. A B részfeladat célja, hogy megjósolja egy adott pletyka valóságát. Az A részfeladat esetében CNN-alapú neurális architektúrát alkalmazunk a posztszöveg ELMo beágyazásával kiegészítő funkciókkal kombinálva, és 44,6%-os F1 pontszámot érünk el. A B részfeladat esetében MLP neurális hálózatot alkalmazunk az A részfeladatra vonatkozó becsléseinket felhasználva, és elérjük az F1 pontszámot 30,1% (második helyezés a versenyen). Rendszerünk teljesítményének eredményeit és elemzését, valamint ablációs kísérleteket mutatunk be.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει την υποβολή μας στο έργο 7: Φήμες: Καθορισμός της αξιοπιστίας των φήμων και υποστήριξη των φήμων. Συμμετείχαμε και στις δύο δευτερεύουσες εργασίες. Ο στόχος της δευτερεύουσας ερώτησης Α είναι να ταξινομήσει τον τύπο αλληλεπίδρασης μεταξύ μιας φημισμένης δημοσίευσης στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης και μιας ανάρτησης απάντησης ως υποστήριξη, ερώτημα, άρνηση ή σχόλιο. Ο στόχος της δευτερεύουσας εργασίας Β είναι να προβλέψει την αλήθεια μιας δεδομένης φήμης. Για την υποταγή Α, εφαρμόζουμε μια νευρωνική αρχιτεκτονική βασισμένη στο ΚΝΝ χρησιμοποιώντας ενσωμάτωση κειμένου σε συνδυασμό με βοηθητικά χαρακτηριστικά και επιτυγχάνουμε μια βαθμολογία F1 44,6%. Για την υποταγή Β, χρησιμοποιούμε ένα νευρωνικό δίκτυο αξιοποιώντας τις εκτιμήσεις μας για την υποταγή Α και επιτυγχάνουμε ένα σκορ F1 30,1% (δεύτερη θέση στον διαγωνισμό). Παρέχουμε αποτελέσματα και ανάλυση των επιδόσεων του συστήματός μας και παρουσιάζουμε πειράματα αφαίρεσης.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive la nostra presentazione al SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval: Determinare la Veracity delle Rumor e il supporto alle Rumors. Abbiamo partecipato ad entrambi i sottocompiti. L'obiettivo della sottomissione A è quello di classificare il tipo di interazione tra un post sui social media rumoroso e un post di risposta come supporto, query, negazione o commento. L'obiettivo della sottomissione B è quello di prevedere la veridicità di un dato rumor. Per la sottomissione A, implementiamo un'architettura neurale basata su CNN utilizzando incorporazioni ELMo di post text combinate con funzionalità ausiliarie e otteniamo un punteggio F1 del 44,6%. Per la sottomissione B, impieghiamo una rete neurale MLP sfruttando le nostre stime per la sottomissione A e raggiungiamo un punteggio F1 del 30,1% (secondo posto nella competizione). Forniamo risultati e analisi delle prestazioni del nostro sistema e presentiamo esperimenti di ablazione.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinamas mūsų pranešimas SemEval-2019 7 uždaviniui: RumourEval: Determining Rumor Truthfulness and Support for Rumors. Mes dalyvavome abiejuose paklausimuose. A paklausos tikslas – klasifikuoti garsų socialinės žiniasklaidos pranešimo ir atsakymo pranešimo sąveikos tipą kaip paramą, klausimą, atsisakymą ar komentarą. B paklausos tikslas – numatyti tam tikrų gandų tikrumą. A paklausimui mes įgyvendiname CNN pagrįstą neurologinę architektūrą naudojant ELMo įterptus posttekstus kartu su pagalbinėmis savybėmis ir pasiekti F1 rezultatą 44,6 %. B paklausimui naudojame MLP nervinį tinklą, kuris sutelkia savo A paklausos įverčius ir siekia 30,1 % F1 taško (antroji vieta konkurse). Pateikiame savo sistemos veiklos rezultatus ir analizę ir atliekame abliacijos eksperimentus.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің жарым-жарым 2019 жылы 7- тапсырмасына жіберімізді таңдап береді: Шығарымдардың дұрыстығын анықтау және сөйлемелердің қолдауын анықтайды. Біз екі ішкі сұрақта қатынасыз. A- суреттің мақсаты - жауап беру, сұрау, сұрау, жоқ немесе түсініктеме ретінде жауап беру тізімін түрлендіру. B- суреттің мақсаты - келтірілген сөйлеменің дұрыстығын көрсету. A суреті үшін CNN негіздеген неврал архитектурасын ELMo мәтіннің ендіру арқылы көмектесу мүмкіндіктерімен біріктіріп, F1- нің 44, 6% дегенді жеткіземіз. B суреті үшін, MLP невралды желімізді қолданып, A суреттің бағалауын қолданып, 30,1% F1 деңгейіндегі (екінші жағдайда жақсы желімізді қолдану үшін). Біз жүйеңіздің әрекеттеріміздің нәтижелерін, анализацияларын және қолдану тәжірибелерін көрсетедік.', 'mk': 'Овој документ го опишува нашето поднесување до SemEval-2019 задача 7: RumourEval: одредување на верност на гласините и поддршка за гласините. Учествувавме на двете потпрашања. Целта на подпрашањето А е да се класификува типот на интеракција помеѓу гласини за социјални медиуми и одговор како поддршка, прашање, негирање или коментар. Целта на потпрашањето Б е да ја предвидиме вистината на одредена гласина. За подпрашање А, спроведуваме нервна архитектура базирана на СНН користејќи ЕЛМО вложувања на пост-текст комбинирани со помошни карактеристики и постигнувајќи резултат на F1 од 44,6 отсто. За потпрашање Б, употребуваме неврална мрежа на МЛП која ги користи нашите проценки за потпрашање А и постигнува резултат на F1 од 30,1 % (второ место во натпреварот). Ние обезбедуваме резултати и анализи на нашата системска перформанса и претставуваме експерименти за аблација.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan penghantaran kita ke SemEval-2019 Tugas 7: RumourEval: Menentukan Kebenaran Rumor dan Sokongan Rumor. Kami berpartisipasi dalam kedua-dua pertanyaan. The goal of subtask A is to classify the type of interaction between a rumorous social media post and a reply post as support, query, deny, or comment.  Tujuan subtask B adalah untuk meramalkan kebenaran khabar angin tertentu. Untuk subtask A, kita melaksanakan arkitektur saraf berasaskan CNN menggunakan pelengkapan ELMo teks pos bersama dengan ciri-ciri bantuan dan mencapai skor F1 44.6%. Untuk subtask B, kami menggunakan rangkaian neural MLP menggunakan anggaran kami untuk subtask A dan mencapai skor F1 30.1% (tempat kedua dalam pertandingan). Kami menyediakan keputusan dan analisis prestasi sistem kami dan mempersembahkan eksperimen ablasi.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ കീഴ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2019 ടാസ്ക് 7: വ്യാഖ്യാനം: വ്യാജത്തിന്റെ വ്യക്തിത്വം തീരുമാന ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ടു സബ്ജിസിലും പങ്കെടുത്തു. സാമൂഹ്യ മീഡിയ പോസ്റ്റിന്റെയും മറുപടി പോസ്റ്റിന്റെയും പിന്തുണയും, ചോദ്യം, നിഷേധിക്കുകയോ ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുമിടയില്\u200d വ്യക്തമ ബിയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം കൊടുത്ത വാക്കുകളുടെ സത്യത്തെ പ്രവചിക്കാനാണ്. സബ്ട്ടൌസ് A-ന് വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സിഎനെന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള നെയൂറല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിക്കുന്നു. എഎല്\u200dമോ പോസ്റ്റിന്റെ അംഗീകരിക്കുന്ന പോസ്റ്റ For subtask B, we employ a MLP neural network leveraging our estimates for subtask A and achieve a F1-score of 30.1% (second place in the competition).  നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രകടനത്തിന്റെയും ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ തീവ്രമായ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളുടെയും ഫലങ്ങളും അന്വേ', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sottomissjoni tagħna lis-SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval: Determining Rumor Veracity and Support for Rumors. Parteċipajna fiż-żewġ sottomistoqsijiet. L-għan tas-sottomistoqsija A huwa li tikklassifika t-tip ta’ interazzjoni bejn post rumoruż tal-midja soċjali u post ta’ tweġiba bħala appoġġ, mistoqsija, ċa ħda jew kumment. L-għan tas-sottomistoqsija B huwa li tiġi mbassra l-veraċità ta’ rumor partikolari. Għas-sottomistoqsija A, nimplimentaw arkitettura newrali bbażata fuq CNN bl-użu ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet ELMo ta’ test post flimkien ma’ karatteristiċi awżiljarji u niksbu punteġġ F1 ta’ 44.6%. Għas-sottomistoqsija B, a ħna nużaw netwerk newrali MLP li jiġġenera l-istimi tagħna għas-sottomistoqsija A u niksbu punteġġ F1 ta’ 30.1% (it-tieni post fil-kompetizzjoni). Aħna nipprovdu riżultati u analiżi tal-prestazzjoni tas-sistema tagħna u nippreżentaw esperimenti ta’ ablazzjoni.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас биднийг SemEval-2019-ийн ажил 7-нд тайлбарлаж байгааг тайлбарлаж байна: Хүмүүсийн үнэн зөвшөөрөл, дуудлагын дэмжлэг тодорхойлох. Бид хоёр дахин сурагчид оролцсон. A-ын доогуур асуултын зорилго бол соёл соёл мэдээллийн хэвлэлийн хэвлэлийн хоорондын харилцааны төрлийн харилцаа, хариултын хэвлэлийг дэмжлэх, query, буруу, эсвэл тэмдэглэх. Б-ын доогуур асуултын зорилго бол өгсөн шүлгийн үнэнийг таамаглах юм. A-ын суурь асуултын тулд бид CNN-д суурилсан мэдрэлийн архитектурыг ELMo-ын зураг текстүүдийг ашиглан тусламжтай хамтдаа нэмэгдүүлж, F1-ийн хэмжээ 44.6%-тай хүрэх болно. B-н суурь асуултын тулд бид MLP мэдрэлийн сүлжээг ашиглаж, А-н суурь асуултын тооцоололтыг ашиглаж, F1-н тооцоо 30.1% (өрсөлдөөнд хоёр дахь орон) гаргадаг. Бид системийн үйл ажиллагааны үр дүнг болон шинжилгээг гаргаж, ашиглах туршилтын үр дүнг өгдөг.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje naszą zgłoszenie do SemEval-2019 Zadanie 7: RumourEval: Określenie wiarygodności plotek i wsparcie dla plotek. Uczestniczyliśmy w obu podzadaniach. Celem podzadania A jest sklasyfikowanie rodzaju interakcji między plotkowym postem w mediach społecznościowych a postem odpowiedzi jako wsparcie, zapytanie, odrzucenie lub komentarz. Celem podzadania B jest przewidzenie prawdziwości danej plotki. Dla podzadania A implementujemy architekturę neuronową opartą na CNN z wykorzystaniem ELMo osadzeń tekstu postowego w połączeniu z funkcjami pomocniczymi i osiągamy wynik F1 44,6%. W przypadku podzadania B stosujemy sieć neuronową MLP wykorzystując nasze szacunki dla podzadania A i osiągając wynik F1 30,1% (drugie miejsce w konkursie). Zapewniamy wyniki i analizę wydajności naszego systemu oraz prezentujemy eksperymenty ablacyjne.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver vår tilføring til semiEval-2019 oppgåve 7: RumourEval: Beskriving av rumoreverklar og støtte for rumorer. Vi delta på begge underspørsmål. Målet for subtspørjing A er å klassifisera type interaksjon mellom ein rumoret sosiale mediepost og ei svarpost som støtte, spørjing, nekt eller kommentar. Målet for subtspørjing B er å forhåndsvisa sannheten til ein gjeven rumor. For subtspøring A, implementerer vi ein CNN-basert neuralarkitektur med ELMo-innbygging av post-tekst kombinert med hjelpefunksjonar og oppnår ein F1-poeng med 44,6 %. For subtask B, bruker vi eit MLP-nøyralnettverk som leverer våre estimalar for subtask A og oppnår ein F1-poeng på 30,1% (andre plass i konkurransen). Vi gjev resultat og analyse av systemutviklinga våre og gjeldande aktiveringseksperimenter.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ සේම්වේල්-2019 වැඩ 7 වැඩේ විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් විස්තර කරනවා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියන්න. අපි දෙන්නම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. A සබ්ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ අරමුණ තමයි සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයම පොස්ටල් අතර සම්බන්ධ විදියට සහ උත්තර පොස්ටල් සහය, ප්\u200dරශ්නය, ප්\u200dර B සබ්ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ අරමුණ තමයි දෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න. A සබ්ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා, අපි CNN-අධාරිත න්\u200dයූරාල ස්ථාපනය සඳහා ELMo පොස්ට් පාළුවක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා සහ F1-ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් 44.6%. ප්\u200dරශ B සබ්ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි MLP න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලයෙක් භාවිතා කරනවා අපේ අනුමාණය A සබ්ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් අපේ අනුමාණය සඳහා  අපි අපේ පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ විශ්ලේෂණය සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය පරීක්ෂණය අවස්ථාවන් කරනවා.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie depunerea noastră la SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval: Determinarea Veracității zvonurilor și sprijinul pentru zvonuri. Am participat la ambele subactivităţi. Scopul subactivității A este de a clasifica tipul de interacțiune dintre un post zvonos de social media și un post de răspuns ca suport, interogare, negare sau comentariu. Scopul subsarcinii B este de a prezice veridicitatea unui anumit zvon. Pentru subactivitatea A, implementăm o arhitectură neuronală bazată pe CNN folosind încorporări ELMo de post text combinate cu caracteristici auxiliare și obținem un scor F1 de 44,6%. Pentru subactivitatea B, folosim o rețea neurală MLP valorificând estimările noastre pentru subactivitatea A și obținem un scor F1 de 30,1% (locul doi în competiție). Oferim rezultate și analiză a performanțelor sistemului nostru și prezentăm experimente de ablație.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše podnošenje zadatku 7: RumourEval: određivanje vernosti glasova i podrške glasina. Участили смо у обе субпотаке. Cilj podpitanja A je klasifikacija vrsta interakcije između rumoroznog post a socijalnih medija i posta odgovora kao podrška, pitanja, poricanja ili komentara. Cilj podpitanja B je predviđati istinu određene glasine. Za podpitanje A, implementiramo neiralnu arhitekturu na CNN-u koristeći integraciju ELMo poštanskog teksta kombinirane sa pomoćnim karakteristikama i ostvarimo F1 rezultat od 44,6%. Za podpitanje B, zapošljavamo neuralnu mrežu MLP koji utiče na našu procjenu za podpitanje A i postignemo rezultat F1 od 30,1% (drugo mesto na konkurenciji). Mi pružamo rezultate i analizu našeg izvođenja sistema i predstavljamo eksperimente za aktiviranje.', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran warqaddayada loo soo dhiibay shaqada SemEval-2019 7: RumourEval: Go’aanka runta iyo kaalmada warqada. We participated in both subtasks.  Ujeedada shabakadda A waa in loo kala qeybeeyo nooca isku xiriir ah oo u dhexeeya boostada shabakadda bulshada iyo warqada jawaabta sida kaalmeynta, weydiinta, diidi ama commentarka. Ujeeda sub-safka B waa in la sii sheego runta hadal la sheegay. Subtask A, waxaynu sameeynaa dhismaha neurada ee CNN ku saleysan isticmaalka ELMo embeddings of post text combined with xilli features and achieves F1 score 44.6%. Shaqo sub-fudud B, waxaynu shaqaynaynaa shabakad neurada ah oo u dhiibaynaa qiimaha sub-fushanta A, waxaana gaadheynaa qiimaha F1 oo 30,1% (goobta labaad ee guud). Waxaynu siinaynaa resultiyo iyo baaritaanka sameynta nidaamka iyo imtixaanka horumarinta ah ee haatan ah.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் SemEval-2019 பணிக்கு எங்கள் submissionை குறிப்பிடுகிறது: குறிப்பு நாங்கள் இரு துணை பணிகளில் பங்கிட்டோம். A துணை பணியின் இலக்கு ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட சமூக ஊடகங்கள் முனையத்திற்கும் இடையே உள்ள இடைவெளியீட்டு வகையான இடைவெளிப்படுத்தல் மற்று B துணை பணியின் இலக்கு கொடுக்கப்பட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட வார்த்தையின் உண்மை துணை பணி A க்கு, நாம் ஒரு சிஎன்என் அடிப்படையிலான புதிய அடிப்படையை பயன்படுத்தி ELMo புதிய உரையின் உள்ளடக்கங்களை பயன்படுத்தி அதிக தன்மைகளுடன் சேர்த்து ஒரு F1- ப துணை பணி B க்கு, நாம் MLP புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் வேலை செய்கிறோம், துணை பணி A க்கான மதிப்பீடுகளை வழங்குகிறது மற்றும் 30.1% F1- score பெறுகிறோம நாம் எங்கள் கணினி செயல்பாட்டின் முடிவுகளையும் தற்போதைய உறுப்பும் சோதனைகளையும் அறிவிப்போம்.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt bidrag till SemEval-2019 Uppgift 7: RumourEval: Fastställande av ryktens Veracity och stöd för rykten. Vi deltog i båda deluppgifterna. Målet med subaktivitet A är att klassificera typen av interaktion mellan ett rykte om sociala medier inlägg och ett svarinlägg som stöd, fråga, neka eller kommentar. Målet med underuppgift B är att förutsäga sanningsenheten i ett givet rykte. För subaktivitet A implementerar vi en CNN-baserad neural arkitektur med ELMo-inbäddningar av posttext kombinerat med hjälpfunktioner och uppnår en F1-poäng på 44,6%. För subaktivitet B använder vi ett MLP neuralt nätverk som utnyttjar våra uppskattningar för subaktivitet A och uppnår en F1-poäng på 30,1% (andra plats i tävlingen). Vi tillhandahåller resultat och analyser av systemets prestanda och presenterar ablationsexperiment.', 'ur': 'This paper describes our submission to SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval: Determining Rumour Veracity and Support for Rumors. ہم دونوں سپٹسٹوں میں شریک ہوئے۔ A کے ساتھ پوچھنے کا موقع یہ ہے کہ ایک روشن سوسیل میڈیا پوسٹ اور ایک جواب پوسٹ کی مدد، سوال، انکار، یا توضیح کے درمیان تخلیق کا نوع کرنا ہے. سوٹپوسٹ ب کا موقع یہ ہے کہ ایک عظیم کی سچائی کی پیش آنے والی ہے. اس کے لئے ہم ایک سین ان کی بنیادی نئورل معماری عملہ کریں گے جو پیسٹ ٹیکسٹ کے ایمڈینگ کے مطابق استعمال کرتا ہے اور 44.6% کی F1-اسکو پہنچاتے ہیں. ہم ایک MLP نیورال نیٹ ورک کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ہم اپنے مطالب A کے لئے مطالب کریں اور 30.1% (دوسری جگہ) کے F1-اسکور کو پہنچ سکیں۔ ہم نے اپنے سیسٹم کے کامیابی کا نتیجہ اور تحلیل اور آزمائش کی آزمائش پیش کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "This paper describes our submission to SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval: Determining Rumor Veracity and Support for Rumors.  Biz ikkita vazifalarga murojaat qildik. Ushbu vazifaning maqola - xavfsiz social media posti va javob posti qoʻllash, сўраб, рад qilish, yoki izohni sifatida tarjima qilish. Bu tub vazifaning maqsadi, koʻrsatilgan so'zning haqiqatini predict qilish. Ushbu vazifa A uchun biz ELMo'ning bir CNN asosida neyrol kutubxonalarini bajaramiz va biz koʻpaytirish imkoniyatlari bilan birlashtirish va 44.6% F1 scorini bajaramiz. B'ning tub vazifa uchun MLP neyron tarmoqni ishlayapmiz va vazifa A'ning qiymatlarimizni ishlab chiqarishimiz va 30.1% (rivojlanishda ikkinchi joyga F1 qismini bajaramiz). Biz tizimning amalni bajarishimiz va hozir qo'yish imtiyozlarimizning natijalarini bajaramiz.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả việc chúng ta tuân theo Nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 9 7: RumourEvol: xác định tin đồn Thật và Hỗ trợ cho Rumers. Chúng tôi tham gia cả hai phần phụ. Mục đích của việc yêu cầu A là phân loại loại giao tiếp giữa một bài báo dữ dội xã hội và một bài hồi đáp là hỗ trợ, truy vấn, chối, hay bình luận. Mục đích của phụ đề B là dự đoán sự thật của tin đồn được đưa ra. Để tìm phần A, chúng tôi thiết lập một kiến trúc thần kinh dựa trên CNN bằng cách sử dụng sự nhúng ghép văn bản bưu điện kết hợp với các tính năng phụ và đạt được một điểm F1 của 44.6 Name Đối với phần phụ đề B, chúng tôi sử dụng mạng thần kinh MLP hỗ trợ giá trị của chúng tôi cho phần A và đạt được lợi nhuận F1 trong 30.1= (vị trí thứ hai trong cuộc thi). Chúng tôi cung cấp kết quả và phân tích khả năng hệ thống và thí nghiệm có phép.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores indsendelse til SemEval-2019 Opgave 7: RumourEval: Fastlæggelse af rygternes sandhed og støtte til rygter. Vi deltog i begge underopgaver. Målet med underopgave A er at klassificere typen af interaktion mellem et rygteligt indlæg på sociale medier og et svar indlæg som support, forespørgsel, benægtelse eller kommentar. Målet med underopgave B er at forudsige sandheden af et givet rygte. For underopgave A implementerer vi en CNN-baseret neural arkitektur ved hjælp af ELMo-indlejringer af posttekst kombineret med hjælpefunktioner og opnår en F1-score på 44,6%. For underopgave B anvender vi et MLP neuralt netværk, der udnytter vores estimater for underopgave A og opnår en F1-score på 30,1% (andenpladsen i konkurrencen). Vi leverer resultater og analyse af vores systemers ydeevne og præsenterer ablationseksperimenter.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše podnošenje zadatku 7: RumourEval: utvrđivanje proverenosti glasina i podrške glasina. Učestvovali smo u obe podatke. Cilj podpitanja A je klasifikacija vrsta interakcije između rumoroznog post a društvenih medija i posta odgovora kao podrška, pitanja, poricanja ili komentara. Cilj podpitanja B je predvidjeti vjernost određene glasine. Za podpitanje A, implementiramo neiralnu arhitekturu na CNN-u koristeći uključenje ELMo postteksta kombinirane s pomoćnim karakteristikama i postići F1 rezultat od 44,6%. Za podpitanje B, zapošljavamo neuralnu mrežu MLP-a koja utječe na procjenu podpitanja A i postigne rezultat F1-a od 30,1% (drugo mjesto na natjecanju). Mi pružamo rezultate i analizu izvršnosti sustava i predstavljamo eksperimente za aktiviranje.', 'id': 'This paper describes our submission to SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval: Determining Rumor Veracity and Support for Rumors.  Kami berpartisipasi dalam kedua pertanyaan. Tujuan subtask A adalah untuk mengklasifikasi tipe interaksi antara sebuah pos media sosial dan sebuah pos jawaban sebagai dukungan, pertanyaan, menyangkal, atau komentar. Tujuan subtask B adalah untuk memprediksi kebenaran rumor tertentu. Untuk subtask A, kami menerapkan arsitektur saraf berasaskan CNN menggunakan ELMo embedding dari post teks kombinasi dengan fitur bantuan dan mencapai skor F1 44,6%. Untuk subtask B, kami menggunakan jaringan neural MLP menggunakan perkiraan kami untuk subtask A dan mencapai skor F1 30,1% (tempat kedua dalam kompetisi). We provide results and analysis of our system performance and present ablation experiments.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt unsere Einreichung an SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval: Ermittlung von Rumor Veracity und Unterstützung für Gerüchte. Wir haben an beiden Teilaufgaben teilgenommen. Das Ziel von Subtask A ist es, die Art der Interaktion zwischen einem mutmaßlichen Social-Media-Beitrag und einem Antwortbeitrag als Support, Abfrage, Verweigerung oder Kommentar zu klassifizieren. Das Ziel von Subtask B ist es, die Wahrhaftigkeit eines bestimmten Gerüchtes vorherzusagen. Für Subtask A implementieren wir eine CNN-basierte neuronale Architektur mit ELMo Einbettungen von Post Text kombiniert mit Hilfsfunktionen und erzielen einen F1-Score von 44,6%. Für Teilaufgabe B verwenden wir ein neuronales MLP-Netzwerk, das unsere Schätzungen für Teilaufgabe A nutzt und einen F1-Score von 30,1% (Zweiter im Wettbewerb) erzielt. Wir liefern Ergebnisse und Analysen unserer Systemleistung und präsentieren Ablationsexperimente.', 'nl': 'Deze paper beschrijft onze inzending aan SemEval-2019 Taak 7: RumourEval: Determining Rumor Veracity and Support for Rumors. We hebben deelgenomen aan beide subtaken. Het doel van subtaak A is om het type interactie tussen een geruchten bericht op sociale media en een antwoordbericht te classificeren als ondersteuning, query, ontkennen of commentaar. Het doel van subtaak B is om de waarachtigheid van een bepaald gerucht te voorspellen. Voor subtaak A implementeren we een CNN-gebaseerde neurale architectuur met ELMo embeddings van posttekst gecombineerd met hulpfuncties en bereiken we een F1-score van 44,6%. Voor subtaak B maken we gebruik van een MLP neuraal netwerk met behulp van onze schattingen voor subtaak A en behalen we een F1-score van 30,1% (tweede plaats in de competitie). We leveren resultaten en analyses van onze systeemprestaties en presenteren ablatieexperimenten.', 'ko': '본고는 우리가SemEval-19 미션7에 제출한 루머 평가: 루머의 진실성과 루머에 대한 지지를 확인한다.우리는 이 두 개의 임무에 참여했다.하위 임무 A의 목표는 떠들썩한 소셜미디어 게시물과 답변 게시물 간의 상호작용 유형을 지원, 조회, 거부 또는 댓글로 분류하는 것이다.서브퀘스트 B의 목표는 주어진 루머의 진실성을 예측하는 것이다.하위 임무 A에 대해 우리가 사용한 후 텍스트의 ELMo 삽입과 보조 기능은 CNN 기반의 신경 구조를 실현했고 F1은 44.6%로 나타났다.하위 퀘스트 B에 대해 우리는 MLP 신경 네트워크를 사용하여 하위 퀘스트 a에 대한 평가를 이용하여 30.1%의 F1 점수(경기에서 2위)를 얻었다.우리는 시스템 성능의 결과와 분석, 그리고 현재의 소식 실험을 제공했다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea ujumbe wetu wa kazi ya SemEval-2019: Ujumbe wa Habari: Kugundua Uukweli na Kuunga mkono Uukweli. Tumeshiriki katika kazi zote. Lengo la subira A ni kutangaza aina ya mijadala kati ya makala ya mitandao ya kijamii yenye uvumi na makala ya majibu kama msaada, kuuliza, kukataa, au maoni. Lengo la subira B ni kutabiri ukweli wa uvumi ulio pewa. Kwa jukumu la A, tunatekeleza ujenzi wa neura anayeishi CNN kwa kutumia ujumbe wa posti wa ELMo ukiunganishwa na vipengele vya ushirikiano na kufikia kiwango cha F1 cha asilimia 44.6. Kwa jukumu la subira B, tunatumia mtandao wa neura wa MLP wakitumia kadri zetu za kufikia kazi A na kupata vipindi vya F1 kwa asilimia 30.1 (sehemu ya pili katika mashindano). Tunatoa matokeo na uchambuzi wa utendaji wa mfumo wetu na majaribio yanayotokea kwa moto.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ تسلیم کردن ما به تابع نیمه سال ۲۰۱۹ تابع شماره ۷: تسلیم کردن صحبت و پشتیبانی برای صحبت\u200cها را توصیف می\u200cکند. ما در هر دو سؤال شرکت کردیم. هدف زیر سوال A این است که نوع تعامل بین یک پست رسانه های اجتماعی شایعه و یک پست پاسخ به عنوان پشتیبانی، سوال، انکار، یا توضیح کنیم. هدف زیر سوال B این است که واقعیت یک شایعه داده شده را پیش بینی کنیم. برای زیر سوال A، ما یک معماری عصبی بر اساس CNN را با استفاده از استفاده از استفاده ELMo از متن پست ترکیب با ویژه\u200cهای کمک و یک نمونه F1 با 44.6 درصد انجام می\u200cدهیم. برای زیر سوال B، ما شبکه عصبی MLP را استفاده می کنیم که تخمین\u200cهایمان را برای زیر سوال A تحت تاثیر قرار می\u200cدهد و درجه ۳۰.۱% (جای دوم در رقابت) یک نقاط F1 تحت تاثیر قرار می\u200cدهیم. ما نتیجه\u200cها و تحلیل اجرای سیستم\u200cمان را و آزمایش\u200cهای فعالیت را پیش\u200cفرض می\u200cکنیم.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz biziň rugsatymyzy SemEval-2019 Taýgyzy 7 Biz ikimiz altsoraglaryň içine bäsleşipdik. A soragynyň maksady şöhretli sosyal medýýatlar arasynda täsirleşmeler we jogaplaryň golaýy, soragy, boýun, ýa-da terjime edilmegi düzenlemekdir. B soragynyň astynyň maksady berilen a ýdyşyň dogrudygyny çaklamak. A alt soragy üçin, CNN tabanly näyral arhitekturuny elMo eser metiniň içine kömekleyici özellikleri bilen birleşdirýäris we F1-अ 44.6%-den çykar. B asty soraglamak üçin, biz MLP näyral şebekeni ulanýarys we bu taryşmalarymyzy A subtask üçin ulanýarys we 30.1% (konkursiýada ikinji ýerde ýetip bolýarys). Biz sistemamyzyň netijeleri we çözümlerini we çykyşymyz bardyr.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe ons onderskrywing na SemEval-2019 Opdrag 7: RumourEval: Besluit Rumor Verwaardigheid en ondersteuning vir Rumors. Ons het in beide subtaske gedeel. Die doel van subtask A is om die tipe interaksie tussen 'n rumorese sosiale media post en 'n antwoord post as ondersteun, navraag, verwerp of kommentaar te klassifiseer. Die doel van subvraag B is om die waarheid van 'n gegewe rumor te voorskou. Vir subtask A, implementeer ons 'n CNN-gebaseerde neurale arkitektuur met gebruik van ELMo inbêdings van posteks gekombineer met hulp funksies en bereik 'n F1-telling van 44.6%. Vir subtask B, gebruik ons 'n MLP neuralnetwerk wat ons estimaties vir subtask A verwyder en 'n F1- telling van 30.1% (tweede plek in die samenskap) bereik. Ons verskaf resultate en analiseer van ons stelsel prestasie en voorneem ablasie eksperimente.", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ለሴmEval-2019 ስራ 7 ላደረገው መልዕክታችንን ይገልጻል፤ RumourEval: ውሸትን ማረጋገጥ እና የውሸታሞች እርዳታን ለማረጋገጥ ነው፡፡ በሁለቱ ደብዳቤዎች ውስጥ ተጋራን:: The goal of subtask A is to classify the type of interaction between a rumorous social media post and a reply post as support, query, deny, or comment.  የ ትዕዛዝ B አቃውሞ የተሰጠውን ውሸት ለመቀበል ነው፡፡ ለስራ አ፣ የCNN-based የደዌብ መሠረት አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ለመስኮት B፣ የMLP የኒውሩር መረብ አካባቢውን አ ለመስጠት እና 30.1 በመቶ F1-score (ሁለተኛ ስፍራ) እናደርጋለን፡፡ የስርዓታችንን ድምፅ እና የአሁኑን አካባቢ ፈተና እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan paraqitjen tonë në SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval: Determining Rumor Veracity and Support for Rumors. Ne morëm pjesë në të dy nënpyetjet. Qëllimi i nënpyetjes A është klasifikimi i llojit të ndërveprimit midis një post të zërave të medias sociale dhe një post të përgjigjes si mbështetje, pyetje, mohim apo koment. Qëllimi i nënpyetjes B është të parashikojmë vërtetësinë e një thashethemi të caktuar. Për nënpyetjen A, ne zbatojmë një arkitekturë nervore bazuar në CNN duke përdorur përfshirje ELMo të posttekstit të kombinuar me karakteristika ndihmëse dhe duke arritur një rezultat F1 prej 44.6%. For subtask B, we employ a MLP neural network leveraging our estimates for subtask A and achieve a F1-score of 30.1% (second place in the competition).  Ne ofrojmë rezultate dhe analiza të performancës sonë të sistemit dhe paraqesim eksperimente ablacioni.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের কাজ ৭-এর প্রতি আমাদের প্রতিষ্ঠান বর্ণনা করেছে: গুজব নির্ধারণ করা এবং গুজবের জন্য সমর্থন। আমরা দুটো সাবটাসে অংশগ্রহণ করেছি। সাবকাজ A এর লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সামাজিক মিডিয়া পোস্ট এবং একটি উত্তর পোস্ট সমর্থন, অনুসন্ধান, অস্বীকার করা অথবা মন্তব্য হিসেব সাবটাস বির লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে একটি গুজবের সত্যিকার ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করা। সাবক্ষেত্র A এর জন্য আমরা একটি সিএনএন-ভিত্তিক নিউরেল কাঠামো ব্যবহার করি ইএলমো পোস্টের লেখার প্রতিষ্ঠান ব্যবহার করে যার ফলে তারা এক্সিলিয়ারি বৈশিষ্ট্য সাবক্ষেত্র বি-এর জন্য আমরা একটি এমএলপি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক চাকুরি করি যারা সাবক্ষেত্র A-এর জন্য আমাদের হিসাব প্রদান করে এবং ৩০. আমরা আমাদের সিস্টেমের প্রযুক্তি এবং বর্তমান আগুনের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল এবং বিশ্লেষণ প্রদান করি।', 'az': 'Bu kağıt bizim halı-2019 Gözəli 7: RumourEval: Söylənmək və Söylənmək üçün dəstək təyin edir. Biz hər ikimizin dəyişikliklərinə katıldıq. A subtask məqsədi, rumorous sosial media post və cavab post as ı dəstək, soruşma, inkar etmək və ya komentar olaraq təşkil etmək. B subtask məqsədi verilən səslərin doğruluğunu öyrənməkdir. A subtask üçün CNN tabanlı nöral arhitektürünü elMo mətnlərin birləşdirilməsi ilə birləşdirilməsi və F1 səviyyəsini 44.6%-dən istifadə edirik. B subtask üçün, bir MLP nöral a ğ istifadə edirik ki, A subtask üçün müəyyənləşdirilir və F1 dərəcəsini 30,1% (müqayisədə ikinci dərəcə yerinə yetiririk). Biz sistemimizin performansının sonuçlarını və analizisini təmin edirik.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše podnošenje zadatku 7: RumourEval: određivanje proverenosti glasina i podrške glasina. Učestvovali smo u obe podatke. Cilj podpitanja A je klasifikacija vrsta interakcije između rumoroznog post a socijalnih medija i posta odgovora kao podrška, pitanja, poricanja ili komentara. Cilj podpitanja B je predvidjeti istinu određene glasine. Za podpitanje A, implementiramo na CNN baziranu neuralnu arhitekturu koristeći ELMo ugrađenje poštanskog teksta kombinirane s pomoćnim karakteristikama i postići F1 rezultat od 44,6%. Za podpitanje B, zapošljavamo neuralnu mrežu MLP-a koja utječe na procjenu podpitanja A i postigne rezultat F1-a od 30,1% (drugo mjesto na konkurenciji). Mi pružamo rezultate i analizu našeg izvođenja sistema i predstavljamo eksperimente za aktiviranje.', 'ca': "This paper describes our submission to SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval: Determining Rumor Veracity and Support for Rumors.  Vam participar en les dues subterrànies. L'objectiu de la subterrània A és classificar el tipus d'interacció entre un rumor social i un post de resposta com suport, pregunta, negació o comentari. L'objectiu de la subterrània B és predir la veritat d'una rumor dada. Per a la subterrània A, implementam una arquitectura neuronal basada en el CNN utilitzant incorporacions ELMo de text post combinades amb característiques auxiliars i aconseguint una puntuació F1 del 44,6%. Per a la subterrània B, utilitzem una xarxa neuronal MLP que aprofita les nostres estimacions per a la subterrània A i aconsegueix una puntuació F1 de 30,1% (segon lloc a la competició). Oferem resultats i anàlisi del nostre rendiment del sistema i presentem experiments d'ablació.", 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր ներկայացումը ՍեմԵվալ-2019-ի 7. հանձնարարության. Հաղմուկ-Եվալ. Հաղմուկների ճշմարտության և աջակցության սահմանումը: Մենք մասնակցեցինք երկու ենթահարցերին: Ա-ի ենթահարցի նպատակն է դասակարգել ձայնային սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների և պատասխանների միջև կապը որպես աջակցություն, հարց, ուրանալ կամ մեկնաբանություն: B-ի ենթահարցի նպատակն է կանխատեսել տվյալ հնչյունների ճշմարտությունը: Ա-ի ենթահարցի համար մենք կիրառում ենք CNN-ի հիմնված նյարդային ճարտարապետություն, օգտագործելով PostText-ի ELMo-ի ներդրումները միասին օգնական հատկանիշների հետ և հասնելով F1-ի 44.6 տոկոսի գնահատականը: B-ի ենթահարցի համար մենք օգտագործում ենք MLP նյարդային ցանց, որը օգտագործում է A-ի ենթահարման մեր հաշվարկները և հասնում է 30.1 տոկոսի F1-ի (մրցակցության երկրորդ մասը): Մենք ապահովում ենք մեր համակարգի արդյունքները և վերլուծությունները և ներկայացնում ենք աբլացիայի փորձեր:', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва нашето представяне на задача 7: Определяне на верността на слуховете и подкрепа за слуховете. Участвахме и в двете подзадачи. Целта на подзадача А е да класифицира вида взаимодействие между слухова публикация в социалната мрежа и публикация за отговор като поддръжка, запитване, отричане или коментар. Целта на подзадача Б е да предскаже истината на даден слух. За подзадача А ние внедряваме базирана на CNN невронна архитектура, използвайки вграждания на пост текст в комбинация с спомагателни функции и постигаме оценка от 44,6%. За подзадача Б използваме невронна мрежа, използвайки нашите оценки за подзадача А и постигаме резултат от 30,1% (второ място в състезанието). Предоставяме резултати и анализ на работата на системата и представяме аблационни експерименти.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš příspěvek k SemEval-2019 Úkol 7: RumourEval: Stanovení věrnosti fámů a podpora fámů. Účastnili jsme se obou dílčích úkolů. Cílem podúkolu A je klasifikovat typ interakce mezi pověstným příspěvkem na sociálních sítích a odpovědí jako podpora, dotaz, popření nebo komentář. Cílem podúkolu B je předpovědět pravdivost dané fámy. Pro podúkol A implementujeme neuronovou architekturu založenou na CNN pomocí ELMo vložení textu v kombinaci s pomocnými funkcemi a dosahujeme F1 skóre 44,6%. Pro podúkol B používáme neuronovou síť MLP, která využívá naše odhady pro podúkol A a dosahuje F1 skóre 30,1% (druhé místo v soutěži). Poskytujeme výsledky a analýzy výkonu našeho systému a prezentujeme ablační experimenty.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie esitamist SemEval-2019 ülesandele 7: RumourEval: kuulujuttude usaldusväärsuse kindlaksmääramine ja kuulujuttude toetamine. Me osalesime mõlemas alamülesandes. Alaülesande A eesmärk on klassifitseerida kuulujutulise sotsiaalmeedia postituse ja vastusepostituse vahelise suhtluse tüüpi tugi-, päringu-, eitamise- või kommentaariks. Alaülesande B eesmärk on ennustada kuulujutu tõesust. Alaülesande A puhul rakendame CNN-põhist neuraalarhitektuuri, kasutades ELMo põimitud postiteksti koos abifunktsioonidega ning saavutame F1-skoori 44,6%. Alaülesande B puhul kasutame MLP neurovõrku, mis võimendab meie alaülesande A hinnanguid ja saavutab F1-skoori 30,1% (teine koht võistlusel). Anname tulemusi ja analüüse oma süsteemi toimivuse kohta ning esitame ablatsioonikatseid.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli kuvaa julkaisuamme SemEval-2019 Task 7: RumourEval: Determining Rumor Veracity and Support for Rumors. Osallistuimme molempiin alitehtäviin. Alatehtävän A tavoitteena on luokitella huhutun sosiaalisen median viestin ja vastausviestin välinen vuorovaikutus tueksi, kyselyksi, kielloksi tai kommentiksi. Alatehtävän B tavoitteena on ennustaa tietyn huhun totuus. Alatehtävässä A toteutamme CNN-pohjaisen neuroarkkitehtuurin käyttämällä ELMo-upotuksia postitekstistä yhdistettynä apuominaisuuksiin ja saavutamme F1-pisteen 44,6%. Alatehtävään B käytämme MLP-neuroverkkoa, joka hyödyntää alatehtävään A liittyviä arvioitamme ja saavuttaa F1-pisteen 30,1% (toinen sija kilpailussa). Annamme tulokset ja analyysit järjestelmämme suorituskyvystä ja esittelemme ablaatiokokeita.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana Musulunci da Kayan aiki 7 Mun yi rabo da aikin dukansu. The goal of subtask A is to classify the type of interaction between a rumorous social media post and a reply post as support, query, deny, or comment.  Gagon sub-aikin B shine ka ƙayyade gaskiyar da aka ƙayyade. @ info: whatsthis Ga sub-aikin B, za mu aiki wani shirin MLP neural wanda ke cika qiimakanmu wa sub-aikin A kuma za mu sami F1-score 30.1% (na sauki a cikin competitin). Munã bãyar da matsala da anayyari ga aikin na'asarmu da jarrabai na halarce.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje našo predložitev SemEval-2019 naloga 7: RumourEval: določanje resničnosti govoric in podpora govoricam. Sodelovali smo pri obeh podnalogah. Cilj podopravila A je razvrstiti vrsto interakcije med govoričo objavo na družbenem omrežju in objavo na odgovor kot podporo, poizvedbo, zanikanje ali komentar. Cilj podnaloge B je napovedati resničnost dane govorice. Za podnalogo A izvajamo nevronsko arhitekturo, ki temelji na CNN, z uporabo ELMo vdelav post besedila v kombinaciji s pomožnimi funkcijami in dosežemo rezultat F1 44,6%. Za podnalogo B uporabljamo MLP nevronsko omrežje, ki uporablja naše ocene za podnalogo A in doseže rezultat F1 30,1% (drugo mesto v tekmovanju). Zagotavljamo rezultate in analizo delovanja sistema ter predstavljamo ablacijske poskuse.', 'jv': "Ngerti kapulan nyong sumulahi nggawe rerungan seminval-2011 Taaksi 7: Dhewekno: detecting rumor Versitiy and suportu kanggo rumor. Awak dhéwé énjaraké kabèh pangan goal goal Ero panggunakake A, kita mulai akeh sistem sing basa nêr online, digawe nggunakake elMo embedding ding of mail text combining karo akeh juter perusahaan lan nêmêng lanjut sampeyan F1-slang ng ng 49.6%. Sampeyan panggungu B, kita gunakake MLP kuwi nggunakake alam kuwi nggunakake tarjamahan 'A' lan nganggo barang F1-30.1% (sampeyan tanggal segondi tanggal). Awak dhéwé ngewehke dadi karo hal-hal kanggo ngerasakno sistem iki dadi neng ujian sing beraksi.", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את ההעברה שלנו לסימוול-2019 משימה 7: השתתפנו בשני השאלות. המטרה של תת-שאלה א היא לקlassifika את סוג האינטראקציה בין פרסט שמועה של מדיה חברתית ופרסט תשובה כתמיכה, בקשה, כחשה או תגובה. המטרה של תת-שאלה ב היא לחזות את האמת של שמועה מסוימת. לתת-שאלה א, אנו מפעילים ארכיטקטורה עצבית מבוססת ב-CNN בשימוש באמצעות תוספות ELMo של טקסט פוסט ביחד עם תכונות עזריות ולהשיג נקודת F1 של 44.6%. לתת-שאלה ב, אנו משתמשים ברשת עצבית MLP שמשתמשת בהערכות שלנו לתת-שאלה א ולהשיג נקודת F1 של 30.1% (מקום שני בתחרות). We provide results and analysis of our system performance and present ablation experiments.', 'bo': 'ཤོག ང་ཚོས་subtasks གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཕྱིར་འདྲི་ཚིག་དགོས་པ་དེ་གསར་གཏོང དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཕབ་ཕྲེ་བ་ཡིན་ན་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་སྒྲུང་གཏམ་གྱི་བདེན་ཚུལ་རྔོན་སྒྲིག་བྱེད། For subtask A, we implement a CNN-based neural architecture using ELMo embeddings of post text combined with auxiliary features and achieve a F1-score of 44.6%. འདིའི་ཕྱིར་བཏོན་པ་ལྟར། ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་སྐྱེས་པའི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཞིག་གིས་ང་ཚོའི་རྩིས་འབྲས་འདི་ཕྱིར་བཏོན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་གི་སྒྲུབ་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་རྗེས་མངོན་འཆར།'}
{'en': 'GWU NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 7 : Hybrid Pipeline for Rumour Veracity and Stance Classification on Social Media', 'ar': 'GWU NLP في SemEval-2019 المهمة 7: خط أنابيب مختلط لصحة الشائعات وتصنيف الموقف على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي', 'fr': 'GWU NLP à SEMEVAL-2019 Task 7\xa0: Pipeline hybride pour la véracité des rumeurs et la classification des positions sur les réseaux sociaux', 'es': 'PNL de GWU en la tarea 7 de Semeval-2019: Canalización híbrida para la clasificación de la veracidad de los rumores y la postura en las redes sociales', 'pt': 'GWU NLP no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 7: Pipeline Híbrido para Veracidade de Rumores e Classificação de Postura nas Mídias Sociais', 'ja': 'GWU NLP at SemEval -2019 Task 7: Hybrid Pipeline for Rumour Veracity and Stance Classification on Social Media', 'zh': 'GWU NLP在SemEval-2019务7:社交媒体讹言真性,立场混合', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 7 पर GWU NLP: अफवाह सत्यता और सामाजिक मीडिया पर रुख वर्गीकरण के लिए हाइब्रिड पाइपलाइन', 'ru': 'GWU NLP на SemEval-2019 Task 7: Hybrid Pipeline for Rumour Veracity and Stance Classification on Social Media', 'ga': 'GWU NLP ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 7: Píblíne Hibrideach le haghaidh Fíorais Rumor agus Aicmiú Seasaimh ar na Meáin Shóisialta', 'ka': 'GWU NLP semiEval-2019 დავალება 7: ჰიბრიდი პიპელინი სუციალური მედიაში და სტანსის კლასიფიკაცია', 'el': 'Εργασία 7: Υβριδικός αγωγός για την ταξινόμηση της αξιοπιστίας και της στάσης των φήμων στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης', 'hu': 'GWU NLP a SemEval-2019 7. feladat: Hibrid csővezeték a hírek becsületessége és helyzet besorolása a közösségi médiában', 'it': 'GWU NLP al SemEval-2019 Task 7: Pipeline ibride per la classificazione delle voci di Veracity e Stance sui Social Media', 'kk': 'GWU NLP жарым-2019 тапсырмасында 7. тапсырма: Гибрид пипипелин және социалдық медиақтардың станциялық классификациясы', 'lt': 'GWU NLP SemEval-2019 7 užduotis: Hibridinis garso teisingumo ir socialinės žiniasklaidos pozicijų klasifikavimo vamzdis', 'mk': 'GWU NLP на SemEval-2019 задача 7: Хибриден цевк за верноста на гласините и класификацијата на состојбата на социјалните медиуми', 'ms': 'GWU NLP di SemEval-2019 Tugas 7: Pipeline Hybrid for Rumor Veracity and Stance Classification on Social Media', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 7: സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയില്\u200d സ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200dസിഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'GWU NLP fis-SemEval-2019 Kompitu 7: Pipeline ibrida għall-Veraċità u l-Klassifikazzjoni tal-Istanza dwar il-Midja Soċjali', 'mn': 'GWU NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Hybrid Pipeline for Rumour Verification and Stance Classification on Social Media', 'no': 'GWU NLP ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 7: Hybrid Pipeline for rumour Veracity and Stance Classification on Social Media', 'ro': 'PNL GWU la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 7: Conductă hibridă pentru clasificarea zvonurilor Veracity și Stance pe rețelele de socializare', 'pl': 'GWU NLP na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 7: Pipeline hybrydowy dla klasyfikacji wiarygodności plotek i stanu w mediach społecznościowych', 'sr': 'GWU NLP na pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 7: hibridna pipelina za verovatnost rušenja i klasifikaciju stanica na socijalnim medijima', 'si': 'GWU NLP at HalfEvel-2019 Job 7: hybroid Pipeline for Rumina Verity and Stance Classication on Humanitarian Media', 'sv': 'GWU NLP på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 7: Hybrid Pipeline för rykten Veracity och Stance Klassificering på sociala medier', 'so': 'GWU NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Hybrid Pipeline for Rumour Veracity and Stance Classification on Social Media', 'ta': 'செம்வால்- 2019ல் ஜிவுயு என்எல்பி செய்தி 7: சமூக ஊடகத்தில் குழப்பம் செயல் மற்றும் நிலை வகைப்படுத்தல்', 'ur': 'GWU NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Hybrid Pipeline for Rumour Veracity and Stance Classification on Social Media', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'GWU NLP tại SemEvl-209 Task 7: Hydy Pipeline for Rumour Vericity and Stance classification on Social Media', 'bg': 'Задача 7: Хибриден тръбопровод за верността на слуховете и класификацията на позициите в социалните медии', 'nl': 'GWU NLP op SemEval-2019 Taak 7: Hybride Pijpleiding voor geruchtvastheid en standclassificatie op sociale media', 'hr': 'GWU NLP na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 7: hibridna pipelina za provjernost rušenja i klasifikaciju stanica na socijalnim medijima', 'da': 'GWU NLP ved SemEval-2019 Opgave 7: Hybrid Pipeline for rygter Veracity og Stance Klassificering på sociale medier', 'de': 'GWU NLP bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabenstellung 7: Hybride Pipeline zur Klassifizierung von Gerüchten in sozialen Medien', 'id': 'GWU NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Hybrid Pipeline for Rumour Veracity and Stance Classification on Social Media', 'ko': 'GWUNLP가SemEval-2019퀘스트7: 소셜미디어에서 루머의 진실성과 입장 분류의 혼합관', 'fa': 'GWU NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Hybrid Pipeline for Rumour Veracity and Stance Classification on Social Media', 'sw': 'GWU NLP katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 7: Pili ya Hybrid kwa Ukweli na Ukosefu wa Vyombo vya Habari vya Kijamii', 'sq': 'GWU NLP në SemEval-2019 Task 7: Hybrid Pipeline for Rumor Veracity and Stance Classification on Social Media', 'tr': 'GWU NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Hybrid Pipeline for Rumour Veracity and Stance Classification on Social Media', 'af': 'GWU NLP by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 7: Hybrid Pipeline vir Rumour Verwaarsheid en Stance Klassifikasie op Sosiale Media', 'am': 'ስራ 7: Hybrid Pipeline for Rumour Veracity and Stance Classification on Social Media', 'hy': 'GW U-ի ՆԼՊ-ը Սեմեվալ-2019-ի 7. հանձնարարությունը. Հիբրիդ խողովակաշար սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների ճշմարտության և կանոնային դասակարգման համար', 'az': 'GWU NLP 7. G칬z톛l 7. G칬z톛l: H칲brid Pipeline for Rumour Veracity and Stance Classification on Social Media', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের জিউউ এনএলপি: সামাজিক মিডিয়াতে গুজব বাস্তবতা এবং স্টেন্স ক্লাসিকেশনের জন্য হাইব্রিড পাইপেলা', 'bs': 'GWU NLP na pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 7: hibridna pipelina za provjernost rušenja i klasifikaciju stanica na socijalnim medijima', 'et': 'GWU NLP SemEval-2019 ülesanne 7: kuulujuttude usaldusväärsuse ja seisukohtade klassifikatsiooni hübriidtorustik sotsiaalmeedias', 'fi': 'GWU NLP SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 7: Hybridiputki huhujen uskottavuuteen ja asenteen luokitteluun sosiaalisessa mediassa', 'cs': 'GWU NLP na SemEval-2019 Úkol 7: Hybridní potrubí pro klasifikaci drbů a postojů na sociálních médiích', 'ca': 'GWU NLP a SemEval-2019 Task 7: Hybrid Pipeline for Rumor Veracity and Stance Classification on Social Media', 'jv': 'GWU NLP at semi-2011 task 7', 'sk': 'NLP GWU na SemEval-2019 naloga 7: hibridni cevovod za govorice verodostojnost in klasifikacijo stanja na družbenih omrežjih', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis', 'he': 'GWU NLP ב SemEval-2019 משימה 7: צינור היברידי עבור שימועים אמיתיים וסטנדציה על מדיה חברתית', 'bo': 'GWU NLP at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Hybrid Pipeline for Rumour Veracity and Stance Classification on Social Media'}
{'en': 'Social media plays a crucial role as the main resource news for information seekers online. However, the unmoderated feature of social media platforms lead to the emergence and spread of untrustworthy contents which harm individuals or even societies. Most of the current automated approaches for automatically determining the veracity of a rumor are not generalizable for novel emerging topics. This paper describes our hybrid system comprising rules and a machine learning model which makes use of replied tweets to identify the veracity of the source tweet. The proposed system in this paper achieved 0.435 F-Macro in stance classification, and 0.262 F-macro and 0.801 RMSE in rumor verification tasks in Task7 of SemEval 2019.', 'ar': 'تلعب وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي دورًا مهمًا باعتبارها مصدر الأخبار الرئيسي للباحثين عن المعلومات عبر الإنترنت. ومع ذلك ، فإن الميزة غير الخاضعة للإشراف لمنصات التواصل الاجتماعي تؤدي إلى ظهور وانتشار محتويات غير جديرة بالثقة تضر بالأفراد أو حتى المجتمعات. معظم الأساليب الآلية الحالية لتحديد صحة الشائعات تلقائيًا غير قابلة للتعميم في الموضوعات الجديدة الناشئة. تصف هذه الورقة نظامنا المختلط الذي يشتمل على القواعد ونموذج التعلم الآلي الذي يستخدم التغريدات التي تم الرد عليها لتحديد صحة تغريدة المصدر. حقق النظام المقترح في هذه الورقة 0.435 F-Macro في تصنيف الموقف ، و 0.262 F-macro و 0.801 RMSE في مهام التحقق من الشائعات في Task7 من SemEval 2019.', 'pt': 'A mídia social desempenha um papel crucial como o principal recurso de notícias para os que buscam informações online. No entanto, o caráter não moderado das plataformas de mídia social leva ao surgimento e disseminação de conteúdos não confiáveis que prejudicam indivíduos ou mesmo sociedades. A maioria das abordagens automatizadas atuais para determinar automaticamente a veracidade de um boato não são generalizáveis para novos tópicos emergentes. Este artigo descreve nosso sistema híbrido composto por regras e um modelo de aprendizado de máquina que faz uso de tweets respondidos para identificar a veracidade do tweet de origem. O sistema proposto neste artigo alcançou 0,435 F-Macro na classificação de postura, e 0,262 F-macro e 0,801 RMSE nas tarefas de verificação de rumores na Tarefa 7 do SemEval 2019.', 'es': 'Las redes sociales desempeñan un papel crucial como principal fuente de noticias para quienes buscan información en línea. Sin embargo, la característica no moderada de las plataformas de redes sociales lleva a la aparición y difusión de contenidos poco confiables que perjudican a las personas o incluso a las sociedades. La mayoría de los enfoques automatizados actuales para determinar automáticamente la veracidad de un rumor no son generalizables para temas emergentes novedosos. Este documento describe nuestro sistema híbrido que comprende reglas y un modelo de aprendizaje automático que utiliza tuits respondidos para identificar la veracidad del tweet de origen. El sistema propuesto en este artículo logró 0.435 F-Macro en la clasificación de postura, y 0.262 F-macro y 0.801 RMSE en tareas de verificación de rumores en la Tarea 7 de SemEval 2019.', 'fr': "Les médias sociaux jouent un rôle crucial en tant que principale ressource d'actualités pour les personnes qui cherchent à obtenir des informations en ligne Cependant, le caractère non modéré des plateformes de médias sociaux conduit à l'émergence et à la diffusion de contenus peu fiables qui nuisent à des individus ou même à des sociétés. La plupart des approches automatisées actuelles pour déterminer automatiquement la véracité d'une rumeur ne sont pas généralisables pour les nouveaux sujets émergents. Cet article décrit notre système hybride comprenant des règles et un modèle d'apprentissage automatique qui utilise les tweets répondus pour identifier la véracité du tweet source. Le système proposé dans cet article a atteint une classification d'attitude de 0,435 F-Macro, et 0,262 F-macro et 0,801 RMSE dans les tâches de vérification des rumeurs dans la Tâche7 de SemEval 2019.", 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアは、オンラインで情報を求める人々の主要なニュースリソースとして重要な役割を果たしています。しかし、ソーシャルメディアプラットフォームのモデレートされていない機能は、信頼できないコンテンツの出現と拡散につながり、個人または社会さえも傷つけます。噂の真偽を自動的に判断するための現在の自動化されたアプローチのほとんどは、新規の出現するトピックに対して一般化できない。本稿では、ルールと、返信されたツイートを使用してソースツイートの真偽を特定する機械学習モデルからなるハイブリッドシステムについて説明する。本稿で提案されたシステムは、STANCE分類で0.435 F - Macroを達成し、SemEval 2019のTask 7では噂検証タスクで0.262 F - Macroと0.801 RMSEを達成した。', 'ru': 'Социальные сети играют решающую роль в качестве основного ресурса новостей для искателей информации в Интернете. Тем не менее, немодерируемая функция социальных медиа-платформ приводит к появлению и распространению недостоверного контента, который наносит вред отдельным лицам или даже обществам. Большинство современных автоматизированных подходов к автоматическому определению достоверности слуха не поддаются обобщению для новых возникающих тем. Эта статья описывает нашу гибридную систему, состоящую из правил и модели машинного обучения, которая использует ответившие твиты, чтобы определить достоверность исходного твита. Предлагаемая система в этой статье достигла 0,435 F-Macro в классификации положения и 0,262 F-Macro и 0,801 RMSE в задачах проверки слухов в задаче 7 SemEval 2019.', 'zh': '社交媒体为在线息寻求者大资新闻,用其至要。 然社交媒体台之无节,不可信者传之,以害人。 方今多自定讹言真性自动化法皆不能及新新兴主题。 本文述我混合系统,统由法则,机器学模形,因复推文以识源推文之实。 本文所系系SemEval 2019Task7中,姿态分类至于0.435 F-Macro,讹言验事至于0.262 F-macro0.801 RMSE。', 'hi': 'सोशल मीडिया ऑनलाइन सूचना चाहने वालों के लिए मुख्य संसाधन समाचार के रूप में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाता है। हालांकि, सोशल मीडिया प्लेटफार्मों की अनियंत्रित विशेषता अविश्वसनीय सामग्री के उद्भव और प्रसार की ओर ले जाती है जो व्यक्तियों या यहां तक कि समाजों को भी नुकसान पहुंचाती है। एक अफवाह की सत्यता को स्वचालित रूप से निर्धारित करने के लिए वर्तमान स्वचालित दृष्टिकोणों में से अधिकांश उपन्यास उभरते विषयों के लिए सामान्यीकृत नहीं हैं। यह पेपर हमारे हाइब्रिड सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है जिसमें नियम और एक मशीन लर्निंग मॉडल शामिल है जो स्रोत ट्वीट की सत्यता की पहचान करने के लिए उत्तर दिए गए ट्वीट्स का उपयोग करता है। इस पेपर में प्रस्तावित प्रणाली ने रुख वर्गीकरण में 0.435 एफ-मैक्रो प्राप्त किया, और सेमईवल 2019 के टास्क 7 में अफवाह सत्यापन कार्यों में 0.262 एफ-मैक्रो और 0.801 आरएमएसई।', 'ga': 'Tá ról ríthábhachtach ag na meáin shóisialta mar phríomhscéal acmhainne do chuardaitheoirí faisnéise ar líne. Mar sin féin, mar gheall ar ghné neamh-mheasartha na n-ardán meán sóisialta a thagann chun cinn agus leathadh ábhar neamhiontaofa a dhéanann dochar do dhaoine aonair nó fiú do shochaithe. Níl an chuid is mó de na cineálacha cur chuige uathoibrithe atá ann faoi láthair chun fírinneacht ráflaí a chinneadh go huathoibríoch inghinearálta do thopaicí núíosacha atá ag teacht chun cinn. Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcóras hibrideach ina bhfuil rialacha agus múnla meaisínfhoghlama a bhaineann úsáid as tvuíteanna freagartha chun fírinne na tweetanna foinse a aithint. Bhain an córas atá beartaithe sa pháipéar seo 0.435 F-Macro in aicmiú seasaimh amach, agus 0.262 F-macra agus 0.801 RMSE i dtascanna fíoraithe ráflaí i dTasc7 de SemEval 2019.', 'hu': 'A közösségi média kulcsfontosságú szerepet játszik az online információkeresők fő erőforrásainak híreként. A közösségi média platformok moderálatlan jellemzői azonban olyan megbízhatatlan tartalmak megjelenéséhez és terjesztéséhez vezetnek, amelyek károsítják az egyéneket vagy akár a társadalmakat. A pletyka valóságának automatikus meghatározására szolgáló jelenlegi automatizált megközelítések többsége nem általánosítható új, feltörekvő témákra. Ez a tanulmány a szabályokból és egy gépi tanulási modellből álló hibrid rendszerünket ismerteti, amely a válaszolt tweetek segítségével azonosítja a forrás tweet valóságát. A jelen tanulmányban javasolt rendszer 0,435 F-Macro az álláspont besorolásában, 0,262 F-makro és 0,801 RMSE a SemEval 2019-es feladatának 7. feladatában.', 'el': 'Τα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης διαδραματίζουν καθοριστικό ρόλο ως κύρια πηγή ειδήσεων για τους αιτούντες πληροφορίες στο διαδίκτυο. Ωστόσο, το ασυνόδευτο χαρακτηριστικό των πλατφορμών κοινωνικών μέσων οδηγεί στην εμφάνιση και διάδοση αναξιόπιστου περιεχομένου που βλάπτει άτομα ή ακόμα και κοινωνίες. Οι περισσότερες από τις τρέχουσες αυτοματοποιημένες προσεγγίσεις για τον αυτόματο προσδιορισμό της αλήθειας μιας φήμης δεν είναι γενικευμένες για νέα αναδυόμενα θέματα. Αυτή η εργασία περιγράφει το υβριδικό μας σύστημα που περιλαμβάνει κανόνες και ένα μοντέλο μηχανικής μάθησης που χρησιμοποιεί απαντήσεις για να προσδιορίσει την αλήθεια του πηγαίου tweets. Το προτεινόμενο σύστημα στην παρούσα εργασία πέτυχε 0.435 F-μακροεντολή στην ταξινόμηση θέσης, και 0.262 F-μακροεντολή και 0.801 RMSE σε εργασίες επαλήθευσης φήμων στο Task7 του SemEval 2019.', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედიაში უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი პროლია, როგორც ინფორმაციის ძებნა ინფორმაციებისთვის უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია. მაგრამ, სოციალური მედია პლატატურების უკეთესი ფუნქცია იქნება, რომლებიც ადამიანებს ან საზოგადოებების შემდეგ გადარწმუნდება და გაფარდება უკეთესი შემ მიმდინარე ავტომატიკური პროგრამების უფრო მეტი სიტყვების სინამდვილეობის განსაზღვრებისთვის არ შეუძლებელია პრომენტის გახსენებელი ტემებისთვის. ეს დაახლობა ჩვენი ჰიბრიდის სისტემის გამოსახულება, რომელიც კონფიგურაციას და მაქსინის სწავლების მოდელი, რომელიც გამოიყენება გარეშე ტევიტის განსახულებლად გამოყენება პროგრამის შესაძლებელი სისტემა ამ დომენტში 0,435 F-მაკრო კლასიფიკაციაში და 0,262 F-მაკრო და 0,801 RMSE პროგრამის შესაძლებელებაში საუკეთესო დავაწყებაში SemEval 2019.', 'it': "I social media svolgono un ruolo cruciale come la principale risorsa di notizie per i cercatori di informazioni online. Tuttavia, la caratteristica non modificata delle piattaforme di social media porta all'emergere e alla diffusione di contenuti inaffidabili che danneggiano gli individui o anche le società. La maggior parte degli attuali approcci automatizzati per determinare automaticamente la veridicità di un rumor non sono generalizzabili per nuovi argomenti emergenti. Questo articolo descrive il nostro sistema ibrido comprendente regole e un modello di machine learning che si avvale dei tweet replicati per identificare la veridicità del tweet sorgente. Il sistema proposto in questo articolo ha raggiunto 0,435 F-Macro nella classificazione delle posizioni, e 0,262 F-macro e 0,801 RMSE nelle attività di verifica delle voci nella Task7 di SemEval 2019.", 'kk': 'Америкалық медиақтары онлайн мәліметті іздеушілердің негізгі ресурс жаңалықтары ретінде маңызды роль орындалады. Бірақ социалдық медиа платформаларының модердеген мүмкіндігі адамдарды немесе әлемдіктерді қауіпсіздік көмектеседі. Автоматты түрде жаңа тақырыптардың дұрыстығын автоматты түрде анықтау үшін қазіргі автоматты түрде арналған әріптердің көпшілігі жалпы болмайды. Бұл қағаз біздің гибридтік жүйеңіздің ережелерін және машинаны оқыту үлгісін таңдайды. Бұл жауап берілген tweets тізімінің шындығын анықтау үшін қолданылады. Бұл қағаздың ұсынылған жүйесі 0,435 F-Макро және 0,262 F-макро және 0,801 RMSE жарық тексеру тапсырмаларында 2019 жылдың жарым Eval 7 тапсырмасында жеткізді.', 'lt': 'Socialinė žiniasklaida atlieka labai svarbų vaidmenį kaip pagrindinės žinios apie informacijos ieškantiems asmenims internete. Tačiau dėl nepakankamo socialinių žiniasklaidos platformų pobūdžio atsiranda ir išplinta nepatikimas turinys, kuris kenkia asmenims ar net visuomenei. Most of the current automated approaches for automatically determining the veracity of a rumor are not generalizable for novel emerging topics.  Šiame dokumente apibūdinama mūsų hibridinė sistema, apimanti taisykles ir mašininio mokymosi model į, kuris naudojasi atsakytais tweetais, kad būtų galima nustatyti šaltinio tweeto tikrumą. Šiame dokumente siūloma sistema pasiekė 0,435 F-Macro pozicijų klasifikavimą ir 0,262 F-Macro ir 0,801 RMSE gandų tikrinimo užduotyse 2019 m. SemEval užduotyje7.', 'ml': 'വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളായി സാമൂഹ്യ മീഡിയ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒര എന്നാലും, സാമൂഹ്യ മാധ്യമങ്ങളുടെ പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമുകളുടെ സ്വഭാവം വ്യക്തികളോ സമൂഹത്തിനോ പോലും ഉപദ്രവിക്കുന്ന വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dന് ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ സ്വയമായി തീരുമാനിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള മിക്കവേറെയും സ്വയമായി സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായി നിര്\u200dണയിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള അടു ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ഹൈബ്രിഡ് സിസ്റ്റത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. നിയമങ്ങളും പഠിക്കുന്ന ഒരു യന്ത്ര പഠിക്കുന ഈ പത്രത്തിലെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച സിസ്റ്റം 0. 435 F-മാക്രോ സ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d ക്ലാസ്റ്റിഫിക്ഷനിലും 0. 262 F-മാക്രോയിലും 0. 801 RMSE സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ലെ ടാസ്ക്ക', 'ms': 'Media sosial bermain peran penting sebagai berita sumber utama bagi pencari maklumat secara talian. Namun, ciri-ciri media sosial yang tidak moderatif membawa kepada muncul dan menyebar kandungan yang tidak dipercayai yang merugikan individu atau masyarakat. Kebanyakan pendekatan automatik semasa untuk menentukan secara automatik kebenaran khabar angin tidak boleh diseluruhkan untuk topik baru yang muncul. Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem hibrid kita yang mengandungi peraturan dan model pembelajaran mesin yang menggunakan tweet yang dijawab untuk mengenalpasti kebenaran tweet sumber. Sistem yang diusulkan dalam kertas ini mencapai 0.435 F-Macro dalam kelasukan kedudukan, dan 0.262 F-macro dan 0.801 RMSE dalam tugas pengesahan khabar angin dalam Tugas 7 SemEval 2019.', 'mt': 'Il-midja soċjali għandha rwol kruċjali bħala l-a ħbarijiet tar-riżorsi ewlenin għal dawk li jfittxu l-informazzjoni onlajn. Madankollu, il-karatteristika mhux moderata tal-pjattaformi tal-midja soċjali twassal għall-ħolqien u t-tixrid ta’ kontenut mhux affidabbli li jagħmel ħsara lill-individwi jew saħansitra lis-soċjetajiet. Il-biċċa l-kbira tal-approċċi awtomatizzati attwali għad-determinazzjoni awtomatika tal-veraċità ta’ rumor mhumiex ġeneralizzabbli għal suġġetti ġodda emerġenti. Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema ibrida tagħna li tinkludi regoli u mudell ta’ tagħlim bil-magna li jagħmel użu minn tweets imwieġba biex tidentifika l-veraċità tat-tweet tas-sors. Is-sistema proposta f’dan id-dokument kisbet 0.435 F-Macro fil-klassifikazzjoni tal-pożizzjoni, u 0.262 F-macro u 0.801 RMSE f’kompiti ta’ verifika ta’ rumori fil-Kompitu 7 ta’ SemEval 2019.', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчид онлайн мэдээллийн хайгчдын үндсэн мэдээллийн хувьд чухал үүрэг тоглодог. Гэхдээ нийгмийн хэвлэлийн платформуудын өөрчлөгдсөн өөрчлөлт нь хүмүүст эсвэл нийгмийн хор нөлөөлдөг гайхамшигтай бүтээгдэхүүнийг нэмэгдүүлдэг. Одоогийн ихэнх автоматжуулагдсан арга зам нь дуу ярианы үнэн байдлыг автоматжуулахын тулд шинэ сэдвээр шинэчлэгдсэн сэдвээр ерөнхийлөгч болохгүй. Энэ цаас бидний гибрид системийг хууль болон машины суралцах загварыг тайлбарладаг. Хариулсан tweets нь эх үүсвэрийн tweetin үнэнийг тодорхойлдохын тулд ашигладаг. Энэ цаасан дээрх санал дэвшүүлсэн систем нь 0.435 F-Макро байдалд хуваалцах болон 0.262 F-макро болон 0.801 RMSE нь 2019 оны SemEval-ын ажил 7 дахь сонсолтын шалгалтын ажил дээр гарч ирсэн.', 'no': 'Sosialmedia spelar ein viktig rolle som hovudressursnyhetane for informasjonssøkarar på nettet. Den ikkje-modererte funksjonen av sosiale media-plattformen fører imidlertid til utviklinga og spredning av ulike innhald som skader individuane eller samfunn. Dei fleste av dei gjeldande automatiske tilnærmingane for automatisk avgjering av sannheten på ein rumor er ikkje generelt for novel oppgåande emne. Denne papiret beskriver vår hybridsystemet som inneheld reglar og ein maskinelæringsmodell som gjer bruk av svarte tweeter for å identifisera sannheten på kjeldetweetet. Dette første systemet i denne papiret oppnådd 0,435 F-Makro i stadsklassifikasjon, og 0,262 F-makro og 0,801 RMSE i rumor verifikasjonsprogrammet i oppgåve7 av semiEval 2019.', 'ro': 'Social media joacă un rol crucial ca principala resursă de știri pentru căutătorii de informații online. Cu toate acestea, caracteristica nemoderată a platformelor de social media duce la apariția și răspândirea unor conținuturi nedemne care dăunează indivizilor sau chiar societăților. Majoritatea abordărilor automate actuale pentru determinarea automată a veridicității unui zvon nu sunt generalizabile pentru subiecte noi emergente. Această lucrare descrie sistemul nostru hibrid cuprinzând reguli și un model de învățare automată care utilizează tweeturile răspunse pentru a identifica veridicitatea tweetului sursă. Sistemul propus în această lucrare a obținut 0,435 F-Macro în clasificarea poziției și 0,262 F-macro și 0,801 RMSE în sarcinile de verificare a zvonurilor în Task7 SemEval 2019.', 'mk': 'Социјалните медиуми играат клучна улога како главни вести за ресурсите за онлајн барачите на информации. Сепак, немодерираната карактеристика на платформите за социјални медиуми води до појава и ширење на недоверливи содржини кои штетат на поединците или дури и на општествата. Повеќето од актуелните автоматизирани пристапи за автоматско одредување на вистината на гласините не се генерализирачки за нови нови теми. Оваа хартија го опишува нашиот хибриден систем кој ги сочинува правилата и моделот на машинско учење кој користи одговорени твитови за идентификување на вистината на изворот твит. Предложениот систем во овој документ постигна 0,435 Ф-Макро во класификација на ставови, а 0,262 Ф-Макро и 0,801 РМСЕ во задачите за верификација на гласини во задачата 7 на SemEval 2019.', 'sr': 'Socijalni mediji imaju ključnu ulogu kao glavne vesti resursa za tražitelje informacija na internetu. Međutim, neodređena karakteristika socijalnih medijskih platformi dovela je do hitne slučajeve i širenja neverovatnog sadržaja koji štete pojedincima ili čak društvu. Većina trenutnih automatskih pristupa za automatski utvrđivanje veranosti glasine nije generalizovana za nove tema koje se pojavljuju. Ovaj papir opisuje naš hibridni sistem koji uključuje pravila i model učenja mašine koji koristi odgovorne tweete da identifikuje istinu izvornog tweet a. Predloženi sistem u ovom papiru postigao je 0,435 F-Makro u klasifikaciji stanja, a 0,262 F-makro i 0,801 RMSE u zadatkima za verificiju glasina u zadatku 7 polevala 2019.', 'si': 'සාමාජික මිඩියාව අන්ලයින් සොයාගන්න තොරතුරු සඳහා ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ආරංචියක් වෙනුවෙ නමුත්, සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයම ප්\u200dරවේශනයේ නොමෝඩර් විශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස නැති  ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය විදියට ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය විදියට ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය විදියට ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය විදියට සාම මේ පැත්තේ අපේ හායිබ්\u200dරිඩ් පද්ධතිය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් නීති සහ පද්ධතිය ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dර මේ පත්තරේ ප්\u200dරතිශ්න පද්ධතිය 0.43F-මැක්රෝ ස්ථානය විශේෂණයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිශ්නය කළා, 0.262 F-මැක්රෝ සහ 0.801 RMSE සම්බන්ධ විශේෂණයේ ස', 'so': 'Macluumaadka sooshalka ayaa qayb muhiim ah ku ciyaaraya sida warbixinta ugu weyn ee macluumaadka ka raadinta internetka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee jardiinada macluumaadka bulshada ayaa soo baxa oo kala firdhiya waxyaabaha aan la aamini karin, kuwaas oo dhibaya qof ama xittaa bulshada. Inta badan oo ka mid ah waxyaabaha aan marxaladda la soo maro si ay u caddeyso daacadnimada warqada, ma ahan wax caadi ah maadooyinka saxda soo socda. Kanu wuxuu ku qoran yahay nidaamka hybrid oo ku qoran sharciyadeenna iyo muusikada waxbarashada maskaxda, kaasoo isticmaalaya warqada jawaabta ee Tweetka si uu u caddeeyo daacadnimada warqada ah ee twita. Sirkaas warqaddan laga soo jeeday waxay gaadhay 0.435 F-Macro oo ku qoran fasaxa istaagga, iyo 0.262 F-macro iyo 0.801 RMSE oo ku qoran shaqooyinka xaqiijinta ee Task7 ee SemEval 2019.', 'sv': 'Sociala medier spelar en avgörande roll som de viktigaste resursnyheterna för informationssökande online. Den omodernade funktionen hos sociala medieplattformar leder dock till uppkomsten och spridningen av opålitligt innehåll som skadar individer eller till och med samhällen. De flesta av de nuvarande automatiserade tillvägagångssätten för att automatiskt bestämma sanningsenheten i ett rykte är inte generaliserbara för nya nya ämnen. Denna uppsats beskriver vårt hybridsystem bestående av regler och en maskininlärningsmodell som använder sig av svarade tweets för att identifiera äktheten av källtweeten. Det föreslagna systemet i denna uppsats uppnådde 0,435 F-Makro i ställningsklassificering, och 0,262 F-makro och 0,801 RMSE i ryktesverifieringsuppgifter i Task7 av SemEval 2019.', 'pl': 'Media społecznościowe odgrywają kluczową rolę jako główne informacje dla osób poszukujących informacji online. Jednak niezmodernizowana cecha platform mediów społecznościowych prowadzi do powstawania i rozpowszechniania niegodnych zaufania treści, które szkodzą jednostkom lub nawet społeczeństwom. Większość obecnych zautomatyzowanych podejść do automatycznego określania prawdziwości plotek nie jest uogólniona dla nowych pojawiających się tematów. Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz hybrydowy system obejmujący reguły i model uczenia maszynowego, który wykorzystuje odpowiedzi tweetów do identyfikacji prawdziwości tweeta źródłowego. Proponowany w niniejszym artykule system osiągnął 0.435 F-Makro w klasyfikacji stanowiska, a 0.262 F-makro i 0.801 RMSE w zadaniach weryfikacji plotek w Task7 SemEval 2019.', 'ta': 'சமூக ஊடகங்கள் ஒரு முக்கியமான விளையாட்டை விளையாடுகிறது தகவல் தேடுபவர்களுக்கு முக்கிய மூலச்செய்திகளாக ஆன ஆயினும், சமூக ஊடகங்களின் ஒரு பாதுகாப்பு தனிப்பட்ட அல்லது சமூகங்களுக்கு காயம் செய்யும் நம்பிக்கையில்லாத உள்ளடக்கங்கள் வெளியே தற்போதைய தன்னியக்கமாக தீர்மானிக்கப்பட்ட முறைகளில் பெரும்பாலான புதிய வரும் தலைப்புகளுக்கு பொதுவாக இல்லை. இந்த காகிதத்தில் எங்கள் ஹைப்ரிட் அமைப்பு விதிகள் சேர்க்கும் மற்றும் ஒரு இயந்திரம் கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் மாதிரி விவரிக்கும் ம இந்த காகிதத்தில் முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட முறைமை 0. 435 F- மேக்ரோ நிலை வகைப்பாட்டில் அடைந்தது, மற்றும் 0. 262 F- மாக்ரோ மற்றும் 0. 801 RMSE செம்Eval 2019ல் ச', 'ur': 'سوسیلی میڈیا ایک اہم رغم لگا رہا ہے جیسے معلومات تلاش کرنے والوں کے لئے اولین رغم رسسوس خبر کے طور پر۔ لیکن سوسیل میڈیا پٹرومٹوں کی غیر منڈر کی تفصیل اضطراری اور غیر یقین کی موجودات کو پھیلاتا ہے جو شخصوں یا حتی اجتماعوں کو نقصان پہنچاتے ہیں۔ بہت سی موجود اتوماٹی طریقے ہیں کہ ایک افسانہ کی سچائی کا فیصلہ کرنے کے لئے اتوماٹی طریقے نہیں ہیں۔ This paper describes our hybrid system comprising rules and a machine learning model which uses replied tweets to identify the truth of the source tweet. اس کاغذ میں پیشنهاد کی سیسٹم نے 0.435 F-Macro کو موقعیت کلاسیفوں میں پہنچ لیا تھا اور 0.262 F-macro اور 0.801 RMSE کو نیم Eval 2019 کے ٹاکسٹ 7 میں شام کی تصدیق کے کاموں میں پہنچ لیا تھا.', 'uz': "Name Lekin, jamiyat media platformlarining o'zgarishni ko'rsatish odamlarni yoki jamiyatlarni ham qo'shish mumkin bo'lgan tarkiblarni ajratishga sabab beradi. Name This paper describes our hybrid system comprising rules and a machine learning model which makes use of replied tweets to identify the veracity of the source tweet.  Bu qogʻozdagi taʼminlovchi tizim darajalashtirishda 0.435 F-Macro, 0.262 F-macro va 0.801 RMSE tashkilotlarini tasdiqlash uchun SemEval 2019 tashkilotlarida yetardi.", 'vi': 'Mạng xã hội đóng vai trò quan trọng là nguồn tin chính cho những người tìm kiếm thông tin online. Tuy nhiên, những nét không quen thuộc của nền truyền thông xã hội dẫn đến sự xuất hiện và lan rộng của những thứ không đáng tin cậy làm tổn hại cá nhân hay thậm chí cả xã hội. Hầu hết các phương pháp tự động hiện thời để tự động quyết định sự thật của tin đồn không thể thông thường cho các chủ đề mới nổi. Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống lai của chúng ta bao gồm các quy tắc và một mô hình học máy dùng những tweet trả lời để xác định sự thật của tweet. Hệ thống được đề nghị trong tờ giấy này đạt được 0.435 F-Macro trong phân loại lập trường, và 0.22 F-macro và 0.801 RMSA trong các nhiệm vụ kiểm tra tin đồn ở Task7 của Semal Ev9.', 'bg': 'Социалните медии играят решаваща роля като основен ресурс новини за търсещите информация онлайн. Въпреки това, немодерираната характеристика на социалните медийни платформи води до появата и разпространението на ненадеждно съдържание, което вреди на индивидите или дори на обществата. Повечето от настоящите автоматизирани подходи за автоматично определяне на истинността на слуховете не са обобщени за нови нововъзникващи теми. Тази статия описва нашата хибридна система, включваща правила и модел на машинно обучение, който използва отговорените туитове, за да идентифицира истинността на източника на туитъра. Предложената в настоящата статия система постига 0,435 в класификацията на позициите и 0,262 в задачите за проверка на слуховете по Задача 7 на СемЕвал 2019.', 'nl': 'Sociale media spelen een cruciale rol als belangrijkste bron nieuws voor informatiezoekers online. De ongemodereerde functie van sociale media platforms leidt echter tot de opkomst en verspreiding van onbetrouwbare inhoud die individuen of zelfs samenlevingen schade toebrengt. De meeste van de huidige geautomatiseerde benaderingen voor het automatisch bepalen van de waarachtigheid van een gerucht zijn niet veralgemeenschappelijk voor nieuwe opkomende onderwerpen. Dit artikel beschrijft ons hybride systeem bestaande uit regels en een machine learning model dat gebruikmaakt van geantwoorde tweets om de waarachtigheid van de brontweet te identificeren. Het voorgestelde systeem in dit document bereikte 0.435 F-Macro in standclassificatie, en 0.262 F-macro en 0.801 RMSE in geruchtverificatie taken in Task7 van SemEval 2019.', 'hr': 'Društveni mediji imaju ključnu ulogu kao glavne vijesti resursa za tražitelje informacija na internetu. Međutim, neomoderirana karakteristika platformi društvenih medija dovede do hitne slučajeve i širenja neuvjerljivih sadržaja koji štete pojedincima ili čak društvu. Većina trenutnih automatskih pristupa za automatski utvrđivanje istinitosti glasine nije generalno za nove teme koje se pojavljuju. Ovaj papir opisuje naš hibridni sustav koji uključuje pravila i model učenja strojeva koji koristi odgovorne tweets kako bi identifikovao istinu izvornog tweet a. Predloženi sustav u ovom papiru postigao je 0,435 F-Makro u klasifikaciji stanja, a 0,262 F-makro i 0,801 RMSE u zadatkima za provjeru glasina u zadatku 7 semiEvala 2019.', 'da': 'Sociale medier spiller en afgørende rolle som den vigtigste ressource nyheder for informationssøgere online. Imidlertid fører den umodererede funktion af sociale medieplatforme til fremkomsten og spredningen af upålideligt indhold, der skader enkeltpersoner eller endda samfund. De fleste af de nuværende automatiserede tilgange til automatisk at bestemme sandheden af et rygte er ikke generaliseret for nye nye nye emner. Denne artikel beskriver vores hybridsystem bestående af regler og en maskinlæringsmodel, der gør brug af besvarede tweets til at identificere sandheden af kildetweeten. Det foreslåede system i denne artikel opnåede 0,435 F-Macro i stande klassificering, og 0,262 F-makro og 0,801 RMSE i rygte verifikationsopgaver i Task7 af SemEval 2019.', 'id': 'Media sosial bermain peran penting sebagai berita sumber daya utama untuk pencari informasi online. Namun, ciri-ciri tidak moderasi platform media sosial memimpin muncul dan menyebar isi yang tidak dipercaya yang merugikan individu atau bahkan masyarakat. Kebanyakan pendekatan otomatis saat ini untuk secara otomatis menentukan kebenaran rumor tidak dapat diseluruhkan untuk topik baru yang muncul. Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem hibrid kita yang mengandung aturan dan model belajar mesin yang menggunakan tweet yang dijawab untuk mengidentifikasi kebenaran dari tweet sumber. Sistem yang diusulkan di kertas ini mencapai 0,435 F-Macro dalam klasifikasi posisi, dan 0,262 F-macro dan 0,801 RMSE dalam tugas verifikasi rumor dalam Tugas 7 SemEval 2019.', 'de': 'Soziale Medien spielen eine entscheidende Rolle als wichtigste Ressource Nachrichten für Informationssuchende online. Die unmoderierte Funktion von Social-Media-Plattformen führt jedoch zur Entstehung und Verbreitung von nicht vertrauenswürdigen Inhalten, die Einzelpersonen oder sogar Gesellschaften schaden. Die meisten der aktuellen automatisierten Ansätze zur automatischen Bestimmung der Wahrhaftigkeit eines Gerüchtes sind für neue aufkommende Themen nicht verallgemeinerbar. Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unser hybrides System bestehend aus Regeln und einem Machine Learning Modell, das die Wahrhaftigkeit des Quelltweets anhand von Antworttweets ermittelt. Das vorgeschlagene System in dieser Arbeit erreichte 0.435 F-Makro in der Positionsklassifikation und 0.262 F-Makro und 0.801 RMSE in der Gerüchtverifizierung Aufgaben in Task7 von SemEval 2019.', 'ko': '소셜 미디어는 온라인 정보 탐구자의 주요 뉴스 자원으로서 매우 중요한 역할을 발휘한다.그러나 소셜미디어 플랫폼의 무절제한 특성은 믿을 수 없는 내용의 출현과 전파를 초래했고 이런 내용은 개인, 심지어 사회를 해칠 수 있다.현재 루머의 진실성을 자동으로 확인하는 자동화 방법의 대부분은 새로운 화제에 적용되지 않는다.본고는 우리의 혼합 시스템을 묘사하는데 규칙과 기계 학습 모델을 포함한다. 이 모델은 회답의 추문을 이용하여 원추문의 정확성을 식별한다.본고에서 제시한 시스템은 2019년 Sem Eval의Task7에서 자세 분류에서 0.435개의 F-Macro를 실현했고 루머 검증 임무에서 0.262개의 F-Macro와 0.801개의 RMSE를 실현했다.', 'fa': 'رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی نقش مهم به عنوان اخبار منابع اصلی برای جستجوان اطلاعات آنلاین بازی می\u200cکند. با این حال، ویژه\u200cهای غیر قابل تغییر قابل تغییر از Platform\u200cهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی به اضطراری و گسترش محتوای غیر باور می\u200cشود که به فردی یا حتی اجتماعی آسیب می\u200cدهند. بیشتر از نزدیک\u200cهای فعلی برای تعیین کردن حقیقت شایعه\u200cای برای موضوع\u200cهای روانی که روشن می\u200cشوند، به طور خودکار قابل نیستند. این کاغذ سیستم هیبرید ما را توصیف می\u200cکند که شامل قوانین و مدل یادگیری ماشین است که از tweets جواب استفاده می\u200cکند تا حقیقت تویت منبع را شناسایی کند. سیستم پیشنهاد در این کاغذ 0.435 F-Macro در قسمت\u200cگذاری موقعیت رسید و 0.262 F-macro و 0.801 RMSE در کارهای تایید شایعه\u200cگذاری در Task7 of SemEval 2019.', 'af': "Soziale media speel 'n belangrike rol as die hoofhulpbron nuus vir inligting soekkers online. Maar die onmodereerde funksie van sosiale media platforme lei tot die uitbreiding en versprei van onvertroude inhoud wat individuele of selfs samelewing skade doen. Die meeste van die huidige outomatiese toegang vir outomatiese bepaal van die waarheid van 'n rumor is nie genereerbaar vir novele uitkommende onderwerpe nie. Hierdie papier beskryf ons hibrid stelsel wat regte en masjien leer modeel bevat wat gebruik van antwoord tweets om die waarheid van die bron tweet te identifiseer. Die voorgestelde stelsel in hierdie papier het 0,435 F-Makro in staatsklassifikasie bereik en 0.262 F-makro en 0.801 RMSE in rumor verifikasie taak in Taak7 van SemEval 2019.", 'sw': 'Vyombo vya habari vya kijamii vinaweza nafasi muhimu kama habari kuu za rasilimali kwa ajili ya kutafuta taarifa mtandaoni. Hata hivyo, utaratibu wa majukwaa ya mitandao ya kijamii yanapelekea kuondoka na kusambaza maudhui yasiyo na imani ambayo yanawaathiri watu au hata jamii. Matokeo mengi ya sasa yanayojitegemea kwa ajili ya kutambua ukweli wa ukweli wa uvumi haujawezekana kwa mada yanayotokea riwaya. Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wetu wa hybrid unaohusiana na kanuni na modeli ya kujifunza mashine ambayo inatumia twiti zilizojibu kutambua ukweli wa twiti za chanzo hicho. Mfumo huo ulipendekezwa katika gazeti hili ulifanikiwa kufikia 0.435 F-Macro katika kutangaza msimamo, na 0.262 F-macro na 0.801 RMSE katika kazi za kuthibitisha tetesi katika Task 7 ya SemEval 2019.', 'tr': 'Sosialy medýýatlar internetde maglumat gözleyenleri üçin esasy taýdan roli oýnaýarlar. Ýöne sosyal medýä platformlaryň täze taýýarlanmadyk özellikleri adamlary ýa-da jemgyýetçiliklere bir urşan bolup ýöredýär. Aýratyn a ýdyşyň hakykatyny otomatik etmek üçin häzirki otomatik yaklaşyklaryň köp bölegi täze temalar üçin däl däl. Bu kagyz biziň hybrid sistemimiziň kararlaryny we maşynyň öwrenme nusgasyny bardyr. Bu ýagdaý, suwlar tweetiniň dogrudygyny tanyşdyrmak üçin janlaşdyrylýan tweetleri ulanýar. Bu kagyzdaki teklip sistemasy 0.435 F-Macro sahypalarda ýetişdi, we 0.262 F-macro we 0.801 RMSE SemEval 2019-nji ýylyň barlama zadynda ýetişdi.', 'sq': 'Media sociale luan një rol vendimtar si lajmi kryesor i burimeve për kërkuesit e informacionit në internet. Megjithatë, karakteristika e pammoderuar e platformeve të medias sociale çon në daljen dhe shpërndarjen e përmbajtjeve të pabesueshme që dëmtojnë individët apo madje shoqëritë. Shumica e qasjeve aktuale të automatizuara për përcaktimin automatik të vërtetës së një thashethemi nuk janë të gjeneralizueshme për temë të reja. This paper describes our hybrid system comprising rules and a machine learning model which makes use of replied tweets to identify the veracity of the source tweet.  Sistemi i propozuar në këtë letër arriti 0.435 F-Macro në klasifikimin e qëndrimeve dhe 0.262 F-macro dhe 0.801 RMSE në detyrat e verifikimit të thashethemeve në Detyrën 7 të SemEval 2019.', 'hy': 'Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցները կարևոր դեր են խաղում որպես տեղեկատվության փնտրողների առցանց գլխավոր ռեսուրսների նորությունները: Այնուամենայնիվ, սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների առանձնահատկությունը հանգեցնում է անվստահելի պարունակությունների առաջացմանը և տարածումը, որոնք վնասում են անհատներին կամ նույնիսկ հասարակություններին: Ներկայումս ավտոմատիկ մոտեցումների մեծ մասը լսությունների ճշմարտությունը ինքնաբերաբար որոշելու համար ընդհանուր չէ նոր թեմաների համար: Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր հիբրիդ համակարգը, որը ներառում է կանոններ և մեքենային ուսումնասիրության մոդել, որը օգտագործում է պատասխանված թվիթերն աղբյուրի թվիթերի ճշմարտությունը բացահայտելու համար: Այս թղթի նախագծված համակարգը հասավ 0.435 ֆ-Մաքրոյի դիրքի դասակարգման մեջ, 0.262 ֆ-Մաքրոյի և 0.801 ՌՄՍԵ-ի լսումների ստուգելու խնդիրներում 2019 թ. ՍեմԷվալի 7-ի գործում:', 'am': 'ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያዎች መረጃ ለሚፈልጉት የዋነኛው የኩነቶች ዜና በመስመር ላይ የሚያስፈልገውን አዋቂነት የሚያደርጋል፡፡ ነገር ግን የማኅበራዊ አውታር ሚዲያ ፕላጦማር ግንኙነት የግንኙነታቸውን ወይም ማኅበረሰቦችን የሚጎድሉ በማይታመን ግንኙነት ይነካቸዋል፡፡ የአሁኑ የውይይት አካባቢ የውይይት አካባቢ ለመፍጠር የረኀብ ጉዳዮች ላይ አቀማሚ አይደሉም፡፡ ይህ ገጽ የኬብሪድ ስርዓታችንን ሕግ እና የመማር ሞዴል ይናገራል፡፡ የመልስ ትዊተሮችን እውነተኛውን ለመግለጽ ይጠቅማል፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ ውስጥ የተዘጋጀው ስርዓት 0.435 F-ማክሮን በመግለጫ እና 0.262 F-ማክሮን እና 0.801 RMSE በሳምEval 2019 ስክስ7 ውስጥ የሚያረጋግጥ ስርዓት አግኝቷል፡፡', 'bs': 'Socijalni mediji imaju ključnu ulogu kao glavne vijesti resursa za tražitelje informacija na internetu. Međutim, neomoderirana karakteristika platformi društvenih medija dovede do hitne slučajeve i širenja neuvjerljivih sadržaja koji štete pojedincima ili čak društvu. Većina trenutnih automatskih pristupa za automatski utvrđivanje veranosti glasine nije generalizovana za nove tema koje se pojavljuju. Ovaj papir opisuje naš hibridni sistem koji uključuje pravila i model učenja mašine koji koristi odgovorne tweete da identifikuje istinu izvornog tweet a. Predloženi sistem u ovom papiru postigao je 0,435 F-Makro u klasifikaciji stanja, a 0,262 F-makro i 0,801 RMSE u zadatkima za provjeru glasina u zadatku 7 semiEvala 2019.', 'ca': "Els mitjans socials juguen un paper crucial com a notícia de recursos per als buscadors d'informació en línia. However, the unmoderated feature of social media platforms lead to the emergence and spread of untrustworthy contents which harm individuals or even societies.  La majoria dels enfocaments automatitzats actuals per determinar automàticament la veritat d'una rumor no són generalitzables per noves temes emergents. Aquest article descriu el nostre sistema híbrid que consisteix en regles i un model d'aprenentatge màquinari que utilitza tweets respostes per identificar la veritat del tweet de fonts. El sistema proposat en aquest paper va aconseguir 0,435 F-Macro en classificació de posicions, i 0,262 F-Macro i 0,801 RMSE en tasques de verificació de rumors a la tasca 7 de SemEval 2019.", 'az': "Sosyal media onlajn məlumat axtarıcıları üçün ən çox qüvvətli mənbə xəbəri olaraq çox mövcuddur. Lakin sosyal media platformların dəyişiklik olmayan özellikləri insanlara və hətta sosyallərə zərər verən inanılmaz məlumatların fəaliyyətinə və yayılmasına yol göstərir. Söhbətlərin doğruluğunu avtomatik olaraq müəyyən etmək üçün a ğımdaki avtomatik tərzlərinin çoxu yeni məsələlər üçün genel olmaz. Bu kağıt bizim hibrid sistemimizi kurallar və maşın öyrənmə modelini təsdiqləyir ki, cavab verilmiş tweetlərdən istifadə edir. Bu kağızdaki tədbir sistemi 0,435 F-Makro mövcud klasifikasyonunda, 0,262 F-makro və 0,801 RMSE'nin yarım Eval 2019 Task7'də səslər təsdiqləməsi işlərində başa düşdü.", 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যম অনলাইনে তথ্য অনুসন্ধানকারীদের প্রধান সম্পদের সংবাদ হিসেবে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিক তবে সামাজিক মিডিয়া প্ল্যাটফর্মের অসম্পূর্ণ বৈশিষ্ট্যের ফলে বের হয়ে যায় এবং বিশ্বাসযোগ্য বিষয়বস্তুর বিস্তৃতি ছড়িয়ে  Most of the current automated approaches for automatically determining the veracity of a rumor are not generalizable for novel emerging topics.  এই পত্রিকাটি আমাদের হাইব্রিড সিস্টেমের ব্যাখ্যা করছে যা নিয়ম এবং মেশিন শিক্ষা মডেল ব্যবহার করে উৎস টুইটের সত্যিকার পরিচয় করার জন এই কাগজটিতে প্রস্তাবিত সিস্টেম ০. 435 F-ম্যাক্রোর স্ট্যান্টিফিকেশন এবং 0. 262 F-ম্যাক্রো এবং 0. 801 রিএমএস ২০১৯ সেমইভাল ২০১৯ এর কাজের কাজে গুজব পরী', 'et': 'Sotsiaalmeedia mängib olulist rolli infootsijate peamise ressursiuudisena internetis. Sotsiaalmeedia platvormide modereerimata omadus toob siiski kaasa ebausaldusväärse sisu tekkimise ja leviku, mis kahjustab üksikisikuid või isegi ühiskondi. Enamik praeguseid automatiseeritud lähenemisviise kuulujutte tõesuse automaatseks kindlaksmääramiseks ei ole üldistatavad uute esilekerkivate teemade puhul. Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie hübriidsüsteemi, mis koosneb reeglitest ja masinõppe mudelist, mis kasutab vastanud säutseid lähtesäutsu õigsuse tuvastamiseks. Selles dokumendis pakutud süsteem saavutas SemEval 2019. aasta ülesandes 0,435 F-makro positsiooni klassifikatsioonis ning 0,262 F-makro ja 0,801 RMSE kuulujutte kontrollimise ülesannetes.', 'cs': 'Sociální média hrají klíčovou roli jako hlavní zdroj novinek pro hledající informace online. Nicméně, nemoderovaná vlastnost platformy sociálních médií vede k vzniku a šíření nedůvěryhodného obsahu, který poškozuje jednotlivce nebo dokonce společnosti. Většina současných automatizovaných přístupů pro automatické určování pravdivosti fámy není zobecněná pro nová vznikající témata. Tento článek popisuje náš hybridní systém zahrnující pravidla a model strojového učení, který využívá odpovědi tweetů k identifikaci pravdivosti zdrojového tweetu. Navržený systém v tomto článku dosáhl 0.435 F-Makro v klasifikaci postojů a 0.262 F-makro a 0.801 RMSE v úlohách ověřování fámů v Task7 of SemEval 2019.', 'fi': 'Sosiaalisella medialla on keskeinen rooli tiedonhakijoiden verkkouutisten tärkeimpänä resurssina. Sosiaalisen median alustojen moderoimaton ominaisuus johtaa kuitenkin epäluotettavan sisällön syntymiseen ja leviämiseen, joka vahingoittaa yksilöitä tai jopa yhteiskuntia. Useimmat nykyiset automaattiset lähestymistavat huhun totuudenmukaisuuden automaattiseen määrittämiseen eivät ole yleistettävissä uusille nouseville aiheille. Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan hybridijärjestelmäämme, joka koostuu säännöistä ja koneoppimismallista, joka hyödyntää vastattuja twiittejä lähdetwiitin todenmukaisuuden tunnistamiseksi. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotettu järjestelmä saavutti 0,435 F-Macro asentoluokittelussa ja 0,262 F-makro ja 0,801 RMSE huhujen todentamistehtävissä SemEval 2019:n tehtävässä 7.', 'jv': 'media sothik wong liya sing dikarol sing dikarepaké awak dhéwé kanggo ngilangno informasi online Kampédong, perusahaan sing gak nguasai perusahaan media-perusahaan sing bisa nguasai kapan lan nganggo perusahaan sing gak nglarani uwong sing nganggo perusahaan daho perusahaan sami. Banyak hal yang mempernik sistem sing otomatik kanggo ngubah gerakan kanggo ngerasah sing nganggo rumor gak bener Bino iki rambarang nggawe sistem Hybud sing dumadhi aturan karo model model sing nyimpen winih dhéwé nggawe sistem winih dhéwé kuwi nggawe sistem sing nyimpen winih dhéwé. Tanggal nggawe sistem ing pepulan iki nggawe luwih 0.luk F-macro ing barêng nggawe gerakan, lan 0.amber F-macro lan 0.', 'he': 'התקשורת החברתית משחקת תפקיד קריטי כחדשות המשאבים הראשיות עבור מחפשי מידע באינטרנט. בכל אופן, התחום הלא מוצד של מתקנות התקשורת החברתית מוביל לחוץ והתפוצץ של תוכן בלתי אמין שפגע באדם או אפילו בחברות. רוב גישות האוטומטיות הנוכחיות לקבוע באופן אוטומטי את האמת של שמועה אינן ניתנות לגנרליזציה עבור נושאים חדשים. העיתון הזה מתאר את מערכת היברידית שלנו המכילה חוקים ומודל ללמוד מכונות שמשתמש בטיוויטים שנענו כדי לזהות את האמת של הטיוויט המקורי. המערכת המוצעת בעיתון הזה השיגה 0.435 F-Macro בסיפור עמדה, ו-0.262 F-Macro ו-0.801 RMSE במשימות האמת שמועות במשימה 7 של SemEval 2019.', 'sk': 'Socialni mediji igrajo ključno vlogo kot glavni vir novic za iskalce informacij na spletu. Vendar pa neposredna značilnost platform socialnih medijev vodi do pojava in širjenja nezanesljivih vsebin, ki škodujejo posameznikom ali celo družbam. Večina trenutnih avtomatiziranih pristopov za samodejno določanje resničnosti govoric ni mogoče posplošiti za nove nastajajoče teme. V prispevku je opisan naš hibridni sistem, ki vključuje pravila in model strojnega učenja, ki uporablja odgovorjene tweete za ugotavljanje resničnosti izvornega tweeta. Predlagani sistem v tem prispevku je dosegel 0,435 F-makro pri klasifikaciji položaja in 0,262 F-makro in 0,801 RMSE pri nalogah preverjanja govoric v nalogi 7 SemEval 2019.', 'ha': "Shiryoyin mutane da jamii yana da wani role mai muhimu kamar muhimmin resource wa masu tambayar information masu shawara ne. Haƙĩƙa, tunkuɗe fasafan mitandai na jamii na ƙara bayan ta fita kuma ta wãtsa masu cikin abin da bã ya yi ĩmãni da shi wanda ke cũci mutane ko kuwa jama'a ko jama'a. Babu mafi yawan hanyoyin farat ɗaya da ake kai yanzu dõmin a ƙayyade gaskiya farat ɗaya ba za'a iya zama mai cire wa maɓallin yanzu masu sãbuwa na yanzu. Wannan takardan na bayyana tsarin Hybir da ke ƙunsa da kanuni da misalin zane-zane da ke amfani da watumin Twitter, dõmin ya gane gaskiyar Twitter. Ga wanda aka buƙata cikin wannan takarda, ya sãmu 0.435 F-Macro cikin fasalin istanci, da 0.263 F-macro da 0.81 RSM cikin aikin gaskiyar gaskiyar a Task7 na SemEV 2019.", 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ ཡིན་ནའང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གླེང་སྟེགས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་མེད་དུ་འདྲ་ཞིག་གིས་འཕྱུར་འགྱུར མིག་སྔར་གྱི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཡོད་པའི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་གཏམ་གཏམ་གླེང་ཐོག་པར་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་གཏན་ཁེལ་གྱི་བད ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་hybrid་གི་མ་ལག་གི་དུས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དང་མ་ལག་གི་ཁོངས་སྒྲིག་གི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཞིབ་ཡོད། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་དོན་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་ལག་གིས་0.435 F-Macro ཡིན་གནས་སྟངས་དབྱེ་བ་དང་། 0.262 F-macro དང་། 0.801 RMSE འོག་སྐབས་འཆར་བཀོད་བྱས་ཆོག་ཚོགས་'}
{'en': 'SINAI-DL at SemEval-2019 Task 7 : Data Augmentation and Temporal Expressions', 'ar': 'SINAI-DL في SemEval-2019 المهمة 7: زيادة البيانات والتعبيرات الزمنية', 'fr': 'SINAI-DL au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 7\xa0: Augmentation des données et expressions temporelles', 'es': 'SINAI-DL en SemEval-2019 Tarea 7: Aumento de datos y expresiones temporales', 'pt': 'SINAI-DL na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 7: Aumento de Dados e Expressões Temporais', 'ja': 'SINAI - DL at SemEval -2019 Task 7: Data Augmentation and Temporal Expression', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019务7上SINAI-DL:数增时表达式', 'ru': 'SINAI-DL в SemEval-2019 Задача 7: Увеличение данных и временные выражения', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 7 पर SINAI-DL: डेटा वृद्धि और अस्थायी अभिव्यक्तियाँ', 'ga': 'SINAI-DL ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 7: Méadú Sonraí agus Léirithe Ama', 'hu': 'SINAI-DL a SemEval-2019 7. feladat: Adatbővítés és időbeli kifejezések', 'el': 'Εργασία 7: Επέκταση δεδομένων και προσωρινές εκφράσεις', 'it': 'SINAI-DL al SemEval-2019 Task 7: Aumento dei dati ed espressioni temporali', 'mk': 'SINAI-DL на SemEval-2019 задача 7: Агментација на податоците и привремени изрази', 'kk': 'SINAI- DL жарым- 2019 тапсырмасы 7: Деректер авгументациясы және температуралық өрнектері', 'lt': 'SINAI-DL pusevalio 2019 m. 7 užduotis: Duomenų didinimas ir laikinasis išraiškas', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 7: ഡേറ്റാ ഓഗ്മെന്റേഷനും താമസിക വാക്കുകളും', 'mt': 'SINAI-DL f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 7: Aġġustament tad-dejta u Espressjonijiet Temporali', 'ka': 'Name', 'ms': 'SINAI-DL di SemEval-2019 Tugas 7: Pembesaran Data dan Ekspresi Temporal', 'no': 'SINAI-DL ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 7: Data Augmentation and Temporary Expressions', 'mn': 'SINAI-DL at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Data Augmentation and Temporal Expressions', 'pl': 'SINAI-DL w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 7: Rozszerzenie danych i wyrażenia czasowe', 'ro': 'SINAI-DL la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 7: Mărirea datelor și expresiile temporale', 'sr': 'SINAI-DL na semiEval-2019 Task 7: Augmentacija podataka i Temporalna izraza', 'si': 'SINAI-DL at HalfEvel-2019 Job 7: Data Agmentation and Temporal Expressions', 'so': 'SINAI-DL at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Data Augmentation and Temporal Expressions', 'sv': 'SINAI-DL på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 7: Dataökning och tidsuttryck', 'ur': 'SINAI-DL at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Data Augmentation and Temporal Expressions', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 7: தரவு கூட்டுதல் மற்றும் தற்காலிக கூறுதல்', 'uz': 'Vazifani 7: Maò¥lumot toò£gò£rilash va vaqt ifodalari', 'vi': 'SINAI-DL tại Nhiệm vụ Semkhai-thẩm 9: gia tăng dữ liệu và Ấn tượng thời gian', 'bg': 'Задача 7: Увеличаване на данните и времеви изрази', 'hr': 'SINAI-DL na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 7: povećanje podataka i Temporalne izraze', 'nl': 'SINAI-DL bij SemEval-2019 Taak 7: Data Augmentation en Temporale Expressies', 'da': 'SINAI-DL på SemEval-2019 Opgave 7: Dataudvidelse og tidsbegrænsede udtryk', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019 작업 7: 데이터 확장과 시제 표현', 'de': 'SINAI-DL bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabenstellung 7: Datenerweiterung und temporale Ausdrücke', 'id': 'SINAI-DL di SemEval-2019 Tugas 7: Data Augmentation and Temporal Expressions', 'sw': 'SINAI-DL katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 7: Kuongeza data na Maoni ya Muda', 'tr': 'SINAI-DL at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Data Augmentation and Temporal Expressions', 'af': 'SINAI- DL by SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 7: Data Augmentation and Temporal Expressions', 'am': 'ስራ 7: Data Augmentation and Temporal Expression', 'fa': 'Name', 'sq': 'SINAI-DL në SemEval-2019 Task 7: Data Augmentation and Temporal Expressions', 'hy': 'SINAI-DL at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Data Augmentation and Temporal Expressions', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2019 কাজ 7: ডাটা অ্যাগমেন্টেশন এবং Temporal expression', 'bs': 'SINAI-DL na semiEval-2019 zadatak 7: povećanje podataka i Temporalne izraze', 'ca': 'SINAI-DL a SemEval-2019 Task 7: Data Augmentation and Temporal Expressions', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Task 7: Data Augmentation and Temporal Expressions', 'fi': 'SINAI-DL SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 7: Tietojen lisääminen ja aikalausekkeet', 'cs': 'SINAI-DL na SemEval-2019 Úkol 7: Rozšíření dat a časové výrazy', 'et': 'SINAI-DL SemEval-2019 ülesanne 7: andmete suurendamine ja ajalised avaldised', 'jv': 'Language', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'SINAI-DL na SemEval-2019 Naloga 7: Povečanje podatkov in časovni izrazi', 'he': 'SINAI-DL ב SemEval-2019 משימה 7: גידול נתונים וביצעות זמניות', 'bo': 'SINAI-DL at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Data Augmentation and Temporal Expressions'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the participation of the SINAI-DL team at RumourEval (Task 7 in SemEval 2019, subtask A : SDQC). SDQC addresses the challenge of rumour stance classification as an indirect way of identifying potential rumours. Given a tweet with several replies, our system classifies each reply into either supporting, denying, questioning or commenting on the underlying rumours. We have applied data augmentation, temporal expressions labelling and transfer learning with a four-layer neural classifier. We achieve an accuracy of 0.715 with the official run over reply tweets.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe la participación del equipo de SINAI-DL en RumoureVal (Tarea 7 en SemEval 2019, subtarea A: SDQC). El SDQC aborda el desafío de la clasificación de la postura de los rumores como una forma indirecta de identificar posibles rumores. Dado un tuit con varias respuestas, nuestro sistema clasifica cada respuesta en apoyo, negación, cuestionamiento o comentario sobre los rumores subyacentes. Hemos aplicado el aumento de datos, el etiquetado de expresiones temporales y el aprendizaje de transferencia con un clasificador neuronal de cuatro capas. Logramos una precisión de 0.715 con los tuits oficiales de respuesta superados.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة مشاركة فريق SINAI-DL في RumourEval (المهمة 7 في SemEval 2019 ، المهمة الفرعية A: SDQC). يعالج SDQC التحدي المتمثل في تصنيف موقف الشائعات كطريقة غير مباشرة لتحديد الشائعات المحتملة. بالنظر إلى تغريدة مع عدة ردود ، يصنف نظامنا كل رد إلى إما دعم أو رفض أو استجواب أو تعليق على الشائعات الأساسية. لقد طبقنا زيادة البيانات ، ووضع العلامات على التعبيرات الزمنية ونقل التعلم باستخدام مصنف عصبي من أربع طبقات. نحقق دقة 0.715 مع التجاوز الرسمي لتغريدات الرد.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve a participação da equipe do SINAI-DL no RumourEval (Tarefa 7 no SemEval 2019, subtarefa A: SDQC). O SDQC aborda o desafio da classificação da postura de boatos como uma forma indireta de identificar possíveis rumores. Dado um tweet com várias respostas, nosso sistema classifica cada resposta em apoiar, negar, questionar ou comentar os rumores subjacentes. Aplicamos aumento de dados, rotulagem de expressões temporais e aprendizado de transferência com um classificador neural de quatro camadas. Alcançamos uma precisão de 0,715 com os tweets de resposta de atropelamento oficial.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit la participation de l'équipe SINAI-DL à RumourEval (tâche 7 dans SemEval 2019, sous-tâche A\xa0: SDQC). Le SDQC relève le défi de la classification de la position des rumeurs comme moyen indirect d'identifier les rumeurs potentielles. Compte tenu d'un tweet avec plusieurs réponses, notre système classe chaque réponse en soutenant, niant, questionnant ou commentant les rumeurs sous-jacentes. Nous avons appliqué l'augmentation des données, l'étiquetage des expressions temporelles et l'apprentissage par transfert avec un classificateur neuronal à quatre couches. Nous atteignons une précision de 0,715 avec les tweets de réponse officiels.", 'zh': '本文述SiNAI-DL团队在RumourEval者(SemEval 2019任7,子职A:SDQC)。 SDQC以挑战为识间接。 给定一条包数报之推文,我们的系统将每报分类为主,否,质疑或评论潜在的讹言。 应用数增强、时表达式标记、四层神经分类器迁学。 以官行复推文遂0.715之准确性。', 'ja': '本稿では， RumourEvalにおけるSINAI - DLチームの参加について述べる（ SINAI - DLチームはSemEval 2019のTask 7、サブタスクA ： SDQC ）。SDQCは、潜在的な噂を特定する間接的な方法として、噂のスタンス分類の課題に取り組んでいます。いくつかの返信があるツイートでは、当社のシステムはそれぞれの返信を、根底にある噂を支持、否定、疑問、またはコメントのいずれかに分類しています。データ拡張、時間的表現ラベリング、4層ニューラル分類器を使用した転移学習を適用しました。公式の返信ツイートで0.715の正確さを実現しています。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर अफवाह में सिनाई-डीएल टीम की भागीदारी का वर्णन करता है (SemEval 2019 में कार्य 7, सबटास्क ए: एसडीक्यूसी)। एसडीक्यूसी संभावित अफवाहों की पहचान करने के एक अप्रत्यक्ष तरीके के रूप में अफवाह रुख वर्गीकरण की चुनौती को संबोधित करता है। कई उत्तरों के साथ एक ट्वीट को देखते हुए, हमारी प्रणाली प्रत्येक उत्तर को अंतर्निहित अफवाहों का समर्थन करने, इनकार करने, पूछताछ करने या टिप्पणी करने में वर्गीकृत करती है। हमने डेटा वृद्धि, अस्थायी अभिव्यक्तियों को लेबलिंग और चार परत तंत्रिका क्लासिफायर के साथ सीखने को स्थानांतरित करने के लिए लागू किया है। हम जवाब tweets पर आधिकारिक रन के साथ 0.715 की सटीकता प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается участие команды SINAI-DL в RumourEval (Задача 7 в SemEval 2019, подзадача A: SDQC). SDQC решает проблему классификации позиции слухов как косвенный способ выявления потенциальных слухов. Учитывая твит с несколькими ответами, наша система классифицирует каждый ответ как поддерживающий, отрицающий, ставящий под сомнение или комментирующий лежащие в основе слухи. Мы применили усиление данных, маркировку временных выражений и обучение передаче с помощью четырехслойного нейронного классификатора. Мы достигаем точности 0,715 с официальными перебежками ответных твитов.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar rannpháirtíocht fhoireann SINAI-DL ag RumourEval (Tasc 7 i SemEval 2019, fothasc A: SDQC). Tugann an SDQC aghaidh ar an dúshlán a bhaineann le rangú ráflaí mar bhealach indíreach chun ráflaí féideartha a aithint. Nuair a chuirtear tweet le go leor freagraí, rangaíonn ár gcóras gach freagra mar thacaíocht, séanadh, ceistiú nó trácht ar na ráflaí bunúsacha. Chuireamar breisiú sonraí, lipéadú nathanna ama agus foghlaim aistrithe i bhfeidhm le haicmitheoir néaraíoch ceithre chiseal. Bainimid amach cruinneas 0.715 leis an rith oifigiúil thar tweets freagartha.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SINAI-DL csapat részvételét a RumourEval-on (7. feladat a SemEval 2019-ben, A. altfeladat: SDQC). Az SDQC foglalkozik azzal a kihívással, hogy a pletykák álláspontját mint a lehetséges pletykák azonosításának közvetett módjaként osztályozzák. A több választ tartalmazó tweet miatt rendszerünk minden választ támogatja, tagadja, megkérdőjelezi vagy kommentálja az alapul szolgáló pletykákat. Adatbővítést, időkifejezések címkézését és transzfer tanulást alkalmaztunk egy négyrétegű neurális osztályozóval. A hivatalos válasz tweetekkel 0,715 pontos pontosságot érünk el.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει τη συμμετοχή της ομάδας στο RumourEval (Εργασία 7 στο SemEval 2019, υποταγή Α: SDQC). Το SDQC αντιμετωπίζει την πρόκληση της ταξινόμησης της στάσης των φήμων ως έμμεσος τρόπος εντοπισμού πιθανών φήμων. Λαμβάνοντας υπόψη ένα tweet με αρκετές απαντήσεις, το σύστημά μας ταξινομεί κάθε απάντηση είτε σε υποστήριξη, άρνηση, αμφισβήτηση ή σχολιασμό των υποκείμενων φήμων. Εφαρμόσαμε αύξηση δεδομένων, σήμανση χρονικών εκφράσεων και μεταφορά μάθησης με έναν τετραστρωματικό νευρικό ταξινομητή. Επιτυγχάνουμε ακρίβεια 0.715 με τις επίσημες απαντήσεις.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive la partecipazione del team SINAI-DL a RumourEval (Task 7 in SemEval 2019, sottotask A: SDQC). SDQC affronta la sfida della classificazione delle posizioni di rumour come un modo indiretto per identificare potenziali rumors. Dato un tweet con diverse risposte, il nostro sistema classifica ogni risposta in supporto, negazione, interrogazione o commento sulle voci sottostanti. Abbiamo applicato l'aumento dei dati, l'etichettatura delle espressioni temporali e l'apprendimento del trasferimento con un classificatore neurale a quattro strati. Otteniamo una precisione di 0.715 con i tweet ufficiali di risposta run over.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз RumourEval (2019 жылы семEval 7- тапсырмасында, A: SDQC асты сұрақ) SINAI- DL тобының қатынасын анықтайды. SDQC жағдай жағдай жағдай жағдай жағдай жағдайларды таңдау үшін бұл жағдайларды бақылайды. Бірнеше жауап берген tweet болса, жүйеміздің әрбір жауапты қолдау, қабылдау, сұрақтау немесе түсініктемелерімізге сәйкес береді. Біз деректерді көбейту, уақытша өрнектерді белгілеу және төрт қабатты неврал классификациясы менен үйренуді қолдандық. Біз 0,715 жауаптарды жауап тәртіптерінің оқиғасы бар.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašomas SINAI-DL grupės dalyvavimas RumourEval (7 užduotis 2019 m. puslapyje, A paklausa: SDQC). SDQC sprendžia gandų pozicijos klasifikavimo iššūkį kaip netiesioginį būdą nustatyti galimus gandus. Atsižvelgiant į tweet ą su keliais atsakymais, mūsų sistema kiekvieną atsakymą klasifikuoja kaip palaikymą, atsisakymą, klausimus ar komentarus dėl pagrindinių gandų. Taikėme duomenų didinimą, laiko išraiškų ženklinimą ir mokymąsi perdavimą keturių sluoksnių nervų klasifikatoriumi. We achieve an accuracy of 0.715 with the official run over reply tweets.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува учеството на тимот SINAI-DL во RumourEval (задача 7 во SemEval 2019, подпрашање А: SDQC). СДК го решава предизвикот на класификацијата на гласините како индиректен начин за идентификување на потенцијалните гласини. Со оглед на твитот со неколку одговори, нашиот систем го класификува секој одговор во поддршка, негирање, испрашување или коментар за основните гласини. Имаме примено зголемување на податоците, означување на временски изрази и трансфер на учење со четири нивоа нервен класификатор. Ние постигнуваме точност од 0,715 со официјалниот преглед на твитови за одговори.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი აღწერს SINAI-DL ჯგუფის მოწყობილობა RumourEval-ში (საქმე 7-ში SemEval 2019-ში, A: SDQC-ში). SDQC მისაღება პოტენციალური სიტყვების კლასიფიკაციის განსაზღვრების განსაზღვრებას როგორც კონდირეტური გზა პოტენციალური სიტყვების განსაზღვრებას. ჩვენი სისტემა კლასიფიკურია ყოველ პასუხში, რომელიც დაეხმარება, განაკითხვა, კითხვა ან კომენტირება ჩვენი სისტემაში. ჩვენ მომხმარებული მონაცემების აგგენტაცია, ტემპალური გამოსახულებები მართლად და ტრანსტრინციის სწავლება 4-layer ნეიროლური კლასიფიკაცია. ეჲჟრигნაჳმვ ოპაგთლნჲჟრ ჲრ 0,715 ჟ ჲტთუთალნთწ ოპჲეყლზვნ ჲრდჲგჲპ.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d റുമോര്\u200dഎവാലിലെ SINAI-DL ടീമിലെ പങ്കെടുക്കുന്നതിനെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു (സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019-ലെ ടാസ്ക് 7, സബ്ബ്ബ എസ്ഡിക്യൂസി വ്യാജസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ വ്യാല്\u200dക്രമത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നു കുറച്ചു ഉത്തരങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം ടൂട്ടിയിട്ട്, നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നത്, പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നത്, നിഷ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dത്തിട്ടുണ്ട്, സമയാവസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ചിഹ്നമാക്കുകയും നാല് ലേഡില്\u200d നെയൂറല്\u200d ക് We achieve an accuracy of 0.715 with the official run over reply tweets.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас RumourEval-ын SINAI-DL багийн оролцоог тайлбарлаж байна (SemEval 2019 оны 7-р ажил, A: SDQC доор асуулт). SDQC зөвшөөрөл байдлын тухай сорилтуудыг тодорхойлох буруу арга гэж хэлж байна. Бидний систем хэдэн хариулттай тууйтаар хариулт бүрийг дэмжиж, буруутгаж, асууж, эсвэл сэтгэлгээний тухай хуваалцдаг. Бид өгөгдлийн нэмэлт, цаг хугацааны илэрхийлэл, сургалтыг 4 давхар тархины хэлбэртэй шилжүүлсэн. Бид 0.715-ын тодорхойлолтой хариултын tweets дээр албан ёсны тусламжтайгаар гарч ирсэн.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver deltakaren av SINAI-DL-gruppa i RumourEval (oppgåve 7 i semiEval 2019, subtspør A: SDQC). SDQC adresserer utfordringen til å klassifisera rumorestasjonen som ein indirekt måte å identifisera potensielle rumorer. Giv eit tweet med fleire svar, klassifiserer systemet vårt kvar svar på anten støttar, nektar, spørjingar eller kommentarar på underliggende rumorene. Vi har brukt data augmentasjon, mellombels uttrykk som merker og overfører læring med ein fire lag neuralklassifiserer. Vi oppnår eit nøyaktig av 0,715 med den offisielle køyren over svartweeter.', 'mt': 'This paper describes the participation of the SINAI-DL team at RumourEval (Task 7 in SemEval 2019, subtask A: SDQC).  SDQC addresses the challenge of rumour stance classification as an indirect way of identifying potential rumours.  Minħabba tweet b’diversi tweġibiet, is-sistema tagħna tikklassifika kull tweġiba f’appoġġ, ċa ħda, mistoqsijiet jew kummenti dwar is-rumori sottostanti. Applikajna żieda fid-dejta, tikkettar ta’ espressjonijiet temporali u tagħlim ta’ trasferiment b’klassifikatur newrali ta’ erba’ saffi. Aħna nilħqu preċiżjoni ta’ 0.715 bit-twettiq uffiċjali fuq it-twittijiet tat-tweġibiet.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje udział zespołu SINAI-DL w RumourEval (Zadanie 7 w SemEval 2019, podzadanie A: SDQC). SDQC odnosi się do wyzwania klasyfikacji stanowiska plotek jako pośredniego sposobu identyfikacji potencjalnych plotek. Biorąc pod uwagę tweet z kilkoma odpowiedziami, nasz system klasyfikuje każdą odpowiedź na wspieranie, zaprzeczanie, kwestionowanie lub komentowanie podstawowych plotek. Zastosowaliśmy rozszerzenie danych, etykietowanie wyrażeń czasowych i transfer nauki za pomocą czterowarstwowego klasyfikatora neuronowego. Osiągamy dokładność 0.710 dzięki oficjalnym tweetom typu run over reply.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea descrie participarea echipei SINAI-DL la RumourEval (Sarcina 7 SemEval 2019, subsarcina A: SDQC). SDQC abordează provocarea clasificării poziției zvonurilor ca o modalitate indirectă de identificare a zvonurilor potențiale. Având în vedere un tweet cu mai multe răspunsuri, sistemul nostru clasifică fiecare răspuns în susținerea, negarea, interogarea sau comentarea zvonurilor subiacente. Am aplicat mărirea datelor, etichetarea expresiilor temporale și transferul de învățare cu un clasificator neural cu patru straturi. Obținem o precizie de 0.715 cu tweeturile oficiale de răspuns rulate peste.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sudjelovanje tima SINAI-DL u RumourEval (zadatak 7 u poluvali 2019, podpitanje A: SDQC). SDQC se obraæa izazovu klasifikacije glasina kao indirektan način identifikacije potencijalnih glasina. S obzirom na tweet sa nekoliko odgovora, naš sistem klasifikuje svaki odgovor na podršku, poricanje, ispitivanje ili komentaciju o temeljnim glasinama. Primijenili smo povećanje podataka, temporalne izraze označavanja i prebacivanje učenja sa neuralnim klasifikatorom na četiri slojeva. Postigli smo taènost od 0,715 sa službenim trkom nad tweetom odgovora.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුව ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා සිනායි-DL කණ්ඩායම Ruminaeval (සෙම්වේල් 2019 වල වැඩේ 7, A: SDQC සබ්ප්\u200dරශ්න). SDQC ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හඳුනාගන්න පුළුවන් කතාවක් විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා. ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් විතරයි, අපේ පද්ධතිය හැම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක්ම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක්ම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙනවා, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ප්\u200d අපි දත්ත විශාලනය, කාලයික ප්\u200dරවේශනය ලේබල් කරනවා සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය හතරක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා. අපි 0,715 ක් හරියට හරියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ටුයිට් එක්ක පටන් ගත්තා.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver SINAI-DL-teamets deltagande i RumourEval (Uppgift 7 i SemEval 2019, underuppgift A: SDQC). SDQC tar itu med utmaningen att klassificera rykten som ett indirekt sätt att identifiera potentiella rykten. Med en tweet med flera svar klassificerar vårt system varje svar i antingen att stödja, förneka, ifrågasätta eller kommentera de underliggande ryktena. Vi har tillämpat dataförstoring, tidsuttryck märkning och transfer learning med en fyra-lagers neural klassificering. Vi uppnår en noggrannhet på 0,715 med de officiella run over svar tweets.', 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaa ku qoran qayb ka qeybqaadashada kooxda SINAI-DL ee RumourEval (shaqo 7 ku qoran SemEval 2019, Subfus A: SDQC). SDQC wuxuu u macaamiloodaa dhibaatada fasaxa xaaladda warqada ah sida qaab toos ah oo loo caddeeyo warqada suurtagalka ah. Sida uu Twitteet ku qoray jawaabo badan, nidaamkayaga ayaa kooxa jawaab kasta oo ka mid ah inay taageeraan, injiidaan, su'aalaan ama ka fikiraan hadalka hooseeya. Waxaannu codsannay kordhiska macluumaadka, ku qoran hadalka waqtiga ah oo lagu qorayo barashada koorasyada neurada ee afar daraf ah. Waxaannu heli karnaa saxda 0.715, haddii dowladu uu u gudbiyo tweetiyada jawaabta.", 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தின் SINAI- DL குழுவின் பகிர்ந்தளிப்பு (செம்Eval 2019ல் செம்வால் 7 பணி A: SDQC) என்பதை குறிப்பிடுகிறது. எஸ்டிகியூசி வாய்ப்பு நிலை வகைப்படுத்தலின் சவால்பாட்டை ஒரு சாதாரண குறிப்புகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க ஒரு நேரடியான வழ பல பதில்களுடன் ஒரு தொடர்பு கொண்டு, எங்கள் கணினி வகைப்படுத்தும் ஒவ்வொரு பதிலையும் ஆதரிக்க, மறுத்து, கேள்வி அல்லது குறிப்பிடு நாம் நான்கு அடுக்கு நெருக்கல் வகுப்பாளர் மூலம் தகவல் கூட்டுதல், தற்காலிக க வெளிப்பாட்டு கூறுகளை குறிப்பிட்டு கற்றல்  We achieve an accuracy of 0.715 with the official run over reply tweets.', 'ur': 'This paper describes the participation of the SINAI-DL team at RumourEval (Task 7 in SemEval 2019, subtask A: SDQC). SDQC شائستہ شائستہ صحیفوں کی شناسایی کا ایک غیر مستقل طریقہ ہے۔ چند جواب کے ساتھ ایک ٹویٹ کے ذریعہ سے ہماری سیستم ہر جواب کو پشتیبانی، انکار، سوال یا مثال کے ذریعہ تہمت دیتا ہے. ہم نے ایک چار لائر نیورال کلاسیر کے ساتھ ڈیٹا اضافہ کرنا، ٹیمٹرال اضافہ لیبل کرنا اور ترنسیٹ سیکھنا لائق کیا ہے. ہم 0.715 کی دقیقیت حاصل کرتے ہیں جواب ٹویٹوں پر رسمی چلنے کے ساتھ۔', 'ms': 'This paper describes the participation of the SINAI-DL team at RumourEval (Task 7 in SemEval 2019, subtask A: SDQC).  SDQC mengatasi cabaran dari klasifikasi posisi khabar angin sebagai cara langsung untuk mengenali khabar angin yang berpotensi. Berdasarkan tweet dengan beberapa jawapan, sistem kita mengklasifikasikan setiap jawapan menjadi sokongan, menolak, menanyakan atau komentar tentang khabar angin yang mendasarkan. Kami telah melaksanakan peningkatan data, penanda ungkapan sementara dan pembelajaran pemindahan dengan klasifikasi saraf empat lapisan. Kami mencapai ketepatan 0.715 dengan pemeriksaan rasmi atas tweet jawapan.', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả sự tham gia của nhóm SINAI-DL tại RumourEvol (Nhiệm vụ 7 in SemEvl 209, subtque A: SDQC). SDQC chấp nhận thách thức về mật khẩu tin đồn như một cách gián tiếp xác định nguồn tin đồn tiềm năng. Do một cái tweet với nhiều câu trả lời, hệ thống của chúng ta phân loại mỗi câu trả lời về việc hỗ trợ, phủ nhận, thẩm vấn hay bình luận về những tin đồn tiềm ẩn. Chúng tôi đã áp dụng lượng dữ liệu gia tăng, nhãn biểu tượng thời gian và học cách truyền tải với phân loại thần kinh bốn lớp. Chúng ta đạt được độ chính xác 0.715 khi chính thức lướt trên các tweet trả lời.', 'uz': "Бу саҳифа RumourEval SINAI-DL жамиятининг шерик бўлишини баён қилади (SDQC, SemEval 2019 tub vazifa A: SemEval 2019 yilda 7 ish (SDQC). Name Bir nechta javob beradigan Twitteet bilan, bizning tizimmiz asosiy so'zlarni qoʻllash, qoʻllash, soʻrov yoki izohlash uchun har bir javob beradi. We have applied data augmentation, temporal expressions labelling and transfer learning with a four-layer neural classifier.  Biz tashkilotlarni javob etishda 0.715 tashkilotga erishimiz.", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва участието на екипа на СИНАИ-ДЛ в РумурЕвал (Задача 7 в СемЕвал 2019, подзадача А: СДК). СДКК разглежда предизвикателството на класификацията на позицията на слуховете като индиректен начин за идентифициране на потенциални слухове. Предвид туит с няколко отговора, нашата система класифицира всеки отговор в подкрепа, отричане, разпит или коментар на основните слухове. Приложихме увеличаване на данните, етикетиране на времевите изрази и трансферно обучение с четирислоен невронен класификатор. Ние постигаме точност от 0.715 с официалния преглед на отговорите туитове.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft de deelname van het SINAI-DL team aan RumourEval (Taak 7 in SemEval 2019, subtaak A: SDQC). SDQC pakt de uitdaging aan om geruchtstandpunten te classificeren als een indirecte manier om potentiële geruchten te identificeren. Op basis van een tweet met meerdere antwoorden classificeert ons systeem elk antwoord in ondersteuning, ontkennen, vragen of commentaar op de onderliggende geruchten. We hebben data augmentatie, temporele expressies labeling en transfer learning toegepast met een vierlaagse neurale classificator. We bereiken een nauwkeurigheid van 0.710 met de officiële run over reply tweets.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje učestvovanje tima SINAI-DL u RumourEval (zadatak 7 u semiEvalu 2019, podpitanje A: SDQC). SDQC rješava izazov klasifikacije glasina za poziciju kao indirektan način identifikacije potencijalnih glasina. S obzirom na tweet sa nekoliko odgovora, naš sustav povezuje svaki odgovor u podršku, poricanje, ispitivanje ili komentacije o temeljnim glasinama. Primijenili smo povećanje podataka, temporalne izraze označavanja i učenje prijenosa s četiri slojeva neuralnog klasifikatora. Postigli smo preciznost od 0,715 sa zvaničnim trčanjem nad tweetom odgovora.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver deltagelsen af SINAI-DL-teamet på RumourEval (Opgave 7 i SemEval 2019, underopgave A: SDQC). SDQC tager fat på udfordringen med klassificering af rygter som en indirekte måde at identificere potentielle rygter på. Givet et tweet med flere svar klassificerer vores system hvert svar i enten støtte, benægtelse, spørgsmål eller kommentarer til de underliggende rygter. Vi har anvendt dataforøgelse, tidsmærkning og overførsel af læring med en firelags neural klassificering. Vi opnår en nøjagtighed på 0,715 med de officielle gennemkørte svar tweets.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt die Beteiligung des SINAI-DL Teams an RumourEval (Aufgabe 7 in SemEval 2019, Teilaufgabe A: SDQC). SDQC befasst sich mit der Herausforderung der Klassifizierung von Gerüchten als indirekter Weg, potenzielle Gerüchte zu identifizieren. Bei einem Tweet mit mehreren Antworten klassifiziert unser System jede Antwort entweder in Unterstützung, Ablehnung, Befragung oder Kommentierung der zugrunde liegenden Gerüchte. Wir haben Daten Augmentation, Temporal Expressions Labeling und Transfer Learning mit einem vierschichtigen neuronalen Klassifikator angewendet. Wir erreichen eine Genauigkeit von 0.710 mit den offiziellen Run Over Antworttweets.', 'id': 'This paper describes the participation of the SINAI-DL team at RumourEval (Task 7 in SemEval 2019, subtask A: SDQC).  SDQC mengatasi tantangan dari klasifikasi posisi rumor sebagai cara indirekt untuk mengidentifikasi rumor potensial. Berdasarkan tweet dengan beberapa jawaban, sistem kita mengklasifikasi setiap jawaban menjadi mendukung, menyangkal, mempertanyakan atau komentar tentang rumor yang didasarkan. Kami telah menerapkan peningkatan data, ekspresi temporal label dan transfer belajar dengan 4 lapisan klasifikasi saraf. Kami mencapai akurasi 0,715 dengan pemeriksaan resmi atas tweet jawaban.', 'ko': '본고는 시네반도-DL팀의 Rumbeval 참여 상황(2019년 SemEval 퀘스트 7, 하위 퀘스트 A:SDQC)을 묘사한다.SDQC는 유언비어의 입장을 잠재적 유언비어를 식별하는 일종의 간접적인 방법으로 분류해 이 도전을 해결했다.여러 개의 답장을 포함하는 트윗을 드리겠습니다. 저희 시스템은 모든 답장을 지원, 부인, 질의, 잠재적인 루머로 나눈다.우리는 4층 신경 분류기로 데이터 강화, 시제 표현식 표기와 전이 학습을 응용했다.공식적인 반복적인 답변 트윗을 통해 우리의 정확도는 0.715에 달했다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea ushiriki wa timu ya SINAI-DL kwenye RumourEval (Kazi 7 jijini SemEval 2019, ujumbe wa subira A: SDQC). SDQC inazungumzia changamoto ya utangazaji wa ukweli kama njia ya moja kwa moja ya kutambua tetesi zinazowezekana. Kutokana na twiti yenye majibu kadhaa, mfumo wetu unafafanua kila jibu la kuunga mkono, kukataa, kuuliza au kutoa maoni juu ya uvumi wa msingi. Tumetumia kuongeza taarifa, hisia za muda zinazoonyesha na kuhamisha kujifunza kwa daraja la neura nne. Tunapata uhakika wa 0.715 kwa kutumia twiti za rasmi zinazotumika.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ مشارکت تیم SINAI-DL در RumourEval (Task 7 in SemEval 2019, subtask A: SDQC) را توصیف می\u200cکند. SDQC با چالش شرایط شایعه\u200cها به عنوان راهی غیرمستقیم برای شناسایی شایعه\u200cهای پتانسیل مشخص می\u200cشود. با توجه به tweet با چند جواب، سیستم ما هر جواب را به پشتیبانی، انکار، سوال یا توضیح دادن شایعه\u200cهای زیر محرمانه می\u200cکند. ما افزایش داده\u200cها، علامت\u200cهای موقتی\u200cها و یادگیری\u200cهای انتقال با یک کلیسار عصبی چهار طبقه\u200cای کاربرد کردیم. ما دقيقاً 0.715 رو با تويت هاي رسمي به دست آورديم', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die deelnadering van die SINAI-DL-span by RumourEval (Opdrag 7 in SemEval 2019, ondersoek A: SDQC). SDQC adres die uitdrukking van rumour staanse klasifikasie as 'n indirekte manier om potensiele rumours te identifiseer. As 'n tweet met verskeie antwoordes gegee, klassifiseer ons stelsel elke antwoord in of ondersteunde, ontken, vraag of kommentaar op die ondersteunde rumours. Ons het toepassing van data augmentasie, tydelike uitdrukkings merkeling en oordrag leer met 'n vier- laag neural klassifiseerder. Ons bereik 'n presisie van 0,715 met die offisiele loop oor antwoord tweets.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan pjesëmarrjen e ekipit SINAI-DL në RumourEval (Detyra 7 në SemEval 2019, nënpyetje A: SDQC). SDQC addresses the challenge of rumour stance classification as an indirect way of identifying potential rumours.  Duke u dhënë një tweet me disa përgjigje, sistemi ynë klasifikon çdo përgjigje në mbështetje, mohim, pyetje apo komentim mbi thashethemet themelore. Kemi aplikuar rritjen e të dhënave, etiketën e shprehjeve temporale dhe transferimin e mësimit me një klasifikues nervor katër nivele. Ne arrijmë një saktësi prej 0.715 me kalimin zyrtar të tweeteve të përgjigjeve.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የSINAI-DL ቡድን በሮሙርEval (ስራ 7 በSemEval 2019 ታቦት አ: SDQC) ተግባር ይናገራል፡፡ SDQC የውይይት ሁኔታ መፍረስ የቻለኝነት ውሸቶችን ለማግኘት የግለጽ መንገድ ነው፡፡ በብዙ መልዕክቶች በተሰጠ፣ የስርዓታችን መልስ እያንዳንዳችን ለመደገፍ ወይም ለመደገፍ፣ ለመጠየቅ ወይም ለመጠየቅ ትምህርት በማድረግ ትዊተር ላይ ይደጋግፋል፡፡ የዳታ አካባቢ፣ የጊዜው አካላት እና የተማርነውን በአራት ደረጃዎች የነጥብ ክፍተት ለመለስ አለብን፡፡ ባለሥልጣናት በመለስ ትዊተሮች ላይ የሚሮጡትን የ0.715 እርግጠኛ አግኝተናል፡፡', 'tr': "Bu kagyz RumourEval'da SINAI-DL toparyň chikanchasyny (Task 7 in SemEval 2019, subtask A: SDQC) hasaplaýar. SDQC aýytlary tanyşdyrmak üçin aýytlaryň kynçylygyny çykarýar. Týuterimiz birnäçe jogaba görä, sistemamyzyň her jogabyny destekleýän, boýunça, soraglama ýa-da a şakdaky aýdyşylar barada synplanlaýar. Biz maglumat ýetişimi, zamanla ifadeleri etitlendirmek we öwrenmek üçin dört katlak neural klasifikaty bilen üýtgedik. Biz 0,715 ýagdaýynda resmi tuýtlar bilen dogry gazandyk.", 'hy': 'This paper describes the participation of the SINAI-DL team at RumourEval (Task 7 in SemEval 2019, subtask A: SDQC).  ՍԴՔ-ը լուծում է հնչյունների դիրքի դասակարգման մարտահրավերը որպես ներուժեղ հնչյուններ հայտնաբերելու միջոց: Հետևաբար մի թվիթ ունի բազմաթիվ պատասխաններ, մեր համակարգը դասակարգում է յուրաքանչյուր պատասխան կամ աջակցելու, մերժելու, հարցաքննության կամ մեկնաբանելու մասին: Մենք կիրառել ենք տվյալների աճը, ժամանակական արտահայտությունները նշանակելով և փոխանցելով ուսումնասիրությունը չորս շերտերի նյարդային դասակարգում: Մենք հասնում ենք 0,715 ճշգրտության պատասխանների թվիթերի վերաբերյալ:', 'az': "Bu kağıt RumourEval'da SINAI-DL takımının paylaşışılığını (7. Task in SemEval 2019, A: SDQC subtask). SDQC səslərinin vəziyyətini müəyyən etməsini potansiyel səslərini tanıma yolu kimi dəyişdirir. Bir neçə cavab verilmiş tweet sayəsində, sistemimiz hər cavabı dəstəkləndirir, inkar edir, sorğu-sual edir və ya düzgün davranışlar barəsində komentar edir. Biz məlumatları artırmaq, zamanlı ifadələr etiketləmək və öyrənmək üçün dörd katlı nöral klasifikatıyla istifadə etdik. Biz 0,715 ilə cavab tweetlərinin üstündə ofisial tələb etdiyimiz doğruluğu başa çatdıq.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sudjelovanje tima SINAI-DL u RumourEval (zadatak 7 u semiEvalu 2019, podpitanje A: SDQC). SDQC rješava izazov klasifikacije glasina u poziciji kao indirektan način identifikacije potencijalnih glasina. S obzirom na tweet sa nekoliko odgovora, naš sistem povezuje svaki odgovor u podršku, poricanje, ispitivanje ili komentacije o temeljnim glasinama. Primijenili smo povećanje podataka, temporalne izraze označavanja i učenje prijenosa sa neuralnim klasifikatorom četiri slojeva. Postigli smo preciznost od 0,715 sa zvaničnim trčanjem nad tweetom odgovora.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা রুমুরেভালের সিনাআই-ডিএল দলের অংশগ্রহণের ব্যাখ্যা করছে (সেমইভাল ২০১৯ সালের সাবকাজ A: এসডিকিউসি)। এসডিকিউসি গুজবের অবস্থান বিভাগের চ্যালেঞ্জের কথা বলেছে যে সম্ভাব্য গুজব পরিচিত করার একটি পরিচালিত উপায় হিসেবে। বেশ কয়েকটি উত্তর দিয়ে আমাদের সিস্টেম প্রত্যেকেই সমর্থন, সমর্থন, অস্বীকার করে, প্রশ্ন করা অথবা গুজবের উপর মন্তব্য করে। আমরা তথ্য যোগাযোগ, সাময়িক প্রকাশ এবং চারটি স্তরের নিউরেল বিভাগের সাথে শিক্ষা প্রদান করেছি। সরকারি প্রতিক্রিয়ার টুইটের উপর পালানোর সময় আমরা ০. ৭১৫ এর সঠিকভাবে অর্জন করি।', 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu la participació de l'equip SINAI-DL a RumourEval (tasca 7 a SemEval 2019, subtanya A: SDQC). SDQC aborda el repte de la classificació de la posició rumorosa com una manera indirecta d'identificar rumors potencials. Dant un tweet amb diverses respostes, el nostre sistema classifica cada resposta en suport, negació, interrogatori o comentari sobre els rumors subjacents. Hem aplicat augment de dades, etiquetar expressions temporals i transferir aprenentatge amb un classificador neural de quatre capes. Obtenim una precisió de 0,715 amb la revisió oficial dels tweets de resposta.", 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse SINAI-DL meeskonna osalemist RumourEvalis (ülesanne 7 SemEval 2019, alaülesanne A: SDQC). SDQC käsitleb kuulujuttude seisukoha klassifitseerimise väljakutset kui kaudset viisi potentsiaalsete kuulujuttude tuvastamiseks. Arvestades mitme vastusega säutsu, liigitab meie süsteem iga vastuse aluseks olevate kuulujuttude toetamiseks, eitamiseks, küsitlemiseks või kommenteerimiseks. Oleme rakendanud andmete suurendamist, ajaväljendite märgistamist ja ülekandeõpet neljakihilise närviklassifikaatori abil. Me saavutame täpsuse 0,715 ametliku vastuse säutsudega.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan SINAI-DL-tiimin osallistumista RumourEvaliin (tehtävä 7 SemEval 2019, alatehtävä A: SDQC). SDQC käsittelee huhukannan luokittelun haastetta epäsuorana keinona tunnistaa mahdolliset huhut. Kun twiitti sisältää useita vastauksia, järjestelmämme luokittelee jokaisen vastauksen joko tukemaan, kieltämään, kyseenalaistamaan tai kommentoimaan taustalla olevia huhuja. Olemme soveltaneet datan lisäämistä, aikailmausten merkitsemistä ja siirtooppimista nelikerroksisella neuroluokittimella. Saavutamme 0,715 tarkkuuden virallisilla reply tweeteillä.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje účast týmu SINAI-DL na RumourEvalu (Úkol 7 v SemEvalu 2019, podúkol A: SDQC). SDQC řeší výzvu klasifikace postojů zvěstí jako nepřímého způsobu identifikace potenciálních zvěstí. Vzhledem k tomu, že tweet obsahuje několik odpovědí, náš systém klasifikuje každou odpověď buď do podpory, popírání, dotazování nebo komentování základních zvěstí. Aplikovali jsme rozšíření dat, značení časových výrazů a transferové učení pomocí čtyřvrstvého neuronového klasifikátoru. Dosahujeme přesnosti 0.710 s oficiálními tweety běžícími přes odpověď.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki rambarang panjenengan kelompok sing nggawe Perintah-DL sing nyebutne ning Rluscobalé (Job 7 ing semiinval 2011, basa A: sdqC). Attribute Ngerti tuwit karo akeh gambaran, sistem dhéwé kelas barang bisa ngubah dhéwé section Awak dhéwé éntuk negori perusahaan 0.1', 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisano sodelovanje ekipe SINAI-DL v RumourEvalu (naloga 7 v SemEvalu 2019, podnaloga A: SDQC). SDQC obravnava izziv klasifikacije stališča govoric kot posredni način prepoznavanja morebitnih govoric. Glede na tvit z več odgovori, naš sistem vsak odgovor razvršča v podporo, zanikanje, vprašanje ali komentiranje temeljnih govoric. Uporabili smo povečanje podatkov, označevanje časovnih izrazov in učenje prenosa s štiriklojnim nevronskim klasifikatorjem. Z uradnim preverjanjem odgovornih tweetov dosežemo natančnost 0,715.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana shirin na team na SNAI-DL at Rumoureval (Tafiyar 7 in Semeval 2019, sub-aikin A: SDQC). @ info Ga da wani na'ura ta ƙara da wasu majiɓinta, na'uranmu yana rarraba kowace matsayi zuwa ƙarami, ko kuma yana ƙarfafa, yin tambaya, ko kuma ya yi izni ga rumors masu ƙaranci. Mun sami ƙaramako da data, da shiryoyin ayuka masu lokaci da za'a yi amfani da wani mai daraja na rubutu na huɗu. We achieve an accuracy of 0.715 with the official run over reply tweets.", 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את השתתפות של צוות SINAI-DL ב RumourEval (משימה 7 בסימEval 2019, subtask A: SDQC). SDQC מתמודד עם האתגר של מסווג עמדת השמועות כדרך לא ישירה לזהות שמועות פוטנציאליות. בהתחשב בטיוויט עם מספר תשובות, המערכת שלנו מסווג כל תשובה לתמיכה, הכחישה, חקירה או הערה על השמועות הנוכחיות. השתמשנו במידע מגדל, ביטויים זמניים, סימנים ולהעברות למידה עם מסווג עצבי של ארבע שכבות. We achieve an accuracy of 0.715 with the official run over reply tweets.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་RumourEval(Task 7 in SemEval 2019, subtask A: SDQC) གྱི་ཚོགས་ཁང་གི་ནང་དུ་SINAI-DL གནད་དོན་གྱི་ནང་དུ་འགྲོ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་སྟེ། SDQC ནི་ཕན་ཐོག་པའི་དཀྲོག་གཏམ་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་དམིགས་བསལ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཁྱད་དུ་འཚར་བ། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚང་གཅིག་གི་ཚབ་ལ་ལན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡིན། We have applied data augmentation, temporal expressions labelling and transfer learning with a four-layer neural classifier. ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་འབྲེལ་གྱི་གཡུལ་འགྲོ་བར་དྲ་ཐོག་ཏུ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་འགྱུར་བ་ཐད།'}
{'en': 'UPV-28-UNITO at SemEval-2019 Task 7 : Exploiting Post’s Nesting and Syntax Information for Rumor Stance Classification', 'fr': "UPV-28-UNITO au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 7\xa0: Exploiter les informations d'imbrication et de syntaxe de Post pour la classification des positions de rumeur", 'ar': 'UPV-28-UNITO في SemEval-2019 المهمة 7: استغلال المعلومات النحوية والتداخل في Post لتصنيف موقف الشائعات', 'es': 'La UPV-28-UNITO en la Tarea 7 de SemEval-2019: Explotación de la información de anidamiento y sintaxis de Post para la clasificación de posturas de rumores', 'pt': 'UPV-28-UNITO na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 7: Explorando as Informações de Aninhamento e Sintaxe do Post para Classificação de Postura de Rumor', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のUPV -28 - UNITOタスク7 ：噂のスタンス分類のためのPostの入れ子と構文情報の利用', 'zh': 'UPV-28-UNITO在SemEval-2019务7:因Post嵌套语法信以讹言', 'ru': 'UPV-28-UNITO на SemEval-2019 Задача 7: Использование информации о вложенности и синтаксисе сообщения для классификации позиции слухов', 'hi': 'UPV-28-UNITO सेमेवल-2019 टास्क 7 पर: अफवाह रुख वर्गीकरण के लिए पोस्ट के घोंसले और वाक्यविन्यास जानकारी का शोषण करना', 'ga': 'UPV-28-UNITO ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 7: Leas a bhaint as Faisnéis Neadaithe agus Comhréire an Phoist le haghaidh Aicmiú Seasaimh Rumor', 'ka': 'UPV-28-UNITO semiEval-2019 დავალება 7: პოსტის შემდეგ და სინტაქსი ინფორმაცია სტანსის კლასიფიკაციაციაზე', 'hu': 'UPV-28-UNITO a SemEval-2019 7. feladat: A posták fészkelésére és szintaxisára vonatkozó információk kiaknázása a pletykák helyzetének besorolásához', 'el': 'Εργασία 7: Εκμετάλλευση των πληροφοριών για τη φωλιά και τη σύνταξη του σταθμού για την ταξινόμηση της θέσης των φήμων', 'it': 'UPV-28-UNITO a SemEval-2019 Task 7: Sfruttare le informazioni di nidificazione e sintassi del post per la classificazione delle posizioni di voce', 'kk': 'UPV', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 7-ല്\u200d യുപിവി- 28- യുനിറ്റോ', 'mk': 'УПВ-28-УНИТО на SemEval-2019 задача 7: Искористување на информациите за гребење и синтакси на поштата за класификација на гласини', 'lt': 'UPV-28-UNITO posėdyje „SemEval-2019“ 7 užduotis: Naudoti pašto gręžimo ir sintaksinę informaciją garsų būklės klasifikavimui', 'ms': 'UPV-28-UNITO di SemEval-2019 Tugas 7: Menggunakan Maklumat Penyuap dan Sintaks Post untuk Klasifikasi Stance Rumor', 'mn': "UPV-28-UNITO at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Exploiting Post's Nesting and Syntax Information for Rumor Stance Classification", 'no': 'UPV-28-UNITO på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 7: Eksplosjon av post sin neste og syntaksinformasjon for rumorestans klassifikasjon', 'pl': 'UPV-28-UNITO na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 7: Wykorzystanie informacji o gniazdzie i składzie Post do klasyfikacji stanu plotek', 'mt': "UPV-28-UNITO f'SemEval-2019 Kompitu 7: L-Isfruttar tal-Informazzjoni dwar it-Tnixxif u s-Sintassa tal-Post għall-Klassifikazzjoni tal-Istanza tas-Rumori", 'ro': 'UPV-28-UNITO la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 7: Exploatarea informațiilor de cuibărire și sinteză ale postului pentru clasificarea stării zvonurilor', 'sr': 'UPV-28-UNITO na pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 7: Eksploziciranje informacija o proglašavanju pošta i sintaksiji za klasifikaciju stanja glasina', 'si': "UPV-28-UNITO at semeval-2019 Job 7: Exploiting Post's Nest and Singax Info for RuMor Stance Classified", 'so': "UPV-28-UNITO at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Exploiting Post's Nesting and Syntax information for classification of rumor", 'sv': 'UPV-28-UNITO på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 7: Utnyttja platsens boplats och syntaxinformation för klassificering av rykten', 'ta': 'UPV- 28- UNITO செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 7: குரல் நிலை வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கு வெளியிடுகிறது', 'ur': "UPV-28-UNITO at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Exploiting Post's Nesting and Syntax Information for Rumor Stance Classification", 'uz': 'UPV- 28- UNITO SemEval- 2019 Vazifani 7: Asosiy Stans klassification uchun Keyingi Keyingi va Syntax Information', 'vi': 'Tiếp tục cập nhật tin tức về giai đoạn mật mã', 'bg': 'Задача 7: Използване на информацията за гнездене и синтаксис на постовете за класификация на положението на слуховете', 'hr': 'UPV-28-UNITO na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 7: Eksploziciranje informacija o nastavku i sintaksiji posta za klasifikaciju stanja glasina', 'nl': 'UPV-28-UNITO bij SemEval-2019 Taak 7: Het exploiteren van Nesting- en Syntax-informatie van Post voor geruchtstandclassificatie', 'ko': 'UPV-28-UNITO가SemEval-2019퀘스트7: 게시물의 삽입과 문법 정보를 이용하여 유언비어 입장 분류', 'de': 'UPV-28-UNITO bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 7: Nutzung von Nesting- und Syntaxinformationen von Post für die Klassifizierung von Gerüchten', 'id': 'UPV-28-UNITO di SemEval-2019 Tugas 7: Mengeksploitasi Informasi Serangan dan Sintaks Post untuk Klasifikasi Stans Rumor', 'fa': 'UPV-28-UNITO در پایگاه ۲۰۱۹ وظیفه ۷: انفجار اطلاعات اخراج و سینتکس پایگاه برای کلاس شناس', 'sw': 'UPV-28-UNITO katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 7: Kutumia taarifa za Kuhitaji na Makosa ya UPV kwa Kutangaza Ukumbushi', 'tr': "UPV-28-UNITO at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Exploiting Post's Nesting and Syntax Information for Rumor Stance Classification", 'sq': 'UPV-28-UNITO në SemEval-2019 Detyra 7: Shfrytëzimi i informacionit për ngritjen dhe sintaksën e postit për klasifikimin e qëndrimit të zërave', 'am': "UPV-28-UNITO በSemEval-2019 ስራ 7: Exploting Post's Nesting and Syntax Information for Rumor Stance Classification", 'af': 'UPV-28-UNITO by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 7: Voorskou Pos se Neste en Sintaks Informasie vir Rumor Stance Klassifikasie', 'hy': 'UPV-28-UNIto-ը, 2019-ի "Սեմեվալ-2019" 7-րդ հանձնարարությունը. օգտագործել տեղեկատվությունը լսումների դասակարգման համար', 'az': "UPV-28-UNITO 7. G칬z톛l: S칬yl톛nm톛 Stansi Klasifikasyonu 칲칞칲n Post's Nest and Syntax Information Exploiting", 'da': 'UPV-28-UNITO på SemEval-2019 Opgave 7: Udnyttelse af Posts rede- og syntaksoplysninger til klassificering af rygtestyrker', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৭-এ ইউপিভি-২৮-ইউনিটো: গুজব স্টেন্স ক্লাসিকেশনের জন্য পোস্টের সাধারণ এবং সিন্যাক্সের তথ্য প্রসারি', 'bs': 'UPV-28-UNITO na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 7: Eksploziciranje informacija o nastavku i sintaksiji za klasifikaciju stanica glasina', 'cs': 'UPV-28-UNITO na SemEval-2019 Úkol 7: Využití informací o hnízdění a syntaxi Post pro klasifikaci pověstí', 'ca': "UPV-28-UNITO a SemEval-2019 Task 7: Exploiting Post's Nesting and Syntax Information for Rumor Stance Classification", 'et': 'UPV-28-UNITO SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 7: Posti pesa- ja süntaksiinfo kasutamine kuulujutuseisundi klassifitseerimiseks', 'fi': 'UPV-28-UNITO SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 7: Postin pesintä- ja syntaksitietojen hyödyntäminen huhuaseman luokittelussa', 'jv': 'UNV-22-UNITo nang seminval-2011 task 7: Isobahan Trabah Nestring lan Senaks Informasi kanggo', 'he': 'UPV-28-UNITO ב SemEval-2019 משימה 7: ניצל מידע הקרן והסינטקס של פוסט', 'ha': '@ info: status', 'sk': 'UPV-28-UNITO na SemEval-2019 Naloga 7: Izkoriščanje gnezdenja in sintakse podatkov za klasifikacijo stanja govoric', 'bo': "UPV-28-UNITO at SemEval-2019 Task 7: Exploiting Post's Nesting and Syntax Information for Rumor Stance Classification"}
{'en': 'In the present paper we describe the UPV-28-UNITO system’s submission to the RumorEval 2019 shared task. The approach we applied for addressing both the subtasks of the contest exploits both classical machine learning algorithms and word embeddings, and it is based on diverse groups of features : stylistic, lexical, emotional, sentiment, meta-structural and Twitter-based. A novel set of features that take advantage of the syntactic information in texts is moreover introduced in the paper.', 'es': 'En el presente artículo describimos la presentación del sistema UPV-28-UNITO a la tarea compartida RumoReval 2019. El enfoque que aplicamos para abordar ambas subtareas del concurso explota tanto los algoritmos clásicos de aprendizaje automático como la incrustación de palabras, y se basa en diversos grupos de características: estilísticas, léxicas, emocionales, de sentimiento, meta-estructurales y basadas en Twitter. Además, se introduce en el artículo un conjunto novedoso de características que aprovechan la información sintáctica de los textos.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نصف تقديم نظام UPV-28-UNITO إلى مهمة RumorEval 2019 المشتركة. النهج الذي طبقناه لمعالجة كل من المهام الفرعية للمسابقة يستغل كلاً من خوارزميات التعلم الآلي الكلاسيكية ودمج الكلمات ، ويستند إلى مجموعات متنوعة من الميزات: الأسلوب والمعجم والعاطفة والمشاعر والبنية الفوقية والقائمة على تويتر. علاوة على ذلك ، تم تقديم مجموعة جديدة من الميزات التي تستفيد من المعلومات النحوية في النصوص في الورقة.', 'pt': 'No presente artigo descrevemos a submissão do sistema UPV-28-UNITO à tarefa compartilhada RumorEval 2019. A abordagem que aplicamos para abordar as duas subtarefas do concurso explora algoritmos clássicos de aprendizado de máquina e incorporação de palavras e é baseada em diversos grupos de recursos: estilísticos, lexicais, emocionais, sentimentais, metaestruturais e baseados no Twitter. Além disso, um novo conjunto de recursos que aproveitam as informações sintáticas em textos é introduzido no artigo.', 'fr': "Dans le présent article, nous décrivons la soumission du système UPV-28-UNITO à la tâche partagée RumoReval 2019. L'approche que nous avons appliquée pour aborder les deux sous-tâches du concours exploite à la fois des algorithmes classiques d'apprentissage automatique et des intégrations de mots, et repose sur divers groupes de caractéristiques\xa0: stylistiques, lexicales, émotionnelles, sentimentales, méta-structurelles et basées sur Twitter. Un nouvel ensemble de fonctionnalités qui tirent parti des informations syntaxiques contenues dans les textes est également présenté dans cet article.", 'zh': '本文中,述UPV-28-UNITO系统向RumorEval 2019共享之。 吾于比赛之法,因经典之机器,学算法,词之嵌,盖殊科异体:风格,词汇,情,情,情,结,Twitter也。 又引文本句法信息新功。', 'ja': '本稿では、UPV -28 - UNITOシステムのRumorEval 2019共有タスクへの提出について説明する。コンテストのサブタスクの両方に対処するために適用されたアプローチは、古典的な機械学習アルゴリズムと単語埋め込みの両方を利用しており、スタイル、語彙、感情、感情、メタ構造、Twitterベースの多様な機能グループに基づいています。さらに、テキストの構文情報を活用した斬新な特徴のセットを論文で紹介した。', 'hi': 'वर्तमान पेपर में हम UPV-28-UNITO सिस्टम के RumorEval 2019 साझा कार्य के लिए प्रस्तुत करने का वर्णन करते हैं। प्रतियोगिता के दोनों उप-कार्यों को संबोधित करने के लिए हमने जिस दृष्टिकोण को लागू किया है, वह शास्त्रीय मशीन लर्निंग एल्गोरिदम और शब्द एम्बेडिंग दोनों का शोषण करता है, और यह सुविधाओं के विविध समूहों पर आधारित है: शैलीगत, लेक्सिकल, भावनात्मक, भावना, मेटा-संरचनात्मक और ट्विटर-आधारित। ग्रंथों में वाक्यात्मक जानकारी का लाभ उठाने वाली विशेषताओं का एक उपन्यास सेट इसके अलावा पेपर में पेश किया गया है।', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе мы описываем представление системы UPV-28-UNITO к совместной задаче RumorEval 2019. Подход, который мы применили для решения как подзадач конкурса, использует как классические алгоритмы машинного обучения, так и вложения слов, и основан на различных группах признаков: стилистических, лексических, эмоциональных, настроений, метаструктурных и на основе Twitter. Кроме того, в работе представлен новый набор особенностей, которые используют синтаксическую информацию в текстах.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo déanaimid cur síos ar aighneacht an chórais UPV-28-UNITO do thasc roinnte RumorEval 2019. Sa chur chuige a d’fheidhmigh muid chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar fhothasc an chomórtais, baintear leas as algartaim mheaisínfhoghlama chlasaiceacha agus leabú focal, agus tá sé bunaithe ar ghrúpaí éagsúla gnéithe: stíle, foclóireachta, mothúchánach, meon, meiteastruchtúir agus bunaithe ar Twitter. Ina theannta sin, tugtar isteach sraith nua gnéithe a bhaineann leas as an eolas comhréire i dtéacsanna sa pháipéar.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban ismertetjük az UPV-28-UNITO rendszer beküldését a RumorEval 2019 közös feladatra. A pályázat mindkét alcsoportjának kezelésére alkalmazott megközelítés mind a klasszikus gépi tanulási algoritmusokat, mind a szóbeágyazásokat használja, és különböző funkciócsoportokra épül: stilisztikai, lexikai, érzelmi, érzelmi, metastrukturális és Twitter alapú. A tanulmány ezenkívül a szövegekben található szintaktikai információk kihasználását kihasználó új jellemzőket mutat be.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე დოკუნტში ჩვენ აღწერეთ UPV-28-UNITO სისტემის შემდეგ 2019 წლის საზოგადომი დავალებაში. კონტენსტის საშუალებების შესახებ, რომელიც ჩვენ გამოყენებდით კლასიკური მაქანის სწავლების ალგორიტემი და სიტყვების შესახებ, და ის განსხვავებული ფუნქციების განსხვავებულ ჯგუფი დაბაზიან: სტილისტიკური, ლექსიკური, ე პრომენტიკური სინტექტიკური ინფორმაციის გამოსაყენება ტექსტში უფრო მეტად ჩვენებულია.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία περιγράφουμε την υποβολή του συστήματος στο κοινό έργο RumorEval 2019. Η προσέγγιση που εφαρμόσαμε για την αντιμετώπιση και των δύο επιμέρους εργασιών του διαγωνισμού αξιοποιεί τόσο τους κλασικούς αλγόριθμους μηχανικής μάθησης όσο και τις ενσωμάτωση λέξεων, και βασίζεται σε ποικίλες ομάδες χαρακτηριστικών: στυλιστικές, λεξικές, συναισθηματικές, συναισθηματικές, συναισθηματικές, μετα-δομικές και βασισμένες στο Twitter. Επιπλέον, στην εργασία εισάγεται ένα νέο σύνολο χαρακτηριστικών που εκμεταλλεύονται τις συντακτικές πληροφορίες των κειμένων.', 'it': "Nel presente articolo descriviamo la sottomissione del sistema UPV-28-UNITO al compito condiviso RumorEval 2019. L'approccio che abbiamo applicato per affrontare entrambe le sottoattività del contest sfrutta sia algoritmi classici di machine learning che embedding di parole, e si basa su diversi gruppi di caratteristiche: stilistiche, lessicali, emotive, sentimental, meta-strutturali e basate su Twitter. Un nuovo insieme di caratteristiche che sfruttano le informazioni sintattiche contenute nei testi è inoltre introdotto nel documento.", 'kk': 'Біз қазіргі қағазда UPV-28-UNITO жүйесінің 2019 жыл RumorEval ортақ тапсырмасына жіберілген тапсырманы таңдадық. Біз конкурстың алгоритмдері мен сөздерді ендіру алгоритмдері жұмыс істеу үшін қолданған әртүрлі мүмкіндіктер топтарына негізделген, стилистик, лексикалық, емоциялық, сезімдік, мета- структуралық және Твиттер негізінде. Мәтіндегі синтактикалық мәліметтің артықшылығын қолданатын романдар жиыны қағазда енгізіледі.', 'lt': "In the present paper we describe the UPV-28-UNITO system's submission to the RumorEval 2019 shared task.  Mūsų taikytas požiūris į abiejų konkurso subtaskų klausimus naudojasi klasikiniais mašinų mokymosi algoritmais ir žodžių įdėjimais, ir jis grindžiamas įvairiomis ypatybių grupėmis: stilistine, leksikine, emocine, jausma, metastruktūrine ir Twitter pagrindu. Be to, dokumente pateikiamas naujas elementų rinkinys, kuriuo naudojasi tekstuose pateikta sintetine informacija.", 'mk': "In the present paper we describe the UPV-28-UNITO system's submission to the RumorEval 2019 shared task.  Пристапот кој го аплициравме за решавање на двете потпрашања на натпреварот ги искористува и алгоритмите за класично машинско учење и вградувањата на зборови, и се базира на различни групи на карактеристики: стилистички, лексички, емоционални, чувства, мета-структурни и Твитер-базирани. Покрај тоа, нов сет карактеристики кои ги искористуваат синтактичките информации во текстовите е воведен во весникот.", 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami menggambarkan penghantaran sistem UPV-28-UNITO kepada tugas berkongsi RumorEval 2019. Pendekatan yang kami aplikasikan untuk mengatasi kedua-dua subtasks pertandingan mengeksploitasi kedua-dua algoritma pembelajaran mesin klasik dan penyampilan perkataan, dan ia berdasarkan kumpulan berbeza ciri-ciri: stilistik, leksikal, emosional, perasaan, meta-struktur dan berdasarkan Twitter. Seting ciri-ciri baru yang mengambil keuntungan dari maklumat sintaktik dalam teks juga diperkenalkan dalam kertas.', 'ml': 'ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d യുപിവി-28-യൂണിറ്റോയുടെ സിസ്റ്റമിനെ വിവരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. റൂമോര്\u200dവെല്\u200d 2019 പ പ്രതികാരത്തിന്റെ സബ്ട്ടേഷനുകളെയും സംസാരിക്കാനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിച്ചിരുന്ന നേര്\u200dവഴി ക്ലാസിക്കല്\u200d യന്ത്രം പഠിക്കുന്നതും വാക്കുകളും പഠിക്കുന്നതും വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ് പദാവലികളിലെ സിനിട്ടാക്കിക്ക് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു നോവല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പേപ്പറില്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Одоогийн цаасан дээр бид UPV-28-ЮНИТО системийн 2019 оны RumorEval-ын хуваалцааны ажлыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бидний өрсөлдөөн хоёр дахь сургалтын алгоритмыг ашиглах арга зам нь алгоритмын суралцах алгоритмыг, үгийг нэмж хэлбэрээр ашигладаг. Энэ нь стилист, лексик, сэтгэл хөдлөл, сэтгэл хөдлөл, мета-структур болон Twitter-н суурилсан олон төрл Шинжлэх ухааны шинжлэх ухаанаас ашигладаг шинжлэх ухаанаас илүү цаасан дээр тайлбарладаг.', 'mt': 'Fid-dokument preżenti niddeskrivu s-sottomissjoni tas-sistema UPV-28-UNITO lill-kompitu kondiviż RumorEval 2019. The approach we applied for addressing both the subtasks of the contest exploits both classical machine learning algorithms and word embeddings, and it is based on diverse groups of features: stylistic, lexical, emotional, sentiment, meta-structural and Twitter-based.  Barra minn hekk, sett ġdid ta’ karatteristiċi li jieħdu vantaġġ mill-informazzjoni sintattika fit-testi huwa introdott fil-karta.', 'no': 'I den noverande papiren beskriver vi UPV-28-UNITO-systemet som er delt oppgåva i RumorEval 2019. Den tilnærminga vi løysa for å adressera både underspørsmålene av konteksten eksploderer både klassiske maskinelæringsalgoritme og ordinnbygging, og den er basert på ulike grupper av funksjonar: stylistiske, leksiske, emosjonelle, sentiment, metastrukturelle og Twitter-basert. Eit romansett av funksjonar som brukar fordel av syntaktiske informasjon i tekstar er også introdusert i papiret.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule opisujemy zgłoszenie systemu UPV-28-UNITO do wspólnego zadania RumorEval 2019. Podejście, które zastosowaliśmy do rozwiązywania obu podzadań konkursu, wykorzystuje zarówno klasyczne algorytmy uczenia maszynowego, jak i osadzenia słów i opiera się na różnych grupach cech: stylistycznych, leksykalnych, emocjonalnych, sentymentalnych, metastrukturalnych oraz opartych na Twitterze. Ponadto w artykule przedstawiono nowatorski zestaw cech wykorzystujących informacje składniowe w tekstach.', 'sr': 'U sadašnjem papiru opisujemo podnošenje UPV-28-UNITO-ovog sistema podijeljenom zadatku za RumorEval 2019. Pristup koji smo se prijavili za rješavanje obje podizaka natjecanja iskorištava i klasične algoritme za učenje mašine i integracije riječi, i zasnovan je na različitim grupama karakteristika: stilističke, leksičke, emocionalne, sentimentalne, metastrukturne i Twitter-based. Novi skup karakteristika koji koriste sintaktičke informacije u tekstima je još uveden u novinama.', 'ro': 'În lucrarea de față descriem supunerea sistemului UPV-28-UNITO la sarcina comună RumorEval 2019. Abordarea aplicată pentru abordarea ambelor subsarcini ale concursului exploatează atât algoritmii clasici de machine learning, cât și încorporarea cuvintelor, și se bazează pe diverse grupuri de caracteristici: stilistică, lexicală, emoțională, sentimentală, meta-structurală și pe Twitter. Mai mult, în lucrare este introdus un set nou de caracteristici care profită de informațiile sintactice din texte.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats beskriver vi UPV-28-UNITO-systemets inlämning till RumorEval 2019 delade uppgift. Det tillvägagångssätt vi tillämpade för att adressera båda delmålen i tävlingen utnyttjar både klassiska maskininlärningsalgoritmer och ordinbäddningar, och det bygger på olika grupper av funktioner: stilistisk, lexikal, emotionell, sentiment, meta-strukturell och Twitter-baserad. En ny uppsättning funktioner som utnyttjar syntaktisk information i texter introduceras dessutom i uppsatsen.', 'si': 'අපි UPV-28-UNITO පද්ධතියේ පද්ධතියේ පිළිගන්නේ 2019 රුමෝර් වලින් ක්\u200dරියාවෙන් කියලා. අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සම්බන්ධ විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ වචනය සම්බන්ධ විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා: ස්ටිලිස්ටික්, ලෙක්සික්, භාවිතය, සංවේදනය, ම පත්තරේ සංවිධානය තොරතුරු ගැන ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා කියලා පත්තරේ සංවිධානය තොරතුරු වලට වඩා ප්\u200dරයෝජන', 'so': 'Warqadda la joogo waxaan ku qoraynaa nidaamka UPV-28-UNITO oo loo soo dhiibay shuqulka loo qeybiyey rumorEval 2019. Dhaqdhaqaaqa aan u codsano in la macaamilo karo labada hawlaha qashinku ay kala duwan yihiin, waxay ka baaraandegaan mashiinka barashada algorithm iyo hadalka, waxayna ku saleysan yihiin kooxo kala duduwan oo ah tusaale ahaan, lexic, xisaabta, xisaabta, dhismaha meta iyo Twitterka. Qoraalka waxaa sidoo kale ku qoran qoraalka macluumaadka la-isticmaalayo warqadda.', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய தாளில் நாம் UPV-28-UNITO அமைப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் குறிப்பிட்ட வேலை 2019 பகிர்ந்த பணிக்கு. நாங்கள் போட்டியின் துணை பணிகளையும் சேர்க்க பயன்படுத்துவதற்கான முறைமையில் இருந்து கிளாசிக்கல் இயந்திரத்தையும் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் கலைப்பியலையும் வார்த்தைகளையும் துண எழுத்துக்களில் உள்ள ஒத்திசைவு தகவலை பயன்படுத்தும் ஒரு புதிய குணங்கள் காகிதத்தில் மேலும் குறிப்பிடுகிறது.', 'ur': 'ہم نے اس کاغذ میں UPV-28-یونیٹو سیسٹم کی تحویل 2019 کے شریک کام کی ہے۔ ہم نے مسابقات کے دوسرے سٹسٹسٹوں کے بارے میں استعمال کیا تھا کلاسیک ماشین کی تعلیم الگوریتموں اور کلمات انڈینگ کے بارے میں، اور یہ مختلف فرق گروہوں پر بنیاد ہے: استیلیستیک، لکھی، احساسات، احساسات، متا-ساختار اور ٹویٹر کی بنیاد پر۔ پیغام میں سینٹکتیک معلومات کا فائدہ اٹھانے والی ایک روانی مجموعہ کاغذ میں اضافہ کیا جاتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Joriy hujjatda biz UPV-28-UNITO tizimini RumorEval 2019 bilan birlashtirilgan vazifani ajratishni anglatamiz. O'zgarish vazifalarini boshqarish uchun qo'llanmalar, klassik uskuna algoritni o'rganish va so'zlarni o'rganish mumkin, va bu turli guruhlar guruhiga asoslangan. Style, leksik, emotional, sentiment, meta-structural va Twitter asosida. Name", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi mô tả s ự chịu thua của hệ thống UPV-28, Cách tiếp cận mà chúng tôi áp dụng để thực hiện cả các yêu cầu của cuộc thi, cũng là sử dụng các thuật toán học máy cổ điển và sự cấy ghép từ ngữ, và nó dựa trên các nhóm khác nhau các tính năng: văn hóa, ngôn ngữ, cảm xúc, cảm xúc, đa cảm, các meta-structure và Twitter. Hơn nữa trên báo có một loạt các tính năng mới lợi dụng thông tin cú pháp trong văn bản.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия описваме подаването на системата към споделената задача на РумърЕвал 2019. Подходът, който приложихме за разглеждане както на подзадачите на конкурса, използва както класическите алгоритми за машинно обучение, така и на вграждането на думи и се основава на разнообразни групи от характеристики: стилистични, лексикални, емоционални, сантиментални, метаструктурни и базирани на Туитър. В статията е въведен и нов набор от функции, които се възползват от синтактичната информация в текстовете.', 'hr': 'U sadašnjem papiru opisujemo podnošenje UPV-28-UNITO-ovog sustava zajedničkom zadatku za RumorEval 2019. Pristup koji smo se prijavili za rješavanje obje podizaka natjecanja iskorištava i klasične algoritme za učenje strojeva i uključuje se na raznim grupama karakteristika: stilističke, leksičke, emocionalne, osjećaje, metastrukturne i Twitter-based. Novi skup karakteristika koji koriste sintaktičke informacije u tekstima je još uveden u novinama.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel beschrijven we de inzending van het UPV-28-UNITO systeem aan de RumorEval 2019 gedeelde taak. De aanpak die we hebben toegepast voor het aanpakken van beide subtaken van de wedstrijd maakt gebruik van zowel klassieke machine learning algoritmes als woord embeddings, en het is gebaseerd op verschillende groepen functies: stilistisch, lexicaal, emotioneel, sentiment, metastructureel en Twitter-gebaseerd. Een nieuwe reeks functies die gebruik maken van de syntactische informatie in teksten wordt bovendien geïntroduceerd in de paper.', 'da': 'I denne artikel beskriver vi UPV-28-UNITO-systemets indsendelse til RumorEval 2019 delte opgave. Den tilgang, vi anvendte til at adressere begge underopgaver i konkurrencen, udnytter både klassiske maskinlæringsalgoritmer og ordindlejringer, og den er baseret på forskellige grupper af funktioner: stilistisk, leksikisk, emotionel, sentiment, meta-strukturel og Twitter-baseret. Et nyt sæt funktioner, der udnytter syntaktiske oplysninger i tekster, introduceres desuden i papiret.', 'de': 'In der vorliegenden Arbeit beschreiben wir die Einreichung des UPV-28-UNITO Systems zur gemeinsamen Aufgabe RumorEval 2019. Der Ansatz, den wir für beide Teilaufgaben des Wettbewerbs angewendet haben, nutzt sowohl klassische Machine Learning Algorithmen als auch Worteinbettungen und basiert auf verschiedenen Merkmalsgruppen: stilistisch, lexikalisch, emotional, sentimental, metastrukturell und Twitter-basiert. Darüber hinaus wird ein neuartiger Satz von Merkmalen vorgestellt, die die syntaktischen Informationen in Texten nutzen.', 'ko': '본고에서 UPV-28-UNITO 시스템이 RumorEval 2019 공유 임무에 제출된 상황을 묘사했다.경쟁의 두 가지 임무를 해결하는 방법은 고전적인 기계 학습 알고리즘과 단어를 활용하고 서로 다른 기능 그룹인 스타일, 어휘, 감정, 감정, 원 구조와 트위터를 바탕으로 한다.본고는 또한 텍스트의 문법 정보를 이용한 새로운 특징도 소개했다.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kami menggambarkan pengiriman sistem UPV-28-UNITO ke tugas rumorEval 2019 yang sama. Pendekatan yang kami aplikasikan untuk mengatasi kedua subtasks kontes mengeksploitasi algoritma belajar mesin klasik dan penyampilan kata, dan berdasarkan kelompok berbagai ciri-ciri: stilistik, leksikal, emosional, sentimen, meta-struktur dan Twitter. Sebuah set karakteristik novel yang mengambil keuntungan dari informasi sintaks dalam teks juga diperkenalkan di koran.', 'fa': 'در کاغذ امروزه ما تسلیم سیستم UPV-28-UNITO به وظیفه مشترک روم Eval 2019 توصیف می کنیم. روش\u200cهایی که ما درخواست می\u200cکردیم برای درخواست کردن هر دوی زیر پاسخ\u200cهای مسابقه، الگوریتم\u200cهای یادگیری ماشین کلاسیک و ابتدایی\u200cهای کلاسیک استفاده می\u200cکند، و بر گروه\u200cهای مختلف ویژه\u200cها بنیاد می\u200cگیرد: استیلیست، زبان\u200cشناسی، احساسات، احساسات، متا-ساختار یک مجموعه رمانی از ویژگی\u200cهایی که از اطلاعات سنتاکتیک در متن استفاده می\u200cکنند، بیشتر در کاغذ معرفی می\u200cشود.', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti la sasa tunaelezea mfumo wa UPV-28-UNITO uliotolewa kwa kazi ya RumorEval 2019. Mfumo tuliotumia kuelezea kazi zote za mashindano haya unatumia mbili za mashine ya kujifunza na maneno ya klassika, na unategemea kwenye makundi mbalimbali: mitindo ya kiuchumi, hisia, miundombinu ya kiungo na mtandao wa Twita. Sehemu ya riwaya zinazotumia taarifa za ushirikiano katika maandishi yanaanzishwa zaidi katika gazeti hilo.', 'tr': 'Häzirki kagyzda UPV-28-UNITO sisteminiň 2019-nji ýylyň bäsleşik görevini tassyýardyk. Näçe çempionlyk Subasklary çözmek üçin we bu ýagdaýyň hem klasik maşynyň öwrenmesi algoritmalaryny we söz integrasyny ulanýar we munyň dürli toparyna daýanýar: stilistik, leksiýal, duýulyk, duýulyk, meta-strukturlyk we Twitter-dan daýanýar. Metinlerde sintaktik maglumatlaryň üstüne alyp biljek özellikleri şol ýagdaýda hem daşary ýazylýar.', 'am': 'በአሁኑ ገጾች ውስጥ የUPV-28-UNITO ስርዓት ለሩሞርEval 2019 የተካፈለውን ስራ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የአሁኑን ደብዳቤዎች እና ቃላትን ለማስተማር የክላሲካዊ መሳሪያን እና መግለጫዎችን ለማድረግ የሚጠይቅበት የሥርዓት ሥርዓት ነው፡፡ በተለየ ዓይነቶች በተለያዩ ክፍሎች ላይ ነው፡፡ በጽሑፎች ውስጥ የስናታዊ መረጃዎችን የሚጠቀም የመረጃ አቀማመጥ በፕሮግራም ላይ የተገኘ ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Në artikullin e tanishëm përshkruajmë dorëzimin e sistemit UPV-28-UNITO ndaj detyrës s ë përbashkët RumorEval 2019. Përqasja që kemi aplikuar për trajtimin e të dy nënpyetjeve të konkursit shfrytëzon si algoritmet klasike të mësimit të makinave si dhe përfshirjet e fjalëve dhe bazohet në grupe të ndryshme karakteristike: stilistike, leksikale, emocionale, ndjesi, meta-strukturale dhe Twitter-bazuar. Një sërë e re karakteristike që përfitojnë nga informacioni sintaktik në tekste futet gjithashtu në gazetë.', 'af': "In die huidige papier beskryf ons die UPV-28-UNITO stelsel se onderskrywing aan die RumorEval 2019 gedeelde taak. Die toegang wat ons aansoek het om beide subaske van die contest te adres, uitbreek beide klassieke masjien leer algoritme en woord inbettings, en dit is gebaseer op verskeie groepe van funksies: stylistike, leksiese, emosiele, sentimente, metastrukturele en Twitter-gebaseer. 'n novel stel van funksies wat voordeel van die sintaktieke inligting in tekste neem, is ook in die papier ingestel.", 'hy': "Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նկարագրում ենք UPV-28-UNITO ի համակարգի ներկայացումը 2019 թվականի ընդհանուր խնդիրը: Մենք կիրառեցինք մրցակցության երկու ենթախնդիրների լուծման համար, օգտագործում ենք և դասական մեխանիզմի ուսումնասիրության ալգորիթմները, և բառերի ներդրումները, և այն հիմնված է տարբեր հատկությունների խմբերի վրա' ոճիլիստիկ, լեքսիկական, զգացմունքային, զգացմունքային, մետակառուցվա Ավելին, թղթի մեջ ներկայացված է նոր հատկանիշներ, որոնք օգտագործում են տեքստների սինտակտիկ տեղեկատվությունը:", 'az': 'Şimdiki kağızda UPV-28-UNITO sisteminin 2019 RumorEval paylaşılan işə təsdiqlənməsini təsdiqləyirik. Yarışmağın hər ikisinin altıcılıqlarını çəkmək üçün tətbiq etdiyimiz tərzim ikisini klasik maşın öyrənməsi algoritmi və sözlərin içərisində istifadə edir. Bu, müxtəlif tərzlərin dəstələrinə dayanılır: stylistik, leksik, emosiyal, hiss, meta-strukturlu və Twitter tabanlı. Mətnlərdə sintaktik məlumatların faydalanıb istifadə edən yeni fəaliyyətlər qeydə belə yazılmışdır.', 'bn': 'বর্তমান পত্রিকায় আমরা উপিভি-২৮-ইউনিটিও সিস্টেমের প্রতি বর্ণনা করছি রুমোরেভাল ২০১৯ শেয়ার কর্মসূচীর প্রতি। এই প্রতিযোগিতার সাবট্যাক্টাসের কথা বলার জন্য আমরা প্রয়োগ করেছিলাম এই প্রতিযোগিতা বিভিন্ন ধরনের বিভিন্ন গ্রুপের উপর ভিত্তি করেছিলাম: স্টাইলিস্টিক, লেক্সিক, আবেগ, অনুভূতি, ম লেখায় টেক্সটের সিন্ট্যাক্টিক তথ্যের সুবিধা প্রদান করা একটি উপন্যাসের বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রকাশ করা হয়েছে।', 'ca': "En el present paper descrivim la presentació del sistema UPV-28-UNITO a la tasca compartida RumorEval 2019. L'enfocament que vam aplicar per abordar les dues subtaskes del concurs explota tant algoritmes clàssics d'aprenentatge màquin com incorporacions de paraules, i està basat en diversos grups de característiques: estilistic, lexical, emotional, sentiment, meta-structural i Twitter. A més, el paper introdueix un nou conjunt de característiques que aprofiten la informació sinàctica dels textos.", 'bs': 'U sadašnjem papiru opisujemo podnošenje UPV-28-UNITO-ovog sistema podijeljenom zadatku za RumorEval 2019. Pristup koji smo se prijavili za rješavanje obje podizaka natjecanja iskorištava i klasične algoritme za učenje mašine i integracije riječi, i zasnovan je na različitim grupama karakteristika: stilističke, leksičke, emocionalne, osjećanja, metastrukturne i Twitter-based. Novi skup karakteristika koji koriste sintaktičke informacije u tekstima je još uveden u novinama.', 'cs': 'V příspěvku popisujeme podání systému UPV-28-UNITO sdílenému úkolu RumorEval 2019. Přístup, který jsme použili k řešení obou dílčích úkolů soutěže, využívá klasických algoritmů strojového učení i slovních vložení a je založen na různých skupinách funkcí: stylistických, lexikálních, emocionálních, sentimentových, metastrukturálních a Twitterových. V článku je navíc představen nový soubor vlastností, které využívají syntaktických informací v textech.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös kirjeldame UPV-28-UNITO süsteemi esitamist RumorEval 2019 jagatud ülesandele. Võistluse nii alamülesannete käsitlemiseks rakendatud lähenemisviis kasutab nii klassikalisi masinõppe algoritme kui ka sõnade manustamist ning põhineb erinevatel omaduste rühmadel: stilistilised, leksikaalsed, emotsionaalsed, sentimentaalsed, metastruktuurilised ja Twitteripõhised. Lisaks tutvustatakse töös uudseid funktsioone, mis kasutavad ära tekstide süntaktilist informatsiooni.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan UPV-28-UNITO-järjestelmän osallistumista RumorEval 2019 -yhteiseen tehtävään. Kilpailun osatehtävien käsittelemiseen sovelletussa lähestymistavassa hyödynnetään sekä klassisia koneoppimisalgoritmeja että sanaupotuksia, ja se perustuu erilaisiin ominaisuuksiin: tyyliin, sanastoon, tunteisiin, tunteisiin, metarakenteellisiin ja Twitter-pohjaisiin. Lisäksi artikkelissa esitellään uusia ominaisuuksia, jotka hyödyntävät tekstien syntaktista tietoa.', 'jv': 'Nang pepulan nambah, kita nguasai nggawe Sistem UNV-22-UNITo gawe ngupakan lan mungkar gawe barang Awak dhéwé ngéwangi nglanggar nganggo gambarang nggawe tarjamahan karo kontribusi sing nyimpen Algorithm karo awak dhéwé, lan ngêwèké bumesten karo sistem sing gawe lan gambarang langgar: stylistik, lexèké, duwé, Sensitif, meta-structural lan Google . Awak dhéwé éntuk karo pernik sing dibutuhé awak dhéwé sing luwih bantuan karo nggambar textin.', 'he': 'בעיתון הנוכחי אנחנו מתארים את ההעברה של מערכת UPV-28-UNITO למשימה משותפת RumorEval 2019. הגישה שביקשנו להתייחס לשני השאלות של התחרות מנצלת אלגוריתמים קלאסיים ללמוד מכונות וקלימות מילים, והיא מבוססת על קבוצות מגוונות של תכונות: סטיליסטית, לקסיקה, רגשית, רגשות, מטה-מבנה וטוויטר. סדר חדש של תכונות שמשתמשים במידע הסינטקטי בטקסטים מוצג בנייר.', 'ha': "Ga takardan da yake a yanzu, Munã bayyana al'amarin na UPV-28-UNICO zuwa aikin Rumoreval 2019 da aka raba shi. Tsarin da muka yi amfani da su yi addu'a ga aikin wannan, yana ƙarfafa da zanen karatun algoritm da kalma masu karatun, kuma yana a kan jama'a-jama'a daban-daban: Styllistic, leksisiki, hison, na'anar, meta-rubutu da Twitter. An introduce wani salon tsari mai amfani da information na syntactic cikin littafan a ƙaranci cikin takardar.", 'sk': 'V prispevku opisujemo predložitev sistema UPV-28-UNITO v skupno nalogo RumorEval 2019. Pristop, ki smo ga uporabili pri obravnavanju obeh podnalog natečaja, izkorišča tako klasične algoritme strojnega učenja kot tudi besedne vdelave, temelji pa na različnih skupinah značilnosti: stilističnih, leksikalnih, čustvenih, sentimentalnih, metastrukturnih in Twitterjevih. V prispevku je predstavljen tudi nov nabor značilnosti, ki izkoriščajo sintaktične informacije v besedilih.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ད་ལྟོའི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་UPV-28-UNITO་གི་མ་ལག་གི་མཉམ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ལ་བཤད་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་འཆར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་རྒྱབ་ཐག་གཟུགས་གཉིས་ལས་སྤྱོད་པའི་གོ་སྐབས་ཡིག ཚིག'}
{'en': 'ColumbiaNLP at SemEval-2019 Task 8 : The Answer is Language Model Fine-tuning', 'ar': 'ColumbiaNLP في SemEval-2019 المهمة 8: الإجابة هي ضبط نموذج اللغة', 'fr': 'ColumbianLP au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 8\xa0: La réponse est le réglage fin du modèle linguistique', 'es': 'ColumbianLP en la Tarea 8 de Semeval-2019: La respuesta es el ajuste del modelo de lenguaje', 'pt': 'ColumbiaNLP na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 8: A resposta é o ajuste fino do modelo de linguagem', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のColumbiaNLPタスク8 ：答えは言語モデルの微調整です', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 8 पर ColumbiaNLP: उत्तर भाषा मॉडल ठीक ट्यूनिंग है', 'ru': 'ColumbiaNLP на SemEval-2019 Задача 8: Ответ - тонкая настройка языковой модели', 'zh': '哥伦比亚NLP在SemEval-2019务8:对案者,语体微调也', 'ga': 'ColumbiaNLP ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 8: Is é an Freagra ná Mionchoigeartú na Múnla Teanga', 'hu': 'ColumbiaNLP a SemEval-2019 8. feladat: A válasz a nyelvi modell finomhangolása', 'el': 'Εργασία 8: Η απάντηση είναι η προσαρμογή του γλωσσικού μοντέλου', 'ka': 'კოლომბიაNLP SemEval-2019 დავალება 8: პასუხი არის ენის მოდელის კონფიგურაცია', 'it': 'ColumbiaNLP al SemEval-2019 Task 8: La risposta è la messa a punto del modello linguistico', 'mk': 'КолумбијаNLP на SemEval-2019 задача 8: Одговорот е финетизирање на јазичкиот модел', 'kk': 'КолумбияNLP жарым- Eval- 2019 тапсырмасының 8- тапсырмасы: Жауап - тіл үлгісі', 'lt': 'Kolumbija', 'ms': 'ColumbiaNLP at SemEval-2019 Task 8: The Answer is Language Model Fine-tuning', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 8-ല്\u200d കൊളംബിയNLP: ഉത്തരം ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d ഫൈന്\u200d ടൂണിങ്ങ്', 'mt': 'ColumbiaNLP f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 8: It-tweġiba hija l-aġġustament tal-Mudell tal-Lingwa', 'mn': 'ColumbiaNLP at SemEval-2019 Task 8: The answer is Language Model Fine-tuning', 'no': 'ColumbiaNLP ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 8: Svar er språk-modellen Fine-tuning', 'pl': 'KolumbiaNLP na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 8: Odpowiedź to dostosowanie modelu językowego', 'ro': 'ColumbiaNLP la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 8: Răspunsul este reglarea fină a modelului lingvistic', 'sr': 'Kolumbija NLP na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 8: Odgovor je dobar nastav jezičkog modela', 'si': 'කෝලොම්බියාNLP සම්වේල්-2019 වැඩ 8: ප්\u200dරතිචාරය තමයි භාෂාව මෝඩේල් හොඳ සංවිධානය', 'so': 'ColumbiaNLP at SemEval-2019 Task 8: Jawaabtu waa Model Fine-tuning', 'sv': 'ColumbiaNLP på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 8: Svaret är språkmodell Finjustering', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 8: பதில் மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரி நன்றாக மாற்றுதல்', 'ur': 'کامل-2019 میں کالومبیاNLP ٹاکس 8: جواب زبان موڈل اچھی-ٹونگ ہے', 'uz': 'Eval- 2019 Vazifa 8: Javob tili Model Fine- tuning', 'vi': 'Colombia: Câu trả lời là ngôn ngữ mềm tinh xảo', 'bg': 'Задача 8: Отговорът е фината настройка на езиковия модел', 'da': 'ColumbiaNLP på SemEval-2019 Opgave 8: Svaret er sprogmodel Finjustering', 'hr': 'Kolumbija NLP na pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 8: Odgovor je dobra prilagodba jezičkog modela', 'nl': 'ColumbiaNLP op SemEval-2019 Taak 8: Het antwoord is Taalmodel finetuning', 'id': 'ColumbiaNLP at SemEval-2019 Task 8: The Answer is Language Model Fine-tuning', 'de': 'ColumbiaNLP bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 8: Die Antwort ist Sprachmodell-Feinabstimmung', 'ko': 'ColumbiaNLP가SemEval-2019퀘스트8:답은 언어모형 마이크로스피커', 'fa': 'کلمبیاNLP در ماده\u200cی نیم\u200cEval-2019 کار ۸: پاسخ مدل\u200cهای نیک\u200cتنظیم زبان است', 'sw': 'ColumbiaNLP katika SemEval-2019 Task 8: Jibu ni Model of Language Fine tuning', 'tr': 'KolumbiýaNLP at SemEval-2019 Task 8: The Answer is Language Model Fine-tuning', 'sq': 'ColumbiaNLP at SemEval-2019 Task 8: The Answer is Language Model Fine-tuning', 'af': 'ColumbiaNLP by SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 8: Die Antwoord is Taal Model Fine- tuning', 'am': 'ስራ 8:', 'hy': 'Կոլումբիան', 'az': 'Qeyd Dil Modeli İyi-Yapılandırmaqdır', 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৮-এ কলোম্বিয়ানএলপি: উত্তর হচ্ছে ভাষার মোডেল ফিন-টুইনিং', 'bs': 'Kolumbija NLP na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 8: Odgovor je dobar način na jezičkom modelu', 'et': 'ColumbiaNLP SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 8: Vastus on keelemudeli peenhäälestus', 'ca': 'ColumbiaNLP a SemEval-2019 Task 8: The Answer is Language Model Fine-tuning', 'cs': 'ColumbiaNLP na SemEval-2019 Úkol 8: Odpověď je jemné ladění jazykového modelu', 'fi': 'ColumbiaNLP SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 8: Vastaus on kielimallin hienosäätö', 'ha': 'QScriptBreakpointsModel Fine-tuning', 'jv': 'column', 'sk': 'ColumbiaNLP na SemEval-2019 Naloga 8: Odgovor je fino nastavitev jezikovnega modela', 'he': 'ColumbiaNLP ב SemEval-2019 משימה 8: The Answer is Language Model Fine-tuning', 'bo': 'ColumbiaNLP at SemEval-2019 Task 8: The Answer is Language Model Fine-tuning'}
{'en': 'Community Question Answering forums are very popular nowadays, as they represent effective means for communities to share information around particular topics. But the information shared on these forums are often not authentic. This paper presents the ColumbiaNLP submission for the SemEval-2019 Task 8 : Fact-Checking in Community Question Answering Forums. We show how fine-tuning a language model on a large unannotated corpus of old threads from Qatar Living forum helps us to classify question types (factual, opinion, socializing) and to judge the factuality of answers on the shared task labeled data from the same forum. Our system finished 4th and 2nd on Subtask A (question type classification) and B (answer factuality prediction), respectively, based on the official metric of accuracy.', 'pt': 'Fóruns de resposta a perguntas da comunidade são muito populares hoje em dia, pois representam meios eficazes para as comunidades compartilharem informações sobre tópicos específicos. Mas as informações compartilhadas nesses fóruns geralmente não são autênticas. Este artigo apresenta a submissão do ColumbiaNLP para a Tarefa 8 do SemEval-2019: Verificação de fatos nos fóruns de resposta a perguntas da comunidade. Mostramos como o ajuste fino de um modelo de linguagem em um grande corpus não anotado de tópicos antigos do fórum Qatar Living nos ajuda a classificar os tipos de perguntas (factual, opinião, socialização) e a julgar a factualidade das respostas na tarefa compartilhada rotulada de dados do mesmo fórum. Nosso sistema terminou em 4º e 2º na Subtarefa A (classificação do tipo de pergunta) e B (previsão de factualidade da resposta), respectivamente, com base na métrica oficial de precisão.', 'fr': "Les forums de réponses aux questions communautaires sont très populaires de nos jours, car ils représentent un moyen efficace pour les communautés de partager des informations sur des sujets particuliers. Mais les informations partagées sur ces forums ne sont souvent pas authentiques. Cet article présente la soumission ColumbianLP pour la Tâche 8 de SemEval-2019\xa0: Vérification des faits dans les forums de réponse aux questions de la communauté. Nous montrons comment affiner un modèle de langage sur un vaste corpus non annoté d'anciens fils de discussion du forum Qatar Living nous aide à classer les types de questions (factuelles, opinions, socialisation) et à juger de la factualité des réponses sur les données étiquetées de tâches partagées provenant du même forum. Notre système a terminé 4e et 2e sur la sous-tâche A (classification du type de question) et B (prédiction de la factualité des réponses), respectivement, sur la base de la métrique officielle de précision.", 'ar': 'تحظى منتديات المجتمع للإجابة على الأسئلة بشعبية كبيرة في الوقت الحاضر ، لأنها تمثل وسائل فعالة للمجتمعات لمشاركة المعلومات حول مواضيع معينة. لكن المعلومات التي يتم مشاركتها في هذه المنتديات غالبًا ما تكون غير صحيحة. تقدم هذه الورقة تقديم ColumbiaNLP لمهمة SemEval-2019 8: تدقيق الحقائق في منتديات الإجابة على أسئلة المجتمع. نوضح كيف أن الضبط الدقيق لنموذج اللغة على مجموعة كبيرة غير مُعلَّقة من الخيوط القديمة من منتدى Qatar Living يساعدنا في تصنيف أنواع الأسئلة (الواقعية ، والرأي ، والتواصل الاجتماعي) والحكم على واقعية الإجابات على المهمة المشتركة التي تحمل عنوان البيانات من نفس المنتدى. أنهى نظامنا المركزين الرابع والثاني في المهمة الفرعية A (تصنيف نوع السؤال) و B (توقع حقيقة الإجابة) ، على التوالي ، بناءً على مقياس الدقة الرسمي.', 'es': 'Los foros de respuesta a preguntas de la comunidad son muy populares hoy en día, ya que representan un medio eficaz para que las comunidades compartan información sobre temas particulares. Sin embargo, la información que se comparte en estos foros a menudo no es auténtica. Este artículo presenta la presentación de ColumbianLP para la Tarea 8 de SemeVal-2019: Verificación de hechos en los foros de respuesta a preguntas de la comunidad. Mostramos cómo ajustar un modelo de lenguaje en un gran corpus no comentado de temas antiguos del foro Qatar Living nos ayuda a clasificar los tipos de preguntas (fácticas, de opinión, socialización) y a juzgar la factualidad de las respuestas en la tarea compartida etiquetada como datos del mismo foro. Nuestro sistema terminó cuarto y segundo en la subtarea A (clasificación del tipo de pregunta) y B (predicción de la factualidad de la respuesta), respectivamente, en función de la métrica oficial de precisión.', 'zh': '社区问答论坛今大行,以其代社区绕特定主题共享信息之效也。 然此论坛分享往往不实。 本文引ColumbiaNLP为SemEval-2019务8:社区问论坛中事实勘交文。 示以卡塔尔生论坛大未注之旧线程语料库上微言,此有助于事类(事,社交)分别,同论坛之共事也。 据官方之准确性指标,系于子职A(分类)与B(对案事占)各得第4名第2名。', 'ja': 'コミュニティ質問への回答フォーラムは、コミュニティが特定のトピックに関する情報を共有するための有効な手段であるため、最近非常に人気があります。しかし、これらのフォーラムで共有されている情報は本物ではないことがよくあります。本稿では、SemEval -2019 Task 8: Fact - Checking in Community Question Answering ForumsのColumbiaNLP提出物を紹介する。私たちは、カタール・リビング・フォーラムの注釈のない古いスレッドの大規模なコーパスで言語モデルを微調整することが、質問タイプ（事実、意見、ソーシャル化）を分類し、同じフォーラムの共有タスクラベル付きデータの回答の事実性を判断するのにどのように役立つかを示します。当社のシステムは、公式の精度測定基準に基づいて、サブタスクA （質問タイプ分類）とB （回答事実性予測）でそれぞれ4位と2位に終わった。', 'hi': 'समुदाय प्रश्न उत्तर देने वाले मंच आजकल बहुत लोकप्रिय हैं, क्योंकि वे समुदायों के लिए विशेष विषयों के आसपास जानकारी साझा करने के लिए प्रभावी साधनों का प्रतिनिधित्व करते हैं। लेकिन इन मंचों पर साझा की गई जानकारी अक्सर प्रामाणिक नहीं होती है। यह पेपर SemEval-2019 कार्य 8 के लिए ColumbiaNLP सबमिशन प्रस्तुत करता है: सामुदायिक प्रश्न उत्तर देने वाले मंचों में तथ्य-जांच। हम दिखाते हैं कि कतर लिविंग फोरम से पुराने धागे के एक बड़े अनएनोटेटेड कॉर्पस पर एक भाषा मॉडल को ठीक-ठीक ट्यूनिंग करने से हमें प्रश्न प्रकारों (तथ्यात्मक, राय, सामाजिककरण) को वर्गीकृत करने और उसी मंच से लेबल किए गए साझा कार्य पर उत्तरों की तथ्यात्मकता का न्याय करने में मदद मिलती है। हमारी प्रणाली Subtask A (प्रश्न प्रकार वर्गीकरण) और बी (उत्तर तथ्यात्मकता भविष्यवाणी) पर क्रमशः 4 वें और 2 वें स्थान पर समाप्त हुई, सटीकता के आधिकारिक मीट्रिक के आधार पर।', 'ru': 'В настоящее время очень популярны форумы для ответа на вопросы сообществ, поскольку они представляют собой эффективное средство для обмена общинами информацией по конкретным темам. Однако информация, распространяемая на этих форумах, зачастую не является подлинной. В настоящем документе представлена информация, представленная ColumbiaNLP для SemEval-2019 Task 8: Fact-Checking in Community Question Answing Forums. Мы показываем, как тонкая настройка языковой модели на большом неаннотированном корпусе старых потоков от форума Qatar Living помогает нам классифицировать типы вопросов (фактологические, мнения, социализация) и судить о фактологичности ответов на общую задачу, помеченную данными от того же форума. Наша система заняла 4-е и 2-е место по подзадаче A (классификация типов вопросов) и B (прогнозирование фактологичности ответов), соответственно, на основе официальной метрики точности.', 'ga': 'Tá an-tóir ar fhóraim Freagraí Ceisteanna Pobail sa lá atá inniu ann, mar gur bealaí éifeachtacha iad chun eolas a roinnt ar thopaicí áirithe. Ach is minic nach mbíonn an fhaisnéis a roinntear ar na fóraim seo barántúil. Cuireann an páipéar seo aighneacht ColumbiaNLP i láthair don Tasc 8 SemEval-2019: Seiceáil Fíricí i bhFóraim Freagartha Ceisteanna Pobail. Léirímid conas a chuidíonn mionchoigeartú múnla teanga ar chorpas mór snáitheanna gan anótáilte ó fhóram Qatar Living linn cineálacha ceisteanna a rangú (fíorasach, tuairim, sóisialú) agus breithiúnas a thabhairt ar fhíorasacht freagraí ar an tasc comhroinnte sonraí lipéadaithe ón gcéanna. fóram. Chríochnaigh ár gcóras sa 4ú agus sa 2ú háit ar Fhothasc A (aicmiú de chineál ceiste) agus B (tuar fírinneachta freagraí), faoi seach, bunaithe ar an méadracht oifigiúil cruinnis.', 'hu': 'A fórumok manapság nagyon népszerűek, mivel hatékony eszközt jelentenek a közösségek számára, hogy megosszák az információkat bizonyos témákkal kapcsolatban. De az ezeken a fórumokon megosztott információk gyakran nem hitelesek. Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a ColumbiaNLP benyújtását a SemEval-2019 feladat 8: Tényellenőrzés a közösségi kérdésre válaszoló fórumokban. Megmutatjuk, hogy egy nyelvi modell finomhangolása a Qatar Living fórum régi szálaiból álló nagy, meg nem jegyzett korpuszán segít abban, hogy osztályozzuk a kérdéstípusokat (tényszerű, vélemény, szocializálás), és hogy megítéljük a válaszok tényszerűségét az ugyanazon fórum megosztott feladat adatai alapján. Rendszerünk 4. és 2. helyen végzett a hivatalos pontossági mutató alapján az A (kérdéstípusosztályozás), illetve a B (válasz tényszerűség előrejelzése).', 'el': 'Τα φόρουμ απάντησης σε ερωτήσεις της κοινότητας είναι πολύ δημοφιλή στις μέρες μας, καθώς αντιπροσωπεύουν αποτελεσματικά μέσα για τις κοινότητες για να μοιραστούν πληροφορίες σχετικά με συγκεκριμένα θέματα. Αλλά οι πληροφορίες που μοιράζονται σε αυτά τα φόρουμ συχνά δεν είναι αυθεντικές. Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει την υποβολή για το έργο 8: Έλεγχος γεγονότων σε κοινοτικά φόρουμ απάντησης ερωτήσεων. Δείχνουμε πώς ο συντονισμός ενός γλωσσικού μοντέλου σε ένα μεγάλο άθικτο σώμα παλιών νημάτων από το φόρουμ μας βοηθά να ταξινομήσουμε τους τύπους ερωτήσεων (πραγματικές, απόψεις, κοινωνικοποίηση) και να κρίνουμε την πραγματικότητα των απαντήσεων στα δεδομένα που έχουν μοιραστεί η εργασία με ετικέτα από το ίδιο φόρουμ. Το σύστημά μας ολοκληρώθηκε 4η και 2η στην Υποεργασία Α (ταξινόμηση τύπου ερωτήματος) και Β (πρόβλεψη πραγματικότητας απάντησης), αντίστοιχα, με βάση την επίσημη μέτρηση ακρίβειας.', 'ka': 'დღეს საზოგადოებო კითხვების გარეშე ფორმები ძალიან პოლუბურია, რადგან ისინი ეფექტიური საზოგადოებებისთვის გარეშე ინფორმაცია განსაკუთრებული ტემე მაგრამ ამ ფორმებზე გაყოფილი ინფორმაცია ხშირად არიან ავტონტიკური. ამ დოკუმენტი კოლომბიაNLP-ის გადაწყვეტილება SemEval-2019 დავალების 8-ზე: ფაქტის დაწყვეტილება საზოგადოებო კითხვის გასაგების ფორმებში. ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ რამდენი სიტყვის მოდელის კოპუსის დიდი უცნობილი კოპუსი კატარის ცხოვრებული ფორმიდან დაგვეხმარებს კითხვის ტიპების კლასიფიკაცია (ფაქტიური, მნიშვნელობა, საზოგალიზება) და გადაწყვება საუბ ჩვენი სისტემა დასრულა 4-და 2-ზე A-ზე (კითხვის ტიპის კლასიფიკაცია) და B-ზე (წარმოდგენა ფაქტიურობის წარმოდგენა), შესახებ, რომელიც უფრო დასრულებული ფაქტიურობის მეტრიკის', 'it': "I forum di risposta alle domande della comunità sono molto popolari al giorno d'oggi, in quanto rappresentano mezzi efficaci per le comunità di condividere informazioni su argomenti particolari. Ma le informazioni condivise su questi forum spesso non sono autentiche. Questo articolo presenta la presentazione di ColumbiaNLP per il SemEval-2019 Task 8: Fact-Check in Community Question Answering Forum. Mostriamo come mettere a punto un modello linguistico su un ampio corpus di vecchi thread non notati dal forum Qatar Living ci aiuta a classificare i tipi di domande (fatti, opinioni, socializzazione) e a giudicare la fattualità delle risposte sul compito condiviso etichettato dati dallo stesso forum. Il nostro sistema si è concluso 4° e 2° rispettivamente su Sottotask A (classificazione del tipo di domanda) e B (previsione della fattualità delle risposte), in base alla metrica ufficiale di accuratezza.", 'kk': 'Компаттық сұрақтар жауап беру форумдары қазіргі уақытта өте маңызды, себебі олар көмектесетін мәліметтерді бөліктеу үшін көмектесетін мәліметтерді көрсетеді. Бірақ бұл форумдар туралы бөлінген мәлімет көбінде автентификация емес. Бұл қағаз 2019 жылдың жарым- жылдық тапсырмасына КолумбияNLP жіберілуін көрсетеді. 8. тапсырмасы: Компаттың сұрақтар жауап беру форумында факты тексеру. Біз Qatar Living форумындағы ескі ілеспелердің үлкен корпус үшін тіл моделін қанша жақсы түрлерін (шындық, сұрақтар, социализациялау) анықтайтын және бір форумдан жазылған ілеспелердің жауаптарды жауап беру үшін көмектеседі. Біздің жүйеіміз 4- мен 2- ші тапсырманы A (сұрақ түрлерінің классификациясы) және B (жауап шындық тапсырмаларының алдындағы дұрыс метрикалық түріне негізделген) жүйеіміз а', 'lt': 'Bendrijos atsakymų į klausimus forumai šiandien yra labai populiarūs, nes jie yra veiksmingos priemonės bendruomenėms dalytis informacija apie konkrečias temas. Tačiau šių forumų informacija dažnai nėra autentiška. Šiame dokumente pateikiamas ColumbiaNLP pateiktas pranešimas apie 8 užduotį „Pusmečio vertinimas – 2019 m. – Faktų tikrinimas Bendrijos atsakymų į klausimus forumuose“. Mes parodome, kaip patobulintas kalbos modelis dideliame nenotiruotoje senų sričių korpuse iš Kataro gyvenimo forumo padeda mums klasifikuoti klausimų tipus (faktines, nuomones, socializacijas) ir įvertinti atsakymų į bendrą užduotį, pažymėtą duomenimis iš to paties forumo, faktiškumą. Mūsų sistema baigė atitinkamai ketvirtąją ir antrąją užduotis A (klausimo tipo klasifikacija) ir B (atsakymo faktų prognozė), remiantis oficialia tikslumo metrija.', 'mk': 'Форумите за одговори на прашањата на заедницата се многу популарни денес, бидејќи претставуваат ефикасни средства за заедниците да споделат информации околу одредени теми. Но информациите споделени на овие форуми честопати не се автентични. Овој документ го претставува поднесувањето на КолумбијаNLP за задачата 8: Проверка на фактите во форумите за одговори на прашањата на заедницата. Ние покажуваме колку финетизирањето на јазичкиот модел на голем незабележан корпус стари жици од Катар Живеење форумот ни помага да ги класификуваме видовите на прашања (фактични, мислења, социјализирање) и да ја процениме факталноста на одговорите на заедничките податоци со означена задача од истиот фор Our system finished 4th and 2nd on Subtask A (question type classification) and B (answer factuality prediction), respectively, based on the official metric of accuracy.', 'ms': 'Forum Perjawapan Pertanyaan Komuniti kini sangat populer, kerana mereka mewakili cara yang efektif bagi komuniti untuk berkongsi maklumat mengenai topik tertentu. But the information shared on these forums are often not authentic.  Kertas ini memperkenalkan penghantaran ColumbiaNLP untuk SemEval-2019 Tugas 8: Pemeriksaan Fakta dalam Forum Jawapan soalan Komuniti. Kami menunjukkan bagaimana penyesuaian model bahasa pada korpus besar tanpa catatan threads lama dari forum Qatar Living membantu kami untuk mengklasifikasi jenis soalan (fakta, pendapat, persekutuan) dan untuk menilai faktualiti jawapan pada tugas berkongsi data yang ditabel dari forum yang sama. Sistem kami selesai ke-4 dan ke-2 pada Subtugas A (kelasukan jenis soalan) dan B (ramalan faktualiti jawapan), berdasarkan metrik keakuran rasmi.', 'ml': 'സമൂഹത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യം ഇന്ന് വളരെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഫോര്\u200dമുകളാണ്. കാരണം സമൂഹത്തിന്റെ പ്രത്യേക വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രത്യേക വിവരങ്ങള പക്ഷെ ഈ ഫോര്\u200dമുകളില്\u200d പങ്കെടുത്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പലപ്പോഴും യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥമായിട്ടില്ല. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 8: സമൂഹത്തിലെ ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം ഫോര്\u200dമുകളില്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഫോര്\u200dമുകള്\u200dക്ക് കൊളംബി കാത്താര്\u200d ലൈവിംഗ് ഫോര്\u200dമില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള പഴയ ത്രീഡുകളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ഒരു ഭാഷ മോഡലില്\u200d എത്ര നന്നായി മാതൃകയുണ്ടാക്കുന്നുവെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു തരം ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്ക നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ സംവിധാനത്തില്\u200d നാലാം രണ്ടാമത്തേതും സുബ്ബട്ട് എ (ചോദ്യ തരത്തില്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d) ബി (ഉത്തരം സത്യം പ്', 'pl': 'Forum odpowiedzi na pytania społecznościowe są obecnie bardzo popularne, ponieważ stanowią skuteczny sposób dla społeczności do dzielenia się informacjami dotyczącymi konkretnych tematów. Ale informacje udostępniane na tych forach często nie są autentyczne. Niniejszy artykuł przedstawia zgłoszenie ColumbiaNLP do SemEval-2019 Task 8: Sprawdzanie faktów na forum odpowiedzi na pytania społecznościowe. Pokazujemy, jak dopracowanie modelu językowego na dużym, niezapisanym korpusie starych wątków z forum Qatar Living pomaga nam klasyfikować typy pytań (faktyczne, opiniowe, socjalizacyjne) i ocenić faktyczność odpowiedzi na wspólne zadanie oznaczone danymi z tego samego forum. Nasz system zakończył się na czwartym i drugim podzadaniu A (klasyfikacja typu pytania) oraz B (predykcja faktyczności odpowiedzi), w oparciu o oficjalną metrykę dokładności.', 'mt': 'Il-fora Komunitarji għat-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet illum huma popolari ħafna, peress li jirrappreżentaw mezzi effettivi għall-komunitajiet biex jaqsmu informazzjoni dwar suġġetti partikolari. Iżda l-informazzjoni kondiviża f’dawn il-fora spiss mhijiex awtentika. Dan id-dokument jippreżenta s-sottomissjoni tal-ColumbiaNLP għas-SemEval-2019 Task 8: Verifika tal-Fatti fil-Forums Komunitarji għat-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet. Aħna nuru kif l-irfinar ta’ mudell lingwistiku fuq korpus kbir mhux innotat ta’ ħjut qodma mill-forum tal-Qatar Għajxien jgħinuna nikklassifikaw it-tipi ta’ mistoqsijiet (fattwali, opinjoni, soċjalizzazzjoni) u niġudikaw il-fattwalità tat-tweġibiet fuq il-kompitu kondiviż bit-tikketta tad-dejta mill-istess forum. Our system finished 4th and 2nd on Subtask A (question type classification) and B (answer factuality prediction), respectively, based on the official metric of accuracy.', 'mn': 'Одоо нийгмийн асуултуудын хариулт хэлбэрүүд нь өнөөдөр маш олон хүн төрөлхтөн юм. Учир нь нийгмийн тодорхой сэдэв дээр мэдээллийг хуваалцах эффективных арга замыг илэрхийлж Гэхдээ эдгээр форумуудын тухай хуваалцагдсан мэдээлэл ихэвчлэн үнэн биш. Энэ цаас нь Колумбияны NLP-ын SemEval-2019-ийн ажил 8-ын төлөөлөгчийн асуулт хариулт хэмжээний үнэний шалгалтыг харуулдаг. Бид Катар амьдралын хуучин хэлний загварыг хэр сайн тодорхойлж чадахыг харуулж байна. Катар амьдралын форум нь бидэнд асуулт төрлүүдийг (үнэндээ, ойлголт, нийгмийн төлөөлөл) ангилах болон ижил форумын нэрлэгдсэн ажлын хариултын үнэндээ шалгаж өгдөг. Бидний систем A-ын 4-т, 2-т (асуулт төрлийн хэлбэр) болон B-т (хариулт үнэндээ тодорхойлолтой тодорхойлолтой тодорхойлолтой хэлбэрээр) 4-т дууслаа.', 'no': 'I dag er det veldig populære forume for å svara på spørsmål i fellesskapet, fordi dei representerer effektive måtar for å dele informasjon om spesielle emner. Men informasjonen delt på desse forumenene er ofte ikkje autentisk. Denne papiret viser kolobiaNLP-tillegget for semiEval-2019-oppgåva 8: Faktisk kontroll i tilfeldige spørsmålsforsøk. Vi viser korleis ein språk-modell skal finnast på ein stor ikkje-anonsert korpus av gamle trådar frå Qatar-levende forum hjelper oss til å klassifisera spørsmåltypar (faktisk, mening, sosialisering) og å bestemme faktisk svar på den delte oppgåva merket data frå samme forum. Systemet vårt fullførte 4. og 2. på suboppgåva A (klassifikasjon av spørsmåltype) og B (forhåndsvising av svar på faktualitet), basert på den offisielle metriske nøyaktighet.', 'ro': 'Forumurile de răspuns la întrebări comunitare sunt foarte populare în zilele noastre, deoarece reprezintă mijloace eficiente pentru comunități de a partaja informații despre anumite subiecte. Dar informațiile partajate pe aceste forumuri nu sunt adesea autentice. Această lucrare prezintă depunerea ColumbiaNLP pentru Sarcina SemEval-2019 8: Verificarea faptelor în forumurile comunitare de răspuns la întrebări. Vă arătăm cum reglarea fină a unui model lingvistic pe un corpus larg neanotat de subiecte vechi de pe forumul Qatar Living ne ajută să clasificăm tipurile de întrebări (fapte, opinie, socializare) și să judecăm faptalitatea răspunsurilor pe sarcina partajată etichetată datele din același forum. Sistemul nostru a terminat al patrulea și al doilea pe Subsarcina A (clasificarea tipului de întrebare) și respectiv B (predicția factualității răspunsurilor), bazată pe metrica oficială de precizie.', 'sr': 'Danas su forumi za odgovor na pitanja zajednice veoma popularni, jer predstavljaju efikasne sredstave za zajednice da podijele informacije o posebnim temama. Ali podijeljene informacije o tim forumima često nisu autentične. Ovaj papir predstavlja podnošenje KolumbijaNLP za pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 8: provjera činjenica u Forumima odgovora na pitanja zajednice. Pokazujemo kako je dobar režim jezičkog model a na velikom neoznačenom korpusu starih prašina iz Qatarskog foruma koja nam pomaže da klasifikujemo vrste pitanja (činjenica, mišljenje, socijalizacija) i da osudimo činjenicu odgovora na zajedničkom zadatku označene podatke iz iste foruma. Naš sistem je završio 4. i 2. na podzadatku A (klasifikacija tipa pitanja) i B (predviđanje realnosti odgovora), na osnovu zvanične metrike tačnosti.', 'si': 'සමාජ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අද විශේෂයෙන් ගොඩක් ලොක්කු වෙනවා, ඒ වගේම ඔවුන් සම ඒත් මේ සංවිධානයේ සම්බන්ධ තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ නෙවෙයි. මේ පැත්තේ කොලෝම්බියාන්ලියාන්ප් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් සේම්වල්-2019 වැඩ 8 වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dර අපි පෙන්වන්නේ කාටාර් ජීවිත ප්\u200dරවේශයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න වර්ගයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න වර්ගයෙන් අපිට උදව් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න වර්ගය (ඇත්තටම, හිතන, සාමාජිකයෙන්) වර්ගයේ ප්\u200dරතික අපේ පද්ධතිය අවස්ථාව 4වෙනි 2වෙනි අවස්ථාව A (ප්\u200dරශ්න වර්ගයක් වර්ගයක්) සහ B (ප්\u200dරශ්න වර්ගයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා), විශේ', 'so': "Summada jawaabta su'aalaha bulshada waa dad aad u maaruf, sababtoo ah waxay leeyihiin macluumaad faa’iido leh oo ay bulshada ku qaybsadaan macluumaad ku saabsan arrimaha gaarka ah. Laakiin macluumaadka ku saabsan warqadahan inta badan ma ahan mid dhab ah. This paper presents the ColumbiaNLP submission for the SemEval-2019 Task 8: Fact-Checking in Community Question Answering Forums.  Waxaynu tusnaynaa sidoo kale sameynta tusaale ahaan afka oo aan la magacaabin, kooxda hore ee qatar Living ayaa nooga caawinaya si aan u fasaxno noocyada su'aalaha (asalka, fikirka, bulshada) iyo in aan xukunno xaqiiqnimada jawaabaha ku saabsan arrimaha la qaybsan oo lagu qoray macluumaadka la qoray ee isku koofiyey. nidaamkayagii wuxuu ku dhamaaday qiyaastii rasmiga ah ee rasmiga ah ee ku qoran sub-safka A (fasaxa su'aalka) iyo B (ka hor dhigidda xaqiiqa ah).", 'sv': 'Forum för att besvara frågor är mycket populära idag, eftersom de utgör ett effektivt sätt för communityn att dela information kring specifika ämnen. Men den information som delas på dessa forum är ofta inte äkta. Denna uppsats presenterar ColumbiaNLP-inlämningen för SemEval-2019 Task 8: Fact-Checking in Community Questanswering Forum. Vi visar hur finjustering av en språkmodell på en stor obeskriven samling gamla trådar från Qatar Living forum hjälper oss att klassificera frågetyper (fakta, åsikt, socialisering) och att bedöma faktauppgifterna i svaren på den delade uppgiften märkta data från samma forum. Vårt system slutade 4:e och 2:a på deluppgift A (frågetypsklassificering) respektive B (svarsfatualitetsprediktion), baserat på den officiella mätaren för noggrannhet.', 'ta': 'சமுதாயத்தில் கேள்வி பதில் குறிப்பிட்ட தலைப்பு ஆனால் இந்த குறிப்புகளில் பகிர்ந்த தகவல் பெரும்பாலும் உண்மையில்லை. இந்த தாள் செம்Eval- 2019 செயல் 8: சமுதாயத்தில் கேள்வி பதில் கேட்கையில் நிரல் சரிபார்க்கிறது. நாம் எவ்வளவு நன்றாக மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரியை காட்டுகிறோம் ஒரு பெரிய புதிய புதிய மாதிரியை காட்டுகிறோம் கேள்வி வகைகளை வகைப்படுத்த உதவுகிறது (உண்மையாக, கருத்து, சமூகத்திற்கு) மற எங்கள் அமைப்பு துணை பணி A (கேள்வி வகுப்பு வகுப்பு) மற்றும் B (விடை உண்மையை முடிவு, சரியான முறையை அடிப்படையில் 4 மற்றும் 2வது முடிந்', 'ur': 'امروز کمونٹی سؤال جواب دینے والی پورومز بہت محبوب ہیں، کیونکہ وہ کمونٹیوں کے لئے مثبت وسائل ہیں کہ مشخص موضوع کے بارے میں اطلاعات کا شریک کریں. لیکن ان فرموموموں کے بارے میں مشترک معلومات اکثر سچا نہیں ہے۔ This paper presents the ColumbiaNLP submission for the SemEval-2019 Task 8: Fact-Checking in Community Question Answering Forums. ہم کس طرح ایک زبان مدل کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ قاتار زندگی فورمم سے ایک بڑے بغیر معلوم ہونے والی کورپوس پر بہت اچھی طرح تدبیر کرنے کی مدد کرتا ہے کہ ہم سوال کی طرح (حقیقی، نظر، سوچولیزی) کا کلاس کریں اور ایک ہی فرموم سے لکھی ہوئی اطلاعات کے حقیقت کا فیصلہ کریں۔ ہمارا سیستم 4 اور 2 سوب ٹاکس A (سؤال ٹیکس کلیسی) اور B (جواب حقیقت کی پیش بینی) پر پورا ہوا، اس کے مطابق، رسمی میٹریک دقیق پر بنیاد ہوا۔', 'uz': "Bugun paytda jamiyat javob beruvchi forumlari juda popular, chunki ular jamiyatlarni xossa mavzularning haqida maʼlumotni qayta qilish uchun ishlaydi. Lekin bu forumlarda qayta boʻlgan maʼlumot odatda haqiqiqiy emas. Name Biz Qatar Living Forum kabi katta notoʻgʻri qanday bir tilning modelini ajratishni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, bizga savol turlarini (haqiqiqiy, fikrlash, jamiyatsiya) shakllashga yordam beramiz va bir forum bilan bir necha ishlab chiqarilgan vazifa haqida javoblarning haqiqida xabar qilish mumkin. Bizning tizimimiz tashkilotlar A (savol turlari) va B (haqiqiqiy hisoboti) bilan birinchi va ikkinchi marta ishga tushirildi.", 'vi': 'Các diễn đàn Trả lời câu hỏi của Cộng đồng giờ rất phổ biến, vì chúng là phương tiện hiệu quả cho cộng đồng chia sẻ thông tin về các chủ đề cụ thể. Nhưng thông tin được chia sẻ trên các diễn đàn không phải là chính xác. Bài phát hành này sẽ đệ trình đơn khiếu nại của ColumbiaNchọc về nhiệm vụ SemEvl-2009 8: Kiểm tra thực tế trong Hội Kín Câu hỏi Vùng Cộng đồng. Chúng tôi cho thấy việc chỉnh sửa mô hình ngôn ngữ trên một tập thể cũ lớn mà không ghi chú từ forum Qatar Living giúp chúng tôi phân loại các kiểu câu hỏi (factor, opinion, socializing) và đánh giá các tính chất của câu trả lời về việc chia sẻ được đánh dấu dữ liệu từ cùng một diễn đàn. Hệ thống của chúng tôi hoàn thành thứ tư và thứ hai theo phân tích A (phân loại câu hỏi) và B (dự đoán tính tình trạng trả lời), dựa trên thước đo chính xác chính xác chính xác chính thức.', 'da': "Fællesskabsspørgsmål Besvarelsesfora er meget populære i dag, da de repræsenterer effektive midler for fællesskaber til at dele information omkring bestemte emner. Men de oplysninger, der deles på disse fora, er ofte ikke autentiske. Denne artikel præsenterer ColumbiaNLP's indlæg til SemEval-2019 Task 8: Fact-Checking in Community Spørgsmål Answering Forum. Vi viser, hvordan finjustering af en sprogmodel på et stort ubestemt korpus af gamle tråde fra Qatar Living forum hjælper os med at klassificere spørgsmålstyper (faktuelle, meninger, socialisering) og til at bedømme faktualiteten af svar på den delte opgave mærket data fra samme forum. Vores system sluttede 4. og 2. på subopgave A (spørgsmålstypeklassificering) og B (svar faktualitet forudsigelse), baseret på den officielle metric for nøjagtighed.", 'bg': 'Форумите за отговор на въпроси на общността са много популярни в днешно време, тъй като представляват ефективно средство за общностите да споделят информация по конкретни теми. Но информацията, споделена на тези форуми, често не е автентична. Настоящата статия представя представянето на доклада за задача 8: Проверка на фактите във форумите за отговор на въпроси на общността. Показваме как фината настройка на езиковия модел върху голям неописан корпус от стари теми от форума ни помага да класифицираме типовете въпроси (фактически, мнения, социализиране) и да преценим фактическостта на отговорите на споделената задача, етикетирани данни от същия форум. Нашата система завърши 4-та и 2-ра по подзадача А (класификация на типа въпроси) и Б (прогнозиране на фактическостта на отговора), съответно въз основа на официалния показател за точност.', 'nl': 'Community Question Beantwoord forums zijn tegenwoordig erg populair, omdat ze effectieve middelen vormen voor gemeenschappen om informatie over bepaalde onderwerpen te delen. Maar de informatie die op deze forums wordt gedeeld, is vaak niet authentiek. Dit artikel presenteert de ColumbiaNLP inzending voor de SemEval-2019 Taak 8: Fact-Checking in Community Question Respwering Forums. We laten zien hoe het finetunen van een taalmodel op een groot ongenoteerd corpus van oude threads uit het Qatar Living forum ons helpt om vraagtypen (feitelijk, mening, socialiseren) te classificeren en de feitelijkheid van antwoorden te beoordelen op de gedeelde taak gelabelde data van hetzelfde forum. Ons systeem eindigde 4e en 2e op respectievelijk Subtaak A (vraagtype classificatie) en B (antwoord feitelijkheid voorspelling), gebaseerd op de officiële metric van nauwkeurigheid.', 'de': 'Community Fragebeantworter Foren sind heutzutage sehr beliebt, da sie effektive Mittel für Communities darstellen, um Informationen zu bestimmten Themen auszutauschen. Aber die Informationen, die in diesen Foren geteilt werden, sind oft nicht authentisch. Dieses Papier stellt die ColumbiaNLP-Einreichung für die SemEval-2019 Task 8: Fact-Checking in Community Question Answering Foren vor. Wir zeigen, wie die Feinabstimmung eines Sprachmodells auf einem großen, nicht notierten Korpus alter Threads aus dem Qatar Living Forum uns hilft, Fragetypen (Faktisch, Meinung, Sozialisierung) zu klassifizieren und die Faktenhaftigkeit von Antworten auf den geteilten Aufgaben beschrifteten Daten aus demselben Forum zu beurteilen. Unser System wurde Vierter und Zweiter bei Subtask A (Fragetyp Klassifizierung) bzw. B (Antwort Faktum Vorhersage), basierend auf der offiziellen Metrik der Genauigkeit.', 'hr': 'Danas su forumi za odgovor na pitanja zajednice veoma popularni, jer predstavljaju učinkovite sredstva za zajednice da podijele informacije o posebnim temama. Ali podijeljene informacije o tim forumima često nisu autentične. Ovaj papir predstavlja podatke KolumbijaNLP za zadatak 8. polovičnog razdoblja 2019. godine: provjera činjenica u Forumima odgovora na pitanja zajednice. Mi pokazujemo kako dobro određivanje jezičkog model a na velikom neoznačenom korpusu starih prašina iz Qatar Living foruma pomaže nam da klasifikujemo vrste pitanja (činjenica, mišljenje, socijalizacija) i sudimo o činjenici odgovora na zajedničkom zadatku označene podatke iz iste foruma. Naš sustav je završio 4. i 2. na podzadatku A (klasifikacija tipa pitanja) i B (predviđanje odgovornosti činjenice), na temelju službenog metrika preciznosti.', 'id': 'Forum Pertanyaan Komunitas kini sangat populer, karena mereka mewakili cara yang efektif bagi komunitas untuk berbagi informasi mengenai topik tertentu. Tapi informasi yang dibagi di forum ini sering tidak autentik. Kertas ini mempersembahkan pengiriman ColumbiaNLP untuk SemEval-2019 Tugas 8: Pemeriksaan Fakta dalam Forum Jawaban Pertanyaan Komunitas. Kami menunjukkan bagaimana penyesuaian model bahasa pada tubuh besar tanpa catatan threads lama dari forum Qatar Hidup membantu kita untuk mengklasifikasi jenis pertanyaan (fakta, pendapat, sosialisasi) dan untuk menilai faktalitas jawaban pada tugas berbagi data labeled dari forum yang sama. Sistem kami selesai ke-4 dan ke-2 di Subtask A (klasifikasi tipe pertanyaan) dan B (prediksi faktualitas jawaban), berdasarkan metrik resmi akurasi.', 'fa': 'در حال حاضر فرموم جواب سوال اجتماعی بسیار مشهور هستند، زیرا آنها وسیله\u200cهای موثر برای اجتماعی نشان می\u200cدهند که اطلاعات در مورد موضوع مخصوص را شریک کنند. ولی اطلاعات که در این فرموم ها مشترک شده اغلب حقیقی نیستند. این کاغذ تحویل کلمبیاNLP برای ماموریت ۲۰۱۹: بررسی حقیقت در فورمهای پاسخ جواب سوال اجتماعی را نشان می دهد. ما نشان می دهیم که چقدر یک مدل زبانی را در یک کورپوس بزرگ غیر شناخته از نژاد قدیمی از فورم زنده Qatar به ما کمک می کند تا نوع سؤال (حقیقت، نظر، اجتماعی) را به کلاس بگذاریم و حقیقت پاسخ\u200cهای روی کار مشترک اطلاعات از یک فورم قائل کنیم. سیستم ما چهارمین و دومین بر اساس متریک دقیق رسمی پایان داد.', 'ko': '현재 지역사회 퀴즈 포럼은 지역사회가 특정한 주제 정보를 공유하는 효과적인 수단이기 때문에 매우 유행한다.그러나 이런 포럼에서 공유된 정보는 종종 진실하지 않다.본고는 콜롬비아대학이 제출한SemEval-2019임무8: 커뮤니티 퀴즈 포럼에서의 사실검사를 소개한다.카타르 라이프 포럼(Qatar Living forum)의 대형 주석이 없는 구선정 어료 라이브러리에서 언어 모델을 미세하게 조정하는 방법을 보여줌으로써 문제 유형(사실, 관점, 사교)을 분류하고 같은 포럼에서 나온 공유 임무 표기 데이터의 답안의 진실성을 판단하는 데 도움을 준다.공식 정확도 지표에 따르면 우리 시스템은 하위 임무 A(문제 유형 분류)와 B(답안 진실성 예측)에서 각각 4위와 2위를 차지했다.', 'tr': "Toplumaty soragy jogap bermek forumlary şu wagt örän meşhurdyr, sebäbi olar jemgyýetlere häzirki temalarda maglumat paylaşmak üçin täsirli yöntemlerdir. Emma bu forumlarda bölünen maglumat köplenç hakyky däl. Bu kagyz SemEval-2019 Görevi 8: Fact-Checking in Community Question Answering Forums üçin KolumbiýaNLP jemgyýetini görkez. Qatar ýa şaýan forumdan öňki sahypalaryň üstünde nähili gowy düzümlenmäge kömek eden dil nusgasyny görkeýäris. Bizim sistemimiz 4-nji we 2-nji Subtask A'da (sorag tipi klasifikasynda) we B-de (sorag hakykatynyň öngörümi), resmi metriýasynda sabitlenmiş.", 'sw': 'Community Question Answering forums are very popular nowadays, as they represent effective means for communities to share information around particular topics.  Lakini taarifa zilizowekwa kwenye jukwaa hizi mara nyingi hazina uhalisia. Gazeti hili linaonyesha ujumbe wa ColumbiaNLP kwa ajili ya kazi ya SemEval-2019 8: Kuchungulia Fact in Swali to Answer Jukwaa. Tunaonyesha jinsi mifano nzuri ya lugha kwenye viungo vikubwa vya matangazo ya zamani yasiyotambuliwa kutoka kwenye jukwaa la Living la Qatar inatusaidia kutufanua aina ya maswali (ukweli, maoni, jamii) na kuhukumu ukweli wa majibu juu ya kazi zilizoshirikishwa kama taarifa kutoka jukwaa hilo. Mfumo wetu ulimaliza kwa asilimia ya 4 na 2 kwenye kazi A (aina ya aina ya swali) na B (utabiri wa ukweli wa majibu), kwa kutumia mitazamo rasmi ya uhakika.', 'am': 'ማኅበረሰብ መልስ ጦማሪያዎች ዛሬ እጅግ የሚቆጠሩ ናቸው፡፡ But the information shared on these forums are often not authentic.  ይህ ገጽ ለSemEval-2019 ስራ 8: የውይይት-ምርጫን በመጠየቅ ጥያቄ ላይ የመልስ ውይይት ማረጋገጫ ያቀርባል፡፡ በካታር Living ፎርማት ያሉትን ታላላቅ ያልታወቀ የቋንቋ ምሳሌ እንዴት ያሳየናል፡፡ የሥርዓት ትክክለኛ ትክክለኛ በመሠረት ላይ ሥርዓታችን አዳራዊ እና በ (የጥያቄ ዓይነት ክፍል) እና B (የመለስ ውይይት ትንቢት) በመፈጸም 4 እና 2ኛ ስርዓት ጨርሷል፡፡', 'sq': 'Forumet e përgjigjeve të pyetjeve të komunitetit janë shumë popullore sot, pasi ato përfaqësojnë mjete efektive për komunitetet për të ndarë informacion rreth çështjeve të veçanta. Por informacioni i ndarë në këto forume shpesh nuk është autentik. Ky dokument paraqet paraqitjen e ColumbiaNLP për detyrën SemEval-2019 8: Kontrollimi i fakteve në forumet e përgjigjeve të pyetjeve të komunitetit. Ne tregojmë se si rregullimi i një modeli gjuhësh në një korpus të madh të papërshënuar të filave të vjetra nga forumi i jetesës së Katarit na ndihmon të klasifikojmë llojet e pyetjeve (fakte, opinion, socializim) dhe të gjykojmë fakticitetin e përgjigjeve në detyrën e përbashkët të dhëna të etiketuara nga i njëjti forum. Sistemi ynë përfundoi respektivisht të katërtën dhe të dytën në nëndetyrën A (klasifikimin e tipit të pyetjes) dhe B (parashikimin e faktit të përgjigjes), bazuar respektivisht në metrikën zyrtare të saktësisë.', 'af': "Kommunikasievraag Antwoord-forums is vandag baie populaar, omdat hulle effektief betekenis vir gemeenskappe om inligting oor spesifieke onderwerpe te deel. Maar die inligting wat op hierdie forums gedeel is, is dikwels nie geldigheid nie. Hierdie papier stel die KolumbiaNLP-onderskrywing voor die semiEval-2019 taak 8: Fact-Checking in gemeenskapsVrag Antwoordeforme. Ons wys hoe fyn-tuning van 'n taal model op 'n groot onbekende korpus van ou dreede van Qatar lewende forum help ons om vraagtipes (faktuele, menigte, sosialisering) te klassifiseer en om die faktualiteit van antwoorde op die gedeelde taak gemerkte data van dieselfde forum te oordeel. Ons stelsel klaar 4de en 2de op Subtaak A (vraagtipe klasifikasie) en B (antwoord faktualiteit voorskou), respektief, gebaseer op die offisiele metrie van presisiteit.", 'hy': 'Այսօր համայնքի հարցերի պատասխանների ֆորմները շատ հայտնի են, քանի որ դրանք ներկայացնում են համայնքների համար արդյունավետ միջոցներ տեղեկատվության կիսվելու որոշակի թեմաների շուրջ: Բայց այս ֆորմում կիսվող տեղեկատվությունը հաճախ անիրական չէ: Այս փաստաթղթին ներկայացնում է Կոլումբիայի ՆԼՊ-ի ներկայացումը 2019 թ.-ի կիսագնդի 8. հանրային հարցերի պատասխանատվության ֆորումների փաստերի ստուգելու համար: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես լեզվի մոդելը կատարելագործելը Կատարի ապրելու ֆորմում հին թելերի մեծ աննկարագրված մարմնի վրա օգնում է մեզ դասակարգել հարցերի տեսակները (փաստական, կարծիքային, սոցիալացման) և դատել պատասխանների փաստականությունը նույն ֆորմում նշված տվյալների հետ: Մեր համակարգը ավարտեց 4-րդը և 2-րդը հարցի A-ի (հարցի տիպի դասակարգման) և B-ի (պատասխանի փաստականության կանխատեսումը) հիմնված ճշգրտության պաշտոնական չափով:', 'az': 'Bu gün toplum soruşu cavab verən forumlar çox məşhurdur, çünki onlar toplum məsələlərinin məlumatları haqqında məlumat paylaşması üçün faydalı yollar göstərirlər. Lakin bu forumlarda paylaşılan məlumat çox səbəb haqq deyildir. Bu kağıt, ÜmiEval-2019 Task 8 üçün KolumbiyaNLP təsdiqlənməsini göstərir: Cənnətlə soruşma cavab verən Förümlərdə fakt-təsdiqlənməsi. Biz Qatar Living forumdan keçmiş köhnə korpus üzərində dil modelini necə düzəltdiyini göstəririk ki, sual növlərini (əslində, fikir, sosyalizasyon) dəyişdirmək və aynı forumdan etiketlənmiş məlumatların paylaşılması haqqında cavab vermək bizə kömək edir. Bizim sistemimiz 4-ci və 2-ci Subtask A (sual növü klasifikasyonu) və B (cavab verilməsi təsəvvür edilən təsəvvür təsəvvür edilmişdir).', 'bs': 'Danas su forumi za odgovor na pitanje zajednice veoma popularni, jer predstavljaju učinkovite sredstva za zajednice da podijele informacije o posebnim temama. Ali podijeljene informacije o tim forumima često nisu autentične. Ovaj papir predstavlja predlog KolumbijaNLP za zadatak 8. polovičnog razdoblja 2019. godine: provjera činjenica u Forumima odgovora na pitanja zajednice. Mi pokazujemo kako dobro određivanje jezičkog model a na velikom neoznačenom korpusu starih prašina iz Qatar Living foruma pomaže nam da klasifikujemo vrste pitanja (činjenica, mišljenje, socijalizacija) i da osudimo činjenicu odgovora na zajedničkom zadatku označene podatke iz iste foruma. Naš sistem je završio 4. i 2. na podzadatku A (klasifikacija tipa pitanja) i B (predviđanje realnosti odgovora), na osnovu zvanične metrike preciznosti.', 'bn': 'সম্প্রদায়ের উত্তর প্রশ্ন এখন খুবই জনপ্রিয়, কারণ তারা সম্প্রদায়ের কার্যকর উপায় প্রতিনিধিত্ব করছে বিশেষ বিষয়ে তথ্য শেয়ার করতে। But the information shared on these forums are often not authentic.  এই কাগজটি সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের জন্য কলোম্বিয়াএনএলপি প্রদান করেছে: কমিউনিটি প্রশ্নের উত্তর ফোরামে মুখোমুখি পরীক্ষা করছে। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি কাতার লিভিং ফোরাম থেকে বিশাল অজানা একটি ভাষার মডেলে কিভাবে ভাষার মডেলের ভাষায় ভালোভাবে প্রশ্নের ধরনের (আসল, মতামত, সমাজের) বিভক্ত করে এবং একই ফোরামে শেয়ার করা  আমাদের সিস্টেম সাবকাজ এ (প্রশ্নের ধরনের গ্রাফিকেশন) এবং বি (উত্তরের বাস্তবতা ভবিষ্যৎবাণী) সমাপ্ত হয়েছে সরকারি সঠিক পদ্ধতির উপর ভ', 'ca': 'Els fòrums comunitaris de resposta a preguntes són molt populars avui en dia, perquè representen mitjans efectius per a les comunitats per compartir informació sobre temes concrets. Però la informació compartida en aquests fòrums sovint no és autèntica. Aquest paper presenta la presentació de ColumbiaNLP per la tasca 8 del SemEval-2019: Verifica de fets en foros comunitaris de resposta a preguntes. Mostrem com ajustar un model de llenguatge en un gran corpus sense notar de fils antics del fòrum de vida de Qatar ens ajuda a classificar els tipus de preguntes (fets, opinió, socialització) i a jugar la realitat de les respostes en la tasca compartida etiquetada de dades del mateix fòrum. El nostre sistema va acabar la 4ª i la 2ª de la Subtasca A (classificació del tipus de pregunta) i B (predicció de factualitat de resposta), respectivament, basant-se en la mètrica oficial de precisió.', 'cs': 'Fóra pro odpovědi na otázky komunity jsou dnes velmi populární, protože představují efektivní prostředky pro komunity sdílet informace o konkrétních tématech. Informace sdílené na těchto fórech však často nejsou autentické. Tento článek představuje příspěvek ColumbiaNLP pro SemEval-2019 Task 8: Kontrola faktů ve fórech pro odpovědi na otázky komunity. Ukážeme, jak jemné ladění jazykového modelu na velkém nezapsaném korpusu starých vláken z fóra Qatar Living nám pomáhá klasifikovat typy otázek (faktické, názorové, socializační) a posoudit skutečnost odpovědí na sdílených úkolech označených daty ze stejného fóra. Náš systém skončil čtvrtý a druhý na podúkolu A (klasifikace typu otázky) a B (predikce faktality odpovědi), respektive na základě oficiální metriky přesnosti.', 'fi': 'Yhteisökysymyksiin vastaaminen foorumit ovat nykyään erittäin suosittuja, koska ne tarjoavat yhteisölle tehokkaita keinoja jakaa tietoa tietyistä aiheista. Mutta näillä foorumeilla jaetut tiedot eivät usein ole aitoja. Tämä artikkeli esittelee ColumbiaNLP:n julkaisun SemEval-2019 Task 8: Fact-Checking in Community Question Answering Forums. Näytämme, miten Qatar Living -foorumin vanhojen viestiketjujen suuren, merkitsemättömän korpusen kielimallin hienosäätäminen auttaa meitä luokittelemaan kysymystyyppejä (fakta, mielipide, sosiaalistaminen) ja arvioimaan vastausten tosiasiallisuutta samalta foorumilta peräisin olevaan jaettuun tehtävään merkittyyn dataan. Järjestelmämme sijoittui neljänneksi ja toiseksi alitehtävässä A (kysymystyyppiluokitus) ja B (vastausfaktatiivisuuden ennustus) virallisen tarkkuusmittarin perusteella.', 'et': 'Kogukonna küsimustele vastamise foorumid on tänapäeval väga populaarsed, kuna need kujutavad endast tõhusat vahendit kogukondadele teabe jagamiseks konkreetsete teemade kohta. Kuid nendel foorumitel jagatud teave ei ole sageli autentne. Käesolevas artiklis esitatakse ColumbiaNLP esitatud ettepanek SemEval-2019 ülesande 8: faktide kontrollimine ühenduse küsimustele vastamise foorumites. Näitame, kuidas Qatar Livingi foorumi vanade teemade suure märkimata korpuse keelemudeli täpsustamine aitab meil klassifitseerida küsimuste tüüpe (faktilised, arvamused, sotsialiseerimine) ja hinnata vastuste faktilisust sama foorumi jagatud ülesandega märgistatud andmete kohta. Meie süsteem lõpetas 4. ja 2. alaülesandel A (küsimuse tüübi klassifikatsioon) ja B (vastuse faktilisuse prognoos), mis põhineb ametlikul täpsusmeetodil.', 'jv': 'Galing Komunat Inggal Manipulan Pero informasi dipun ngomong karo pêrungu iki ora autoèn. Gambar iki bakal ngewehi nggawe ColumbiaNLP tarjamahan kanggo ngilanggar seminval-2011 task 8: Faktu-checker kanggo ngilanggar-pangrungu Bupul Awak dhéwé iso nglanggar kelas-tuning model sing luwih dumadhi karo perusahaan karo hal dumadhi sing gak dhéwé kuwi Ketaré Tulung kesempatan dhéwé ngerasai perusahaan (tanggal, soalêh, iso nggalakno) lan soko nggawe barang langgar sampeyan winih dhéwé berarti data sak perusahaan sing iki. Sistem dhéwé wis mulai 4 lan 2 lan Subtask A', 'he': 'פורמות תשובות לשאלות הקהילתיות היום מאוד פופולריים, כיוון שהם מייצגים אמצעים יעילים לקהילות לחלוק מידע סביב נושאים מסוימים. אבל המידע המשותף על הפורומים האלה לעתים קרובות אינו אמיתי. העבודה הזו מציגה את ההצגה של קולומביה NLP למשימה "SemEval-2019 Task 8: Fact-Checking in Community Question Answering Forums". We show how fine-tuning a language model on a large unannotated corpus of old threads from Qatar Living forum helps us to classify question types (factual, opinion, socializing) and to judge the factuality of answers on the shared task labeled data from the same forum.  Our system finished 4th and 2nd on Subtask A (question type classification) and B (answer factuality prediction), respectively, based on the official metric of accuracy.', 'sk': 'Forumi za odgovarjanje na vprašanja skupnosti so danes zelo priljubljeni, saj predstavljajo učinkovito sredstvo za skupnosti za izmenjavo informacij o določenih temah. Vendar informacije, ki jih delimo na teh forumih, pogosto niso verodostojne. Ta prispevek predstavlja predlog ColumbiaNLP za nalogo SemEval-2019 8: Preverjanje dejstev v forumih za odgovarjanje na vprašanja Skupnosti. Prikazujemo, kako natančno nastavitev jezikovnega modela na velikem neobvezanem korpusu starih tem foruma Qatar Living nam pomaga razvrstiti vrste vprašanj (dejansko, mnenje, druženje) in presoditi dejanskost odgovorov na skupno nalogo označene podatke istega foruma. Naš sistem je zaključil 4. in 2. na podnalogi A (klasifikacija vrste vprašanja) oziroma B (napoved dejanskega odgovora), ki temelji na uradni metriki natančnosti.', 'ha': "Jami'in da ake karɓa wajen jama'a ne mafiya famous a yanzu, kamar yadda sunã wakilisha manyan aiki mai amfani da jamii dõmin su share information a cikin masu husũma masu hususan. Amma kuma ma'anar da aka samun su kan waɗannan jama'a ba su zama masu gaskiya ba. Wannan takardan na bãyar da al'amarin ColembiaNLP wa Tafiyar da SemEV-2019 8: Fact-Check in Commonci SQUESTI Forums. Tuna nũna jinsi masu tsari da misalin harshen a kan wani matsayin na zaman hanyoyi na karatar Living Forum na ƙarfafa mu ga rarrabe nau'i-nau'i (fakta, mawaƙi, socialising) kuma ya yi hukunci ga gaskiya na zama masu jibar da aka raba na aikin da aka rubũta data daga sami jukwar. Tsarinmu ya cika a kan jama'a 4 da 2 na a kan Subaikin A (mai classified nau'in tambaya) da B (mai bastarwa tabbatarwa), a kan karatun misalin na rasmi.", 'bo': 'ཚོགས་སྡེ་ཚན་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལན་གསལ་བ་དེ་ཚོ་དུས་སྐབས་ཆེན་པོ་ཆགས་ཡོད། རྣམ་གྲངས་འདི་དག་གི་བརྡ་སྟོན་དུ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དུ་བདེན་པོ་མ་རེད། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ཀོ་ལོངས་NLP མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་སྐྱོང་ལ་2019 ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད། We show how fine-tuning a language model on a large unannotated corpus of old threads from Qatar Living forum helps us to classify question types (factual, opinion, socializing) and to judge the factuality of answers on the shared task labeled data from the same forum. Our system finished 4th and 2nd on Subtask A (question type classification) and B (answer factuality prediction), respectively, based on the official metric of accuracy.'}
{'en': 'Fermi at SemEval-2019 Task 8 : An elementary but effective approach to Question Discernment in Community QA Forums', 'pt': 'Fermi no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 8: Uma abordagem elementar, mas eficaz, para questionar o discernimento nos fóruns de controle de qualidade da comunidade', 'fr': "Fermi au SEMEVAL-2019 Task 8\xa0: Une approche élémentaire mais efficace du discernement des questions dans les forums d'assurance qualité communautaires", 'ar': 'فيرمي في SemEval-2019 المهمة 8: نهج أولي ولكنه فعال لتمييز الأسئلة في منتديات ضمان الجودة بالمجتمع', 'es': 'Fermi en la Tarea 8 de SemEval-2019: Un enfoque elemental pero efectivo para el discernimiento de preguntas en los foros de control de calidad de la comunidad', 'ja': 'Fermi at SemEval -2019 Task 8:コミュニティQAフォーラムでの質問判断への基本的でありながら効果的なアプローチ', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 8 पर फर्मी: सामुदायिक क्यूए मंचों में प्रश्न विवेक के लिए एक प्राथमिक लेकिन प्रभावी दृष्टिकोण', 'zh': '费米于SemEval-2019务8:社区QA论坛辨其大要而有效者也', 'ru': 'Fermi на SemEval-2019 Задача 8: Элементарный, но эффективный подход к распознаванию вопросов на форумах по обеспечению качества сообществ', 'ga': 'Fermi ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 8: Cur chuige bunúsach ach éifeachtach maidir le hintiúlacht Cheisteanna i bhFóraim Phobail QA', 'ka': 'ტერმთ SemEval-2019 დავალება 8: ელემენტური, მაგრამ ეფექტიური პროგრამა კითხვების განსხვავება საზოგადოებო QA ფორმებში', 'el': 'Καθήκον 8: Μια στοιχειώδης αλλά αποτελεσματική προσέγγιση της Διακρίσεως Ερωτήσεων σε Κοινοτικά Φόρουμ QS', 'hu': 'Fermi a SemEval-2019 8. feladaton: Elemi, de hatékony megközelítés a kérdések megkülönböztetéséhez a közösségi minőségbiztosítási fórumokban', 'it': 'Fermi al SemEval-2019 Task 8: Un approccio elementare ma efficace al discernimento delle domande nei forum comunitari di QA', 'kk': 'Fermi at semiEval-2019 Task 8: An elementary but effective approach to Question Discernment in Community QA Forums', 'lt': 'Fermi per 2019 m. pusmetį 8 užduotis: pagrindinis, bet veiksmingas požiūris į klausimų nagrinėjimą Bendrijos QA forumuose', 'mk': 'Fermi at SemEval-2019 Task 8: An elementary but effective approach to Question Discernment in Community QA Forums', 'ml': 'Fermi at SemEval-2019 Task 8: An elementary but effective approach to Question Discernment in Community QA Forums', 'mt': 'Fermi at SemEval-2019 Task 8: An elementary but effective approach to Question Discernment in Community QA Forums', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Task 8: Нийгмийн QA форумуудын асуултын тухай асуудлын тухай анхны, эффективны арга зам', 'no': 'Fermi på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 8: Eit elementært, men effektivt tilnærming til spørsmålsforskjellen i kommunikasjonsformar QA', 'pl': 'Fermi na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 8: Podstawowe, ale skuteczne podejście do rozpatrywania pytań na społecznościowych forach jakości', 'ro': 'Fermi la SemEval-2019 Task 8: O abordare elementară, dar eficientă a discuției întrebărilor în forumurile comunitare de asigurare a calității', 'sr': 'Fermi na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 8: osnovni ali efikasni pristup razmatranju pitanja u Forumima zajednice QA', 'si': 'Fermi at semeval-2019 Job 8: A Elementary but Effective approach to Query discrernment in the Comunity QA Force', 'so': 'Fermi at SemEval-2019 Task 8: A elementary but effective approach to Question Discrimination in Community QA Forums', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 8: கேள்வி கேட்பாட்டு வித்தியாசம் குறிப்புகளில் ஒரு உறுப்பினர் ஆனால் வெளிப்படையான வழியில்', 'sv': 'Fermi på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 8: En elementär men effektiv metod för frågeställning i gemenskapens QA-forum', 'ur': 'فیرمی سیموئل-2019 ٹاکس ۸ میں: کمونٹی کیا فورموں میں سوال پریشان کے لئے ایک اصلی لیکن اثری طریقہ ہے', 'ms': 'Fermi di SemEval-2019 Tugas 8: Pendekatan dasar tetapi berkesan untuk Penjelasan soalan dalam Forum QA Komuniti', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifani 8: QA Forumlarida savol Discernment in Community', 'vi': '(Fermi at Semkhai-thẩm mĩ) Nhiệm vụ 8: Một phương pháp cơ bản nhưng hiệu quả cho câu hỏi trong cung cấp tổn thất cơ bản', 'bg': 'Задача 8: Елементарен, но ефективен подход към дискретността по въпросите във форумите за оценка на качеството на Общността', 'nl': 'Fermi bij SemEval-2019 Taak 8: Een elementaire maar effectieve benadering van vragendiscernment in Community QA Forums', 'da': 'Fermi ved SemEval-2019 Opgave 8: En elementær, men effektiv tilgang til spørgsmålsdiskerning i Fællesskabets QA-fora', 'hr': 'Fermi na zadatku 8: osnovni ali učinkoviti pristup razmatranju pitanja u Forumima zajednice QA', 'ko': '페미가SemEval-2019임무8: 커뮤니티 QA포럼에서 문제 식별의 기본적이고 효과적인 방법', 'de': 'Fermi bei SemEval-2019 Task 8: Ein elementarer, aber effektiver Ansatz zur Fragendiskriminierung in Community-QA-Foren', 'fa': 'Fermi at SemEval-2019 Task 8: An elementary but effective approach to Question Discernment in Community QA Forums', 'id': 'Fermi di SemEval-2019 Tugas 8: Sebuah pendekatan elementar tapi efektif untuk Discernment Pertanyaan di Forum QA Komunitas', 'tr': 'Fermi at SemEval-2019 Task 8: An elementary but effective approach to Question Discernment in Community QA Forums', 'sw': 'Fermi kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019: Tamko la Kimsingi lakini yenye ufanisi wa namna ya Kutofauti kwa Maswali katika Jukwaa la QA', 'sq': 'Fermi në SemEval-2019 Task 8: Një qasje elementare por efektive për diskrimin e pyetjeve në forumet e QA të komunitetit', 'af': 'Fermi by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 8: 芒聙聶n element锚re, maar effektief toegang tot vraag ondersoek in die gemeenskap QA Forums', 'am': 'Eval-2019 ስራ 8', 'hy': 'Fermi at SemEval-2019 Task 8: An elementary but effective approach to Question Discernment in Community QA Forums', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৮: কমিউনিটি কিউ ফোরামে প্রশ্ন বিচারের কাছে কার্যকর কিন্তু কার্যকর উপায়', 'az': 'Fermi at SemEval-2019 Task 8: Community QA Forumlar캼nda sual f톛rql톛nm톛si 칲칞칲n ilk but effektiv approach', 'ca': 'Fermi a SemEval-2019 Task 8: Un enfocament elementar però eficaç al discerniment de preguntes en foros comunitaris de QA', 'bs': 'Fermi na semiEval-2019 zadatku 8: osnovni ali efikasni pristup razmatranju pitanja u Forumima zajednice QA', 'et': 'Fermi SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 8: Elementaarne, kuid tõhus lähenemine küsimuste eristamisele ühenduse kvaliteedi tagamise foorumites', 'cs': 'Fermi na SemEval-2019 Úkol 8: Základní, ale efektivní přístup k rozhodování o otázkách v komunitních fórech QA', 'fi': 'Fermi SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 8: Perusteellinen mutta tehokas lähestymistapa kysymyserotteluun yhteisön laadunvarmistusfoorumeilla', 'jv': 'Vermi nang semebal-2011 task 8: Sing alas semester nguasai efek dadi Kemerdekaan Obtengahan di Diskernment ning Komunat', 'sk': 'Fermi na SemEval-2019 Naloga 8: Osnovni, a učinkovit pristop k razlikovanju vprašanj v forumih Skupnosti za zagotavljanje kakovosti', 'ha': 'QA Forums', 'bo': 'Fermi at SemEval-2019 Task 8: An elementary but effective approach to Question Discernment in Community QA Forums', 'he': 'פרמי ב-SemEval-2019 משימה 8: גישה יסודית אך יעילה לדיסקרציה של שאלות בפורומים QA קהילתיים'}
{'en': 'Online Community Question Answering Forums (cQA) have gained massive popularity within recent years. The rise in users for such forums have led to the increase in the need for automated evaluation for question comprehension and fact evaluation of the answers provided by various participants in the forum. Our team, Fermi, participated in sub-task A of Task 8 at SemEval 2019-which tackles the first problem in the pipeline of factual evaluation in cQA forums, i.e., deciding whether a posed question asks for a factual information, an opinion / advice or is just socializing. This information is highly useful in segregating factual questions from non-factual ones which highly helps in organizing the questions into useful categories and trims down the problem space for the next task in the pipeline for fact evaluation among the available answers. Our system uses the embeddings obtained from Universal Sentence Encoder combined with XGBoost for the classification sub-task A. We also evaluate other combinations of embeddings and off-the-shelf machine learning algorithms to demonstrate the efficacy of the various representations and their combinations. Our results across the evaluation test set gave an accuracy of 84 % and received the first position in the final standings judged by the organizers.Fermi, participated in sub-task A of Task 8 at SemEval 2019 - which tackles the first problem in the pipeline of factual evaluation in cQA forums, i.e., deciding whether a posed question asks for a factual information, an opinion/advice or is just socializing. This information is highly useful in segregating factual questions from non-factual ones which highly helps in organizing the questions into useful categories and trims down the problem space for the next task in the pipeline for fact evaluation among the available answers. Our system uses the embeddings obtained from Universal Sentence Encoder combined with XGBoost for the classification sub-task A. We also evaluate other combinations of embeddings and off-the-shelf machine learning algorithms to demonstrate the efficacy of the various representations and their combinations. Our results across the evaluation test set gave an accuracy of 84% and received the first position in the final standings judged by the organizers.', 'ar': 'اكتسبت منتديات الإجابة على أسئلة المجتمع عبر الإنترنت (cQA) شعبية كبيرة في السنوات الأخيرة. أدى ارتفاع عدد المستخدمين لمثل هذه المنتديات إلى زيادة الحاجة إلى التقييم الآلي لفهم الأسئلة وتقييم الحقائق للإجابات التي قدمها مختلف المشاركين في المنتدى. شارك فريقنا ، Fermi ، في المهمة الفرعية A للمهمة 8 في SemEval 2019 - والتي تتناول المشكلة الأولى في خط أنابيب التقييم الوقائعي في منتديات cQA ، أي تحديد ما إذا كان السؤال المطروح يطلب معلومات واقعية ، رأي / نصيحة أو مجرد التنشئة الاجتماعية. هذه المعلومات مفيدة للغاية في فصل الأسئلة الواقعية عن الأسئلة غير الواقعية والتي تساعد بشكل كبير في تنظيم الأسئلة إلى فئات مفيدة وتقليص مساحة المشكلة للمهمة التالية في خط الأنابيب لتقييم الحقائق بين الإجابات المتاحة. يستخدم نظامنا الزخارف التي تم الحصول عليها من Universal Sentence Encoder جنبًا إلى جنب مع XGBoost لمهمة التصنيف الفرعية A. كما نقوم أيضًا بتقييم مجموعات أخرى من حفلات الزفاف وخوارزميات التعلم الآلي الجاهزة لإثبات فعالية التمثيلات المختلفة ومجموعاتها. أعطت نتائجنا عبر مجموعة اختبار التقييم دقة بلغت 84٪ وحصلت على المركز الأول في الترتيب النهائي الذي يحكم عليه المنظمون.', 'pt': 'Os Fóruns de Resposta a Perguntas da Comunidade Online (cQA) ganharam enorme popularidade nos últimos anos. O aumento de usuários para esses fóruns levou ao aumento da necessidade de avaliação automatizada para compreensão de perguntas e avaliação de fatos das respostas fornecidas por vários participantes do fórum. Nossa equipe, Fermi, participou da subtarefa A da Tarefa 8 no SemEval 2019 - que aborda o primeiro problema no pipeline de avaliação factual em fóruns de cQA, ou seja, decidir se uma pergunta feita pede uma informação factual, uma opinião/conselho ou está apenas socializando. Essas informações são muito úteis para separar as questões factuais das não factuais, o que ajuda muito na organização das questões em categorias úteis e reduz o espaço do problema para a próxima tarefa no pipeline para avaliação dos fatos entre as respostas disponíveis. Nosso sistema usa os embeddings obtidos do Universal Sentence Encoder combinados com o XGBoost para a subtarefa de classificação A. Também avaliamos outras combinações de embeddings e algoritmos de aprendizado de máquina prontos para uso para demonstrar a eficácia das várias representações e suas combinações. Nossos resultados em todo o conjunto de testes de avaliação deram uma precisão de 84% e receberam a primeira posição na classificação final julgada pelos organizadores.', 'fr': "Les forums communautaires de réponse aux questions (cQa) en ligne ont gagné en popularité ces dernières années. L'augmentation du nombre d'utilisateurs de ces forums a conduit à une augmentation de la nécessité d'une évaluation automatisée pour la compréhension des questions et l'évaluation factuelle des réponses fournies par les différents participants au forum. Notre équipe, Fermi, a participé à la sous-tâche A de la tâche 8 au SemEval 2019 - qui aborde le premier problème dans le pipeline de l'évaluation factuelle dans les forums CqA, c'est-à-dire décider si une question posée demande une information factuelle, un opinion/un conseil ou s'il s'agit simplement de socialiser. Ces informations sont très utiles pour séparer les questions factuelles des questions non factuelles, ce qui aide grandement à organiser les questions en catégories utiles et à réduire l'espace de problème pour la prochaine tâche dans la filière d'évaluation des faits parmi les réponses disponibles. Notre système utilise les intégrations obtenues par Universal Sentence Encoder en combinaison avec XGBoost pour la sous-tâche de classification A. Nous évaluons également d'autres combinaisons d'intégrations et d'algorithmes d'apprentissage automatique standard afin de démontrer l'efficacité des différentes représentations et de leurs combinaisons. Nos résultats sur l'ensemble des tests d'évaluation ont donné une précision de 84\xa0% et ont obtenu la première place dans le classement final jugé par les organisateurs.", 'ja': 'オンラインコミュニティクエスチョンアンサーフォーラム（ cQA ）は、近年大変な人気を集めています。 このようなフォーラムのユーザーの増加は、質問の理解のための自動評価と、フォーラムのさまざまな参加者が提供した回答の事実評価の必要性を増大させました。 私たちのチーム、Fermiは、SemEval 2019でタスク8のサブタスクAに参加しました。これは、cQAフォーラムでの事実評価のパイプラインの最初の問題に取り組んでいます。つまり、提起された質問が事実の情報、意見/アドバイスを求めているのか、それとも交際しているだけなのかを判断しています。 この情報は、質問を有用なカテゴリに整理し、利用可能な回答の中から事実評価のためのパイプラインの次のタスクのための問題空間を絞り込むのに非常に役立つ、事実的な質問と非事実的な質問を分離するのに非常に役立ちます。 当社のシステムは、分類サブタスクAにUniversal Sentence Encoderから取得した埋め込みをXGBoostと組み合わせて使用します。また、埋め込みと既製の機械学習アルゴリズムの他の組み合わせを評価して、さまざまな表現とそれらの組み合わせの有効性を実証します。 評価テストセット全体の結果は84 ％の精度を示し、主催者が判断した最終順位の1位を獲得しました。', 'es': 'Los foros de respuesta a preguntas de la comunidad en línea (CQa) han ganado gran popularidad en los últimos años. El aumento de usuarios de estos foros ha llevado al aumento de la necesidad de una evaluación automatizada para la comprensión de las preguntas y la evaluación de los hechos de las respuestas proporcionadas por varios participantes en el foro. Nuestro equipo, Fermi, participó en la subtarea A de la Tarea 8 en SemEval 2019, que aborda el primer problema en la canalización de la evaluación de hechos en los foros de CQa, es decir, decidir si una pregunta planteada requiere información objetiva, una opinión/consejo o simplemente está socializando. Esta información es muy útil para separar las preguntas fácticas de las no fácticas, lo que ayuda mucho a organizar las preguntas en categorías útiles y reduce el espacio problemático para la siguiente tarea en proceso de evaluación de hechos entre las respuestas disponibles. Nuestro sistema utiliza las incrustaciones obtenidas de Universal Sentence Encoder combinadas con XGBoost para la subtarea de clasificación A. También evaluamos otras combinaciones de incrustaciones y algoritmos de aprendizaje automático estándar para demostrar la eficacia de las diversas representaciones y sus combinaciones. Nuestros resultados en todo el conjunto de pruebas de evaluación dieron una precisión del 84% y obtuvieron la primera posición en la clasificación final juzgados por los organizadores.', 'zh': '近年以来,在线社区问论坛(cQA)大获迎接。 此论坛之用户益,而解论坛各与会者之事自评也。 吾团队Fermi与SemEval 2019任8子职A - 该子决cQA论坛中事论管道之首,即决事责息,/议犹社交也。 此甚有助于将事者,有用之类也,削其间,以论于管道之下。 吾统用从通用句编码器得嵌与XGBoost合,以类事A。 又估嵌成机器学算法者,以验其有效性。 估集以84%准确率,组织者第一。', 'hi': 'ऑनलाइन समुदाय प्रश्न उत्तर मंचों (cQA) हाल के वर्षों के भीतर बड़े पैमाने पर लोकप्रियता हासिल की है. इस तरह के मंचों के लिए उपयोगकर्ताओं में वृद्धि ने प्रश्न समझ के लिए स्वचालित मूल्यांकन की आवश्यकता में वृद्धि और मंच में विभिन्न प्रतिभागियों द्वारा प्रदान किए गए उत्तरों के तथ्य मूल्यांकन को जन्म दिया है। हमारी टीम, फर्मी ने सेमेवल 2019 में टास्क 8 के उप-कार्य ए में भाग लिया - जो सीक्यूए मंचों में तथ्यात्मक मूल्यांकन की पाइपलाइन में पहली समस्या से निपटता है, यानी, यह तय करना कि क्या एक प्रश्न एक तथ्यात्मक जानकारी, एक राय / सलाह के लिए पूछता है या सिर्फ सामाजिककरण है। यह जानकारी गैर-तथ्यात्मक लोगों से तथ्यात्मक प्रश्नों को अलग करने में अत्यधिक उपयोगी है जो प्रश्नों को उपयोगी श्रेणियों में व्यवस्थित करने में अत्यधिक मदद करती है और उपलब्ध उत्तरों के बीच तथ्य मूल्यांकन के लिए पाइपलाइन में अगले कार्य के लिए समस्या स्थान को ट्रिम करती है। हमारा सिस्टम यूनिवर्सल वाक्य एन्कोडर से प्राप्त एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करता है जो वर्गीकरण उप-कार्य ए के लिए XGBoost के साथ संयुक्त है। हम विभिन्न अभ्यावेदनों और उनके संयोजनों की प्रभावकारिता को प्रदर्शित करने के लिए एम्बेडिंग और ऑफ-द-शेल्फ मशीन लर्निंग एल्गोरिदम के अन्य संयोजनों का भी मूल्यांकन करते हैं। मूल्यांकन परीक्षण सेट में हमारे परिणामों ने 84% की सटीकता दी और आयोजकों द्वारा न्याय किए गए अंतिम स्टैंडिंग में पहला स्थान प्राप्त किया।', 'ru': 'В последние годы массовую популярность приобрели форумы по вопросам онлайн-сообщества (cQA). Увеличение числа пользователей таких форумов привело к росту необходимости в автоматизированной оценке для понимания вопросов и фактической оценки ответов, представленных различными участниками форума. Наша команда, Ферми, участвовала в подзадаче А Задачи 8 на SemEval 2019 - которая решает первую проблему в процессе фактической оценки на форумах cQA, то есть, решая, запрашивает ли заданный вопрос фактическую информацию, мнение/совет или просто общается. Эта информация очень полезна для отделения фактических вопросов от несущественных, что очень помогает в организации вопросов в полезные категории и сокращает проблемное пространство для следующей задачи в конвейере для оценки фактов среди доступных ответов. Наша система использует вложения, полученные от универсального кодировщика предложений в сочетании с XGBoost для подзадачи классификации A. Мы также оцениваем другие комбинации вложений и готовых алгоритмов машинного обучения, чтобы продемонстрировать эффективность различных представлений и их комбинаций. Наши результаты по всему тестовому набору оценки дали точность 84% и получили первую позицию в финальном зачете, судя по организаторам.', 'ga': 'Le blianta beaga anuas tá an-tóir ar Fhóraim Ar Líne um Fhreagróirí Ceisteanna an Phobail (cQA). Mar gheall ar an méadú ar líon na n-úsáideoirí do na fóraim sin tá méadú ar an ngá atá le meastóireacht uathoibrithe le haghaidh tuisceana ar cheisteanna agus meastóireacht fíorais ar na freagraí a thug rannpháirtithe éagsúla san fhóram. Ghlac ár bhfoireann, Fermi, páirt i bhfo-thasc A de Thasc 8 ag SemEval 2019 - a théann i ngleic leis an gcéad fhadhb atá sa phíblíne meastóireachta fíorasach i bhfóraim cQA, i.e., cinneadh a dhéanamh an iarrann ceist a cuireadh faisnéis fhíorasach, tuairim/comhairle. nó go bhfuil sé díreach ag sóisialú. Tá an t-eolas seo thar a bheith úsáideach chun ceisteanna fíorasacha a scaradh ó cheisteanna neamhfhíorasacha, rud a chabhraíonn go mór le heagrú na gceisteanna i gcatagóirí úsáideacha agus a ghearrann síos spás na bhfadhbanna don chéad tasc eile atá sa phíblíne do mheasúnú fíricí i measc na bhfreagraí atá ar fáil. Úsáideann ár gcóras na leabaithe a fhaightear ó Ionchódóir Pianbhreithe Uilíoch in éineacht le XGBoost don fhothasc aicmithe A. Déanaimid measúnú freisin ar theaglaim eile leabaithe agus halgartaim meaisínfhoghlama lasmuigh den tseilf chun éifeachtúlacht na léiriú éagsúil agus a gcomhcheangail a léiriú. Thug ár dtorthaí trasna na sraithe trialacha meastóireachta beachtas 84% agus fuarthas an chéad áit sna seasaimh deiridh a ndearna na heagraithe breithiúnas orthu.', 'el': 'Τα φόρουμ απάντησης ερωτήσεων της κοινότητας έχουν αποκτήσει τεράστια δημοτικότητα τα τελευταία χρόνια. Η αύξηση των χρηστών για τέτοια φόρουμ έχει οδηγήσει στην αύξηση της ανάγκης για αυτοματοποιημένη αξιολόγηση για την κατανόηση των ερωτήσεων και την αξιολόγηση των γεγονότων των απαντήσεων που παρέχονται από διάφορους συμμετέχοντες στο φόρουμ. Η ομάδα μας, η Φέρμη, συμμετείχε στην υπο-εργασία Α της εργασίας 8 στο το οποίο αντιμετωπίζει το πρώτο πρόβλημα που βρίσκεται στο στάδιο της πραγματικής αξιολόγησης σε φόρουμ, δηλαδή την απόφαση αν μια ερώτηση που τίθεται ζητά μια πραγματική πληροφορία, μια γνώμη/συμβουλή ή απλώς κοινωνικοποίηση. Αυτές οι πληροφορίες είναι ιδιαίτερα χρήσιμες για τον διαχωρισμό των πραγματικών από των μη πραγματικών ερωτήσεων, γεγονός που βοηθά ιδιαίτερα στην οργάνωση των ερωτήσεων σε χρήσιμες κατηγορίες και περιορίζει τον προβληματικό χώρο για την επόμενη εργασία που θα ακολουθήσει για την αξιολόγηση των γεγονότων μεταξύ των διαθέσιμων απαντήσεων. Το σύστημά μας χρησιμοποιεί τις ενσωματώσεις που λαμβάνονται από τον καθολικό κωδικοποιητή προτάσεων σε συνδυασμό με το για την επιμέρους εργασία ταξινόμησης Α. Επίσης αξιολογούμε άλλους συνδυασμούς ενσωμάτωσης και αλγόριθμους μηχανικής μάθησης για να καταδείξουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα των διαφόρων αναπαραστάσεων και των συνδυασμών τους. Τα αποτελέσματά μας στο σύνολο των δοκιμών αξιολόγησης έδωσαν ακρίβεια 84% και πήραν την πρώτη θέση στην τελική κατάταξη που κρίθηκαν από τους διοργανωτές.', 'hu': 'Az online közösségi kérdésekre válaszoló fórumok (cQA) az elmúlt években óriási népszerűséget szereztek. Az ilyen fórumok felhasználóinak számának növekedése miatt a fórum különböző résztvevői által adott válaszok automatizált értékelésének és tényértékelésének szükségessége növekedett. Csapatunk, Fermi, részt vett a SemEval 2019-ben a 8. feladat A. alcsoportjában, amely a tényértékelés során álló első problémával foglalkozik a cQA fórumokon, azaz eldönti, hogy egy feltett kérdés tényszerű információt, véleményt/tanácsot kér, vagy csak szocializálódik-e. Ez az információ rendkívül hasznos a tényszerű kérdések és a nem tényszerű kérdések elkülönítésére, ami nagymértékben segít a kérdések hasznos kategóriákba történő rendezésében, és csökkenti a problémát a következő feladat számára, amely a rendelkezésre álló válaszok között a tényértékelés céljából. Rendszerünk az Univerzális mondatkódoló XGBoost és XGBoost alkalmazással kombinált beágyazásokat használja az A osztályozási alcsoporthoz. A beágyazások egyéb kombinációit és a polcon kívüli gépi tanulási algoritmusokat is kiértékeljük a különböző reprezentációk hatékonyságának és kombinációinak bemutatására. Az értékelő tesztkészleten végzett eredményeink 84%-os pontosságot biztosítottak, és a szervezők által megítélt döntő helyen első helyezést kaptak.', 'ka': 'უკვე წლის შემდეგ ინტერნეტური საზოგადოებო კითხვების გარეშე ფორმები (cQA) მიიღეთ დიდი პოლუგარიტი. ასეთი ფორმებისთვის მომხმარებელების ზომა გავაკეთეთ ავტომატიური განსაზღვრება კითხვების შესახებ და ფაქტიური განსაზღვრება განსაზღვრებისთვის განსხვავებული სხვადასხვა მომხმარებელი ფორმე ჩვენი ჯგუფი, ფერმთ, გადაწყვეტილი A-ის სამუშაო დავალებში 2019 წლის SemEval-ში - რომელიც პირველი პრობლემა გადაწყვეტის ფექტურალური оценების პრობლემაში cQA ფორმებში, ანუ, გადაწყვეტილი კითხვა ფაქტური ინფორმაციას, მნიშვნელობა ეს ინფორმაცია ძალიან გამოყენებელია ფაქტიური კითხვების გარეშე, რომლებიც არ-ფაქტიური კითხვების გარეშე, რომლებიც ძალიან დახმარებენ კითხვების გარეშე საჭირო კატეგორიაში და გამოყენებს პრობლემების სი ჩვენი სისტემა გამოყენება სამყარო სიტყვების კოდირებით, რომელიც XGBoost-თან კლასიფიკაციის A სამყარო დავალებისთვის. ჩვენ ასევე სხვა სიტყვების კომბინეციები და მაქინის სწავლების ალგორიტემების გამოყენება, რომელიც განსხვავებული რემონტე ჩვენი წარმოდგენება განსაზღვრებულ ტესტის განსაზღვრებულებაში 84%-ის წარმოდგენა და პირველი პოზაცია მიიღეთ პირველი პოზაციაში, რომელიც ორგანიზატორიები გა', 'it': "I forum di risposta alle domande della comunità online (cQA) hanno guadagnato enorme popolarità negli ultimi anni. L'aumento degli utenti di tali forum ha portato all'aumento della necessità di una valutazione automatica per la comprensione delle domande e la valutazione dei fatti delle risposte fornite dai vari partecipanti al forum. Il nostro team, Fermi, ha partecipato al sottocompito A del Task 8 a SemEval 2019 - che affronta il primo problema nella pipeline di valutazione dei fatti nei forum di cQA, ovvero decidere se una domanda posta richiede informazioni fattuali, un parere/consiglio o è semplicemente socializzante. Queste informazioni sono molto utili per separare le domande fattuali da quelle non fattuali che aiutano molto nell'organizzare le domande in categorie utili e riducono lo spazio di problema per il prossimo compito in pipeline per la valutazione dei fatti tra le risposte disponibili. Il nostro sistema utilizza le incorporazioni ottenute da Universal Sentence Encoder combinate con XGBoost per il sottocompito di classificazione A. Valutiamo anche altre combinazioni di incorporazioni e algoritmi di machine learning off-the-shelf per dimostrare l'efficacia delle varie rappresentazioni e delle loro combinazioni. I nostri risultati in tutto il set di test di valutazione hanno dato una precisione dell'84% e hanno ottenuto la prima posizione nella classifica finale giudicata dagli organizzatori.", 'kk': 'Жуырдағы жылдарда онлайн Компания сұрақтарының жауап беру форумдары (cQA) өткен жалпы мәліметті жетті. Бұл форумдардың пайдаланушыларының көтерілігі, форумдағы көптеген қатысушылардың жауаптарды түсініп, шындық оқиғалардың автоматты оқиғаларының қажеттігін өзгертуге болады. Біздің командамыз, Ферми, 2019 жылы SemEval 8 тапсырмасының A-тапсырмасына қатысу керек - бұл cQA форумындағы факталдық оқиғалардың алғашқы мәселесін шешу үшін, мәлімет/сұрақтар сұрайтын сұрақтарын шешуге болады. Бұл мәлімет фактикалық сұрақтарды фактикалық емес сұрақтардан сегрегируға көмектеседі. Бұл сұрақтарды пайдаланушылық санаттарға орнату үшін көмектеседі, және қол жеткізетін жауаптар арасындағы келесі тапсы Біздің жүйеміз "A" классификациясы үшін XGBoost- мен біріктірілген Universal sentence Encoder- дан алгоритмдерді қолданады. Сонымен қатар, біз басқа ендіру және қоршаудан тыс компьютерді үйрену алгоритмдерін бағалаймыз. Біздің нәтижелеріміз бағалау сынақтарының нәтижелеріміз 84% деген дұрыс болды және бағдарламалардың оқиғаларының алғашқы нәтижесін алды.', 'lt': 'Per pastaruosius metus Bendrijos atsakymų į klausimus forumai internete labai populiarūs. Dėl padidėjusio tokių forum ų dalyvių skaičiaus padidėjo poreikis atlikti automatinį klausimų supratimo vertinimą ir įvairių forumo dalyvių pateiktų atsakymų faktų vertinimą. Our team, Fermi, participated in sub-task A of Task 8 at SemEval 2019 - which tackles the first problem in the pipeline of factual evaluation in cQA forums, i.e., deciding whether a posed question asks for a factual information, an opinion/advice or is just socializing.  Ši informacija labai naudinga atskiriant faktinius klausimus nuo faktinių klausimų, kurie labai padeda organizuoti klausimus į naudingas kategorijas ir sutrumpina problem in ę erdvę kitai užduotims, kuri bus atliekama vertinant faktus tarp turimų atsakymų. Mūsų sistema naudoja įdėjimus, gautus iš Universalaus sakinių kodo kartu su XGBoost klasifikavimo A subužduotyje. Taip pat vertiname kitus įdėjimų derinius ir išorinių mašinų mokymosi algoritmus, kad įrodytume įvairių atvaizdų ir jų derinių veiksmingumą. Mūsų rezultatai įvertinimo bandymuose parodė 84 proc. tikslumą ir gavo pirmąją poziciją galutiniuose organizatorių įvertintuose posėdžiuose.', 'mk': 'Форумите за онлајн одговори на прашањата на заедницата (cQA) во последниве години добија масовна популарност. Зголемувањето на корисниците на ваквите форуми доведе до зголемување на потребата од автоматизирана оценка за разбирање на прашањата и оценка на фактите на одговорите на различните учесници во форумот. Нашиот тим, Ферми, учествуваше во подзадачата А на задачата 8 на Семевал 2019 година - која го решава првиот проблем во нафтоводот на фактичната оценка на форумите на ЦКА, односно одлучувајќи дали поставено прашање бара фактични информации, мислење/совет или само социјализира. Оваа информација е многу корисна за одделување на фактичните прашања од нефактичните кои многу помагаат во организацијата на прашањата во корисни категории и го намалуваат проблемскиот простор за следната задача во нафтоводот за проценка на фактите помеѓу достапните одговори. Нашиот систем ги користи вградувањата добиени од универзалниот кодер на реченици комбинирани со XGBoost за класификацијата на подзадачата А. Исто така ги проценуваме и другите комбинации на вградувања и алгоритми за учење на машините надвор од полицата за да ја покажеме ефикасноста на различните претставувања и нивните комбинации. Нашите резултати во сетот на тестот за евалуација дадоа точност од 84 отсто и ја добија првата позиција на финалните состаноци кои ги осудија организаторите.', 'ms': 'Forum Jawapan Pertanyaan Komuniti Dalam Talian (cQA) telah meningkat popularitas besar dalam beberapa tahun terakhir. Peningkatan pengguna untuk forum tersebut telah membawa kepada peningkatan keperluan penilaian automatik untuk pemahaman soalan dan penilaian fakta jawapan yang diberikan oleh pelbagai peserta dalam forum. Pasukan kami, Fermi, berpartisipasi dalam sub-tugas A dari Tugas 8 di SemEval 2019 - yang mengatasi masalah pertama dalam saluran penilaian fakta di forum cQA, iaitu, memutuskan sama ada soalan yang ditanya meminta maklumat fakta, pendapat/nasihat atau hanya berkomunikasi. Maklumat ini sangat berguna dalam memisahkan soalan fakta dari yang tidak fakta yang sangat membantu dalam mengatur soalan ke kategori berguna dan mengurangi ruang masalah untuk tugas berikutnya dalam baris paip untuk penilaian fakta diantara jawapan yang tersedia. Sistem kami menggunakan penyembedding yang diperoleh dari Pengekod Perkataan Universal bergabung dengan XGBoost untuk subtugas klasifikasi A. Kami juga menilai kombinasi lain penyembedding dan algoritma pembelajaran mesin luar rak untuk menunjukkan kegunaan pelbagai perwakilan dan kombinasi mereka. Hasil kami dalam set ujian penilaian memberikan ketepatan 84% dan menerima kedudukan pertama di posisi terakhir yang dihukum oleh pengatur.', 'mt': 'Online Community Question Answering Forums (cQA) have gained massive popularity within recent years.  Iż-żieda fl-utenti għal fora bħal dawn wasslet għal żieda fil-ħtieġa għal evalwazzjoni awtomatizzata għall-komprensjoni tal-mistoqsijiet u evalwazzjoni tal-fatti tat-tweġibiet ipprovduti minn diversi parteċipanti fil-forum. It-tim tagħna, Fermi, ipparteċipa fis-sottokompitu A tal-Kompitu 8 f’SemEval 2019 - li jindirizza l-ewwel problem a fil-proċess ta’ evalwazzjoni fattwali fil-forums tas-cQA, jiġifieri, li jiddeċiedi jekk mistoqsija mressqa titlobx informazzjoni fattwali, opinjoni/parir jew jekk hijiex biss soċjalizzata. Din l-informazzjoni hija utli ħafna fis-segregazzjoni tal-mistoqsijiet fattwali minn dawk mhux fattwali li tgħin ħafna fl-organizzazzjoni tal-mistoqsijiet f’kategoriji utli u tnaqqas l-ispazju problematiku għall-kompitu li jmiss fil-linja ta’ gwida għall-evalwazzjoni tal-fatti fost it-tweġibiet disponibbli. Is-sistema tagħna tuża l-inkorporazzjonijiet miksuba minn Universal Sentence Encoder ikkombinati ma’ XGBoost għas-sottokompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni A. A ħna evalwaw ukoll kombinazzjonijiet oħra ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet u algoritmi ta’ tagħlim tal-magna barra mill-ixkaffa biex nippruvaw l-effikaċja tad-diversi rappreżentazzjonijiet u l-kombinazzjonijiet tagħhom. Our results across the evaluation test set gave an accuracy of 84% and received the first position in the final standings judged by the organizers.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത വര്\u200dഷങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ളില്\u200d ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d കമ്മിറ്റി ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം ഫോര്\u200dമുകള്\u200d (സിക്യൂഎ) വളരെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടു. ഇങ്ങനെയുള്ള ഫോര്\u200dമുകളിലെ ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ ഉയര്\u200dച്ചയ്ക്ക് സ്വയം വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ ആവശ്യം കൂടുതല്\u200d വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഫോര്\u200dമിലെ പല ഞങ്ങളുടെ ടീം ഫെര്\u200dമി, സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019-ല്\u200d ടാസ്ക് 8-ല്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്നു. സിക്യൂഎ ഫോര്\u200dമുമില്\u200d യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ വിലയ്ക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ആദ്യത്തെ പ്രശ്നത്തിന്റെ പൈപ്പെലിനില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന This information is highly useful in segregating factual questions from non-factual ones which highly helps in organizing the questions into useful categories and trims down the problem space for the next task in the pipeline for fact evaluation among the available answers.  നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന് ലഭ്യമായ വിധി കോഡിങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത പ്രതിനിധികളുടെയും കൂട്ടത്തിന്റെയും പ്രഭാവങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വ്യക്തമാക്കാന്\u200d എക്സ്ജിബൂസ്റ്റിന്റെ നമ്മുടെ പരിശോധനത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d 84% കൃത്യമായി കൊടുത്തു. സംഘടനക്കാര്\u200d വിധിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ അവസാന സ്ഥാനത്തി', 'mn': 'Онлайн нийгмийн асуултуудын хариултын форум (cQA) сүүлийн жилийн дотор маш их нэр хүндрэлтэй болсон. Ийм форумуудын хэрэглэгчдийн өсөлт нь асуултын ойлголтын тухай автоматжуулалтын шалгалтыг автоматжуулалтын шалгалтыг нэмэгдүүлсэн. Бидний баг Ферми 2019 оны SemEval-д A of Task 8-д оролцсон бөгөөд энэ нь cQA форумын үнэндээ үнэндээ үнэндээ дүгнэх шугамын хамгийн эхний асуудлыг шийдвэрлэх боломжтой болсон. Энэ мэдээлэл үнэндээ биш бодит асуултуудыг хуваалцах нь маш хэрэгтэй. Энэ асуултуудыг хэрэгжүүлэгч категорид зохион байгуулахад тусалдаг, дараагийн хоолойн даалгаварын асуудлыг үнэндээ хариултуудын дунд үнэндээ үнэлэх боломжтой. Бидний систем XGBoost-тэй хуваалцах A-р хуваалцах суб-даалгаврын тулд гарсан Universal sentence Encoder-ээс гарсан нэвтрүүлэгүүдийг ашигладаг. Мөн бид өөр өөр төрлийн үзүүлэлт болон нийлүүлэлтийн үр дүнг харуулахын тулд бусад нэвтрүүлэлт болон сургалтын алгоритмыг баталдаг. Үүний шалгалтын туршилтын үр дүнд 84% нь тодорхой байдал өгсөн ба зохион байгуулагчид зохион байгуулсан анхны байр суурь авсан.', 'no': 'Tilkoplingsformar for svar på spørsmål (cQA) har fått massivt popularitet i løpet av siste år. Øvrenga i brukarar for slike forummer har ført til å økja nødvendighet for automatisk evaluering for spørsmålsforståking og faktisk evaluering av svara gjeven av forskjellige deltakarar i forumet. Gruppen vårt, Fermi, delta i underoppgåve A av oppgåve 8 på semiEval 2019, som løyser det første problemet i røyvinga av faktiske evalueringa i cQA-forummer, dvs. avgjør om eit posert spørsmål spør om e in faktisk informasjon, ein mening/råd eller berre er sosialisert. Denne informasjonen er svært nyttig i å segrega faktiske spørsmål frå ikkje-faktiske, som hjelper hjelp på å organisera spørsmålene til nyttige kategoriar og trykker ned problemplassen for neste oppgåve i røyslinja for faktisk evaluering mellom dei tilgjengelege svara. Sistemet vårt bruker innbyggingane som er henta frå Universell teiknkoder kombinasjon med XGBoost for klassifikasjon underoppgåva A. Vi evaluerer også andre kombinasjonar av innbyggingane og av-skalf-læringsalgoritme for å demonstrare effekten av dei ulike representasjonane og kombinasjonane sine. Resultatet våre over evalueringstesten gjev ein nøyaktig av 84 % og mottok den første posisjonen i dei siste stadene som organisatorene regnar.', 'ro': 'Forumurile de răspuns la întrebări comunitare online (cQA) au câștigat popularitate masivă în ultimii ani. Creșterea numărului de utilizatori pentru astfel de forumuri a condus la creșterea necesității de evaluare automată pentru înțelegerea întrebărilor și evaluarea faptelor răspunsurilor furnizate de diverși participanți la forum. Echipa noastră, Fermi, a participat la subsarcina A a Task 8 la SemEval 2019 - care abordează prima problemă în derularea evaluării faptelor în forumurile cQA, adică decide dacă o întrebare pusă cere informații fapte, o opinie/sfat sau doar socializează. Aceste informații sunt extrem de utile în separarea întrebărilor factuale de cele non-factuale, ceea ce ajută foarte mult la organizarea întrebărilor în categorii utile și reduce spațiul de problemă pentru următoarea sarcină în curs de evaluare a faptelor printre răspunsurile disponibile. Sistemul nostru folosește încorporările obținute din Universal Sentence Encoder combinat cu XGBoost pentru subsarcina de clasificare A. Evaluăm, de asemenea, alte combinații de încorporări și algoritmi de învățare automată off-the-shelf pentru a demonstra eficacitatea diferitelor reprezentări și combinațiile acestora. Rezultatele noastre din setul de teste de evaluare au dat o acuratețe de 84% și au primit primul loc în clasamentul final judecat de organizatori.', 'pl': 'Forum odpowiedzi na pytania społeczności online (cQA) zyskały ogromną popularność w ostatnich latach. Wzrost liczby użytkowników takich forów doprowadził do wzrostu potrzeby zautomatyzowanej oceny w celu zrozumienia pytań oraz oceny faktów odpowiedzi udzielonych przez różnych uczestników forum. Nasz zespół, Fermi, uczestniczył w podzadaniu A Zadania 8 na SemEval 2019, które podejmuje pierwszy problem w trakcie oceny faktycznej na forach cQA, tj. decydowanie, czy zadane pytanie prosi o informację faktyczną, opinię/poradę, czy to tylko społeczność. Informacje te są bardzo przydatne w oddzieleniu pytań faktycznych od pytań niefaktycznych, co bardzo pomaga w zorganizowaniu pytań na użyteczne kategorie i skraca przestrzeń problemową dla kolejnego zadania do oceny faktów wśród dostępnych odpowiedzi. Nasz system wykorzystuje osadzenia uzyskane z Universal Sentence Encoder w połączeniu z XGBoost do podzadania klasyfikacji A. Oceniamy również inne kombinacje osadzeń i gotowe algorytmy uczenia maszynowego w celu wykazania skuteczności różnych reprezentacji i ich kombinacji. Nasze wyniki w zestawie testów oceniających dały dokładność 84% i zdobyły pierwsze miejsce w klasyfikacji końcowej ocenianej przez organizatorów.', 'sr': 'Forumi za odgovor na pitanja zajednice (cQA) u poslednjih godina dobili su ogromnu popularnost. Povećanje korisnika takvih foruma dovelo je do povećanja potrebe za automatskom procjenom razumijevanja pitanja i procjene činjenica odgovora koje su pružile različiti sudionici na forumu. Naš tim, Fermi, sudjelovao je u podzadatku A od zadatka 8 na semiEvalu 2019. koji je riješio prvi problem u cijevi činjenične procjene u forumima cQA, tj. da odluči da li postavljeno pitanje traži činjenične informacije, mišljenje/savjete ili samo socijalizira. Ova informacija je veoma korisna u segregaciji činjeničnih pitanja od nečinjeničnih, koji visoko pomaže u organizaciji pitanja u korisne kategorije i smanjuje problem prostor za sljedeći zadatak u kanalizaciji za procjenu činjenica među dostupnim odgovorima. Naš sistem koristi ugrađenje od Univerzalnog kodera kazne kombinovanog sa XGBoost za klasifikaciju podzadatak A. Takođe procjenjujemo i druge kombinacije ugrađenja i algoritma za učenje uređaja van policije kako bi pokazali efikasnost različitih predstavljanja i njihovih kombinacija. Naši rezultati u testu za procjenu pružali su preciznost 84% i primili prvu poziciju na konačnim stavovima koje su osudili organizatori.', 'si': 'ඇන්ලයින් සමාජ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න (cQA) අවුරුද්ධ අවුරුද්ධ වලට ගොඩක්  අනිවාර්ය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ විශ්වාස කරපු විශ්වාසයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශ්වාස කරන්න අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරපු විශ්වාසයේ ස් අපේ කණ්ඩායම, ෆෙර්මි, සබ-වැඩේ A of Job 8 at semeval 2019 - මේ පළමු ප්\u200dරශ්නය cQA ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා, ඉතින්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඇහෙනවා කියලා, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඇහෙනවා කි මේ තොරතුරු ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නොවැඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සංවිධානය කරනවා වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වගේම ප්\u200dරශ අපේ පද්ධතිය පාවිච්චි විශේෂ සංකේතකයෙන් ලැබුණු සංකේතකයෙන් XGBoost එක්ක විශේෂ සංකේතකය A වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සහ off-the-shelf පද් අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණාවේ පරීක්ෂණාවෙන් තියෙන්නේ 84% ගැන සැකසුම් තියෙන්නේ ඒ වගේම පළමු ස්ථානයක් අවසා', 'sv': 'Online Community Question Answering Forums (cQA) har fått massiv popularitet under de senaste åren. Ökningen av antalet användare för sådana forum har lett till ett ökat behov av automatiserad utvärdering för frågeförståelse och faktautvärdering av svaren från olika deltagare i forumet. Vårt team, Fermi, deltog i deluppgift A i Uppgift 8 på SemEval 2019 - som tar itu med det första problemet i pipeline av faktautvärdering i cQA forum, dvs. besluta om en ställd fråga kräver faktauppgifter, en åsikt/råd eller bara umgås. Denna information är mycket användbar för att separera faktiska frågor från icke-faktiska frågor vilket i hög grad hjälper till att organisera frågorna i användbara kategorier och trimmar ner problemutrymmet för nästa uppgift i pipeline för faktautvärdering bland de tillgängliga svaren. Vårt system använder de inbäddningar som erhållits från Universal Sentence Encoder kombinerat med XGBoost för klassificering underuppgift A. Vi utvärderar även andra kombinationer av inbäddningar och off-the-shelf maskininlärningsalgoritmer för att demonstrera effektiviteten av de olika representationerna och deras kombinationer. Våra resultat i utvärderingstestet gav en noggrannhet på 84% och fick första plats i den slutliga rankningen som bedömdes av arrangörerna.', 'so': "Jawaabta jawaabaha ugu jawaabidda Internetka (cQA) waxay gaadheen dad aad u badan sanadkii ugu dambeeyey. Koritaanka isticmaalayaasha jardiinada caynkaas ah waxaa sababtay in la kordhiyo baahida loo baahan yahay qiimeynta kaartaada su'aalaha iyo qiimeynta dhabta ah ee jawaabaha warqada ka qayb galay. Timaheena Fermi ayaa ka qayb galay sub-task A oo ku qoran SemEval 2019 - taas oo xambaaraya dhibaatada ugu horeeyay e e qiimeynta xaqiiqa ah ee ku qoran jardiinada cQA, waa go’aanka ay su’aalku weydiisato macluumaad xaqiiq ah, fikir/talo ama waa samo. Macluumaadkan aad buu u faa’iido badan yahay in laga kala soocaayo su'aalaha runta ah, kuwaas oo aad uga caawinaya in su'aalaha loo qabto kooxo faa’iido leh iyo in loo jarayo goobta dhibaatada ku xigta shuqulka dambe ee baalinka si aad ugu qiimeysid jawaabaha ay jiraan. Systemkanagu wuxuu isticmaalaa kaalmeynta jaamacadda ee XGBoost, taas oo loo soo bandhigayo qasabka hoose A. Sidoo kale waxaynu qiimeynaynaa noocyo kale oo ka mid ah qashinka qalabka lagu baranayo iyo qoraalka barashada shabakada ee machadka lagu baro si loo muujiyo saameynta kala duduwan iyo xiriirkooda. Abaalkayagii dhamaadka imtixaanka qiimeynta ayaa saxday 84% waxayna heleen meeshii ugu horraysay ee ay qabanqaabiyay.", 'ta': 'இணைய சமூகத்தில் கேள்வி பதில் குறிப்புகள் (சிகியூஏ) சமீபத்தில் சமீபத்திய ஆண்டுகளில் மகிழ்ச்சியை பெரியதாக்கிவ இவ்வாறு குறிப்புகளுக்கான பயனர்களின் உயர்ந்தது குறிப்புகளில் உள்ள பல பகிர்ந்துக்கொள்பவர்கள் வழங்கப்பட்ட விடைகளை தானாகவே மதிப்பின் தேவைய எங்கள் குழு பெர்மி, செம்வால் 2019ல் செய்யும் வேலை 8 துணை பணியில் பங்கிடப்பட்டது - அது சிகியூ குறிப்புகளில் உண்மையான evaluation பைப்பெல்லையில் முதல் பிரச்சனையை பார்க்கும், உண்மையா @ info எங்கள் அமைப்பு உலக வாக்குறியீட்டு குறியீட்டிலிருந்து கிடைக்கப்பட்டது எக்ஸ்ஜிபூஸ்டுடன் வகைப்படுத்தப்படும் துணை பணி A. மற்றொரு இணைப்புகளையும் நாம் பரிசோதிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் மற மதிப்பு சோதனைக்கு முழுவதும் முடிவு', 'ur': 'اولاین کمونٹی سوال جواب دینے والی فورمز (cQA) اگلے سالوں میں بہت زیادہ شگفت حاصل کیا گیا ہے۔ ایسے فرموموموں کے لئے استعمال کرنے والوں کی اضافہ کی وجہ سے پوچھنے کے لئے سوال کی سمجھ اور حقیقت کی ارزش کے لئے مختلف حضار کرنے والوں کی ضرورت کی اضافہ کی ہے۔ ہماری تیم، فرمی، ٹاکس ۸ کے سابٹ ٹاکس میں شریک ہوا ہے 2019 میں، جو cQA فورموں میں واقعی ارزیابی کے پائٹلین میں پہلی مسئلہ کا حل کرتا ہے، یعنی فیصلہ کرتا ہے کہ کوئی پوسٹ سوال ایک حقیقی معلومات کے لئے سوال کرتا ہے، ایک نظر/نصیحت یا صرف سوچولی کرتا ہے. یہ معلومات غیر حقیقی سوالوں سے جدا کرنے میں بہت فائدہ ہے جو سوالوں کو فائدہ کائٹیوں میں سازمان کرنے کے لئے بہت اچھی مدد کرتی ہیں اور پائٹ لین میں اگلوں کے مسئلہ کی جگہ کے لئے موجود جواب کے درمیان حقیقت کا ارزش کے لئے کم کرتی ہے. ہماری سیستم نے یونیورل سنٹنس انکوڈر سے حاصل کئے گئے ہیں جو XGBoost کے ساتھ کلاسیفوں زیب-ٹاکس A کے لئے جمع کئے گئے ہیں. ہم نے بھی انبوڈینگ اور ناف-شالف ماشین یادگاری الگوریٹم کے دوسرے جمع کئے ہیں کہ مختلف نمایش اور ان کی جمع کئی اثبات دکھائیں۔ ہمارے نتائج آزمائش کی آزمائش میں سٹ نے 84 درصد کا دقیق بنایا تھا اور سازمائٹوں نے فیصلہ کیا تھا کہ پہلی موقعیت پائنی موقعیت حاصل کی تھی۔', 'uz': "Name Ushbu forumlarning foydalanuvchilarining ko'payishi forumda turli boʻlgan javoblarni qiymatga avtomatik qiymatlashga sabab beradi. Fermi, SemEval 2019 yilda Vazifaning 8 Ishga birinchi vazifani qidirib, bu cQA forumlaridagi haqiqiqiy qiymatning asosiy muammolarining birinchi muammolarini qidirish mumkin, balki bu muammolar haqiqiqiy maʼlumot, fikrlar/talabani soʻrashi yoki faqat jamiyatli soʻrayapti. @ info Biz tizimmiz bir xil vazifasi A bilan birlashtirish uchun XGBoost (XGBoost) bilan birlashtirilgan tizimlardan foydalanadi. Biz boshqa bir bir qanchalik bir qanchalik tashkilotlarni qiymatimiz va o'rganish mashinasining algoritlarini ko'rsatuvchimiz va har xil tashkilotlarning effektini ko'rsatish kerak. Ko'rib chiqarish tugmalarimiz 84% dan foydalanadi va ташкил қилувчиlar davomida oxirgi holatda birinchi joyga olingan.", 'vi': 'Những câu hỏi trực tuyến của Cộng đồng nằm vùng (CQA) đã trở nên nổi tiếng trong những năm gần đây. Sự gia tăng của người dùng cho các diễn đàn như vậy đã làm tăng nhu cầu đánh giá tự động cho sự thấu hiểu các câu hỏi và đánh giá thực tế các câu trả lời được cung cấp bởi các diễn viên khác nhau trong hội. Đội của chúng tôi, Fermi, đã tham gia vào nhiệm vụ A của Task 8 tại SemEvl 209- giải quyết vấn đề đầu tiên trong quá trình đánh giá dữ kiện trong diễn đàn của chúng tôi. Tức là, quyết định câu hỏi có cần thông tin, ý kiến hay lời khuyên hay chỉ là giao tiếp. Thông tin này rất hữu ích để phân biệt các câu hỏi của thực tế với những câu không thực tế mà giúp đỡ rất nhiều trong việc sắp xếp các câu hỏi thành các loại hữu ích và phân loại các khoảng trống vấn đề cho nhiệm vụ tiếp theo sắp tới để thực tế đánh giá trong các câu trả lời có thể. Hệ thống của chúng tôi sử dụng những thuật to án được lấy từ Universal Sensence Encoder, kết hợp với XGBboost cho phân loại A. Chúng tôi cũng đánh giá các tổ hợp khác của sự tác tác nhân tạo và các thuật toán học máy không bán giá để chứng minh hiệu quả của các biểu tượng khác nhau và kết hợp của chúng. Kết quả của chúng tôi trong vòng kiểm tra đánh giá đã xác thực 84. Và nhận được vị trí đầu tiên trong giải đấu cuối cùng được đánh giá bởi tổ chức.', 'bg': 'Онлайн форумите за отговор на въпроси на общността (КУА) придобиха огромна популярност през последните години. Повишаването на потребителите на такива форуми доведе до увеличаване на необходимостта от автоматизирана оценка за разбиране на въпросите и оценка на фактите на отговорите, предоставени от различните участници във форума. Екипът ни, Ферми, участва в подзадача А на задача 8 на която се занимава с първия проблем в процеса на фактическа оценка във форуми за оценка на качеството, т.е. решаване дали зададеният въпрос изисква фактическа информация, мнение/съвет или просто социализира. Тази информация е изключително полезна при разделянето на фактически от нефактически въпроси, което силно помага при организирането на въпросите в полезни категории и намалява проблемното пространство за следващата задача в процес на оценка на фактите сред наличните отговори. Нашата система използва вгражданията, получени от Универсален кодер на изречения, комбинирани с За класификацията на подзадача А. Също така оценяваме и други комбинации от вграждания и алгоритми за машинно обучение, за да демонстрираме ефективността на различните изображения и техните комбинации. Резултатите от теста за оценка дадоха точност от 84% и получиха първата позиция в окончателното класиране, оценено от организаторите.', 'hr': 'Forumi za odgovor na pitanja zajednice (cQA) u posljednjih godina dobili su ogromnu popularnost. Povećanje korisnika za takve forume dovelo je do povećanja potrebe za automatskom procjenom razumijevanja pitanja i procjene činjenica odgovora koje su pružile različiti učesnici na forumu. Naš tim, Fermi, sudjelovao je u podzadatku A zadatka 8 na semiEvalu 2019. koji rješava prvi problem u cijevi činjenične procjene u forumima cQA, tj. odlučujući da li postavljeno pitanje traži činjenične informacije, mišljenje/savjet ili samo socijalizira. Ova informacija je vrlo korisna u segregaciji činjeničnih pitanja od neočinjeničnih koji visoko pomaže u organizaciji pitanja u korisne kategorije i smanjuje problem prostor za sljedeći zadatak u cijevi za procjenu činjenice među dostupnim odgovorima. Naš sustav koristi ugrađene od Univerzalnog kodera kazne kombinacije s XGBoost za klasifikaciju podzadatak A. Također procjenjujemo i druge kombinacije ugrađenja i algoritma učenja stroja izvan policije kako bi pokazali djelotvornost različitih predstavljanja i njihovih kombinacija. Naši rezultati u sklopu ispitivanja procjene pružali su preciznost 84% i primili prvu poziciju na konačnim stavovima koje su organizatori osudili.', 'nl': 'Online Community Question Answering Forums (cQA) hebben de afgelopen jaren enorm aan populariteit gewonnen. De toename van gebruikers voor dergelijke forums heeft geleid tot de toenemende behoefte aan geautomatiseerde evaluatie voor het begrijpen van vragen en feitelijke evaluatie van de antwoorden die door verschillende deelnemers aan het forum worden verstrekt. Ons team, Fermi, nam deel aan deeltaak A van Taak 8 op SemEval 2019, die het eerste probleem aanpakt in de pijplijn van feitelijke evaluatie in cQA forums, dat wil zeggen, beslissen of een gestelde vraag vraagt om een feitelijke informatie, een mening/advies of gewoon socialiseren is. Deze informatie is zeer nuttig bij het scheiden van feitelijke en niet-feitelijke vragen, wat zeer helpt bij het organiseren van de vragen in nuttige categorieën en de probleemruimte voor de volgende taak in de pijplijn voor feitelijke evaluatie onder de beschikbare antwoorden verkleint. Ons systeem gebruikt de embeddings verkregen uit Universal Sentence Encoder gecombineerd met XGBoost voor de classificatiedeeltaak A. We evalueren ook andere combinaties van embeddings en standaard machine learning algoritmes om de effectiviteit van de verschillende representaties en hun combinaties aan te tonen. Onze resultaten in de evaluatie testset gaven een nauwkeurigheid van 84% en behaalden de eerste plaats in de finale klassement beoordeeld door de organisatoren.', 'da': 'Online Community Spørgsmål Besvarelse Forums (cQA) har vundet massiv popularitet inden for de seneste år. Det stigende antal brugere af sådanne fora har ført til et stigende behov for automatiseret evaluering af spørgsmålsforståelse og faktisk evaluering af de svar, som forskellige deltagere i forummet har givet. Vores team, Fermi, deltog i underopgave A af Opgave 8 på SemEval 2019 - som tager fat på det første problem i forløbet af faktuel evaluering i cQA fora, dvs. at beslutte, om et stillet spørgsmål beder om faktuel information, en mening/rådgivning eller bare socialiserer. Disse oplysninger er yderst nyttige til at adskille faktuelle spørgsmål fra ikke-faktuelle spørgsmål, hvilket i høj grad hjælper med at organisere spørgsmålene i nyttige kategorier og reducere problemrummet til den næste opgave i pipeline til faktaudvurdering blandt de tilgængelige svar. Vores system bruger de indlejringer, der er opnået fra Universal Sentence Encoder kombineret med XGBoost til klassificering underopgave A. Vi evaluerer også andre kombinationer af indlejringer og off-the-shelf maskinlæringsalgoritmer for at demonstrere effektiviteten af de forskellige repræsentationer og deres kombinationer. Vores resultater på tværs af evalueringstestsættet gav en nøjagtighed på 84% og fik den første position i den endelige stilling bedømt af arrangørerne.', 'id': 'Forum Jawaban Pertanyaan Komunitas Online (cQA) telah meningkat popularitas besar dalam beberapa tahun terakhir. Peningkatan pengguna untuk forum-forum tersebut telah membawa meningkat kebutuhan untuk evaluasi otomatis untuk pemahaman pertanyaan dan evaluasi fakta jawaban yang diberikan oleh berbagai peserta di forum. Tim kami, Fermi, berpartisipasi dalam sub-tugas A dari Tugas 8 di SemEval 2019 - yang mengatasi masalah pertama dalam saluran evaluasi faktual di forum cQA, i.e., memutuskan apakah pertanyaan yang ditanya meminta informasi faktual, pendapat/saran atau hanya sosialisasi. Informasi ini sangat berguna untuk memisahkan pertanyaan fakta dari pertanyaan yang tidak fakta yang sangat membantu dalam mengatur pertanyaan menjadi kategori berguna dan mengurangi ruang masalah untuk tugas berikutnya dalam saluran pipa untuk evaluasi fakta diantara jawaban yang tersedia. Sistem kami menggunakan embedding yang diperoleh dari Universal Sentence Encoder bergabung dengan XGBoost untuk klasifikasi sub-tugas A. Kami juga mengevaluasi kombinasi lain dari embedding dan algoritma belajar mesin off-the-shelf untuk menunjukkan efektivitas dari berbagai representation dan kombinasi mereka. Our results across the evaluation test set gave an accuracy of 84% and received the first position in the final standings judged by the organizers.', 'de': 'Online Community Question Answering Foren (cQA) haben in den letzten Jahren an Popularität gewonnen. Die Zunahme der Nutzer solcher Foren hat dazu geführt, dass der Bedarf an automatisierten Auswertungen für das Frageverständnis und die Faktenbewertung der Antworten verschiedener Forenteilnehmer zunimmt. Unser Team, Fermi, nahm an Teilaufgabe A of Task 8 bei SemEval 2019 teil, in der das erste Problem in der Pipeline der faktischen Bewertung in cQA-Foren angegangen wird, d.h. zu entscheiden, ob eine gestellte Frage nach einer sachlichen Information, einer Meinung/Beratung fragt oder einfach nur gesellschaftlich ist. Diese Informationen sind sehr nützlich, um sachliche Fragen von nicht sachlichen Fragen zu trennen, was sehr hilft, die Fragen in nützliche Kategorien zu unterteilen und den Problemraum für die nächste Aufgabe in der Pipeline für die Faktenbewertung unter den verfügbaren Antworten verkürzt. Unser System verwendet die Einbettungen aus Universal Satence Encoder kombiniert mit XGBoost für die Klassifikations-Teilaufgabe A. Wir evaluieren auch andere Kombinationen von Einbettungen und Standardalgorithmen für maschinelles Lernen, um die Wirksamkeit der verschiedenen Darstellungen und deren Kombinationen zu demonstrieren. Unsere Ergebnisse im gesamten Testset lieferten eine Genauigkeit von 84% und erhielten den ersten Platz in der Endwertung, die von den Organisatoren beurteilt wurde.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 온라인 커뮤니티 퀴즈 포럼(cQA)은 거대한 보급을 얻었다.이러한 포럼 사용자의 증가는 문제 이해에 대한 자동 평가 수요의 증가와 포럼 각 참여자가 제공한 답안에 대한 사실 평가를 초래했다.우리 팀 페르미는 2019년 SemEval에서 미션 8의 하위 미션 A에 참여했다. 이 미션은 cQA 포럼에서 팩트 평가 과정에서 첫 번째 문제를 해결했다. 즉, 팩트 정보, 의견/조언이 필요한지 아니면 사교적일지 결정하는 것이다.이러한 정보는 사실 문제와 비사실 문제를 구분할 때 매우 유용하다. 이는 문제를 유용한 유형으로 구성하고, 다음 임무에 대한 질문 공간을 줄여 사실 평가를 할 수 있도록 한다.Google 시스템은 유니버설 문장 인코더에서 얻은 삽입과 XGboost를 결합하여 하위 작업 A를 분류합니다. 또한 삽입과 기존의 기계 학습 알고리즘의 다른 조합을 평가하여 각종 표시와 조합의 유효성을 증명합니다.우리는 전체 평가 테스트집의 결과 84%의 정확도를 제시했고 조직자 평가의 최종 순위에서 1위를 차지했다.', 'fa': 'فورمه\u200cهای پاسخ جواب سوال اجتماعی آنلاین (cQA) در سال\u200cهای اخیر شهرت بزرگی را به دست آورده\u200cاند. افزایش کاربران برای این فرموم\u200cها باعث افزایش نیازی برای ارزیابی خودکار برای درک و ارزیابی سؤال\u200cها جواب\u200cهای مختلف مشترک در فرموم است. تیم ما فرمی، در زیر وظیفه ای از وظیفه ۸ در نیم Eval 2019 شرکت کرد، که اولین مشکل در لوله\u200cی ارزیابی حقیقی در forums cQA، یعنی تصمیم گرفت که آیا یک سؤال مشخص برای اطلاعات حقیقی می\u200cخواهد، یک نظر/نصیحت یا فقط اجتماعی می\u200cکند. این اطلاعات بسیار مفید است در جدا کردن سوالات حقیقی از غیر حقیقی که به شدت کمک می\u200cکند در سازمان سؤال\u200cها به گونه\u200cهای مفید و پایین کردن فضای مشکلی برای کار بعدی در خط لوله برای ارزیابی حقیقت بین جواب\u200cهای موجود است. سیستم ما از ابتدایی\u200cها که از ابتدایی\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای جهانی دریافت شده\u200cاند، استفاده می\u200cکند که با XGBoost برای زیر کارهای ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای است. همچنین با ابتدایی\u200cهای دیگر از ابتدایی\u200cها و الگوریتم\u200cهای یادگیری ماشین\u200cهای خارج از پناهگاه\u200cها، ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم تا نشان دهیم که عملکرد نمایش\u200cهای مخ نتیجه\u200cهایمان در آزمایش ارزیابی\u200cها به ۴۸ درصد دقیق دادند و اولین موقعیت در آخرین موقعیت\u200cها که توسط سازمان\u200cکنندگان تصمیم می\u200cگیرند دریافت شد.', 'sw': 'Jukwaa la Maswali ya Jamii ya Mtandaoni (cQA) limekuwa na umaarufu mkubwa katika miaka ya hivi karibuni. Kuongezeka kwa watumiaji wa majukwaa haya yamesababisha kuongezeka kwa mahitaji ya kutathmini kwa ajili ya utafiti wa kujieleza na tathmini ya majibu yaliyotolewa na washiriki kadhaa katika jukwaa hilo. Timu yetu, Fermi, ilishiriki katika kazi A ya Kazi 8 katika SemEval 2019 - ambayo inakabiliwa na tatizo la kwanza katika pipeline ya uchunguzi wa ukweli katika majukwaa ya cQA, yaani kuamua kama swali lililopendekezwa linaomba taarifa halisi, maoni/ushauri au ni jamii. Taarifa hii inafaa sana katika kutenganisha maswali ya ukweli kutoka kwa wale wasio na ukweli ambazo zinasaidia sana kuandaa maswali katika makundi yenye manufaa na kujaribu kupunguza nafasi ya tatizo kwa kazi inayofuata katika pipeline ili kutathmini ukweli kati ya majibu yanayopatikana. Mfumo wetu unatumia maeneo yaliyopata kutoka kodi ya hukumu ya Kimataifa ikiunganishwa na XGBoost kwa ajili ya kutangaza mchanganyiko wa kazi A. Pia tunatathmini mfumo mwingine wa mawasiliano na kuzuia mifumo ya kujifunza kwa mashine ya kifua ili kuonyesha ufanisi wa uwakilishi tofauti na mfumo wao. Matokeo yetu katika kituo cha uchunguzi wa tathmini yalitoa sahihi ya asilimia 84 na kupokea nafasi ya kwanza katika msimamo wa mwisho ulioandaliwa na waandaaji.', 'af': "Online ële gemeenskappe Vrag Antwoordeforme (cQA) het groot populariteit binne onlangse jaar ontvang. Die opstanding van gebruikers vir sodanige forums het gelei tot die vergroei van die behoefte vir outomatiese evaluering vir vraag verstaan en feit evaluering van die antwoorde wat deur verskeie deelnaders in die forum verskaf word. Ons span, Fermi, het gedeeld in sub-task A van Opdrag 8 by SemEval 2019 - wat die eerste probleem in die pipelyn van faktuele evaluasie in cQA forums, i.e. besluit om 'n posisie vraag vir 'n faktuele inligting vra, 'n besluit/raad of net sosialiseer is. Hierdie inligting is baie bruikbaar in die segregasie van faktuele vrae van nie-faktuele wat baie hulp in die organisasie van die vrae in gebruiklike kategories en die probleem spasie af vir die volgende taak in die pyplyn vir feit evaluering onder die beskikbare antwoorde. Ons stelsel gebruik die inbêding wat van Universele Sentence Encoder gekombineer is met XGBoost vir die klasifikasie sub-taak A. Ons asseblieer ook ander kombinasies van inbêdings en af-die-shelf masjien leer algoritme om die effektiviteit van die verskillende verteenwoordings en hulle kombinasies te wys. Ons resultate oor die evalueringstoets het 'n presisie van 84% gegee en die eerste posisie ontvang in die einde standings wat deur die organiseerders oordeel is.", 'tr': "Çaltylyk jemgyýetiň soraglary jogaplama forumlary (cQA) soňky ýyllar içinde köp popularlyk gazandy. Böyle forumlar üçin ullançylaryň köwesi forumda bolan soraglaryň düşünmesi we çykyşlaryň jogablarynyň baýramynyň awtomatik deňlemesi gerek bolmagyna ýüklendirdi. Biziň topamyz Fermi, SemEval 2019-njy ýyldaky Asagy 8-nji i şe goşulypdyr - bu iň cQA forumlarynda ilkinji meselämizi çözýär, yani bir sorag hakyky bir maglumat soragyny, pikir/maslahat edilýändigini çözýär. Bu maglumat, faktal soraglary bölünmek için kullanışlı kategorilere ayırmak için faydalıdır. Bu soruları kullanışlı kategorilere düzenlemek üçin faktal soraglary bölünmek için pipeline'de gelecek görev için kullanışlı soraglary azaltmak için faydalıdır. Bizim sistemimiz XGBoost klasifikasyon sub-görevi A üçin alınan Uniwersal Şahsy Ködlemelerini ulanýar. Biz bu şekilde farklı temsiller we birleşmelerinin etkinliğini kanıtlamak üçin başga birleşmelerini we raflardan uzak bir makine öwrenmesi algoritmalarını deňleýäris. Taýýarlama testimiziň netijesi 84%-de dogry boldy we düzenleyiciler tarapyndan edilen ilkinji gezek kabul edildi.", 'sq': 'Forumet e përgjigjeve të pyetjeve në internet të komunitetit (cQA) kanë fituar popullaritet masiv brenda viteve të fundit. Rritja e përdoruesve për forume të tilla ka çuar në rritjen e nevojës për vlerësim automatik për kuptimin e pyetjeve dhe vlerësimin e fakteve të përgjigjeve të ofruara nga pjesëmarrësit e ndryshëm në forum. Ekipi ynë, Fermi, mori pjesë në nëndetyrën A të Detyrës 8 në SemEval 2019 - e cila trajton problem in e parë në tubacionin e vlerësimit faktik në forumet e cQA, pra, duke vendosur nëse një pyetje e vënë kërkon një informacion faktik, një opinion/këshillë apo thjesht po socializon. Ky informacion është shumë i dobishëm në ndarjen e pyetjeve faktike nga ato jo faktike që ndihmojnë shumë në organizimin e pyetjeve në kategori të dobishme dhe reduktojnë hapësirën e problemit për detyrën tjetër në tubacion për vlerësimin e fakteve midis përgjigjeve të disponueshme. Sistemi ynë përdor përfshirjet e përfshira nga Universal Sentence Encoder kombinuar me XGBoost për klasifikimin e nëndetyrës A. Ne gjithashtu vlerësojmë kombinime të tjera të përfshirjeve dhe algoritmet e mësimit të makinave jashtë raftit për të demonstruar efektshmërinë e përfaqësimeve të ndryshme dhe kombinimet e tyre. Rezultatet tona gjatë testit të vlerësimit dhanë një saktësi prej 84% dhe morën pozitën e parë në qëndrimet përfundimtare të gjykuara nga organizatorët.', 'hy': 'Օնլայն համայնքի հարցերի պատասխանների ֆորմները (CQA) զանգվածային բնակչություն են ստացել վերջին տարիների ընթացքում: Այսպիսի ֆորմերի օգտագործողների աճը հանգեցրեց ավտոմատիկ գնահատման անհրաժեշտության աճին հարցերի հասկանալու համար և ֆորմերի տարբեր մասնակիցների տրամադրված պատասխանների փաստերի գնահատման համար: Our team, Fermi, participated in sub-task A of Task 8 at SemEval 2019 - which tackles the first problem in the pipeline of factual evaluation in cQA forums, i.e., deciding whether a posed question asks for a factual information, an opinion/advice or is just socializing.  Այս տեղեկատվությունը շատ օգտակար է ոչ փաստական հարցերի բաժանման մեջ, որոնք շատ օգնում են հարցերի կազմակերպել օգտակար կատեգորիաներով և նվազեցնում են խնդիրների տարածքը հաջորդ առաջադրանքի համար, որպեսզի հասանելի պատասխանների մեջ փաստական գնահատման համար: Մեր համակարգը օգտագործում է համաշխարհային նախադասությունների կոդավորից ստացված ներգրավումները, որոնք միավորվում են Xգբուստի հետ, A-ի դասակարգման ենթախնդրի համար: Մենք նաև գնահատում ենք ներգրավումների և անդասակարգչային մեքենայի ուսումնասիրության ալգորիթմների այլ համադրումները, որպեսզի Արժեքավորման փորձարկումների ընթացքում մեր արդյունքները 84 տոկոսի ճշգրտություն տվեցին և ստացան առաջին դիրքը կազմակերպողների կողմից գնահատված վերջնական դիրքերում:', 'am': 'የኢንተርኔት ማኅበረሰብ ጥያቄዎች (cQA) በቅርብ ዓመታት ውስጥ ብዙ ሕዝብ አግኝቷል፡፡ The rise in users for such forums have led to the increase in the need for automated evaluation for question comprehension and fact evaluation of the answers provided by various participants in the forum.  የፊርሪ ቡድን ከ ስራ 8 አካባቢ በሴምEval 2019 ላይ ተጋጠመ፤ ይህም የCQA ፎርማኖችን የመጀመሪያ ጉዳይ የውነት ማስታወቂያውን እና አስተያየት/ምክር ወይም ማኅበራዊ ማኅበረሰብ እንዲጠይቅ ነው፡፡ ይህ መረጃ የእውነት ጥያቄዎችን ከመለየት በጣም ይጠቅማል፡፡ የዓለምአቀፍ ፈቃድ ኮድ ከXGBoost ጋር ለመግለጫው አካባቢ እና ሌሎችን ጉዳዮች እና የሸለፍ መሳፍን ማወቅ ማቀናጃዎችን እና የልዩ መልዕክቶችን እና ግንኙነታቸውን ለማሳየት እናስታውቃለን፡፡ የድምፅ ፈተና ውጤታችን 84 በመቶ አካሄዱን አግኝቷል፡፡', 'az': "İnternettə Cəhənnəm soruşu cavab vermək Forumu (cQA) son illərdə böyük məşhurlük artırdı. Bütün forumların istifadəçilərinin yüksəlişi, bu forumda müxtəlif iştirakçilər təyin etdikləri cavabların anlaşılması və həqiqət değerlendirməsi üçün otomatik değerlendirmə ehtiyacını artırdı. Bizim ekibimiz, Fermi, 2019-in SemEval'da A of Task 8-in sub-task ilə müvəffəq etdi - bu, cQA forumlarında fəaliyyətli değerlendirməyin ilk problem in i çəkir, yox. ki, bir sual həqiqət məlumatı soruşur, fikir/məsləhət istəyir və ya sadəcə sosializaşdırmaq istəyir. Bu məlumat faktal sualları fərqli olmayanlardan ayırmaq üçün çox faydalıdır ki, bu sualları faydalı kategoriyalara organize etmək üçün çox faydalıdır və məlumatların faydalı cevaplar arasında faktal değerlendirmək üçün gələcək məlumatın sonraki məlumatının məlumatını azaltır. Bizim sistemimiz XGBoost'la birlikdə XGBoost'un A klasifikasiya apa-görevi üçün alınan Universal Sentence Encoderindən alınan inbingləri istifadə edir. Biz də başqa inbinglərin və apa-shelf makinelərin öyrənməsi algoritmini müxtəlif təsirlərin və kombinasyonlarının etkinliğini göstərmək üçün değerlendiririk. Növbətimizin sonuçlarımız müəyyən edilmə sınamasında 84%-dən düzgün oldu və organizatorların hökmünün son durumlarında ilk pozisyonu aldı.", 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক বছরের মধ্যে অনলাইন কমিউনিটি প্রশ্নের উত্তর ফোরাম (সিকিউএ) ব্যাপক জনপ্রিয় হয়েছে। এ ধরনের ফোরামের ব্যবহারকারীদের বৃদ্ধি বাড়িয়ে ফোরামের বিভিন্ন অংশগ্রহণকারীদের প্রশ্নের স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মূল্যের প্রয়োজন বৃদ্ধি  আমাদের দল ফের্মি সেমইভাল ২০১৯ সালের সাব কাজের ৮টি অংশগ্রহণ করেছেন - যা সিকিউএ ফোরামে আসল মূল্যের প্রথম সমস্যার মুখোমুখি হয়েছে, যেমন সিদ্ধান্ত নেয়া হয়েছে যে একটি প্রশ্ন আসল তথ্য, একটি মতা পাইপেলাইনের পরবর্তী কাজের জন্য প্রশ্ন বিভক্ত করার জন্য এই তথ্য অনেক কার্যকর, যা বাস্তবতার মধ্যে বাস্তবতা মূল্যায়নের জন্য প্রশ্নের সংগঠিত করার জন্যে অত্যন্ত সা আমাদের সিস্টেম ব্যবহার করে বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের শাস্তি এনকোডারের সাথে এক্স জিবুস্টের সাথে ক্লাশিকেশন সাব-কাজের জন্য এক্সিবুস্ট ব্যবহার করে। এছাড়াও আমরা বিভিন্ন প্রতিনিধিত্ব ও তাদে মূল্য পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষার ফলাফল ৮৪% সঠিকভাবে দিয়েছে এবং সংগঠকদের বিচারের শেষ অবস্থানে প্রথম অবস্থান পেয়েছে।', 'bs': 'Forumi za odgovor na pitanja zajednice (cQA) u posljednjih godina dobili su ogromnu popularnost. Povećanje korisnika za takve forume dovelo je do povećanja potrebe za automatskom procjenom razumijevanja pitanja i procjene činjenica odgovora koje su pružile različiti sudionici na forumu. Naš tim, Fermi, sudjelovao je u podzadatku A zadatka 8 na semiEvalu 2019. koji rješava prvi problem u cijevi činjenične procjene u forumima cQA, tj. odlučuje da li postavljeno pitanje traži činjenične informacije, mišljenje/savjete ili samo socijalizira. Ova informacija je vrlo korisna u segregaciji činjeničnih pitanja od nečinjenica koje visoko pomaže u organizaciji pitanja u korisne kategorije i smanjuje problem prostor za sljedeći zadatak u cijevi za procjenu činjenica među dostupnim odgovorima. Naš sistem koristi ugrađene od Univerzalnog kodera kazne kombinacije s XGBoost za klasifikaciju podzadatak A. Također procjenjujemo i druge kombinacije ugrađenja i algoritma učenja uređaja iz policije kako bi pokazali učinkovitost različitih predstavljanja i njihovih kombinacija. Naši rezultati u testu za procjenu dali su preciznost 84% i primili prvu poziciju na konačnim stavovima koje su organizatori osudili.', 'ca': "Els fòrums de resposta a preguntes de la comunitat en línia (cQA) han guanyat una gran popularitat en els últims anys. L'augment dels usuaris d'aquests fòrums ha portat al creixement de la necessitat d'una evaluació automatitzada per a la comprensió de preguntes i l'evaluació de fets de les respostes proporcionades per diversos participants del fòrum. El nostre equip, Fermi, va participar en la subtasca A de la tasca 8 a SemEval 2019 - que aborda el primer problema en el conjunt de l'evaluació de fets en fòrums de cQA, és a dir, decidir si una pregunta plantejada demana informació de fet, opinió/consell o simplement es socialitza. Aquesta informació és molt útil per separar les preguntes factuals de les que no són factuals, que ajuda molt a organitzar les preguntes en categories útils i redueix l'espai problem àtic per a la següent tasca en el sistema d'evaluació de fets entre les respostes disponibles. El nostre sistema utilitza les incorporacions obtenues del codificador de sentences universal combinat amb XGBoost per la subclassificació A. També evaluem altres combinacions d'incorporacions i algoritmes d'aprenentatge de màquines fora de la plataforma per demostrar l'eficacia de les diverses representacions i les seves combinacions. Els nostres resultats en el conjunt de proves d'evaluació van donar una precisió del 84% i van rebre la primera posició en les posicions finals juzgades pels organitzadors.", 'cs': 'Online komunitní otázková fóra (cQA) získala v posledních letech obrovskou popularitu. Nárůst uživatelů těchto fór vedl ke zvýšení potřeby automatizovaného vyhodnocování pro porozumění otázkám a hodnocení faktů odpovědí poskytnutých různými účastníky fóra. Náš tým Fermi se podílel na podúkolu A úkolu 8 na SemEvalu 2019, který řeší první problém v plánu faktického hodnocení na fórech cQA, tj. rozhodování, zda položená otázka žádá o faktickou informaci, názor/radu nebo jen socializaci. Tyto informace jsou velmi užitečné při oddělení věcných od nevěcných otázek, což velmi pomáhá při organizování otázek do užitečných kategorií a zkrátí problémový prostor pro další úkol v plánu pro hodnocení faktů mezi dostupnými odpověďmi. Náš systém využívá vložení získané z Universal Sentence Encoder v kombinaci s XGBoost pro klasifikační dílčí úlohu A. Hodnotíme také další kombinace vložení a standardní algoritmy strojového učení, abychom demonstrovali účinnost různých reprezentací a jejich kombinací. Naše výsledky napříč hodnotícím testovým setem poskytly přesnost 84% a získaly první místo ve finálním pořadí hodnoceném organizátory.', 'fi': 'Online Community Question Answering Forumit (cQA) ovat saaneet valtavan suosion viime vuosina. Tällaisten foorumien käyttäjien määrän kasvu on johtanut siihen, että foorumin eri osallistujien antamien vastausten automaattisen arvioinnin tarve on lisääntynyt. Tiimimme Fermi osallistui SemEval 2019 -tapahtumassa tehtävän 8 osatehtävään A, jossa käsitellään ensimmäistä ongelmaa faktojen arvioinnissa cQA-foorumeilla eli päätettiin, kysyykö esitetty kysymys faktatietoa, mielipidettä/neuvoja vai onko se vain seurustelua. Tämä tieto on erittäin hyödyllistä faktakysymysten erottamisessa ei-faktakysymyksistä, mikä auttaa suuresti järjestämään kysymykset hyödyllisiin kategorioihin ja pienentää ongelmatilaa seuraavassa tehtävässä faktojen arviointia varten saatavilla olevien vastausten joukosta. Järjestelmämme käyttää Universal Sentence Encoderista saatuja upotuksia yhdistettynä XGBoostiin luokittelun osatehtävässä A. Arvioimme myös muita upotuksien yhdistelmiä ja valmiita koneoppimisalgoritmeja osoittaaksemme eri esitysten ja niiden yhdistelmien tehokkuuden. Tuloksemme läpi arviointitestisarjan antoivat 84% tarkkuuden ja saivat ensimmäisen sijan loppukilpailussa järjestäjien arvioimana.', 'et': 'Online kogukonna küsimustele vastamise foorumid (cQA) on viimastel aastatel saanud tohutu populaarsuse. Selliste foorumite kasutajate arvu suurenemine on suurendanud vajadust automatiseeritud hindamise järele küsimuste mõistmiseks ja foorumis osalejate vastuste faktide hindamiseks. Meie meeskond Fermi osales SemEval 2019 ülesande 8 alaülesandes A, mis käsitleb esimest probleemi faktilise hindamise kavas cQA foorumites, st otsustada, kas esitatud küsimus nõuab faktilist teavet, arvamust/nõu või lihtsalt suhtlemist. See teave on väga kasulik faktiliste küsimuste eraldamisel mittefaktilistest küsimustest, mis aitab kõrgelt organiseerida küsimused kasulikeks kategooriateks ja vähendab probleemiruumi järgmise ülesande jaoks faktide hindamiseks kättesaadavate vastuste hulgas. Meie süsteem kasutab klassifitseerimise alamülesandeks A universaalsest lausekodeerist saadud manustamisi kombineerituna XGBoostiga. Samuti hindame teisi manustamise ja masinõppe algoritmide kombinatsioone, et demonstreerida erinevate esituste ja nende kombinatsioonide efektiivsust. Meie tulemused kogu hindamiskatse komplektis andsid täpsuse 84% ja said esimese koha lõplikus edetabelis korraldajate hinnangul.', 'he': 'פורומות תשובות לשאלות הקהילתיות באינטרנט (cQA) קיבלו פופולריות מסיבית בשנים האחרונות. הגידול במשתמשים לפורומים כאלה הוביל לגידול בצורך להערכה אוטומטית להבין שאלות ולעריכת העובדות של התשובות שנספקו על ידי שונים משתתפים בפורום. הצוות שלנו, פרמי, השתתף במשימה A של משימה 8 בסימוול 2019 - אשר מתמודד עם הבעיה הראשונה בצינור הערכה העובדית בפורומים CQA, כלומר, להחליט אם שאלה שנשארה מבקשת מידע עובדי, דעה/עצה או רק סוציאליזציה. המידע הזה מועיל ביותר בהפרדה של שאלות עובדות מאותות לא עובדות שמעזרות ביותר בארגון השאלות לקטגוריות שימושיות ומעטפת את מרחב הבעיה למשימה הבאה בצינור לערכה עובדות בין התשובות זמינות. המערכת שלנו משתמשת באלגריטים שנקבלו ממקודד גזרים אוניברסלי שילוב עם XGBoost עבור התפקיד מסווג A. אנחנו גם מעריכים שילובים אחרים של התפקידים ואלגריטימים ללמוד מכונות מחוץ למדף כדי להוכיח את היעילות של התפקידים השונים והשילובים שלהם. התוצאות שלנו במבחן הערכה נתנו מדויקה של 84% וקיבלו את העמדה הראשונה במעמדות האחרונות ששופטים על ידי המארגנים.', 'jv': 'online Rasané ning perusahaan kanggo nggawe for êr dumadhi iki dadi nggawe gerakan kanggo ngilangno sistem sing otomatik kanggo ngerasai perusahaan karo akeh nyong weruh-ngobro sing nyimpen lanjut sampeyan winih ning acara dhéwé Awak dhéwé, Vermi, gabungi tanggal apat-task A ning task 8 nang semebal 2011 - sing nambahi perusahaan tanggal perusahaan tanggal ngguna perusahaan tanggal ngguna perusahaan winih Informasi iki luwih apik tenan kanggo segregani aturan question kamatuhal karo ingkang apa-ingkang artik sing bisa supoyo nggawe kesempatan kanggo ngilangno kategori sing luwih apik karo iso nguasai perbudhakan kanggo langgar nganggo perbudhakan kanggo diandelak bantuan kebonan kanggo kowé nggawe barang langgar. Sistem dhéwé wis nggunakake embedding sing ditambah Universal Sentense Rejalaké awakdhéwé éntuk perusahaan kanggo masalah éntuk aksi, awak dhéwé butuh gak ono wektu nggawe barang tanggal sing sabanjuré kara-sangan iki, ning acara tuaweke nggawe barang awak dhéwé.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Kiɗaɗa masu amfani da shi wa wannan Forums sun ƙara wa haja ya iya ƙayyade kima farat ɗaya wa bincike wa masu tambaya da jãyayya masu amfani da musamman masu cikin jurnata. Timin mu, Ferri, ya yi shirin sub-aikin A wa Taimar 8 a Semeval 2019 - wanda ke tacilin na farkon mataimaki a cikin piilen evaluation na gaskiya a cikin cQA's Forummomi, misali, yana tambayar a tambayar wani masu gaskiyar, ma'anar/shiryi ko yana samoyi. @ info Ana amfani da shirin ayukanmu da aka samu da XGBoost wa fassarar-sub-aikin A. Mu ƙaddara masu haɗi da matsayin da aka sanar da algoritori na-shelf dõmin ya nuna muhimmin masu motsari da kuma haɗiyalinsu. Matamayinmu da ke samun jarrabin evaluation ya ƙayyade tsarin 84% kuma ya motsa na farko a cikin matsayin ƙarami da aka yi hukunci da mãsu organizers.", 'sk': 'Spletni forumi za odgovore na vprašanja skupnosti (cQA) so v zadnjih letih pridobili veliko priljubljenost. Povečanje števila uporabnikov takih forumov je povzročilo povečanje potrebe po avtomatiziranem ocenjevanju za razumevanje vprašanj in ocenjevanje dejstev odgovorov različnih udeležencev foruma. Naša ekipa, Fermi, je sodelovala v podnalogi A naloge 8 na SemEvalu 2019, ki obravnava prvo težavo v načrtu ocenjevanja dejanskih dejanj v forumih cQA, tj. odločanje, ali postavljeno vprašanje zahteva dejanske informacije, mnenje/nasvet ali je samo druženje. Te informacije so zelo koristne pri ločevanju dejanskih vprašanj od nedejanskih, kar zelo pomaga pri organizaciji vprašanj v koristne kategorije in zmanjšuje problematični prostor za naslednjo nalogo v pripravi za oceno dejstev med razpoložljivimi odgovori. Naš sistem za klasifikacijsko podnalogo A uporablja vdelave iz univerzalnega kodirnika stavkov v kombinaciji z XGBoostom. Ocenjujemo tudi druge kombinacije vdelav in algoritmov strojnega učenja, da bi dokazali učinkovitost različnih reprezentacij in njihovih kombinacij. Naši rezultati v celotnem naboru ocenjevalnih testov so dali natančnost 84% in prejeli prvo mesto v končni lestvici, ki so jo ocenili organizatorji.', 'bo': 'དྲ་ཐོག དབྱེ་རིམ་འདི་དག་གི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གྲོང་ཁྱེར་གྱི་འཕེལ་རིམ་འདིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་རྟོགས་པ་དང་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མེད་པར་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལ་ ང་ཚོའི་ekipa Fermi, SemEval 2019 ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་གླེང་མོལ་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་གནད་དོན་ལྡན་གྱི་រង་འགོད་ཐུབ་པ། དངོས་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་གླེང་སྡུད་མེད་པའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་གྱི་དྲི་ཚིག་མང་ཙམ་གྱི་ཐོག་ཏེ། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་ཡིག ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ'}
{'en': 'TueFact at SemEval 2019 Task 8 : Fact checking in community question answering forums : context matters', 'ar': 'TueFact في SemEval 2019 المهمة 8: تدقيق الحقائق في المنتديات التي تجيب على أسئلة المجتمع: مسائل السياق', 'pt': 'TueFact no SemEval 2019 Tarefa 8: Verificação de fatos em fóruns de resposta a perguntas da comunidade: questões de contexto', 'fr': 'TueFact au SemEval 2019 Tâche 8\xa0: Vérification des faits dans les forums de réponse aux questions de la communauté\xa0: le contexte compte', 'es': 'TUEFact en SemEval 2019 Tarea 8: Verificación de hechos en los foros de respuesta a preguntas de la comunidad: el contexto importa', 'ja': 'TueFact at SemEval 2019タスク8 ：コミュニティの質問に答えるフォーラムでの事実確認：コンテキストの重要性', 'zh': 'SemEval 2019上星期二事实8:社区问答论坛中事核:背景重', 'hi': 'SemEval 2019 कार्य 8 पर TueFact: समुदाय के प्रश्न का जवाब देने वाले मंचों में तथ्य की जांच: संदर्भ मामले', 'ru': 'TueFact на SemEval 2019 Задача 8: Проверка фактов в сообществе, ответы на вопросы на форумах: контекст имеет значение', 'ga': 'TueFact ag SemEval 2019 Tasc 8: Seiceáil fíricí i bhfóraim fhreagraí ceisteanna pobail: cúrsaí comhthéacs', 'ka': 'TueFact at SemEval 2019 Task 8: Fact checking in community question answering forums: context matters', 'hu': 'TueFact a SemEval 2019 8. feladat: Tények ellenőrzése a közösségi kérdésekre válaszoló fórumokon: kontextus fontos', 'el': 'Εργασία 8: Έλεγχος γεγονότων σε φόρουμ απάντησης σε ερωτήσεις της κοινότητας: θέματα περιβάλλοντος', 'kk': 'TueFact at semiEval 2019 Task 8: Fact checking in community question answering forums: context matters', 'lt': 'TueFact 2019 m. SemEval 8 užduotis: Faktų tikrinimas bendruomenės klausimų atsakymo forumuose: konteksto klausimai', 'it': 'TueFact a SemEval 2019 Task 8: Controllo dei fatti nei forum di risposta alle domande della comunità: questioni relative al contesto', 'ms': 'TueFact at SemEval 2019 Task 8: Fact checking in community question answering forums: context matters', 'mk': 'TueFact на SemEval 2019 задача 8: Проверка на фактите во форумите за одговори на прашањата на заедницата: контекстни прашања', 'mt': 'It-TueFact f’SemEval 2019 Kompitu 8: Verifika tal-fatti f’fora ta’ tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet tal-komunità: kwistjonijiet ta’ kuntest', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ജോലി 8: സമൂഹത്തിന്റെ ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ ഉത്തരം ഫോര്\u200dമുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും സത്യം പരിശോധിക്കുക: context matters', 'no': 'TueFact at semiEval 2019 Oppgåve 8: Faktisk kontroll i samfunnspunkt svar på forume: kontekstsaker', 'ro': 'TueFact la SemEval 2019 Sarcina 8: Verificarea faptelor în forumurile de răspuns la întrebări comunitare: contextul contextului', 'pl': 'TueFact na SemEval 2019 Zadanie 8: Sprawdzanie faktów na forach odpowiadających na pytania społeczności: znaczenie kontekstu', 'mn': 'TueFact at SemEval 2019 Task 8: Нийгмийн асуулт хариултын загварын үндсэн шалгалт: context matters', 'sr': 'TueFact at semiEval 2019 Task 8: Provjera činjenica u pitanju zajednice odgovara na forume: kontekstske pitanja', 'sv': 'TueFact på SemEval 2019 Uppgift 8: Faktakontroll i forum för att besvara frågor från gemenskapen: sammanhangsfrågor', 'si': 'TueFactor at semeval 2019 Job 8: Real checking in а·ѓа¶ёа·Џа¶ұ а¶өа·ЉвЂҚа¶»а·Ѓа·Ља¶« а¶өа·ЉвЂҚа¶»а·Ѓа·Ља¶« а¶өа·ЉвЂҚа¶»а·Ѓа·Ља¶« а¶өа·ЉвЂҚа¶»а·Ѓа·Ља¶« а¶өа·ЉвЂҚа¶»а·Ѓа·Ља¶« а¶өа·ЉвЂҚа¶»а·Ѓа·Ља¶« а¶өа·ЉвЂҚа¶»а·Ѓа·Ља¶« а¶ө', 'so': 'Shaqoda SemEval 2019 8: Fact checking in community question answering forums: context matters', 'ta': 'செம்Eval 2019 பணி 8: சமூகத்தின் கேள்வி பதில் குறிப்புகளுக்கு முகப்பு சரிபார்ப்பு', 'ur': 'ٹوئ فٹ ۲۰۱۹ ٹوک ۸ میں توئ فٹ: جمعیت سؤال کے جواب دینے والی فورمز میں حقیقت چک کرنے والی', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'TueFact at SemEvl 2009 Task 8: Kiểm tra thực tế trong các diễn đàn trả lời câu hỏi cộng đồng: Vấn đề ngữ cảnh', 'bg': 'Задача 8: Проверка на факти във форумите за отговор на въпроси на общността: въпроси от контекста', 'da': 'TueFact på SemEval 2019 Opgave 8: Faktatjek i fællesskabsspørgsmålsbesvarelsesfora: kontekst betyder noget', 'nl': 'TueFact op SemEval 2019 Taak 8: Feitencontrole in community vragenbeantwoordingsforums: context telt', 'hr': 'TueFact at semiEval 2019 Task 8: Provjera činjenica u pitanju zajednice odgovarajućih foruma: kontekstske pitanja', 'de': 'TueFact bei SemEval 2019 Aufgabe 8: Faktenüberprüfung in Community-Fragebeantworterforen: Kontext zählt', 'ko': 'TueFact 2019년 SemEval 퀘스트 8: 커뮤니티 퀴즈 포럼에서의 사실 검토: 배경 문제', 'id': 'TueFact di SemEval 2019 Tugas 8: Pemeriksaan fakta dalam pertanyaan komunitas menjawab forum: masalah konteks', 'sw': 'TueFact kwenye kazi ya SemEval 2019 8: Kuchungulia ukweli katika swali la jumuiya kuwajibu jukwaa: context matters', 'fa': 'TueFact at SemEval 2019 Task 8: checking facts in community questions answering forums: context matters', 'tr': 'TueFact at SemEval 2019 Task 8: Fact checking in community question answering forums: context matters', 'sq': 'TueFact në SemEval 2019 Taska 8: Kontrolli i fakteve në forumet për përgjigjen e pyetjeve të komunitetit: çështje konteksti', 'hy': 'Դադար', 'am': 'Fact at SemEval 2019 Task 8: Fact checking in community question answering forums: context matters', 'az': 'TueFact at SemEval 2019 Task 8: Communities sual캼n캼n cevap ver톛n forumlar캼n faktlar캼n t톛sdiql톛nm톛si: context matters', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল ২০১৯-এর টুইফ্যাক্ট ৮: কমিউনিটি প্রশ্নের উত্তর দিয়ে সম্প্রদায়ের মুখোমুখি পরীক্ষা করা হচ্ছে: কন্ট্রে', 'bs': 'TueFact at semiEval 2019 Task 8: Provjera činjenica u pitanju zajednice odgovara na forume: kontekstske pitanja', 'af': 'TueFact by SemEval 2019 Opdrag 8: Fakte kontrole in gemeenskapsvraag antwoord forums: konteks saake', 'ca': 'TueFact a SemEval 2019 Task 8: Verifica de fets en fòrums de resposta a preguntes comunitàries: qüestions contextuals', 'cs': 'TueFact na SemEval 2019 Úkol 8: Kontrola faktů ve fórech odpovídajících na otázky komunity: kontext záleží', 'et': 'TueFact SemEval 2019 Ülesanne 8: Faktide kontrollimine kogukonna küsimustele vastamise foorumites: kontekstiküsimused', 'fi': 'TueFact SemEvalissa 2019 Tehtävä 8: Fact checking in community question answer forums: context matters', 'jv': 'TueActual at seminval 2011 task 8:', 'ha': 'Fact at SemEal 2019 Tafiyar 8: Fact checking in society about responsing Forums: context important', 'sk': 'TueFact na SemEval 2019 Naloga 8: Preverjanje dejstev v forumih za odgovore na vprašanja skupnosti: kontekstne zadeve', 'he': 'TueFact at SemEval 2019 Task 8: Fact checking in community questions answering forums: context matters', 'bo': 'TueFact at SemEval 2019 Task 8: Fact checking in community question answering forums: context matters'}
{'en': 'The SemEval 2019 Task 8 on Fact-Checking in community question answering forums aimed to classify questions into categories and verify the correctness of answers given on the QatarLiving public forum. The task was divided into two subtasks : the first classifying the question, the second the answers. The TueFact system described in this paper used different approaches for the two subtasks. Subtask A makes use of word vectors based on a bag-of-word-ngram model using up to trigrams. Predictions are done using multi-class logistic regression. The official SemEval result lists an accuracy of 0.60. Subtask B uses vectorized character n-grams up to trigrams instead. Predictions are done using a LSTM model and achieved an accuracy of 0.53 on the final SemEval Task 8 evaluation set.', 'ar': 'هدفت المهمة الثامنة في SemEval 2019 حول تدقيق الحقائق في المنتديات التي تجيب على أسئلة المجتمع إلى تصنيف الأسئلة إلى فئات والتحقق من صحة الإجابات المقدمة في منتدى QatarLiving العام. تم تقسيم المهمة إلى مهمتين فرعيتين: الأولى تصنيف السؤال ، والثانية للإجابات. استخدم نظام TueFact الموضح في هذه الورقة مناهج مختلفة للمهمتين الفرعيتين. يستخدم Subtask A متجهات الكلمات استنادًا إلى نموذج bag-of-word-ngram باستخدام ما يصل إلى أشكال ثلاثية الأبعاد. تتم التنبؤات باستخدام الانحدار اللوجستي متعدد الفئات. تسرد نتيجة SemEval الرسمية دقة قدرها 0.60. يستخدم Subtask B حرفًا متجهًا n-grams حتى أشكال ذات أشكال ثلاثية الأبعاد بدلاً من ذلك. تتم التنبؤات باستخدام نموذج LSTM وحققت دقة قدرها 0.53 في مجموعة التقييم النهائية لـ SemEval Task 8.', 'fr': "La tâche 8 de SemEval 2019 sur la vérification des faits dans les forums communautaires de réponses aux questions visait à classer les questions en catégories et à vérifier l'exactitude des réponses données sur le forum public QatarLiving. La tâche était divisée en deux sous-tâches\xa0: la première classant la question, la seconde les réponses. Le système TueFact décrit dans cet article utilisait différentes approches pour les deux sous-tâches. La sous-tâche A utilise des vecteurs de mots basés sur un modèle de sac de mot-ngram utilisant jusqu'à trigrammes. Les prévisions sont effectuées à l'aide d'une régression logistique multiclasse. Le résultat officiel de SemEval indique une précision de 0,60. La sous-tâche B utilise à la place des n-grammes de caractères vectorisés jusqu'aux trigrammes. Les prévisions sont effectuées à l'aide d'un modèle LSTM et ont atteint une précision de 0,53 sur l'ensemble d'évaluation final de la tâche 8 de SemEval.", 'pt': 'A Tarefa 8 do SemEval 2019 sobre Verificação de Fatos em fóruns de resposta a perguntas da comunidade teve como objetivo classificar as perguntas em categorias e verificar a exatidão das respostas dadas no fórum público do QatarLiving. A tarefa foi dividida em duas subtarefas: a primeira classificando a questão, a segunda as respostas. O sistema TueFact descrito neste artigo usou abordagens diferentes para as duas subtarefas. A subtarefa A faz uso de vetores de palavras com base em um modelo bag-of-word-ngram usando até trigramas. As previsões são feitas usando regressão logística multiclasse. O resultado oficial do SemEval lista uma precisão de 0,60. A subtarefa B usa caracteres vetorizados de n-gramas até trigramas. As previsões são feitas usando um modelo LSTM e alcançaram uma precisão de 0,53 no conjunto de avaliação final da Tarefa 8 SemEval.', 'es': 'La Tarea 8 de SemEval 2019 sobre verificación de datos en los foros de respuesta a preguntas de la comunidad tenía como objetivo clasificar las preguntas en categorías y verificar la exactitud de las respuestas dadas en el foro público de QatarLiving. La tarea se dividió en dos subtareas: la primera clasificaba la pregunta y la segunda las respuestas. El sistema TueFact descrito en este documento utilizó enfoques diferentes para las dos subtareas. La subtarea A utiliza vectores de palabras basados en un modelo bag-of-word-ngram que utiliza hasta trigramas. Las predicciones se realizan mediante regresión logística de múltiples clases. El resultado oficial de SemEval muestra una precisión de 0.60. La subtarea B usa n-gramas de caracteres vectorizados hasta trigramas en su lugar. Las predicciones se realizan utilizando un modelo LSTM y alcanzaron una precisión de 0.53 en el conjunto de evaluación final de la Tarea 8 de SemEval.', 'ja': 'コミュニティ質問回答フォーラムのファクトチェックに関するSemEval 2019タスク8は、質問をカテゴリに分類し、QatarLiving公開フォーラムで与えられた回答の正確性を検証することを目的としています。課題は2つのサブタスクに分けられた。1つ目は質問を分類することであり、2つ目は回答を分類することであった。この論文で説明したTueFactシステムは、2つのサブタスクに対して異なるアプローチを使用した。サブタスクAは、最大トリグラムを使用して、バッグ・オブ・ワード・グラムモデルに基づくワードベクトルを使用します。予測は、マルチクラスのロジスティック回帰を使用して行われます。公式のSemEvalの結果には、0.60の精度が記載されています。サブタスクBは、代わりにベクトル化された文字n - gramsを使用し、最大トリグラムを使用します。予測は、LSTMモデルを使用して行われ、最終的なSemEvalタスク8評価セットで0.53の精度を達成した。', 'zh': 'SemEval 2019年社区问论坛中事实勘事8旨在分类而验之卡塔尔生平论坛上所对案正确性。 分为二务:一曰分,二曰分。 本文所述TueFact系统对二子用异法也。 子职 A 用三元组词袋 ngram 模词向量。 用多类逻辑归成。 官方SemEval结果显示精度为0.60。 子职 B 用矢量化字符 n-gram,最多只用三元组。 以 LSTM 测之,终于 SemEval 务 8 估集上成 0.53 之准确率。', 'hi': 'समुदाय के प्रश्नों के उत्तर देने वाले मंचों में तथ्य-जांच पर SemEval 2019 टास्क 8 का उद्देश्य प्रश्नों को श्रेणियों में वर्गीकृत करना और कतर लिविंग सार्वजनिक मंच पर दिए गए उत्तरों की शुद्धता को सत्यापित करना है। कार्य को दो उप-कार्यों में विभाजित किया गया था: पहला प्रश्न को वर्गीकृत करना, दूसरा उत्तर। इस पेपर में वर्णित TueFact प्रणाली ने दो उप-कार्यों के लिए अलग-अलग दृष्टिकोणों का उपयोग किया। सबटास्क ए एक बैग-ऑफ-वर्ड-एनग्राम मॉडल के आधार पर ट्राइग्राम तक का उपयोग करके शब्द वैक्टर का उपयोग करता है। भविष्यवाणियां बहु-वर्ग रसद प्रतिगमन का उपयोग करके की जाती हैं। आधिकारिक SemEval परिणाम 0.60 की सटीकता को सूचीबद्ध करता है। सबटास्क बी इसके बजाय ट्राइग्राम तक वेक्टरीकृत चरित्र एन-ग्राम का उपयोग करता है। भविष्यवाणियों को एक LSTM मॉडल का उपयोग करके किया जाता है और अंतिम SemEval कार्य 8 मूल्यांकन सेट पर 0.53 की सटीकता प्राप्त की जाती है।', 'ru': 'Задача SemEval 2019 8 по проверке фактов на форумах с ответами на вопросы сообщества направлена на классификацию вопросов по категориям и проверку правильности ответов, данных на общественном форуме QatarLiving. Задача была разделена на две подзадачи: первая классифицирует вопрос, вторая - ответы. Система TueFact, описанная в настоящем документе, использовала различные подходы для двух подзадач. Подзадача А использует векторы слов, основанные на модели bag-of-word-ngram, используя до триграмм. Прогнозы делаются с использованием многоклассовой логистической регрессии. Официальный результат SemEval показывает точность 0,60. Подзадача B использует векторизированные символьные n-граммы вплоть до триграмм. Прогнозы выполняются с использованием модели LSTM и достигают точности 0,53 в окончательном наборе оценки задачи SemEval 8.', 'ga': 'Bhí sé mar aidhm ag Tasc 8 ar Sheiceáil Fíricí SemEval 2019 i bhfóraim freagartha ceisteanna pobail ceisteanna a rangú i gcatagóirí agus cruinneas na bhfreagraí a thugtar ar fhóram poiblí QatarLiving a fhíorú. Roinneadh an tasc ina dhá fhothasc: an chéad cheann ag rangú na ceiste, an dara ceann na freagraí. Bhain an córas TueFact a bhfuil cur síos air sa pháipéar seo úsáid as cineálacha cur chuige éagsúla don dá fhothasc. Úsáideann Fothasc A veicteoirí focal bunaithe ar mhúnla mála focal-ngram ag baint úsáide as suas le trigraim. Déantar tuartha trí úsáid a bhaint as aischéimniú lóistíochta ilranga. Liostaíonn toradh oifigiúil SemEval cruinneas 0.60. Úsáideann Fothasc B carachtar veicteoirithe n-gram suas go trigram ina ionad sin. Déantar réamh-mheastacháin ag baint úsáide as samhail LSTM agus baineadh amach cruinneas 0.53 ar thacar meastóireachta deiridh Tasc 8 SemEval.', 'ka': 'SemEval 2019 დავალება 8 ფაქტის შემოწმება საზოგადოებო კითხვაში, რომელსაც საზოგადოებო ფორმულებში გადასწავლა კითხვების კატეგორიებში და დამოწმება კატაპლივის საზოგადოებო ფორმულში მი პარამეტრი გაყოფილი ორი საკითხვით: პირველი კითხვის კლასი, მეორე კითხვით. TueFact-ის სისტემა, რომელიც აღწერულია ამ დონეში, გამოიყენება განსხვავებული დახმარებები ორი საკუთარი საკუთარი. Subtask A გამოყენება სიტყვის გვექტორების გამოყენება სიტყვის- სიტყვის- ngram მოდელზე, რომელიც რრიგრამისთვის გამოყენება. მრავალი კლასის ლოგისტიკური რეგრესიის გამოყენება. ჲტთუთალნთწრ ჟვმვგალ პვჱსლრარ ჟლსფთ ოპაგთლნჲჟრ ნა 0.60. Subtask B გამოყენება n- გრამების გარეშე. LSTM მოდელის გამოყენება დავაკეთებულია და 0.53 წარმოდგენა საკუთარი SemEval Task 8 განსაზღვრებას.', 'el': "Η εργασία 8 για τον έλεγχο των γεγονότων σε φόρουμ απαντήσεων σε ερωτήσεις της κοινότητας είχε ως στόχο να ταξινομήσει τις ερωτήσεις σε κατηγορίες και να επαληθεύσει την ορθότητα των απαντήσεων που δόθηκαν στο δημόσιο φόρουμ του QatarLiving. Η εργασία διαιρέθηκε σε δύο δευτερεύουσες ερωτήσεις: την πρώτη ταξινόμηση της ερώτησης, τη δεύτερη τις απαντήσεις. Το σύστημα TueFact που περιγράφεται στην παρούσα εργασία χρησιμοποίησε διαφορετικές προσεγγίσεις για τις δύο δευτερεύουσες εργασίες. Υποεργασία Α χρησιμοποιεί διανύσματα λέξεων βασισμένα σε ένα μοντέλο σακούλας λέξεων-ngram χρησιμοποιώντας έως και τρίγραμμα. Οι προβλέψεις γίνονται με τη χρήση πολυκλασσικής λογιστικής παλινδρόμησης. Το επίσημο αποτέλεσμα αναφέρει ακρίβεια 0.60. Η δευτερεύουσα εργασία Β χρησιμοποιεί διανυσματικά γραμμάτια χαρακτήρων μέχρι τρίγραμμα αντ' αυτού. Οι προβλέψεις γίνονται χρησιμοποιώντας ένα μοντέλο και επιτυγχάνονται ακρίβεια 0.53 στο τελικό σύνολο αξιολόγησης SemEval Task 8.", 'hu': 'A SemEval 2019 Task 8 on Fact-Checking a közösségi kérdésre válaszoló fórumokon célzott kategóriákba sorolni a kérdéseket és ellenőrizni a QatarLiving nyilvános fórumon adott válaszok helyességét. A feladatot két alcsoportra osztották: az első osztályozta a kérdést, a második a válaszokat. Az ebben a tanulmányban leírt TueFact rendszer különböző megközelítéseket alkalmazott a két részfeladathoz. Az A. alcsoport szóvektorokat használ egy zsák-of-word-ngram modell alapján, legfeljebb trigramokat használva. A jóslatok több osztályú logisztikai regresszióval történnek. A hivatalos SemEval eredmény 0,60 pontosságot mutat. A B. alcsoport vektorizált karaktereket használ helyette trigramokig. Az előrejelzések LSTM modellel történnek, és a végső SemEval Task 8 értékelési készleten 0,53 pontosságot értek el.', 'lt': '2019 m. SemEval 8 užduotis dėl faktų tikrinimo bendruomenės klausimų klausimų klausimų atsakymo forumuose buvo skirta klausimus suskirstyti į kategorijas ir patikrinti, ar atsakymai, pateikti viešajame forume QatarLiving, yra teisingi. Ši užduotis buvo suskirstyta į du paklausimus: pirmasis klausimo klasifikavimas, antrasis atsakymai. Šiame dokumente aprašyta TueFact sistema naudojo skirtingus metodus dviem paklausymams. Subužduotis A naudoja žodžio vektorius, pagrįstus žodžio maišelio modeliu, naudojančiu iki trigramų. Numatymai atliekami naudojant įvairių klasių logistinę regresiją. Oficialiuose SemEval rezultatuose nurodomas 0,60 tikslumas. Vietoj B papunkčio naudojamas vektorizuotas simbolis n-gramai iki trigramų. Prognozės atliekamos naudojant LSTM model į, o galutinio 8 pusvertinimo uždavinio vertinimo rinkinio tikslumas yra 0,53.', 'mk': 'The SemEval 2019 Task 8 on Fact-Checking in community question answering forums aimed to classify questions into categories and verify the correctness of answers given on the QatarLiving public forum.  Оваа задача беше поделена на две потпрашања: првото класификување на прашањето, второто на одговорите. Системот TueFact опишан во овој весник користеше различни пристапи за двете потпрашања. Подзадача А користи вектори на зборови базирани на модел на вреќа со зборови кои користат до триграми. Предвидувањата се направени користејќи мултикласична логистичка регресија. Официјалниот резултат на SemEval ја наведува точноста од 0,60. Подзадача Б користи векторизиран знак n-грам до триграми наместо тоа. Предвидувањата се направуваат со користење на LSTM модел и се постигна точност од 0,53 за финалниот семевал задача 8.', 'it': 'Il Task 8 di SemEval 2019 sul controllo dei fatti nei forum di risposta alle domande della comunità mirava a classificare le domande in categorie e verificare la correttezza delle risposte fornite sul forum pubblico QatarLiving. Il compito era diviso in due sottocompiti: la prima classificava la domanda, la seconda le risposte. Il sistema TueFact descritto in questo articolo ha utilizzato approcci diversi per le due sottoattività. Sottotask A utilizza vettori di parole basati su un modello bag-of-word-ngram utilizzando fino a trigrammi. Le previsioni sono fatte utilizzando regressione logistica multi-classe. Il risultato ufficiale SemEval elenca una precisione di 0,60. Sottotask B utilizza caratteri vettoriali n-grammi fino a trigrammi invece. Le previsioni sono fatte utilizzando un modello LSTM e hanno raggiunto una precisione di 0,53 sul set finale di valutazione SemEval Task 8.', 'mt': 'The SemEval 2019 Task 8 on Fact-Checking in community question answering forums aimed to classify questions into categories and verify the correctness of answers given on the QatarLiving public forum.  The task was divided into two subtasks: the first classifying the question, the second the answers.  The TueFact system described in this paper used different approaches for the two subtasks.  Subtask A makes use of word vectors based on a bag-of-word-ngram model using up to trigrams.  It-tbassir isir bl-użu ta’ rigressjoni loġistika ta’ diversi klassijiet. The official SemEval result lists an accuracy of 0.60.  Minflok, is-sottokompitu B juża karattru vektorizzat n-grammi sa trigrammi. Predictions are done using a LSTM model and achieved an accuracy of 0.53 on the final SemEval Task 8 evaluation set.', 'ml': 'വിഭാഗങ്ങളിലേക്ക് ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d വിഭാഗങ്ങളിലേക്ക് വ്യക്തമാക്കുവാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്ന ഫോര്\u200dമുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം ചോദിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 201 ഈ ജോലി രണ്ടു സബ്ജോട്ടിലേക്ക് വിഭാഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ആദ്യത്തെ ചോദ്യത്തെ വിഭാഗിക്കുന്നതും, രണ്ടാ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d വിശദീകരിച്ച ട്യൂഫാക്റ്റ് സിസ്റ്റം രണ്ട് സബ്ട്ടാസിന്റെ വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വഴികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗി ട്രിഗ്രാമിലേക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ബാഗ്- ഓഫ്- വാര്\u200dഡ്- ഗ്രാം മോഡലിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റര പല-ക്ലാസ്സിലെ ലോഗിസ്റ്റിക്ക് റിക്രഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മുന്\u200dഗണന നടത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ഔദ്യോഗിക സെമ്Eval ഫലം 0. 60 ന്റെ ഒരു കൃത്യമായി നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. Subtask B പകരം ട്രിഗ്രാമുകളിലേക്ക് വെക്ടോര്\u200dട്ടെഷന്\u200d ചെയ്ത അക്ഷരം n- ഗ്രാമുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു LSTM മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന മുന്\u200dഗണന നടത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അവസാനത്തെ സെമ്എവാല്\u200d ടാസ്ക് 8 വിലാസപ്രകാരം സെറ്റില്\u200d 0. 53', 'kk': '2019 жылдың жарым Eval 8 тапсырмасы қоғамдық сұрақтардың жауап беру форумында сұрақтарды санаттарына классификациялау және QatarLiving көпшілік форумында берілген жауаптардың дұрыстығын тексеру үшін. Тапсырма екі ішкі сұрақ бөлінген: бірінші сұрақ, екінші жауап. Бұл қағаздың TueFact жүйесі екі ішкі сұрақтар үшін түрлі арқылы қолданылды. Ішкі тапсырма А триграммаларды қолдану үшін сөздің векторларын қолданады. Көп класс логистикалық регрессиясын қолдану үшін болады. Әдетті SemEval нәтижесі 0, 60 деген дұрыс тізімінде. B ішкі тапсырма орнына триграммдерге көп n- грамм векторияланған таңбаны қолданады. LSTM үлгісін қолдануға болады. Соңғы SemEval Task 8 бағалау бағдарламасында 0,53 деген дұрыс жеткізді.', 'pl': 'Zadanie SemEval 2019 8 na temat sprawdzania faktów na forach odpowiadających na pytania społecznościowe miało na celu sklasyfikowanie pytań na kategorie i weryfikację poprawności odpowiedzi udzielonych na forum publicznym QatarLiving. Zadanie zostało podzielone na dwa podzadania: pierwsze klasyfikujące pytanie, drugie odpowiedzi. Opisany w niniejszym artykule system TueFact zastosował różne podejścia do dwóch podzadań. Podzadanie A wykorzystuje wektory słowa oparte na modelu worka-of-word-ngram z wykorzystaniem do trygramów. Prognozy są wykonywane przy użyciu wieloklasowej regresji logistycznej. Oficjalny wynik SemEval wykazuje dokładność 0.60. Podzadanie B używa zamiast tego wektoryzowanych znaków n-gramów do trygramów. Prognozy są wykonywane przy użyciu modelu LSTM i osiągane dokładność 0,53 na ostatecznym zestawie oceny SemEval Task 8.', 'ro': 'Sarcina 8 SemEval 2019 privind verificarea faptelor în forumurile de răspuns la întrebări comunitare a vizat clasificarea întrebărilor în categorii și verificarea corectitudinii răspunsurilor date pe forumul public QatarLiving. Sarcina a fost împărțită în două subactivități: prima clasificând întrebarea, a doua răspunsuri. Sistemul TueFact descris în această lucrare a folosit abordări diferite pentru cele două subactivități. Subsarcina A utilizează vectori de cuvinte bazați pe un model sac-of-word-ngram folosind până la trigrame. Predicţiile se fac folosind regresia logistică multiclasă. Rezultatul oficial SemEval indică o precizie de 0,60. Subsarcina B folosește caractere vectorizate n-grame până la trigrame în schimb. Predicțiile se fac folosind un model LSTM și au obținut o precizie de 0,53 pe setul final de evaluare SemEval Task 8.', 'ms': 'SemEval 2019 Task 8 on Fact-Checking in community question answering forums aimed at classifying questions in to categories and verify the correctness of answers given on the QatarLiving public forum. Tugas ini dibahagi kepada dua sub-tanya: yang pertama mengklasifikasi soalan, yang kedua jawapan. Sistem TueFact yang diterangkan dalam kertas ini menggunakan pendekatan yang berbeza untuk kedua-dua sub-tanya. Subtugas A menggunakan vektor perkataan berdasarkan model beg-of-word-ngram menggunakan sehingga trigram. Ramalan dilakukan menggunakan regresi logistik berkelas berbilang. Hasil SemEval rasmi menyenaraikan ketepatan 0. 60. Subtask B uses vectorized character n-grams up to trigrams instead.  Ramalan dilakukan menggunakan model LSTM dan mencapai ketepatan 0.53 pada set penilaian SemEval Task 8 terakhir.', 'mn': '2019 оны SemEval 2019 оны нийгмийн асуултын хариулт шалгалтын 8 даалгавар Катар Ливийн нийгмийн форум дээр өгсөн хариултын зөв байдлыг шалгахын тулд зориулсан. Ажилд хоёр доорх асуулт хуваагдсан: анхны асуултыг тайлбарлах, хоёр дахь хариулт. Энэ цаасан дээр тайлбарласан TueFact систем нь хоёр дотроос өөр арга зам ашиглаж байсан. Газрын даалгавар А нь триграмм руу ашиглаж үгний векторуудыг ашигладаг. Бид олон ангийнх логистик сэтгэл хөдлөлийг ашиглаж байдаг. Шинжлэх ухааны SemEval-ын үр дүн нь 0.60-ын тодорхойлолт бий. Б-ын суурь даалгавар нь n-граммыг триграмм руу ашигладаг. LSTM загварыг ашиглаж, сүүлийн SemEval Task 8 дүгнэлттэй тодорхойлолт нь 0.53 гарч ирсэн.', 'sr': 'Zadnji zadatak 8 za ispitivanje činjenica u zajedničkim pitanjima usmjeren je da klasifikuju pitanja u kategorije i provjeri ispravnost odgovora koji su dobili na javnom forumu QatarLiving. Taj zadatak je podijeljen u dva podataka: prva klasifikacija pitanja, druga odgovora. Sistem TueFact opisao je u ovom papiru koristio različite pristupe za dve podkaze. Subtask A koristi vektore reèi na temelju vreæe reèi-ngramnog model a korištenja do trigrama. Predviđanja se završavaju koristeći multiklasnu logističku regresiju. Zvanični rezultat SemEval prikazuje točnost od 0,60. Subtask B koristi vektorizirani karakter n-grame do trigrama umesto toga. Predviđanja se završavaju koristeći LSTM model i ostvarila tačnost od 0,53 na konačnom setu procjene 8 polevalnih zadataka.', 'so': "Shaqo 8 ee SemEval 2019 ee ku saabsan suurtagalka ku saabsan kooxaha lagu jawaabayo warqadaha lagu qorayo su'aalaha kooxaha lagu kala qeybiyo si loo xaqiijiyo jawaabaha la siiyey warqadda guud ee QatarLiving. Amarkii waxaa loo qaybsaday laba shabakad, marka ugu horeysa ay su'aalka u qaybsadaan, kii labaadna jawaabihiisii. Tirada TueFact ee warqaddan lagu qoray waxay isticmaaleen qaabooyin kala duduwan labada shaqooyin. Submission A wuxuu isticmaalaa vectors oo ku saleysan tilmaamaha word-ngram oo isticmaalaya jardiinooyinka. Horumarka waxaa lagu sameeyaa isticmaalka dib u celinta fasalka kala duduwan. Shahaadada rasmiga ah ee SemEval wuxuu ku qoraa saxda 0.60. Subtask B uses vectorized character n-grams up to trigrams instead.  Tusaale LSTM waxaa la isticmaalaa bandhigyo, wuxuuna gaadhay saxda 0.53 ee ugu dambeysay shuqulka qiimeynta ee ugu dambeysay ee SemEval.", 'sv': 'SemEval 2019 Task 8 om faktakontroll i forum för frågesvar syftade till att klassificera frågor i kategorier och verifiera riktigheten i svaren på det offentliga forumet QatarLiving. Uppgiften delades in i två underuppgifter: den första klassificeringen av frågan, den andra svaren. Det TueFact-system som beskrivs i denna uppsats använde olika tillvägagångssätt för de två deluppgifterna. Underuppgift A använder ordvektorer baserade på en bag-of-word-ngram modell med upp till trigram. Förutsägelser görs med hjälp av logistisk regression i flera klasser. Det officiella SemEval-resultatet visar en noggrannhet på 0,60. Underuppgift B använder vektoriserade tecken n-gram upp till trigram istället. Förutsägelser görs med hjälp av en LSTM-modell och uppnår en noggrannhet på 0,53 på den slutliga SemEval Task 8 utvärderingssatsen.', 'ta': 'The SemEval 2019 பணி 8 on Fact-Checking in community question answers forums aimed to classify questions into categories and verify the correctness of answers given on the QatarLiving public forum. இந்த செயல் இரண்டு துணை பணிகளாக பிரிக்கப்பட்டது: முதல் கேள்வி வகுத்தல், இரண்டாவது விடைகள். இந்த தாளில் விவரிக்கப்பட்ட ட டைப்Fact அமைப்பு இரண்டு துணை பணிகளுக்கு வேறு வழிகளை பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டது. Subtask A makes use of word vectors based on a bag-of-word-ngram model using up to trigrams.  பல வகுப்பு logistic regression பயன்படுத்தி விருப்பங்கள் செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது. The official SemEval result lists an accuracy of 0. 60. உப பணி B துணை வரைபடங்களுக்கு பதிலாக வெக்டார் செய்யப்பட்ட எழுத்து n- கிராம்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறது. LSTM மாதிரி பயன்படுத்தி முன்னுரிமைகள் செய்யப்பட்டு இறுதியாக செம்Eval பணி 8 மதிப்பு அமைப்பில் 0. 53 க்கு சரியான சரியான விகி', 'ur': 'سمیوئل 2019 ٹاکس 8 کمونٹی سؤال کے سوال کی جواب دینے کی سؤال کے بارے میں ہے جس کا ارادہ تھا کہ سؤال کاٹر لیٹ لیٹ فارغ فورسم میں کریں اور سؤال کا درستی تصدیق کریں۔ یہ کام دو دفعہ میں تقسیم کیا گیا تھا: پہلی کلاس سوال کرنے والی ہے، دوسری جواب دینے والی ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں توئفٹ سیسٹم نے دو دفتروں کے لئے مختلف طریقے استعمال کی۔ Subtask A کلمات ویکتروں کا استعمال کرتا ہے جو تریکرام کے لئے استعمال کر رہے ہیں ایک بسگ-of-word-ngram موڈل پر بنیاد رکھتی ہے. بہت سی کلاس لوجیسٹیک ریگرس کے مطابق پیش بینی کی جاتی ہیں. رسمی سیمیولی نتیجہ 0.60 کی دقیق لکھی جاتی ہے. Subtask B اس عوض تکرام کے لئے vectorized character n-grams استعمال کرتا ہے. ایک LSTM موڈل کے مطابق پیش بینی کر دی گئی ہے اور آخری سیم Eval Task 8 ارزیابی سٹے پر 0.53 کی دقیق پہنچ گئی ہے.', 'si': 'සමාජික ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලට පරි ප්\u200dරශ්නය දෙකට වෙනස් කරලා තියෙනවා: පළමු ප්\u200dරශ්නය විශ්වාස කරනවා, දෙවෙනි ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය. TueFactor පද්ධතිය මේ පත්තරයේ වෙනස් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා වෙනස් ප්\u200dරවේශනය පාවිච්චි කරලා තියෙනවා. Sub-action A make use of word vets ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ විද්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි. සේම්වේල් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් 0.60 විතරයි. වෙක්ටරිස් B වෙක්ටරිස් අක්ෂර n- ග්\u200dරාම් වලට ත්\u200dරික්\u200dරාම් වලට භාවිත කරනවා. LSTM මොඩල් එකක් භාවිතා කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරලා තියෙනවා ඒ වගේම අන්තිම සෙම්වේල් වැඩ 8 විශ්නයක් සැකසුමේ 0.53 ගැන ස', 'no': 'Det semiEval 2019 oppgåva 8 om faktisksjekking i samfunnspunktsforummet for å klassifisera spørsmål i kategoriar og verifisera korrekt svar som er gitt på QatarLiving offentlig forum. Oppgåva var delt i to underspørsmål: den første klassifiserer spørsmålet, den andre svara. Name Suboppgåve A gjer bruk av ordvektorar basert på ein pakk av ord- ngram- modell som brukar opp til trigrammer. Forhåndsvising er ferdig med logistisk regresjon for fleire klassar. Den offisielle semiEval-resultatet viser eit nøyaktig 0,60. Suboppgåve B brukar vektorisert teikn n- gram opp til trigrammer i staden. Førehandsvising er ferdige med ein LSTM-modell og oppnådd eit nøyaktig 0,53 på det siste halvårsevalueringssettet for halvårsoppgåva 8.', 'uz': 'Name Vazifa ikki vazifalarga qaytarilgan: birinchi savol ajratish, ikkinchi javoblar. Ushbu hujjatda yaratilgan TueFact tizimi ikkita vazifalar uchun boshqa usullar ishlatilgan. Name Predictions are done using multi-class logistic regression.  Eval natijasi 0. 60 tasdiqligini roʻyxat qiladi. Ushbu vazifa B oʻrniga vektorilgan belgi n- grammalarni trigrammalarga foydalanadi. @ title: window', 'vi': 'Thanh tra Điều tra Sự Thật trong các câu hỏi của cộng đồng nhằm nhằm phân loại câu hỏi và kiểm tra sự chính xác các câu trả lời được đưa ra trên diễn đàn người QatarLiving. Nhiệm vụ được chia thành hai phần nhỏ: câu thứ nhất phân loại câu hỏi, thứ hai câu trả lời. Hệ thống Cung giải được mô tả trong tờ giấy này sử dụng phương pháp khác nhau cho hai mặt phụ đề. Trừ A sử dụng các cỗ máy có từ dựa trên một kiểu cỡ chữ, dùng đến tam điểm. Dự đoán được thực hiện bằng sự phục hồi hàng loạt. Kết quả hoàn hảo của SemEvol liệt kê độ chính xác 0.60. Phân tích B sử dụng véc- tơ và n-grams theo tỉ số. Dự đoán được thực hiện bằng một mô hình LSD và đạt được độ chính xác 0.cô trong bộ đánh giá cuối cùng của SemEvl Task 8.', 'bg': 'Задача 8 за проверка на фактите във форумите за отговор на въпроси в общността имаше за цел класифициране на въпросите в категории и проверка на точността на отговорите, дадени на публичния форум "КатарЖивинг". Задачата беше разделена на две подзадачи: първата класификация на въпроса, втората отговорите. Системата описана в тази статия използва различни подходи за двете подзадачи. Подзадача А използва вектори на думи въз основа на модел торба с дума, използващ до триграми. Прогнозите се правят с помощта на мултикласна логистична регресия. Официалният резултат показва точност от 0,60. Подзадача Б използва векторизирани символи n-грами до триграми вместо това. Прогнозите се правят с помощта на модел и се постига точност от 0,53 на окончателния набор от оценка на задача 8.', 'da': 'SemEval 2019 Task 8 om fact-checking i fællesskabsspørgsmålsbesvarelsesfora havde til formål at klassificere spørgsmål i kategorier og kontrollere rigtigheden af svar givet på det offentlige QatarLiving forum. Opgaven var opdelt i to underopgaver: den første klassificering af spørgsmålet, den anden svarene. TueFact-systemet beskrevet i denne artikel anvendte forskellige tilgange til de to underopgaver. Underopgave A gør brug af ordvektorer baseret på en pose-of-word-ngram model ved hjælp af op til trigrammer. Forudsigelser udføres ved hjælp af logistisk regression i flere klasser. Det officielle SemEval resultat viser en nøjagtighed på 0,60. Underopgave B bruger vektoriserede tegn n-gram op til trigrammer i stedet. Forudsigelser udføres ved hjælp af en LSTM model og opnået en nøjagtighed på 0,53 på det endelige SemEval Task 8 evalueringssæt.', 'hr': 'Zadnji zadatak 8 iz polovice 2019. o provjeri činjenica u pitanju zajednice odgovarajućih foruma s ciljem klasifikacije pitanja u kategorije i provjeriti ispravnost odgovora podataka na javnom forumu QatarLiving. Taj zadatak je podijeljen u dvije podatke: prva klasifikacija pitanja, druga odgovora. Sistem TueFact opisanog u ovom papiru koristio je različite pristupe za dvije podkaze. Subtask A koristi vektore riječi na temelju torbe riječi-ngram model koristeći do trigrama. Predviđanja se završavaju koristeći multiklasnu logističku regresiju. Službeni rezultat SemEval prikazuje točnost od 0,60. Podzadatak B koristi vektorizirani znak n-grama do trigrama umjesto toga. Predviđanja se obavljaju koristeći LSTM model i ostvarili točnost od 0,53 na konačnom nastavu ocjene osmog zadatka za semiEval Task 8.', 'nl': 'De SemEval 2019 Taak 8 over Fact-Checking in communityvragenbeantwoordingsforums was bedoeld om vragen in categorieën te classificeren en de juistheid van antwoorden te verifiëren die op het QatarLiving openbare forum worden gegeven. De taak werd onderverdeeld in twee subtaken: de eerste classificatie van de vraag, de tweede de antwoorden. Het in dit artikel beschreven TueFact systeem gebruikte verschillende benaderingen voor de twee subtaken. Subtaak A maakt gebruik van woordvectoren gebaseerd op een bag-of-word-ngram model met maximaal trigrammen. Voorspellingen worden gedaan met behulp van multi-class logistieke regressie. Het officiële SemEval resultaat vermeldt een nauwkeurigheid van 0.60. Subtaak B gebruikt in plaats daarvan vectoriseerde teken n-grammen tot trigrammen. Voorspellingen worden gedaan met behulp van een LSTM model en bereikt een nauwkeurigheid van 0.53 op de uiteindelijke SemEval Task 8 evaluatieset.', 'id': 'SemEval 2019 Task 8 on Fact-Checking in community question answering forums aimed at classifying questions in to categories and verify the correctness of answers given on the QatarLiving public forum. Tugas dibagi menjadi dua pertanyaan: pertanyaan yang pertama, pertanyaan yang kedua. Sistem TueFact yang dijelaskan di kertas ini menggunakan pendekatan yang berbeda untuk dua subtasks. Subtask A menggunakan vektor kata berdasarkan model tas-kata-ngram menggunakan sampai trigram. Prediksi dilakukan menggunakan regresi logistik multikelas. Hasil SemEval resmi daftar akurasi 0,60. Subtask B menggunakan karakter vektoris n-gram hingga trigram sebagai gantinya. Prediksi dilakukan menggunakan model LSTM dan mencapai akurasi 0,53 pada set evaluasi SemEval Task 8 akhir.', 'ko': 'SemEval 2019 미션 8 커뮤니티 Q&amp;A 포럼에서의 팩트체크는 문제를 분류하고 카타르 공공 포럼에서 제시된 답안의 정확성을 검증하기 위한 것이다.이 임무는 두 개의 하위 임무로 나뉜다. 첫 번째 하위 임무는 문제를 분류하는 것이고, 두 번째 하위 임무는 답안을 분류하는 것이다.본고에서 기술한 TueFact 시스템은 이 두 하위 작업에 대해 서로 다른 방법을 사용했다.하위 작업 A는 단어 한 봉지를 기반으로 하는ngram모델의 단어 벡터를 이용하여 이 모델은 최대 3원을 사용한다.여러 가지 논리 회귀를 사용하여 예측하다.SemEval의 공식 결과는 0.60의 정확도를 나타냅니다.하위 작업 B는 삼각도까지 벡터화된 문자 n-gram을 사용합니다.LSTM 모델을 사용하여 예측한 결과 SemEval Task 8 평가 세트의 정확도는 0.53입니다.', 'de': 'Die SemEval 2019 Task 8 on Fact-Checking in Community-Fragebeantworterforen zielte darauf ab, Fragen in Kategorien einzuordnen und die Richtigkeit der Antworten im öffentlichen QatarLiving Forum zu überprüfen. Die Aufgabe wurde in zwei Teilaufgaben unterteilt: die erste Klassifizierung der Frage, die zweite die Antworten. Das in dieser Arbeit beschriebene TueFact-System verwendete unterschiedliche Ansätze für die beiden Teilaufgaben. Subtask A verwendet Wortvektoren, die auf einem Bag-of-Word-ngram-Modell basieren und bis zu Trigramme verwenden. Vorhersagen werden mit Hilfe von logistischer Regression mit mehreren Klassen durchgeführt. Das offizielle SemEval Ergebnis listet eine Genauigkeit von 0.60 auf. Unteraufgabe B verwendet stattdessen vektorisierte Zeichen n-Gramm bis Trigramme. Die Vorhersagen werden mit Hilfe eines LSTM-Modells durchgeführt und erreichen eine Genauigkeit von 0,53 auf dem endgültigen SemEval Task 8 Evaluierungsset.', 'fa': 'ماموریت ۲۰۱۹ نیم Eval ۲۰۱۹ در مورد بررسی حقیقت در سوال جامعه جواب دادن فرموم\u200cهای جامعه هدف گرفته است که سؤال\u200cها را به گونه\u200cها تشکیل دهند و درستی جواب\u200cها را در فرموم عمومی QatarLiving ثابت کند. وظیفه به دو پاسخ تقسیم شد: اولین کلاس سوال، دومین پاسخ. سیستم TueFact توضیح داده شده در این کاغذ از دسترسی های مختلف برای دو زیر سؤال استفاده کرد. زیر کار A از ویکتورهای کلمه بر اساس یک مدل کلمه انگرام استفاده می\u200cکند که با استفاده از تریکرام استفاده می\u200cکند. پیشنهاد با استفاده از بازگشت لوژیکی متعدد کلاس انجام می\u200cشود. نتیجه رسمی SemEval دقیق 0.60 را فهرست می\u200cکند. زیر کار B از نوشته\u200cهای n- گرم استفاده می\u200cکند به جای تریکرام. پیشنهاد با استفاده از یک مدل LSTM انجام می\u200cشود و دقیق 0.53 در مجموعه ارزیابی آخرین کار نیمه\u200cای ۸ رسیده است.', 'tr': '2019-njy ýyldaky halkara sahypalaryň jogap bermegi barada Semeval 2019 Görevi 8 Görev iki alt soraga bölündi: ilkinji soragy bölmek üçin, ikinji jogaby bölündi. Bu kagyzda TueFact sistemi iki alt soragy üçin farklı yaklaşyklary ulanýardy. Subtask A, trigramlar için kullanan bag-of-word-ngram modellerine dayanan kelime vektörleri kullanır. Birnäçe klas lojik regresiýasy ulanyp barýar. Resmi SemEval netijesi 0.60-yň dogrylygyny görkezilýär. Subtask B vektöredilen karakter n-gramlerden bunun yerine trigramlar üçin kullanır LSTM nusgasyny ulanyp barýar we soňky SemEval Taýgyny 8-nji çykyş düzümlerinde 0.53-yň dogrylygyny ýetdi.', 'sw': 'Kazi ya SemEval 2019 8 kuhusu Kuchungulia ukweli katika maswali ya jamii yaliyolenga kujibu jukwaa la kutangaza maswali katika makundi na kuthibitisha ukweli wa majibu yaliyotolewa kwenye jukwaa la umma la QatarLiving. Kazi hiyo iligawanywa katika majukumu mawili: ya kwanza kugawanya swali, ya pili majibu. Mfumo wa TueFact ulioandikwa katika gazeti hili ulitumia mbinu tofauti za kazi hizi mbili. Subtask A makes use of word vectors based on a bag-of-word-ngram model using up to trigrams.  Utawala unafanywa kwa kutumia vikwazo vingi vya kihistoria. Matokeo rasmi ya SemEval yanaorodhesha ukweli wa 0.60. Subtask B inatumia tabia n-grams zilizotengenezwa hadi trigram badala yake. Utawala unafanywa kwa kutumia mifano ya LSTM na umefikia ukweli wa 0.53 kwenye seti ya tathmini ya mwisho ya SemEval.', 'af': "Die SemEval 2019 Opdrag 8 oor Fact-Checking in gemeenskapsvraag antwoord-forums wat gewys het om vrae in kategorie te klassifiseer en die korrekheid van antwoorde wat gegee is op die QatarLiving publieke forum. Die taak is deel in twee subtaske: die eerste klassifisering van die vraag, die tweede van die antwoorde. Die TueFact stelsel beskrywe in hierdie papier het verskillende toegang gebruik vir die twee subtaske. Subtaak A maak gebruik van woord vektore gebaseer op 'n sak van woord- ngram model wat gebruik word na trigrame. Voorskrifte word gedoen met multiklas logistike regresie. Die offisiele SemEval resultaat lys 'n presisie van 0. 60. Subtaak B gebruik vektoriseerde karakter n- grame op na trigrame in plaas. Voorwoordings word gedoen deur 'n LSTM model te gebruik en 'n presisie van 0.53 a an die eindelike SemEval Opdrag 8 evaluering stel bereik.", 'sq': 'SemEval 2019 Task 8 on Fact-Checking in community question answering forums aimed at classifying questions in to categories and verifying the correctness of answers given on the QatarLiving public forum. Detyra u ndar në dy nënpyetje: e para klasifikimi i pyetjes, e dyta përgjigjet. Sistemi TueFact i përshkruar në këtë letër përdori metoda të ndryshme për të dy nënpyetjet. Nëndetyra A përdoret vektorët e fjalës bazuar në një model me çantë me fjalë-ngram duke përdorur deri në trigram. Parashikimet janë bërë duke përdorur regresionin logjik të shumëklasave. Rezultati zyrtar i SemEval liston një saktësi 0.60. Nëndetyra B përdor karakterin e vektorizuar n-gram deri n ë trigram në vend të kësaj. Parashikimet bëhen duke përdorur një model LSTM dhe arritën një saktësi prej 0.53 në kompletin përfundimtar të vlerësimit SemEval Task 8.', 'am': 'የSemEval 2019 ስራ 8 በማኅበረሰብ ላይ እውነተኛ-checking ውይይት በማድረግ የፎርማኖችን መልስ ክፍሎች ለመግለጥ እና በQatarLiving public forum ላይ የተሰጠውን መልስ እውነተኛውን ማረጋገጥ ነው፡፡ ሥራውም ሁለት አዋራጆች ተካፈለ፤ ፊተኛውን ጥያቄውን፥ ሁለተኛውንም መልስ። በዚህ ገጽ ውስጥ የተዘጋጀው የTueFact ሲስተም ለሁለቱ ደብዳቤዎች የተለየ ልዩ ደረጃዎችን ተጠቃሚ ነበር፡፡ አ ምርጫዎች በብዙ-class logistic repression The official SemEval result lists an accuracy of 0.60.  Subtask B ምርጫዎች የLSTM ሞዴል በመጠቀም ይደረጋሉ፡፡', 'hy': '2019 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" 8-ը հանրության հարցերի ստուգելու գործընթացը, որը պատասխանում է ֆորմաներին, որոնց նպատակով էր դասակարգել հարցերը կատեգորիաների մեջ և ստուգել Կատար Կյանքի հանրային ֆորմում տրված պատասխանների ճշմարտությունը: Այս խնդիրը բաժանվել է երկու ենթահարցերով. առաջինը հարցը դասակարգում է, երկրորդը՝ պատասխանները: Այս աշխատանքում նկարագրված համակարգը օգտագործեց տարբեր մոտեցումներ երկու ենթահարցերի համար: Առաջնախնդիր A-ը օգտագործում է բառերի վեկտորներ, հիմնված բառերի շարժի-նգրամի մոդելի վրա, որը օգտագործում է մինչև տրիգրամ: Կարծումները կատարվում են օգտագործելով բազմադասական լոգիստիկ ռեգրեսիա: Ապաշտոնական SEM-ի արդյունքը ցույց է տալիս 0.60 ճշգրտությունը: Փոխարենը B-ի ենթախնդիրը օգտագործում է n-գրամ վեկտորիզացված կերպարը մինչև տրիգրամ: Կարծումները կատարվում են LSMT մոդելի օգնությամբ և հասնում են 0.53 ճշգրիտության վերջնական կես-հավասարման 8-ի գնահատման համակարգում:', 'az': 'QatarLiving halkı forumu barəsində verilən cavab verən forumların yarısı 2019 Gözəli 8. Bu iş iki dəstə bölünmüşdü: ilk dəstə soruşmaq, ikinci dəstə cavab vermək. Bu kağızda tanımlanan TueFact sistemi iki dəstək üçün müxtəlif fikirlər kullandı. Subtask A, trigramlar üçün istifadə edilən torba-söz-ngram modeli ilə söz vektörlərini istifadə edir. Çoxlu sınıf lojik regresiya vasitəsilə təsirlər edilir. Resmi SemEval sonuçları 0.60 dəqiqliyi yazır. Subtask B onun yerinə vektorizatlı n-gramləri trigramlara qədər istifadə edir. LSTM modeli vasitəsilə tədbir edilir və son SemEval Task 8 değerlendirmə qutusunda 0.53 dəqiqliyinə nail oldu.', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল ২০১৯ সম্প্রদায়ের ফোরামের ফ্যাক্ট পরীক্ষা সম্পর্কে প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেওয়ার উদ্দেশ্য ছিল বিভাগে প্রশ্ন বিভক্ত করা এবং কাতার লাইভিং জনসাধা এই কাজটি দুটি সাবটাসে বিভক্ত হয়ে গেছে: প্রথম প্রশ্নের ব্যাখ্যা করা, দ্বিতীয় উত্তর। এই পত্রিকায় বর্ণনা করা টুইফ্যাক্ট সিস্টেম দুই সাবটাসের জন্য বিভিন্ন উপায় ব্যবহার করেছে। একটি ব্যাগ-অফ-ওয়ার্ড- ঙ্গ্রাম মডেলের ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক শব্দ ভেক্টর ব্যবহার করে ট্রিগ্রামে ব্যবহার করে। মাল্টিক্লাসের লজিস্টিক পুনরাবৃত্তি ব্যবহার করে পছন্দ করা হয়েছে। অফিসিয়াল সেমEval ফলাফল ০. ৬০ এর সঠিকভাবে তালিকা দিয়েছে। সাবটাস বি ত্রিগ্রামের পরিবর্তে ভেক্টরেশন করা চরিত্র n-gram ব্যবহার করে। একটি এলস্টিএম মডেল ব্যবহার করে পছন্দ করা হয়েছে এবং শেষ সেমভাল কাজ ৮ মূল্যায়নের সেটে ০.', 'ca': "La tasca 8 de SemEval 2019 sobre la verificació de fets en fòrums de resposta a preguntes comunitàries tenia l'objectiu de classificar preguntes en categories i verificar la correctesa de les respostes dadas al fòrum públic QatarLiving. La tasca es va dividir en dues subpreguntes: la primera classificant la pregunta, la segona les respostes. El sistema TueFact descrit en aquest paper va utilitzar diferents enfocaments per les dues subterrànies. La Subtasca A utilitza vectors de paraules basats en un model de bolsa de paraules que utilitza fins a trigrames. Predictions are done using multi-class logistic regression.  El resultat oficial de SemEval enumera una precisió de 0,60. La Subtasca B utilitza els n-grams de caràcter vectoritzat fins a trigrams en canvi. Les prediccions s'utilitzen amb un model LSTM i s'aconsegueixen una precisió de 0,53 en el conjunt final d'evaluació de SemEval Task 8.", 'cs': 'SemEval 2019 Úkol 8 o kontrole faktů ve fórech odpovídajících na otázky komunity měl za cíl klasifikovat otázky do kategorií a ověřit správnost odpovědí poskytnutých na veřejném fóru QatarLiving. Úkol byl rozdělen do dvou dílčích úkolů: první klasifikace otázky, druhá odpovědi. Systém TueFact popsaný v tomto článku používal různé přístupy pro obě dílčí úkoly. Subúloha A využívá slovní vektory založené na sáčku slova-ngramovém modelu pomocí až trigramů. Predikce jsou prováděny pomocí multitřídní logistické regrese. Oficiální výsledek SemEval uvádí přesnost 0.60. Podúkol B místo toho používá vektorizované znaky n-gramy až po trigramy. Predikce jsou prováděny pomocí LSTM modelu a dosahovány přesnosti 0,53 na konečné sadě vyhodnocování SemEval Task 8.', 'et': 'SemEval 2019 ülesande 8 faktide kontrollimise kohta kogukonna küsimustele vastamise foorumites eesmärk oli liigitada küsimused kategooriatesse ja kontrollida QatarLivingi avalikul foorumil antud vastuste õigsust. Ülesanne jagati kaheks alamülesandeks: esimene küsimuse liigitamine, teine vastused. Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatud TueFact süsteemis kasutati kahe alamülesande jaoks erinevaid lähenemisviise. Alaülesanne A kasutab sõnavektoreid, mis põhinevad kott-of-word-ngram mudelil, kasutades kuni trigramme. Prognoosid tehakse mitmeklassilise logistilise regressiooni abil. Ametliku SemEvali tulemuse täpsus on 0,60. Alaülesanne B kasutab selle asemel vektoriseeritud märke n-gramme kuni trigrammideni. Prognoosid tehakse LSTM mudeli abil ja saavutatakse täpsus 0,53 SemEval Task 8 lõplikul hindamiskomplektil.', 'bs': 'Zadnji zadatak 8 za ispitivanje činjenica u zajedničkim pitanjima usmjeren je na odgovorne forume za klasifikaciju pitanja u kategorije i provjeriti ispravnost odgovora podataka na javnom forumu QatarLiving. Taj zadatak je podijeljen u dva podataka: prva klasifikacija pitanja, druga odgovora. Sistem TueFact opisanog u ovom papiru koristio je različite pristupe za dva poduzeća. Subtask A koristi vektore riječi na temelju torbe riječi-ngram model koji koristi do trigrama. Predviđanja se završavaju koristeći multiklasnu logističku regresiju. Zvanični rezultat SemEval prikazuje točnost od 0,60. Subtask B koristi vektorizirani znak n-grama do trigrama umjesto toga. Predviđanja se završavaju koristeći LSTM model i ostvarila preciznost od 0,53 na konačnom setu procjene 8 za pola evaluacije.', 'fi': 'SemEval 2019 Task 8 on Fact-Checking yhteisökysymyksiin vastaamisen foorumeilla pyrittiin luokittelemaan kysymykset kategorioihin ja varmistamaan QatarLivingin julkisella foorumilla annettujen vastausten oikeellisuus. Tehtävä jaettiin kahteen alatehtävään: ensimmäiseen kysymyksen luokitteluun ja toiseen vastaukseen. Tässä artikkelissa kuvattu TueFact-järjestelmä käytti erilaisia lähestymistapoja näihin kahteen alatehtävään. Alatehtävä A käyttää sanavektoreita, jotka perustuvat pussi-of-word-ngram-malliin käyttäen jopa trigrammeja. Ennusteet tehdään käyttämällä moniluokkaista logistista regressiota. Virallinen SemEval tulos listaa tarkkuuden 0,60. Alitehtävä B käyttää vektorisoituja merkkejä n-grammoihin asti trigrammeja sen sijaan. Ennusteet tehdään LSTM-mallilla, ja lopullisen SemEval Task 8 -arviointisarjan tarkkuus on 0,53.', 'jv': 'Saminval 2011 task 8 mungkar Faktu-Checking barêng komunitas supoyo perusahaan anyar kang dipunangé kesempatan kanggo ingkang kategori lan pakan iku adalah cewisan responseng dipunangé ning katimbang apakno Awak dhéwé éntuk kabèh basa sing durung: awak dhéwé ngejaraké perusahaan, sampek tanggal. Sistem TueActual sing paling nggambaran nang paper iki gambar dadi kapan kanggo ngilanggar sampeyan pangan. Subtask A make use of word vectors bazed on a bag-of-word-ngram model used up to Trirams. echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world Gambar usual semewal dadi 0.60 teka dadi. Subtask B use vectored character n-gram up to Trirams instead. Wis', 'he': 'משימה 8 של SemEval 2019 על בדיקת עובדות בפורומים לענות על שאלות קהילתיות המטרה להקליף שאלות לקטגוריות ולאבדוק את התקנות של תשובות שנתנו בפורום ציבורי QatarLiving. המשימה הוחלקה לשני תושאלות: הראשונה מסווג את השאלה, השנייה את התשובות. מערכת TueFact התארה בעיתון הזה השתמשה באמצעות גישות שונות לשני השאלות. מתפקיד א משתמש בוקטורים מילים מבוססים על מודל שק של מילה-ngram משתמש עד טריגרמים. התחזויות נעשות באמצעות מחזור לוגיסטי רב-מעמד. התוצאה הרשמית של SemEval רשומה מדויקה של 0.60. התפקיד ב משתמש באופי נוקטורי n-גרם עד טריגרמים במקום. התחזויות נעשות באמצעות מודל LSTM וישגשו מדויקה של 0.53 על קבוצת הערכה הסופית של משימה SemEval 8.', 'sk': 'Cilj naloge 8 SemEval 2019 o preverjanju dejstev v forumih za odgovarjanje na vprašanja skupnosti je razvrstiti vprašanja v kategorije in preveriti pravilnost odgovorov na javnem forumu QatarLiving. Naloga je bila razdeljena na dve podnalogi: prvo razvrščanje vprašanja, drugo odgovore. Sistem TueFact, opisan v tem članku, je uporabljal različne pristope za obe podnalogi. Podnaloga A uporablja besedne vektorje, ki temeljijo na modelu vrečke besede-ngram z uporabo do trigramov. Napovedi se izvajajo z uporabo večrazredne logistične regresije. Uradni rezultat SemEval navaja točnost 0,60. Podopravilo B namesto tega uporablja vektorizirane znake n-gramov do trigramov. Napovedi so narejene z uporabo modela LSTM in dosežene natančnost 0,53 na končnem naboru ocenjevanja SemEval Task 8.', 'ha': "The SemEval 2019 Task 8 on Fact-Checking in community question answering forums aimed to classify questions into categories and verify the correctness of answers given on the QatarLiving public forum.  An raba wani aikin su biyu: farkon na raba tambayar, da na ƙarshe karya. @ info: whatsthis Subaikin A na amfani da shiryoyi na magana a kan wani misali mai daidaita-maganar-ngram wanda ya yi amfani da zuwa tigram. An cika fikarin da za'a yi amfani da rajistan sigarin mai yawa. @ info @ info: whatsthis An cika zauren akwatin bayani da za'a yi amfani da wata motsi na LSSM kuma aka sami tsari na 0.53 kan aikin ƙarshen kimar sigar 8 na Semeval.", 'bo': 'The SemEval 2019 Task 8 on Fact-Checking in community question answering forums aimed to classify questions into categories and verify the correctness of answers given on the QatarLiving public forum. བྱ་འགུལ་འདི་subtasks གཉིས་བར་དབྱེ་བ་རེད། གཙོ་བ་དེ་འདྲི་ཚིག་དང་པོ་དབྱེ་བ་དེ་གཉིས་པ་བརྗོད། ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་TueFact system་གིས་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་མ་འདྲ་བ་མཉམ་དུ་སྤྱོད་ཡོད། Subtask A makes use of word vectors based on a bag-of-word-ngram model using up to trigrams. སྔོན་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས་འཛིན་གྲྭར་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ལྕགས་རིས་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཚར་བ གཞུང་འབྲེལ་གྱི་SemEval འོན་འབྲས་ཐོག་ནས་0.60 ཡིན་བདེན་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐོ་བཀོད་བྱེད། Subtask B ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་བརྒྱུད་འགྲུལ་གྱི་ཡིག་འབྲུ་n-grams་ལས་འགུལ་སྤྱོད་པ གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱིས་LSTM རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་ཡོད། མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་SemEval Task 8 རིམ་དཔྱད་སྒྲིག་ཐོག'}
{'en': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2019 Task 8 : Using A LSTM-Attention Model for Fact-Checking in Community Forums', 'ar': 'YNU-HPCC في SemEval-2019 Task 8: استخدام نموذج LSTM-Attention لتقصي الحقائق في منتديات المجتمع', 'es': 'YNU-HPCC en la Tarea 8 de SemEval-2019: Uso de un modelo de atención LSTM para la verificación de datos en los foros de la comunidad', 'fr': "YNU-HPCC au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 8\xa0: Utilisation d'un modèle d'attention LSTM pour la vérification des faits dans les forums communautaires", 'pt': 'YNU-HPCC no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 8: Usando um modelo de atenção LSTM para verificação de fatos em fóruns da comunidade', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のYNU - HPCCタスク8 ：コミュニティフォーラムでのファクトチェックにLSTM - Attentionモデルを使用する', 'ru': 'YNU-HPCC на SemEval-2019 Задача 8: Использование модели LSTM-Attention для проверки фактов в форумах сообщества', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 8 पर YNU-HPCC: सामुदायिक मंचों में तथ्य-जांच के लिए एक LSTM-ध्यान मॉडल का उपयोग करना', 'zh': 'YNU-HPCC于SemEval-2019务8:用LSTM-Attention于社区论坛中核实', 'ga': 'YNU-HPCC ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 8: Samhail Airde LSTM a Úsáid chun Fíricí a Sheiceáil i bhFóram Pobail', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Εργασία 8: Χρήση ενός μοντέλου προσοχής για έλεγχο γεγονότων σε κοινοτικά φόρουμ', 'hu': 'YNU-HPCC a SemEval-2019 8. feladat: LSTM-figyelem modell használata a tények ellenőrzésére a közösségi fórumokon', 'lt': 'YNU-HPCC 8 užduotis – naudoti LSTM-Attention modelį faktų tikrinimui Bendrijos forumuose', 'mk': 'YNU-HPCC на SemEval-2019 задача 8: Користење на LSTM-Attention Model за проверка на факти во заедничките форуми', 'kk': 'YNU-HPCC жалпы 2019 тапсырмасында 8. тапсырма: Компаттық форумында факттерді тексеру үшін LSTM- назар үлгісін қолдану', 'it': 'YNU-HPCC a SemEval-2019 Task 8: Utilizzare un modello LSTM-Attenzione per il controllo dei fatti nei forum comunitari', 'ms': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2019 Task 8: Using A LSTM-Attention Model for Fact-Checking in Community Forums', 'ml': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2019 Task 8: Using A LSTM-Attention Model for Fact-Checking in Community Forums', 'mn': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2019 Task 8: Using a LSTM-Attention Model for Fact-Checking in Community Forums', 'ro': 'YNU-HPCC la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 8: Utilizarea unui model LSTM-Atenție pentru verificarea faptelor în forumurile comunitare', 'mt': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2019 Task 8: Using A LSTM-Attention Model for Fact-Checking in Community Forums', 'no': 'YNU-HPCC ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 8: Bruk ein LSTM-Attention Modell for faktisksjekking i fellesskapsformer', 'si': 'YNO-HPCC at semeval-2019 Job 8: Using a LSTM-Attension Model for Factor-checking in Community Force', 'pl': 'YNU-HPCC na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 8: Wykorzystanie modelu uwagi LSTM do sprawdzania faktów na forach społecznościowych', 'sr': 'YNU-HPCC na semiEval-2019 zadatak 8: Koristenje modela LSTM-pažnje za provjeru činjenica u Forumima zajednice', 'so': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2019 Task 8: Using A LSTM-Attention Model for Fact-Checking in Community Forums', 'sv': 'YNU-HPCC på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 8: Använda en LSTM-uppmärksamhetsmodell för faktakontroll i gemenskapsforum', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 செயல் 8- ல் YNU- HPCC: Community Forums இல் ஒரு LSTM- Attention Model பயன்படுத்துகிறது', 'ur': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2019 Task 8: Using a LSTM-Attention Model for Fact-Checking in Community Forums', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Hồ sơ Hồ sơ Hồ sơ Hồ sơ Y:', 'nl': 'YNU-HPCC op SemEval-2019 Taak 8: Een LSTM-Attention Model gebruiken voor fact-Checking in Community Forums', 'da': 'YNU-HPCC på SemEval-2019 Opgave 8: Brug af en LSTM-opmærksomhedsmodel til fact-checking i fællesskabsfora', 'de': 'YNU-HPCC bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 8: Einsatz eines LSTM-Aufmerksamkeitsmodells zur Faktenkontrolle in Community-Foren', 'id': 'YNU-HPCC di SemEval-2019 Tugas 8: Menggunakan Model LSTM-Perhatian untuk memeriksa fakta di Forum Komunitas', 'bg': 'Задача 8: Използване на модел на внимание за проверка на фактите във форумите на общността', 'ko': 'YNU-HPCC SemEval-2019에서의 작업 8: 커뮤니티 포럼에서 LSTM 주의 모형을 사용하여 사실 검사', 'hr': 'YNU-HPCC na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 8: Korištenje modela LSTM-pažnje za provjeru činjenica u Forumima zajednice', 'fa': 'YNU-HPCC در فعالیت ۲۰۱۹: استفاده از مدل LSTM-Attention برای بررسی حقیقت در فورمهای اجتماعی', 'sw': 'YNU-HPCC kwenye SemEval-2019 Task 8: Utumiaji Modela ya Uchunguzi wa LSTM kwa ajili ya Kuchungulia ukweli katika Jukwaa za Jamii', 'tr': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2019 Task 8: Using A LSTM-Attention Model for Fact-Checking in Community Forums', 'sq': 'YNU-HPCC në SemEval-2019 Task 8: Using A LSTM-Attention Model for Fact-Checking in Community Forums', 'af': "YNU-HPCC by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 8: Gebruik 'n LSTM-aandag Model vir Fakte-Toetsing in gemeenskapsforme", 'am': 'ስራ 8: A LSTM-Attention Model used for Fact-Checking in Community Forums', 'hy': 'YNH-ՀՊՔ-ը, 2019-ի կիսագնդի 8-րդ հանձնարարում. LSMT-ուշադրության մոդելի օգտագործումը համայնքի ֆորմում փաստերի ստուգելու համար', 'az': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2019 Task 8: Cumhuriyet Forumlarında Faylı Verirməsi üçün LSTM-Attention Modelini istifadə edir', 'cs': 'YNU-HPCC na SemEval-2019 Úkol 8: Použití modelu pozornosti LSTM pro kontrolu faktů na komunitních fórech', 'et': 'YNU-HPCC SemEval-2019 ülesandel 8: LSTM-tähelepanu mudeli kasutamine faktide kontrollimiseks ühenduse foorumites', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৮-এ ইয়ানইউ-এইচপিসি: কমিউনিটি ফোরামে ফ্যাক-চেক করার জন্য একটি এলস্টিএম-মনোযোগ মডেল ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'YNU-HPCC na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 8: Koristenje modela LSTM-pažnje za provjeru činjenica u Forumima zajednice', 'ca': 'YNU-HPCC a SemEval-2019 Task 8: Usar un model LSTM-Attention for Fact Checking in Community Forums', 'fi': 'YNU-HPCC SemEval-2019 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 8: LSTM-huomiomallin käyttäminen faktojen tarkistamiseen yhteisön foorumeilla', 'jv': 'YNU', 'he': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2019 Task 8: Using A LSTM-Attention Model for Fact-Checking in Community Forums', 'ha': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEV-2019 Taskon 8: Yin amfani da A LTRM-Attachment Model for Fact-Check in Common Forums', 'sk': 'YNU-HPCC na SemEval-2019 naloga 8: Uporaba modela LSTM-pozornosti za preverjanje dejstev v forumih Skupnosti', 'bo': 'YNU-HPCC at SemEval-2019 Task 8: Using A LSTM-Attention Model for Fact-Checking in Community Forums'}
{'en': 'We propose a system that uses a long short-term memory with attention mechanism (LSTM-Attention) model to complete the task. The LSTM-Attention model uses two LSTM to extract the features of the question and answer pair. Then, each of the features is sequentially composed using the attention mechanism, concatenating the two vectors into one. Finally, the concatenated vector is used as input for the MLP and the MLP’s output layer uses the softmax function to classify the provided answers into three categories. This model is capable of extracting the features of the question and answer pair well. The results show that the proposed system outperforms the baseline algorithm.', 'es': 'Proponemos un sistema que utiliza un modelo de memoria a corto plazo con mecanismo de atención (LSTM-atención) para completar la tarea. El modelo LSTM-Attention utiliza dos LSTM para extraer las características del par de preguntas y respuestas. Luego, cada una de las características se compone secuencialmente mediante el mecanismo de atención, concatenando los dos vectores en uno solo. Finalmente, el vector concatenado se usa como entrada para el MLP y la capa de salida del MLP usa la función softmax para clasificar las respuestas proporcionadas en tres categorías. Este modelo es capaz de extraer bien las características del par de preguntas y respuestas. Los resultados muestran que el sistema propuesto supera al algoritmo de referencia.', 'fr': "Nous proposons un système qui utilise un modèle de mémoire à court terme avec mécanisme d'attention (LSTM-Attention) pour effectuer la tâche. Le modèle LSTM-Attention utilise deux LSTM pour extraire les caractéristiques de la paire question-réponse. Ensuite, chacune des caractéristiques est composée séquentiellement à l'aide du mécanisme d'attention, en concaténant les deux vecteurs en un seul. Enfin, le vecteur concaténé est utilisé comme entrée pour le MLP et la couche de sortie du MLP utilise la fonction softmax pour classer les réponses fournies en trois catégories. Ce modèle est capable d'extraire correctement les caractéristiques de la paire question-réponse. Les résultats montrent que le système proposé surpasse l'algorithme de base.", 'ar': 'نقترح نظامًا يستخدم ذاكرة طويلة المدى مع نموذج آلية الانتباه (LSTM-Attention) لإكمال المهمة. يستخدم نموذج LSTM-Attention اثنين من LSTM لاستخراج ميزات زوج السؤال والإجابة. بعد ذلك ، يتم تكوين كل ميزة بالتسلسل باستخدام آلية الانتباه ، مع ربط المتجهين في واحد. أخيرًا ، يتم استخدام المتجه المتسلسل كمدخل لـ MLP وتستخدم طبقة إخراج MLP وظيفة softmax لتصنيف الإجابات المقدمة إلى ثلاث فئات. هذا النموذج قادر على استخراج ميزات زوج السؤال والجواب جيدًا. تظهر النتائج أن النظام المقترح يتفوق على الخوارزمية الأساسية.', 'pt': 'Propomos um sistema que utiliza um modelo de memória de curto prazo com mecanismo de atenção (LSTM-Attention) para completar a tarefa. O modelo LSTM-Attention usa dois LSTM para extrair os recursos do par de perguntas e respostas. Em seguida, cada uma das características é composta sequencialmente usando o mecanismo de atenção, concatenando os dois vetores em um. Por fim, o vetor concatenado é usado como entrada para o MLP e a camada de saída do MLP usa a função softmax para classificar as respostas fornecidas em três categorias. Este modelo é capaz de extrair bem as características do par de perguntas e respostas. Os resultados mostram que o sistema proposto supera o algoritmo de linha de base.', 'zh': '立一用长短期记机(LSTM-Attention)以成事统。 LSTM-Attention 模用二 LSTM 以取问对。 然后以意机次第为之,属两向量为一。 最后以联向量为MLP输,MLP者重用softmax函数分其对案为三。 该模能很好地提取对对的特征。 结果表明,所上系统优于基线算法。', 'ja': 'タスクを完了するために、注意メカニズム（ LSTM - Attention ）モデルを備えた長期短期記憶を使用するシステムを提案します。LSTM - Attentionモデルは、2つのLSTMを使用して、質問と回答のペアの特徴を抽出します。次いで、各特徴は、注目メカニズムを使用して順次構成され、２つのベクトルを１つに連結する。最後に、連結されたベクトルは、MLPの入力として使用され、MLPの出力レイヤーは、softmax関数を使用して、提供された回答を3つのカテゴリに分類します。このモデルは、質問と回答のペアの特徴をうまく抽出することができます。結果は、提案されたシステムがベースラインアルゴリズムを上回ることを示しています。', 'hi': 'हम एक ऐसी प्रणाली का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो कार्य को पूरा करने के लिए ध्यान तंत्र (LSTM-Attention) मॉडल के साथ एक लंबी अल्पकालिक स्मृति का उपयोग करती है। LSTM-ध्यान मॉडल प्रश्न और उत्तर जोड़ी की विशेषताओं को निकालने के लिए दो LSTM का उपयोग करता है। फिर, प्रत्येक विशेषताओं को ध्यान तंत्र का उपयोग करके क्रमिक रूप से बनाया जाता है, दो वैक्टरों को एक में संयोजित किया जाता है। अंत में, concatenated वेक्टर का उपयोग MLP के लिए इनपुट के रूप में किया जाता है और MLP की आउटपुट परत प्रदान किए गए उत्तरों को तीन श्रेणियों में वर्गीकृत करने के लिए softmax फ़ंक्शन का उपयोग करती है। यह मॉडल प्रश्न और उत्तर जोड़ी की विशेषताओं को अच्छी तरह से निकालने में सक्षम है। परिणाम बताते हैं कि प्रस्तावित प्रणाली बेसलाइन एल्गोरिथ्म को मात देती है।', 'ru': 'Мы предлагаем систему, которая использует длинную кратковременную память с механизмом внимания (модель LSTM-Attention) для выполнения задачи. Модель LSTM-Attention использует два LSTM для извлечения особенностей пары вопросов и ответов. Затем последовательно формируют каждый из признаков с помощью механизма внимания, объединяя два вектора в один. Наконец, конкатенированный вектор используется в качестве входного сигнала для MLP, а выходной слой MLP использует функцию softmax для классификации предоставленных ответов по трем категориям. Эта модель способна хорошо извлекать признаки пары вопросов и ответов. Результаты показывают, что предлагаемая система превосходит базовый алгоритм.', 'ga': 'Molaimid córas a úsáideann múnla cuimhne gearrthéarmach fada agus meicníocht aird (LSTM-Attention) chun an tasc a chríochnú. Úsáideann an tsamhail LSTM-Attention dhá LSTM chun gnéithe an phéire ceisteanna agus freagraí a bhaint as. Ansin, déantar gach ceann de na gnéithe a chomhdhéanamh go seicheamhach ag baint úsáide as an meicníocht aird, agus an dá veicteoir á gcomhtháthú i gceann amháin. Ar deireadh, úsáidtear an veicteoir comhcheangailte mar ionchur don MLP agus úsáideann ciseal aschuir an MLP an fheidhm softmax chun na freagraí a thugtar a rangú i dtrí chatagóir. Tá an tsamhail seo in ann gnéithe an phéire ceisteanna agus freagraí a bhaint go maith. Léiríonn na torthaí go sáraíonn an córas atá beartaithe an t-algartam bunlíne.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ შევძლებთ სისტემა, რომელიც ძალიან ძალიან სიმართლური მეხსიერებას გამოყენებს, რომელიც დაახლოებით მოდულის მექანსი (LSTM-Attention) მოდელს დასრულებლა Name შემდეგ, ყველა ფუნქციების განსაკუთრებულად შექმნია შესაძლებელად დააყენებული მაქსინემის გამოყენებით, ორი გვექტორის ერთად დააყენებული. საბოლოოდ, შესაბამისი გვქტორი გამოყენება MLP და MLP-ის გამოყენება ფანქტის მაქსი ფუნქტის გამოყენება სამი კატეგორიაში მიმდინარე პასუხების კლასიფიკაციისთვის. ეს მოდელი შესაძლებელია კითხვის და პასუხის მნიშვნელობების გამოყენება. წარმოდგენები ჩვენებენ, რომ საზოგადომის სისტემა გავაკეთებს ბაზლინური ალგორიტიმა.', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε ένα σύστημα που χρησιμοποιεί ένα μοντέλο μακροχρόνιας βραχυπρόθεσμης μνήμης με μηχανισμό προσοχής (Προσοχή) για την ολοκλήρωση του έργου. Το μοντέλο χρησιμοποιεί δύο για να εξαγάγει τα χαρακτηριστικά του ζευγαριού ερωτήσεων και απαντήσεων. Στη συνέχεια, κάθε ένα από τα χαρακτηριστικά συνθέτεται διαδοχικά χρησιμοποιώντας τον μηχανισμό προσοχής, ενώνοντας τα δύο διανύσματα σε ένα. Τέλος, το συνδεδεμένο διάνυσμα χρησιμοποιείται ως εισαγωγή για το MLP και το στρώμα εξόδου του MLP χρησιμοποιεί τη συνάρτηση για να ταξινομήσει τις παρεχόμενες απαντήσεις σε τρεις κατηγορίες. Αυτό το μοντέλο είναι ικανό να εξαγάγει καλά τα χαρακτηριστικά του ζευγαριού ερωτήσεων και απαντήσεων. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο σύστημα ξεπερνά τον αλγόριθμο βάσης.', 'hu': 'Olyan rendszert javaslunk, amely hosszú rövid távú memóriát használ figyelemmechanizmussal (LSTM-Attention) a feladat elvégzéséhez. Az LSTM-Attention modell két LSTM-t használ a kérdés és válasz pár jellemzőinek kivonására. Ezután minden funkció egymást követően összeállításra kerül a figyelemmechanizmus segítségével, összekapcsolva a két vektort egybe. Végül az összefüggő vektort használják az MLP bemenetként, és az MLP kimeneti rétege a softmax függvényt használja a megadott válaszok három kategóriába sorolására. Ez a modell képes kivonni a kérdés és válasz pár jellemzőit jól. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt rendszer felülmúlja az alap algoritmust.', 'it': "Proponiamo un sistema che utilizza una memoria a lungo termine con meccanismo di attenzione (LSTM-Attenzione) modello per completare il compito. Il modello LSTM-Attention utilizza due LSTM per estrarre le caratteristiche della coppia domanda e risposta. Quindi, ciascuna delle caratteristiche è composta sequenzialmente utilizzando il meccanismo di attenzione, concatenando i due vettori in uno. Infine, il vettore concatenato viene utilizzato come input per la MLP e il livello di output della MLP utilizza la funzione softmax per classificare le risposte fornite in tre categorie. Questo modello è in grado di estrarre bene le caratteristiche della coppia domanda e risposta. I risultati mostrano che il sistema proposto supera l'algoritmo di base.", 'kk': 'Біз тапсырманы аяқтау үшін қысқа уақыт жады қолданатын жүйе (LSTM-Attention) үлгісін қолданатын. LSTM- Attention үлгісі сұрақ мен жауап екі қасиеттерін тарқату үшін екі LSTM қолданылады. Содан кейін, әрбір мүмкіндіктері бір векторға сәйкес құрылады. Соңында, сәйкесті вектор MLP және MLP шығыс қабатты келтірілген жауаптарды үш санатына классификациялау үшін қолданылады. Бұл үлгі сұрақ және жауап екеуінің мүмкіндіктерін шығаруға мүмкіндік береді. Нәтижелер таңдалған жүйенің негізгі жолдың алгоритмін орындайды.', 'lt': 'Siūlome sukurti sistemą, kuri užbaigtų užduotį naudoja ilgalaikę trumpalaikę atmintinę su dėmesio mechanizmu (LSTM-Attention). LSTM-Attention modelis naudoja du LSTM klausimo ir atsakymo poros savybėms ištraukti. Tada kiekvienas iš požymių yra iš eilės sudarytas naudojant dėmesio mechanizmą, sutvirtinant du vektorius į vieną. Galiausiai sutrumpintas vektorius naudojamas kaip MLP įvestis, o MLP išėjimo sluoksnis naudoja softmax funkciją, kad pateikti atsakymai būtų suskirstyti į tris kategorijas. Šis modelis gali gerai ištraukti klausimo ir atsakymo poros savybes. Iš rezultatų matyti, kad siūloma sistema viršija pradinį algoritmą.', 'mk': 'Предложуваме систем кој користи долгорочна меморија со механизам на внимание (LSTM- Attention) за да ја заврши задачата. The LSTM-Attention model uses two LSTM to extract the features of the question and answer pair.  Потоа, секоја од карактеристиките е секвенцијално композирана користејќи го механизмот на внимание, концентрирајќи ги двата вектори во еден. Конечно, концентрираниот вектор се користи како влог за MLP и излезниот слој на MLP ја користи функцијата softmax за да ги класификува обезбедените одговори во три категории. Овој модел е способен да ги извади карактеристиките на прашањето и одговорот пар добро. Резултатите покажуваат дека предложениот систем го надминува основниот алгоритм.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan sistem yang menggunakan memori jangka pendek panjang dengan mekanisme perhatian (LSTM-Perhatian) untuk menyelesaikan tugas. Model LSTM-Perhatian menggunakan dua LSTM untuk mengekstrak ciri-ciri pasangan soalan dan jawapan. Kemudian, setiap ciri-ciri berkomposen secara berturut-turut menggunakan mekanisme perhatian, menyatukan dua vektor menjadi satu. Akhirnya, vektor bersamaan digunakan sebagai input untuk MLP dan lapisan output MLP menggunakan fungsi softmax untuk mengklasifikasikan jawapan yang diberikan ke tiga kategori. Model ini mampu mengekstrak ciri-ciri soalan dan jawapan pasangan dengan baik. Hasil menunjukkan bahawa sistem diusulkan melampaui algoritma asas.', 'ml': 'ഈ ജോലി പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു നീണ്ട നീണ്ട മെമ്മറി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സിസ്റ്റം പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. LSTM-ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d രണ്ട് LSTM ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. Then, each of the features is sequentially composed using the attention mechanism, concatenating the two vectors into one.  അവസാനം, എംഎല്\u200dപിയ്ക്കും എംഎല്\u200dപിയുടെ പുറത്തുള്ള ഏലകങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വെക്ടര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് മൂന്നു വിഭാഗങ്ങളിലേക്ക് നല്\u200dകിയ ഉത്തരം ക്ലാസ ഈ മോഡലിന്റെ ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നതും ജോലി നല്ലതിന് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകാന പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സിസ്റ്റം ബേസ്ലൈന്\u200d അല്\u200dഗോരിതം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെന്ന് ഫലങ', 'mn': 'Бид ажлыг бүтээхэд урт хугацааны санамж хэрэглэдэг системийг сануулдаг. LSTM-Attention загвар асуулт болон хариултын хоёрын чадварыг гаргахад хоёр LSTM хэрэглэдэг. Дараа нь, эдгээр тодорхойлолтууд бүр анхаарлын механизм ашиглаж, хоёр векторуудыг нэг рүү нэгтгэдэг. Эцэст нь, мөн тодорхойлогдсон вектор MLP болон MLP-ын гаргалтын давхар нь 3 категорид өгсөн хариултуудыг ангилахын тулд хамгийн бага боломжтой функцийг ашигладаг. Энэ загвар асуулт болон хариултын хоёрын чадварыг сайн гаргаж чадна. Үүний үр дүнд санал өгсөн систем суурь шугам алгоритмыг дамжуулдаг.', 'mt': 'We propose a system that uses a long short-term memory with attention mechanism (LSTM-Attention) model to complete the task.  Il-mudell LSTM-Attenzjoni juża żewġ LSTM biex jiġu estratti l-karatteristiċi tal-pari tal-mistoqsijiet u t-tweġibiet. Then, each of the features is sequentially composed using the attention mechanism, concatenating the two vectors into one.  Fl-aħħar nett, il-vettur konġunat jintuża bħala input għall-MLP u s-saff ta’ ħruġ tal-MLP juża l-funzjoni softmax biex jikklassifika t-tweġibiet ipprovduti fi tliet kategoriji. Dan il-mudell huwa kapaċi jestrezzjona sew il-karatteristiċi tal-mistoqsija u l-pari tat-tweġibiet. The results show that the proposed system outperforms the baseline algorithm.', 'no': 'Vi foreslår eit systemet som brukar ein lang kortståande minne med oppmerksmekanismen (LSTM-Attention) for å fullføra oppgåva. LSTM-Attention-modellen brukar to LSTM for å pakka ut funksjonane til spørsmålet og svarpar. Så er kvar av funksjonane sett saman med oppmerksmekanismen, og sammenliknar dei to vektorane til ein. Til slutt blir det samsvarte vektoren brukt som inndata for MLP- en og MLP- utlaget brukt den maksimale funksjonen for å klassifisera dei oppgjevne svara i tre kategoriar. Dette modellet kan henta ut funksjonane for spørsmålet og svarpar godt. Resultatet viser at foreslått systemet utfører baseline-algoritmen.', 'ro': 'Propunem un sistem care utilizează o memorie pe termen scurt cu mecanism de atenție (LSTM-Atenție) pentru a finaliza sarcina. Modelul LSTM-Attention utilizează două LSTM pentru a extrage caracteristicile perechii de întrebări și răspunsuri. Apoi, fiecare dintre caracteristicile sunt compuse secvențial folosind mecanismul de atenție, concatenând cei doi vectori într-unul. În cele din urmă, vectorul concatenat este folosit ca intrare pentru MLP, iar stratul de ieșire al MLP utilizează funcția softmax pentru a clasifica răspunsurile furnizate în trei categorii. Acest model este capabil să extragă bine caracteristicile perechii de întrebare și răspuns. Rezultatele arată că sistemul propus depășește algoritmul de referință.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy system wykorzystujący do wykonania zadania model pamięci krótkoterminowej z mechanizmem uwagi (LSTM-Attention). Model LSTM-Attention używa dwóch LSTM do wyodrębnienia cech pary pytań i odpowiedzi. Następnie każda z cech jest kolejno składana za pomocą mechanizmu uwagi, łącząc dwa wektory w jeden. Wreszcie, połączony wektor jest używany jako wejście dla MLP, a warstwa wyjściowa MLP wykorzystuje funkcję softmax do klasyfikacji dostarczonych odpowiedzi na trzy kategorie. Model ten jest w stanie dobrze wyodrębnić cechy pary pytań i odpowiedzi. Wyniki pokazują, że proponowany system przewyższa algorytm bazowy.', 'si': 'අපි පද්ධතියක් ප්\u200dරසිද්ධා කරනවා මේ වැඩ සම්පූර්ණ කරන්න ලොකු කාලකාල මතකයක් භාවිත කරනවා. LSTM- අවධානය නිර්මාණය LSTM දෙකක් භාවිත කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ උත්තර දෙකක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරන්න. ඊට පස්සේ, හැම වෙක්ටර් දෙකක් එක්කෙන් එක්කෙන් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා. අන්තිමේදී, සම්පූර්ණ වෙක්ටර් වෙනුවෙන් MLP සඳහා MLP ගේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප මේ මොඩල් එක හොඳට ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ උත්තර දෙන්න පුළුවන් හැකියාවක් අරගෙන යන්න පුළුවන්. ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය අල්ගෝරිතම් විසින් නැත', 'sr': 'Predlažemo sistem koji koristi kratkoročnu pamćenje sa modelom pažnje (LSTM-Attention) da završi zadatak. LSTM-Pažnja model koristi dve LSTM kako bi izvukao karakteristike pitanja i odgovornog par. Onda je svaka od karakteristika sekvencijalno sastavljena koristeći mehanizam pažnje, sastavljajući dva vektora u jedan. Konačno, konačni vektor se koristi kao ulaz za MLP i sloj izlaska MLP koristi softmax funkciju kako bi klasifikovali pružene odgovore u tri kategorije. Ovaj model je sposoban da izvuče karakteristike pitanja i odgovore na par. Rezultati pokazuju da predloženi sistem iznosi početni algoritam.', 'so': "Waxaan soo jeedaynaa nidaam ku isticmaalaya xusuus waqti dheer oo aad u dhaqdhaqaaqsan karto qaab adag (LSTM-Attention) in uu shaqada dhamaado. The LSTM-Attention model uses two LSTM to extract the features of the question and answer pair.  Markaas mid walba waxaa lagu soo kooban karaa isticmaalka midowga maandooriyaha, kaas oo labada wadiiqooyinka isku kooban. Ugu dambaysta waxaa loo isticmaalaa vector la isku daray sida input u sameeyo MLP iyo qaybta soo baxa ee MLP wuxuu u isticmaalaa habaarka dhakhtarka si uu ugu qeybeeyo jawaabaha la siiyay saddex kooxood. Tusaaladan wuxuu awoodaa in uu soo bixiyo tayada su'aalka islamarkaasna uu ka jawaabi karo laba si wanaagsan. Midhaha la soo jeedo waxay tustaa in nidaamka la soo jeedo uu soo saaraa algorithm-qoriga hoose.", 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு சிறிய நீண்ட நினைவகம் பயன்படுத்தும் முறைமையை கவனத்துடன் (LSTM- கவனத்துடன்) மாதிரியை முடிக்க ஒரு அமைப்பை பரிந்து LSTM- Attention model uses two LSTM to extract the features of the question and answer ஜோடி Then, each of the features is sequentially composed using the attention mechanism, concatenating the two vectors into one.  கடைசியாக, MLP மற்றும் MLP வெளியீட்டு அடுக்கு மென்பொருள் செயல்பாட்டை மூன்று வகைகளாக வகைப்படுத்தும் விடைகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறது. இந்த மாதிரி கேள்வியின் தன்மைகளை வெளியேற்றி சரியாக பதில் இருக்கும். The results show that the proposed system outperforms the baseline algorithm.', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår ett system som använder ett långtidsminne med uppmärksamhetsmekanism (LSTM-Attention) modell för att slutföra uppgiften. LSTM-Attention-modellen använder två LSTM för att extrahera funktionerna i fråga- och svarsparet. Sedan är var och en av funktionerna sekventiellt sammansatt med hjälp av uppmärksamhetsmekanismen, som sammanfogar de två vektorerna till en. Slutligen används den sammankopplade vektorn som inmatning för MLP och MLP:s utmatningslager använder softmax-funktionen för att klassificera svaren i tre kategorier. Denna modell är kapabel att extrahera funktionerna i fråga och svar par väl. Resultaten visar att det föreslagna systemet överträffar baslinjealgoritmen.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک سیسٹم کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو اس کام کو پورا کرنے کے لئے طویل مدت کی مہمانی کے ساتھ (LSTM-Attention) موڈل استعمال کرتا ہے۔ LSTM-Attention model uses two LSTM to extract the features of the question and answer pair. اس کے بعد، ہر شخصیت کے ساتھ توجه کی مکانیسم کے مطابق پیدا ہوا ہے، دو ویکتروں کو ایک میں پیدا کرتا ہے. بالآخر، مکمینٹ ویکتور MLP کے لئے اینپیٹ کے طور پر استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں اور MLP کے اینپیٹ لائر کے لئے نرم مکمینٹ فنکٹ کا استعمال کرتا ہے تاکہ وفات کی جواب تین قطاریوں میں تقسیم کریں. یہ موڈل سؤال اور جواب جوڑے کے علائم اضافہ کرنے کے قابل ہے. نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی سیستم بنیادی لین الگوریتم کو کام نہیں کرتا۔', 'uz': "Bu vazifani bajarish uchun uzun muddati xotira (LSTM-Attention modeli) bilan foydalanadigan tizimni tahlil qilamiz. Name Keyin, har bir xususiyatlar bir xil o'zgarishga qarang, ikkita vektorlarni birinchi marta birlashtiradi. Oxiri, bir nechta boʻlgan vector MLP uchun kiritish sifatida ishlatiladi va MLP tashkilotlarini uchta guruhga tayyorlash uchun dastur funksiyatini foydalanadi. Bu model savol xossalarini olib tashlash va ikkita ikkita javob beradi. The results show that the proposed system outperforms the baseline algorithm.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống dùng bộ nhớ ngắn hạn với cơ chế tập trung (LSTM-Attention) để hoàn thành nhiệm vụ. Bộ mô hình LSTM-Attention dùng hai LSTM để trích các tính năng của câu hỏi và câu trả lời cặp. Sau đó, mỗi tính năng được tạo ra theo dãy số nhờ vào cơ quan chú ý, kết hợp hai sinh tố thành một. Cuối cùng, véc- tơ dính được dùng làm nhập cho MLP và lớp xuất phát của MLP dùng hàm lượng mềm để phân loại câu trả lời được cung cấp thành ba loại. Mẫu này có khả năng khai thác các tính năng của câu hỏi và trả lời cặp rất tốt. Kết quả cho thấy hệ thống được đề xuất vượt quá thuật toán cơ bản.', 'da': "Vi foreslår et system, der bruger en langtidshukommelse med opmærksomhedsmekanisme (LSTM-Attention) model til at fuldføre opgaven. LSTM-Attention modellen bruger to LSTM til at udtrække funktionerne i spørgsmål og svar parret. Derefter er hver af funktionerne sekventielt sammensat ved hjælp af opmærksomhedsmekanismen, der sammenkobler de to vektorer til én. Endelig bruges den sammenkoblede vektor som input til MLP, og MLP's outputlag bruger softmax-funktionen til at klassificere de leverede svar i tre kategorier. Denne model er i stand til at udtrække funktionerne i spørgsmål og svar par godt. Resultaterne viser, at det foreslåede system overgår basisalgoritmen.", 'nl': 'We stellen een systeem voor dat gebruik maakt van een langetermijngeheugen met aandachtsmechanisme (LSTM-Attention) model om de taak te voltooien. Het LSTM-Attention model gebruikt twee LSTM om de kenmerken van het vraag- en antwoordpaar te extraheren. Vervolgens wordt elk van de kenmerken opeenvolgend samengesteld met behulp van het aandachtsmechanisme, waarbij de twee vectoren in één worden samengevoegd. Ten slotte wordt de samengevoegde vector gebruikt als invoer voor de MLP en de uitvoerlaag van de MLP gebruikt de softmax functie om de verstrekte antwoorden in drie categorieën te classificeren. Dit model is in staat om de kenmerken van het vraag- en antwoordpaar goed te extraheren. De resultaten tonen aan dat het voorgestelde systeem het basisalgoritme overtreft.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме система, която използва модел на дългосрочна краткосрочна памет с механизъм на вниманието (Внимание) за завършване на задачата. Моделът използва два за извличане на характеристиките на двойката въпроси и отговори. След това всяка от характеристиките е последователно съставена, използвайки механизма на вниманието, конкатенирайки двата вектора в един. Накрая, конатенираният вектор се използва като вход за MLP, а изходният слой на MLP използва функцията softmax, за да класифицира предоставените отговори в три категории. Този модел е в състояние да извлече характеристиките на двойката въпрос и отговор добре. Резултатите показват, че предложената система надминава базовия алгоритъм.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo sistem koji koristi kratkoročnu pamćenje s modelom pažnje (LSTM-Attention) kako bi završili zadatak. LSTM-Attention model koristi dvije LSTM kako bi izvukao karakteristike pitanja i odgovornog par. Onda, svaka od karakteristika je sekvencijski sastavljena koristeći mehanizam pažnje, uključujući dva vektora u jednu. Konačno, konačni vektor se koristi kao ulaz za MLP i sloj izlaza MLP koristi softmax funkciju kako bi klasifikirali pružene odgovore u tri kategorije. Ovaj model je sposoban izvući karakteristike pitanja i odgovora. Rezultati pokazuju da predloženi sustav nadmašuje početni algoritam.', 'ko': '우리는 장-단기 기억과 주의 메커니즘(LSTM 주의) 모델을 사용하여 임무를 완성하는 시스템을 제시했다.LSTM 참고로 모델은 두 개의 LSTM을 사용하여 퀴즈 쌍의 피쳐를 추출합니다.그리고 주의 메커니즘을 사용하여 각 특징을 순서대로 합성하여 두 벡터를 하나의 벡터로 연결한다.마지막으로, 레벨 연결 벡터는 MLP의 입력으로 사용되고, MLP의 출력층은softmax 함수를 사용하여 제공하는 답안을 세 가지로 나눈다.이 모델은 문답 쌍의 특징을 잘 추출할 수 있다.그 결과 이 시스템의 성능은 기본 알고리즘보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'id': 'Kami mengusulkan sebuah sistem yang menggunakan memori jangka pendek panjang dengan mekanisme perhatian (LSTM-Attention) model untuk menyelesaikan tugas. Model LSTM-Perhatian menggunakan dua LSTM untuk mengekstrak fitur dari pasangan pertanyaan dan jawaban. Kemudian, masing-masing ciri-ciri berkomposensi secara urutan menggunakan mekanisme perhatian, mengkonsentrasi dua vektor menjadi satu. Akhirnya, vektor konkritasi digunakan sebagai input untuk MLP dan lapisan output MLP menggunakan fungsi softmax untuk mengklasifikasi jawaban yang diberikan ke tiga kategori. Model ini mampu mengekstraksi fitur pertanyaan dan jawaban pasangan dengan baik. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa sistem yang diusulkan melampaui algoritma dasar.', 'sw': 'Tunazipendekeza mfumo unaotumia kumbukumbu ya muda mrefu kwa mfumo wa ufuatiliaji (LSTM-Attention) ili kutimiza kazi hiyo. Mfano wa LSTM-Attention hutumia LSTM wawili ili kuondoa vipengele vya swali na jibu wawili. Kisha, kila tabia imetengenezwa kwa kutumia mfumo wa ufuatiliaji, kuwaunganisha vector hizo mbili moja. Mwisho, vector aliyetengenezwa inatumika kama input kwa ajili ya MLP na kiwango cha uzalishaji cha MLP hutumia kazi ya programu kwa kutangaza majibu yaliyotolewa katika makundi matatu. Mfano huu una uwezo wa kuondoa vipengele vya swali na kujibu viwili vizuri. Matokeo yanaonyesha kwamba mfumo wa pendekezo unafanya utambulisho wa msingi.', 'tr': "Biz bu işi tamamlamak üçin uzun wagt yada sistemini teklip edip bilýäris. LSTM-Attention nusgasy soragyň we jogabyň özelliklerini açmak üçin iki LSTM ullanýar Sonra, bu özelliklerin her biri dikkati mekanizmasyny kullanarak, iki vektörü bir şekilde birleştirildir. Sonunda, birleşmiş vektör MLP için giriş şeklinde kullanılır ve MLP'in çizgi katmanı üç kategoriye çarpmak üçin yumuşak fonksiyonu kullanır. Bu nusga soragyň we jogabynyň özelliklerini gowy açyp biler. Netijeler teklip eden sistemiň baz algoritminiň üstünden çykarýandygyny görkezýär.", 'de': 'Wir schlagen ein System vor, das ein langes Kurzzeitgedächtnis mit Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus (LSTM-Attention) Modell verwendet, um die Aufgabe zu erfüllen. Das LSTM-Attention-Modell verwendet zwei LSTM, um die Eigenschaften des Frage- und Antwortpaares zu extrahieren. Dann wird jedes der Merkmale sequenziell mit Hilfe des Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus zusammengesetzt und die beiden Vektoren zu einem verkettet. Schließlich wird der verkettete Vektor als Eingabe für das MLP verwendet und die Ausgabeebene des MLP verwendet die softmax-Funktion, um die bereitgestellten Antworten in drei Kategorien zu klassifizieren. Dieses Modell ist in der Lage, die Eigenschaften des Frage- und Antwortpaares gut zu extrahieren. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass das vorgeschlagene System den Basisalgorithmus übertrifft.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n stelsel wat gebruik 'n lang kort-tyd geheue met aandag mekanisme (LSTM-aandag) model om die taak te voltooi. Die LSTM- Attention model gebruik twee LSTM om die funksies van die vraag en antwoord paar uit te pak. Dan, elke van die funksies is sekwensielik gemeenskap deur die aandagmekanisme te gebruik en die twee vektore in een samelewing. Eindelik, die samelekteerde vektor is gebruik as invoer vir die MLP en die MLP se uitset laag gebruik die sagte maksimum funksie om die verskaf antwoorde in drie kategorie te klassifiseer. Hierdie model is in staat om die funksies van die vraag en antwoord paar goed te uittrek. Die resultate wys dat die voorgestelde stelsel uitvoer die basis-lyn algoritme.", 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një sistem që përdor një kujtim afat-shkurtër me mekanizëm vëmendje (LSTM-Attention) për të kompletuar detyrën. Modeli LSTM-Attention përdor dy LSTM për të nxjerrë karakteristikat e çiftit të pyetjeve dhe përgjigjeve. Pastaj, secila nga karakteristikat është kompozuar sekuencërisht duke përdorur mekanizmin e vëmendjes, duke i konkonkonatuar dy vektorët në një. Më në fund, vektori i shkurtuar përdoret si hyrje për MLP dhe niveli i daljes s ë MLP përdor funksionin softmax për të klasifikuar përgjigjet e dhëna në tre kategori. Ky model është në gjendje të nxjerrë mirë karakteristikat e pyetjes dhe të përgjigjet. Rezultatet tregojnë se sistemi i propozuar përmbush algoritmin bazë.', 'am': 'ስራውን ለመፈጸም የረጅም ዘመን ማስታወስ ማሰሪያ (LSTM-Attention) ሞዴል የሚጠቅመውን ስርዓት እናሳልጋለን፡፡ የLSTM ማስታወቂያ ሞዴል የጥያቄውን ውጤቶች እና ሁለትን መልስ እንዲያወጣ ሁለት LSTM ይጠቅማል። ከዚህም በኋላ እያንዳንዱ ምርጫዎች በጥንቃቄ ማሰናከል እና ሁለቱን vectors በአንድ ላይ ለመቀላቀል ይደረጋሉ፡፡ በመጨረሻው የኮምፕዩተር ምርጫዎች ይህ ሞዴል የጥያቄውን ምርጫዎች ማውጣት እና ሁለትን ደኅንነት ለመመልስ ይችላል፡፡ ፍጥረቶቹ የተዘጋጀው ስርዓት የbaseline algorithም እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡', 'fa': 'ما یک سیستم پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از یک حافظه کوتاه مدت طولانی با مدل توجه (LSTM-Attention) برای کامل این کار استفاده می\u200cکند. مدل LSTM-Attention از دو LSTM استفاده می\u200cکند تا ویژه\u200cهای سوال و جفت جواب را خارج کند. بعدش، هر ویژه\u200cای از ویژه\u200cها از طریق مکانیسم توجه، با همدیگر دو ویکتور به یکی ساخته می\u200cشود. بالاخره، ویکتور متصل به عنوان ورودی برای MLP استفاده می\u200cشود و لایه خروجی MLP از فعالیت نرم\u200cترین نرم\u200cترین استفاده می\u200cکند تا پاسخ\u200cهای پیشنهاد را به سه گروه برگزیند. این مدل قادر است که ویژه\u200cهای سؤال و جواب جفت\u200cها را خوب خارج کند. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که سیستم پیشنهاد الگوریتم بنیادی را بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'az': 'Biz bu işi tamamlamaq üçün uzun müddətli bir yaddaş istifadə edən sistemi təklif edirik. LSTM-Attention modeli sual və cavab çiftlərinin özelliklərini çıxartmaq üçün iki LSTM istifadə edir. Sonra, hər fəaliyyətlərin səbəbi təsiri mehanizmi ilə birləşdirilməsi və iki vektörü birləşdirilməsi ilə birləşdirilmişdir. Sonunda, birləşdirilmiş vektor MLP üçün giriş olaraq və MLP çıxış s əviyyəsi üç kategoriya cevaplarını dəyişdirmək üçün yumuşaqlıq funksiyasını istifadə edir. Bu model sual və cavab çiftərin özelliklərini yaxşı çıxarmağa qadirdir. Sonuçlar təbliğ edilmiş sistemin baz çətinliklərin algoritminin üstünlüyünü göstərir.', 'bs': 'Predlažemo sistem koji koristi kratkoročnu pamćenje sa modelom pažnje (LSTM-Attention) kako bi završili zadatak. LSTM-Attention model koristi dvije LSTM kako bi izvukao karakteristike pitanja i odgovornog par. Onda je svaka od karakteristika sekvencijalno sastavljena koristeći mehanizam pažnje, uključujući dva vektora u jednu. Konačno, konkatenirani vektor se koristi kao ulaz za MLP i sloj izlaska MLP koristi softmax funkciju kako bi klasifikirali pružene odgovore u tri kategorije. Ovaj model je sposoban izvući karakteristike pitanja i odgovora na par. Rezultati pokazuju da predloženi sistem iznosi početni algoritam.', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի համակարգ, որը օգտագործում է երկարաժամկետ հիշողություն ուշադրության մեխանիզմի (LSMT-Ուշադրություն) մոդել, որպեսզի կատարի առաջադրանքը: LSMT-Ուշադրություն մոդելը օգտագործում է երկու LSMT հարցի և պատասխանի զույգի առանձնահատկությունները հանելու համար: Հետո, յուրաքանչյուր հատկությունը հաջորդաբար կազմված է ուշադրության մեխանիզմի օգնությամբ, համեմատելով երկու վեկտորները մեկի: Վերջապես, կոնկրետացված վեկտորը օգտագործվում է որպես MLP-ի ներմուծք և MLP-ի արտադրման շերտը օգտագործում է soft hmax ֆունկցիան, որպեսզի ստացված պատասխանները դասակարգեն երեք կատեգորիաների: Այս մոդելը կարողանում է լավ վերցնել հարցի և պատասխանի հատկությունները: Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված համակարգը գերազանցում է հիմնական ալգորիթմը:', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি সিস্টেম প্রস্তাব করছি যা কাজ সম্পূর্ণ করার জন্য দীর্ঘমেয়াদ মেমরি ব্যবহার করে মনোযোগ মেনে (এলসিএম-মনোযোগ)। LSTM-Attention মডেল প্রশ্নের বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং উত্তর জোড়ার জন্য দুই LSTM ব্যবহার করে। তারপর, প্রত্যেকটি বৈশিষ্ট্যের প্রতিটি বৈশিষ্ট্যের মাধ্যমে মনোযোগ মাধ্যমে তৈরি করা হয়েছে, যার ফলে দুটি ভেক্টর একের মধ্ শেষ পর্যন্ত MLP এবং MLP আউটপুট স্তরের জন্য কন্ট্যাক্টেট ভেক্টর ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে তিন শ্রেণীর মধ্যে প্রদান করা উত্তর ব্যবহার করার জন্য সফটম্যাক্স This model is capable of extracting the features of the question and answer pair well.  ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত সিস্টেম বেসেলাইন অ্যালগরিদমের ব্যবস্থা প্রদর্শন করে।', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme systém, který k dokončení úkolu využívá model dlouhodobé krátkodobé paměti s mechanismem pozornosti (LSTM-Attention). Model LSTM-Attention používá dva LSTM k extrakci vlastností páru otázek a odpovědí. Pak je každá z prvků postupně složena pomocí mechanismu pozornosti, který spojuje dva vektory do jednoho. Konečně, řetězený vektor je použit jako vstup pro MLP a výstupní vrstva MLP používá funkci softmax k klasifikaci poskytnutých odpovědí do tří kategorií. Tento model je schopen dobře extrahovat vlastnosti páru otázek a odpovědí. Výsledky ukazují, že navrhovaný systém překonává základní algoritmus.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme järjestelmää, joka käyttää pitkän aikavälin muistia huomiomekanismilla (LSTM-Attention) -mallia tehtävän suorittamiseksi. LSTM-Attention-malli käyttää kahta LSTM-mallia kysymys- ja vastausparin ominaisuuksien erottamiseen. Sitten jokainen ominaisuus koostuu peräkkäin käyttämällä huomiomekanismia, yhdistäen kaksi vektoria yhdeksi. Lopuksi konkatenoitua vektoria käytetään syötteenä MLP:lle ja MLP:n lähtökerros käyttää softmax-funktiota luokitellakseen annetut vastaukset kolmeen luokkaan. Tämä malli pystyy erottamaan kysymyksen ja vastauksen parin ominaisuudet hyvin. Tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotettu järjestelmä on parempi kuin perusalgoritmi.', 'ca': "Proposem un sistema que utilitza un model de memòria a curt termini amb mecanisme d'atenció (LSTM-Attention) per completar la tasca. El model LSTM-Attention utilitza dos LSTM per extrair les característiques del parell de preguntes i respostes. Llavors, cada una de les característiques està composta seqüencialment utilitzant el mecanisme d'atenció, concatenant els dos vectors en un. Finalment, el vector concatenat s'utilitza com entrada per MLP i la capa de sortida del MLP utilitza la funció softmax per classificar les respostes proporcionades en tres categories. Aquest model és capaç d'extrair bé les característiques del parell de preguntes i respostes. Els resultats mostren que el sistema proposat supera l'algoritme de base.", 'et': 'Pakume välja süsteemi, mis kasutab ülesande täitmiseks pikaajalist lühiajalist mälu tähelepanumehhanismiga (LSTM-Attention). LSTM-Attention mudel kasutab kahte LSTM-i küsimuse ja vastuste paari omaduste väljatõmbamiseks. Seejärel koostatakse iga funktsioon järjestikuselt, kasutades tähelepanumehhanismi, sidudes kaks vektorit üheks. Lõpuks kasutatakse MLP sisendina konkateneeritud vektorit ja MLP väljundikiht kasutab softmax funktsiooni, et liigitada antud vastused kolme kategooriasse. See mudel suudab hästi välja võtta küsimuse ja vastuse paari omadused. Tulemused näitavad, et kavandatud süsteem ületab algoritmi.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngerbah sistem sing Ngawe Perintah sistem sing gambar apa sistem ngono nggawe nguasakno sistem (LTT-Attention) nggo nggawe barang nggawe Name Sampeyan, kabeh kelompok punika dipharos neng akeh lanjut ning sampeyan ingkang sampeyan ingkang sampeyan ingkang sampeyan ingkang sampeyan. text-editor-action Name Rejalaké wong kèwèké ngertuakaké sistem sing wis ngerasai Algorithm kanggo mbakdéné.', 'ha': "Tuna goyyar da wani na'urar da ke amfani da wata masanin lokaci mai tsawo da shiryarwa (LTRM-Attaikin) zuwa ya cika aikin. @ action: button Sa'an nan kuma, aka sami duk ɗaya na takarda, a yi amfani da mekanin aikin muhimmada, kuma yana haɗa shiryoyi biyu zuwa guda. Finally, the concatenated vector is used as input for the MLP and the MLP's output layer uses the softmax function to classify the provided answers into three categories.  Wannan shirin ya iya iya iya nuna tayari na tambayar kuma ya karɓa sau biyu mai kyau. Mataimakin ya nuna cewa, na'urar da aka buƙata, yana tafiyar da algoritm na bakin layin.", 'sk': 'Predlagamo sistem, ki za dokončanje naloge uporablja model dolgoročnega kratkoročnega pomnilnika z mehanizmom pozornosti (LSTM-Attention). Model LSTM-Attention uporablja dva LSTM za izvlečitev značilnosti pare vprašanj in odgovorov. Nato je vsaka od značilnosti zaporedno sestavljena z uporabo mehanizma pozornosti, ki povezuje dva vektorja v enega. Konatenirani vektor se uporablja kot vhod za MLP, izhodna plast MLP pa uporablja funkcijo softmax za razvrstitev zagotovljenih odgovorov v tri kategorije. Ta model je sposoben dobro izvleči značilnosti vprašanja in odgovorov. Rezultati kažejo, da predlagani sistem presega osnovni algoritem.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציעים מערכת שמשתמשת בזיכרון ארוך לטווח קצר עם מנגנון תשומת לב (LSTM-Attention) מודל כדי להשלים את המשימה. מודל LSTM-תשומת לב משתמש בשני LSTM כדי להוציא את תכונות השאלה והתשובה זוג. ואז, כל אחד מהתכונות מורכב ברצף באמצעות מנגנון תשומת לב, מצביע את שני הוקטורים לאחד. סוף סוף, הוקטור הקונקוטנט משתמש כתוצאה עבור MLP ושכבת ההוצאה של MLP משתמשת בפונקציה softmax כדי לקlassifika את התשובות הנוספות לשלושה קטגוריות. המודל הזה מסוגל לחלץ את המאפיינים של השאלה ולענות זוג טוב. התוצאות מראות שהמערכת המוצעת מתגברת על האלגוריתם הבסיסי.', 'bo': "We propose a system that uses a long-term memory with attention mechanism (LSTM-Attention) model to complete the task. LSTM-Attention་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་འདྲི་ཞིབ་དང་ཁ་ཤས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཁྱད་པར་དབྱིབས་སྤེལ་བ་ཡོད། དེ་ལས། ཆ་ཆ་རེ་རེ་བ་ནི་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་གཅིག་ནང་གི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་རྒྱུ་ཡིན་པས། Finally, the concatenated vector is used as input for the MLP and the MLP's output layer uses the softmax function to classify the provided answers into three categories. མིག་སྔར་འདིས་འདྲི་ཚིག་དང་ཁྲིད་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གཙང་དག་ཕྱིར་བཏུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་ནི་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་ལག་གིས་རྨང་གཞིའི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་སྤྱོད་མི་ཐུབ་པ"}
{'en': 'MIDAS at SemEval-2019 Task 9 : Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews using ULMFit', 'ar': 'MIDAS في SemEval-2019 المهمة 9: اقتراح التنقيب من المراجعات عبر الإنترنت باستخدام ULMFit', 'es': 'MIDAS en SemEval-2019 Tarea 9: Extracción de sugerencias a partir de revisiones en línea utilizando ULMFit', 'pt': 'MIDAS no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 9: Mineração de sugestões a partir de avaliações on-line usando o ULMFit', 'fr': 'MIDAS au SEMEVAL-2019 Task 9\xa0: Exploration de suggestions à partir de revues en ligne avec ULMfit', 'ja': 'MIDAS at SemEval -2019タスク9 ： ULMFitを使用したオンラインレビューからの提案マイニング', 'zh': 'MIDASåœ¨SemEval-2019åŠ¡9:ç”¨ULMFitäºŽåœ¨çº¿è®ºæŽ˜ä¹‹', 'hi': 'SEMEval-2019 कार्य 9 पर MIDAS: ULMFit का उपयोग कर ऑनलाइन समीक्षासे सुझाव खनन', 'ru': 'MIDAS на SemEval-2019 Задача 9: Предложения по майнингу из онлайн-обзоров с использованием ULMFit', 'ga': 'MIDAS ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 9: Mianadóireacht Molta ó Léirmheasanna Ar Líne ag úsáid ULMFit', 'hu': 'MIDAS a SemEval-2019 feladat 9: Javaslat bányászat az ULMFit használatával online értékelésekből', 'el': 'Εργασία 9: Εξόρυξη Προτάσεων από Ηλεκτρονικές Κριτικές με χρήση του έργου', 'ka': 'MIDAS semiEval-2019 დავალება 9: შესაძლებლობა გადაწყვეტა ელენელი განახლებებიდან ULMFit გამოიყენება', 'kk': 'MIDAS 9 тапсырмасы: ULMFit қолданып онлайн редакцияларынан балау жұмыс', 'mk': 'MIDAS на SemEval-2019 задача 9: Предлог за минирање од онлајн ревизии користејќи ULMFit', 'lt': 'MIDAS per 2019 m. pusmetį 9 užduotis: siūloma kasyba iš internetinių peržiūrų naudojant ULMFit', 'it': 'MIDAS a SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining dalle recensioni online utilizzando ULMFit', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ജോലി 9- ല്\u200d MIDAS: ULMFit ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d റിവിയുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും മിനിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള ശു', 'mt': 'MIDAS f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 9: Suġġeriment Mining minn Reviżjonijiet Online bl-użu tal-ULMFit', 'ms': 'MIDAS pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 9: cadangan Perlombongan dari Ujian Online menggunakan ULMFit', 'mn': 'MIDAS at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining from Online Review using ULMFit', 'no': 'MIDAS på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 9: Foreslåp for mining frå nettverksområde med ULMFit', 'ro': 'MIDAS la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 9: Sugestii de minerit din recenzii online folosind ULMFit', 'sr': 'MIDAS na semiEval-2019 Task 9: Predloženje rudarstva iz online pregleda koristeći ULMFit', 'pl': 'MIDAS na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 9: Wydobycie sugestii z recenzji online przy użyciu ULMFit', 'si': 'MIDAS at semeval-2019 Job 9: Suggestion mining from online Reviews use UNMFit', 'sv': 'MIDAS på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 9: Förslag till gruvdrift från onlinerecensioner med hjälp av ULMFit', 'so': 'MIDAS at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews using ULMFit', 'ta': 'MIDAS at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews using ULMFit', 'ur': 'MIDAS سم Eval-2019 ٹاکس ۹ میں: ULMFit کے استعمال سے آنلاین رسانیوں سے مینینگ کا پیشنهاد', 'uz': "9 Vazifani SemEval- 2019 bilan MIDAS: ULMFit yordamida Online Reviews' dan yaratish talab qilindi", 'vi': 'MIDAS tại SemEvl-209 Task 9: Khuyên dò khai thác từ giờ đọc qua mạng bằng USMFit', 'bg': 'Задача 9: Пробиване на предложения от онлайн ревюта с помощта на Задача 9: Пробиване на предложения от онлайн ревюта', 'nl': 'MIDAS op SemEval-2019 Taak 9: Suggestie Mining uit Online Reviews met behulp van ULMFit', 'hr': 'MIDAS na semiEval-2019 zadatku 9: Predloženje rudarstva iz online pregleda koristeći ULMFit', 'da': 'MIDAS på SemEval-2019 Opgave 9: Forslag til minedrift fra online anmeldelser ved hjælp af ULMFit', 'de': 'MIDAS bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 9: Suggestion Mining aus Online Reviews mit ULMFit', 'ko': 'MIDAS가SemEval-2019의 퀘스트 9:ULMFit를 사용하여 온라인 댓글에서 조언 발굴', 'id': 'MIDAS di SemEval-2019 Tugas 9: Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews using ULMFit', 'fa': 'MIDAS در پایین اول-۲۰۱۹ کار ۹: پیشنهاد خرید از بازرسی\u200cهای آنلاین با استفاده از ULMFit', 'tr': 'MIDAS at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining from Online Review using ULMFit', 'sq': 'MIDAS në SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews using ULMFit', 'sw': 'MIDAS kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019: Mapendekezo ya Kumbukumbu kutoka Mapitio ya Mtandaoni kwa kutumia ULMFit', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'hy': 'MIDAS at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews using ULMFit', 'az': 'MIDAS at semiEval-2019 Task 9: Online Revisions using ULMFit', 'af': 'MIDAS by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 9: voorstellings Mining van Online Revisiones gebruik ULMFit', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2019 কাজ ৯-এ মিডাস: ULMFit ব্যবহার করে অনলাইন রিভিউ থেকে মিনিং পরামর্শ', 'bs': 'MIDAS na semiEval-2019 Task 9: Predloženje rudarstva iz online pregleda koristeći ULMFit', 'ca': 'MIDAS at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews using ULMFit', 'et': 'MIDAS SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 9: Soovituste kaevandamine veebipõhistest ülevaatest, kasutades ULMFit', 'fi': 'MIDAS SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 9: Suggestion Mining online-arvosteluista käyttäen ULMFit', 'cs': 'MIDAS na SemEval-2019 Úkol 9: Těžba návrhů z online recenzí pomocí ULMFit', 'jv': 'MDES at seminval-2011 task 9: Suggestion Minng from online spills use UlMMatch', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'sk': 'MIDAS na SemEval-2019 Naloga 9: Predlog rudarjenje iz spletnih ocen z uporabo ULMFit', 'he': 'MIDAS ב SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews using ULMFit', 'bo': 'MIDAS at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews using ULMFit'}
{'en': 'In this paper we present our approach to tackle the Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forums Sub-Task A. Given a review, we are asked to predict whether the review consists of a suggestion or not. Our model is based on Universal Language Model Fine-tuning for Text Classification. We apply various pre-processing techniques before training the language and the classification model. We further provide analysis of the model. Our team ranked 10th out of 34 participants, achieving an F1 score of 0.7011.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم نهجنا لمعالجة اقتراح التنقيب من المراجعات عبر الإنترنت والمهمة الفرعية للمنتديات أ. بعد المراجعة ، يُطلب منا توقع ما إذا كانت المراجعة تتكون من اقتراح أم لا. يعتمد نموذجنا على الضبط الدقيق لنموذج اللغة العالمي لتصنيف النص. نطبق تقنيات معالجة مسبقة مختلفة قبل تدريب اللغة ونموذج التصنيف. نحن نقدم كذلك تحليل النموذج. احتل فريقنا المرتبة العاشرة من بين 34 مشاركًا ، وحققوا درجة F1 قدرها 0.7011.', 'es': 'En este artículo presentamos nuestro enfoque para abordar la subtarea A de la minería de sugerencias de las revisiones en línea y los foros. Dada una revisión, se nos pide que predigamos si la revisión consiste en una sugerencia o no. Nuestro modelo se basa en el ajuste fino del modelo de lenguaje universal para la clasificación de textos. Aplicamos varias técnicas de preprocesamiento antes de entrenar el idioma y el modelo de clasificación. Además, proporcionamos un análisis del modelo. Nuestro equipo ocupó el décimo lugar de 34 participantes, logrando una puntuación de F1 de 0.7011.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons notre approche pour aborder la sous-tâche A. L'exploration de suggestions à partir des revues en ligne et des forums. Après un examen, on nous demande de prédire si l'examen consiste en une suggestion ou non. Notre modèle est basé sur le réglage fin du modèle de langage universel pour la classification de texte. Nous appliquons différentes techniques de prétraitement avant de former la langue et le modèle de classification. Nous fournissons également une analyse du modèle. Notre équipe s'est classée 10e sur 34 participants, obtenant un score F1 de 0,7011.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos nossa abordagem para lidar com a Mineração de Sugestões de Revisões Online e Fóruns Sub-Tarefa A. Dada uma revisão, somos solicitados a prever se a revisão consiste em uma sugestão ou não. Nosso modelo é baseado no ajuste fino do modelo de linguagem universal para classificação de texto. Aplicamos várias técnicas de pré-processamento antes de treinar a linguagem e o modelo de classificação. Fornecemos ainda a análise do modelo. Nossa equipe ficou em 10º lugar entre 34 participantes, alcançando uma pontuação na F1 de 0,7011.', 'zh': '于本文中,言在线论论坛子务A决议发掘之法。 给定论,臣等预论包含。 我们的模形基于通用语言模形对文本分类的微调。 语言分类之前,宜用诸预处理术。 更供模样。 吾团队排名第10位于34名参赛者中,F1分为0.7011。', 'ja': 'この論文では、オンラインレビューとフォーラムのサブタスクAからの提案マイニングに取り組むためのアプローチを提示します。レビューが提案であるかどうかを予測することが求められます。当社のモデルは、テキスト分類のためのユニバーサル言語モデル微調整に基づいています。言語と分類モデルを訓練する前に、さまざまな前処理技術を適用します。さらに、モデルの分析を提供します。当チームは34名中10位となり、F 1スコアは0.7011となりました。', 'hi': 'इस पत्र में हम ऑनलाइन समीक्षा और मंचों उप कार्य ए से सुझाव खनन से निपटने के लिए हमारे दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं। एक समीक्षा को देखते हुए, हमें यह अनुमान लगाने के लिए कहा जाता है कि समीक्षा में एक सुझाव शामिल है या नहीं। हमारा मॉडल पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए यूनिवर्सल लैंग्वेज मॉडल फाइन-ट्यूनिंग पर आधारित है। हम भाषा और वर्गीकरण मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने से पहले विभिन्न पूर्व-प्रसंस्करण तकनीकों को लागू करते हैं। हम आगे मॉडल का विश्लेषण प्रदान करते हैं। हमारी टीम 34 प्रतिभागियों में से 10 वें स्थान पर है, 0.7011 का एफ 1 स्कोर प्राप्त कर रही है।', 'ru': 'В этом документе мы представляем наш подход к решению подзадачи «Предложения по майнингу из онлайновых обзоров и форумов» А. Учитывая обзор, нас просят предсказать, состоит ли обзор из предложения или нет. Наша модель основана на точной настройке универсальной языковой модели для классификации текста. Мы применяем различные методы предварительной обработки перед обучением языку и модели классификации. Далее приведен анализ модели. Наша команда заняла 10-е место из 34 участников, получив оценку F1 0,7011.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo cuirimid i láthair ár gcur chuige chun dul i ngleic leis an bhFoTasc A maidir le Mianadóireacht Moltaí ó Athbhreithnithe agus Fóraim Ar Líne A. I bhfianaise athbhreithnithe, iarrtar orainn a thuar cé acu an bhfuil nó nach bhfuil san athbhreithniú moladh. Tá ár múnla bunaithe ar Mhíneachán Samhail Teanga Uilíoch le haghaidh Aicmiú Téacs. Cuirimid teicnící réamhphróiseála éagsúla i bhfeidhm roimh oiliúint a chur ar an teanga agus ar an múnla rangaithe. Cuirimid tuilleadh anailíse ar an tsamhail ar fáil. Bhí ár bhfoireann sa 10ú háit as 34 rannpháirtí, ag baint amach scór F1 de 0.7011.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ ჩვენი გახსენება, რომელიც წარმოიდგინეთ წარმოიდგინების წარმოიდგინების წარმოიდგინების წარმოიდგინების წარმოიდგინების წარმოიდგინების შესახებ და A-ს წარმოიდგინების ჩვენი მოდელი ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციისთვის უნივერსური ენის მოდელზე დაბაზიან. ჩვენ განსხვავებული პროცესირების ტექნექციების გამოყენება ენის და კლასიფიკაციის მოდელის შემდეგ. ჩვენ მოდელის ანალიზაციას დავიწყებთ. ნაქთწრ ვკთო ნაპვეთ 10-რთ ჲრ 34 სფაჟრგაფნთუთ, ეჲჟრთდნაჳა F1 ოჲ 0,7011.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζουμε την προσέγγισή μας για την αντιμετώπιση της Εξόρυξης Προτάσεων από Ηλεκτρονικές Κριτικές και Φόρουμ Υποεργασία Α. Με βάση μια ανασκόπηση, μας ζητείται να προβλέψουμε αν η ανασκόπηση αποτελείται από μια πρόταση ή όχι. Το μοντέλο μας βασίζεται στη ρύθμιση προτύπων καθολικής γλώσσας για την ταξινόμηση κειμένου. Εφαρμόζουμε διάφορες τεχνικές προεπεξεργασίας πριν από την εκπαίδευση της γλώσσας και του μοντέλου ταξινόμησης. Παρέχουμε περαιτέρω ανάλυση του μοντέλου. Η ομάδα μας κατατάχθηκε 10η στους 34 συμμετέχοντες, πετυχαίνοντας σκορ F1 0.7011.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a javaslatbányászat online értékelésekből és fórumokból történő kezelésére irányuló megközelítésünket. A felülvizsgálat alapján meg kell jósolnunk, hogy a felülvizsgálat javaslatból áll-e vagy sem. Modellünk az Univerzális nyelvi modell finomhangolásán alapul a szövegosztályozáshoz. A nyelv és az osztályozási modell képzése előtt különböző előfeldolgozási technikákat alkalmazunk. Továbbá elemzést nyújtunk a modellről. Csapatunk 34 résztvevő közül a 10. helyen állt, ezzel 0,7011 F1 pontszámot ért el.', 'it': 'In questo articolo presentiamo il nostro approccio per affrontare il Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forum Sub-Task A. Data una recensione, ci viene chiesto di prevedere se la recensione consiste in un suggerimento o meno. Il nostro modello si basa sulla messa a punto del modello linguistico universale per la classificazione del testo. Applichiamo varie tecniche di pre-elaborazione prima di formare la lingua e il modello di classificazione. Forniamo inoltre analisi del modello. Il nostro team si è classificato 10 ° su 34 partecipanti, ottenendo un punteggio F1 di 0.7011.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome savo požiūrį į pasiūlymų dėl kasybos internetu peržiūrų ir forumų A subužduotį. Atsižvelgiant į peržiūrą, prašoma nuspėti, ar peržiūrą sudaro pasiūlymas, ar ne. Our model is based on Universal Language Model Fine-tuning for Text Classification.  Prieš mokydami kalbą ir klasifikavimo model į taikome įvairius išankstinio apdorojimo metodus. Toliau teikiame modelio analizę. Mūsų komanda buvo dešimtoji iš 34 dalyvių, o F1 rezultatas buvo 0,7011.', 'mk': 'Во овој документ го претставуваме нашиот пристап за решавање на производството на предлози од онлајн ревизии и форуми подзадача А. Со оглед на ревизијата, се бара да предвидеме дали ревизијата се состои од предлог или не. Нашиот модел е базиран на Универзалното јазичко модел за финетирање на текстовата класификација. Применуваме различни техники за преобработување пред обуката на јазикот и моделот за класификација. Понатаму обезбедуваме анализа на моделот. Нашиот тим се рангираше на 10-тото место од 34 учесници, достигнувајќи оценка Ф1 од 0,7011.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда онлайн редакцияларынан және A тапсырмасының ішкі тапсырмаларының түсіндіру үшін жағдайламызды таңдаймыз. Қарастыру үшін, бұл редакцияның ұсынысынан тұрып тұрмауын сұрады. Біздің үлгіміз мәтін классификациясы үшін Universal Language Model жақсы баптауға негізделген. Тілді және классификациялық үлгісін оқыту алдында әртүрлі өзгерту техникаларын қолданамыз. Біз үлгісінің анализациясын келтіреміз. Біздің командамыз 34 қатысушылардан 10-інші ретінде, F1 деңгейін 0,7011 деңгейіне жеткізді.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d റിവിവ്യൂവുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഫോറമുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും സുബ് ടാസ്ക് എയില്\u200d നിന്നും മിനിങ്ങ് നോക്കാനുള്ള പ്രായശ്ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ  ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d യൂണിവര്\u200dണിവല്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്താണ്. ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസിഷനിങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ് ഭാഷയും ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d മോഡലും പരിശീലിക്കുന്നതിനു മുമ്പ് നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്ന നമ്മള്\u200d മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ അന്വേഷണം കൂടുതല്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു. ഞങ്ങളുടെ ടീം 34 പങ്കാളികളില്\u200d നിന്ന് 10ആം റെഞ്ച് ചെയ്തു. എഫ്\u200c1 സ്കോര്\u200d 0. 7011 ന് പ്രാപിക്കുന്നു.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan pendekatan kami untuk mengatasi Mencari cadangan dari Review Online dan Forum Sub-Task A. Mengingat revisi, kami diminta untuk meramalkan sama ada revisi terdiri dari cadangan atau tidak. Model kami berdasarkan penyesuaian Model Bahasa Universal untuk Klasifikasi Teks. Kami melaksanakan berbagai teknik praproses sebelum melatih bahasa dan model klasifikasi. Kami memberikan analisis model. Our team ranked 10th out of 34 participants, achieving an F1 score of 0.7011.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид онлайн шалгалт болон Форумуудын A-н суб-Task-ээс зориулах санал зориулалтыг зориулахын тулд өөрсдийн арга замыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бидний загвар нь универсал хэл загварын төлөвлөгөөнд суурилсан. Бид хэл болон классификацийн загварыг суралцахаас өмнө олон арга үйлдвэрлэх техникуудыг ашиглаж байна. Бид дараа нь загварын талаар шинжилгээ гаргадаг. Бидний баг 34 оролцогчдын 10-н орон зайнаас 0.7011 гарч ирсэн.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument qed nippreżentaw l-approċċ tagħna biex nindirizzaw is-Suġġerimenti għall-Minjieri minn Reviżjonijiet Online u Forums Sub-Task A. Minħabba reviżjoni, qed jintalbu nippjanaw jekk ir-reviżjoni tikkonsistix f’suġġeriment jew le. Our model is based on Universal Language Model Fine-tuning for Text Classification.  Aħna napplikaw diversi tekniki ta’ qabel l-ipproċessar qabel ma nħarrġu l-lingwa u l-mudell ta’ klassifikazzjoni. Aħna nipprovdu aktar analiżi tal-mudell. It-tim tagħna kklassifika l-għaxar minn 34 parteċipant, u kiseb punteġġ F1 ta’ 0.7011.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare prezentăm abordarea noastră pentru abordarea sugestiilor miniere din recenzii online și forumuri sub-sarcina A. Având în vedere o revizuire, suntem rugați să prezicem dacă revizuirea constă dintr-o sugestie sau nu. Modelul nostru se bazează pe ajustarea fină a modelului universal de limbă pentru clasificarea textelor. Aplicăm diferite tehnici de pre-procesare înainte de instruirea limbii și a modelului de clasificare. În continuare, vă oferim analiza modelului. Echipa noastră s-a clasat pe locul 10 din 34 de participanți, obținând un scor F1 de 0.7011.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi tilnærminga vårt for å løse forslag for å gjere gjennomsikt frå nettverksomsyningar og forgangar underoppgåve A. I tillegg til ei oversikt vert vi spurd om gjennomsikt inneheld eit forslag eller ikkje. Modellen vårt er basert på Universell språk-modell Fine-tuning for tekstklassifikasjon. Vi bruker forskjellige førehandsamingsteknikkar før opplæring av språk og klassifikasjonsmodulet. Vi gjev meir analyse av modellen. Gruppen vårt rangerte 10 av 34 deltakarar, og oppnår ein F1-poeng på 0,7011.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy nasze podejście do rozwiązania problemu wydobywania sugestii z podzadań online recenzji i forów A. Biorąc pod uwagę przegląd, prosimy o przewidzenie, czy przegląd składa się z sugestii, czy nie. Nasz model oparty jest na uniwersalnym dostrajaniu modelu językowego dla klasyfikacji tekstu. Przed treningiem języka i modelu klasyfikacji stosujemy różne techniki wstępnego przetwarzania. Ponadto zapewniamy analizę modelu. Nasza drużyna zajęła się dziesiątą z 34-uczestników, osiągając wynik F1 0.7011.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo naš pristup da se suočimo sa prijedlogom o rudarstvu iz Online Review i Foruma podzadatak A. S obzirom na pregled, traženi smo da predvidimo da li pregled sastoji od predlog ili ne. Naš model je zasnovan na univerzalnom jezičkom modelu fino podešavanje za klasifikaciju teksta. Primjenjujemo različite tehnike pre obrade prije obuke jezika i klasifikacijskog modela. Dalje pružamo analizu modela. Naš tim je bio 10 od 34 učesnika, ostvario F1 rezultat od 0,7011.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි අපේ අභිවිධානය පෙන්වන්නේ අන්ලයාන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් විදිහට අපේ මෝඩල් විශාල භාෂාව මෝඩල් විශේෂණය වෙනුවෙන් අධාරණය කරනවා. අපි භාෂාව සහ විශේෂ මොඩේල් කලින් විවිධ ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා. අපි මොඩල් එකේ විශ්ලේෂණයක් තියෙනවා. අපේ කණ්ඩායමයි අංශිකාරියෝ 34කින් 10වෙනි ස්ථානය කරලා, F1 ස්කෝර් 0.7011 වලින් ලැබෙනවා.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaan ku soo qoraynaa qaabilaada aan ka tacliino Suggestii aan ka soo jeedo Internetka Reviews and Forums Sub-Task A. Markii aan baaritaan, waxaa nala soo sheegayaa in baaritaanka uu ka mid yahay suggestion ama la’aan. Tusaalkayagu wuxuu ku saleysan yahay muusikada luqada caalamiga ah oo ku qoran qoraalka fasaxa. Waxbarashada luqada iyo muusikada fasaxa ka hor ayaannu codsanaynaa heerar kala duduwan. Waxaynu sameynaa wax kaloo baaritaan qaababka. Our team ranked 10th out of 34 participants, achieving an F1 score of 0.7011.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi vårt tillvägagångssätt för att tackla Förslag Mining from Online Reviews and Forums underuppgift A. Med tanke på en granskning ombeds vi förutsäga om recensionen består av ett förslag eller inte. Vår modell är baserad på Universal Language Model Finjustering för textklassificering. Vi tillämpar olika förbehandlingstekniker innan vi tränar språket och klassificeringsmodellen. Vi tillhandahåller vidare analys av modellen. Vårt lag rankade sig 10:e av 34 deltagare och fick en F1-poäng på 0.7011.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் இணைய முறைமையில் இருந்து நினைவூட்டல் மற்றும் குறிப்புகள் துணை பணி A என்ற பரிந்துரையை எதிர்பார்க்க எங்களுடைய வழியில் கொண்டு வரு எங்கள் மாதிரி பொதுவான மொழி மாதிரி உரை வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கான நன்மையை அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது. மொழியையும் வகுப்பு மாதிரியையும் பயிற்சி செய்வதற்கு முன் பல முன் செயல்படுத்தும் தொழில்நுட்பம் பயன நாம் மாதிரியின் ஆராய்ச்சியை மேலும் வழங்குகிறோம். எங்கள் குழு 34 பங்குக்குரியவர்களில் 10வது நிறைந்தது, 0.7011 புள்ளியை அடைந்தது.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں اپنے طریقے کو پیش کریں گے کہ آنلاین کی آزمائش اور فورموں کے سابٹ-ٹاکس A کے ذریعہ سے پیش آئیں، ہم سے پوچھا جاتا ہے کہ آزمائش کا کوئی پیشنهاد ہے یا نہ ہے. ہمارا موڈل متن کلاسیفی کے لئے یونلورڈ زبان موڈل پر بنیاد ہے. ہم زبان اور کلاسپیٹ موڈل کی آموزش سے پہلے مختلف پیش پردازش تکنیک استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ ہم اس مدل کا تحلیل ادا کرتے ہیں۔ ہماری تیم نے 34 شرکت کرنے والوں میں سے 10 درجے کی، 0.7011 کی F1 سکونٹ پہنچ گئی۔', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda biz Online Reviews va Forums Sub-Vazifalar A dasturini taklif qilish imkoniyatini ko'rib chiqarish uchun qoʻllanmiz. Koʻrib chiqishni tasavvur qilishimiz mumkin yoki ravishda ko'rib chiqarishimiz mumkin. Bizning modelimiz matn klassification uchun umumiy til modeli asosida. Biz tilni va tabiif modelini taʼminlashdan oldin boshqa taʼminlovchi texnologilarga qoʻllamiz. Koʻproq modelni analyzeriz qilamiz. Bizning guruhimiz 34 participlardan 10 qismini o'zgartirdi, 0.7011'ning F1 scorini yetdi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi giới thiệu phương pháp xử lý các đề nghị khai thác các tạp chí tìm kiếm qua mạng A. Dựa vào một bản đánh giá, chúng tôi được yêu cầu dự đoán xem bản phê bình có gồm một đề nghị hay không. Mẫu của chúng tôi dựa trên mô hình ngôn ngữ chung. Trước khi đào tạo ngôn ngữ và mô hình phân loại, chúng tôi đã dùng nhiều kỹ thuật. Chúng tôi cung cấp phân tích mô hình. Đội của chúng tôi xếp hạng 10th ngoài 34, đạt được điểm F1 trong 0.7011.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi vores tilgang til at tackle Forslag Mining fra Online Anmeldelser og Forums underopgave A. På baggrund af en gennemgang bliver vi bedt om at forudsige, om anmeldelsen består af et forslag eller ej. Vores model er baseret på Universal Language Model Fine-tuning for tekstklassifikation. Vi anvender forskellige forbearbejdningsteknikker inden vi træner sproget og klassifikationsmodellen. Vi leverer yderligere analyse af modellen. Vores hold rangerede 10 ud af 34 deltagere og opnåede en F1 score på 0.7011.', 'bg': 'В тази статия представяме нашия подход за справяне с подзадача А. Предвид преглед, ние сме помолени да предвидим дали прегледът се състои от предложение или не. Нашият модел се основава на универсален езиков модел фина настройка за класификация на текста. Прилагаме различни техники за предварителна обработка преди обучението на езика и класификационния модел. Освен това предоставяме анализ на модела. Екипът ни се класира на 10-то място от 34 участници, постигайки резултат от 0.7011.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we onze aanpak om de Suggestion Mining vanuit Online Reviews en Forums Sub-Task A aan te pakken. Gezien een review worden we gevraagd om te voorspellen of de review bestaat uit een suggestie of niet. Ons model is gebaseerd op Universal Language Model Fine-tuning voor Tekst Classificatie. We passen verschillende pre-processing technieken toe alvorens de taal en het classificatiemodel te trainen. We bieden verder analyse van het model. Ons team scoorde 10e van 34 deelnemers en behaalde een F1 score van 0.7011.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir unseren Ansatz vor, den Suggestion Mining aus Online Reviews und Foren Teilaufgabe A anzugehen. Angesichts einer Überprüfung werden wir gebeten vorherzusagen, ob die Überprüfung aus einem Vorschlag besteht oder nicht. Unser Modell basiert auf Universal Language Model Fine-Tuning für die Textklassifikation. Wir wenden verschiedene Vorverarbeitungstechniken an, bevor wir die Sprache und das Klassifizierungsmodell trainieren. Weiterhin bieten wir eine Analyse des Modells an. Unser Team wurde Zehnter von 34-Teilnehmern und erzielte eine F1-Punktzahl von 0.7011.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan pendekatan kami untuk menangani Suggestion Mining dari Review Online dan Forums Sub-Task A. Dengan penelitian, kami diminta untuk memprediksi apakah penelitian terdiri dari sugestian atau tidak. Our model is based on Universal Language Model Fine-tuning for Text Classification.  Kami menerapkan berbagai teknik pre-proses sebelum melatih bahasa dan model klasifikasi. Kami menyediakan analisis model. Tim kami mencatat ke-10 dari 34 peserta, mencapai skor F1 0,7011.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo naš pristup rješavanju prijedloga za rudarstvo iz online preglede i Foruma podzadatak A. S obzirom na pregled, traženi smo predvidjeti da li se pregled sastoji od predloga ili ne. Naš model je baziran na univerzalnom jezičkom modelu fino podešavanje za klasifikaciju teksta. Primjenjujemo različite tehnike predobrađivanja prije obuke jezika i klasifikacijskog modela. Dalje pružamo analizu modela. Naš tim je bio 10 od 34 učesnika, ostvario F1 rezultat od 0,7011.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii tunaonyesha mbinu yetu ya kukabiliana na pendekezo la Kufuatilia Mapitio ya Mtandaoni na Jukwaa la Kupitia Tamko A. Kwa kuangalia mapitio haya, tunaulizwa kutabiri kama matokeo hayo yanatokana na pendekezo au la. Mfano wetu una msingi wa Modeli ya Lugha ya Kimataifa kwa ajili ya Kuhitimisha Maandishi. Tunatumia mbinu mbalimbali za upasuaji kabla ya kufundisha lugha na mtindo wa usafi. Tunatoa uchambuzi zaidi wa mifano. Timu yetu ilikuwa ni ya 10 kati ya washiriki 34, kupata kipindi cha F1 cha 0.7011.', 'af': "In hierdie papier aanbied ons ons toegang om die voorstellings van Online ële Aansoek en Forums Sub-Taak A te trek. Gien 'n oorskou, word ons gevra om te voorskou of die oorskou bestaan van 'n voorstelling of nie. Ons model is gebaseer op Universele Taal Model Fine- tuning vir Teks Klassifikasie. Ons het verskeie voorafverwerking teknike aanwend voor die taal en die klasifikasie-model te oefen. Ons verskaf verder analisie van die model. Ons span het 10de van 34 deelnimmers rangeer, met 'n F1-rekening van 0,7011.", 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 온라인 평론과 논단지 임무 A에서 건의를 발굴하는 방법을 제시했다. 평론을 한 편 정하면 평론에 건의가 포함되어 있는지 예측해 달라는 요청을 받았다.우리의 모델은 텍스트 분류의 통용 언어 모델을 바탕으로 미세하게 조정된다.언어와 분류 모델을 훈련하기 전에 우리는 각종 예처리 기술을 응용하였다.우리는 한층 더 모델에 대해 분석을 진행하였다.우리 팀은 34명의 참가자 중 10위, F1은 0.7011을 기록했다.', 'sq': 'In this paper we present our approach to tackle the Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forums Sub-Task A. Given a review, we are asked to predict whether the review consists of a suggestion or not.  Modeli ynë bazohet në rregullimin e modelit të gjuhës universale për klasifikimin e tekstit. Ne aplikojmë teknika të ndryshme paraprocesimi përpara trajnimit të gjuhës dhe modelit klasifikues. Ne furnizojmë më tej analizën e modelit. Ekipi ynë renditi të dhjetën nga 34 pjesëmarrës, duke arritur një rezultat F1 prej 0.7011.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما روش خود را برای حل کردن پیشنهاد ذخیره\u200cای از آزمایش\u200cهای آنلاین و فورمهای زیر کار A پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. با توجه به تحقیق، ما از پیشنهاد داده می\u200cشویم که آیا تحقیق از پیشنهاد است یا نه. مدل ما بر اساس مدل زبان جهانی تنظیم نیکویی برای کلاس متن است. ما پیش از آموزش زبان و مدل classification مختلف فناوری پیش پردازش را استفاده می کنیم. ما تحلیل مدل را بیشتر پیشنهاد می کنیم. تيم ما 10 از 34 شرکت کننده درجه گرفته بود تا يه امتياز F1 از 0.7011 برسه', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ የኢንተርኔት ተመልከቶች እና የፎርሙስ ደብዳቤ አድራጊዎች A ለመቀናቀል ጉዳዩን ለማቀናቀል ልናደርገው አቀረብናል፡፡ ሞዴሌዎቻችን የዓለምአቀፍ ቋንቋ ሞዴል ለጽሑፍ መግለጫ ማቀናጃ ነው፡፡ ቋንቋውን እና መግለጫውን ሳናስተምሩ በፊት የፊደል ሥልጣናዎችን እናስጠይቃለን፡፡ ዳግመኛ የሞዴል አስተያየት እናደርጋለን፡፡ ቡድን ከ34 ተጋሪዎች አሥር አንደኛው የ.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեր մոտեցումը, որպեսզի հաղթահարենք օնլայն վերլուծումներից և ֆորումների A ենթախնդիրներից առաջարկած հանքարդյունքը. վերլուծումը հաշվի առնելով, մեզ խնդրում են կանխատեսել, արդյոք վերլուծումը առաջարկած է կամ ոչ: Մեր մոդելը հիմնված է տեքստի դասակարգման համաշխարհային լեզվի մոդելի բարելավման վրա: Մենք կիրառում ենք տարբեր նախավերամշակման մեթոդներ նախքան լեզվի և դասակարգման մոդելը ուսուցանումը: Մենք նաև կատարում ենք մոդելի վերլուծությունը: Մեր թիմը համախմբվեց 34 մասնակիցներից 10-րդին, որի արդյունքում F1 գնահատականը 0.7011 էր:', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda internetäki revisyonlardan ylalaşyk üçin tekliplarymyzy çözmekde teklipimizi görkezýäris Biziň nusgasymyz Umumy Dil Modeli Metin Sınıflandyrma üçin iňe düzümlenmesine dayanan. Dili we klasifikasyon nusgasyny öňünden öň dürli öňünden öňünden işleýän tekniklerimizi uygulapdyrys. Biz nusganyň analyzasyny daşyrdyrys. Biziñ toparymyz 34-nji tarapyndan 10-nji sapar boldy, F1 sany 0.7011 derejesine ýetýärdi.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা অনলাইন রিভিউ এবং ফোরাম সাব-কাজ A-এর প্রস্তাবের মিনিং মুখোমুখি করার জন্য আমাদের পদক্ষেপ উপস্থাপন করেছি, একটি পর্যালোচনা দিয়ে আমরা ভবিষ্যদ্বাণ আমাদের মডেল বিশ্বব্যাপী ভাষার মোডেল টেক্সট ক্লাসিফিকেশনের জন্য ভিত্তিক। ভাষা এবং শ্রেণীকরণ মডেল প্রশিক্ষণের পূর্বে আমরা বিভিন্ন প্রক্রিয়ার প্রযুক্তি প্রয়োগ করি। আমরা আরো মডেলের বিশ্লেষণ প্রদান করি। Our team ranked 10th out of 34 participants, achieving an F1 score of 0.7011.', 'ca': "En aquest paper presentem el nostre enfocament per abordar la Suggestion Mining de Reviews Online i Forums Sub-Task A. Tenint en compte una revisió, ens demana predir si la revisió consisteix en una suggerició o no. El nostre model es basa en l'ajustament del model de llenguatge universal per a la classificació del text. Aplicam diverses tècniques de pré-processament abans d'entrenar el llenguatge i el model de classificació. També proporcionem anàlisi del model. El nostre equip va classificar la décima de cada 34 participants, aconseguint una puntuació F1 de 0,7011.", 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis tutvustame oma lähenemisviisi soovituste kaevandamise lahendamiseks online ülevaatete ja foorumite alamülesandest A. Arvestades ülevaadet, palutakse meil prognoosida, kas ülevaade koosneb soovitusest või mitte. Meie mudel põhineb universaalsel keelemudeli peenhäälestusel teksti klassifitseerimiseks. Enne keele ja klassifikatsioonimudeli koolitamist rakendame erinevaid eeltöötlustehnikaid. Lisaks analüüsime mudelit. Meie meeskond oli 34 osalejast 10. kohal, saavutades F1 skoori 0,7011.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme lähestymistapamme Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forums Sub-Task A. Tarkastelun perusteella meitä pyydetään ennustamaan, koostuuko arvostelu ehdotuksesta vai ei. Mallimme perustuu Universal Language Model Fine-tuning for Text Classification. Sovellamme erilaisia esikäsittelytekniikoita ennen kielen ja luokittelumallin koulutusta. Lisäksi tarjoamme analyysin mallista. Joukkueemme sijoittui kymmenenneksi 34 osallistujasta saavuttaen F1-pisteen 0,7011.', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, Online Review və Forums Sub-Task A tədbirlərindən çəkilmək üçün tədbirlərimizi göstərdik. Bir tədbirlə görə, bizim tədbirlərin tədbirlərindən olub olmadığını öyrənmək istəyirik. Bizim modelimiz üniversal Dil Modeli Metin Klasifikasyonu üçün yaxşı tərzdə tərzdə dayanılır. Biz dili və klasifikasiya modelini təhsil etmədən əvvəl müxtəlif ön işləmə tekniklərini uygulayıq. Biz modelinin analizini daha da təmin edirik. Bizim ekibimiz 34 iştirakçılardan 10 səf çəkdi, F1 səviyyəsini 0,7011 çatdı.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme náš přístup k řešení subúkolu Suggestion Mining z online recenzí a fór A. Vzhledem k recenzi jsme požádáni o předpověď, zda recenze obsahuje nějaký návrh či nikoli. Náš model je založen na univerzálním jazykovém modelu jemného ladění pro klasifikaci textu. Před výcvikem jazyka a klasifikačního modelu aplikujeme různé techniky předzpracování. Dále poskytujeme analýzu modelu. Náš tým byl desátý z 34 účastníků a dosáhl F1 skóre 0.7011.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo naš pristup rješavanju prijedloga za rudarstvo iz online pregleda i foruma podzadatak A. S obzirom na pregled, traženo nam je da predvidimo da li se pregled sastoji od predloga ili ne. Naš model je baziran na univerzalnom jezičkom modelu fino podešavanje za klasifikaciju teksta. Primjenjujemo različite tehnike predobrazovanja prije obuke jezika i klasifikacijskog modela. Dalje pružamo analizu modela. Naš tim je bio 10 od 34 učesnika, ostvario F1 rezultat od 0,7011.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנו מציגים את הגישה שלנו להתמודד עם המכרה ההצעה מתוך מחקרים באינטרנט ופורומים Sub-Task A. בהתחשב במבחן, אנו מבקשים לחזות אם המבחן כולל הצעה או לא. הדוגמא שלנו מבוססת על הדוגמא של שפה אוניברסלית מתאים לטקסט קליфікаציה. אנחנו משתמשים בטכניקות רבות לפני העבודה לפני שאימון את השפה ואת מודל ההקלטה. אנחנו נוספים ניתוח של המודל. הצוות שלנו דיווח עשר מתוך 34 משתתפים, השיג נקודת F1 של 0.7011.', 'sk': 'V tem prispevku predstavljamo naš pristop k obravnavi rudarjenja predlogov iz spletnih pregledov in forumov podnaloga A. Glede na pregled nas prosimo, da napovedamo, ali pregled vsebuje predlog ali ne. Naš model temelji na univerzalnem jezikovnem modelu finega nastavitve za klasifikacijo besedila. Pred usposabljanjem jezika in klasifikacijskega modela uporabljamo različne tehnike predobdelave. Dodatno zagotavljamo analizo modela. Naša ekipa se je uvrstila na 10. mesto od 34 udeležencev in dosegla rezultat F1 0,7011.', 'ha': "A cikin wannan takardan da Muke gabatar da hanyarmu dõmin mu yi makaranti da Makarin da Muke iya haɗi Summari daga Mafyuta da Forums Sub-Tafiyar da A. Aka sami kure, za'a tambaye mu gane musamman ko ba za'a ƙunsa da wata shawarar. @ item Text character set Tuna amfani da wasu masu shiryi masu gaba ga-aikin da aka yi amfani da harshe da misãlai mai fassarawa. Munã ƙara ƙari da anayyar misalin. Teachenmu na sami 10 daga 34 mãsu haɗuwa, kuma ya sami F1 score 0.7011.", 'jv': 'Nang paper iki kita nggawe dadi aturan mruput kanggo nggawe Suggestion Ming ning online Resolusi lan Forward Sub-task A .bisa ngecat perusahaan, awak dhéwé gejane perusahaan winih sing isih bakal terus. model kita digawe ning Universal Language model Fine-tuning kanggo teks Kelikasi Awak dhéwé ngerasakno teknik karo akeh-perusahaan seneng nggawe gerakan luwih lan model Kelasek. Awak dhéwé nggawe akeh dadi bisa ngewehke model. Awak dhéwé sing wis nambah 10 sampek 34 sampek, iso nggawe F1 sing paling 0.0011', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ལྟ་ཞིབ་དང་Forums Sub-Task A རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མིན་གྱི་བསམ་འཆར་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ང་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོ ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་ཆ་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་མ་དཔེ་གཏོང་གི་ནང་དུ་གཞི་རྟེན་འདུག ང་ཚོས་སྐད ང་ཚོས་མ་དབྱིབས་དཔེ་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་ཇེ་མང་ཙམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མཁའ་དབུགས་འདི་ཞུགས་མཁན་ལས་བཅུ་ཐམ་པ་ལས་གནད་དོན་འགྲོ་བཞིན་ཡོད། F1 དེ་གྲངས་ཀ་གཅིག་ལས་མཐུན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'NTUA-ISLab at SemEval-2019 Task 9 : Mining Suggestions in the wild', 'ar': 'NTUA-ISLab في SemEval-2019 المهمة 9: اقتراحات التعدين في البرية', 'es': 'NTUA-ISLAB en la Tarea 9 de Semeval-2019: Sugerencias mineras en la naturaleza', 'pt': 'NTUA-ISLab no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 9: Sugestões de mineração na natureza', 'fr': 'NTUA-ISlab au SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 9\xa0: Suggestions minières dans la nature', 'ja': 'NTUA - ISLab at SemEval -2019 Task 9: Mining Suggestions in the wild', 'hi': 'NTUA-ISLab SemEval-2019 कार्य 9 पर: जंगली में खनन सुझाव', 'ru': 'NTUA-ISLab на SemEval-2019 Задача 9: Предложения по майнингу в дикой природе', 'zh': 'NTUA-ISLabĺś¨SemEval-2019ĺŠˇ9:é‡Žé‡‡çźżč®®', 'ga': 'NTUA-ISlab ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 9: Moltaí Mianadóireachta san fhiántas', 'ka': 'NTUA', 'hu': 'NTUA-ISLab a SemEval-2019 9. feladat: Bányászati javaslatok a vadonban', 'el': 'Εργασία 9: Προτάσεις εξόρυξης στην άγρια φύση', 'it': 'NTUA-ISLab al SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggerimenti minerari in natura', 'kk': 'NTUA-ISLab at semiEval-2019 Task 9: Mining suggestions in the wild', 'lt': 'NTUA-ISLab SemEval-2019 9 užduotis: kasybos pasiūlymai laukiniame sektoriuje', 'mk': 'NTUA-ISLab на SemEval-2019 задача 9: Предлози за минирање во дивината', 'ms': 'NTUA-ISLab di SemEval-2019 Tugas 9: Suġġestions Mining in the wild', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 9- ലെ എന്റുയാ- ഐസ്ലാബ്: കാട്ടിലെ പരിപാടികള്\u200d മിനിങ്ങിംഗ് ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'mn': 'NTUA-ISLab at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Mining Suggestions in the wild', 'mt': 'NTUA-ISLab f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 9: Suġġerimenti għall-minjieri fl-ambjent selvaġġ', 'pl': 'NTUA-ISLab w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 9: Sugestie górnicze na wolności', 'sr': 'NTUA-ISLab na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 9: prijedloge rudarstva u divljini', 'ro': 'NTUA-ISLab la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 9: Sugestii miniere în sălbăticie', 'no': 'NTUA-ISLab at semiEval-2019 oppgåve 9: Miningsforslag i det wilde', 'si': 'NTUA-ISLab at Half-2019 Job 9: mining Suggestions in the wild', 'sv': 'NTUA-ISLab på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 9: Förslag till gruvdrift i det vilda', 'so': 'NTUA-ISLab at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Mining Suggestions in the wild', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 9: காட்டில் குறைந்த பரிந்துரைகள்', 'ur': 'NTUA-ISLab at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Mining Suggestions in the wild', 'uz': 'Vazifa 9: Mining recommendations in the wild', 'vi': '*NTUA-ISLab at SemEvl-209 Task*9: Các đề nghị khai thác trong hoang dã', 'bg': 'НТУА-ИСЛаб в СемЕвал-2019 Задача 9: Минни предложения в дивата природа', 'nl': 'NTUA-ISLab bij SemEval-2019 Taak 9: Mijnbouwsuggesties in het wild', 'hr': 'NTUA-ISLab na pola Evala-2019. zadatak 9: prijedloge za rudarstvo u divljini', 'da': 'NTUA-ISLab på SemEval-2019 Opgave 9: Forslag til minedrift i naturen', 'de': 'NTUA-ISLab bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 9: Bergbauvorschläge in freier Wildbahn', 'id': 'NTUA-ISLab at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Mining Suggestions in the wild', 'ko': 'NTUA ISLab이SemEval-19 퀘스트 9: 야외 채광 제안', 'fa': 'NTUA-ISLab at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Mining suggestions in the wild', 'sw': 'NTUA-ISLab katika SemEval-2019 Task 9: Kumbulia Mapendekezo katika jangwa', 'sq': 'NTUA-ISLab në SemEval-2019 Task 9: Mining Suggestions in the wild', 'tr': 'NTUA-ISLab at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Mining Suggestions in the wild', 'af': 'NTUA-ISLab by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 9: Mining voorstellings in die wilde', 'am': 'ስራ 9: Mining recommendations in the wilderness', 'bn': 'সেমভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৯-এ এনটুয়া- আইএসলাব: জঙ্গলের প্রস্তাব মিনিং করছে', 'az': 'NTUA-ISLab at semiEval-2019 Task 9: Mining suggestions in the wild', 'hy': 'ՆԹԱ-ԻՍԼաբ, 2019 թվականի "Սեմեվալ"-ի 9. հանքային առաջարկներ վայրի մեջ', 'bs': 'NTUA-ISLab na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 9: prijedloge rudarstva u divljini', 'ca': 'NTUA-ISLab a SemEval-2019 Task 9: Mining Suggestions in the wild', 'cs': 'NTUA-ISLab na SemEval-2019 Úkol 9: Těžební návrhy v přírodě', 'et': 'NTUA-ISLab SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 9: Kaevandamise soovitused looduses', 'fi': 'NTUA-ISLab SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 9: Kaivosehdotukset luonnossa', 'jv': 'RT-IsLab nang seminval-2011 task 9: Minng Suggestions in the Wild', 'he': 'NTUA-ISLab ב SemEval-2019 Task 9: Mining Suggestions in the wild', 'sk': 'NTUA-ISLab na SemEval-2019 Naloga 9: Rudarski predlogi v naravi', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'NTUA-ISLab at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Mining Suggestions in the wild'}
{'en': 'As online customer forums and product comparison sites increase their societal influence, users are actively expressing their opinions and posting their recommendations on their fellow customers online. However, systems capable of recognizing suggestions still lack in stability. Suggestion Mining, a novel and challenging field of Natural Language Processing, is increasingly gaining attention, aiming to track user advice on online forums. In this paper, a carefully designed methodology to identify customer-to-company and customer-to-customer suggestions is presented. The methodology implements a rule-based classifier using heuristic, lexical and syntactic patterns. The approach ranked at 5th and 1st position, achieving an f1-score of 0.749 and 0.858 for SemEval-2019 / Suggestion Mining sub-tasks A and B, respectively. In addition, we were able to improve performance results by combining the rule-based classifier with a recurrent convolutional neural network, that exhibits an f1-score of 0.79 for subtask A.', 'ar': 'نظرًا لأن منتديات العملاء عبر الإنترنت ومواقع مقارنة المنتجات تزيد من تأثيرهم المجتمعي ، فإن المستخدمين يعبرون بنشاط عن آرائهم وينشرون توصياتهم على زملائهم العملاء عبر الإنترنت. ومع ذلك ، فإن الأنظمة القادرة على التعرف على الاقتراحات لا تزال تفتقر إلى الاستقرار. اقتراح التعدين ، وهو مجال جديد ومليء بالتحديات في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية ، يكتسب اهتمامًا متزايدًا ، ويهدف إلى تتبع نصائح المستخدم في المنتديات عبر الإنترنت. في هذه الورقة ، يتم تقديم منهجية مصممة بعناية لتحديد الاقتراحات من عميل إلى شركة ومن عميل إلى عميل. تطبق المنهجية مصنفًا قائمًا على القواعد باستخدام الأنماط الاستدلالية والمعجمية والنحوية. تم تصنيف النهج في المركزين الخامس والأول ، محققًا درجة f1 من 0.749 و 0.858 للمهام الفرعية A و B على التوالي في SemEval-2019 / Suggestion Mining. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، تمكنا من تحسين نتائج الأداء من خلال الجمع بين المصنف المستند إلى القواعد والشبكة العصبية التلافيفية المتكررة ، والتي تعرض درجة f1 تبلغ 0.79 للمهمة الفرعية A.', 'fr': "Alors que les forums clients en ligne et les sites de comparaison de produits augmentent leur influence sociétale, les utilisateurs expriment activement leurs opinions et publient leurs recommandations sur leurs autres clients en ligne. Toutefois, les systèmes capables de reconnaître les suggestions manquent toujours de stabilité. Suggestion Mining, un domaine novateur et stimulant du traitement du langage naturel, attire de plus en plus l'attention, dans le but de suivre les conseils des utilisateurs sur les forums en ligne. Dans cet article, une méthodologie soigneusement conçue pour identifier les suggestions client à entreprise et client à client est présentée. La méthodologie met en œuvre un classificateur basé sur des règles utilisant des modèles heuristiques, lexicaux et syntaxiques. L'approche s'est classée aux 5e et 1re positions, obtenant un score f1 de 0,749 et 0,858 pour les sous-tâches A et B de SemEval-2019/Suggestion Mining, respectivement. De plus, nous avons pu améliorer les résultats de performance en combinant le classificateur basé sur des règles avec un réseau neuronal convolutif récurrent, qui présente un score f1 de 0,79 pour la sous-tâche A.", 'pt': 'À medida que os fóruns de clientes on-line e os sites de comparação de produtos aumentam sua influência social, os usuários expressam ativamente suas opiniões e publicam suas recomendações sobre seus colegas clientes on-line. No entanto, os sistemas capazes de reconhecer sugestões ainda carecem de estabilidade. Mineração de Sugestões, um campo novo e desafiador de Processamento de Linguagem Natural, está ganhando cada vez mais atenção, com o objetivo de rastrear conselhos de usuários em fóruns online. Neste artigo, é apresentada uma metodologia cuidadosamente projetada para identificar sugestões de cliente para empresa e cliente para cliente. A metodologia implementa um classificador baseado em regras usando padrões heurísticos, lexicais e sintáticos. A abordagem ficou na 5ª e 1ª posição, alcançando um f1-score de 0,749 e 0,858 para as subtarefas A e B da SemEval-2019/Sugestão de Mineração, respectivamente. Além disso, conseguimos melhorar os resultados de desempenho combinando o classificador baseado em regras com uma rede neural convolucional recorrente, que exibe uma pontuação f1 de 0,79 para a subtarefa A.', 'es': 'A medida que los foros de clientes en línea y los sitios de comparación de productos aumentan su influencia en la sociedad, los usuarios expresan activamente sus opiniones y publican sus recomendaciones sobre sus clientes en línea. Sin embargo, los sistemas capaces de reconocer sugerencias aún carecen de estabilidad. La minería de sugerencias, un campo novedoso y desafiante del procesamiento del lenguaje natural, está ganando cada vez más atención con el objetivo de rastrear los consejos de los usuarios en los foros en línea En este documento, se presenta una metodología cuidadosamente diseñada para identificar sugerencias de cliente a empresa y de cliente a cliente. La metodología implementa un clasificador basado en reglas que utiliza patrones heurísticos, léxicos y sintácticos. El enfoque se ubicó en la quinta y primera posición, logrando una puntuación de F1 de 0.749 y 0.858 para las subtareas A y B de Semeval-2019/Suggestion Mining, respectivamente. Además, pudimos mejorar los resultados de rendimiento al combinar el clasificador basado en reglas con una red neuronal convolucional recurrente, que presenta una puntuación de F1 de 0,79 para la subtarea A.', 'ja': 'オンラインカスタマーフォーラムや製品比較サイトが社会的影響力を高めるにつれて、ユーザーは積極的に意見を述べ、オンラインの他の顧客におすすめを投稿しています。 しかし、提案を認識できるシステムは依然として安定性に欠ける。 自然言語処理の新規かつ挑戦的な分野であるSuggestion Miningは、オンラインフォーラムでのユーザーアドバイスの追跡を目指してますます注目されています。 本稿では、顧客間および顧客間の提案を特定するために慎重に設計された方法論を提示する。 この方法論は、ヒューリスティック、辞書、および構文パターンを使用して、ルールベースの分類子を実装します。 このアプローチは5位と1位であり、SemEval -2019/Suggestion MiningサブタスクAとBでそれぞれ0.749と0.858のf 1スコアを達成しました。 さらに、ルールベースの分類子を再帰的な畳み込みニューラルネットワークと組み合わせることにより、サブタスクAについて0.79のf 1スコアを示すことにより、パフォーマンス結果を改善することができた。', 'zh': '随在线客户论坛与产品较网站增其世影响力,用户方极言其说,而发其在线客户。 然识议之统犹乏稳定性。 议掘者,自然语言处一新挑战性之域,方日见关注,指在踪迹在线论坛上用户议。 于本文,建精心设计之法,以别客户之议。 其法用启发式、词法、句法式成其器。 其法在第5位及第1位,SemEval-2019/建议挖掘子任A与B各得0.7490.858之f1得分。 是故器合循环卷积神经网络,能成其性,卷积神经网络子任务Af1分为0.79。', 'hi': 'चूंकि ऑनलाइन ग्राहक मंचों और उत्पाद तुलना साइटों ने अपने सामाजिक प्रभाव को बढ़ाया है, इसलिए उपयोगकर्ता सक्रिय रूप से अपनी राय व्यक्त कर रहे हैं और अपने साथी ग्राहकों पर अपनी सिफारिशों को ऑनलाइन पोस्ट कर रहे हैं। हालांकि, सुझावों को पहचानने में सक्षम प्रणालियों में अभी भी स्थिरता की कमी है। सुझाव खनन, प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण का एक उपन्यास और चुनौतीपूर्ण क्षेत्र, तेजी से ध्यान आकर्षित कर रहा है, ऑनलाइन मंचों पर उपयोगकर्ता की सलाह को ट्रैक करने का लक्ष्य रखता है। इस पेपर में, ग्राहक-से-कंपनी और ग्राहक-से-ग्राहक सुझावों की पहचान करने के लिए एक सावधानीपूर्वक डिज़ाइन की गई पद्धति प्रस्तुत की गई है। पद्धति हेरिस्टिक, लेक्सिकल और वाक्यात्मक पैटर्न का उपयोग करके एक नियम-आधारित क्लासिफायर को लागू करती है। दृष्टिकोण 5 वें और पहले स्थान पर है, जो क्रमशः SemEval-2019 / सुझाव खनन उप-कार्यों A और B के लिए 0.749 और 0.858 का f1-स्कोर प्राप्त करता है। इसके अलावा, हम एक आवर्तक convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ नियम-आधारित क्लासिफायर के संयोजन से प्रदर्शन परिणामों में सुधार करने में सक्षम थे, जो सबटास्क ए के लिए 0.79 का एफ 1-स्कोर प्रदर्शित करता है।', 'ru': 'По мере того, как онлайн-форумы клиентов и сайты сравнения продуктов усиливают свое общественное влияние, пользователи активно выражают свое мнение и размещают свои рекомендации на своих коллег-клиентов в Интернете. Однако системам, способным распознавать предложения, по-прежнему не хватает стабильности. Suggestion Mining, новая и сложная область обработки естественного языка, все больше привлекает внимание, стремясь отслеживать советы пользователей на онлайн-форумах. В настоящем документе представлена тщательно разработанная методология для выявления предложений от клиента к компании и от клиента к клиенту. Методика реализует основанный на правилах классификатор с использованием эвристических, лексических и синтаксических паттернов. Подход занял 5-е и 1-е места, достигнув показателя f1 0,749 и 0,858 для подзадач SemEval-2019/Suggestion Mining A и B, соответственно. Кроме того, мы смогли улучшить результаты производительности, объединив основанный на правилах классификатор с рекуррентной сверточной нейронной сетью, которая демонстрирует f1-балл 0,79 для подзадачи A.', 'ga': 'De réir mar a mhéadaíonn fóraim chustaiméirí ar líne agus suíomhanna comparáide táirgí a dtionchar sochaíoch, tá úsáideoirí ag cur a gcuid tuairimí in iúl go gníomhach agus ag postáil a gcuid moltaí ar a gcomhchustaiméirí ar líne. Mar sin féin, tá easpa cobhsaíochta fós ag córais atá in ann moltaí a aithint. Tá níos mó airde á tarraingt ar Mhianadóireacht Molta, réimse nua agus dúshlánach de Phróiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha, agus é mar aidhm aige comhairle úsáideoirí a rianú ar fhóraim ar líne. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirtear i láthair modheolaíocht atá deartha go cúramach chun moltaí ó chustaiméirí go cuideachta agus ó chustaiméir go custaiméir a shainaithint. Cuireann an mhodheolaíocht aicmitheoir riail-bhunaithe i bhfeidhm ag úsáid patrúin heorastúla, léacsacha agus chomhréire. Rangaíodh an cur chuige ag an 5ú agus an 1ú háit, ag baint amach scór f1 de 0.749 agus 0.858 d’fho-thascanna Mianadóireachta SemEval-2019/Moltaí A agus B, faoi seach. Ina theannta sin, bhíomar in ann torthaí feidhmíochta a fheabhsú tríd an aicmitheoir riail-bhunaithe a chomhcheangal le líonra néarach comhthráthach athfhillteach, a thaispeánann scór f1 de 0.79 d’fhothasc A.', 'ka': 'როგორც ინტერნეტური კლიენტების ტორმები და პროდისტურის შემდგომარების საზოგადოება საზოგადოებო გექნება, მომხმარებელი აქტიგურად განახსენებენ მისი მხოლობა და მაგრამ, სისტემები, რომელიც შეუძლებელია მოცნობა საზოგადოებების შესაძლებლობა, სტაბლიტურობაში არსებობს. ოპვეოჲლადანთვ ჱა მთნსგაŒვ, პჲმვნრ თ ოპჲუვჟსგაŒვ ნა ოპჲუვჟსგაŒვ ნა ოპჲუვჟსგაŒვ ნა ოპჲუვჟსგაŒვ ნა ოპჲუვჟსგაŒვ ნა ოპჲუვჟსგაŒვ ნა ოპჲუვჟსგაŒვ ნა თჱ ამ დოკუმენტში მხოლოდ განაზღვრებული მეტოლოგია კომპანიაზე და კომპანიაზე კომპანიაზე და კომპანიაზე კომპანიაზე გამოყენება. მეტოდოლოგია კლასიფიკაცია, რომელიც გამოიყენება ჰერისტიული, ლექსიკალური და სინტაქტიური შაბლონების გამოყენება. 5. და 1. პოზიციაში პროგრამი, რომელიც 0.749 და 0.858-ის f1-სოზიციაში დაიწყება SemEval-2019/საზოგადომის გადაწყება A და B-სოზიციაში. დამატებით, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია გავაკეთოთ გავაკეთება შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობით კლასიფიკაციის შესაძლებლობით, რომელიც A-სკენ კ', 'el': 'Καθώς τα διαδικτυακά φόρουμ πελατών και οι ιστοσελίδες σύγκρισης προϊόντων αυξάνουν την κοινωνική τους επιρροή, οι χρήστες εκφράζουν ενεργά τις απόψεις τους και δημοσιεύουν τις συστάσεις τους στους συναδέλφους τους πελάτες στο διαδίκτυο. Ωστόσο, τα συστήματα ικανά να αναγνωρίσουν προτάσεις εξακολουθούν να στερούνται σταθερότητας. Η εξόρυξη προτάσεων, ένα νέο και προκλητικό πεδίο επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας, κερδίζει όλο και περισσότερο την προσοχή, στοχεύοντας στην παρακολούθηση των συμβουλών των χρηστών σε διαδικτυακά φόρουμ. Στην παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζεται μια προσεκτικά σχεδιασμένη μεθοδολογία για τον προσδιορισμό προτάσεων πελάτη-προς-εταιρεία και πελάτη-προς-πελάτη. Η μεθοδολογία εφαρμόζει έναν ταξινομητή βασισμένο σε κανόνες χρησιμοποιώντας heuristικά, λεξικά και συντακτικά πρότυπα. Η προσέγγιση κατατάχθηκε στην 5η και 1η θέση, επιτυγχάνοντας βαθμολογία f1 0.749 και 0.858 για τις υποεργασίες Α και Β αντίστοιχα. Επιπλέον, καταφέραμε να βελτιώσουμε τα αποτελέσματα απόδοσης συνδυάζοντας τον ταξινομητή βασισμένο σε κανόνες με ένα επαναλαμβανόμενο νευρωνικό δίκτυο, το οποίο παρουσιάζει βαθμολογία f1 0.79 για την υποταγή Α.', 'hu': 'Mivel az online ügyfélfórumok és a termék-összehasonlító oldalak növelik társadalmi befolyásukat, a felhasználók aktívan fejezik ki véleményüket és ajánlásaikat online teszik közzé ügyfeleiknek. A javaslatok felismerésére képes rendszerek azonban még mindig hiányoznak a stabilitásban. A javaslatbányászat, a természetes nyelvfeldolgozás új és kihívást jelentő területe egyre inkább felhívja a figyelmet, azzal a céllal, hogy nyomon kövesse a felhasználói tanácsokat online fórumokon. Ebben a tanulmányban gondosan megtervezett módszertant mutatunk be az ügyfél-vállalat és az ügyfél-vevő javaslatok azonosítására. A módszertan heurisztikus, lexikai és szintaktikus mintákat használó szabályalapú osztályozót alkalmaz. A megközelítés 5. és 1. helyen állt, f1 pontszámot ért el 0,749, illetve 0,858 a SemEval-2019/Suggestion Mining A, illetve B alcsoportok esetében. Ezenkívül a szabályalapú osztályozót egy visszatérő konvolúciós neurális hálózattal ötvözve tudtuk javítani a teljesítmény eredményeit, amely f1 pontszámot mutat az A részfeladat esetében.', 'it': "Poiché i forum online dei clienti e i siti di confronto dei prodotti aumentano la loro influenza sociale, gli utenti esprimono attivamente le loro opinioni e pubblicano le loro raccomandazioni sui loro colleghi clienti online. Tuttavia, i sistemi capaci di riconoscere i suggerimenti mancano ancora di stabilità. Suggestion Mining, un nuovo e impegnativo campo dell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale, sta guadagnando sempre più attenzione, con l'obiettivo di tracciare i consigli degli utenti sui forum online. In questo articolo viene presentata una metodologia attentamente progettata per identificare i suggerimenti da cliente a azienda e da cliente a cliente. La metodologia implementa un classificatore basato su regole utilizzando modelli euristici, lessicali e sintattici. L'approccio si è classificato in 5a e 1a posizione, ottenendo un punteggio f1 di 0,749 e 0,858 per SemEval-2019/Suggestion Mining sotto-task A e B, rispettivamente. Inoltre, siamo stati in grado di migliorare i risultati delle prestazioni combinando il classificatore basato su regole con una rete neurale convoluzionale ricorrente, che mostra un punteggio f1 di 0,79 per la sottomissione A.", 'lt': 'Kadangi internetiniai vartotojų forumai ir produktų palyginimo svetainės didina jų įtaką visuomenei, vartotojai aktyviai išreiškia savo nuomonę ir savo rekomendacijas savo kolegoms vartotojams skelbia internete. Tačiau sistemoms, galinčioms pripažinti pasiūlymus, vis dar trūksta stabilumo. Pasiūlymai dėl kasybos, naujoviška ir sunki gamtos kalbų apdorojimo sritis, vis labiau didėja dėmesio, siekiant stebėti vartotojų konsultacijas internetiniuose forumuose. Šiame dokumente pateikiama atidžiai suprojektuota metodika, skirta nustatyti klientų tarpusavio ir klientų tarpusavio pasiūlymus. Metodika įgyvendina taisyklių pagrindu grindžiamą klasifikatorių, naudojantį heuristinius, leksinius ir sintaksinius modelius. Metodas buvo priskirtas 5-ajai ir 1-ajai pozicijai, o pagal „SemEval-2019“ ir „Suggestion Mining“ A ir B papunkčiuose nustatytas f1 balas buvo atitinkamai 0,749 ir 0,858. Be to, sugebėjome pagerinti veiklos rezultatus derindami taisyklių pagrindu grindžiamą klasifikatorių su pasikartojančiu konvoliuciniu nervų tinklu, kuris rodo f1 tašką 0,79 A paklausos atveju.', 'mk': 'Како што онлајн клиентските форуми и страниците за споредба на производите го зголемуваат нивното општествено влијание, корисниците активно ги изразуваат своите мислења и ги објавуваат своите препораки за своите колеги клиенти онлајн. Сепак, системите способни да ги признаат предлозите сé уште недостасуваат стабилност. Suggestion Mining, a novel and challenging field of Natural Language Processing, is increasingly gaining attention, aiming to track user advice on online forums.  Во овој весник се претставува внимателно дизајнирана методологија за идентификување на предлозите од клиент до компанија и клиент до клиент. Метологијата имплементира класификатор базиран на правила користејќи хеористички, лексички и синтактички шеми. Пристапот се рангираше на петтата и првата позиција, достигнувајќи оценка f1 од 0,749 и 0,858 за подзадачите SemEval-2019/Suggestion Mining A и B, односно. Покрај тоа, успеавме да ги подобриме резултатите на резултатите со комбинацијата на класификаторот базиран на правилата со рецидентна конволуционална нервна мрежа, која покажува ф1-оценка од 0,79 за подпрашањето А.', 'kk': 'Интернеттегі клиенттер форумы мен продукттарды салыстыру сайттары қоғамдық әсерін көтеріп, пайдаланушылар өзінің ойларын белсенді көрсетеді және онлайн клиенттеріне рекомендацияларын жібереді. Бірақ жүйелер таңдауға мүмкіндік беруге мүмкіндік береді. Табиғи тіл процессорының романы және шақыру өрісі, онлайн форумдарында пайдаланушылардың мақсаттарын қадағалау үшін болып тұрады. Бұл қағазда клиенттің компаниясын және клиенттің бағдарламаларды анықтау үшін тәжірибелі құрылған методология көрсетіледі. Методология шеуристикалық, лексикалық және синтактикалық үлгілерді қолдану үшін ережелерді негіздеген классификаторын істейді. 5- мен 1- нің орнындағы тәсілдік: 0, 749 және 0, 858-нің f1- нұсқасы жалғастырып, 30- 2019- нұсқасы үшін A және B ішкі тапсырмаларды бағалау үшін. Қосымша, біз ережелер негіздеген классификациясын қайталанатын невралдық желімен біріктіруге болдық. Бұл A асты сұрау үшін f1- нәтижесін 0,79 деп көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Sebagai forum pelanggan online dan laman perbandingan produk meningkatkan pengaruh masyarakat mereka, pengguna secara aktif mengekspresikan pendapat mereka dan memposting cadangan mereka pada rakan pelanggan mereka secara online. Namun, sistem yang mampu mengenali cadangan masih kurang stabil. Menyembah cadangan, bidang baru dan menantang Pemprosesan Bahasa Alami, semakin menambah perhatian, bertujuan untuk mengesan nasihat pengguna pada forum online. Dalam kertas ini, metodologi yang direka dengan berhati-hati untuk mengenalpasti cadangan pelanggan-kepada-syarikat dan pelanggan-kepada-pelanggan dipaparkan. Metodologi melaksanakan pengklasifikasi berdasarkan peraturan menggunakan corak heuristik, leksik dan sintaktik. pendekatan dipilih pada kedudukan ke-5 dan ke-1, mencapai skor-f1 0.749 dan 0.858 untuk SemEval-2019/Suggestion Mining sub-tugas A dan B, berdasarkan. Selain itu, kami mampu memperbaiki keputusan prestasi dengan menggabungkan klasifikasi berdasarkan peraturan dengan rangkaian saraf konvolusi yang berulang, yang menunjukkan skor f1 0.79 untuk subtask A.', 'ml': 'ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d കസ്റ്റമറിന്റെ ഫോര്\u200dമുകളും ഉത്തരവാദിത്വ സൈറ്റുകളും അവരുടെ സാമൂഹ്യത്തിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200d  എങ്കിലും സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200dക്ക് സ്ഥിരതയില്ലാത്തതിന്റെ ആശയങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്നു. സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയയുടെ പ്രക്രിയയുടെ നോവലും വിലാലിക്കുന്ന ഭാഗത്തിന്റെ പരിപാടി കൂടുതല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ വര്\u200dദ്ധിക്കുന്നു ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, കസ്റ്ററില്\u200d നിന്നും കമ്പനിയില്\u200d നിന്നും കസ്റ്ററില്\u200d നിന്നും കസ്റ്ററിലേക്ക് നിരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രദ് ഹൂരിസ്റ്റിക്ക്, ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d സിന്റാക്റ്റിക്കും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന നിയമത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു ക്ലാസ്ഫി അഞ്ചാമത്തേതും ആദ്യത്തേതും സ്ഥാനത്തേക്കുള്ള വഴിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെട്ടു. സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019/സെമ്മെവാല്\u200d മിനിംഗ് സബ് ജോലികള്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടി എഫ് കൂടാതെ, നിയമത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫറിനെ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് സാധ്യതയുള്ള ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d കഴിഞ്ഞു. വീണ', 'mt': 'Peress li l-forums tal-klijenti onlajn u s-siti tat-tqabbil tal-prodotti jżidu l-influwenza tas-soċjetà tagħhom, l-utenti qed jesprimu b’mod attiv l-opinjonijiet tagħhom u jippubblikaw ir-rakkomandazzjonijiet tagħhom fuq il-klijenti l-oħra tagħhom onlajn. Madankollu, is-sistemi kapaċi jirrikonoxxu s-suġġerimenti għadhom nieqsa mill-istabbiltà. Suggestion Mining, a novel and challenging field of Natural Language Processing, is increasingly gaining attention, aiming to track user advice on online forums.  F’dan id-dokument, qed tiġi ppreżentata metodoloġija mfassla bir-reqqa biex jiġu identifikati suġġerimenti minn klijent għal kumpanija u minn klijent għal klijent. Il-metodoloġija timplimenta klassifikatur ibbażat fuq ir-regoli bl-użu ta’ mudelli ġewristiċi, lexiċi u sintetiċi. L-approċċ kien ikklassifikat fil-ħames u l-ewwel pożizzjoni, u kiseb punteġġ f1 ta’ 0.749 u 0.858 għas-sottokompiti SemEval-2019/Suġġestion Mining A u B, rispettivament. Barra minn hekk, inkunu kapaċi jtejbu r-riżultati tal-prestazzjoni billi ngħaqdu l-klassifikatur ibbażat fuq ir-regoli ma’ netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali rikorrenti, li juri punteġġ f1 ta’ 0.79 għas-sottodomanda A.', 'mn': 'Интернет хэрэглэгчийн форум, бүтээгдэхүүний харьцуулах сайтууд нийгмийн нөлөөг нэмэгдүүлдэг учраас хэрэглэгчид өөрсдийн үзэл бодлоо илэрхийлж, хамтрагчдаа онлайн хэрэглэгчид дээр зөвлөмж Гэхдээ зөвлөгөө таньж чадах системүүд тогтвортой байдал байхгүй. Байгалийн хэл Процессийн шинэ зохиол болон шаардлагатай салбар нь анхаарлыг ихэвчлэн анхаарлаа хандуулж, онлайн форумууд хэрэглэгчдийн зөвлөгөөг дагах зорилготой. Энэ цаасан дээр хэрэглэгчид, хэрэглэгчид, хэрэглэгчид, хэрэглэгчид зөвхөн хэрэглэгчид зөвшөөрөх ухаантай арга загвар өгсөн. Шинжлэх ухаан нь хюрист, лексик, синтактик загварыг ашиглан дүрмийн үндсэн хэлбэрийг хийдэг. 5-р, 1-р байр суурь дээр тохиолдсон арга барилга нь 0.749, 0.858-р SemEval-2019/Сармагийн суб-даалгавар А болон B хүртэл хүртэл байна. Мөн бид дахин дахин дахин дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээгээр дүрсийн үндсэн классификаторыг нэгтгэхэд гаргаж чадна. Энэ нь A-ын доогуур F1-тоо 0.79-тоо үзүүлдэг.', 'pl': 'Ponieważ fora klientów online i witryny porównawcze produktów zwiększają wpływ społeczny, użytkownicy aktywnie wyrażają swoje opinie i publikują swoje rekomendacje na swoich kolegów online. Jednak systemom zdolnym do rozpoznawania sugestii nadal brakuje stabilności. Suggestion Mining, nowatorska i wymagająca dziedzina przetwarzania języka naturalnego, coraz bardziej zyskuje uwagę, mająca na celu śledzenie porad użytkowników na forach online. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiono starannie zaprojektowaną metodologię identyfikacji sugestii klienta-do-firmy i klienta-do-klienta. Metodologia wdraża klasyfikator oparty na regułach wykorzystujący wzorce heurystyczne, leksykalne i składniowe. Podejście znalazło się na piątej i pierwszej pozycji, osiągając odpowiednio wynik f1 0.749 i 0.858 dla podzadań SemEval-2019/Suggestion Mining A i B. Ponadto udało nam się poprawić wyniki wydajności poprzez połączenie klasyfikatora opartego na regułach z powtarzającą się konwolucyjną siecią neuronową, która wykazuje wynik f1 0,79 dla podzadania A.', 'no': 'Etter at internetklientforummer og sammenlikningstader aukar sosiale påvirkningar sine, brukarar uttrykker sine meningar aktivt og sender anbefalingane sine på sine felle klientene på nettet. Systemar som kan gjenkjenne forslag er imidlertid manglar i stabilitet. Førehandsvising av mining, eit roman og vanskeleg felt av naturspråk-prosessering, blir større oppmerksomhet, og måtar å spora brukarårleg på nettforum. I denne papiret vert det oppgjeve ein forsiktig fastleggte metodologi for å identifisera klientar-til-selskap og klientar-til-klientar-forslag. Metodologien implementerer ein regelbasert klassifisering med heuristisk, leksisk og syntaktisk mønster. Tilnærminga rangerte på 5. og 1. posisjon, og f1- poeng av 0,749 og 0,858 for semiEval-2019/Foreslådd å minne underoppgåver A og B. I tillegg var vi i stand til å forbetra resultatet av utviklinga ved å kombinerera regelbasert klassifisering med eit rekursive konvolusjonell neuralnettverk, som viser ein f1- poeng med 0,79 for subtspøring A.', 'ro': 'Pe măsură ce forumurile online ale clienților și site-urile de comparare a produselor își sporesc influența societală, utilizatorii își exprimă activ opiniile și își publică recomandările online colegilor lor clienți. Cu toate acestea, sistemele capabile să recunoască sugestiile încă nu au stabilitate. Sugestie Mining, un domeniu nou și provocator al procesării limbajului natural, câștigă din ce în ce mai mult atenție, având ca scop urmărirea sfaturilor utilizatorilor pe forumurile online. În această lucrare, este prezentată o metodologie atent concepută pentru identificarea sugestiilor client-la-companie și client-la-client. Metodologia implementează un clasificator bazat pe reguli folosind modele euristice, lexicale și sintactice. Abordarea s-a clasat pe poziția 5 și 1, obținând un scor f1 de 0.749 și 0.858 pentru subsarcinile SemEval-2019/Sugestion Mining A și, respectiv, B. În plus, am reușit să îmbunătățim rezultatele performanței combinând clasificatorul bazat pe reguli cu o rețea neurală convoluțională recurentă, care prezintă un scor f1 de 0,79 pentru subsarcina A.', 'sr': 'Pošto internetski forumi klijenata i sajtovi usporedbe proizvoda povećavaju njihov socijalni utjecaj, korisnici aktivno izražavaju svoje mišljenje i postavljaju svoje preporuke o svojim kolegim klijentima na internetu. Međutim, sistemi koji su sposobni da priznaju prijedloge još uvek nedostaju u stabilnosti. Predloženje rudarstva, roman i izazovni polje procesa prirodnog jezika, sve više privlači pažnju, u cilju praćenja savjeta korisnika na internetskim forumima. U ovom papiru se predstavlja pažljiva dizajnirana metodika za identifikaciju predloga klijenta-kompanije i klijenta-na-klijenta. Metodologija implementira klasifikatora na pravilima koristeći heurističke, leksičke i sintaktičke obrasce. Pristup je raspoređen na 5. i 1. poziciji, ostvario je f1-rezultat od 0,749 i 0,858 za pola-2019/Predloženje rudarskih podzadataka A i B. Osim toga, uspeli smo da poboljšamo rezultate provedbe kombiniranjem klasifikatora na pravilima sa rekonstrucionom konvolucionalnom neuralnom mrežom, koja pokazuje f1-rezultat od 0,79 za podpitanje A.', 'si': 'අන්ලයින් ග්\u200dරාහකයෝ ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති සහ ප්\u200dරවෘත්ති සමාජ ප්\u200dරභාවක් විශාලනය කරනවා වගේම, ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ ඔවුන්ගේ අදහස් ප්\u200d නමුත්, පද්ධතිය අඳුරගන්න පුළුවන් පද්ධතිය තවමත් ස්ථිරතාවට අවශ්\u200dයයි. ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනු මේ පත්තරයේ, සාධාරණික විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dතියක් සැකසුම් විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dතියක් සංවිධානකයෙන් සහ ග්\u200dරවාහකයෙ මාධ්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාවය නීති අධ්\u200dයාත්මක විශේෂකයෙක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා හෙයුරිස්ටික්, ලෙක්සිකා The approach ranged at 5th and 1 location, achieval a f1-score of 0.749 and 0.858 for semeval-2019/Suggestion mining sub-Jobs A and B, with the appropriate approach. ඒ වගේම, අපිට පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර විදිහට වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් වුනා නීතිය අධාරිත විදිහට ප', 'so': 'Sida lagu sameeyo koorasyada internetka ee macaamiisha iyo alaabta is-dhigista ah, isticmaalayaashu waxqabad ah ayaa si fircoon ah u sheegaya fikirkooda islamarkaasna waxay talooyinkooda ku dirayaan shabakadda macaamiisha kale. However, systems capable of recognizing suggestions still lack in stability.  Dalbashada Mining, bannaan iyo dhibaatooyin la xiriira baaritaanka afka dabiiciga ah waxaa si korsocod ah looga jeedaa talo-bixinta isticmaalaha oo ku saabsan jaamacadaha internetka. Warqaddan waxaa lagu soo qoraa qaabab aad u taxadar ah oo loo aqoonsado macaamiisha iyo warqadaha macaamiisha loo sameeyo. Isticmaalku wuxuu sameeyaa fasaal ku saleysan sharciga oo lagu isticmaalo noocyada heuristiga, lexical iyo syntactic. Dhacdooyinku waxay ku qoran jireen meel ka mid ah 5aad iyo 1aad, waxayna gaadhi jireen f1-score 0.749 iyo 0.858 SemEval-2019/Suggestii Mining Sub-task A iyo B. Intaas waxaa dheer oo a an awoodin in aan horumarino resultiyada sameyn karno fasaliikaha sharciga ku qoran iyo shabakadda neurada ee soo socda oo soo socda ah, kaas oo muuqata kooxda F1-kooxda 0.79 ee subaxda A.', 'ta': 'இணைய கஸ்டமர் குறிப்புகள் மற்றும் பொருள் ஒப்பீடு தளங்கள் அவர்களுடைய சமூகத்திற்கு விளைவு அதிகரிக்கும் போது, பயனர்கள் செயல்படுத்தி தங்கள் இணைய க ஆனால், முறைமைகள் இன்னும் நிலைமையில் பரிந்துரைகளை அறிந்து கொள்ள முடியும். இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாட்டின் புலத்தின் பரிந்துரைப்பு, புதிய புலம் மற்றும் சவாலிக்கும் புலத்தின் பரிந்துரை இந்த காகிதத்தில், பயனர் நிறுவனத்தை கண்டுபிடிக்க ஒரு கவனமாக வடிவமைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையை கொண்டு வருகிறது. இந்த முறைமையில் ஒரு விதிமுறையான வகுப்பாளரை உபயோகிக்கும் ஹூரிஸ்டிக், லெக்சிகிள் மற்றும் ஒத்திசைவு ம 5வது மற்றும் 1வது நிலையில் நிறுவப்பட்டுள்ளது, SemEval- 2019/சிறிது துணை பணிகள் A மற்றும் B க்கு ஒரு f1- score பெற்றுவிட்டது. In addition, we were able to improve performance results by combining the rule-based classifier with a recurrent convolutional neural network, that exhibits an f1-score of 0.79 for subtask A.', 'ur': 'جیسے آنلاین مشترک فورمز اور محصولات مقایسہ سائٹ ان کی اجتماعی تاثیر اضافہ کرتی ہیں، کارساز اپنی نظریں فعال کر رہے ہیں اور اپنے ساتھی مشترک کو آنلاین پر اضافہ کر رہے ہیں. لیکن، سیستموں کی تصدیق کرنے کے قابل ہیں، یہاں تک بھی ثابت قدم نہیں ہے۔ وصیت مینینگ، نائرلی زبان پرسس کی روزنامہ اور مشکل مکان، اضافہ ہوتا ہے، آنلاین فورموں میں کارساز کی نصیحت کی تلاش کرنا چاہتا ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ایک مضطرب طراحی طراحی طراحی کی گئی ہے کہ مشتری سے کمپنی اور مشتری سے مشتری پیشنهاد پہچان سکیں۔ مٹوڈولوژی ایک قانون کی بنیادی کلاسیٹر کو ہوریستیک، لکسیکل اور سینٹکتیک پٹرنے کے مطابق استعمال کرتا ہے. 5 اور 1 موقعیت پر درجہ کی طریقہ، 0.749 اور 0.858 کی f1-score پہنچ رہی تھی، اس طریقہ کے ساتھ SemEval-2019/Suggestion Mining sub-tasks A and B کے لئے. اس کے علاوہ، ہم نے قانون کی بنیادی کلاسیر کو ایک دوبارہ کنویرول نیورال نیٹ ورک کے ساتھ ترکیب کرنے کے ذریعہ قادر کر سکتے تھے، جو A کے ذریعہ 0.79 کی f1-score کو دکھاتا ہے.', 'sv': 'I takt med att kundforum och produktjﾃ､mfﾃｶrelsewebbplatser online ﾃｶkar sitt samhﾃ､lleliga inflytande, uttrycker anvﾃ､ndarna aktivt sina ﾃ･sikter och lﾃ､gger upp sina rekommendationer pﾃ･ sina medkunder online. Systemen som kan kﾃ､nna igen fﾃｶrslag saknar dock fortfarande stabilitet. Fﾃｶrslag Mining, ett nytt och utmanande omrﾃ･de fﾃｶr Natural Language Processing, fﾃ･r allt mer uppmﾃ､rksamhet och syftar till att spﾃ･ra anvﾃ､ndarrﾃ･d pﾃ･ onlineforum. I denna uppsats presenteras en noggrant utformad metod fﾃｶr att identifiera kund-till-fﾃｶretag och kund-till-kund fﾃｶrslag. Metoden implementerar en regelbaserad klassificerare med hjﾃ､lp av heuristiska, lexikala och syntaktiska mﾃｶnster. Metoden rankades pﾃ･ 5:e och 1:a plats och uppnﾃ･dde en f1-poﾃ､ng pﾃ･ 0,749 respektive 0,858 fﾃｶr SemEval-2019/Fﾃｶrslag Mining deluppgifter A respektive B. Dessutom kunde vi fﾃｶrbﾃ､ttra prestationsresultaten genom att kombinera regelbaserade klassificerare med ett ﾃ･terkommande konvulutionellt neuralt nﾃ､tverk, som uppvisar en f1-poﾃ､ng pﾃ･ 0,79 fﾃｶr subaktivitet A.', 'uz': "Onlayn kundalik forumlari va taʼminlovchilar saytlari jamiyatli ishlatishlarini oshirishda foydalanuvchilar ularning fikrlarini aktiv ko'rsatadi va ular bilan bir xizmatlari shaxsiyatlariga qaramaydi. Lekin, tizimlarni tasavvur qilish imkoniyatlarini aniqlashga imkoniyatli mumkin. Name Ushbu qogʻozda, kundalik bilan kompaniyalarni aniqlash va kundalik bilan boshqaruvchi soʻzlari koʻrsatiladi. Name Name Ko'pchilik, biz qoidagi darajadagi darajalarni davom etish uchun davom etilgan neyrol tarmoqni birlashtirish mumkin. Bu vazifa A uchun 0.79 darajasini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Khi các diễn đàn khách hàng trực tuyến và các nơi so sánh sản phẩm tăng ảnh hưởng xã hội, người dùng đang tích cực bày tỏ ý kiến và gửi lời khuyên về các khách hàng khác trên mạng. Tuy nhiên, hệ thống có khả năng nhận ra đề nghị vẫn thiếu ổn định. Đề nghị khai thác, một lĩnh vực mới lạ và đầy thử thách của Quá trình ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, ngày càng tăng cường sự chú ý, nhằm mục đích theo dõi người dùng trên các diễn đàn online. Trong tờ giấy này, một phương pháp được thiết kế cẩn thận để xác định ý kiến của khách hàng và khách hàng. Phương pháp này thực hiện một phân loại dựa trên quy luật, sử dụng các mô- đun thần kinh, ngôn ngữ và cú pháp. Cách tiếp cận nằm ở vị trí thứ năm và thứ nhất, đạt được điểm f1 của 0.749 và 0 Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi có thể cải thiện kết quả của hiệu suất bằng cách kết hợp các phân loại nguyên tắc với một mạng thần kinh liên kết liên tục, nó hiển thị điểm f1 của 0.99 để tìm phần A.', 'bg': 'Тъй като онлайн потребителските форуми и сайтове за сравняване на продукти увеличават общественото си влияние, потребителите активно изразяват мненията си и публикуват препоръките си на своите колеги клиенти онлайн. Системите, способни да разпознават предложенията, обаче все още нямат стабилност. Минното дело, нова и предизвикателна област на обработка на естествени езици, все по-често набира внимание, целейки проследяване на потребителските съвети в онлайн форуми. В тази статия е представена внимателно разработена методология за идентифициране на предложения от клиент към фирма и клиент към клиент. Методологията внедрява базиран на правила класификатор, използващ евристични, лексикални и синтактични модели. Подходът се класира на 5-та и 1-ва позиция, като постига резултат от 0.749 и 0.858 за Подзадачи А и Б съответно. Освен това успяхме да подобрим резултатите от производителността чрез комбиниране на класификатора, базиран на правила, с рецидивираща конволюционна невронна мрежа, която показва оценка от 0,79 за подзадача А.', 'da': 'Efterhånden som online kundeforum og produktsammenligningssteder øger deres samfundsmæssige indflydelse, udtrykker brugerne aktivt deres meninger og sender deres anbefalinger til deres medkunder online. Men systemer, der er i stand til at genkende forslag, mangler stadig stabilitet. Forslag Mining, et nyt og udfordrende område inden for Natural Language Processing, vinder stadig mere opmærksomhed og sigter mod at spore brugerrådgivning på online fora. I denne artikel præsenteres en omhyggeligt designet metode til at identificere kunde-til-virksomhed og kunde-til-kunde forslag. Metoden implementerer en regelbaseret klassificering ved hjælp af heuristiske, leksikske og syntaktiske mønstre. Fremgangsmåden rangerede på 5. og 1. plads og opnåede en f1-score på henholdsvis 0,749 og 0,858 for SemEval-2019/Suggestion Mining underopgaver A og B. Derudover var vi i stand til at forbedre resultaterne ved at kombinere den regelbaserede klassificering med et tilbagevendende konvulutivt neuralt netværk, der udviser en f1-score på 0,79 for subaktivitet A.', 'nl': 'Terwijl online klantenfora en productvergelijkingssites hun maatschappelijke invloed vergroten, geven gebruikers actief hun mening uit en plaatsen hun aanbevelingen online op hun medeklanten. Systemen die suggesties kunnen herkennen, zijn echter nog steeds niet stabiel. Suggestion Mining, een nieuw en uitdagend gebied van Natural Language Processing, krijgt steeds meer aandacht, gericht op het volgen van gebruikersadviezen op online forums. In dit artikel wordt een zorgvuldig ontworpen methodologie gepresenteerd om klant-tot-bedrijf en klant-tot-klant suggesties te identificeren. De methodologie implementeert een rule-based classificator met behulp van heuristische, lexicale en syntactische patronen. De aanpak rangschikte op 5e en 1e positie en behaalde een f1-score van 0.749 en 0.858 voor respectievelijk SemEval-2019/Suggestion Mining subtaken A en B. Daarnaast konden we prestatieresultaten verbeteren door de rule-based classifier te combineren met een recurrent convolutional neural network, dat een f1-score van 0.79 vertoont voor subtaak A.', 'hr': 'Pošto internetski forumi klijenata i mjesta usporedbe proizvoda povećavaju njihov socijalni utjecaj, korisnici aktivno izražavaju svoje mišljenje i objavljuju svoje preporuke o svojim kolegim klijentima na internetu. Međutim, sustavi sposobni priznati prijedloge još uvijek nedostaju u stabilnosti. Predloženje rudarstva, roman i izazovni polje procesa prirodnog jezika, sve više privlači pažnju na cilj praćenja savjeta korisnika na internetskim forumima. U ovom papiru se predstavlja pažljiva dizajnirana metodika identifikacije predloga klijenta-kompanije i klijenta-na-klijenta. Metodologija provodi klasifikator na pravilima koristeći heurističke, leksičke i sintaktičke obrasce. Pristup je postavljen na 5. i 1. poziciji, postizajući f1 rezultat od 0,749 i 0,858 za polovinu 2019/Predloženje podzadataka rudarstva A i B. Osim toga, uspjeli smo poboljšati rezultate učinka kombiniranjem klasifikatora na pravilima s rekonstrucionalnom konvolucionalnom neuronskom mrežom, koja pokazuje f1 rezultat od 0,79 za podpitanje A.', 'de': 'Da Online-Kundenforen und Produktvergleichsseiten ihren gesellschaftlichen Einfluss erhöhen, äußern Nutzer aktiv ihre Meinung und veröffentlichen ihre Empfehlungen online bei ihren Mitkunden. Systeme, die Vorschläge erkennen können, fehlen jedoch noch an Stabilität. Suggestion Mining, ein neuartiges und herausforderndes Gebiet der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache, gewinnt zunehmend an Aufmerksamkeit und zielt darauf ab, Benutzerberatung in Online-Foren zu verfolgen. In diesem Beitrag wird eine sorgfältig entwickelte Methodik zur Identifizierung von Kunden-zu-Unternehmen- und Kunden-zu-Kunden-Vorschlägen vorgestellt. Die Methodik implementiert einen regelbasierten Klassifikator mit heuristischen, lexikalischen und syntaktischen Mustern. Der Ansatz rangierte auf dem fünften und ersten Platz und erreichte einen f1-Score von 0.749 und 0.858 für SemEval-2019/Suggestion Mining Teilaufgaben A bzw. B. Darüber hinaus konnten wir die Performance-Ergebnisse verbessern, indem wir den regelbasierten Klassifikator mit einem wiederkehrenden Faltungsneuronalen Netzwerk kombinieren, das einen f1-Score von 0.79 für Subtask A aufweist.', 'ko': '온라인 고객 포럼과 제품 비교 사이트가 사회적 영향력을 키우면서 사용자들은 그들의 의견을 적극적으로 표현하고 그들의 건의를 다른 고객의 인터넷에 발표하고 있다.그러나 건의를 식별할 수 있는 시스템은 여전히 안정성이 부족하다.제안 발굴은 자연 언어 처리의 참신하고 도전적인 분야로 온라인 포럼의 사용자 제안을 추적하는 데 목적을 두고 있다.본고는 고객이 회사와 고객이 고객에 대한 건의를 식별하기 위해 정성스럽게 설계한 방법을 제시했다.이 방법은 계발식, 어휘, 문법 모델을 사용하여 규칙을 바탕으로 하는 분류기를 실현했다.이 방법은 5위와 1위, SemEval-2019/발굴 서브퀘스트 A와 B의 f1은 각각 0.749와 0.858로 나타났다.또한 규칙을 바탕으로 하는 분류기와 귀속권적신경망을 결합시켜 우리는 성능을 개선할 수 있다. 서브퀘스트 a의 f1은 0.79로 나뉜다.', 'id': 'As online customer forums and product comparison sites increase their societal influence, users are actively expressing their opinions and posting their recommendations on their fellow customers online.  Namun, sistem yang mampu mengakui saran masih kurang stabil. Suggestion Mining, bidang baru dan menantang Proses Bahasa Alami, semakin menarik perhatian, bertujuan untuk melacak nasihat pengguna di forum online. Dalam kertas ini, metodologi yang direncanakan dengan hati-hati untuk mengidentifikasi saran klien-ke-perusahaan dan klien-ke-klien. Metodologi mengimplementasi klasifikasi berdasarkan aturan menggunakan pola heuristik, leksik dan sintaksi. pendekatan ditandai di posisi ke-5 dan 1, mencapai skor f1 0,749 dan 0,858 untuk SemEval-2019/Suggestion Mining sub-tugas A dan B, sesuai. Selain itu, kami mampu memperbaiki hasil prestasi dengan menggabungkan klasifikasi berdasarkan aturan dengan jaringan neural konvolusi yang berkurang, yang menunjukkan skor f1 0,79 untuk subtask A.', 'sw': 'Wakati jukwaa la wateja mtandaoni na tovuti za uwalinganishwaji zinaongezea ushawishi wa kijamii, watumiaji wanaelezea maoni yao na kutuma maoni yao juu ya wateja wenzao mtandaoni. Hata hivyo, mifumo inayoweza kutambua mapendekezo bado hayakuwa na utulivu. Mapendekezo ya Mining, riwaya na yenye changamoto ya mchakato wa lugha ya asili, inaongezeka kuongezeka, kwa lengo la kuwafuatilia ushauri wa watumiaji kwenye majukwaa ya mtandaoni. In this paper, a carefully designed methodology to identify customer-to-company and customer-to-customer suggestions is presented.  Utawala huu unatekeleza maafisa anayeishi sheria kwa kutumia mitindo ya heuristi, lexico na syntactic. Hatua hiyo ilipangwa na nafasi ya 5 na ya 1, ikifikia vipindi vya f1 vya 0.749 na 0.858 kwa ajili ya SemEval-2019/pendekezo la kupunguza kazi za chini za kazi A na B. Zaidi ya hayo, tuliweza kuboresha matokeo ya utendaji kwa kuunganisha wataalamu wenye msingi wa sheria na mtandao unaoendelea wa taratibu za kijamii, ambazo zinaonyesha vipimo vya f1 vya 0.79 kwa ajili ya kazi ya subira A.', 'fa': 'همانطور که برنامه\u200cهای مشتریان و سایت مقایسه\u200cی محصولات در اینترنت تأثیر اجتماعی آنها را افزایش می\u200cدهند، کاربران فعالی نظرشان را نشان می\u200cدهند و پیشنهاد خود را بر همکاران مشتریان خود در اینترنت می\u200cفرستند. ولی سیستم\u200cهای قادر به شناختن پیشنهاد هنوز در استواری کم است. پیشنهاد صنعت، یک منطقه رمانی و سخت\u200cگیری از پردازش زبان طبیعی، بیشتر توجه می\u200cگیرد، و هدف می\u200cگیرد نصیحت کاربر در فورم\u200cهای آنلاین پیدا کند. در این کاغذ، یک روش با دقت طراحی برای شناسایی پیشنهاد مشتری به شرکت و مشتری به مشتری پیشنهاد می\u200cشود. روش\u200cشناسی یک راهنمایی بر اساس قانون با استفاده از الگوهای هوریستیک، زبان\u200cشناسی و سنتاکتیک عملکرد می\u200cکند. دسترسی در موقعیت پنجم و اول درجه گرفته شده است، با رسیدن یک نقطه f1 از 0.749 و 0.858 برای نیمه\u200cای-2019/پیشنهاد زیر کار\u200cهای وزن A و B به طور مستقیم. در addition, we were able to improve performance results by combining the rule-based classifier with a recurrent convolutional neural network, which shows an f1-score of 0.79 for subtask A.', 'tr': 'Çaltyn müşteriler forumlary we önümleriň karşılaştyrylyşy meýdançalary sosyal täsirini artýarlar, ullançylar öz pikirlerini aktiw aýdýarlar we öz ahbaplarynyň internetde maslahatlaryny terjime edip otyrýarlar. Ýöne sistemalar maslahatlary tanamak ukyplary ýok. Köçürmek maslahatlary, tebigy dil işlemleriniň romanlary we çözgüli sahypalary, internetde qullanıcılaryň maslahatyny yzarlamak üçin üns berýär. Bu kagyzda müşterilere-kompaniýa we müşterilere-müşteri maslahatlary tanamak üçin ünsli tasarlanýan bir methodologiýa görkezildi. Bu metodoloji, heuristik, leksik ve sintaktik şekilleri kullanarak kural tabanlı bir klasifikatörü gerçekleştirir. approach ranked at 5th and 1st position, reaching a f1-score of 0.749 and 0.858 for SemEval-2019/Suggestion Mining sub-tasks A and B, respectively. Ayrıca, kural tabanlı klasifikatyny tekrarlanan nöral şebekesi ile birleşerek performans netijelerini geliştirebilirdik. Bu A subtask üçin f1-derece 0,79 rakam verir.', 'sq': 'Ndërsa forumet e klientëve online dhe faqet e krahasimit të produkteve rritin ndikimin e tyre shoqëror, përdoruesit po shprehin aktivisht opinionet e tyre dhe po publikojnë rekomandimet e tyre mbi kolegët e tyre klientë online. Megjithatë, sistemet e aftë për të njohur sugjerimet ende mungon në stabilitet. Suggestion Mining, a novel and challenging field of Natural Language Processing, is increasingly gaining attention, aiming to track user advice on online forums.  Në këtë letër, paraqitet një metodologi e projektuar me kujdes për të identifikuar sugjerimet klienti-ndërmarrje dhe klienti-klienti-klienti. Metodologjia zbaton një klasifikues bazuar në rregulla duke përdorur modele heuristike, lexike dhe sintaktike. Përqasja u rendit në pozitën e 5-të dhe të 1-të, duke arritur një rezultat f1 prej 0.749 dhe 0.858 respektivisht për nëndetyrat SemEval-2019/Suggestion Mining A dhe B. Përveç kësaj, ne ishim në gjendje të përmirësonim rezultatet e performancës duke kombinuar klasifikuesin bazuar në rregulla me një rrjet nervor konvolutiv të përsëritur, që ekspozon një rezultat f1 prej 0.79 për nënpyetjen A.', 'af': "Soos online kliëntsforums en produktvergelyking tuistes hul samelewing verhoog, word gebruikers aktief hul besonderhede uitdruk en hulle aanbevelings aan hul mede kliënte op internette stuur. Maar stelsels wat kan herken voorstellings nog steeds in stabiliteit ontbreek. Die voorstelling van Mining, 'n novel en pragtige veld van Natuurlike Taal Prosessering, verhoog aandag en doel om gebruikerraad op online forums te volg. In hierdie papier is 'n versigtig ontwerp metodologie om kliënt-na-maatskappy en kliënt-na-kliënt-voorstellings te identifiseer. Die metodologie implementeer 'n reëlbaseerde klassifiseerder met gebruik van heuristiese, leksiese en sintaksiese patrone. Die toegang rangeer by 5de en 1de posisie, met 'n f1-telling van 0.749 en 0.858 vir SemEval-2019/voorstelling Mining Sub-Takke A en B, respektief. In addition, we were able to improve performance results by combining the rule-based classifier with a recurrent convolutional neural network, which exhibits an f1-score of 0.79 for subtask A.", 'am': 'የኢንተርኔት ጋዜጠኞች ፎርማኖች እና የዘዋወትር ገጾች ማኅበራዊ ግንኙነት ሲጨምር፣ ተጠቃሚዎቹ የራሳቸውን አስተያየት እና በተጨማሪው ጋዜጠኞች ላይ በመስመር ይዘጋጁ፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የሥርዓት ማስታወቂያውን የሚችል ስርዓቶች ገና በጥላቻ አይጎድልም፡፡ የመዳረክ ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ እና የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ፕሮጀክት መሬት የሚጨምረው ማስታወቂያ እየጨመረ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ፣ የጋዜጠኛ-ወደ ክፍተት እና የጋዜጠኛ-ወደ-ገበዛ-መንግስታት ጉዳይ እንዲታወቅ የተዘጋጀ ሥርዓት ነው፡፡ የሥርዓት ሥርዓት፣ የሜክሲካዊ እና የስናታዊ ዓይነቶች በመጠቀም የሥርዓት ክፍተቶችን ያስተካክላል፡፡ የ 5 እና 1ኛ ደረጃውን ይደረጋል፤ የ. በተጨማሪም፣ የሥርዓቱን ክፍልፍሎች በመቀጠል የጠቅላዊ የኔural መረብ ጋር በመቀላቀል እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Քանի որ առցանց հաճախորդների ֆորմները և արտադրանքների համեմատական կայքերը աճում են իրենց հասարակական ազդեցությունը, օգտագործողները ակտիվ են արտահայտում իրենց կարծիքները և տեղադրում են իրենց խորհուրդները իրենց ընկերների հաճախորդ Այնուամենայնիվ, համակարգերը, որոնք կարող են ճանաչել առաջարկները, դեռևս կայունության պակաս են: Առաջարկումների հանքագործումը, բնական լեզվի մշակույթի նոր և դժվար ոլորտը, ավելի ու ավելի ուշադրություն է դարձնում և նպատակում է հետևել օգտագործողների խորհուրդներին առցանց ֆորմերում: Այս թղթի մեջ ներկայացված է ուշադիր ձևավորված մեթոդոլոգիա հաճախորդ առ ընկերություն և հաճախորդ առ հաճախորդ առաջարկներ բացահայտելու համար: Մեթոդոլոգիան իրականացնում է կանոններով հիմնված դասակարգիչ՝ օգտագործելով հորիստիկ, լեքսիկական և սինտակտիկ կաղապարներ: Այս մոտեցումը դասակարգված էր 5-րդ և 1-րդ դիրքում, որպեսզի հասնի 0.749 և 0.858-ի f1-գնահատականներին, համեմատաբար A-ի և B-ի «ՍեմԵվալ-2019» նախագծի համար: In addition, we were able to improve performance results by combining the rule-based classifier with a recurrent convolutional neural network, that exhibits an f1-score of 0.79 for subtask A.', 'bn': 'যখন অনলাইন ক্যাস্টমার ফোরাম এবং পণ্যের তুলনায় সাইট তাদের সামাজিক প্রভাব বৃদ্ধি করে, ব্যবহারকারীরা সক্রিয় ভাবে তাদের মতামত প্রকাশ করে এবং তাদের সহ তবে সিস্টেম স্বীকার করতে পারে যে পরামর্শ এখনো স্থিতির অভাব নেই। প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার একটি উপন্যাস এবং চ্যালেঞ্জ ক্ষেত্রে মিনিং এর প্রস্তাব বাড়ছে, যার লক্ষ্যে অনলাইন ফোরামে ব্যবহারকারীদের উপ এই পত্রিকায় ক্যাস্টমার-থেকে কোম্পানি এবং ক্যাস্টমার-থেকে কাস্টামার পরামর্শ প্রদান করা হয়েছে। এই পদ্ধতিটি হিউরিস্টিক, লেক্সিক্যাল এবং সিন্ট্যাকটিক প্যাটার্ট ব্যবহার করে একটি নিয়ম ভিত্তিক ক্লাসিফার ব এই প্রযুক্তিটি ৫ থেকে প্রথম অবস্থায় পরিচালিত হয়েছে, যার ফলে সেমইভাল-২০১৯/সাব-কাজ এ এবং বি এর জন্য একটি ফি১ স্কোর পাওয়া যায়। এছাড়াও, আমরা নিয়ম ভিত্তিক শ্রেণীবিষয়কে প্রতিযোগিতা নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে একত্রিত করে প্রদর্শনের ফলাফল উন্নত করতে সক্ষম হয়েছি, যা সাবক্ষেত্র A এর জন্য একট', 'bs': 'Pošto internetski forumi klijenata i sajtovi usporedbe proizvoda povećavaju njihov socijalni utjecaj, korisnici aktivno izražavaju svoje mišljenje i objavljuju svoje preporuke o svojim kolegim klijentima na internetu. Međutim, sistemi sposobni da priznaju prijedloge još uvijek nedostaju u stabilnosti. Prijedlog rudarstva, roman i izazovni polje procesa prirodnog jezika, sve više privlači pažnju na cilj praćenja savjeta korisnika na internetskim forumima. U ovom papiru se predstavlja pažljiva dizajnirana metodika identifikacije predloga klijenta-kompanije i klijenta-na-klijenta. Metodologija provede klasifikatora na pravilima koristeći heurističke, leksičke i sintaktičke obrasce. Pristup je postavljen na 5. i 1. poziciji, ostvarivši f1-rezultat od 0,749 i 0,858 za polovinu 2019/Predloženje podzadataka rudarstva A i B. Osim toga, uspjeli smo poboljšati rezultate učinka kombiniranjem klasifikatora na pravilima sa rekonstrucionom konvolucionalnom neuralnom mrežom, koja pokazuje f1 rezultat od 0,79 za podpitanje A.', 'az': 'İnternet müşterilər forumları və məhsulları ilə qarşılaşdırma sitələri sosyal təsirlərini artırmaq üçün istifadəçiləri öz fikirlərini aktif ifadə edir və yoldaşları müşterilərinə onlaynı təsirlərini göndərirlər. Ancaq təsirlərin tanımasına qadir olan sistemlər hələ də istiqamətdə olmayan. Təbiətli Dil İşləməsinin yeni və çətinlikli sahəsi təklif etmək istəyir ki, onlaynı forumlar barəsində istifadəçilərin nəsihətlərini izləmək istəyir. Bu kağızda müşterilərə və müşterilərə müşterilərə və müşterilərə təbliğ etmək üçün təhlükəsiz bir metodoloji təyin edilir. Bu metodoloji heuristik, leksik və sintaktik modelləri istifadə edir. 5-ci və 1-ci pozisyonda f1-nöqtəsi 0,749 və 0,858 f1-nöqtəsini qəbul edir. Əvvəlcə, qüdrət-tabanlı klasifikatçısını bir-birinə birləşdirərək f1-score 0,79-ini göstərir.', 'cs': 'Vzhledem k tomu, že online fóra zákazníků a porovnávací stránky produktů zvyšují svůj společenský vliv, uživatelé aktivně vyjadřují své názory a zveřejňují svá doporučení na své spoluzákazníky online. Systémy schopné rozpoznávat návrhy však stále chybí stabilita. Suggestion Mining, nová a náročná oblast zpracování přirozeného jazyka, získává stále více pozornosti, jejímž cílem je sledovat uživatelské rady na online fórech. V tomto příspěvku je prezentována pečlivě navržená metodika identifikace návrhů od zákazníka k podniku a od zákazníka k zákazníkovi. Metodika implementuje klasifikátor založený na pravidlech s využitím heuristických, lexikálních a syntaktických vzorů. Přístup byl umístěn na pátém a prvním místě a dosáhl f1 skóre 0.749 a 0.858 pro podúkoly SemEval-2019/Suggestion Mining A a B. Kromě toho jsme byli schopni zlepšit výsledky výkonu kombinací klasifikátoru založeného na pravidlech s recidivující konvoluční neuronovou sítí, která vykazuje f1-skóre 0,79 pro podúkol A.', 'ca': "A mesura que els fòrums de clients en línia i els llocs de comparació de productes augmenten la seva influència social, els usuaris estan expressant activament les seves opinions i publicant les seves recomendacions als seus companys en línia. Però els sistemes capaços de reconèixer suggeriments encara no tenen estabilitat. Suggestion Mining, un nou i desafiant camp de la processació de llenguatges naturals, està cada vegada més atraent atenció, mirant a seguir els consells dels usuaris en fòrums on-line. En aquest article es presenta una metodologia dissenyada atentament per identificar suggeriments client-a-empresa i client-a-client. La metodologia implementa un classificador basat en regles utilitzant patrons heurístics, lèxics i sinàctics. L'enfocament es va classificar en la 5ª i 1ª posició, aconseguint una puntuació f1 de 0,749 i 0,858 per a SemEval-2019/Suggestion Mining sub-tasques A i B, respectivament. A més, vam poder millorar els resultats del rendiment combinant el classificador basat en les regles amb una xarxa neural convolutiva recurrent, que mostra una puntuació f1 de 0,79 per a la subtanya A.", 'et': 'Kuna kliendifoorumid ja tootevõrdlussaidid suurendavad oma ühiskondlikku mõju, avaldavad kasutajad aktiivselt oma arvamusi ja avaldavad oma soovitusi kaasklientidele internetis. Siiski puuduvad soovitusi ära tundvad süsteemid endiselt stabiilsuses. Suggestion Kaevandamine, looduskeele töötlemise uus ja keeruline valdkond, on üha enam tähelepanu pälvimas, eesmärgiga jälgida kasutajate nõuandeid veebifoorumites. Käesolevas töös on esitatud hoolikalt kavandatud metoodika kliendi-ettevõtte ja kliendi-kliendi soovituste tuvastamiseks. Metoodika rakendab reeglipõhist klassifikaatorit heuristiliste, leksikaalsete ja süntaktiliste mustrite abil. Lähenemine oli viiendal ja esimesel kohal, saavutades SemEval-2019/Suggestion Mining alamülesannete A ja B puhul f1-skoori 0,749 ja 0,858. Lisaks suutsime parandada jõudluse tulemusi, kombineerides reeglipõhise klassifikaatori korduva konvolutsioonivõrguga, millel on alaülesande A puhul f1-skoor 0,79.', 'fi': 'Kun verkkoasiakasfoorumit ja tuotevertailusivustot lisäävät yhteiskunnallista vaikutustaan, käyttäjät ilmaisevat aktiivisesti mielipiteitään ja julkaisevat suosituksiaan kanssasiakkailleen verkossa. Järjestelmät, jotka pystyvät tunnistamaan ehdotuksia, ovat kuitenkin edelleen epävakaita. Suggestion Mining, uusi ja haastava luonnonkielen prosessoinnin ala, on saamassa yhä enemmän huomiota ja pyrkii seuraamaan käyttäjäneuvoja verkkofoorumeilla. Tässä työssä esitellään huolellisesti suunniteltu menetelmä asiakkaan ja asiakkaan välisten ehdotusten tunnistamiseksi. Menetelmässä toteutetaan sääntöpohjainen luokittelija käyttäen heuristisia, leksikaalisia ja syntaktisia kuvioita. Lähestymistapa sijoittui 5. sijalle ja 1. sijalle saavuttaen f1-pisteet SemEval-2019/Suggestion Mining -alatehtävissä A ja B 0,858. Lisäksi onnistuimme parantamaan suorituskykytuloksia yhdistämällä sääntöpohjaisen luokittelijan toistuvaan konvolutionaaliseen neuroverkkoon, jonka f1-pisteet alitehtävässä A ovat 0,79.', 'sk': 'Ker spletni forumi za stranke in spletna mesta za primerjavo izdelkov povečujejo svoj družbeni vpliv, uporabniki aktivno izražajo svoja mnenja in objavljajo svoja priporočila pri svojih kolegih strankah na spletu. Vendar sistemi, ki lahko prepoznajo predloge, še vedno primanjkujejo stabilnost. Suggestion Mining, novo in zahtevno področje obdelave naravnega jezika, vse bolj pridobiva pozornost, katerega cilj je sledenje nasvetov uporabnikov na spletnih forumih. V prispevku je predstavljena skrbno zasnovana metodologija za prepoznavanje predlogov od stranke do podjetja in od stranke do stranke. Metodologija izvaja klasifikator, ki temelji na pravilih, z uporabo heurističnih, leksikalnih in sintaktičnih vzorcev. Pristop se je uvrstil na 5. in 1. mesto ter dosegel rezultat f1 0,749 oziroma 0,858 za podnaloga SemEval-2019/Suggestion Mining A oziroma B. Poleg tega smo lahko izboljšali rezultate zmogljivosti s kombinacijo klasifikatorja na pravilih s ponavljajočim se konvolucijskim živčnim omrežjem, ki kaže f1-rezultat 0,79 za podnalogo A.', 'he': 'כאשר פורמים לקוחות באינטרנט ואתרי שיוואי מוצרים מגבירים את השפעה החברתית שלהם, המשתמשים מבטאים באופן פעיל את דעתם ופרסמים המלצות שלהם על הלקוחות השותפים שלהם באינטרנט. עם זאת, מערכות מסוגלות לזהות הצעות עדיין חסרות ביציבות. מוכרת הצעות, שדה חדש ומתאגר של מעבדת שפת טבעית, מקבלת יותר ויותר תשומת לב, המטרה לאתר עצות משתמשים בפורומים באינטרנט. בעיתון הזה, מוצגת מטודולוגיה מעוצבת בזהירות לזהות הצעות לקוח לחברה וללקוח לקוח לקוח. המטדולוגיה מפעילה קלאסיפור מבוסס על חוקים באמצעות דפוסים היוריסטיים, לקסיים וסינטקטיים. הגישה התייצבה בעמדה ה-5 וה-1, השיגה נקודת f1 של 0.749 ו-0.858 עבור סמי-Eval-2019/Suggestion Mining sub-tasks A ו-B, בהתאם. בנוסף, הצלחנו לשפר את תוצאות ההופעה על ידי שילוב את המסגר המבוסס על החוקים עם רשת עצבית משתנה חוזרת, אשר מציגה נקודת f1 של 0.79 עבור תחתונה A.', 'ha': "Kama da jama'ar masu shawara da matsayi masu kamfani masu ƙara matsayinsu, sai masu amfani da mataimaka sun faɗa zaɓen fikanci kuma sunã poster masu shawarar da maswalinsu da mataimaka masu haɗi da su waɗancan ne. A lokacin da, na'ura masu iya iya ganin shawarar da za'a ƙara ba da aminci. @ action: button A cikin wannan takardan, an zo wani metode wanda aka ƙayyade wajen ƙayyade zuwa-ma'abũcin-zuwa-shirka da masu shawarar-zuwa-matafiyar-zuwa. @ info: whatsthis Mataimakin ta ranka a wurin 5 da 1, ta sami wani f1-score na 0.749 da 0.858 wa SemEV-2019/Recoyyadcast Mining Sub-Hikima A da B. In a iya ƙara, za'a iya kyautata matsalar mafarinta da za'a haɗa fassarar-danganta a kangaran rubutun da wata tarayya na'urar da za'a karo, wanda ke nuna f1-score 0.79 wa sub-aikin A.", 'jv': 'Taning negori foras online karo perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo wong liya nggawe gerakan ingkang software, nik nguasai nggawe persilangan liyane karo pawartos online. Nanging, sistem kang dipunangé karo akeh gunakake supoyo kang isih basa Stabisa. Suggestion Ming, buku kaendahing lan nganggep nggawe Ngubah Pribadhakan Sak Jagad Nanging mapani iki, sistem sing paling-perusahaan kanggo dianggap pawaran bantuan karo benajeng-bantuan karo benajeng-bantuan liyane Name Ndoleh sing wis ngawe 5 punti 1 punti, gayetara f1-punti 0. Genjer', 'bo': 'དྲ་ཐོག་ཞབས་ཏོག ཡིན་ནའང་། མ་ལག་གིས་བསམ་ཚུལ་རྟོགས་པའི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ནུས་གནས་སྟངས་གང་ཡང་བྱུང་མེད། Suggestion Mining, a novel and challenging field of Natural Language Processing, is increasingly gaining attention, aiming to track user advice on online forums. ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཞབས་ཏོག་སྤྱོད་མཁན་ལས་ ཞབས་ཏོག་སྤྱོད་མཁན་ལས་ ཞབས་ཏོག་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་བསམ་ཚུལ The methodology implements a rule-based classifier using heuristic, lexical and syntactic patterns. འདི་གྲངས་གཟུགས་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་འགོ་བཙུགས་པ་དེ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་འགྲོ་བཞིན་ཡོད། f1-score of 0.749 and 0.858 for SemEval-2019/Suggestion Mining sub-tasks A and B respectively. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་དང་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བའི་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་དང་མཉམ་སྦྱོར་བྱེད་ཚུགས་བྱུང་།'}
{'en': 'SSN-SPARKS at SemEval-2019 Task 9 : Mining Suggestions from Online Reviews using Deep Learning Techniques on Augmented Data', 'pt': 'SSN-SPARKS na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 9: Sugestões de Mineração de Avaliações Online usando Técnicas de Aprendizado Profundo em Dados Aumentados', 'es': 'SSN-SPARKS en la Tarea 9 de SemEval-2019: Sugerencias de minería a partir de revisiones en línea utilizando técnicas de aprendizaje profundo en datos aumentados', 'ar': 'SSN-SPARKS في SemEval-2019 المهمة 9: اقتراحات التعدين من المراجعات عبر الإنترنت باستخدام تقنيات التعلم العميق على البيانات المعززة', 'fr': "SSN-SPARKS à la tâche 9 de SEMEVAL-2019\xa0: Exploration de suggestions à partir de revues en ligne à l'aide de techniques d'apprentissage profond sur des données", 'zh': 'SemEval-2019务9上SSN-SPARKS:用深度学术在线论掘建议', 'ja': 'SSN - SPARKS at SemEval -2019 Task 9: Mining Suggestions from Online Reviews using Deep Learning Techniques on Augmented Data', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 9 पर SSN-SPARKS: संवर्धित डेटा पर डीप लर्निंग तकनीकों का उपयोग करके ऑनलाइन समीक्षाओं से खनन सुझाव', 'ru': 'SSN-SPARKS на SemEval-2019 Задача 9: Предложения по майнингу из онлайн-обзоров с использованием методов глубокого обучения на дополненных данных', 'ga': 'SSN-SPARKS ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 9: Moltaí Mianadóireachta ó Léirmheasanna Ar Líne ag Úsáid Teicnící Deepfhoghlama ar Shonraí Méadaithe', 'hu': 'SSN-SPARKS a SemEval-2019 9. feladat: Bányászati javaslatok a kiterjesztett adatok mélytanulási technikáit használó online értékelésekből', 'ka': 'SSN-SPARKS semiEval-2019 დავალება 9: წინაწერის შესაძლებელებები online Revisions-დან გამოყენებული ძალიან სწავლების ტექნიკების გამოყენება აგგენტირებული მონაცემებზე', 'el': 'Εργασία 9: Προτάσεις εξόρυξης από διαδικτυακές αξιολογήσεις χρησιμοποιώντας τεχνικές βαθιάς μάθησης σε ενισχυμένα δεδομένα', 'lt': 'SSN-SPARKS at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Mining Suggestions from Online Reviews using Deep Learning Techniques on Augmented Data', 'kk': 'SSN-SPARKS жарым- 2019 тапсырмасында 9: Жоғарылған деректер бойынша қалыпты оқыту техникаларын қолданып онлайн редакцияларынан бағалау керектері', 'it': 'SSN-SPARKS a SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggerimenti minerari dalle recensioni online utilizzando tecniche di deep learning sui dati aumentati', 'mk': 'SSN-SPARKS at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Mining Suggestions from Online Reviews using Deep Learning Techniques on Augmented Data', 'mn': 'SSN-SPARKS at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Mining Suggestions from Online Reviews using Deep Learning Techniques on Augmented Data', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 9- ല്\u200d എസ്എസ്- എസ്പാര്\u200dക്കെസ്: ഓഗ്മെന്റ് ഡേറ്റായിലെ ആഴമുള്ള പഠിക്കുന്ന ടെക്നിക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഓണ്\u200d', 'mt': 'SSN-SPARKS f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 9: Suġġerimenti għall-Minjieri minn Reviżjonijiet Online bl-użu ta’ Tekniki ta’ Tagħlim Profond dwar Data Aġġustata', 'ms': 'SSN-SPARKS pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 9: cadangan penambangan dari Review Online menggunakan Teknik Belajar Dalam Data Ditambah', 'no': 'SSN-SPARKS at semiEval-2019 Oppgåve 9: Miningsforslag frå Online Revisions med Deep Learning Techniques on Augmented Data', 'ro': 'SSN-SPARKS la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 9: Sugestii miniere din recenzii online folosind tehnici de învățare profundă asupra datelor augmentate', 'pl': 'SSN-SPARKS na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 9: Wydobywanie sugestii z recenzji online z wykorzystaniem technik głębokiego uczenia na rozszerzonych danych', 'sr': 'SSN-SPARKS na pola evaluacije 2019. zadatak 9: prijedloge za rudarstvo iz online pregleda koristeći tehnike dubokog učenja o povećanim podacima', 'si': 'SSN-SPARKS at semeval-2019 Job 9: mining Suggestions from online Revises Using Deep Knowing Techques on Agment Data', 'sv': 'SSN-SPARKS på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 9: Förslag till gruvdrift från online-recensioner med hjälp av djupinlärningstekniker om utökad data', 'so': 'SSN-SPARKS at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Mining Suggestions from Online Reviews using Deep Learning Techniques on Augmented Data', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 9- ல் SSN- SPARKS: இணைய முன்னோட்டங்களிலிருந்து பரிந்துரைகளை நினைவு கொள்கிறது ஆழமான கற்றுக் கொண்டு தொழில்நுட்ப தகவல் மூ', 'ur': 'SSN-SPARKS at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Mining Suggestions from Online Review using Deep Learning Techniques on Augmented Data', 'uz': '9 Ish stolidagi SSN- SPARKS: Oʻzgartirilgan maʼlumot uchun Deep Learning Teknologi', 'vi': 'SSN-Spa tại SemEvl-209 Task 9: Các gợi ý từ lướt qua mạng sử dụng kĩ thuật học sâu về dữ liệu bổ sung', 'bg': 'Задача 9: Предложения за минно дело от онлайн ревюта, използващи техники за задълбочено обучение на разширени данни', 'hr': 'SSN-SPARKS na pola izvještaja 2019. zadatak 9: Prijedloge za rudarstvo iz online pregleda koristeći tehnike dubokog učenja o povećanim podacima', 'da': 'SSN-SPARKS på SemEval-2019 Opgave 9: Forslag til minedrift fra online anmeldelser ved hjælp af Deep Learning teknikker på Augmented Data', 'nl': 'SSN-SPARKS bij SemEval-2019 Taak 9: Mining Suggesties uit Online Reviews met behulp van Deep Learning Technieken op Augmented Data', 'id': 'SSN-SPARKS di SemEval-2019 Tugas 9: Suarangan Menombongkan dari Review Online menggunakan Teknik Belajar Dalam Data Ditambah', 'ko': 'SSN-SPARKS가SemEval-2019에서의 임무9: 증강 데이터에 심도 있는 학습 기술을 사용하여 온라인 평론에서 조언을 발굴', 'de': 'SSN-SPARKS bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 9: Mining von Vorschlägen aus Online-Reviews mit Deep Learning Techniken auf Augmented Data', 'fa': 'SSN-SPARKS at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Mining suggestions from Online Review using Deep Learning Techniques on Augmented Data', 'af': 'Comment', 'sw': 'SSN-SPARKS kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 9: Kumbuka Mapendekezo kutoka Mapitio ya Mtandaoni kwa kutumia Teknolojia za Kufunza Kikina kwenye Taarifa za Augmented', 'tr': 'SSN-SPARKS at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Mining Suggestions from Online Reviews using Deep Learning Techniques on Augmented Data', 'sq': 'SSN-SPARKS në SemEval-2019 Task 9: Mining Suggestions from Online Reviews using Deep Learning Techniques on Augmented Data', 'am': 'ስራ 9', 'az': "SSN-SPARKS at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Online Review's Mining suggestions using Deep Learning Techniques on Augmented Data", 'hy': 'SSN-SP ARKS-ը 2019 թվականի "Սեմեվալ-2019" 9-րդ հանքային առաջարկություններից օնլայն վերլուծություններից օգտագործելով աճեցված տվյալների մասին խորը սովորելու տեխնիկան', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৯-এ এসএসএন-এসপার্কেস: অগ্মেন্ড ড ডাটা ব্যবহার করে অনলাইন রিভিউ থেকে প্রস্তাবের স্মরণ করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'SSN-SPARKS na semiEval-2019 zadatak 9: Prijedloge za rudarstvo iz online pregleda koristeći tehnike dubokog učenja o povećanim podacima', 'ca': 'SSN-SPARKS a SemEval-2019 Task 9: Mining Suggestions from Online Reviews using Deep Learning Techniques on Augmented Data', 'cs': 'SSN-SPARKS na SemEval-2019 Úkol 9: Těžba návrhů z online recenzí pomocí technik hlubokého učení na rozšířených datech', 'et': 'SSN-SPARKS SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 9: Kaevandamise soovitused veebiülevaatest, kasutades sügavõppe tehnikaid liigendatud andmetel', 'fi': 'SSN-SPARKS SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 9: Kaivosehdotuksia online-arvosteluista, joissa käytetään syväoppimisen tekniikoita lisätyssä datassa', 'jv': 'SSN', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'sk': 'SSN-SPARKS na SemEval-2019 Naloga 9: Rudarski predlogi iz spletnih pregledov z uporabo tehnik globokega učenja na dodatnih podatkih', 'bo': 'SSN-SPARKS at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Mining Suggestions from Online Reviews using Deep Learning Techniques on Augmented Data', 'he': 'SSN-SPARKS ב SemEval-2019 משימה 9: הצעות מכירה ממחקרים באינטרנט באמצעות טכניקות למידה עמוקה על נתונים מוגדלים'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the work on mining the suggestions from online reviews and forums. Opinion mining detects whether the comments are positive, negative or neutral, while suggestion mining explores the review content for the possible tips or advice. The system developed by SSN-SPARKS team in SemEval-2019 for task 9 (suggestion mining) uses a rule-based approach for feature selection, SMOTE technique for data augmentation and deep learning technique (Convolutional Neural Network) for classification. We have compared the results with Random Forest classifier (RF) and MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP) model. Results show that the CNN model performs better than other models for both the subtasks.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة العمل على التنقيب عن الاقتراحات من المراجعات والمنتديات عبر الإنترنت. يكتشف التنقيب عن الآراء ما إذا كانت التعليقات إيجابية أو سلبية أو محايدة ، بينما يستكشف التنقيب عن الاقتراحات محتوى المراجعة للحصول على النصائح أو النصائح الممكنة. يستخدم النظام الذي طوره فريق SSN-SPARKS في SemEval-2019 للمهمة 9 (التنقيب عن الاقتراحات) نهجًا قائمًا على القواعد لاختيار الميزات ، وتقنية SMOTE لزيادة البيانات وتقنية التعلم العميق (الشبكة العصبية التلافيفية) من أجل التصنيف. لقد قارنا النتائج مع مصنف Random Forest (RF) ونموذج MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP). تظهر النتائج أن نموذج CNN يعمل بشكل أفضل من النماذج الأخرى لكلتا المهمتين الفرعيتين.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le travail d'exploration des suggestions issues des revues en ligne et des forums. L'exploration d'opinion détecte si les commentaires sont positifs, négatifs ou neutres, tandis que l'exploration de suggestions explore le contenu des avis à la recherche de conseils ou de conseils éventuels. Le système développé par l'équipe SSN-SPARKS au SEMEVAL-2019 pour la tâche 9 (exploration de suggestions) utilise une approche basée sur des règles pour la sélection des caractéristiques, la technique SMOTE pour l'augmentation des données et la technique d'apprentissage profond (réseau de neurones convolutionnels) pour la classification. Nous avons comparé les résultats avec le classificateur de forêt aléatoire (RF) et le modèle Perceptron multicouche (MLP). Les résultats montrent que le modèle CNN est plus performant que les autres modèles pour les deux sous-tâches.", 'es': 'Este documento describe el trabajo de extracción de las sugerencias de reseñas y foros en línea. La minería de opiniones detecta si los comentarios son positivos, negativos o neutrales, mientras que la minería de sugerencias explora el contenido de las reseñas en busca de posibles consejos o sugerencias. El sistema desarrollado por el equipo de SSN-SPARKS en SemEval-2019 para la tarea 9 (minería de sugerencias) utiliza un enfoque basado en reglas para la selección de características, la técnica SMOTE para el aumento de datos y la técnica de aprendizaje profundo (Red Neural Convolucional) para la clasificación. Hemos comparado los resultados con el modelo Random Forest Classifier (RF) y Multilayer Perceptron (MLP). Los resultados muestran que el modelo de CNN funciona mejor que otros modelos para ambas subtareas.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve o trabalho de mineração das sugestões de comentários e fóruns online. A mineração de opinião detecta se os comentários são positivos, negativos ou neutros, enquanto a mineração de sugestões explora o conteúdo da revisão para possíveis dicas ou conselhos. O sistema desenvolvido pela equipe SSN-SPARKS no SemEval-2019 para a tarefa 9 (mineração de sugestões) usa uma abordagem baseada em regras para seleção de recursos, técnica SMOTE para aumento de dados e técnica de aprendizado profundo (Rede Neural Convolucional) para classificação. Comparamos os resultados com o classificador Random Forest (RF) e o modelo MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP). Os resultados mostram que o modelo CNN tem um desempenho melhor do que outros modelos para ambas as subtarefas.', 'ja': '本稿では、オンラインレビューやフォーラムからの提案をマイニングする作業について説明します。オピニオンマイニングは、コメントがポジティブかネガティブかニュートラルかを検出し、オピニオンマイニングは、可能なヒントやアドバイスのレビューコンテンツを探索します。SSN - SPARKSチームが、タスク9 （提案マイニング）のためにSemEval -2019で開発したシステムは、特徴選択のためのルールベースのアプローチ、データ拡張のためのSMOTEテクニック、分類のためのディープラーニングテクニック（畳み込みニューラルネットワーク）を使用しています。ランダムフォレスト分類子（ RF ）と多層パーセプトロン（ MLP ）モデルとの結果を比較しました。結果は、CNNモデルがサブタスクの両方で他のモデルよりも優れたパフォーマンスを発揮することを示しています。', 'zh': '本文引在线论及论坛中掘议。 议掘检论正,负面犹中立,而议掘则探论取可。 SSN-SPARKS团队于SemEval-2019中为务9(建议发掘)开统用於法,SMOTE术以增益深习(卷积神经网络)分类。 将与随机林分器(RF)与多感知器(MLP)较之。 结果表明,CNN 二子者皆优焉。', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе описывается работа по майнингу предложений из онлайн-обзоров и форумов. Opinion mining определяет, являются ли комментарии положительными, отрицательными или нейтральными, в то время как suggestion mining исследует содержание отзыва на предмет возможных советов или советов. Система, разработанная командой SSN-SPARKS в SemEval-2019 для задачи 9 (анализ предложений), использует основанный на правилах подход к выбору признаков, технику расширения данных и технику глубокого обучения (сверточная нейронная сеть) для классификации. Мы сравнили результаты с классификатором Random Forest (RF) и моделью MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP). Результаты показывают, что модель CNN работает лучше, чем другие модели для обеих подзадач.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर ऑनलाइन समीक्षाओं और मंचों से सुझावों के खनन पर काम का वर्णन करता है। राय खनन का पता लगाता है कि क्या टिप्पणियां सकारात्मक, नकारात्मक या तटस्थ हैं, जबकि सुझाव खनन संभावित युक्तियों या सलाह के लिए समीक्षा सामग्री की पड़ताल करता है। कार्य 9 (सुझाव खनन) के लिए SemEval-2019 में SSN-SPARKS टीम द्वारा विकसित प्रणाली सुविधा चयन के लिए एक नियम-आधारित दृष्टिकोण, डेटा वृद्धि के लिए SMOTE तकनीक और वर्गीकरण के लिए गहरी सीखने की तकनीक (Convolutional Neural Network) का उपयोग करती है। हमने परिणामों की तुलना रैंडम फॉरेस्ट क्लासिफायर (आरएफ) और मल्टीलेयर परसेप्ट्रॉन (एमएलपी) मॉडल के साथ की है। परिणाम बताते हैं कि सीएनएन मॉडल दोनों उप-कार्यों के लिए अन्य मॉडलों की तुलना में बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an obair ar mhianadóireacht na moltaí ó athbhreithnithe ar líne agus fóraim. Aimsíonn mianadóireacht tuairimí cibé an bhfuil na tuairimí dearfach, diúltach nó neodrach, agus déanann mianadóireacht moltaí iniúchadh ar an ábhar athbhreithnithe chun leideanna nó comhairle a fháil. Úsáideann an córas a d’fhorbair foireann SSN-SPARKS in SemEval-2019 do thasc 9 (mianadóireacht moltaí) cur chuige bunaithe ar rialacha maidir le roghnú gnéithe, teicníc SMOTE le haghaidh méadú sonraí agus teicníc foghlama domhain (Líonra Convolutional Neural) le haghaidh aicmiú. Chuireamar na torthaí i gcomparáid le samhail aicmitheora Random Forest (RF) agus Ilshraith Perceptron (MLP). Léiríonn torthaí go bhfeidhmíonn samhail CNN níos fearr ná múnlaí eile don dá fhothasc.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει την εργασία για την εξόρυξη των προτάσεων από διαδικτυακές κριτικές και φόρουμ. Η εξόρυξη γνώμης ανιχνεύει εάν τα σχόλια είναι θετικά, αρνητικά ή ουδέτερα, ενώ η εξόρυξη προτάσεων διερευνά το περιεχόμενο της κριτικής για πιθανές συμβουλές ή συμβουλές. Το σύστημα που αναπτύχθηκε από την ομάδα στο SemEval-2019 για την εργασία 9 (εξόρυξη προτάσεων) χρησιμοποιεί μια προσέγγιση βασισμένη σε κανόνες για την επιλογή χαρακτηριστικών, τεχνική για την αύξηση δεδομένων και τεχνική βαθιάς μάθησης (Convolutional Neural Network) για την ταξινόμηση. Συγκρίναμε τα αποτελέσματα με τον ταξινομητή τυχαίων δασών (RF) και το μοντέλο πολυστρωματικού Perceptron (MLP). Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο αποδίδει καλύτερα από άλλα μοντέλα και για τις δύο δευτερεύουσες εργασίες.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja az online értékelések és fórumok javaslatainak bányászatával kapcsolatos munkát. A véleménybányászat megállapítja, hogy a megjegyzések pozitívak, negatívak vagy semlegesek-e, míg a javaslatbányászat a lehetséges tippek vagy tanácsok érdekében feltárja a vélemény tartalmát. Az SSN-SPARKS csapata által a SemEval-2019-ben kifejlesztett rendszer a 9. feladatra (javaslatbányászat) szabályalapú megközelítést alkalmaz a funkciókiválasztáshoz, az SMOTE technikát az adatok nagyobbításához és a mélytanulási technikát (Convolutional Neural Network) az osztályozáshoz. Az eredményeket a Random Forest osztályozó (RF) és a MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP) modellel hasonlítottuk össze. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a CNN modell mindkét részfeladatnál jobban teljesít, mint más modellek.', 'ka': 'ამ დოგუმენტი აღწერა სამუშაო, რომელიც ინტერნეტის რევისუმენტების და ფორმების წინასწორებაზე მიღებული სამუშაო. მისამართების მინიერება განახსენებს, თუ კომენტრები პოტიფიურია, ნეიროლურია თუ არა, მინიერებული მინიერება განახსენებს შესაძლებელი კომენტრების შესახებ ან სისტემა, რომელიც SSN-SPARKS ჯგუფი SemEval-2019-ში განვითარებულია სამუშაო 9-ში (სამუშაო მინიღება) კლასიფიკაციისთვის განსაზღვრებისთვის პროგრამის მიზეზი გამოყენება, SMOTE ტექნოგია მონაცემების ა ჩვენ შევადგენეთ წარმოდგენების შემდგენება პანუმენტური ძალიან კლასიფიკაციერი (RF) და მრავალერი პერსტეპრონი (MLP) მოდელზე. შედეგი გამოჩვენება, რომ CNN მოდელი უკეთესი მოდელეებისგან უკეთესი მოდელეებისგან ორივე სკენ მოდელეებისთვის.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il lavoro sul mining dei suggerimenti da recensioni e forum online. L'opinion mining rileva se i commenti sono positivi, negativi o neutri, mentre il suggestion mining esplora il contenuto della recensione per i possibili suggerimenti o consigli. Il sistema sviluppato dal team SSN-SPARKS in SemEval-2019 per il task 9 (suggestion mining) utilizza un approccio basato su regole per la selezione delle funzionalità, la tecnica SMOTE per l'aumento dei dati e la tecnica di deep learning (Convolutional Neural Network) per la classificazione. Abbiamo confrontato i risultati con il modello Random Forest classificatore (RF) e MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP). I risultati mostrano che il modello CNN ha prestazioni migliori rispetto ad altri modelli per entrambe le sottoattività.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašomas darbas kasybos klausimais, susijęs su internetinių apžvalgų ir forumų pasiūlymais. Nuomonės kasyba nustato, ar pastabos yra teigiamos, neigiamos ar neutralios, o pasiūlymų kasyba nagrinėja galimų patarimų peržiūros turinį. Sistema, kurią SSN-SPARKS grupė parengė SemEval-2019 m. 9 uždaviniui (siūlomosios kasybos) taikyti taisyklėmis grindžiamą metodą atrinkti savybes, SMOTE metodą duomenų didinimui ir gilaus mokymosi metodą (konvolucinis neurologinis tinklas) klasifikavimui. We have compared the results with Random Forest classifier (RF) and MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP) model.  Rezultatai rodo, kad CNN modelis veikia geriau nei kiti abiejų paklausų modeliai.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз онлайн қарау және форумдардан таңдау жұмысын таңдайды. Ақпарат бақылауы келтірілген түсініктемелер оң, негативті немесе нейтралды екенін анықтайды, бірақ бақылау бақылауы мүмкін мәліметтер не мәліметтер үшін қарау мазмұны Жүйе 9 тапсырма үшін SSN-SPARKS командасының жасалған жүйесі (тапсырмалар бойынша) үшін ережелерді таңдау үшін, деректерді жақсарту және қалыпты оқыту техникасының SMOTE техникасы (Конволюциялық невралдық желі) арқылы ше Біз нәтижелерді Кездейсоқ орман классификациясы (RF) және көп қабаттар процеспектроны (MLP) үлгісімен салыстырдық. Нәтижелер CNN үлгісі екеуінде басқа үлгілерден жақсы орындалады.', 'mk': 'Овој весник ја опишува работата за минирање на предлозите од онлајн рецензии и форуми. Opinion mining detects whether the comments are positive, negative or neutral, while suggestion mining explores the review content for the possible tips or advice.  Системот развиен од страна на тимот SSN-SPARKS во SemEval-2019 за задачата 9 (рудање на предлози) користи правила-базиран пристап за избор на карактеристики, техника СМОТЕ за зголемување на податоците и техника на длабоко учење (конволуционална неурална мрежа) за класифика Ги споредивме резултатите со моделот на „Random Forest Classifier“ (RF) и „Multilayer Perceptron“ (MLP). Резултатите покажуваат дека моделот на СНН функционира подобро од другите модели за двете потпрашања.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan kerja untuk mengembangkan cadangan dari ulasan dan forum online. Penyelamatan pendapat mengesan sama ada ulasan positif, negatif atau neutral, semasa penambangan tambang mengeksplorasi kandungan ulasan untuk tip atau nasihat yang mungkin. Sistem yang dikembangkan oleh pasukan SSN-SPARKS dalam SemEval-2019 untuk tugas 9 (penambangan cadangan) menggunakan pendekatan berdasarkan peraturan untuk pemilihan ciri, teknik SMOTE untuk peningkatan data dan teknik pembelajaran dalam (Rangkaian Neural Konveolutional) untuk klasifikasi. Kami telah membandingkan keputusan dengan model pengklasifikasi Rawak Hutan (RF) dan MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP). Hasil menunjukkan bahawa model CNN berfungsi lebih baik daripada model lain untuk kedua-dua subtasks.', 'ml': 'This paper describes the work on mining the suggestions from online reviews and forums.  പ്രത്യേകിച്ചുള്ള കുറിപ്പുകള്\u200dക്കോ ഉപദേശങ്ങള്\u200dക്കോ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d കുറച്ചു മുന്നിലുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രേതികമാണോ എന എസ്\u200cഎസ്\u200cഎസ്\u200cഎസ്\u200cഎസ്\u200cഎസ്- എസ്\u200cപാര്\u200dക്കെസ് ടീം നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം ജോലി 9 (പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന മിനിംഗ്) ക്ലാസിഫിഷന്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനായി ന നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d റാന്\u200dഡോമില്\u200d കാട്ടിന്\u200dറെ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കേറ്റര്\u200d എന്നിവയുടെയും മറ്റു ലേയര്\u200d പെര്\u200dസെപ്റ്റരോണിന്\u200dറെയും മോ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് സിഎന്\u200d എന്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d രണ്ടുപേര്\u200dക്കും വേറെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതാണെന്നാണ്.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi l-ħidma dwar it-tħaffir fil-minjieri tas-suġġerimenti minn reviżjonijiet u forums onlajn. It-tħaffir fil-minjieri tal-opinjoni jidentifika jekk il-kummenti humiex pożittivi, negattivi jew newtrali, filwaqt li s-suġġerimenti fil-minjieri jesploraw il-kontenut tar-reviżjoni għat-tips jew pariri possibbli. Is-sistema żviluppata mit-tim SSN-SPARKS f’SemEval-2019 għall-kompitu 9 (tħaffir tas-suġġerimenti fil-minjieri) tuża approċċ ibbażat fuq ir-regoli għall-għa żla tal-karatteristiċi, it-teknika SMOTE għall-augmentazzjoni tad-dejta u t-teknika ta’ tagħlim fil-fond (Netwerk Newrali Konveoluzzjonali) għall-klassifikazzjoni. Tqabblu r-riżultati mal-mudell tal-Klassifikatur Random Forest (RF) u Multilayer Perceptron (MLP). Ir-riżultati juru li l-mudell CNN għandu prestazzjoni aħjar minn mudelli oħra għaż-żewġ sottomistoqsijiet.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje prace nad wydobyciem sugestii z recenzji internetowych i forów. Opinion mining wykrywa, czy komentarze są pozytywne, negatywne czy neutralne, podczas gdy sugestie mining bada treść recenzji w celu uzyskania ewentualnych wskazówek lub porad. System opracowany przez zespół SSN-SPARKS w SemEval-2019 dla zadania 9 (eksploracja suggestion mining) wykorzystuje podejście oparte na regułach do wyboru cech, technikę SMOTE do powiększania danych oraz technikę głębokiego uczenia (Convolutional Neuroral Network) do klasyfikacji. Porównaliśmy wyniki z klasyfikatorem Random Forest (RF) i modelem Perceptronu wielowarstwowego (MLP). Wyniki pokazują, że model CNN działa lepiej niż inne modele dla obu podzadań.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie lucrarea privind extragerea sugestiilor din recenziile și forumurile online. Opinion mining detectează dacă comentariile sunt pozitive, negative sau neutre, în timp ce sugestiile mining explorează conținutul recenziilor pentru posibilele sfaturi sau sfaturi. Sistemul dezvoltat de echipa SSN-SPARKS în SemEval-2019 pentru sarcina 9 (mining de sugestii) utilizează o abordare bazată pe reguli pentru selectarea caracteristicilor, tehnica SMOTE pentru augmentarea datelor și tehnica de învățare profundă (Rețeaua Neurală Convoluțională) pentru clasificare. Am comparat rezultatele cu clasificatorul Random Forest (RF) și modelul MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP). Rezultatele arată că modelul CNN performează mai bine decât alte modele pentru ambele subactivități.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver arbeidet på mining av forslag frå online reviews and forums. Det finst opp om kommentarane er positiv, negativ eller nøytral, mens forslag om mining utforskar innhaldet i oversiktet for dei moglege tipsa eller råd. Systemet utvikla av SSN-SPARKS-gruppa i semiEval-2019 for oppgåve 9 (forslag-mining) brukar ein regelbasert tilnærming for utval av funksjonar, SMOTE-teknikk for data augmentasjon og dyp læringsteknikk (Konvolusjonell neiralnettverk) for klassifikasjon. Vi har samanlikna resultatet med tilfeldige skogsklassifiseringar (RF) og fleire lag proseptron (MLP) modellen. Resultat viser at CNN-modellen utfører bedre enn andre modeller for begge underspørjingane.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас онлайн шалгалт болон форумуудын санал зохиох талаар ажлыг тайлбарладаг. Тодорхойлолтын сүлжээний сүлжээний сүлжээний сэтгэл санаа нь эерэг, сөрөг эсвэл зайлсхийлгүй эсэхийг олж мэддэг. SemEval-2019 оны SSN-SPARKS баг боловсруулсан систем нь 9 ажлын тулд (зөвлөгөөний хөрөнгө оруулалт) загварын сонголт, өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлт болон гүн гүн суралцах техник (Конvolutional Neural Network) хуваалтын тулд хуваалцах загварын үндсэн арга хэрэглэ Бид санамсаргүй ой хэлбэртэй (RF) болон олон Layer Perceptron (MLP) загвартай харьцуулсан. Үүний үр дүнд CNN загвар нь бусад загвараас илүү дээр ажилладаг.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje rad o rudarstvu prijedloga iz online pregleda i foruma. Miniranje mišljenja otkriva da li su komentari pozitivni, negativni ili neutralni, dok predlog rudarstva istražuje sadržaj pregleda mogućih saveta ili savjeta. Sistem koji je razvijen od ekipe SSN-SPARKS u semiEvalu-2019 za zadatak 9 (rudarstvo predloga) koristi pravilni pristup za selekciju funkcija, SMOTE tehniku za povećanje podataka i duboko učenje tehnike (Konvolucionalna Neuralna mreža) za klasifikaciju. Usporedili smo rezultate sa model "Random Forest classifier (RF) i MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP). Rezultati pokazuju da CNN model izvodi bolje od drugih modela za obe podrške.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ විස්තර කරන්නේ අන්ලයින් පරීක්ෂණය සහ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් වලින් විස්තර කරන වැඩය. ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගන්නවා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් උපදේශය හෝ උපදේශය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  SSN-SPARKS කණ්ඩායමේ සෙම්වෙල්-2019 වැඩේ 9 (ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්) වැඩසටහන් වෙනුවෙන් පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් නීතිය අධාරිත වි අපි ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිපත (RF) සහ Multilayer Percepron (MLP) නිර්මාණය සමඟ තියාගත්තා. ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ CNN මොඩේල් එක අනිත් මොඩේල් එකට වඩා හොඳයි කියලා.', 'so': 'Warqaddaas wuxuu ku qoran yahay shaqada ku saabsan jardiinada laga soo qorayo wargelinta iyo jardiinada internetka. Opinion mining detects whether the comments are positive, negative or neutral, while suggestion mining explores the review content for the possible tips or advice.  Sirkaas waxaa loo isticmaalaa qoraal-gaar ah oo loo qoray kooxda SSN-SPARKS oo ku qoray SemEval-2019 (suggestion mining) si loo qoro xuquuqda gaarka ah, SMOTE tekniknikada la kordhiyo data iyo iskuulka waxbarashada deegaan (Convolutional Neural Network). Fashihiisa waxaan isbarbardhignay qoraalka dhirta ee Random Forest (RF) iyo Muubolka MLP (MLP). Midhaha waxaa tusaya in modellka CNN uu sameeyo mid ka wanaagsan tusaalooyin kale oo labada shaqaalaha ah.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver arbetet med att utvinna förslag från online recensioner och forum. Opinion mining upptäcker om kommentarerna är positiva, negativa eller neutrala, medan suggestion mining utforskar omdömets innehåll för eventuella tips eller råd. Systemet som utvecklats av SSN-SPARKS team i SemEval-2019 för uppgift 9 (suggestion mining) använder en regelbaserad metod för funktionsval, SMOTE teknik för dataförstärkning och djupinlärningsteknik (Convolutional Neural Network) för klassificering. Vi har jämfört resultaten med Random Forest klassificerare (RF) och MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP) modell. Resultaten visar att CNN-modellen presterar bättre än andra modeller för båda delaktiviteterna.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் இணைய முறையீட்டு மற்றும் குறிப்புகளில் இருந்து பரிந்துரைகளை குறைக்கும் வேலையை  சாத்தியமான குறைக்கும் கருத்துருவுகள் நேர்ம, எதிர்மறை அல்லது நியுயமாக இருக்குமா என்பதை தெரிந்து கொள்ளும், சாத்தியமான குறி செம்Eval- 2019ல் SSN- SPARKS குழுவாக உருவாக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பு வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கு ஒரு விதிமுறையை பயன்படுத்துகிறது (பரிந்துரைக்கும்) தனிப்பயன் தேர்வுக்கான விதிமுறையை பயன்படுத்து நாம் குறிப்பில்லாத காட்டு வகைப்பாளர் (RF) மற்றும் பல அடுக்கு பர்செப்ட்ரான் (MLP) மாதிரியை ஒப்பிட்டோம். Results show that the CNN model performs better than other models for both the subtasks.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ آنلین ریوئیٹ اور فورمز سے پیشنهادوں کو مٹانے کے بارے میں کوشش کرتا ہے۔ معلومات منیونگ کا اظہار کرتا ہے کہ مثبت، منفی یا نائرٹ ہیں، حالانکہ معلومات منیونگ کے ذریعے ممکن قول یا نصیحت کے لئے ریویڈ منیونگ کا اظہار کرتا ہے. سیسٹم سیم-اسپارکس تیم کے ذریعہ سیم Eval-2019 میں توسط 9 (پیشنهاد مینینگ) کے لئے ایک قانون-بنیادی طریقہ کا استعمال کرتا ہے۔ ہم نے ان نتائج کو Random Forest classifier (RF) اور MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP) موڈل سے مقایسہ کیا ہے. نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ سی ان کے نمڈل دوسرے نمڈلوں سے بہتر عمل کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Ushbu qog\xa0Ľoz Online ko\xa0Ľruvchi va forumlardan murakkab qilish ishni anglatadi. Ko\xa0Ľrib chiqish 9 Ish uchun SSN-SPARKS jamoasi SemEval-2019 (ta\xa0ľminlovchi mining) yaratilgan tizim moslamani tanlash uchun qoidadan foydalanadi. Ma\xa0ľlumot so\xa0Ľzlashtirish uchun SMOTE tugmasi va juda qiyin o'rganish techniqiga (To\xa0Ľg\xa0Ľri Neural Network) darafslashga foydalanadi. @ info: whatsthis @ info: status", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả công việc khai thác ý kiến từ các diễn đàn online. Việc khai thác ý kiến xác định xem những nhận xét này có dương tính, âm tính hay trung lập không, trong khi đề nghị khai thác nội dung xem xét để có lời khuyên hay lời khuyên. Hệ thống được phát triển bởi nhóm SSN-BORK ở Semkhai thác-thẩm tê cho nhiệm vụ 9 (dò tiếp xúc) sử dụng phương pháp quy định cho việc chọn đặc trưng, kỹ thuật SMOTE cho việc gia tăng dữ liệu và kỹ thuật học sâu (mạng thần kinh Thuyết phục) để phân loại. Chúng tôi đã so sánh kết quả với kiểu phân loại khu rừng bừa bãi (RF) và kiểu nhận phần nhiều lớp (MLP). Kết quả cho thấy mẫu CNN làm tốt hơn so với các mẫu khác cho cả hai mặt phụ đề.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver arbejdet med at udvinde forslag fra online anmeldelser og fora. Opinion mining registrerer, om kommentarerne er positive, negative eller neutrale, mens forslag mining undersøger anmeldelsens indhold for de mulige tips eller råd. Systemet udviklet af SSN-SPARKS team i SemEval-2019 til opgave 9 (suggestion mining) bruger en regelbaseret tilgang til funktionsudvælgelse, SMOTE teknik til dataaugmentation og deep learning teknik (Convolutional Neural Network) til klassificering. Vi har sammenlignet resultaterne med Random Forest klassificering (RF) og MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP) model. Resultaterne viser, at CNN-modellen fungerer bedre end andre modeller for begge underopgaver.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje rad o rudarstvu prijedloga iz online pregleda i foruma. Miniranje mišljenja otkriva li su komentari pozitivni, negativni ili neutralni, dok je predloženje rudarstva istražuje sadržaj preglede mogućih savjeta ili savjeta. Sistem koji je razvijen SSN-SPARKS tim u poluvolju 2019. za zadatak 9 (prijedlog rudarstva) koristi pravilni pristup za selekciju funkcija, SMOTE tehniku za povećanje podataka i duboko učenje tehnike (Konvolucionalna Neuralna mreža) za klasifikaciju. Usporedili smo rezultate sa model slučajnog klasifikatora šume (RF) i MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP). Rezultati pokazuju da model CNN izvršava bolje od drugih modela za obe podrške.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft het werk om de suggesties van online reviews en forums te ontginnen. Opinion mining detecteert of de opmerkingen positief, negatief of neutraal zijn, terwijl suggestion mining de review inhoud onderzoekt voor mogelijke tips of adviezen. Het systeem dat is ontwikkeld door het SSN-SPARKS team in SemEval-2019 voor taak 9 (suggestie mining) maakt gebruik van een regelgebaseerde benadering voor feature selectie, SMOTE techniek voor data augmentatie en deep learning techniek (Convolutional Neural Network) voor classificatie. We hebben de resultaten vergeleken met Random Forest classifier (RF) en MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP) model. Resultaten tonen aan dat het CNN model beter presteert dan andere modellen voor beide subtaken.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва работата по извличане на предложения от онлайн рецензии и форуми. Извличането на мнения открива дали коментарите са положителни, отрицателни или неутрални, докато извличането на предложения изследва съдържанието на прегледа за възможни съвети или съвети. Системата, разработена от екипа на ССН-СПАРКС в СемЕвал-2019 за задача 9 (извличане на предложения), използва правило базиран подход за избор на функции, техника за увеличаване на данните и техника за дълбоко учене (Конволюционна неврална мрежа) за класификация. Сравнихме резултатите с модела на рандомен горски класификатор (РФ) и мултислоен перцептрон (МЛП). Резултатите показват, че моделът се представя по-добре от другите модели и за двете подзадачи.', 'de': 'Dieses Papier beschreibt die Arbeit zum Mining der Vorschläge aus Online-Rezensionen und Foren. Opinion Mining erkennt, ob die Kommentare positiv, negativ oder neutral sind, während Suggestion Mining den Bewertungsinhalt für mögliche Tipps oder Ratschläge untersucht. Das System, das vom SSN-SPARKS Team in SemEval-2019 für Aufgabe 9 (Suggestion Mining) entwickelt wurde, verwendet einen regelbasierten Ansatz zur Feature-Auswahl, SMOTE-Technik zur Datenaugmentation und Deep Learning-Technik (Convolutional Neural Network) zur Klassifizierung. Wir haben die Ergebnisse mit Random Forest Classifier (RF) und MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP) Modell verglichen. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass das CNN-Modell für beide Teilaufgaben besser abschneidet als andere Modelle.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan pekerjaan untuk menggabungkan saran dari penelitian dan forum online. Pencarian pendapat mendeteksi apakah komentar positif, negatif atau neutral, sementara saran penambangan mengeksplorasi isi penelitian untuk tips atau saran yang mungkin. Sistem yang dikembangkan oleh tim SSN-SPARKS di SemEval-2019 untuk tugas 9 (penambangan saran) menggunakan pendekatan berdasarkan aturan untuk seleksi fitur, teknik SMOTE untuk peningkatan data dan teknik belajar dalam (Jaringan Neural Konvelusional) untuk klasifikasi. Kami telah membandingkan hasilnya dengan model Random Forest classifier (RF) dan MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP). Hasil menunjukkan bahwa model CNN berhasil lebih baik dari model lain untuk kedua subtasks.', 'ko': '본고는 온라인 평론과 포럼에서 건의를 발굴하는 작업을 묘사하였다.의견 발굴은 평론이 긍정적인지, 부정적인지, 중성적인지, 건의발굴은 가능한 제시나 건의의 평론 내용을 탐색한다.SSN-SPARKS팀은SemEval-2019가 임무9(발굴 권장)로 개발한 시스템에서 규칙에 기반한 방법으로 특징 선택을 하고 SMOTE 기술로 데이터 강화를 하며 심도 있는 학습 기술(권적 신경 네트워크)을 사용하여 분류한다.결과는 무작위 포리스트 분류기(RF) 및 다중 감지기(MLP) 모델과 비교했다.그 결과 CNN 모델은 이 두 하위 임무에서 모두 다른 모델보다 우수하다는 것이 밝혀졌다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ کار را توصیف می\u200cکند که پیشنهاد\u200cهایی از بررسی\u200cهای آنلاین و فروموم\u200cها را خرید می\u200cکند. اخراج نظر مشخص می\u200cکند که آیا توضیح\u200cها مثبت، منفی یا غیرمستقل هستند، در حالی که توضیح\u200cهای اخراج\u200cکننده\u200cها محتوای تحقیق را برای توضیح\u200cهای ممکن یا نصیحت تحقیق می\u200cکند. سیستم توسط تیم SSN-SPARKS توسعه شده در نیم Eval-2019 برای کار ۹ (پیشنهاد خرید) از روش قانونی برای انتخاب ویژگی استفاده می\u200cکند، تکنیک SMOTE برای افزایش داده\u200cها و تکنیک یادگیری عمیق (شبکه عصبی معمولی) برای classification استفاده می\u200cکند. ما نتیجه\u200cها را با مدل مخلوط جنگل تصادفی (RF) و پرسپترن MultiLayer (MLP) مقایسه کردیم. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل سین\u200cان بهتر از مدل\u200cهای دیگر برای هر دو زیر سؤال انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea kazi ya uchimbaji wa mapendekezo kutoka kwenye mtazamo na majukwaa ya mtandaoni. Utafiti wa uchimbaji madini unagundua kama maoni yalikuwa chanya, hasi au katikati, wakati unapendekeza uchimbaji madini unagundua maudhui yanayowezekana kwa matatizo au ushauri. The system developed by SSN-SPARKS team in SemEval-2019 for task 9 (suggestion mining) uses a rule-based approach for feature selection, SMOTE technique for data augmentation and deep learning technique (Convolutional Neural Network) for classification.  Tumefananisha matokeo na mtindo wa Msitu wa Random (RF) na MLP (MLP). Matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa modeli ya CNN inafanya vizuri zaidi ya mifano mingine kwa kazi hizo mbili.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die werk om die voorstellings van online hersienings en forums te miner. Opinion mining beskry of die kommentaar positiewe, negatiewe of neutrale is, terwyl voorstel mining uitsoek die oorskouinhoud vir die moontlike tipes of raad. Die stelsel ontwikkel deur SSN-SPARKS-span in SemEval-2019 vir taak 9 (voorskriftemining) gebruik 'n reël-gebaseerde toegang vir funksie kies, SMOTE-tekniks vir data augmentasie en diep leer tekniks (Convolutional Neural Network) vir klassifikasie. Ons het vergelyk die resultate met Lukrake Voorskou klassifiseerder (RF) en MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP) model. Resultate wys dat die CNN model beter uitvoer as ander modele vir beide die subtaske.", 'sq': 'Kjo letër përshkruan punën mbi minierën e sugjerimeve nga kritikat dhe forumet online. Miniera e opinionit zbulon nëse komentet janë pozitive, negative apo neutrale, ndërsa sugjerimi minier eksploron përmbajtjen e shqyrtimit për këshilla apo këshilla të mundshme. Sistemi i zhvilluar nga ekipi SSN-SPARKS në SemEval-2019 për detyrën 9 (minierë sugjerimi) përdor një qasje bazuar në rregulla për zgjedhjen e karakteristikave, teknikën SMOTE për rritjen e të dhënave dhe teknikën e mësimit të thellë (Rrjeti Neural Konveolutiv) për klasifikimin. Kemi krahasuar rezultatet me modelin e klasifikuesit të pyllit të rastësishëm (RF) dhe MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP). Results show that the CNN model performs better than other models for both the subtasks.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የኢንተርኔት ድምፅ እና የፎርማት ጉዳዮችን ለመቀነስ የሚደረገውን ሥራ ይናገራል፡፡ የመስመር ግንኙነት አካባቢ፣ አካባቢ ወይም የውጤት መሆኑን ያስታውቃል፡፡ የሳምEval-2019 የስራ ጉዳይ 9 (መግለጫ ማቅረብ) የሥርዓት ጉዳይ ለመምረጥ የሥርዓት ጉዳይ፣ SMOTE የዳታ ማቀናጃ እና የጥልቅ ትምህርት (Convolution Neural Network) ለመግለጫ ይጠቅማል። ፍሬዎቹን አቀማመጥ የዱር ክፍልፍሎች (RF) እና MultiLayer Perceptron Results show that the CNN model is better than other models for both subtasks.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt onlayn raporları və forumların təsirlərini qurmaq haqqında işləri təsbit edir. Düşünmə madencisi məlumatların pozitif, negatif və nötrəlik olduğunu tanıyır, məlumatların madenciliyi mümkün nəsihətlər və nəsihətlər üçün görünüş məlumatını keşfetir. Sistem 9 task üçün SSN-SPARKS komandası tarafından tədbir edildi (tövsiyə madenci qurmaq üçün) fərqli seçmək üçün qayda-tabanlı tərzi, məlumatları artırmaq üçün SMOTE tekniki və dərin öyrənmək tekniki (Convolutional Neural Network) klasifikasyonu üçün istifadə edir. Biz sonuçlarını Random Forest classifier (RF) və MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP) modeli ilə saldıq. Sonuçlar CNN modelinin hər ikisi üçün daha yaxşı modellərini göstərir.', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը նկարագրում է ինտերնետ նախադասությունների և ֆորմերի առաջարկների հանքահանման աշխատանքը: Կարծում եմ, որ հանքահանումը բացահայտում է, արդյոք մոտեցումները դրական, բացասական կամ չեզոք են, մինչդեռ հանքահանումը առաջարկում է ուսումնասիրել վերանայման պարունակությունը հնարավոր խորհուրդների կամ խորհուրդ ՍՍN-Սպարքսի թիմի կողմից զարգացած համակարգը ՍեմԵվալ-2019-ում 9-ի (առաջարկներ հանքագործելու համար) օգտագործում է կանոններով հիմնված մոտեցում հատկանիշների ընտրության համար, SMOCE-ի տեխնիկա տվյալների աճի և խորը ուսումնասիրության տեխնիկա (Կանվոլյուցիոն Մենք համեմատեցինք արդյունքները պատահական անտառի դասակարգիչների (RF) և բազմաշերտ պերցեպտոնի (MLP) մոդելի հետ: Results show that the CNN model performs better than other models for both the subtasks.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje rad o rudarstvu prijedloga iz online pregleda i foruma. Miniranje mišljenja otkriva li su komentari pozitivni, negativni ili neutralni, dok je predloženje rudarstva istražuje sadržaj preglede mogućih savjeta ili savjeta. Sistem koji je razvijen SSN-SPARKS tim u semiEval-2019 za zadatak 9 (prijedlog rudarstva) koristi pravilni pristup za selekciju funkcija, SMOTE tehniku za povećanje podataka i duboko učenje tehnike (Konvolucionalna Neuralna mreža) za klasifikaciju. Usporedili smo rezultate sa slučajnim šumskim klasifikatorom (RF) i multilayer Perceptron (MLP) modelom. Rezultati pokazuju da CNN model izvodi bolje od drugih modela za obe podrške.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা অনলাইন পরিচালনা এবং ফোরাম থেকে প্রস্তাবের খনি করার ব্যাপারে কাজের বর্ণনা করেছে। মন্তব্য ইতিবাচক, নেতিবাচক বা নিরপেক্ষ কিনা, যদিও পরামর্শ দেয়া হচ্ছে সম্ভাব্য টিপস বা উপদেশের জন্য পুনরাবৃত্তির বিষয়বস্তু বিশে কাজ ৯ (পরামর্শ নির্বাচনের জন্য সিস্টেম এসএসএনএসপার্কেস টিমের উন্নয়ন করা হয়েছে, বৈশিষ্ট্য নির্বাচনের জন্য একটি নিয়মিত পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করেছে, তথ্য বাড়ানোর জন্য SMOTE প্রযুক্ত আমরা র\u200d্যান্ডোমাল বন বিভাগের (আরএফ) এবং বহুসংযুক্ত পার্সেপ্ট্রোন (এমএলপি) মডেলের সাথে তুলনা করেছি। ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে সিএনএন মডেল উভয় সাবটাসের জন্য অন্যান্য মডেলের চেয়ে ভালো কাজ করে।', 'ca': "This paper describes the work on mining the suggestions from online reviews and forums.  La mineria d'opinió detecta si els comentaris són positius, negatius o neutrals, mentre la mineria suggereix explorar el contingut de revisió per a les consells o consells possibles. El sistema desenvolupat per l'equip SSN-SPARKS a SemEval-2019 per la tasca 9 (mineria de suggeriments) utilitza un enfocament basat en regles per seleccionar característiques, tècnica SMOTE per augmentar les dades i tècnica d'aprenentatge profund (Red Neural Convolutional) per a classificar-se. Hem comparat els resultats amb el model de classificador Random Forest (RF) i MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP). Results show that the CNN model performs better than other models for both the subtasks.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz internet pārskatyşlaryň we forumlaryň maslahatlaryny köçürmek üçin işlerini tassyklaýar. Taýýarlyk maňaty kabul etmek üçin terjimeler pozitif, negatif ýa-da neutral diýip kabul edip bilmeýändigini tanyýar, mineriň maňaty mümkin tipler ýa maslahat üçin review maksadyny keşfedýär. SemEval-2019 tarapynda SSN-SPARKS topary tarapyndan geliştirilen sistemi gören 9 üçin (teklip taýýarlamak üçin) düzgün taýýarlama üçin düzgün taýýarlama taýýarlamasy üçin, SMOTE tekniki maglumaty we derin öwrenmek tekniki (Convolutional Neural Network) klasifikasyýasy üçin ullanýar. Sonuçlaryň Taýdalyk Forest klasifikatöri (RF) we MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP) modeli bilen karşılaşdyryldyk. Netijiler CNN nusgasynyň her iki alttalardan has gowy nusgalaryny edip barýandygyny görkezýär.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje práci na těžbě návrhů z online recenzí a fór. Mining opinion detekuje, zda jsou komentáře pozitivní, negativní nebo neutrální, zatímco mining návrhů zkoumá obsah recenze pro možné tipy nebo rady. Systém vyvinutý týmem SSN-SPARKS v SemEval-2019 pro úkol 9 (dolování suggestion) využívá přístup založený na pravidlech pro výběr funkcí, SMOTE techniku pro rozšíření dat a techniku hlubokého učení (Convolucionální neuronová síť) pro klasifikaci. Výsledky jsme porovnali s klasifikátorem Random Forest (RF) a MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP). Výsledky ukazují, že model CNN funguje lépe než ostatní modely pro oba dílčí úkoly.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse tööd veebiülevaatete ja foorumite soovituste kaevandamiseks. Arvamuste kaevandamine tuvastab, kas kommentaarid on positiivsed, negatiivsed või neutraalsed, samas kui soovituste kaevandamine uurib ülevaate sisu võimalike näpunäidete või nõuannete saamiseks. SSN-SPARKSi meeskonna poolt SemEval-2019 ülesandeks 9 (soovituste kaevandamine) välja töötatud süsteem kasutab reeglipõhist lähenemisviisi funktsioonide valimiseks, SMOTE tehnikat andmete suurendamiseks ja süvaõppe tehnikat (konvolutsiooniline neurovõrk) klassifitseerimiseks. Oleme võrrelnud tulemusi Random Forest klassifitseerija (RF) ja MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP) mudeliga. Tulemused näitavad, et CNN mudel toimib mõlema alamülesande puhul paremini kui teised mudelid.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan työtä, jolla haetaan ehdotuksia online-arvosteluista ja foorumeista. Opinion mining tunnistaa, ovatko kommentit positiivisia, negatiivisia vai neutraaleja, kun taas suggestion mining tutkii arvostelun sisältöä mahdollisten vinkkien tai neuvojen saamiseksi. SSN-SPARKS-tiimin SemEval-2019 tehtävään 9 (suggestion mining) kehittämä järjestelmä käyttää sääntöpohjaista lähestymistapaa ominaisuuksien valintaan, SMOTE-tekniikkaa datan lisäämiseen ja syväoppimistekniikkaa (konvolutional neural Network) luokitteluun. Tulokset on verrattu Random Forest Classificator (RF) ja MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP) -malliin. Tulokset osoittavat, että CNN-malli suoriutuu paremmin kuin muut mallit molemmissa alitehtävissä.', 'jv': 'Perintah iki dadi nggawé nggawe jajal kanggo nggawe tresnaning ing, suku winih karo perusahaan online politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Sistem Daftar nggawe bi SSN-SpaARKS group in semi-2011 for task 9 Two Ngomongé wong-wong kuwi model MT sing luwih luwih apik, dadi model sing luwih apik kanggo tarjamahan', 'ha': 'This paper describes the work on mining the suggestions from online reviews and forums.  Tsarin da ke ƙaranci ya gane cewa komai masu fara, negative ko neutral, kuma idan an shauri da ƙarami, sai ya nuna maɓallin kure wa shirin ayuka masu iya yiwuwa. @ item: inmenu Mun samfata matsalan da tsogi mai fassarar randa (RF) da multi-Layer Perceptron (MLP). Matarin ya nuna cewa misalin CNN na aikata mafi alhẽri daga misãlai masu ƙaranci wa abun aikin biyu.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את העבודה על הכרייה ההצעות מבחינות באינטרנט ופורמים. מכירת דעות מגלה אם ההערות חיוביות, שליליות או נוטרליות, בעוד הצעה מכירה חוקרת את תוכן ההערכה לטיפים או עצות אפשריים. המערכת שפותחת על ידי צוות SSN-SPARKS בסמיוול-2019 עבור משימה 9 (מכירת הצעה) משתמשת באמצעות גישה מבוססת על חוקים לבחירת תכונות, טכניקה SMOTE עבור גידול נתונים וטכניקת לימוד עמוק (רשת נוירולית קונבנולוצציונית) עבור קליזציה. We have compared the results with Random Forest classifier (RF) and MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP) model.  התוצאות מראות שהמודל CNN מציג מודלים טובים יותר משני השאלות.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje delo pri iskanju predlogov iz spletnih pregledov in forumov. Pridobivanje mnenja zazna, ali so komentarji pozitivni, negativni ali nevtralni, medtem ko pridobivanje predlogov preuči vsebino pregleda za morebitne nasvete ali nasvete. Sistem, ki ga je ekipa SSN-SPARKS razvila v SemEval-2019 za nalogo 9 (sugestivno rudarjenje), uporablja pristop, ki temelji na pravilih za izbiro funkcij, SMOTE tehniko za povečanje podatkov in tehniko globokega učenja (konvolucionalno nevralno omrežje) za klasifikacijo. Rezultate smo primerjali z modelom Random Forest Classificator (RF) in MultiLayer Perceptron (MLP). Rezultati kažejo, da je model CNN boljši od drugih modelov za obe podopravili.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་དང་འཚོལ་བ་དག་གི་བསམ་ཚུལ་སྐྱུར Opinion mining detects whether the comments are positive, negative or neutral, while suggestion mining explores the review content for the possible tips or advice. The system developed by SSN-SPARKS team in SemEval-2019 for task 9 (suggestion mining) uses a rule-based approach for feature selection, SMOTE technique for data augmentation and deep learning technique (Convolutional Neural Network) for classification. ང་ཚོས་འབྲུག་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་མཐའ་ཉུང་བའི་ནགས་ཚལ་དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བ་ཡོད། དབྱིབས་འབྲས་བ་ནི་CNN་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་subtasks་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གཞན་ལས་ལྡན་མི་སྟོན་ཐུབ་པ'}
{'en': 'Suggestion Miner at SemEval-2019 Task 9 : Suggestion Detection in Online Forum using Word Graph', 'ar': 'عامل منجم الاقتراحات في SemEval-2019 المهمة 9: اكتشاف الاقتراح في المنتدى عبر الإنترنت باستخدام Word Graph', 'pt': 'Minerador de Sugestões no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 9: Detecção de Sugestões no Fórum Online usando Word Graph', 'fr': "Suggestion Miner à la tâche 9 de SEMEVAL-2019\xa0: Détection de suggestions dans un forum en ligne à l'aide de Word", 'es': 'Suggestion Miner en SemEval-2019 Tarea 9: Detección de sugerencias en el foro en línea usando Word Graph', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019事9矿工:用Word Graph在线论坛中议', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019タスク9での提案マイナー: Word Graphを使用したオンラインフォーラムでの提案検出', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 9 पर सुझाव खनिक: वर्ड ग्राफ़ का उपयोग करके ऑनलाइन फोरम में सुझाव का पता लगाना', 'ru': 'Шахтер предложений на SemEval-2019 Задача 9: Обнаружение предложений в онлайн-форуме с использованием Word Graph', 'ga': 'Mianadóir Moltaí ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 9: Brath Moltaí san Fhóram Ar Líne ag úsáid Word Graph', 'ka': 'საზოგადომის მინიერი semiEval-2019 დავალება 9: საზოგადომის განახლება online ფორმის გამოყენებაში სიტყვა გრაფის გამოყენება', 'el': 'Εργασία 9: Ανίχνευση προτάσεων σε διαδικτυακό φόρουμ χρησιμοποιώντας το γράφημα λέξεων', 'hu': 'Javaslatbányász a SemEval-2019 9. feladat: Javaslatészlelés az online fórumban Word Graph használatával', 'it': 'Suggestion Miner a SemEval-2019 Task 9: Rilevazione dei suggerimenti nel forum online utilizzando Word Graph', 'kk': 'Жарым- 2019 тапсырмасындағы минерді таңдау 9- тапсырмасы: Телефон форумында сөз графигін қолдану үшін таңдау', 'lt': 'Pasiūlymų gavėjas SemEval-2019 m. 9 užduotis: pasiūlymų nustatymas internete forume naudojant žodžių grafiką', 'mk': 'Минер на предлози на SemEval-2019 задача 9: Детектирање на предлози во онлајн форум користејќи Word Graph', 'ms': 'Suggestion Miner at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Detection in Online Forum using Word Graph', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 9- ല്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള പരിപാടി: വാക്ക് ഗ്രാഫ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d ഫോറമിലുള്ള ശുപാര്\u200dശ്ച ഡി', 'mt': 'Suġġeriment Miner at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suġġeriment Detection in Online Forum using Word Graph', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Task 9: Онлайн форумын талаар санал дэвшүүлэгч Word Graph ашиглан', 'no': 'Førehandsvising Miner ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 9: Førehandsvising i nettforum med ordgraf', 'ro': 'Miner de sugestii la SemEval-2019 Activitatea 9: Detectarea sugestiilor în forumul online folosind Word Graph', 'pl': 'Suggestion Miner w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 9: Wykrywanie sugestii na forum online za pomocą wykresu Word Graph', 'sr': 'Предлагање минера на полевалу-2019 задача 9: Отказање предложенија у онлайн форум користећи графику речи', 'si': 'සෙම්වෙල්-2019 වැඩ 9 වල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ: වචනය ග්\u200dරාෆ් භාවිතා වි', 'so': 'Suggestion Miner at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Detection in Online Forum using Word Graph', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 9- ல் செய்யும் பரிந்துரை', 'sv': 'Förslag Miner på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 9: Upptäckt av förslag i onlineforum med Word Graph', 'ur': 'SemEval-2019 ٹاکس 9 میں سفارش مائنر کی پیشنهاد: اولین فورم میں سفارش پڑھنا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đề nghị khai thác mỏ tại nhiệm vụ SemEvl-209: Đề nghị phát hiện qua nội dung từ từ trên mạng', 'bg': 'Задача 9: Откриване на предложения в онлайн форум с помощта на графика', 'hr': 'Prijedlog rudara na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 9: otkrivanje prijedloga u online forumu koristeći Graf riječi', 'da': 'Forslag Miner på SemEval-2019 Opgave 9: Registrering af forslag i Online Forum ved hjælp af Word Graph', 'nl': 'Suggestie Miner bij SemEval-2019 Taak 9: Suggestiedetectie in Online Forum met behulp van Word Graph', 'id': 'Suggestion Miner di SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Detection in Online Forum using Word Graph', 'de': 'Suggestion Miner bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 9: Suggestion Detection im Online Forum mit Word Graph', 'fa': 'پیشنهاد معدنی در کار ۱۹۲۹: شناسایی پیشنهاد در فورم آنلاین با استفاده از گراف کلمه', 'sw': 'Suggestion Miner at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Detection in Online Forum using Word Graph', 'tr': 'Mazmunlar at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Detection in Online Forum using Word Graph', 'af': 'Voorskou Miner by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 9: Voorskou Opdekking in Aanlyn Forum gebruik Woordgraf', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019 작업 9: 텍스트 맵을 사용하여 온라인 포럼에서 권장 사항 테스트', 'sq': 'Suggestion Miner at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Detection in Online Forum using Word Graph', 'am': 'አድራሻ', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2019 কাজ ৯-এ প্রস্তাব মিনার: ওয়ার্ড গ্রাফ ব্যবহার করে অনলাইন ফোরামে প্রস্তাব গ্রাফ ব্যবহার করার পরামর্শ গ্রহণ', 'hy': 'Առաջարկումների հանքաքարարն է, որը տեղի է ունենում 2019 թվականի 9-րդ հանձնարարում. Առաջարկումների հայտնաբերումը առցանց ֆորմում, օգտագործելով Word Graffi', 'bs': 'Predloženje rudarstva na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 9: otkrivanje prijedloga u online forumu koristeći grafiku riječi', 'az': "SemEval-2019 Task 9: Online Forum'da Tövsiyə Görüş", 'et': 'Soovituste kaevandaja SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 9: Soovituste tuvastamine veebifoorumis Word Graphi abil', 'fi': 'Ehdotusten kaivaja SemEval-2019 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 9: Ehdotusten havaitseminen verkkofoorumissa Word Graphin avulla', 'ca': 'Suggestion Miner a SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Detection at Online Forum using Word Graph', 'cs': 'Návrhy Miner na SemEval-2019 Úkol 9: Detekce návrhů v online fóru pomocí Word Graph', 'jv': 'Suggestion Miner at seminval-2011 task 9: Suggestion detection in online forum use Word Graph', 'sk': 'Naloga 9: Zaznavanje predlogov v spletnem forumu s programom Word Graph', 'ha': '@ item: intable Text context menu item', 'he': 'מינר הצעות ב SemEval-2019 משימה 9: גילוי הצעות בפורום באינטרנט באמצעות גרף מילים', 'bo': 'Suggestion Miner at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Detection in Online Forum using Word Graph'}
{'en': 'This paper describes the suggestion miner system that participates in SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A-Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forums. The system participated in the subtasks A. This paper discusses the results of our system in the development, evaluation and post evaluation. Each class in the dataset is represented as directed unweighted graphs. Then, the comparison is carried out with each class graph which results in a vector. This vector is used as features by a machine learning algorithm. The model is evaluated on hold on strategy. The organizers randomly split (8500 instances) training set (provided to the participant in training their system) and testing set (833 instances). The test set is reserved to evaluate the performance of participants systems. During the evaluation, our system ranked 31 in the Coda Lab result of the subtask A (binary class problem). The binary class system achieves evaluation value 0.34, precision 0.87, recall 0.73 and F measure 0.78.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظام عامل منجم الاقتراحات الذي يشارك في SemEval 2019 Task 9 - SubTask A - اقتراح التنقيب من المراجعات والمنتديات عبر الإنترنت. شارك النظام في المهام الفرعية أ. تناقش هذه الورقة نتائج نظامنا في التطوير والتقييم وبعد التقييم. يتم تمثيل كل فئة في مجموعة البيانات على أنها رسوم بيانية موجهة غير مرجحة. بعد ذلك ، يتم إجراء المقارنة مع كل رسم بياني للفصل ينتج عنه متجه. يتم استخدام هذا المتجه كميزات بواسطة خوارزمية التعلم الآلي. يتم تقييم النموذج في انتظار الإستراتيجية. قام المنظمون بتقسيم مجموعة التدريب (8500 مثيل) بشكل عشوائي (تم توفيرها للمشارك في تدريب نظامهم) ومجموعة الاختبار (833 مثيل). مجموعة الاختبار محجوزة لتقييم أداء أنظمة المشاركين. أثناء التقييم ، احتل نظامنا المرتبة 31 في نتيجة Coda Lab للمهمة الفرعية A (مشكلة الطبقة الثنائية). يحقق نظام الفئة الثنائية قيمة التقييم 0.34 ، والدقة 0.87 ، واسترجاع 0.73 ، وقياس F 0.78.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve o sistema de mineração de sugestões que participa da Tarefa 9 do SemEval 2019 - Subtarefa A - Mineração de sugestões de avaliações e fóruns online. O sistema participou das subtarefas A. Este artigo discute os resultados do nosso sistema no desenvolvimento, avaliação e pós-avaliação. Cada classe no conjunto de dados é representada como gráficos não ponderados direcionados. Em seguida, a comparação é realizada com cada grafo de classe que resulta em um vetor. Esse vetor é usado como recursos por um algoritmo de aprendizado de máquina. O modelo é avaliado em espera na estratégia. Os organizadores dividiram aleatoriamente (8.500 instâncias) conjunto de treinamento (fornecido ao participante no treinamento de seu sistema) e conjunto de teste (833 instâncias). O conjunto de teste é reservado para avaliar o desempenho dos sistemas participantes. Durante a avaliação, nosso sistema ficou em 31º lugar no resultado do Coda Lab da subtarefa A (problema de classe binária). O sistema de classes binárias atinge o valor de avaliação 0,34, precisão 0,87, recall 0,73 e medida F 0,78.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit le système de mineur de suggestions qui participe à SemEval 2019 Task 9 - SubTask A - Suggestion Mining à partir de revues et de forums en ligne. Le système a participé aux sous-tâches A. Ce document traite des résultats de notre système dans le développement, l'évaluation et la post-évaluation. Chaque classe de l'ensemble de données est représentée sous forme de graphiques non pondérés orientés. Ensuite, la comparaison est effectuée avec chaque graphe de classe qui aboutit à un vecteur. Ce vecteur est utilisé comme fonctionnalités par un algorithme d'apprentissage automatique. Le modèle est évalué en fonction de la stratégie d'attente. Les organisateurs ont divisé aléatoirement (8500 instances) l'ensemble de formation (fourni au participant à la formation de son système) et le jeu de test (833 instances). L'ensemble de tests est réservé à l'évaluation des performances des systèmes participants. Au cours de l'évaluation, notre système s'est classé 31 dans le résultat Coda Lab de la sous-tâche A (problème de classe binaire). Le système de classe binaire atteint la valeur d'évaluation 0,34, la précision 0,87, le rappel 0,73 et la mesure F 0,78.", 'es': 'Este artículo describe el sistema de minería de sugerencias que participa en la Tarea 9 de SemEval 2019 - Subtarea A - Minería de sugerencias de revisiones y foros en línea. El sistema participó en las subtareas A. Este documento analiza los resultados de nuestro sistema en el desarrollo, la evaluación y la evaluación posterior. Cada clase del conjunto de datos se representa como gráficos no ponderados dirigidos. Luego, la comparación se lleva a cabo con cada gráfico de clase que da como resultado un vector. Un algoritmo de aprendizaje automático utiliza este vector como características. El modelo se evalúa en la estrategia de espera. Los organizadores dividieron aleatoriamente (8500 instancias) el conjunto de entrenamiento (proporcionado al participante en la capacitación de su sistema) y el conjunto de pruebas (833 instancias). El conjunto de pruebas está reservado para evaluar el rendimiento de los sistemas de los participantes. Durante la evaluación, nuestro sistema ocupó el puesto 31 en el Coda Lab como resultado de la subtarea A (problema de clase binaria). El sistema de clases binarias logra un valor de evaluación de 0.34, precisión de 0.87, recuperación de 0.73 y medida F de 0.78.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2019 Task 9 - SubTask A - Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forumsに参加する提案マイナーシステムについて説明する。システムは、サブタスクAに参加しました。本稿では、開発、評価、ポスト評価におけるシステムの結果について説明します。データセット内の各クラスは、指示された重み付けされていないグラフとして表されます。次に、各クラスのグラフと比較を行い、ベクトルを得ます。このベクトルは、機械学習アルゴリズムによって特徴として使用されます。モデルは保留中の戦略として評価されます。主催者は、トレーニングセット（ 8500インスタンス）とテストセット（ 833インスタンス）をランダムに分割します。テストセットは、参加者システムのパフォーマンスを評価するために予約されています。評価中、当社システムはサブタスクA （バイナリクラス問題）のCODAラボ結果で31位にランクインしました。バイナリクラスシステムは、評価値0.34、精度0.87、リコール0.73、Fメジャー0.78を達成する。', 'zh': '本文言预SemEval 2019务9 - 子职A - 自在线论论坛议所发掘矿工系统。 统与子职 A。 本文论我们的系统在开发,评估和后期评中的结果。 数集之类,皆有向无权重图。 然后校类图而得一向量。 此向量以机器学算法为特征。 于策暂停者,评模形。 组织者随机拆分(8500例)练集(给其统参与者)、试集(833)。 留该试集以评估参与者系统之性。 凡评估之际,统于子职A(二进制类)者Coda实验室排名第31位也。 二元系统至评估直0.34,精度0.87,召还0.73与F测0.78。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर सुझाव खनिक प्रणाली का वर्णन करता है जो SemEval 2019 कार्य 9 - SubTask A - ऑनलाइन समीक्षाओं और मंचों से सुझाव खनन में भाग लेता है। सिस्टम ने उप-कार्यों में भाग लिया ए। यह पेपर विकास, मूल्यांकन और पोस्ट मूल्यांकन में हमारी प्रणाली के परिणामों पर चर्चा करता है। डेटासेट में प्रत्येक वर्ग को निर्देशित अनवेटेड ग्राफ़ के रूप में दर्शाया गया है। फिर, तुलना प्रत्येक वर्ग ग्राफ के साथ की जाती है जिसके परिणामस्वरूप एक वेक्टर होता है। इस वेक्टर का उपयोग मशीन लर्निंग एल्गोरिथ्म द्वारा सुविधाओं के रूप में किया जाता है। मॉडल का मूल्यांकन रणनीति पर पकड़ पर किया जाता है। आयोजकों को बेतरतीब ढंग से विभाजित (8500 इंस्टेंस) प्रशिक्षण सेट (प्रतिभागी को उनके सिस्टम को प्रशिक्षण देने में प्रदान किया गया) और परीक्षण सेट (833 उदाहरण)। परीक्षण सेट प्रतिभागियों प्रणालियों के प्रदर्शन का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए आरक्षित है। मूल्यांकन के दौरान, हमारे सिस्टम को सबटास्क ए (बाइनरी क्लास समस्या) के कोडा लैब परिणाम में 31 वें स्थान पर रखा गया था। बाइनरी क्लास सिस्टम मूल्यांकन मान 0.34, परिशुद्धता 0.87, 0.73 को याद करता है और एफ 0.78 मापता है।', 'ru': 'В этом документе описывается система майнеров предложений, которая участвует в задаче 9 SemEval 2019 - Подзадача A - Майнинг предложений из онлайн-обзоров и форумов. Система участвовала в подзадачах А. В этой статье обсуждаются результаты нашей системы в разработке, оценке и пост-оценке. Каждый класс в наборе данных представлен в виде направленных невзвешенных графиков. Затем проводится сравнение с каждым графом классов, в результате которого получается вектор. Этот вектор используется в качестве признаков алгоритмом машинного обучения. Модель оценивается в режиме ожидания стратегии. Организаторы случайным образом разделили (8500 экземпляров) обучающий набор (предоставленный участнику в обучении своей системы) и тестовый набор (833 экземпляра). Тестовый набор зарезервирован для оценки эффективности систем участников. Во время оценки наша система заняла 31 место в результате Coda Lab по подзадаче A (задача двоичного класса). Система двоичных классов достигает оценочного значения 0,34, точности 0,87, вызова 0,73 и измерения F 0,78.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar an gcóras mianadóirí moltaí a ghlacann páirt i dTasc 9 SemEval 2019 - Fothasc A - Mianadóireacht Moltaí ó Athbhreithnithe agus Fóraim Ar Líne. Ghlac an córas páirt i bhfothascanna A. Pléann an páipéar seo torthaí ár gcóras maidir le forbairt, meastóireacht agus iarmheastóireacht. Léirítear gach rang sa tacar sonraí mar ghraif dhírithe neamhualaithe. Ansin, déantar comparáid le gach graf ranga a mbíonn veicteoir mar thoradh air. Úsáideann algartam meaisínfhoghlama an veicteoir seo mar ghnéithe. Déantar an tsamhail a mheas mar straitéis stoptha. Scoilt na heagraithe go randamach (8500 cás) tacair oiliúna (a cuireadh ar fáil don rannpháirtí agus a gcóras á oiliúint) agus tacair tástála (833 cás). Cuirtear an tacar tástála in áirithe chun feidhmíocht chórais na rannpháirtithe a mheas. Le linn na meastóireachta, bhí ár gcóras rangaithe 31 i dtoradh Coda Lab ar fhothasc A (fadhb aicme dhénártha). Baineann an córas ranga dénártha luach meastóireachta amach 0.34, cruinneas 0.87, aisghlaoch 0.73 agus tomhas F 0.78.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი აღწერს მინიერის სისტემა, რომელიც semiEval 2019 დავალება 9 - SubTask A - წარმოდგენების მინიერება Online Revisions and Forums-დან. სისტემა A-ში დაწყვეტილია. ეს წიგნი ჩვენი სისტემას შედეგების განვითარებაში, განსაზღვრებაში და პოსტის განსაზღვრებაში. ყველა კლასი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში იქნება, როგორც განსაზღვრებული არაფერი გრაფიკი. შემდეგ, ყველა კლასის გრაფიკით, რომელიც გვექტორის შემდეგ გადასრულება. ეს გვქტორი გამოყენება მაქსინის სწავლების ალგორიტიმზე. მოდელის შესახებ სტრატიგიის შესახებ გაუმუშავება. ორგანიზატორები შემთხვევაში გაყოფილი (8500 ინსტენსტი) სტრიქციის ნაწილი (მისი სისტემის განაკეთებაში მომხმარებელი) და ტესტის ნაწილი (833 ინსტენსტი). ტესტის სექტის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი სექტიმების შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი. ჩვენი სისტემა კოდეა ლაბოში A-ის (ბიუნური კლასის პრობლემა) გადაწყვეტილია 31 წერტილი. ბიუნარი კლასის სისტემა მიიღება 0.34, precision 0.87, შემხსენება 0.73 და F ზომა 0.78.', 'el': 'Αυτή η εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημα ορυχείων προτάσεων που συμμετέχει στην εργασία 9.Υποεργασία Α. Το σύστημα συμμετείχε στις δευτερεύουσες εργασίες Α. Η παρούσα εργασία συζητά τα αποτελέσματα του συστήματός μας στην ανάπτυξη, αξιολόγηση και μετα-αξιολόγηση. Κάθε τάξη στο σύνολο δεδομένων αντιπροσωπεύεται ως κατευθυνόμενα μη σταθμισμένα γραφήματα. Στη συνέχεια, η σύγκριση γίνεται με κάθε γράφημα τάξης που οδηγεί σε ένα διάνυσμα. Αυτό το διάνυσμα χρησιμοποιείται ως χαρακτηριστικά από έναν αλγόριθμο μηχανικής μάθησης. Το μοντέλο αξιολογείται σε αναμονή στρατηγικής. Οι διοργανωτές διαχωρίζουν τυχαία (8500 περιπτώσεις) εκπαιδευτικό σύνολο (παρέχεται στον συμμετέχοντα στην εκπαίδευση του συστήματός τους) και δοκιμαστικό σύνολο (833 περιπτώσεις). Το σετ δοκιμών προορίζεται για την αξιολόγηση της απόδοσης των συστημάτων συμμετεχόντων. Κατά τη διάρκεια της αξιολόγησης, το σύστημά μας κατατάχθηκε 31 στο αποτέλεσμα του εργαστηρίου Coda της υποτάξεως Α (πρόβλημα δυαδικής τάξης). Το δυαδικό σύστημα τάξης επιτυγχάνει την αξία αξιολόγησης 0.34, ακρίβεια 0.87, ανάκληση 0.73 και μέτρο Φ 0.78.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval 2019 feladat 9 - A alfeladat - javaslatbányászat online értékelésekből és fórumokból. A rendszer részt vett az A. alcsoportokban. Ez a tanulmány a rendszer fejlesztési, értékelési és utóértékelési eredményeit tárgyalja. Az adathalmaz minden osztályát irányított, súlytalan grafikonként jelenítik meg. Ezután az összehasonlítást minden osztálygrafonnal végezzük, ami vektort eredményez. Ezt a vektort egy gépi tanulási algoritmus szolgáltatásként használja. A modell értékelése várakozási stratégiával történik. A szervezők véletlenszerűen osztották meg (8500 példány), képzéskészletet (amelyet a résztvevő a rendszerük oktatásában biztosított) és tesztkészletet (833 példány). A tesztkészlet a résztvevői rendszerek teljesítményének értékelésére szolgál. Az értékelés során rendszerünk a Coda Lab eredményében 31. helyezett lett az A részfeladat (bináris osztály probléma). A bináris osztályrendszer értéke 0,34, precízió 0,87, visszahívás 0,73 és F mérés 0,78.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive il sistema miner di suggerimenti che partecipa a SemEval 2019 Task 9 - SubTask A - Suggestion Mining da recensioni e forum online. Il sistema ha partecipato alle sottoattività A. Questo articolo discute i risultati del nostro sistema nello sviluppo, valutazione e post valutazione. Ogni classe nel set di dati è rappresentata come grafici diretti non ponderati. Poi, il confronto viene effettuato con ogni grafico di classe che si traduce in un vettore. Questo vettore è usato come caratteristiche da un algoritmo di apprendimento automatico. Il modello viene valutato in attesa di strategia. Gli organizzatori dividono casualmente (8500 istanze) il set di allenamento (fornito al partecipante nell'addestramento del proprio sistema) e il set di test (833 istanze). Il set di test è riservato per valutare le prestazioni dei sistemi partecipanti. Durante la valutazione, il nostro sistema si è classificato 31 nel risultato Coda Lab della sottomissione A (problema di classe binaria). Il sistema di classe binaria raggiunge valori di valutazione 0,34, precisione 0,87, richiamo 0,73 e F misura 0,78.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma siūlymų gavėjų sistema, kuri dalyvauja 2019 m. pusmečio vertinime 9 užduotis – A posėdis – siūlymų gavyba iš internetinių peržiūrų ir forumų. Sistema dalyvavo A paklausimuose. Šiame dokumente aptariami mūsų sistemos rezultatai rengiant, vertinant ir po vertinimo. Kiekviena duomenų rinkinio klasė pateikiama kaip nukreiptas svertinis grafikas. Tada palyginama su kiekvienu klasės grafiku, kuris sukelia vektorių. Šis vektorius naudojamas kaip savybės pagal mašinų mokymosi algoritmą. Modelis vertinamas laukiant strategijos. Organizatoriai atsitiktinai padalijo (8500 atvejų) mokymo rinkinį (teikiamą jų sistemos mokymo dalyviui) ir bandymų rinkinį (833 atvejai). Bandymų rinkinys skirtas dalyvių sistemų veiksmingumui įvertinti. Vertinimo metu mūsų sistema klasifikuota 31 kodų laboratorijos A (dviejų klasių problema) rezultatu. The binary class system achieves evaluation value 0.34, precision 0.87, recall 0.73 and F measure 0.78.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува системот на сугерирани минери кој учествува во SemEval 2019 задача 9 - Subtask A - Suggestion Mining од онлајн преглед и форуми. Системот учествуваше во потпрашањата А. Овој документ ги дискутира резултатите на нашиот систем во развојот, евалуацијата и постевалуацијата. Секоја класа во датотеката е претставена како директирани нетежирани графики. Потоа, споредбата се спроведува со секој клас граф кој резултира со вектор. Овој вектор се користи како карактеристика од алгоритм за машинско учење. The model is evaluated on hold on strategy.  The organizers randomly split (8500 instances) training set (provided to the participant in training their system) and testing set (833 instances).  The test set is reserved to evaluate the performance of participants systems.  За време на проценката, нашиот систем се рангираше на 31 во резултатот на кода лабораторијата на подпрашањето А (бинарен проблем на класата). Бинарниот систем постигнува вредност за проценка 0,34, прецизност 0,87, повлекување 0,73 и мерка F 0,78.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2019 жылдың жарым- бағандағы 9- тапсырмасында қатысу жүйесін - Онлайн редакцияларынан және форумында қатысу үшін бағалау жүйесін таңдайды. Бұл қағаз жүйеміздің жасау, оқу және соңғы оқу жүйесінің нәтижелерін талқылады. Деректер жиындағы әрбір класы бағытталмаған графиктер ретінде көрсетіледі. Содан кейін, салыстырылуы вектордың нәтижесі бар әрбір класс графикамен істейді. Бұл вектор машинаны оқыту алгоритмі ретінде қолданылады. Бұл үлгі стратегия тұрғанда бағалады. Орындаушылар кездейсоқ бөліп (8500 инстанциялар) оқыту бағдарламасы (жүйесінде қатысушыға келтірілген) және сынақтар бағдарламасы (833 инстанциялар). Қатысушылар жүйесінің істемін бағалау үшін сынақтар жинақталған. Бағалау кезінде, біздің жүйеміз Кода лабораториясының A (бинарлық класс мәселесінің 31- сынып) жазылды. Бинарлық класс жүйесі 0, 34, 0, 87, 0, 73 және F өлшемі 0, 78 деп саналады.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem penambang cadangan yang berpartisipasi dalam SemEval 2019 Task 9 - SubTask A - Suġġestion Mining dari Reviews Online dan Forum. Sistem ini berpartisipasi dalam sub-tanya A. Kertas ini membahas keputusan sistem kita dalam pembangunan, penilaian dan penilaian selepas. Setiap kelas dalam set data diwakili sebagai graf tidak berat direksi. Kemudian, perbandingan dilakukan dengan setiap graf kelas yang menghasilkan vektor. Vektor ini digunakan sebagai ciri-ciri oleh algoritma pembelajaran mesin. Model diteliti dalam menunggu strategi. Pengurus dibahagi secara rawak (8500 kes) set latihan (diberikan kepada peserta dalam latihan sistem mereka) dan set ujian (833 kes). Set ujian disimpan untuk menilai prestasi sistem peserta. Semasa penilaian, sistem kami ditangkap 31 dalam hasil Coda Lab dari subtask A (masalah kelas binari). Sistem kelas binari mencapai nilai penilaian 0.34, ketepatan 0.87, ingat 0.73 dan F ukuran 0.78.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ടാസ്ക് 9 - സബ്ട്ടാക്ക് A - ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d റിവിവ്യുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഫോറമില്\u200d നിന്നും മിന സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d പങ്കെടുത്തത് A. ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d പങ്കെടുത്തത് നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് വികസിക് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റിലെ ഓരോ ക്ലാസ്സും നേര്\u200dവഴിയില്ലാത്ത ഗ്രാഫുകളായി പ്രതിനിധിയിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ ഒരു വെക്റ്റര്\u200dക്ക് കൊടുക്കുന്ന ഓരോ ക്ലാസ് ഗ്രാഫുമായി താല്\u200dപ്പര്യം നടത്തുന്നു. ഈ വെക്ടര്\u200d അല്\u200dഗോരിതം പഠിക്കുന്ന യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ വിശേഷതകളായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പിടിച്ചു നില്\u200dക്കുന്നതില്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d വിലയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d (8500 നിലപാടുകള്\u200d) പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d പങ്കാളികള്\u200dക്ക് (അവരുടെ സിസ്റ്റം പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d പങ്കാളികള്\u200dക്ക് നല്\u200dകിയ പങ്കുകാളികളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രകടനം പരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d പരീക്ഷ സജ്ജീകരിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. പരിഗണനത്തിനുള്ള സമയത്ത്, നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ കോഡ ലാബില്\u200d 31 ന്റെ പരിപാടി എ (ബൈനരി ക്ലാസിന്റെ പ്രശ്നം ബൈനറി ക്ലാസ്റ്റ് സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ മൂല്യം 0. 34, പ്രിസിഷന്\u200d 0. 87, 0. 73 എന്നിവയെ ഓര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുക 0. 78.', 'mt': "Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema ta' suġġerimenti għall-minjieri li tipparteċipa f'SemEval 2019 Task 9 - SubTask A - Suġġeriment Mining minn Reviżjonijiet Online u Forums. Is-sistema pparteċipat fis-sottomistoqsijiet A. Dan id-dokument jiddiskuti r-riżultati tas-sistema tagħna fl-iżvilupp, l-evalwazzjoni u l-evalwazzjoni ta’ wara. Kull klassi fis-sett tad-dejta hija rrappreżentata bħala grafiċi mhux peżati diretti. Imbagħad, it-tqabbil isir ma’ kull graff tal-klassi li jirriżulta f’vettur. Dan il-vettur jintuża bħala karatteristiċi minn algoritmu tat-tagħlim bil-magna. Il-mudell huwa evalwat fuq żmien twil mill-istrateġija. L-organizzaturi maqsuma b’mod każwali (8500 każ) sett ta’ taħriġ (ipprovdut lill-parteċipant fit-taħriġ tas-sistema tagħhom) u sett ta’ ttestjar (833 każ). Is-sett tat-test huwa riżervat biex jevalwa l-prestazzjoni tas-sistemi tal-parteċipanti. Matul l-evalwazzjoni, is-sistema tagħna kklassifikat 31 fir-riżultat tal-Coda Lab tas-sottodomanda A (problema tal-klassi binarja). Is-sistema tal-klassi binarja tikseb valur ta’ evalwazzjoni 0.34, preċiżjoni 0.87, tfakkar lura 0.73 u miżura F 0.78.", 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver minningssystemet som deltar i halvEval 2019 oppgåve 9 – Sub-oppgåve A – Førsel for mining frå nettverksområde og forum. Systemet delta i underspørjinga A. Denne papiret diskuterer resultatet av systemet vårt i utviklinga, evalueringa og post-evalueringa. Kvar klasse i datasettet vert representert som direkte uvekt grafikk. Deretter vert sammenlikninga utført med kvar klassegraf som resulterer i ein vektor. Denne vektoren vert brukt som funksjonar av ein maskinelæringsalgoritme. Modellen er evaluert ved å holde strategi. Opplæring sett av organisatorene tilfeldig delt (8500 instansar) og testsett (833 instansar). Testsettet er reservert for å evaluera utviklinga av deltakarsystemet. I løpet av evalueringa, systemet vår rangert 31 i Coda Lab-resultatet av underspørjinga A (binærklasseproblem). Binærklassesystemet oppnår evalueringsverdien 0,34, nøyaktig 0,87, rekna ut 0,73 og F mål 0,78.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас 2019 оны SemEval-д оролцож буй санал зохиолчдын системийг тайлбарладаг. Энэ цаас нь бидний системийн үр дүнг хөгжүүлэх, үнэлгээ, дараагийн үнэлгээ дэвшүүлэх боломжтой. Өгөгдлийн хэлбэрийн хичээл бүр жингээгүй график гэж дүрслэгддэг. Дараа нь, харьцуулалт нь векторын үр дүнтэй хичээл бүрт хийгддэг. Энэ вектор машин суралцах алгоритмын хувьд хэрэглэгддэг. Загвар нь стратегийг хүлээн зөвшөөрсөн. Организагчид санамсаргүй хуваагдаж (8500 instances) сургалтын сургалтыг (системийг сургалтын оролцогчид хангалттай) шалгалтын сургалтыг (833 instances). Шинжлэх суурь нь оролцогчдын системийн үйл ажиллагааг үнэлэхэд хадгалагдсан. Баталгааны үед бидний систем Кодаа Лаборт А-ын (хоёр дахь хичээл асуудал) дээр 31-р байрлалтай байлаа. Хоёрдугаар хичээлийн систем 0.34, 0.87, 0.73, F 0.78 хэмжээг санаж байна.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje system górnika sugestii, który uczestniczy w SemEval 2019 Zadanie 9.Podzadanie A.Suggestion Mining z recenzji i forów online. System uczestniczył w podzadaniach A. W niniejszym artykule omówiono wyniki naszego systemu w rozwoju, ocenie i ocenie post. Każda klasa w zbiorze danych jest reprezentowana jako ukierunkowane nieważone wykresy. Następnie porównanie przeprowadza się z każdym wykresem klasy, który powoduje wektor. Ten wektor jest używany jako cechy przez algorytm uczenia maszynowego. Model jest oceniany w momencie zatrzymania strategii. Organizatorzy losowo dzielą (8500 instancji) zestaw szkoleniowy (dostarczony uczestnikowi szkolenia swojego systemu) i zestaw testowy (instancje 833). Zestaw testowy jest zarezerwowany do oceny wydajności systemów uczestników. Podczas oceny nasz system umieścił 31 w wyniku Coda Lab podzadania A (problem klasy binarnej). System klasy binarnej osiąga wartość oceny 0.34, precyzję 0.87, przywołanie 0.73 i miarę F 0.78.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul miner de sugestii care participă la SemEval 2019 Task 9 - SubTask A - Suggestion Mining din recenzii și forumuri online. Sistemul a participat la subactivitățile A. Această lucrare discută rezultatele sistemului nostru în dezvoltare, evaluare și post evaluare. Fiecare clasă din setul de date este reprezentată ca grafice direcționate necântărite. Apoi, comparația este efectuată cu fiecare grafic de clasă care rezultă într-un vector. Acest vector este folosit ca caracteristici de un algoritm de învățare automată. Modelul este evaluat în așteptare pe strategie. Organizatorii au împărțit aleatoriu (8500 instanțe) setul de instruire (furnizat participantului la instruirea sistemului său) și setul de testare (833 instanțe). Setul de teste este rezervat pentru a evalua performanța sistemelor participanților. În timpul evaluării, sistemul nostru a clasat 31 în rezultatul Coda Lab al subactivității A (problema clasei binare). Sistemul de clasă binară atinge valoarea de evaluare 0,34, precizie 0,87, rechemare 0,73 și F măsură 0,78.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem prijedloga rudarstva koji sudjeluje u zadatku 9 iz polovice 2019. godine - SubTask A - Suggestivanje rudarstva iz Online Review i Foruma. Sistem je sudjelovao u podrazumijevanju A. Ovaj papir razgovara o rezultatima našeg sistema u razvoju, procjeni i post procjeni. Svaka klasa u setu podataka predstavlja se kao direktivni neoteženi grafik. Onda se usporedba provede sa svakim klasnom grafikom koji rezultira vektoru. Ovaj vektor se koristi kao karakteristika algoritma za učenje mašine. Model se procjenjuje na održavanju strategije. Organizatori su slučajno podelili (8500 slučajeva) obuku (pružen učesniku u obuci njihovog sistema) i setu testiranja (833 slučajeva). Nastava testiranja je rezervisana kako bi procenila provedbu sustava sudionika. Tokom procjene, naš sistem je u laboratoriji Coda rezultat podpitanja A (problem sa binarnim klasom). Sistem binarne klase postiže vrijednost procjene 0,34, preciznost 0,87, sjeti se 0,73 i F mjere 0,78.', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu ku qoraa nidaamka laga jeedo wax yar yar ee ka qayb gala SemEval 2019 Shaqadda 9 - Sub-Task A - Suggestiisa Mining ka soo jeeda Internetka Reviews and Forums. nidaamka wuxuu ka qeybqaaday meelaha hoose ee A. Warqaddaas wuxuu ka sheekaynayaa resultinta nidaamka horumarinta, qiimeynta iyo qiimeynta kadib. Fasalka macluumaadka waxaa looga jeedaa tusaale aan la hagin. Markaas is-barbardhigga waxaa lagu sameeyaa fasalka oo dhan, taas oo sababto wado. Vectorkan waxaa loo isticmaalaa qalabka barashada maamulka. Tusaalada waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa qoraalka ku haysta. Waxqabayaashu waxay si rasmi ah u kala qeybiyeen (tusaale ahaan 8500) waxbarasho (taas oo loo siiyay kuwa ka qeybqaatay waxbarashada nidaamka) iyo saxda imtixaanka (dhacdooyinka 833). Lambarka imtixaanka waxaa loo kaydiyey in lagu qiimeeyo sameynta nidaamka dadka ka qeybqaatay. Inta lagu qiimeynayo, nidaamkayagu wuxuu ka soo baxay 31 koob ee Coda Lab sababtiisa sub-safka A (dhibaatada fasalka labaad). Tirada fasalka labaad wuxuu gaadhaa qiimeynta 0.34, saxda 0.87, xasuuso 0.73 iyo F qiyaasta 0.78.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver förslaget miner system som deltar i SemEval 2019 Task 9 - SubTask A - Förslag Mining from Online Reviews and Forums. Systemet deltog i deluppgifterna A. Denna uppsats diskuterar resultaten av vårt system i utveckling, utvärdering och efterutvärdering. Varje klass i datauppsättningen representeras som riktade ovägtade grafer. Sedan utförs jämförelsen med varje klassgraf vilket resulterar i en vektor. Denna vektor används som funktioner av en maskininlärningsalgoritm. Modellen utvärderas i väntan på strategi. Arrangörerna delade slumpmässigt (8500 instanser) träningsset (tillhandahållit deltagarna i utbildningen av sitt system) och testset (833 instanser). Testuppsättningen är reserverad för att utvärdera deltagarsystemens prestanda. Under utvärderingen rankades vårt system 31 i Coda Lab-resultatet av underuppgiften A (binärt klassproblem). Det binära klasssystemet uppnår utvärderingsvärde 0,34, precision 0,87, återkallelse 0,73 och F mått 0,78.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරනවා සම්වේල 2019 වැඩ 9 - Sub- වැඩ A - අන්ලයාන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  පද්ධතිය A සබ්ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඇතුලත් වුනා. දත්ත සෙට් වල හැම ප්\u200dරධානයක්ම ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැති විශාල චිත්\u200dරපට වගේ. ඊට පස්සේ, වෙක්ටර් වලට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන හැම ප්\u200dරමාණ ග්\u200dරාෆ් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා. මේ වෙක්ටර් පද්ධතිය ඉගෙන ගන්න අල්ගෝරිතම් වලින් භාවිත වෙනවා. මොඩේල් එක විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ. සංයෝජනකයන්ට සැකසුම් විතරයි (8500 සැකසුම් සැකසුම්) ප්\u200dරශ්නය සැකසුම (ඔවුන්ගේ පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ පරීක්ෂණ සෙට් සුරක්ෂා කරලා අංශිත වැඩසටහන් කරන්න. විශ්ලේෂණය වෙලාවට, අපේ පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය කෝඩා ලේබ් එකේ අභිප්\u200dරශ්ණය A (බායිනාරි ප්\u200dරශ්ණය) ප්\u200dරශ බායිනාරි ක්ලාස් පද්ධතිය 0.34 විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණය, 0.87 විශ්ලේෂණය, 0.73 විශ්ලේෂණය 0.78 විශ්ලේෂණය', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval 2019 செயல் 9 - உப பணி A - இணைய முன்னோட்டங்கள் மற்றும் Forums இருந்து குறைந்த பரிந்துரைக்கும் சிறிய கணினி A. துணை பணிகளில் அமைப்பு பகிர்ந்தது. இந்த காகிதத்தில் எங்கள் கணினியின் முடிவுகளை உருவாக்கு, மதிப்பிடுதல் மற்றும் பின்  தரவுத்தளத்தில் உள்ள ஒவ்வொரு வகுப்பும் காட்டப்படாத வரைப்படமாக குறிக்கப்படும். பிறகு, ஒப்பீடு ஒவ்வொரு வகுப்பு வரைப்படத்துடன் செயல்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, அது வெக்டார் ஆகும். இயந்திரத்தை கற்றுக் கொண்டு இந்த நெறியின் தன்மைகளாக பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. திட்டத்தை பிடித்துக் கொண்டு மாதிரி மதிப்பிடப்படுகிறது. அமைப்பாளர்கள் குறிப்பில்லாமல் (8500 நிகழ்வுகள்) பயிற்சி அமைப்புகள் (தங்கள் கணினியில் பங்காளிகளுக்கு வழங்கப்பட்ட) மற்றும் சோதன பரிசோதனை அமைப்புகளின் செயல்பாட்டை மதிப்பிட வேண்டும் மதிப்பிடும் போது, எங்கள் அமைப்பு கோடா லாப் முறைமையில் 31 வரிசையில் உள்ளது A (இருமுறை வகுப்பு பிரச்சனை). இருநிலை வகுப்பு அமைப்பு மதிப்பின் மதிப்பு 0. 34, துல்லியம் 0. 87, 0. 73 மற்றும் F அளவு 0. 78 நினைவு கொள்கிறது.', 'ur': 'This paper describes the suggestion miner system that participates in SemEval 2019 Task 9 - SubTask A - Suggestion Mining from Online Review and Forums. سیسٹم نے A کے سپٹسٹ میں شریک ہوا. یہ کاغذ ہمارے سیسٹم کے نتائج توسعہ، ارزیابی اور پست ارزیابی میں بحث کرتا ہے. ڈاٹ سٹ میں ہر کلاس کی نمایش کی جاتی ہے بغیروزن گراف کی طرح۔ پھر، مقایسہ ہر کلاس گراف کے ساتھ کیا جاتا ہے جو ایک ویکتور میں نتیجہ پاتا ہے. This vector is used as features by a machine learning algorithm. مدل استراتژی کے ذریعے مطالبہ کیا جاتا ہے۔ سازمان کرنے والے randomly split (8500 instances) training set (provided to the participant in training their system) and testing set (833 instances). ٹیسٹ سٹ کے ذریعہ شرکت کرنے والوں کی فعالیت کا ارزش کرنے کے لئے ذخیره کیا گیا ہے. ارزیابی کے موقع، ہماری سیسٹم نے کوڈا لاب میں 31 درجے کا نتیجہ A (بیناری کلاس مسئلہ) کی۔ بیناری کلاس سیسٹم 0.34، دقیق 0.87، 0.73 اور F اندازہ 0.78 کو یاد کرو.', 'uz': "Bu hujjat SemEval 2019 Vazifa 9 - Uzifa A - Online Koʻrib chiqish va Forumlardan foydalanishni taʼrifi qiladi. Name Maʼlumotlar sahifadagi har bir sinfi oʻrnatilmagan grafik sifatida koʻrsatiladi. Then, the comparison is carried out with each class graph which results in a vector.  Name Usul strategiya bilan ishlashga qiymatdir. Tasodifiy (8500 darajalar) taʼminlovchilar tizimni taʼminlashga ega boʻlganligi va sinov moslamalari (833 xususiyatlar). Name Tavalu paytida, bizning tizimmiz Coda Lab'da 31 ta'mincha yuqori A (ikkita sinf muammolari). Ikkita sinf tizimi qiymatni 0. 34, murakkab 0. 87, 0. 73 va F tizimni 0. 78 qoladi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống mìn góp ý tham gia vào Nhiệm vụ SemEvl 209 - SubTask A- Khuyên dò tìm từ tạp chí lướt và cung cấp qua mạng. Hệ thống đã tham gia vào phần A. Bài báo này thảo luận về kết quả của hệ thống trong việc phát triển, đánh giá và đánh giá sau. Mỗi lớp trong tập tin được đại diện như những biểu đồ chỉ đạo không có tám. Sau đó, so sánh được thực hiện với mỗi đồ thị lớp dẫn đến một véc- tơ. Giá trị này được sử dụng như tính năng của thuật toán học máy. Mô hình được đánh giá dựa trên chiến lược. Các tổ chức chia cắt ngẫu nhiên (trường hợp 8500) tập luyện (cung cấp cho người tham gia huấn luyện hệ thống của họ) và các bộ thử nghiệm (trường hợp 833). Bộ thử nghiệm được dành riêng để đánh giá khả năng của hệ thống diễn viên. Trong phần đánh giá, hệ thống của chúng tôi xếp hạng 31 trong kết quả của Coda Lab (Lớp nhị phân). Hệ thống phân loại nhị phân đạt được giá trị đánh giá 0.34, độ chính xác 0.87, triệu hồi 0.73 và F thước đo 0.78.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver det forslag miner system, der deltager i SemEval 2019 Opgave 9 - SubTask A - Forslag minering fra online anmeldelser og fora. Systemet deltog i underopgaverne A. Denne artikel diskuterer resultaterne af vores system i udvikling, evaluering og efterevaluering. Hver klasse i datasættet repræsenteres som rettede uvægtede grafer. Derefter udføres sammenligningen med hver klassegraf, som resulterer i en vektor. Denne vektor bruges som funktioner af en maskinlæringsalgoritme. Modellen evalueres på hold på strategi. Arrangørerne delte tilfældigt (8500 forekomster) træningssæt (leveret til deltageren i træningen af deres system) og testsæt (833 forekomster). Testsættet er forbeholdt til at evaluere deltagernes systemers ydeevne. Under evalueringen rangerede vores system 31 i Coda Lab resultatet af underopgaven A (binær klasse problem). Det binære klassesystem opnår evalueringsværdi 0,34, præcision 0,87, tilbagekaldelse 0,73 og F mål 0,78.', 'de': 'Dieses Papier beschreibt das Suggestion Miner System, das an SemEval 2019 Task 9.SubTask A-Suggestion Mining aus Online Reviews und Foren beteiligt ist. Das System beteiligte sich an den Teilaufgaben A. In dieser Arbeit werden die Ergebnisse unseres Systems in der Entwicklung, Evaluation und Nachevaluation diskutiert. Jede Klasse im Datensatz wird als gerichtete ungewichtete Graphen dargestellt. Anschließend wird der Vergleich mit jedem Klassengraphen durchgeführt, was zu einem Vektor führt. Dieser Vektor wird von einem Algorithmus für maschinelles Lernen als Merkmale verwendet. Das Modell wird in der Warteschleife der Strategie evaluiert. Die Organisatoren teilen zufällig (8500 Instanzen) Trainingsset (dem Teilnehmer beim Training seines Systems zur Verfügung gestellt) und Testset (833 Instanzen). Das Testset ist reserviert, um die Leistung der Teilnehmersysteme zu bewerten. Während der Evaluation rangierte unser System 31 im Coda Lab Ergebnis des Subtasks A (Binärklassenproblem). Das binäre Klassensystem erreicht Auswertungswert 0.34, Präzision 0.87, Rückruf 0.73 und F Maß 0.78.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва идеята миньорска система, която участва в Задача 9 - Подзадача А - Предложение миньорство от онлайн рецензии и форуми. Системата участва в подзадачите В настоящата статия се разглеждат резултатите от нашата система при разработването, оценката и следоценката. Всеки клас в набора от данни е представен като насочени неотеглени графики. След това сравнението се извършва с всяка класа графика, която води до вектор. Този вектор се използва като функции от алгоритъм за машинно обучение. Моделът се оценява при изчакване на стратегията. Организаторите на случаен принцип разделиха (8500 инстанции) тренировъчния комплект (предоставен на участника в обучението на тяхната система) и тестовия комплект (833 инстанции). Тестовият комплект е запазен за оценка на ефективността на системите на участниците. По време на оценката нашата система се класира на 31 в резултат на подзадачата А (проблем с двоичен клас). Системата от двоичен клас постига стойност за оценка 0,34, точност 0,87, връщане 0,73 и мярка 0,78.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem prijedloga rudarstva koji sudjeluje u zadatku 9. polovične ocjene 2019 - Podzadatak A - Prijedloge rudarstva iz Online Review i Foruma. Sistem je sudjelovao u podstavama A. Ovaj papir razgovara o rezultatima našeg sustava u razvoju, procjeni i post procjeni. Svaka klasa u setu podataka predstavlja se kao navedeni neoteženi grafiki. Onda se usporedba provede sa svakim grafikom klase koji rezultira vektoru. Ovaj vektor se koristi kao karakteristika algoritma učenja stroja. Model se procjenjuje na održavanju strategije. Organizatori su slučajno podijelili (8500 slučajeva) obuku (pružen učesniku u obuci njihovog sustava) i nastavu testiranja (833 slučajeva). Nastava testiranja je rezervirana za procjenu učesničkih sustava. Tijekom procjene, naš sustav je u laboratoriji Coda rezultat podpitanja A (problem sa binarnim klasom). Sistem binarne klase postiže vrijednost procjene 0,34, preciznost 0,87, sjeti se 0,73 i F mjere 0,78.', 'nl': 'Dit document beschrijft het suggestie miner systeem dat deelneemt aan SemEval 2019 Taak 9.SubTaak A-Suggestie Mining vanuit Online Reviews en Forums. Het systeem nam deel aan de subtaken A. In dit artikel worden de resultaten van ons systeem in de ontwikkeling, evaluatie en post evaluatie besproken. Elke klasse in de dataset wordt weergegeven als gerichte ongewegen grafieken. Vervolgens wordt de vergelijking uitgevoerd met elke klassegrafiek die resulteert in een vector. Deze vector wordt gebruikt als kenmerken door een machine learning algoritme. Het model wordt geëvalueerd op hold on strategie. De organisatoren splitsen willekeurig (8500 instances) trainingsset (verstrekt aan de deelnemer aan het trainen van hun systeem) en testset (833 instances). De testset is gereserveerd om de prestaties van deelnemerssystemen te evalueren. Tijdens de evaluatie heeft ons systeem 31 gerangschikt in het Coda Lab resultaat van de subtaak A (binair class problem). Het binaire klassensysteem bereikt evaluatiewaarde 0.34, precisie 0.87, recall 0.73 en F meting 0.78.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم معدنی پیشنهاد را توصیف می\u200cکند که در عملیات نیمه سال 2019 شرکت می\u200cکند - SubTask A - پیشنهاد معدنی از تحقیقات و فورمهای آنلاین. این کاغذ در نتیجه سیستم ما در توسعه، ارزیابی و ارزیابی پست صحبت می کند. هر کلاس در مجموعه داده\u200cها به عنوان گراف\u200cهای ناوزن هدایت می\u200cشوند. سپس، مقایسه با هر گراف کلاس انجام می شود که نتیجه یک vektor است. این vektor به عنوان ویژگی توسط الگوریتم یادگیری ماشین استفاده می\u200cشود. این مدل در انتقال استراتژی ارزیابی می شود. سازمان\u200cکنندگان مجموعه آموزش (8500 instances) را تصادفی تقسیم کردند (به مشرکان در سیستم آموزش) و مجموعه آزمایش (833 instances). مجموعه آزمایش برای ارزیابی عملکرد سیستم شرکتگران ذخیره شده است. در طول ارزیابی، سیستم ما در آزمایشگاه کودا نتیجه زیر سوال A (مشکل کلاس دویینی) ۳۱ درجه داشت. سیستم کلاس دویینی ارزش ارزش 0.34، دقیق 0.87، 0.73 و F اندازه 0.78 را به یاد آورد.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem penambang saran yang berpartisipasi dalam SemEval 2019 Tugas 9 - SubTask A - Suggestion Mining dari Reviews dan Forum Online. Sistem berpartisipasi dalam subtasks A. Kertas ini mendiskusikan hasil dari sistem kita dalam pengembangan, evaluasi dan pos evaluasi. Setiap kelas dalam set data dipilih sebagai grafik tidak berat direksi. Then, the comparison is carried out with each class graph which results in a vector.  Vektor ini digunakan sebagai fitur oleh algoritma pembelajaran mesin. Modelnya diteliti dalam menunggu strategi. Organiser secara acak berbagi (8500 kejadian) set pelatihan (diberikan kepada peserta dalam pelatihan sistem mereka) dan set tes (833 kejadian). Set tes tersediakan untuk mengevaluasi prestasi sistem peserta. During the evaluation, our system ranked 31 in the Coda Lab result of the subtask A (binary class problem).  Sistem kelas binari mencapai nilai evaluasi 0,34, presisi 0,87, ingat 0,73 dan F ukuran 0,78.', 'ko': '본고는 SemEval 2019 퀘스트 9-하위 퀘스트 A-온라인 평론과 포럼에서 제안된 발굴에 참여하는 제안된 발굴 시스템을 묘사한다.이 시스템은 하위 임무 A에 참여했다. 본고는 우리 시스템이 개발, 평가와 후 평가에서의 결과를 논의했다.데이터가 집중된 모든 종류는 유방향 무권도를 나타낸다.그리고 각 종류의 그림을 비교하여 벡터를 얻는다.이 벡터는 기계 학습 알고리즘에 의해 특징으로 쓰인다.이 모델은 대기 전략을 채택하여 평가한다.조직자는 교육집(8500개 실례)과 테스트집(833개 실례)을 무작위로 두 부분으로 나눈다.테스트 집합은 참여자 시스템의 성능을 평가하는 데 쓰인다.평가 기간 동안 우리 시스템은 서브퀘스트 A(이원류 문제)의 미파 실험실 결과에서 31위를 차지했다.이원류 시스템의 평가치는 0.34이고 정밀도는 0.87이며 리콜율은 0.73이고 F 측정치는 0.78이다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wa madini unaoendelea kushiriki kazi ya SemEval 2019 - Jukumu A - Mapendekezo ya Kumbukumbu kutoka Maoni na Jukwaa za Mtandaoni. Mfumo ulishiriki katika majukumu ya A. Gazeti hili linajadili matokeo ya mfumo wetu katika maendeleo, uchunguzi na baada ya tathmini. Kila darasa katika seti ya taarifa inawakilishwa kama picha zisizoelekezwa. Kisha, kulinganishwa na kila a in a ya grafu inayosababisha vector. Vector hii inatumika kama taswira za kujifunza kwa mashine. Mradi huu unavutiwa katika mkakati wa kushikilia. Waandaaji waligawanya mafunzo (matukio 8500) kwa urahisi (yaliyotolewa kwa washiriki katika mafunzo ya mfumo wao) na seti ya jaribio (matukio 833). Mpango wa jaribio umewekwa ili kutathmini utendaji wa mifumo ya washiriki. Wakati wa tathmini hizo, mfumo wetu ulikuwa wa rangi 31 katika Lab ya Coda na matokeo ya kazi A (tatizo la darasa la binafsi). The binary class system achieves evaluation value 0.34, precision 0.87, recall 0.73 and F measure 0.78.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe die voorstelling miner stelsel wat deel in semiEval 2019 Opdrag 9 - SubTask A - voorstellings Mining van Online Review en Forums. Die stelsel het gedeel in die subtaske A. Hierdie papier bespreek die resultate van ons stelsel in die ontwikkeling, evaluering en post evaluering. Elke klas in die datastel word verteenwoordig as gewigte grafieke. Dan, die vergelyking is uitgevoer met elke klas graf wat resultaat in 'n vektor. Hierdie vektor is gebruik as funksies deur 'n masjien leer algoritme. Die model is evalueer op die houding van strategie. Die organiseerders het willekeurig uitdeel (8500 voorbeelde) onderwerp stel (verskaf aan die deelnimmer in onderwerp hul stelsel) en toets stel (833 voorbeelde). Die toets stel is rezerveer om die prestasie van deelnaders stelsels te evalueer. In die evaluasie het ons stelsel 31 rangeer in die Coda Lab resultaat van die subvraag A (binêre klas probleem). Die binêre klasstelsel bereik evalueringswaarde 0.34, presisie 0.87, reken 0.73 en F maat 0.78.", 'sq': 'This paper describes the suggestion miner system that participates in SemEval 2019 Task 9 - SubTask A - Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forums.  Sistemi mori pjesë në nënpyetjet A. Ky dokument diskuton rezultatet e sistemit tonë në zhvillimin, vlerësimin dhe pas vlerësimit. Çdo klasë në grupin e të dhënave përfaqësohet si grafikë të drejtuar pa peshë. Pastaj, krahasimi bëhet me çdo grafik klase që rezulton në një vektor. Ky vektor përdoret si karakteristika nga algoritmi i mësimit të makinave. Modeli vlerësohet në pritje në strategji. The organizers randomly split (8500 instances) training set (provided to the participant in training their system) and testing set (833 instances).  Grupi i testit është rezervuar për të vlerësuar performancën e sistemeve të pjesëmarrësve. Gjatë vlerësimit, sistemi ynë renditi 31 në rezultatin e Coda Lab të nënpyetjes A. Sistemi binar i klasës arrin vlerën e vlerësimit 0.34, saktësinë 0.87, tërheq 0.73 dhe matjen F 0.78.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የሳምEval 2019 ስራ 9 - SubTask A - የኢንተርኔት ተመልከቶች እና የፎርማቶች ማስታወቂያ የሚያስፈልገውን የአንጀራ ስርዓት ያሳያል፡፡ ሲስተምሩ አ በመስኮቶች ውስጥ ተጋጠመ። ይህም ፕሮግራም የስርዓታችንን ውጤቶች አካባቢ፣ ማስታወቂያ እና የፖስታ አስተያየት ይናገራል፡፡ በዳታ ሳጥን ውስጥ ሁሉም ክፍል ሳይሰራ ቀፎች እንደሚመስል ነው፡፡ በኋላም ተሳሳይ ከሁሉም ክፍል ጋር ይደረጋል፡፡ ይሄ vector በመሣሪያው ማስተማር አልgorithም የተጠቀመ ምርጫዎች ሆኖ ይጠቀማል። The model is evaluated on hold on strategy.  ተሟጋቾች (8500 ምሳሌዎች) ለሲስተምሯቸው ተማሪ ሰጥተዋል) እና የመፈተና ማሰናጃዎችን (833 ምሳሌዎች). የፈተናው ስርዓት ተጋሪዎች ሲስተም እንዲያስተካክሉ የተጠበቀ ነው። በተመሳሳይ ጊዜ ስርዓታችን በኮዳ ላብ ላይ 31 የተደረገ ነው፡፡ የሁለተኛ ክፍል ሲስተምረው ዋጋውን 0.34፣ ቁጥጥር 0.87፣ 0.73 እና F ልክ 0.78 አስታውሱ፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է առաջարկների հանքային համակարգը, որը մասնակցում է 2019 թ.-ի "Սեմեվալ" 9-ի "Սեմեվալ Ա"-ի "Սեմեվալ Ա"-ի "Ամենահանքային առաջարկներ առցանց վերլուծություններից և ֆորումներից: Համակարգը մասնակցել է A-ի ենթահարցերին. Այս աշխատանքը քննարկում է մեր համակարգի արդյունքները զարգացման, գնահատման և հետագնահատման մեջ: Տեղեկատվական համակարգի յուրաքանչյուր դասարան ներկայացված է որպես ուղղված անկշռված գրաֆիկներ: Then, the comparison is carried out with each class graph which results in a vector.  Այս վեկտորը օգտագործվում է որպես առանձնահատկություններ մեքենային սովորելու ալգորիթմի միջոցով: Մոդելը գնահատվում է սպասելով ռազմավարության: Տեղադրողները պատահական բաժանեցին (8500 օրինակ) ուսուցման համակարգը (տրամադրված իրենց համակարգի ուսուցման մասնակիցներին) և փորձարկումները (833 օրինակ): Տեստի համակարգը պահպանված է մասնակիցների համակարգերի արդյունավետության գնահատման համար: Արժեքի ընթացքում մեր համակարգը դասակարգվել է 31-ի կոդայի լաբորատորիայի արդյունքում A-ի ենթահարցի (երկարագույն դասարանի խնդիր) արդյունքում: Երկնական դասարանի համակարգը հասնում է գնահատման արժեքը 0.34, ճշգրտությունը 0.87, վերադարձնում է 0.73 և F չափումը 0.78:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি ব্যাখ্যা করেছে যে প্রস্তাবিত মিনিয়ার ব্যবস্থা সেমইভাল ২০১৯ টাকা কাজে অংশগ্রহণকারী হয়েছে - সাবটাস A- অনলাইন রিভি সিস্টেম এ সাবটাসে অংশগ্রহণ করেছে। এই পাতায় আমাদের সিস্টেম উন্নয়ন, মূল্যায়ন এবং পোস্ট মূল্যায়নের ফলাফল নিয়ে আলোচনা করেছে। ডাটাসেটের প্রত্যেক শ্রেণীকে নির্দেশিত অগ্রাফ হিসেবে প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা হয়। Then, the comparison is carried out with each class graph which results in a vector.  এই ভেক্টর একটি মেশিন শিক্ষা অ্যালগরিদমের বৈশিষ্ট্য হিসেবে ব্যবহার করা হয়। মডেলের কৌশল ধরে রাখা হয়েছে। প্রশিক্ষণের সেট (৮৫০০ অনুসারে) প্রশিক্ষণের সাথে অংশগ্রহণকারীদের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে এবং পরীক্ষার সেট (৮৩৩ অনুসারে অংশগ্রহণকারী সিস্টেমের প্রভাব মূল্যায়নের জন্য পরীক্ষা সেট সংরক্ষণ করা হয়েছে। মূল্যায়নের সময় আমাদের সিস্টেম কোডা ল্যাবের মধ্যে ৩১ টি সাবক্ষেত্র A (বাইনারি ক্লাসের সমস্যা)। বাইনারি ক্লাস সিস্টেম মূল্য 0. 34, ঠিক 0. 87, ০. 73 এবং F মাপ 0. 78 স্মরণ করুন।', 'tr': "Bu kagyz SemEval 2019 Görevi 9 - SubTask A - Suggestion Mining from Online Review and Forums goşulan teklipleri taýýarlaýar. Sistem A subtaskynda bäsleşipdi. Bu kagyz sistemamyzyň gelişmegi, deňlenme we çykyşlygymyň netijesini çykýar. Maglumat setiriniň her synpy çyzylmadyk grafikler ýaly görkezildi. Sonra, vektöre ulaşan her sınıf grafiği ile karşılaştırılır. Bu vektör makine öwrenmek algoritmi bilen üýtgedikler ýaly ullanýar Bu nusga strategiýa garaşylýar. Saýlanan hatlary görä böldi (8500 öñünde) okuw taýýarlamasy takmyndy (sistemasyny eğitmäge dahil edildi) we testi taýýarlamasy (833 öñünde). Synagy çykyş sistemleriniň janlaýyşyny barlamak üçin gurnaldy. Ýüklemek üçin sistemimiz Coda Lab'da 31-nji derejesi bar. Ikinji synp sistemasy 0.34 deňlenme mykdary ýetişdirilýär, dogrysy 0.87, 0.73 we F ölçüsi 0.78 diýip atlaýar.", 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el sistema de miners suggerits que participa en SemEval 2019 Task 9 - SubTask A - Suggestion Mining de Reviews Online i Forums. El sistema va participar en les subtanya A. Aquest paper discute els resultats del nostre sistema en el desenvolupament, l'evaluació i la postevaluació. Cada classe del conjunt de dades està representada com gràfics directs sense pes. Llavors, la comparació es fa amb cada gràfic de classe que resulta en un vector. Aquest vector és utilitzat com a característiques per un algoritme d'aprenentatge automàtic. El model es valora en espera de l'estratègia. The organizers randomly split (8500 instances) training set (provided to the participant in training their system) and testing set (833 instances).  El conjunt d'exàmens està reservat per avaluar el rendiment dels sistemes de participants. Durant l'evaluació, el nostre sistema va classificar 31 als resultats del Coda Lab de la subterrània A (problema de classe binaria). El sistema de classe binaria aconsegueix valor d'evaluació 0,34, precisió 0,87, recorda 0,73 i F mesura 0,78.", 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse soovituse kaevandussüsteemi, mis osaleb SemEval 2019 ülesandes 9 - SubTask A - Soovituse kaevandamine online ülevaatetest ja foorumitest. Süsteem osales alamülesannetes A. Käesolevas artiklis käsitletakse meie süsteemi tulemusi arendamisel, hindamisel ja järelhindamisel. Andmekogumi iga klass on esitatud suunatud kaalumata graafikutena. Seejärel tehakse võrdlus iga klassigraafikuga, mille tulemuseks on vektor. Seda vektorit kasutab masinõppe algoritm omadustena. Mudelit hinnatakse strateegia ootel. Korraldajad jagasid juhuslikult (8500 eksemplari) koolituskomplekti (antakse osalejale oma süsteemi koolitamisel) ja testimise komplekti (833 eksemplari). Katsekomplekt on reserveeritud osalejate süsteemide jõudluse hindamiseks. Hindamise käigus oli meie süsteem Coda Labi tulemuses 31 alaülesande A (binaarklassi probleem). Binaarklassi süsteem saavutab hindamisväärtuse 0,34, täpsuse 0,87, tagasikutsumise 0,73 ja F mõõtme 0,78.', 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪt 2019 YarńĪm Eval Task 9 - SubTask A - Online Review and Forums t…ôklif ed…ôn minik sistemini t…ôsdiql…ôyir. Sistem A subtasklarńĪna katńĪldńĪ. Bu kańüńĪt sistemimizin t…ôdbirl…ôŇüdirilm…ôsi, deńüerlendirm…ôsi v…ô post deńüerlendirm…ôsi √ľ√ß√ľn m√ľbahis…ô edir. Datum qutusundakńĪ h…ôr d…ôst…ô t…ôr…ôfind…ôn √ß…ôkilm…ômiŇü grafikl…ôr kimi g√∂st…ôrildir. Sonra, h…ôr sńĪnńĪf grafńĪ il…ô qarŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪlńĪr ki, bir vektor sonucu verir. Bu vektor maŇ°in √∂yr…ônm…ôsi algoritmi il…ô √∂zellikl…ôr olaraq qullanńĪlńĪr. Model strateji tutmaqda deńüerl…ônir. Organizatorlar rastgele (8500 instans) t…ôhsil quruluŇüu (sisteml…ôrini t…ôhsil etm…ôy…ô m√ľv…ôff…ôqiyy…ôt etdil…ôr) v…ô t…ôhsil quruluŇüu (833 instans). ńįŇül…ôyici sisteml…ôrin performansńĪnńĪ deńüerl…ôŇüdirm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn sńĪnama qurulmuŇüdur. QńĪymet sńĪrasńĪnda, sistemimiz Coda Lab A subtask sonu√ßlarńĪnda 31 s…ôf √ß…ôkdi. ńįkil sńĪnńĪf sistemi 0.34 deńüerl…ôŇüdirm…ô qiym…ôtini, 0.87 deńüerl…ôŇüdirir, 0.73 v…ô F √∂l√ß√ľsi 0.78 yada salńĪr.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje sistem prijedloga rudarstva koji sudjeluje u zadatku 9 iz polovice 2019. godine - Podzadatak A - Prijedloga rudarstva iz Online Review i Foruma. Sistem je sudjelovao u podkazama A. Ovaj papir razgovara o rezultatima našeg sistema u razvoju, procjeni i post procjeni. Svaka klasa u setu podataka predstavlja se kao navedeni neoteženi grafiki. Onda se usporedba provede sa svakim grafikom klase koji rezultira vektoru. Ovaj vektor se koristi kao karakteristika algoritma za učenje mašine. Model se procjenjuje na održavanju strategije. Organizatori su slučajno podijelili (8500 slučajeva) obuku (pružen učesniku u obuci njihovog sustava) i set testiranja (833 slučajeva). Nastava testiranja je rezervirana kako bi procenila učinkovitost sustava sudionika. Tokom procjene, naš sistem je u laboratoriji Coda rezultat podpitanja A (problem sa binarnim klasom). Sistem binarne klase postiže vrijednost procjene 0,34, preciznost 0,87, sjeti se 0,73 i F mjere 0,78.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje systém návrhů těžby, který se podílí na SemEval 2019 Task 9.Podúkol A-Suggestion Mining z online recenzí a fór. Systém se podílel na dílčích úkolech A. Tento článek diskutuje výsledky našeho systému při vývoji, hodnocení a po hodnocení. Každá třída v datové sadě je reprezentována jako směrované nevážené grafy. Poté je provedeno srovnání s každým grafem třídy, který vytvoří vektor. Tento vektor je používán jako vlastnosti algoritmu strojového učení. Model je vyhodnocován na zadržení strategie. Organizátoři náhodně rozdělili (8500 instance) tréninkovou sadu (poskytnutou účastníkovi tréninku jejich systému) a testovací sadu (833 instance). Testovací sada je vyhrazena pro hodnocení výkonnosti systémů účastníků. Během hodnocení se náš systém zařadil 31 ve výsledku Coda Lab podúkolu A (problém binární třídy). Systém binární třídy dosahuje hodnoty hodnoty 0,34, přesnosti 0,87, odvolání 0,73 a F měření 0,78.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan suggestion miner system, joka osallistuu SemEval 2019 Task 9 - SubTask A - Suggestion Mining online-arvosteluista ja foorumeista. Järjestelmä osallistui alatehtävään A. Tässä artikkelissa käsitellään järjestelmämme tuloksia kehityksessä, arvioinnissa ja jälkiarvioinnissa. Jokainen aineiston luokka on esitetty suunnattuina punnittomina kaavioina. Tämän jälkeen vertailu suoritetaan kunkin luokan kaavion kanssa, joka johtaa vektoriin. Tätä vektoria käytetään ominaisuuksina koneoppimisen algoritmissa. Mallia arvioidaan odotusaikana strategiassa. Järjestäjät jakavat satunnaisesti (8500 esiintymää) koulutusjoukon (joka annetaan osallistujalle heidän järjestelmänsä koulutuksessa) ja testausjoukon (833 esiintymää). Testisetti on varattu osallistujien järjestelmien suorituskyvyn arviointiin. Arvioinnin aikana järjestelmämme sijoittui 31 Coda Labin tulokseen alatehtävästä A (binaariluokan ongelma). Binääriluokan järjestelmä saavuttaa arviointiarvon 0,34, tarkkuuden 0,87, takaisinkutsun 0,73 ja F-mittauksen 0,78.', 'jv': 'This paper describes the proposal miner System that joins in seminval 2011 task 9 - Subtask A - Suggestion Minng from online Updates and forumes. Sistem sing ngejaraké ning tarjamahan A. Perintah iki dadi jaming pancen ning sistem awak dhéwé nang nggawe, jejaraké lan jejaraké mulai. All Where am I vector Nari model ono duwé nggunaké ngerasakno. Jejaring Tengeng wis dipoleh nggawe kanggo kuwi nggawe sistem sing beraksi perusahaan Anyone 2.34', 'ha': "Wannan takardar na bayyana shawarar ƙarami wanda ke haɗa da aikin SemEV 2019 - Sub-Tafiyar A - Kayyardar da Ka ƙarfafa daga Cikakken Maɓallun da Forums na Online. A. Wannan takarda yana jãyayya matsalar na'asarmu a cikin shirin ayuka, da hakarin da bayani. Kowace kure cikin tsarin database na nuna kamar an shiryar da graphogi wanda ba'a yi sauna ba. Sa'an nan, an sami misalin shi da duk grafi wanda yake ƙara wata hanya. Wannan mai shiryarwa ke amfani da kamar misfealum masu amfani da algoritm mai sanar da mashine. Ana ƙaddara shirin a yi riƙo ga ƙanshin. Mai shirin da aka raba (masallaci 85000) wa'adin na tsari (da aka bai wa mãsu shirin da shi na tsarin tsarin su) da aka jarraba shi a rana ranar ransa (da misali 833). An adana tsarin jarraba don a ƙayyade aikin mãsu shirin ayuka. Duran evaluation, system na ranar 31 a cikin Coda Lab na ƙarshen aikin A (matsalar daraja na biyu). The binary class system achieves evaluation value 0.34, precision 0.87, recall 0.73 and F measure 0.78.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje sistem rudarjev predlogov, ki sodeluje v SemEval 2019 Task 9 - SubTask A - Suggestion Mining iz spletnih pregledov in forumov. Sistem je sodeloval pri podnalogah A. V prispevku so obravnavani rezultati našega sistema pri razvoju, vrednotenju in naknadnem vrednotenju. Vsak razred v naboru podatkov je predstavljen kot usmerjeni neotehtani grafi. Nato se izvede primerjava z vsakim grafom razredov, ki ima za rezultat vektor. Ta vektor se kot značilnosti uporablja z algoritmom strojnega učenja. Model se ocenjuje ob čakanju strategije. Organizatorji so naključno razdelili (8500 primerov) nabor usposabljanja (zagotovljen udeležencu pri usposabljanju njegovega sistema) in nabor testiranja (833 primerov). Test set je rezerviran za oceno učinkovitosti sistemov udeležencev. Med ocenjevanjem je naš sistem uvrstil 31. mesto v Coda Lab rezultat podopravila A (problem binarnega razreda). Sistem binarnih razredov doseže vrednost ocenjevanja 0,34, natančnost 0,87, odpoklic 0,73 in F merilo 0,78.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את מערכת המכרים ההצעה שמשתתפת בסימוול 2019 משימה 9 - SubTask A - Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forums. המערכת השתתפה בשאלות ה. העבודה הזו דוברת על תוצאות המערכת שלנו בפיתוח, עריכה ואחרי הערכה. כל כיתה במערכת הנתונים מייצגת כגרפים לא משובחים. ואז, השוואה נעשה עם כל גרף כיתה שמוציא בוקטור. ווקטור זה משתמש כתכונות על ידי אלגוריתם ללמוד מכונות. המודל מוערך בהמתנה לאסטרטגיה. המארגנים חלקו באופן אקראי (8500 מקרים) קבוצת אימונים (שנספקו לשתתף באימון המערכת שלהם) ומקבוצת בדיקות (833 מקרים). קבוצת הבדיקות מושמרת כדי להעריך את ההפעה של מערכות המשתתפים. במהלך הערכה, המערכת שלנו דיווחה 31 בתוצאה מעבדת קודה של התת-שאלה A (בעיה בכיתה בינרית). מערכת הכיתה הבינרית משיגה ערך הערכה 0.34, מדויק 0.87, חזרה 0.73 ומדוד F 0.78.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་འདིར་ལྟ་བུ་འདིའི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་སའི་མ་ལག་གི་རྒྱས་ཁབ་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ལྡན་2019 ལས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་སྐྱོང་9 - SubTask A - Suggestion Mini མ་ལག་གིས་རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་A ནང་དུ་མཉམ་དུ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པ་ཡིན། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་གནད་སྤེལ་ལས་འགན་རིམ་ སྡེར་གྲངས་ཚང་ནང་གི་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་ཆ་སྐྱེལ་མེད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་ཙམ་མཚོན་གྱི་ཡོད། དེ་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱས་ན། དབྱེ་རིས་རེར་སོ་སོའི་ཚད་རྩིས་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཁྲིལ་ཡོད། སྒུལ་ཆས་འདི་ལག་ལེན་གྱིས་མ་རྩིས་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་རྣམས་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ མིག་དབྱིབས་བྱེད་རྩོལ་བ་དང་འཆར་ཁག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་པ་ཚོས་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལྡན་སྔོན་འགྱུར་བ(8500 གནད་སྡུད་ནང་གི་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་གི་ནང་དུ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་སྐབས། ཞིབ་འཆར་གཞུང་ནི་རྩ་འབྲེལ་མ་ལག་གི་གྲུབ་སྐྱོར་ཚད་ལྟར་བཞག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་ཚད་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་(གཉིས་རིམ་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཚོགས་)ལས་ Coda Lab འི་ནང་གི་དབ གཉིས་པ་གྲྭར་གྱི་མ་ལག་གིས་དཔྱད་གྲངས་རིན་ཐང་ 0.34 ། ཚད་0.87 ། 0.73་དང་། F་ཚད་0.78་ལྟར་འཛུགས་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'ThisIsCompetition at SemEval-2019 Task 9 : BERT is unstable for out-of-domain samples', 'ar': 'ThisIsCompetition في SemEval-2019 Task 9: BERT غير مستقر للعينات خارج المجال', 'fr': 'ThisIsCompetition à SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 9\xa0: BERT est instable pour les échantillons hors domaine', 'pt': 'ThisIsCompetition na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 9: BERT é instável para amostras fora do domínio', 'es': 'ThisisCompetition en Semeval-2019 Tarea 9: BERT es inestable para muestras fuera del dominio', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019での競争タスク9 ： BERTはドメイン外サンプルでは不安定です', 'ru': 'ThisIsCompetition на SemEval-2019 Задача 9: BERT нестабилен для внедоменных образцов', 'hi': 'यह SemEval-2019 कार्य 9 पर प्रतियोगिता है: BERT आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन नमूनों के लिए अस्थिर है', 'ga': 'ThisIsCompetition at SemEval-2019 Tasc 9: Tá BERT éagobhsaí maidir le samplaí lasmuigh den fhearann', 'zh': '此SemEval-2019务9之争:域外样本BERT不定', 'ka': 'This IsCompetition at SemEval-2019 Task 9: BERT is unstable for out-of-domain samples', 'el': 'Αυτό είναι ανταγωνισμός στο SemEval-2019 Εργασία 9: Ο BERT είναι ασταθής για δείγματα εκτός πεδίου', 'hu': 'Ez a verseny a SemEval-2019 9. feladat: A BERT instabil a domainen kívüli mintákhoz', 'it': 'QuestoConcorso a SemEval-2019 Task 9: BERT è instabile per campioni fuori dominio', 'lt': 'ŠisKonkurencija 2010 m. puslapyje 9 užduotis: BERT nestabilus ne srities mėginiams', 'mk': 'Ова е конкуренција на SemEval-2019 задача 9: BERT е нестабилен за примероци надвор од домен', 'kk': 'Бұл IsCompetition at semiEval-2019 Task 9: BERT is unstable for non-domain samples', 'ms': 'IniIsCompetition at SemEval-2019 Task 9: BERT is unstable for out-of-domain samples', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 9: ബെര്\u200dട്ടിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഡോമെന്\u200d ടാമ്പുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള സാധ്യതയില്ല', 'mt': 'Din hija Kompetizzjoni f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 9: BERT mhuwiex stabbli għal kampjuni barra d-dominju', 'mn': 'This IsCompetition at SemEval-2019 Task 9: BERT is unstable for out-of-domain samples', 'no': 'Dette IsCompetition at semiEval-2019 Task 9: BERT er unstable for out-of-domain samples', 'pl': 'Zadanie 9: BERT jest niestabilny dla próbek poza domeną', 'ro': 'AceastăConcurență la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 9: BERT este instabil pentru eșantioanele din afara domeniului', 'sr': 'Ova Iskonkurencija na pola Evala-2019 zadatak 9: BERT je nestabilna za uzorke izvan domena', 'si': 'This IsCompetition at HalfEvel-2019 Job 9: BERT is unterminated for out-of-domain samples', 'so': 'IsCompetition at SemEval-2019 Task 9: BERT is unstable for samooyinka aan domain-ka-lahayn', 'sv': 'Detta är tävlingen på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 9: BERT är instabil för prover utanför domänen', 'ur': 'یہ سیم Eval-2019 ٹاکس ۹ میں تہمت ہے: BERT ڈومین کے خارج نمونے کے لئے unstable ہے', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 9: BERT is unstable for out-domain samples', 'uz': 'Competition at SemEval- 2019 Task 9: BERT is unstable for out-domen samples', 'vi': 'Sự cạnh tranh tại SemEvl-209: BERT không ổn định cho các mẫu ngoài miền', 'bg': 'Задача 9: БЕРТ е нестабилен за извадки извън домейна', 'da': 'DenneIskonkurrence på SemEval-2019 Opgave 9: BERT er ustabil for prøver uden for domæne', 'nl': 'Taak 9: BERT is instabiel voor monsters buiten het domein', 'hr': 'Ova Iskonkurencija na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 9: BERT je nestabilna za uzorke izvan domena', 'id': 'Ini adalah Kompetisi di SemEval-2019 Tugas 9: BERT tidak stabil untuk sampel luar domain', 'ko': '이것은SemEval-2019 퀘스트 9의 경쟁이다. 역외 견본에 대해 BERT는 불안정하다.', 'de': 'ThisIsWettbewerb bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 9: BERT ist instabil für Out-of-Domain-Proben', 'sw': 'Matukio katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 9: BERT haina imara kwa sampuli nje ya ndani', 'tr': 'ThisIsCompetition at SemEval-2019 Task 9: BERT is unstable for out-of-domain samples', 'fa': 'این مسابقه\u200cای است که در عملۀ نیم\u200cEval-2019 کار ۹: BERT برای نمونه\u200cهای خارج از دومین ثابت نیست', 'af': 'Dit IsCompetition by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 9: BERT is unstable for out-of-domain samples', 'sq': 'ThisIsCompetition at SemEval-2019 Task 9: BERT is unstable for out-of-domain samples', 'am': 'Competition at SemEval-2019 Task 9: BERT is unstable for out-domain samples', 'az': 'Bu IsCompetition at SemEval-2019 Task 9: BERT is unstable for out-of-domain samples', 'hy': 'This is ISմրցակցություն', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ টাস্ক ৯-এ বিষয়বস্তুCompetition: BERT is unstable for out-domain Samples', 'bs': 'Ova Iskonkurencija na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 9: BERT je nestabilna za uzorke izvan domena', 'ca': 'Això és Competition a SemEval-2019 Task 9: BERT no és estable per mostres fora de domini', 'cs': 'Úkol 9: BERT je nestabilní pro vzorky mimo doménu', 'et': 'ThisIsCompetition SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 9: BERT on domeeniväliste proovide puhul ebastabiilne', 'fi': 'ThisIsCompetition SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 9: BERT on epävakaa toimialueen ulkopuolisten näytteiden osalta', 'jv': 'This sIsCompetition at semiinval-2011 task 9: BERT is untable for out-of-domain samples', 'ha': 'ThisIsCompetition at SemEval-2019 Task 9: BERT is unstable for out-of-domain samples', 'he': 'זהו התחרות ב SemEval-2019 משימה 9: BERT לא יציב לדגימות מחוץ לתחום', 'sk': 'ThisIsCompetition na SemEval-2019 Naloga 9: BERT je nestabilen za zunajdomenske vzorce', 'bo': 'ThisIsCompetition at SemEval-2019 Task 9: BERT is unstable for out-of-domain samples'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our system, Joint Encoders for Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI), for the SemEval 2019 Task 9 : Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forums. JESSI is a combination of two sentence encoders : (a) one using multiple pre-trained word embeddings learned from log-bilinear regression (GloVe) and translation (CoVe) models, and (b) one on top of word encodings from a pre-trained deep bidirectional transformer (BERT). We include a domain adversarial training module when training for out-of-domain samples. Our experiments show that while BERT performs exceptionally well for in-domain samples, several runs of the model show that it is unstable for out-of-domain samples. The problem is mitigated tremendously by (1) combining BERT with a non-BERT encoder, and (2) using an RNN-based classifier on top of BERT. Our final models obtained second place with 77.78 % F-Score on Subtask A (i.e. in-domain) and achieved an F-Score of 79.59 % on Subtask B (i.e. out-of-domain), even without using any additional external data.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة نظامنا ، التشفير المشترك للاستدلال المستقر بالاقتراحات (JESSI) ، لمهمة SemEval 2019 9: اقتراح التنقيب من المراجعات والمنتديات عبر الإنترنت. JESSI عبارة عن مزيج من جملتين: (أ) أحدهما يستخدم تدريبات متعددة للكلمات مدربة مسبقًا تم تعلمها من نماذج الانحدار اللوغاريتمي الثنائي (GloVe) والترجمة (CoVe) ، و (ب) واحد فوق ترميز الكلمات من قبل المحولات العميقة ثنائية الاتجاه المدربة (بيرت). نقوم بتضمين وحدة تدريب خصومة المجال عند التدريب لعينات من خارج المجال. تظهر تجاربنا أنه على الرغم من أداء BERT جيدًا بشكل استثنائي للعينات في المجال ، فإن العديد من عمليات التشغيل للنموذج تُظهر أنه غير مستقر للعينات خارج المجال. تم تخفيف المشكلة بشكل كبير عن طريق (1) دمج BERT مع مشفر غير BERT ، و (2) باستخدام مصنف قائم على RNN أعلى BERT. حصلت نماذجنا النهائية على المركز الثاني مع 77.78٪ F-Score في Subtask A (أي في المجال) وحققت F-Score 79.59٪ في Subtask B (أي خارج المجال) ، حتى بدون استخدام أي بيانات خارجية إضافية.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre système, Joint Encoders for Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI), pour le SemEval 2019 Task 9\xa0: Suggestion Mining à partir de revues et de forums en ligne. JESSI est une combinaison de deux codeurs de phrases\xa0: (a) l'un utilisant plusieurs intégrations de mots préentraînées apprises à partir de modèles de régression log-bilinéaire (GLOve) et de translation (CoVE), et (b) un autre au-dessus des codages de mots d'un transformateur bidirectionnel profond (BERT) pré-entraîné. Nous incluons un module de formation contradictoire dans le domaine lors de la formation pour les échantillons hors domaine. Nos expériences montrent que même si le BERT fonctionne exceptionnellement bien pour les échantillons dans le domaine, plusieurs essais du modèle montrent qu'il est instable pour les échantillons hors domaine. Le problème est considérablement atténué par (1) la combinaison de BERT avec un codeur non BERT, et (2) l'utilisation d'un classificateur basé sur RNN au-dessus de BERT. Nos modèles finaux ont obtenu la deuxième place avec un score F de 77,78\xa0% pour la sous-tâche A (c'est-à-dire dans le domaine) et un score F de 79,59\xa0% pour la sous-tâche B (c'est-à-dire hors domaine), même sans utiliser de données externes supplémentaires.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nosso sistema, Joint Encoders for Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI), para a Tarefa 9 do SemEval 2019: Mineração de sugestões de revisões e fóruns online. JESSI é uma combinação de dois codificadores de sentença: (a) um usando várias incorporações de palavras pré-treinadas aprendidas a partir de modelos de regressão log-bilinear (GloVe) e tradução (CoVe), e (b) um em cima de codificações de palavras de um pré- transformador bidirecional profundo treinado (BERT). Incluímos um módulo de treinamento contra adversários de domínio ao treinar para amostras fora do domínio. Nossos experimentos mostram que, embora o BERT tenha um desempenho excepcional para amostras no domínio, várias execuções do modelo mostram que ele é instável para amostras fora do domínio. O problema é mitigado tremendamente (1) combinando BERT com um codificador não BERT e (2) usando um classificador baseado em RNN em cima do BERT. Nossos modelos finais obtiveram o segundo lugar com 77,78% de F-Score na subtarefa A (ou seja, no domínio) e obtiveram um F-Score de 79,59% na subtarefa B (ou seja, fora de domínio), mesmo sem usar dados externos adicionais.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestro sistema, Joint Encoders for Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI), para la Tarea 9 de SemEval 2019: Minería de sugerencias de reseñas y foros en línea. JESSI es una combinación de dos codificadores de oraciones: (a) uno que usa múltiples incrustaciones de palabras previamente entrenadas aprendidas de los modelos de regresión log-bilineal (GloE) y traducción (CoVE), y (b) uno además de codificaciones de palabras de un transformador bidireccional profundo (BERT) previamente entrenado. Incluimos un módulo de capacitación de adversarios de dominio cuando se capacitan muestras fuera del dominio. Nuestros experimentos muestran que, si bien BERT funciona excepcionalmente bien para muestras dentro del dominio, varias ejecuciones del modelo muestran que es inestable para muestras fuera del dominio. El problema se mitiga enormemente mediante (1) la combinación de BERT con un codificador no BERT y (2) el uso de un clasificador basado en RNN sobre BERT. Nuestros modelos finales obtuvieron el segundo lugar con una puntuación F del 77,78% en la subtarea A (es decir, dentro del dominio) y alcanzaron una puntuación F del 79,59% en la subtarea B (es decir, fuera del dominio), incluso sin utilizar ningún dato externo adicional.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर हमारे सिस्टम का वर्णन करता है, स्थिर सुझाव अनुमान (जेईएसएसआई) के लिए संयुक्त एनकोडर, SemEval 2019 कार्य 9 के लिए: ऑनलाइन समीक्षा और मंचों से सुझाव खनन। JESSI दो वाक्य encoders का एक संयोजन है: (ए) लॉग-द्विरेखीय प्रतिगमन (GloVe) और अनुवाद (CoVe) मॉडल से सीखा कई पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करके एक, और (बी) एक पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित गहरे द्विदिश ट्रांसफार्मर (BERT) से शब्द एन्कोडिंग के शीर्ष पर एक। हम एक डोमेन प्रतिकूल प्रशिक्षण मॉड्यूल शामिल करते हैं जब आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन नमूनों के लिए प्रशिक्षण। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि जबकि BERT इन-डोमेन नमूनों के लिए असाधारण रूप से अच्छी तरह से प्रदर्शन करता है, मॉडल के कई रन दिखाते हैं कि यह आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन नमूनों के लिए अस्थिर है। समस्या को (1) एक गैर-BERT एन्कोडर के साथ BERT के संयोजन से काफी हद तक कम किया जाता है, और (2) BERT के शीर्ष पर एक RNN-आधारित क्लासिफायर का उपयोग करके। हमारे अंतिम मॉडल ने सबटास्क ए (यानी इन-डोमेन) पर 77.78% एफ-स्कोर के साथ दूसरा स्थान प्राप्त किया और किसी भी अतिरिक्त बाहरी डेटा का उपयोग किए बिना भी सबटास्क बी (यानी आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन) पर 79.59% का एफ-स्कोर हासिल किया।', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forumsについて、当社のシステムであるJoint Encoders for Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI)について説明します。 JESSIは、次の2つの文エンコーダの組み合わせです。（ a ）対数双線型回帰（ GloVe ）および翻訳（ CoVe ）モデルから学習された複数の事前訓練された単語埋め込みを使用するもの、および（ b ）事前訓練された深い双方向変換器（ BERT ）からの単語エンコードの上にあるもの。 ドメイン外サンプルのトレーニングには、ドメイン対抗トレーニングモジュールが含まれています。 私たちの実験は、BERTがドメイン内サンプルに対して非常に良好なパフォーマンスを発揮する一方で、モデルのいくつかの実行は、ドメイン外サンプルに対して不安定であることを示すことを示しています。 この問題は、(1) BERTと非BERTエンコーダを組み合わせること、および(2) BERTの上にRNNベースの分類子を使用することによって大幅に軽減される。 当社の最終モデルは、追加の外部データを使用せずとも、サブタスクA （すなわち、ドメイン内）で77.78 ％のFスコアで2位を獲得し、サブタスクB （すなわち、ドメイン外）で79.59 ％のFスコアを達成しました。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наша система, Joint Encoders for Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI), для задачи 9 SemEval 2019: Suggestion Mining из онлайн-обзоров и форумов. JESSI представляет собой комбинацию двух кодировщиков предложений: (a) один использует несколько предварительно обученных вложений слов, извлеченных из моделей логарифмической билинейной регрессии (GloVe) и трансляции (CoVe), и (b) один поверх кодировок слов от предварительно обученного глубокого двунаправленного трансформатора (BERT). Мы включаем модуль обучения соперничеству в домене при обучении внедоменным образцам. Наши эксперименты показывают, что, в то время как BERT работает исключительно хорошо для внутридоменных выборок, несколько прогонов модели показывают, что она нестабильна для внедоменных выборок. Проблема значительно смягчается (1) объединением BERT с кодером, не являющимся BERT, и (2) использованием классификатора на основе RNN поверх BERT. Наши финальные модели заняли второе место с 77,78% F-баллами по подзадаче A (т. е. в домене) и достигли F-балла 79,59% по подзадаче B (т. е. вне домена), даже без использования каких-либо дополнительных внешних данных.', 'zh': '本文引我们的系统,用于SemEval 2019务9:在线论和论坛的建议推理(JESSI)系统。 JESSI 两句编码器合:(a) 一用从对数双线性归 (GloVe) 与译 (CoVe) 模形中学者多预训练词嵌,及 (b) 一在预练之深双向转换器 (BERT) 词编码之上。 训练域外样本,一域抗教模块。 吾实验虽BERT于域内样本甚有色,然其数行,于域外样本,BERT不定也。 因(1)以BERT与非BERT编码器合,与(2)用于BERT之上,基于RNN之分器,可以大解也。 吾终于子职A(即域内)以77.78%之F得分得二,于子任B(即域外)得79.59%之F分,虽无所用外数。', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár gcóras, Ionchódóirí Comhpháirteacha le haghaidh Tátail Molta Cobhsaí (JESSI), le haghaidh Tasc 9 SemEval 2019: Mianadóireacht Moltaí ó Athbhreithnithe agus Fóraim Ar Líne. Is meascán de dhá ionchódóir abairte é JESSI: (a) ceann amháin a úsáideann leabaithe focal réamhoilte iolracha a foghlaimíodh ó mhúnlaí aischéimnithí log-bilinear (GloVe) agus aistriúcháin (CoVe), agus (b) ceann amháin ar bharr ionchóduithe focal ó réamhchóduithe claochladán déthreoch domhain oilte (BERT). Tá modúl oiliúna sáraíochta fearainn san áireamh againn agus sinn ag traenáil le haghaidh samplaí lasmuigh den fhearann. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh, cé go n-éiríonn go han-mhaith le BERT i gcás samplaí in-fearainn, léiríonn roinnt rití den tsamhail go bhfuil sé éagobhsaí do shamplaí lasmuigh den fhearann. Déantar an fhadhb a mhaolú go mór trí (1) BERT a chomhcheangal le ionchódóir neamh-BERT, agus (2) úsáid a bhaint as aicmitheoir RNN-bhunaithe ar bharr BERT. Fuair ár múnlaí deiridh an dara háit le 77.78% Scór-F ar Fhothasc A (i.e. san fhearann) agus bhain siad Scór-F de 79.59% amach ar Fhothasc B (i.e. lasmuigh den fhearann), fiú gan aon sonraí seachtracha breise a úsáid.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει το σύστημά μας, Κοινοί κωδικοποιητές για Σταθερή Συμπέρασμα Προτάσεων (για το έργο 9: Εξόρυξη Προτάσεων από Ηλεκτρονικές Κριτικές και Φόρουμ. Το JESSI είναι ένας συνδυασμός δύο κωδικοποιητών προτάσεων: α) ένας που χρησιμοποιεί πολλαπλές προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις λέξεων που έχουν διδαχθεί από μοντέλα λογότυπης διγραμμικής παλινδρόμησης (GloVe) και μετάφρασης (CoVe) και β) ένας πάνω από κωδικοποιήσεις λέξεων από έναν προ-εκπαιδευμένο βαθύ αμφίδρομο μετασχηματιστή (BERT). Συμπεριλαμβανόμαστε μια ενότητα κατάρτισης κατά την εκπαίδευση για δείγματα εκτός τομέα. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι ενώ ο BERT αποδίδει εξαιρετικά καλά για δείγματα εντός πεδίου, αρκετές εκτελέσεις του μοντέλου δείχνουν ότι είναι ασταθής για δείγματα εκτός πεδίου. Το πρόβλημα μετριάζεται σημαντικά με (1) συνδυασμό BERT με έναν κωδικοποιητή μη BERT, και (2) τη χρήση ενός ταξινομητή βασισμένου RNN πάνω από BERT. Τα τελικά μοντέλα μας πήραν τη δεύτερη θέση με 77.78% Φ-Score στην Υποεργασία Α (δηλαδή εντός πεδίου) και πέτυχαν ένα Φ-Score 79,59% στην Υποεργασία Β (δηλαδή εκτός πεδίου), ακόμη και χωρίς να χρησιμοποιούν πρόσθετα εξωτερικά δεδομένα.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a rendszerünket, a Joint Encoders for Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI), a SemEval 2019 feladat 9: Javaslatbányászat online értékelésekből és fórumokból. A JESSI két mondatkódoló kombinációja: (a) az egyik a log-bilináris regressziós (GloVe) és fordítási (CoVe) modellekből tanult több előre képzett szóbeágyazást használ, valamint (b) az egyik az előre képzett mély kétirányú transzformátor (BERT) szókódolását használja. A domain kívüli mintákra vonatkozó képzésekor tartalmazunk egy domain ellenséges képzési modult. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy bár a BERT rendkívül jól teljesít domain minták esetében, a modell több futtatása azt mutatja, hogy a domain kívüli minták esetében instabil. A problémát óriási mértékben enyhíti (1) a BERT egy nem BERT kódolóval való kombinálásával, és (2) a BERT tetején egy RNN alapú osztályozóval. Végső modelljeink 77,78%-os F-pontszámot értek el a második helyre az A (azaz domain belüli) alfeladaton, és 79,59%-os F-pontszámot értek el a B (azaz domain kívüli) alfeladaton kívül, még további külső adatok felhasználása nélkül is.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი ჩვენი სისტემის, ერთადერთი კოდირები სტაბლემების შესახებ (JESSI), SemEval 2019 დავალების 9. დავალებისთვის: Online Revisions and Forums-ის შესახებ წინასწორება. JESSI არის ორი სიტყვების კოდირების კომბიზაცია: a) ერთი გამოყენებული მრავალ წინაშემოწმებული სიტყვების კომბიზაცია, რომელიც მოსწავლია log- ბილური რეგრესი (Glove) და გარგება (Cove) მოდელეებიდან და b) ერთი წინაშემოწმებული სიტყვებ ჩვენ დავყენებთ დიომინის ნეტებერიალური განსწავლების მოდული, როდესაც განსწავლება დიომინის გარეშე მოდულებისთვის. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებს, რომ BERT გამოიყენება სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა მოდელს პრობლემა უფრო მარტივია (1) BERT-ის კოდერებით, რომელიც არ არის BERT-ის კოდერებით, და (2) გამოყენება RNN-ის კლასიფიკაცია BERT-ის ზემოთ. ჩვენი საბოლოო მოდელები მიიღეთ მეორე ადგილი 77.78% F-სკონტაქტის A-ზე (ანუ, დემომინში) და მიიღეთ 79.59% F-სკონტაქტის სკონტაქტის B-ზე (ანუ, სკონტაქტის გარეშე დემომინზე), არც გამოყენებული ექსკ', 'it': 'Questo articolo descrive il nostro sistema, Joint Encoder for Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI), per SemEval 2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining da recensioni e forum online. JESSI è una combinazione di due encoder di frase: (a) uno che utilizza più incorporazioni di parole pre-addestrate apprese dai modelli di regressione log-bilineare (GloVe) e traduzione (CoVe), e (b) uno sopra le codificazioni di parole da un trasformatore bidirezionale profondo pre-addestrato (BERT). Includiamo un modulo di formazione avversaria di dominio quando ci alleniamo per campioni fuori dominio. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che mentre BERT si comporta eccezionalmente bene per i campioni in-domain, diverse versioni del modello mostrano che è instabile per i campioni fuori-domain. Il problema è mitigato enormemente (1) combinando BERT con un encoder non BERT e (2) utilizzando un classificatore basato su RNN sopra BERT. I nostri modelli finali hanno ottenuto il secondo posto con il 77,78% F-Score su Subtask A (cioè in-domain) e hanno ottenuto un F-Score del 79,59% su Subtask B (cioè out-of-domain), anche senza utilizzare ulteriori dati esterni.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinama mūsų sistema, Jungtiniai Stabilaus siūlymų pažeidimo kodai (JESSI), skirta 2019 m. pusmečio vertinimo 9 uždaviniui: siūlymų kasybai iš internetinių peržiūrų ir forumų. JESSI yra dviejų sakinių kodų derinys: a) vienas naudoja kelis iš anksto apmokytus žodžių įdėjimus, išmoktus iš log-bilinear regresijos (GloVe) ir vertimo (CoVe) modelių, ir b) vienas virš žodžių kodų iš iš anksto apmokyto gilaus dvikryptinio transformatoriaus (BERT). Įtraukiame priešiško mokymo modulį į sritį rengiant ne srities mėginius. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad nors BERT veikia išskirtinai gerai vietoje esantiems mėginiams, keli modelio bandymai rodo, kad jis nestabilis ne vietoje esantiems mėginiams. Problemą labai sušvelnina (1) BERT derinimas su ne BERT kodatoriumi ir (2) BERT virš RNN grindžiamu klasifikatoriumi. Mūsų galutiniai modeliai pasiekė antrą vietą su 77,78 % F-Score A pakopos užduotyje (t. y. domene) ir pasiekė 79,59 % F-Score B pakopos užduotyje (t. y. ne domene), net nenaudodami jokių papildomų i šorinių duomenų.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің жүйемізді, біріктірілген жұмыс істеу үшін біріктірілген кодерлерімізді (JESSI), 2019 жылдық 9. тапсырмасы үшін біріктіреді: онлайн редакциялары мен форумдардан балау жұмыс істеу жұ JESSI - екі сөз кодерлерінің бірі: a) бірнеше бірнеше алдын- оқылған сөз ендірімін қолданатын журнал- екі жақын регрессия (Glove) және аудару (CoV) моделдерінен үйренген сөз кодерлерінің бірі, және b) бірнеше сөз кодерлерін алдын- оқылған алдын- оқыл Доменге тыс мәліметтер үшін оқыту үшін доменге қарсы оқыту модулі болады. Біздің тәжірибелеріміз BERT домендегі үлгілер үшін өте жақсы жұмыс істегенде, үлгілердің бірнеше орындалуы доменге тыс үлгілер үшін дұрыс емес дегенді көрсетеді. Мәселе BERT- ті BERT- тің үстінен RNN- негіздеген классификациясын қолдану (1) мен BERT- тің кодері емес, және (2) беRT- тің үстінен RNN- негіздеген классификациясы қолданылады. Біздің соңғы үлгілеріміз A субтапсырманың (т.е. домендегі) субтапсырманың (т.е. субтапсырманың B субтапсырманың (т.е. субтапсырманың) 79,59% деген F-нүктесі (т.е. субтапсырманың) сәйкес жеткізді.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan sistem kita, Pengekod Kesempatan untuk Suaran Stable (JESSI), untuk SemEval 2019 Tugas 9: Suaran Menyembah dari Review Online dan Forum. JESSI adalah kombinasi dua pengekod kalimat: (a) satu menggunakan pelbagai penyembedding perkataan terlatih terlatih belajar dari regresi log-bilinear (GloVe) dan model terjemahan (CoVe), dan (b) satu di atas pengekodan perkataan dari penukar bidireksi dalam terlatih terlatih (BERT). Kami termasuk modul latihan musuh domain bila latihan untuk sampel luar domain. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa sementara BERT berjalan dengan sangat baik untuk sampel dalam domain, beberapa jalanan model menunjukkan bahawa ia tidak stabil untuk sampel luar domain. Masalahnya dipermalahkan dengan (1) menggabungkan BERT dengan pengekod bukan-BERT, dan (2) menggunakan pengeklasifikasi berasaskan RNN di atas BERT. Model akhir kami mendapat tempat kedua dengan skor F 77.78% pada Subtugas A (i.e. dalam domain) dan mencapai skor F 79.59% pada Subtugas B (i.e. diluar domain), walaupun tanpa menggunakan data luaran tambahan.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പ് നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ സ്റ്റേബിളിന്റെ ആലോചനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള യൂണ്ട് കോഡിറ്റര്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ടാസ്ക് 9: ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d റിവി JESSI is a combination of two sentence encoders: (a) one using multiple pre-trained word embeddings learned from log-bilinear regression (GloVe) and translation (CoVe) models, and (b) one on top of word encodings from a pre-trained deep bidirectional transformer (BERT).  ഡൊമൈന്\u200d മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പരിശീലിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d നമുക്കൊരു ഡോമെന്\u200d വിരോധമായ പരിശീലന ഘടകം ചേര്\u200dക്കാം. നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ബെര്\u200dട്ടി ഡോമെന്\u200d ടാമ്പുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം ചെയ്യുമ്പോള്\u200d, കുറച്ചു  ബെര്\u200dട്ടി അല്ലാത്ത ഒരു കോഡെര്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ബെര്\u200dട്ടിനെ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതില്\u200d പ്രശ്നം വളരെ മാറ്റുന്നതാണ്. ബെര്\u200dട്ടിന്റെ മുകളില്\u200d RNN-അട ഞങ്ങളുടെ അവസാനത്തെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d രണ്ടാമത്തെ സ്ഥലത്ത് 77. 78% എഫ് സ്കോര്\u200d ലഭിച്ചു. അതിനാല്\u200d സുബ്ബട്ട് ബിയില്\u200d 79. 59% സ്കോര്\u200d നേടി. പുറത്തുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചില്ല.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sistema tagħna, l-Kodifikaturi Konġunti għal Inferenza Stabbli tas-Suġġerimenti (JESSI), għas-SemEval 2019 Task 9: Suġġeriment Mining minn Reviżjonijiet Online u Forums. JESSI huwa kombinazzjoni ta’ żewġ kodifikaturi ta’ sentenzi: (a) waħda li tuża inkorporazzjonijiet multipli ta’ kliem imħarrġa minn qabel imgħallma minn mudelli ta’ rigressjoni log-bilinear (GloVe) u traduzzjoni (CoVe), u (b) waħda fuq kodifikazzjonijiet tal-kliem minn trasformatur bidirezzjonali fond imħarrġa minn qabel (BERT). Inkludu modulu ta’ taħriġ avversarju tad-dominju meta nħarrġu għal kampjuni barra mid-dominju. L-esperimenti tagħna juru li filwaqt li l-BERT iwettaq prestazzjoni eċċezzjonalment tajba għall-kampjuni fid-dominju, diversi eżerċizzji tal-mudell juru li mhuwiex stabbli għall-kampjuni barra mid-dominju. Il-problem a titnaqqas b’mod enormi billi (1) il-BERT jiġi kkombinat ma’ kodifikatur mhux BERT, u (2) jintuża klassifikatur ibbażat fuq RNN fuq il-BERT. Il-mudelli final i tagħna kisbu t-tieni post b’77.78% Punteġġ F fuq is-Subkompitu A (jiġifieri fid-dominju) u kisbu Punteġġ F ta’ 79.59% fuq is-Subkompitu B (jiġifieri barra mid-dominju), anki mingħajr l-użu ta’ dejta esterna addizzjonali.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашиот систем, заедничките кодери за стабилна инференција на предлози (ЈЕССИ), за задачата SemEval 2019 9: Предлози за минирање од онлајн преглед и форуми. ЈЕССИ е комбинација од две кодирачи на реченици: (a) една користи повеќе претренирани вградувања на зборови научени од регресија log-bilinear (GloVe) и превод (CoVe) модели, и (b) една над кодирање на зборови од претрениран длабок дворечен трансформатор (BERT). Вклучуваме модул за обука на противниците на доменот кога тренираме за примероци надвор од доменот. Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека додека БЕРТ извонредно добро работи за примероци во домен, неколку процеси на моделот покажуваат дека е нестабилен за примероци надвор од домен. Проблемот е огромно намален со (1) комбинација на BERT со кодер кој не е BERT, и (2) користење класификатор базиран на RNN врз BERT. Нашите финални модели добија второ место со 77,78 отсто F-Score на Subtask A (т.е. во домен) и постигнаа F-Score од 79,59 отсто на Subtask B (т.е. надвор од домен), дури и без користење на дополнителни надворешни податоци.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasz system, Joint Encoders for Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI), dla SemEval 2019 Zadania 9: Wydobywanie sugestii z recenzji i forów online. JESSI jest połączeniem dwóch koderów zdań: (a) jednego z wykorzystujących wiele wstępnie przeszkolonych osadzeń słów nauczonych na podstawie regresji log-bilinearowej (GloVe) i modeli tłumaczenia (CoVe), oraz (b) jednego na szczycie kodowania słów z wstępnie wytrenowanego głębokiego transformatora dwukierunkowego (BERT). Podczas szkolenia dla próbek poza domeną dołączamy moduł szkoleniowy przeciwnika domeny. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że choć BERT sprawdza się wyjątkowo dobrze w próbkach wewnątrz domeny, kilka wykonań modelu pokazuje, że jest on niestabilny dla próbek poza domeną. Problem jest znacznie łagodzony przez (1) połączenie BERT z koderem innym niż BERT oraz (2) użycie klasyfikatora opartego na RNN na wierzchu BERT. Nasze ostateczne modele zdobyły drugie miejsce z 77,78% F-Score na podzadaniu A (tj. w domenie) i osiągnęły F-Score 79,59% na podzadaniu B (tj. poza domeną), nawet bez użycia dodatkowych danych zewnętrznych.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie sistemul nostru, Encodere comune pentru inferența sugestiei stabile (JESSI), pentru Sarcina SemEval 2019 9: Mining de sugestii din recenzii și forumuri online. JESSI este o combinație de două codificatoare de propoziții: (a) unul utilizând mai multe încorporări pre-instruite de cuvinte învățate din modele de regresie log-bilineară (GloVe) și traducere (CoVe), și (b) unul deasupra codărilor de cuvinte de la un transformator bidirecțional profund pre-instruit (BERT). Includem un modul de instruire adversarială a domeniului atunci când ne antrenăm pentru mostre din afara domeniului. Experimentele noastre arată că, în timp ce BERT performează excepțional de bine pentru eșantioanele din domeniu, mai multe execuții ale modelului arată că este instabil pentru eșantioanele din afara domeniului. Problema este atenuată enorm prin (1) combinarea BERT cu un encoder non-BERT și (2) utilizarea unui clasificator bazat pe RNN deasupra BERT. Modelele noastre finale au obținut locul doi cu 77,78% F-Score la Subtask A (adică în domeniu) și au obținut un F-Score de 79,59% la Subtask B (adică în afara domeniului), chiar și fără a utiliza date externe suplimentare.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний системийг, Стэбъл зөвшөөрөх зөвшөөрөлт (JESSI) болон SemEval 2019 ажлын 9-р ажлын тухай нэгдэлтэй коддогчийг тайлбарлаж байна: Онлайн шалгалтын болон Форумын зөвшөөрөх зөвшөөрөл. JESSI бол хоёр өгүүлбэрийн коддогчийн нэгдэл: a) нэг нь олон сургалтын аль хэдийн сургалтын үгнүүдийг ашиглаж, лог-хоёр ойролцоогоор (Glove) болон хөрөнгө хөрөнгө хөрөнгө хөрөнгө хөрөнгө хөрөнгө хөрөнгө хөрөнгө хөрөнгө хөр Бид хүрээлэн буй холбоотой үлгээний сургалт хийх үед эсрэг дасгал сургалт модуль агуулдаг. Бидний туршилтууд БЕРТ холбоотой жишээнд маш сайн үйлдвэрлэхэд хэд хэдэн загварын даалгавар нь холбоотой жишээнд тогтворгүй гэдгийг харуулдаг. Энэ асуудал бол BERT-г BERT-гүй кодлогчтай холбоотой (1) болон (2) нь BERT-ийн дээд RNN-ээр суурилсан классификаторыг ашиглан маш багасгаж байна. Бидний сүүлийн загварын загвар нь А субтайгаар F-Score-ын 77.78%-тай хоёр дахь газрын мэдээллийг ашиглахгүйгээр хоёр дахь газрын загвар авсан юм.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver systemet vårt, Joint Encoders for Stable Suggestingar Inference (JESSI) for semiEval 2019 Oppgåva 9: Suggestingar for Mining frå Online Review og Forums. JESSI er ein kombinasjon av to setkodar: a) ein som brukar fleire før- trengte ord- innbygging lært frå log- bilinær regresjonsmodular (Glove) og omsetjingsmodular (Cove), og b) ein på toppen av ordkodingar frå ein før- trengte dyp bidireksjonsformer (BERT). Vi inkluderer ein domeneadversarial treningsmodul når opplæring for utrytta domenesampler. Eksperimentane våre viser at mens BERT utfører unntak bra for prøver i domenet, viser fleire køyringar av modellen at det er ikkje stabil for utdomenetsprøver. Problemet er vanskeleg samansert av (1) som kombinerer BERT med ein koder som ikkje er BERT, og (2) brukar ein RNN-basert klassifiser på toppen av BERT. Våre siste modeller har fått andre plass med 77,78% F-poeng på Subtask A (t.d. i domene) og oppnådd e in F-poeng med 79,59% på Subtask B (t.d. out-of-domain), selv utan å bruka nokon eksterne data.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem, zajednički koderi za stabilne prijedloge (JESSI), za zadatak 9. polovice 2019. godine: predlog rudarstva iz online pregleda i foruma. JESSI je kombinacija dva kodera rečenice: a) jedna koja koristi višestruke predobučene rečenice koje su naučene od modela regresije (Glove) i prevode (Cove), a b) jedna na vrhu kodiranja rečenica iz predobučenog dubokog bidirekcijnog transformatora (BERT). Uključujemo domenu adversarni modul treninga kada treniramo uzorke izvan domena. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da dok BERT izvršava izuzetno dobro za uzorke u domenu, nekoliko trkova modela pokazuju da je nestabilno za uzorke izvan domena. Problem je strašno smanjeno (1) kombinacijom BERT sa koderom bez BERT-a i (2) korištenjem klasifikatora na RNN-baziranog na vrhu BERT-a. Naši poslednji modeli su dobili drugo mesto sa 77,78% F-Score na podzadatku A (tj. u domenu) i postigli F-Score od 79,59% na podzadatku B (tj. van domena), čak i bez korištenja dodatnih vanjskih podataka.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ පද්ධතිය, ස්ථිර සැකසුම් ප්\u200dරශ්නය (JESSI) සඳහා සම්බන්ධ සංවේදනය සඳහා සම්බන්ධ සංවේදනය සඳහා සම්බන්ධ සංවේදනය JESSI is a combination of Two Sentences Coders: (a) one use Multipre-Trained Word Embdings from log-Bilclose regression (Glove) and translation (Cove) Models, and (b) one on Top of word codes from a pre-Trained depth Biirection changer (BERT). අපිට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති ඩොමේන් සැමැල්ස් වලට. අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ BERT සම්පූර්ණයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් හොඳ සාම්ප්\u200dරේට් කරනවා කියලා, මොඩල් එකේ කිහිපයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ඒ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (1) BERT එක සම්බන්ධ කරන්න බෙර්ට් කෝඩර් එක්ක, සහ (2) බෙර්ට් එක්ක RNN අධාරිත විශේෂකයෙක් භාවිත කරනවා. අපේ අන්තිම මොඩල් එක්ක 77.78% F-Score එක්ක සබ්ට්\u200dරේස් A (ඉතින්, ඩෝමින් එක්ක) එක්ක දෙවෙනි ස්ථානය ලබාගත්තා, සබ්ට්\u200dරේස් B (ඉතින්, out-of-domain) එක්ක F-Score එක්ක', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu sawiraa nidaamkan, Qoodayaasha wadajirka ah ee Suggestiisa Inference (JESSI), ee SemEval 2019 Shaqadda 9: Suggestiisa Mining from Online Reviews and Forums. JESSI waa noocyada labada qoraal oo qoraal ah: (a) mid isticmaalaya hadal aad u baran karto oo aad ka baratay qoraal-bilinear regression (GloVe) iyo modellada turjumista (CoVe) iyo (b) mid ku qoran qoraalka codcodsiga oo ka horeeya shifo aad u dheer bideerctional (BERT). Waxaan ku qornaa moduleed waxbarasho ka gees ah ee gudaha marka lagu baranayo samooyinka aan dalbanin. Imtixaanadeena waxay muuqataa in marka BERT samooyinka gudaha uu si gaar ah u sameeyo, tusaalaha qaarkood waxay muuqataa in samooyin aan sameyn. Dhibaatadu waxay si weyn ugu leedahay (1) oo BERT ku soo bandhigaan qoraal a an BERT aheyn, iyo (2) ku isticmaalaya fasax ku saleysan RNN-based BERT. Tilmaamahayagii ugu dambeeyey waxay heleen meel labaad oo ay ka heleen 77.78% F-score sub-shaqada A (i.e. in-domain) waxayna gaadheen F-scoro 79.59% oo ku qoran sub-safka B (tusaale ahaan ka baxa domain), xittaa aan isticmaalin macluumaad dheeraad ah oo dibadda ah.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt system, Joint Encoders for Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI), för SemEval 2019 Task 9: Förslag Mining from Online Reviews and Forum. JESSI är en kombination av två meningskoder: (a) en som använder flera förklädda ord inbäddningar lärda från log-bilinear regression (GloVe) och översättning (CoVe) modeller, och (b) en ovanpå ordkodningar från en förklädd djup tvåriktad transformator (BERT). Vi inkluderar en domain adversarial training modul vid träning av out-of-domain prover. Våra experiment visar att medan BERT presterar exceptionellt bra för in-domain prover, visar flera körningar av modellen att den är instabil för out-of-domain prover. Problemet lindras enormt genom att (1) kombinera BERT med en icke-BERT-kodare och (2) använda en RNN-baserad klassificerare ovanpå BERT. Våra slutliga modeller fick andraplats med 77,78% F-Score på deluppgift A (dvs. inom domänen) och uppnådde en F-Score på 79,59% på deluppgift B (dvs utanför domänen), även utan att använda ytterligare externa data.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் எங்கள் கணினியை விளக்குகிறது, ஸ்டேப் பரிந்துரைக்கு இணைய குறியீடுகளை வரையறுக்கிறது, செம்Eval 2019 செயல் 9: இணைய முறைமைகளில் இருந்து குறியீடு JESSI என்பது இரண்டு வாக்கிய குறியீடுகளின் சேர்ப்பு: (a) முன் பயிற்சி முன் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட வார்த்தை குறியீடுகளை பயன்படுத்தி பல பயிற்சி முன் உள்ளீடுகளில் இருந்து கற்றுக் கொண்டுள் டொமைன் மாதிரிகளுக்கு பயிற்சியை பயிற்சிக்கும் பொழுது நாம் களம் எதிர்மறை பயிற்சி கூற்றை சேர்த் நம்முடைய சோதனைகள் காட்டுகிறது பெர்ட் டோமைன் மாதிரிகளுக்கு வேறு வித்தியாசமாக நன்றாக செயல்படும் போது, பல ஓடுகள் மாதிரிகள் தெரியும்  பிரச்சினையை பிரெட் குறியீட்டுடன் ஒன்று சேர்க்கும் பிரெட்டின் மேல் ஒரு RNN-அடிப்படையான வகுப்பாட்டை பயன்படுத்தும் பிரெட் எங்கள் இறுதியான மாதிரிகள் 77. 78% F- மதிப்பெண்டு இரண்டாவது இடத்தில் பெற்றுள்ளார்கள் துணை பணி A (அதாவது களத்தில்) மற்றும் வெளியேறும் தகவலை பயன்படுத்தாமல் ஒரு F- மதிப்பு 79. 59%', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ہماری سیسٹم، ایسسی کے لئے استبل سفارشی تفاوت کے ساتھ Joint Encoders (JESSI) کی توصیح کرتا ہے، سیم Eval 2019 تاسگ 9: آنلاین رسانیوں اور فورموں کے ساتھ میری پیشنهاد کرتا ہے. JESSI دو جماعت کوڈر کا ایک جماعت ہے: a) ایک سے مختلف پیش آموزش کی کلمات ابڈینگ کے استعمال کرتا ہے جو لوگ-بیلینز regression (Glove) اور ترجمہ (Cove) موڈل سے سکھایا گیا ہے، اور b) ایک سے پہلے آموزش کی عمیق عمیق ترجمہ پھیرنے والے (BERT) سے کلمات کوڈینگ کے اوپر ہے۔ ہم ایک ڈومین مقابلہ تطارین موڈل میں شامل کرتے ہیں جب دومین خارج نمونے کے لئے تطارین کرتے ہیں. ہمارے آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ جب BERT ڈومین میں نمونے کے لئے اچھی طرح کام کرتا ہے تو نمونے کے چند رونڈ دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ ڈومین خارج نمونے کے لئے unstable ہے۔ مسئلہ (1) کے ذریعہ BERT کو ایک غیر BERT کوڈر کے ساتھ ملنے سے بہت کم کم کر دیا گیا ہے اور (2) BERT کے اوپر RNN بنیادی کلاسفار کے استعمال سے۔ ہمارے آخری مدلکوں نے 77.78% F-Score کو Subtask A (یعنی دامین میں) کے ساتھ دوسری جگہ پہنچایا اور اس میں 79.59% F-Score کو پاک کیا تھا Subtask B (یعنی out-of-domain) پر (یعنی out-of-domain) اضافہ کے بغیر کسی بیرونی ڈاٹی کا استعمال نہ کیا۔', 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả hệ thống của chúng ta, bộ mã số liên kết cục Cục Dự thảo liên kết (Jesus), cho nhiệm vụ hoàn hảo Evol 9: Đề nghị khai thác từ tạp chí lướt và cung cấp qua mạng. Jesus là sự kết hợp của hai câu mã hóa: a) một dùng nhiều từ ngữ được huấn luyện trước sự nhúng vào từ những thứ học được từ sự phục hồi mật khẩu (GloVe) và dịch (CoVe) và b) một trên đầu các từ mã hóa chữ từ một b ộ chuyển đổi hai chiều sâu được đào tạo sẵn (BERT). Chúng tôi bao gồm một mô- đun huấn luyện đối thủ trong lĩnh vực khi được đào tạo mẫu ngoài lãnh thổ. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy rằng, mặc dù BERT thực hiện một cách rất tốt cho các mẫu trong vùng, nhiều loại mẫu cho thấy nó không ổn định cho các mẫu ngoài vùng. Vấn đề được làm giảm đáng kể bởi(1) kết hợp BERT với mã hóa không phải BERT, và (2) sử dụng một phân loại dựa vào RNN trên BERT. Những mẫu cuối cùng của chúng tôi được xác định vị trí thứ hai với 77.78=. F-Score on Subask A (tức là trong-miền) và đạt được một F-Score of 99.99=. on Subask B (tức là. out-of-ground) ngay cả không cần sử dụng thêm dữ liệu ngoài miền.', 'uz': "Name JESSI - ikkita maxfiy soʻz kodlash usuli (a) bir necha marta o'rganilgan so'zlar tarjimalaridan foydalanuvchi (GloVe) va tarjima modellardan foydalanish va (b) bir so'zlar kodlash usulining eng yuqoridagi (b) soʻz kodlash usulidan oldin o'rgandi. Biz domen misollaridan tashqi tizim qilayotganda foydalanuvchi taʼminlovchi modulini qoʻllamiz. Bizning imtiyozlarimiz shunday ko'rsatadi, BERT hozir domen misollarida yaxshi bajarayotganda, modeldagi bir nechta ishlab chiqaruvchi modellarni ko'rsatadi, bu domen namunalardan tashqi emas. Name Bizning oxirgi modellarimiz vazifa A (m- n- domen) bilan 77.78% F- scori ikkinchi joyga olingan va shu vazifa B (m- dan boshqa maʼlumotdan foydalanmagan F- scori 79.59% ga yetdi.", 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores system, Joint Encoders for Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI), til SemEval 2019 Opgave 9: Forslag Mining fra online anmeldelser og fora. JESSI er en kombination af to sætningskodere: (a) en ved hjælp af flere præ-trænede ord indlejringer lært fra log-bilinær regression (GloVe) og oversættelse (CoVe) modeller, og (b) en oven på ord kodninger fra en præ-trænet dyb bidirektional transformer (BERT). Vi inkluderer et domæne adversarial træningsmodul, når vi træner for out-of-domæne prøver. Vores eksperimenter viser, at selvom BERT klarer sig usædvanligt godt til in-domæne prøver, viser flere kørsler af modellen, at den er ustabil for out-of-domæne prøver. Problemet afhjælpes enormt ved at (1) kombinere BERT med en ikke-BERT koder og (2) bruge en RNN-baseret klassificering oven på BERT. Vores endelige modeller opnåede andenpladsen med 77,78% F-Score på subopgave A (dvs. i-domæne) og opnåede en F-Score på 79,59% på subopgave B (dvs. out-of-domæne), selv uden at bruge yderligere eksterne data.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sustav, zajednički koderi za stabilnu prijedlogu (JESSI), za zadatak 9. polovice 2019. godine: prijedloge rudarstva iz online pregleda i foruma. JESSI je kombinacija dva kodera rečenice: a) jedna koja koristi višestruke predobučene riječi uključene iz modela regresije (Glove) i prevoda (Cove), a b) jedna na vrhu kodiranja riječi od predobučenog dubokog bidirektivnog transformatora (BERT). Uključujemo modul protivnog treninga domena kada obuka za uzorke izvan domena. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da dok BERT izvršava izuzetno dobro za uzorke u domenu, nekoliko trkova modela pokazuju da je nestabilno za uzorke izvan domena. Problem se ogromno smanjuje (1) kombiniranjem BERT-a s koderom koji nije BERT-a i (2) koristeći DNN-bazirani klasifikator na vrhu BERT-a. Naši konačni modeli su dobili drugo mjesto s 77,78% F-Score na podzadatku A (tj. u domenu) i postigli F-Score od 79,59% na podzadatku B (tj. van domena), čak i bez koristenja dodatnih vanjskih podataka.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unser System, Joint Encoder for Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI), für die SemEval 2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining aus Online Reviews und Foren. JESSI ist eine Kombination aus zwei Satzcodierern: (a) einer verwendet mehrere vorgetrainierte Worteinbettungen, die aus log-bilinearen Regressionsmodellen (GloVe) und Translation (CoVe) gelernt wurden, und (b) einer über Wortcodierungen eines vorgetrainierten tiefen bidirektionalen Transformators (BERT). Beim Training für Out-of-Domain-Samples ist ein Domain-Widersarial-Trainingsmodul enthalten. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass BERT zwar außergewöhnlich gut für In-Domain-Samples funktioniert, mehrere Durchläufe des Modells zeigen jedoch, dass es für Out-of-Domain-Samples instabil ist. Das Problem wird erheblich gemildert, indem (1) BERT mit einem Nicht-BERT-Encoder kombiniert wird und (2) ein RNN-basierter Klassifikator auf BERT verwendet wird. Unsere finalen Modelle erreichten den zweiten Platz mit 77,78% F-Score auf Subtask A (d.h. in-domain) und erreichten einen F-Score von 79,59% auf Subtask B (d.h. out-of-domain), auch ohne zusätzliche externe Daten zu verwenden.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu el nostre sistema, Codificadors Conjunts per a la Inferència de Sugeriments Estables (JESSI), per la tasca 9 del SemEval 2019: Sugeriments de mineria a partir de revisions on-line i foros. JESSI és una combinació de dos codificadors de frases: a) una utilitzant múltiples incorporacions de paraules pré-entrenades aprenguts de models de regressió log-bilinear (GloVe) i traducció (CoVe), i b) una a sobre de codificacions de paraules d'un transformador bidireccional profund pré-entrenat (BERT). Inclouem un módul d'entrenament adversari en domini quan entrenem mostres for a de domini. Els nostres experiments demostren que mentre el BERT funciona excepcionalment bé per a mostres en domini, diverses execucions del model demostren que no és estable per a mostres fora de domini. The problem is mitigated tremendously by (1) combining BERT with a non-BERT encoder, and (2) using an RNN-based classifier on top of BERT.  Els nostres models finals van aconseguir el segon lloc amb un 77,78% de puntuació F a la Subtasca A (i.e. en domini) i van aconseguir un 79,59% de puntuació F a la Subtasca B (i.e. fora de domini), fins i tot sense utilitzar dades externes adicionals.", 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan sistem kita, Joint Encoders for Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI), untuk SemEval 2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forums. JESSI adalah kombinasi dari dua pengekode kalimat: (a) satu menggunakan beberapa pembangunan kata terlatih terlatih belajar dari regresi log-bilinear (GloVe) dan model terjemahan (CoVe), dan (b) satu di atas pengekodan kata dari transformer bidireksi dalam terlatih (BERT). Kami termasuk modul latihan lawan domain ketika latihan untuk sampel luar domain. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa sementara BERT berhasil dengan sangat baik untuk sampel dalam domain, beberapa jalur model menunjukkan bahwa itu tidak stabil untuk sampel luar domain. Masalahnya sangat dipermalukan oleh (1) menggabungkan BERT dengan pengekode bukan BERT, dan (2) menggunakan pengekode berbasis RNN di atas BERT. Model akhir kami mendapatkan kedua tempat dengan 77,78% F-Score pada Subtask A (i.e. dalam domain) dan mencapai F-Score 79,59% pada Subtask B (i.e. luar domain), bahkan tanpa menggunakan data eksternal tambahan.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz sistemimizi, Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI) üçin, SemEval 2019 Görevi 9: Online Review and Forums üçin birleşmiş Ködlemeler tassyýar. JESSI iki sözlem kodçysynyň birleşigidir: a) biri bilin golaý regresiýanyň (GloVe) we terjime (CoVe) modellerinden öwrenmiş multiple öňünden ullanýan sözlem kodçysyndan ullanýar, we (b) biri öňünden öňünden ullanýan ýokary sözlem kodçysynyň üstine (BERT). We include a domain adversarial training module when training for out-of-domain samples. Bizim deneylerimiz BERT domeny örnekleri üçin ajaýyp gowy عمل edende, modelden birnäçe runlar bu domeny daşaryk örnekleri üçin unstable olduğunu gösterir. Mesele BERT'i BERT ködlemesi bilen birleşdirmek üçin (1) örän azaltylýar, we (2) BERT'iň üstünde RNN tabanly klasifikatçy bilen birleşýärler. Final models obtained second place with 77.78% F-Score on Subtask A (i.e. in-domain) and achieved an F-Score of 79.59% on Subtask B (i.e. out-of-domain), even without using any additional external data.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš systém Joint Encoders for Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI) pro SemEval 2019 Task 9: Dolování návrhů z online recenzí a fór. JESSI je kombinace dvou snímačů vět: (a) jeden používá více předcvičených vkládání slov naučených z log-bilineární regrese (GloVe) a překladu (CoVe) a (b) jeden na vrcholu kódování slov z předcvičeného hlubokého obousměrného transformátoru (BERT). Při školení mimo doménu vzorků zahrnujeme modul adversariálního tréninku domény. Naše experimenty ukazují, že zatímco BERT funguje mimořádně dobře pro vzorky v doméně, několik běhů modelu ukazuje, že je nestabilní pro vzorky mimo doménu. Tento problém je značně zmírněn kombinací BERT s jiným snímačem a (2) použitím klasifikátoru na bázi RNN na vrcholu BERT. Naše finální modely získaly druhé místo s 77,78% F-skóre na Subúkolu A (tzn. in-domain) a dosáhly F-skóre 79,59% na Subúkolu B (tzn. out-of-domain), a to i bez použití dalších externích dat.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft ons systeem, Joint Encoders for Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI), voor de SemEval 2019 Taak 9: Suggestion Mining vanuit Online Reviews en Forums. JESSI is een combinatie van twee zinnencoders: (a) een die meerdere voorgetrainde woordembeddingen gebruikt die zijn geleerd uit log-bilineaire regressie (GloVe) en vertaling (CoVe) modellen, en (b) een bovenop woordencoders van een voorgetrainde diepe bidirectionele transformator (BERT). Bij training voor out-of-domain samples nemen we een domein adversariaal trainingsmodule op. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat terwijl BERT uitzonderlijk goed presteert voor in-domain samples, verschillende runs van het model laten zien dat het instabiel is voor out-of-domain samples. Het probleem wordt enorm verzacht door (1) BERT te combineren met een niet-BERT encoder, en (2) een RNN-gebaseerde classificator bovenop BERT te gebruiken. Onze eindmodellen behaalden de tweede plaats met 77,78% F-Score op Subtaak A (d.w.z. in-domein) en behaalden een F-Score van 79,59% op Subtaak B (d.w.z. out-of-domain), zelfs zonder gebruik te maken van extra externe gegevens.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سیستم\u200cمون را توصیف می\u200cکند، رمز\u200cکننده\u200cهای مشترک برای تضمین پیشنهاد استوار (JESSI) برای ماموریت نیمه سال ۲۰۱۹: پیشنهاد ذخیره\u200cکننده از بازرسی\u200cهای آنلاین و فورم\u200cها. JESSI یک ترکیب از دو رمزگذارنده جمله است: a) یکی از جمله\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای پیش آموزش\u200cشده\u200cای که از مدل\u200cهای regression (Glove) و ترجمه (Cove) یاد گرفته\u200cاند، و b) یکی از بالای رمزگذاری کلمه\u200cهای پیش آموزش\u200cشده\u200cای از تغییردهنده عمیق عمیق (BERT) است. ما در زمان آموزش برای نمونه های خارج از دومین شامل یک مدول آموزش دشمنی داریم. آزمایش\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که در حالی که BERT به طور خاص برای نمونه\u200cهای دامنی خوب انجام می\u200cدهد، چند چرخه\u200cهای مدل نشان می\u200cدهد که برای نمونه\u200cهای خارج از دامنی ثابت نیست. این مشکل با (1) ترکیب BERT با یک رمزگر غیر BERT و (2) با استفاده از یک رمزگر بنیاد RNN بر بالای BERT بسیار کم می\u200cکند. مدلهای نهایی ما جای دوم با 77.78 درصد F-Score on Subtask A (i.e. in-domain) دریافت شد و با استفاده از اطلاعات خارجی اضافه\u200cای از 79.59 درصد F-Score در Subtask B (i.e. out-of-domain) دریافت شد.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ስብሰባችንን፣ የድምፅ ጉዳይ ማቀናጃ ማቀናቀል (JESSI)፣ ለሴmEval 2019 ስራ 9: የOnline Reviews and Forums ማስታወቂያ ጥያቄ ይናገራል፡፡ JESSI የሁለት የፊደል ቃላት አካባቢዎች ነው:(a) አንዱ ከlog-ቢሊnear regression (GloVe) እና ትርጉም (CoVe) ዓይነቶች የተማረ ብዙዎች ቃላት አካባቢዎች (BERT) እና (b) አንድ ከንግግር ጽሑፎች በላይ ላይ የሚቆጠሩ ቃላት ክፍሎች ነው፡፡ ለዶሜን ምሳሌዎች ሲያስተምር የዶሜን ተቃዋሚ ትምህርት ሞዴል እናገባለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን ብሬት ለዶሜን ምሳሌዎች በተለየ ጊዜ ብዙዎች የሞዴል ዓይነቶች ከዶሜን ምሳሌዎች የማይሰፍር እንደሆነ የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡ ጉዳዩ BERT በተለየ BERT የኮድ እና (2) BERT በላይ የተመሳሳይ RNN-based ክፍል በመጠቀም በ (1) በመጠቀም ነው፡፡ የመጨረሻው ሞዴላዎቻችን 77.78% F-score በመስኮት አ (አ. ውስጥ-domain) ሁለተኛ ስፍራን አገኘን የውጭ መረጃ ምንም እንኳ ሳይጠቀም የF-Score 79.59 በመቶ አግኝቷል፡፡', 'az': "Bu kağıt sistemimizi, Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI) üçün birləşdirilmiş Kodalarımızı (Joint Encoders for Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI) yazır, 2019 Gözəl 9: Online Review and Forums təklif edir. JESSI iki cümlədən kodlayıcının birləşdirilməsidir: a) bir çox öyrənmiş cümlədən əvvəl təhsil edilmiş sözlərin birləşdirilməsi ilə log-bilik regressiya (Glove) və çevirim (Cove) modellerindən öyrənilmiş, və b) birinin əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş dərin dönüşücü (BERT) sözlərin üstündə kodlaması. Dərzində nümunələr üçün təhsil edildiyi zaman domena düşmənçilik təhsil modulu daxil edirik. Bizim təcrübələrimiz belə göstərir ki, BERT domain nümunələri üçün istisna olaraq yaxşı işlədikdə, modellərin bir neçə dəyişiklik göstərilir ki, bu dəyişiklik nümunələri dış domena üçün istisnadır. Problem BERT-i BERT-dən olmayan kodlayıcıyla birləşdirmək (1) ilə böyük zəifləşdirilmişdir, və (2) BERT üstündə RNN-tabanlı klassifikatçısı ilə birləşdirilmişdir. Əvvəlki modellərimiz A Subtask'da 77.78% F-Score ilə ikinci yer aldı və B Subtask'də 79.59% F-Score qəbul etdi, hətta heç bir dış veri istifadə etmədən.", 'hy': "Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր համակարգը, կայուն առաջարկների ինֆերանսի (JSSI) համախմբագրիչները, 2019 թ. Սեմյավալ 9-ի առաջարկի համար' առաջարկներ հանքահանումը ինտերնետային վերլուծություններից և ֆորումներից: Յեսսին երկու նախադասությունների կոդավորների համակցություն է: a) մեկը օգտագործում է բազմաթիվ նախապատրաստված բառերի ներգրավումներ, որոնք սովորվել են լոգ-երկու կողմերի ռեգրեսիայից (glove) և թարգմանման (COve) մոդելներից, և b) մեկը բառերի կոդավորումների վերևում է նախապատրաստված երկու ուղղությամբ Մենք ներառում ենք տիեզերական հակառակ վարժման մոդուլը, երբ վարժվում ենք տիեզերական առանց տիեզերական նմուշների համար: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մինչդեռ BER-ը արտառությամբ լավ է աշխատում տիեզերական նմուշների համար, մոդելի մի քանի թերթեր ցույց են տալիս, որ այն անկայուն է տիեզերական նմուշների համար: Խնդիրը հսկայական նվազեցվում է (1) BERT-ի և ոչ BERT-ի կոդերի համադրման միջոցով, և (2) BERT-ի վերևում օգտագործվող ՌՆՆ-ի հիմնված դասակարգիչ օգտագործելով: Մեր վերջնական մոդելները ստացան երկրորդ տեղը 77.78 տոկոսով F-գնահատականով A-ի ենթախնդրի վրա (այսինքն՝ տիեզերքում) և ստացան F-գնահատականը 79.59 տոկոսով B-ի ենթախնդրի վրա (այսինքն՝ տիեզերքում դուրս), նույնիսկ առանց որևէ ավելին արտաքին տվյալներ օգ", 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea mfumo wetu, Washiriki wa Kuunganisha Mapendekezo ya Kuzuia Usimama (JESSI), kwa ajili ya SemEval 2019 Kazi 9: Mapendekezo ya Kumbuliwa kutoka Mapitio ya Mtandaoni na Jukwaa. JESSI ni muunganiko wa idadi mbili za hukumu: (a) moja kwa kutumia maneno mengi yaliyofundishwa kabla ya mafunzo yaliyojifunza kutoka kwa mfumo wa kudhibiti kwa ajili ya kujiandikisha kwa ujasiri wa karibu (GloVe) na tafsiri (CoVe), na (b) moja kwenye taarifa za maneno kutoka katika mabadiliko ya kizamani yanayofundishwa sana ya bidhaa (BERT). Tunajumuisha kituo cha mafunzo yanayotokana na upinzani wakati mafunzo ya nje ya sampuli za ndani. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kwamba wakati BERT inafanya vizuri kwa ajili ya sampuli za ndani, baadhi ya mifano inaonyesha kuwa haiwezekani kwa sampuli nje ya ndani. Tatizo hili linapunguzwa sana na (1) kuunganisha BERT na kodi isiyo na BERT, na (2) kwa kutumia mwandishi anayeishi RNN juu ya BERT. Our final models obtained second place with 77.78% F-Score on Subtask A (i.e. in-domain) and achieved an F-Score of 79.59% on Subtask B (i.e. out-of-domain), even without using any additional external data.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা আমাদের সিস্টেম, স্টেবেল প্রস্তাবের জন্য যুক্ত এনকোডার (জেসিআই), সেমভাল ২০১৯ টাস্ক ৯: অনলাইন রিভিউ আর ফোরাম থেকে মিনিং এর প্রস্তাব। জেসিসি দুই বাক্য এনকোডারের একটি সংযোগ: (a) পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত শব্দ ব্যবহার করে বেশ কয়েকটি প্রশিক্ষিত শব্দ ব্যবহার করে (গ্লোভে) এবং অনুবাদ (কোভি) মডেল থেকে শিখেছে এবং (b) প্রশিক্ষিত গভীর বিদ ডোমেইনের বাইরে প্রশিক্ষণের সময় আমরা একটি ডোমেইন বিরোধী প্রশিক্ষণ মডিউলের মধ্যে রয়েছি। আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে যখন বিবের্ট ব্যতিক্রমে ডোমেইনের নমুনার জন্য ভালো কাজ করে, তখন কয়েকটি মডেলের চাল দেখাচ্ছে যে ডোমেইনের বাইর এই সমস্যাটি বিবের্টের সাথে একটি বিবেরেট এনকোডার দ্বারা (১) আর (২) বার্টির উপরে একটি RNN-ভিত্তিক ক্লাসাফাইফার ব্যবহার করে বিভাগের মাধ্যম আমাদের চূড়ান্ত মডেল ৭৭. ৭৮% এফ-স্কোর দ্বিতীয় স্থান পেয়েছে সাবকাজ এ (যেমন ডোমেইনে) এবং সাবকাজ B (যেমন ডোমেইন বাইরের কোনো বিদেশী তথ্য ব্যবহার করা ছাড়া ৭৯. ৫৯% এর F', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва нашата система, Съвместни кодери за стабилни предположения (Задача 9: Извличане на предложения от онлайн рецензии и форуми. JESSI е комбинация от два кодера на изречения: а) единият използва множество предварително обучени вграждания на думи, научени от лого-билинеарна регресия (GloVe) и моделите за превод (CoVe), и б) единият върху кодирането на думи от предварително обучен дълбок двупосочен трансформатор (BERT). Ние включваме модул за обучение на конкуренция на домейн при обучение за извадки извън домейна. Нашите експерименти показват, че макар да работи изключително добре за проби в домейн, няколко проби на модела показват, че той е нестабилен за проби извън домейн. Проблемът се смекчава изключително чрез (1) комбиниране на BERT с неBERT кодер и (2) използване на RNN базиран класификатор върху BERT. Последните ни модели получиха второ място с 77.78% при подзадача А (т.е. в домейна) и постигнаха 79.59% при подзадача Б (т.е. извън домейна), дори без да използват допълнителни външни данни.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf ons stelsel, Joint Encoders vir Stabler Voorslag Inferensie (JESSI), vir die SemEval 2019 Opdrag 9: Voorslag Mining van Onlinene Aansig en Forums. JESSI is 'n kombinasie van twee setkoders: (a) een gebruik veelvuldige voorafgeleerde woord inbettings geleer van log- bilineer regresie (Glove) en vertaling (Cove) modele, en (b) een op bo van woord kodering van 'n voorafgeleerde diep bidireksjonale transformeerder (BERT). Ons insluit 'n domein teenstandaarie onderwerp module wanneer onderwerp vir buite domein-voorbeelde. Ons eksperimente vertoon dat terwyl BERT uitsonderlik goed uitvoer vir in- domein voorbeelde, veelvuldige loop van die model vertoon dat dit is unstable vir buite- domein voorbeelde. Die probleem is groot gemaak deur (1) die kombinasie van BERT met 'n nie- BERT enkoder, en (2) gebruik van 'n RNN- gebaseerde klassifiseerder op bo van BERT. Ons eindelike modele het tweede plek ontvang met 77.78% F-Tel op Subtask A (bv. in-domein) en 'n F-Tel van 79.59% op Subtask B (bv. uit-domein), selfs sonder om enige addisionele eksterne data te gebruik.", 'sq': 'This paper describes our system, Joint Encoders for Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI), for the SemEval 2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forums.  JESSI është një kombinim i dy kodifikuesve të fjalëve: (a) një duke përdorur shumë përfshirje të fjalëve të stërvitura para-stërvitura të mësuara nga regresioni log-bilinear (GloVe) dhe përkthimi (CoVe) modelet, dhe (b) një mbi kodifikimet e fjalëve nga një transformues i thellë dy-drejtues (BERT) të stërvitur para-stërvitur. Ne përfshijmë një modul trajnimi kundërshtar në domeni kur trajnojmë për mosha jashtë domeni. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se ndërsa BERT funksionon jashtëzakonisht mirë për mostrat në domeni, disa vrasje të model it tregojnë se është e paqëndrueshme për mostrat jashtë domenit. Problemi lehtësohet shumë nga (1) kombinimi i BERT me një kodues jo-BERT dhe (2) përdorimi i një klasifikuesi me bazë RNN mbi BERT. Modelet tona përfundimtare fituan vendin e dytë me 77.78% F-Score në Subtask A (pra në domeni) dhe arritën një F-Score prej 79.59% në Subtask B (pra jashtë domeni), edhe pa përdorur ndonjë të dhënë shtesë të jashtme.', 'ko': '본고는 우리 시스템, 안정적인 추리 연합 인코더(JESSI)를 묘사하여SemEval 2019 퀘스트 9: 온라인 평론과 포럼에서의 건의 발굴에 사용한다.JESSI는 두 개의 문장 인코더의 조합이다. (a) 대수 쌍선형 회귀 (장갑) 와 번역 (CoVe) 모형에서 배운 여러 개의 미리 훈련된 단어 삽입, 그리고 (b) 미리 훈련된 깊이 양방향 변환기 (BERT) 의 단어 인코딩 위에 있다.역외 견본을 훈련할 때, 우리는 역대항 훈련 모듈을 포함한다.우리의 실험은 BERT가 역내 샘플에서 매우 잘 표현되었지만 모델의 여러 차례 운행은 역외 샘플에서 불안정하다는 것을 보여 주었다.(1) BERT와 비BERT 인코더를 결합시키고 (2) BERT를 바탕으로 RNN 기반의 분류기를 사용하면 이 문제를 크게 완화시킬 수 있다.우리의 최종 모델은 하위 퀘스트 A(즉 역내)에서 77.78%의 F 점수로 2위를 차지했고, 하위 퀘스트 B(즉 역외)에서 79.59%의 F 점수로 2위를 차지했다. 추가 외부 데이터를 사용하지 않았더라도.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naš sistem, zajednički koderi za stabilne prijedloge (JESSI), za zadatak 9. polovice 2019. godine: prijedloge rudarstva iz online preglede i foruma. JESSI je kombinacija dva kodera rečenice: a) jedna koja koristi više predobučenih rečenica, učena iz modela regresije (Glove) i prevoda (Cove), a b) jedna na vrhu kodiranja rečenica iz predobučenog dubokog bidirektivnog transformatora (BERT). Uključujemo domenu adversarni modul treninga kada obuka za uzorke izvan domena. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da dok BERT izvršava izuzetno dobro za uzorke u domenu, nekoliko rundi modela pokazuju da je nestabilno za uzorke izvan domena. Problem se ogromno smanjuje (1) kombinacijom BERT sa koderom bez BERT-a i (2) korištenjem klasifikatora na RNN-baziranog na vrhu BERT-a. Naši konačni modeli su dobili drugo mjesto sa 77,78% F-Score na podzadatku A (tj. u domenu) i postigli F-Score od 79,59% na podzadatku B (tj. van domena), čak i bez koristenja dodatnih vanjskih podataka.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis kirjeldatakse meie süsteemi Joint Encoders for Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI) SemEval 2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Foorums. JESSI on kahest lausekodeerijast koosnev kombinatsioon: a) üks kasutab mitut eelõpetatud sõna manustamist, mis on saadud logaritmilise regressiooni (GloVe) ja tõlke (CoVe) mudelitest, ning b) üks eelõpetatud kahesuunalise trafo (BERT) sõna kodeerimise kõrval. Sisaldame domeeniväliste näidiste koolitamisel domeeni vastastikuse koolituse moodulit. Meie katsed näitavad, et kuigi BERT toimib domeenisiseste proovide puhul erakordselt hästi, näitavad mitmed mudeli jooksud, et see on domeeniväliste proovide puhul ebastabiilne. Probleemi leevendab tohutult (1) BERT-i kombineerimine mitte-BERT-kodeerijaga ja (2) RNN-põhise klassifikaatori kasutamine BERT-i peal. Meie lõplikud mudelid said teise koha 77,78% F-skooriga alaülesandel A (st domeenisisene) ja saavutasid F-skoori 79,59% alaülesandel B (st domeenivälise) isegi ilma täiendavate välisandmeteta.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan järjestelmäämme, Joint Encoders for Stable Suggestion Inference (JESSI), SemEval 2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forums. JESSI on kahden lauseenkooderin yhdistelmä: a) toisessa käytetään useita esikoulutettuja sanaupotuksia, jotka on opittu log-bilinear regression (GloVe) ja käännösmallien (CoVe) avulla, ja b) toisessa esikoulutetun syvän kaksisuuntaisen muuntajan (BERT) sanakoodausten päälle. Sisällytämme domain adversarial koulutusmoduulin, kun koulutamme domain-ulkopuolisia näytteitä. Kokeemme osoittavat, että vaikka BERT toimii poikkeuksellisen hyvin domain-näytteissä, useat testit osoittavat, että se on epävakaa domain-näytteissä. Ongelmaa lievennetään valtavasti (1) yhdistämällä BERT:tä muuhun kuin BERT-kooderiin ja (2) käyttämällä BERT:n päälle RNN-pohjaista luokitusta. Lopulliset mallit saavuttivat toisen sijan 77,78% F-Score-pisteellä alitehtävässä A (eli toimialueen sisällä) ja 79,59% F-Score-pisteen alitehtävässä B (eli toimialueen ulkopuolella), jopa ilman ulkoista lisätietoa.', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מתארת את מערכתנו, קודים משותפים עבור פרסומת הצעות יציבה (JESSI), עבור המשימה "SemEval 2019" JESSI הוא שילוב של שני קודדים משפטים: a) אחד בשימוש במספר קודמות מילים מאומנות מראש ללמוד מחזור log-bilinear (GloVe) ותרגום (CoVe) דוגמנים, ו (b) אחד מעל קודמות מילים ממהפך עמוק עמוק מאומן מראש (BERT). אנחנו כוללים מודול אימון יריבי בתחום כאשר אימון לדגימות מחוץ לתחום. הניסויים שלנו מראים כי בעוד BERT מצליח יוצא דופן טוב לדגימות בתחום, מספר רצויות של הדוגמא מראים שהוא לא יציב לדגימות מחוץ לתחום. הבעיה מוקלת באופן עצום על ידי (1) שילוב BERT עם קודד לא-BERT, ו (2) בשימוש מסווג מבוסס על RNN על גבי BERT. הדוגמנים האחרונים שלנו השיגו מקום שני עם 77.78% F-Score על Subtask A (כלומר בתחום) והשגנו F-Score של 79.59% על Subtask B (כלומר מחוץ לתחום), אפילו בלי להשתמש במידע חיצוני נוסף.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje naš sistem, Skupni kodirniki za stabilno ugotavljanje predlogov (JESSI), za nalogo 9 SemEval 2019: rudarjenje predlogov iz spletnih pregledov in forumov. JESSI je kombinacija dveh kodirnikov stavkov: (a) enega, ki uporablja več vnaprej usposobljenih besednih vdelav, pridobljenih z modeli log-bilinearne regresije (GloVe) in prevajanja (CoVe), ter (b) enega na vrhu kodiranja besed iz vnaprej usposobljenega globokega dvosmernega transformatorja (BERT). Pri usposabljanju za zunajdomenske vzorce vključujemo domenski kontradiktorski modul. Naši poskusi kažejo, da BERT sicer izjemno dobro deluje pri notranjih vzorcih, več serij modela pa kaže, da je nestabilen pri zunajdomenskih vzorcih. Težavo močno ublažimo z (1) kombinacijo BERT-a s kodirnikom, ki ni BERT, in (2) z uporabo klasifikatorja, ki temelji na RNN-u, na vrhu BERT-a. Naši končni modeli so dobili drugo mesto s 77,78% F-Score na podnalogi A (tj. v domeni) in dosegli F-Score 79,59% na podnalogi B (tj. zunaj domene), tudi brez uporabe dodatnih zunanjih podatkov.', 'jv': 'This paper description us System, Joint koder for Stable Suggestion Info (jESSE), for the seminval 2011 task 9: Suggestion Minng from online spills and forumes. YESSE iku kelompok durung koder: a) sampeyan gambar sistem ampungan kelompok tarjamahan kelompok We include a domain contrastorial tutorial module when tutorial for out-of-domain samples. We testis show that when BERT plays extremely welly for in-domain samples, Multiple runs of the model show that it is not stable for out-of-domain samples. Presis We last modes generated second location with 7.8% F-Escure on Subtask A (i.e. in-domain) and success an F-Escure of 7.9% on Subtask B (i.e. out-of-domain), same before use some additional externe data.', 'ha': "Wannan takardar na bayyana tsarin mu, Sake Encodiers wa Sakamako na Stable Infekt (JESSA), wa the Semeval 2019 Tafiyar da aikin 9: Kayyardon Mining from Online Refugees and Forums. JESSA yana cikin kode biyu na maganar kwamfyuta: (a) ɗayan ta yi amfani da shiryoyin magana masu ƙaranci da aka sanar da su daga shiryoyin log-bilineighbour regression (GoV) da fassarar (Cove) da kuma (b) wani da ke saman kodi na kalma daga wata shido mai amfani da ta gabã ɗaya na saka mai b a ƙanci (BERT). Munã shigar da wata moduli mai motsi da ke cikin Domen idan an yi wa shirin misãlai waɗanda ba'a fita ba. Kayan jarrabõnmu za'a nũna cewa, a lokacin da BERT ke aikata wani abu mai kyau wa misãlai guda, yana nuna wasu rundunõni na misãlai masu buɗe ba. Socket error code ConnectionTimeout DawuyinMu na ƙarshen ya sami matsayin da 77.78% F-score kan Sub-aikin A (misali, cikin-Domin) kuma ya sami wani F-score na 79.59% kan Sub-aikin B (misali, wanda ba ya fita ba, ko kuma ba ya yi amfani da wasu data na ƙaranci ba.", 'bo': 'ཤོག JESSI is a combination of two sentence encoders: (a) one using multiple pre-trained word embeddings learned from log-bilinear regression (GloVe) and translation (CoVe) models, and (b) one on top of word encodings from a pre-trained deep bidirectional transformer (BERT). We include a domain adversarial training module when training for out-of-domain samples. Our experiments show that while BERT performs exceptionally well for in-domain samples, several runs of the model show that it is unstable for out-of-domain samples. དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ནི(1) BERT སྒྲིག་མཐུད་ཀྱི་མིན་BERT་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་(2) སྤྱོད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་RNN་ཡོད་པའི་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག་དགོས། Our final models obtained second place with 77.78% F-Score on Subtask A (i.e. in-domain) and achieved an F-Score of 79.59% on Subtask B (i.e. out-of-domain), even without using any additional external data.'}
{'en': 'Yimmon at SemEval-2019 Task 9 : Suggestion Mining with Hybrid Augmented Approaches', 'pt': 'Yimmon no SemEval-2019 Tarefa 9: Sugestão de Mineração com Abordagens Aumentadas Híbridas', 'ar': 'يمون في SemEval-2019 المهمة 9: اقتراح التنقيب باستخدام مناهج معززة هجينة', 'es': 'Yimmon en la Tarea 9 de SemEval-2019: Minería de sugerencias con enfoques aumentados híbridos', 'fr': 'Yimmon au SEMEVAL-2019 Task 9\xa0: Exploration de suggestions avec des approches hybrides augmentées', 'ja': 'Yimmon at SemEval -2019タスク9 ：ハイブリッド拡張アプローチによる提案採掘', 'zh': 'Yimmon在SemEval-2019务9:用混合增强之法议掘之', 'ru': 'Yimmon на SemEval-2019 Задача 9: Предложение майнинга с гибридными дополненными подходами', 'hi': 'सेमवेल-2019 टास्क 9 पर यिमन: हाइब्रिड संवर्धित दृष्टिकोण के साथ सुझाव खनन', 'ga': 'Yimmon ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 9: Mianadóireacht Molta le Cur Chuige Méadaithe Hibrideach', 'ka': 'იმიმონი SemEval-2019 დავალება 9: საზოგადომის მინღება ჰიბრიტური აგგგენტირებული მიღებებით', 'el': 'Γιμμόν στο έργο 9: Προτάσεις εξόρυξης με υβριδικές ενισχυμένες προσεγγίσεις', 'hu': 'Yimmon a SemEval-2019 9. feladat: Javaslat bányászat hibrid kiterjesztett megközelítéssel', 'it': 'Yimmon a SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining con Approcci Aumentati Ibridi', 'kk': 'Иммон 9. тапсырма: Хибрид көтерілген жағдайлармен балалау талаптары', 'lt': 'Yimmon SemEval-2019 9 užduotis: siūloma kasyba naudojant hibridinius didinamuosius metodus', 'mk': 'Yimmon на SemEval-2019 задача 9: Предлог за рудање со хибридски зголемени пристапи', 'ms': 'Yimmon di SemEval-2019 Tugas 9: cadangan Perlombongan dengan pendekatan Ditambah Hybrid', 'ml': 'സെമ്മെവാല്\u200d- 2019 ജോലി 9: ഹൈബ്രിഡ് ഓഗ്മെന്റ് ആഗമെന്\u200dഡുകളുമായി മിനിംഗ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന് ശുദ്ധീകരിക്കുക', 'mn': 'SemEval-2019 Task 9: Hybrid Augmented Approaches', 'mt': 'Yimmon f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 9: Suġġeriment Mining b’Approċċi Aġġustati Ibridi', 'no': 'Yimmon på semiEval-2019 oppgåve 9: Foreslåp for mining med hybrid augmentert tilnærmingar', 'sr': 'Yimmon na semiEval-2019 zadatak 9: Predloženje rudarstva sa hibridskim povećanim pristupima', 'pl': 'Yimmon na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 9: Górnictwo sugestii z hybrydowymi rozszerzonymi podejściami', 'ro': 'Yimmon la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 9: Sugestii miniere cu abordări hibride augmentate', 'si': 'Yimmon at semeval-2019 Job 9: Suggestion mining with hybri Agment approach', 'sv': 'Yimmon på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 9: Förslag till gruvdrift med Hybrid Augmented Approaches', 'so': 'Yimmon at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining with Hybrid Augmented Approaches', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 9- ல் Yimmon: ஹைப்ரிட் ஒதுக்கப்பட்ட நெருங்குகளுடன் நினைவூட்டல் பரிந்துரை', 'ur': 'ایمون سیم اول-2019 ٹاکس ۹ میں: ہیبراڈ اگلوٹی تقریب کے ساتھ پیش کرنا', 'uz': '9 Vazifani SemEval- 2019 yimmon: Hybrid Augmented Approaches bilan birlashtirish talab qilindi', 'vi': 'Giao dịch nảy sinh tại SemEvl-209: Đề nghị khai thác với các phương pháp gia tăng thêm.', 'bg': 'Задача 9: Предложение за добив с хибридни разширени подходи', 'nl': 'Yimmon op SemEval-2019 Taak 9: Suggestiemijnbouw met hybride augmented benaderingen', 'hr': 'Yimmon na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 9: Prijedloge rudarstva s hibridskim povećanim pristupima', 'da': 'Yimmon på SemEval-2019 Opgave 9: Forslag til minedrift med Hybrid Augmented Approaches', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019년의 Yimmon 퀘스트 9: 혼합 증강 방법의 건의 발굴', 'fa': 'Yimmon at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Proposal Mining with Hybrid Increased Approaches', 'id': 'Yimmon di SemEval-2019 Tugas 9: Suggestion Mining with Hybrid Augmented Approaches', 'de': 'Yimmon auf der SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 9: Suggestion Mining mit hybriden Augmented Ansätzen', 'sw': 'Yimmon kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 9: Mapendekezo ya Kusini na Mazungumzo ya Hybrid Augmented', 'sq': 'Yimmon në SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining with Hybrid Augmented Approaches', 'am': 'ስራ 9:', 'tr': 'Yimmon at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining with Hybrid Augmented Approaches', 'af': 'Yimmon by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 9: Voorskou Mining met Hybrid Augmenteerde Approaches', 'hy': 'Yimmon at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining with Hybrid Augmented Approaches', 'az': 'Yimmon at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Hybrid Increased Approaches with Mining Proposal', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের ইমমন: হাইব্রিড অগমেন্টের আগমনের সাথে মিনিং এর প্রস্তাব', 'bs': 'Yimmon na pola Evala-2019. zadatak 9: Prijedlog rudarstva sa povećanim pristupima hibrida', 'ca': 'Yimmon a SemEval-2019 tasca 9: Sugerir mineria amb enfocaments híbrids augmentats', 'cs': 'Yimmon na SemEval-2019 Úkol 9: Návrhy těžby s hybridními rozšířenými přístupy', 'fi': 'Yimmon SemEval-2019 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 9: Hybridi-Augmented Approaches', 'et': 'Yimmon SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 9: soovituste kaevandamine hübriidsete täiendatud lähenemisviisidega', 'jv': 'Yimm on at semebal-2011 task 9: Suggestion Minng with HyBridge AGmented Acceaces', 'sk': 'Yimmon na SemEval-2019 naloga 9: Predlogi rudarjenja s hibridnimi razširjenimi pristopi', 'ha': 'Yimmon at SemEal-2019 Tafiyar 9: Recossation Mining with Hybri Augmented Approaches', 'he': 'Yimmon ב SemEval-2019 משימה 9: הצעה מכירה עם גישות גבוהות היברידים', 'bo': 'Yimmon at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Suggestion Mining with Hybrid Augmented Approaches'}
{'en': 'Suggestion mining task aims to extract tips, advice, and recommendations from unstructured text. The task includes many challenges, such as class imbalance, figurative expressions, context dependency, and long and complex sentences. This paper gives a detailed system description of our submission in SemEval 2019 Task 9 Subtask A. We transfer Self-Attention Network (SAN), a successful model in machine reading comprehension field, into this task. Our model concentrates on modeling long-term dependency which is indispensable to parse long and complex sentences. Besides, we also adopt techniques, such as contextualized embedding, back-translation, and auxiliary loss, to augment the system. Our model achieves a performance of F1=76.3, and rank 4th among 34 participating systems. Further ablation study shows that the techniques used in our system are beneficial to the performance.', 'es': 'La tarea de extracción de sugerencias tiene como objetivo extraer consejos, consejos y recomendaciones de textos no estructurados. La tarea incluye muchos desafíos, como el desequilibrio de clases, las expresiones figurativas, la dependencia del contexto y oraciones largas y complejas. Este documento proporciona una descripción detallada del sistema de nuestra presentación en la Subtarea A de la Tarea 9 de SemEval 2019. Transferimos la Red de Autoatención (SAN), un modelo exitoso en el campo de la comprensión de la lectura automática, a esta tarea. Nuestro modelo se concentra en modelar la dependencia a largo plazo, que es indispensable para analizar oraciones largas y complejas. Además, también adoptamos técnicas, como incrustación contextualizada, retrotraducción y pérdida auxiliar, para aumentar el sistema. Nuestro modelo logra un rendimiento de F1 = 76.3 y ocupa el cuarto lugar entre los 34 sistemas participantes. Un estudio de ablación adicional muestra que las técnicas utilizadas en nuestro sistema son beneficiosas para el rendimiento.', 'pt': 'A tarefa de mineração de sugestões visa extrair dicas, conselhos e recomendações de texto não estruturado. A tarefa inclui muitos desafios, como desequilíbrio de classe, expressões figurativas, dependência de contexto e frases longas e complexas. Este artigo fornece uma descrição detalhada do sistema de nossa submissão no SemEval 2019 Tarefa 9 Subtarefa A. Transferimos Self-Attention Network (SAN), um modelo de sucesso na área de compreensão de leitura de máquina, para esta tarefa. Nosso modelo se concentra em modelar a dependência de longo prazo que é indispensável para analisar sentenças longas e complexas. Além disso, também adotamos técnicas, como embedding contextualizado, retrotradução e perda auxiliar, para aumentar o sistema. Nosso modelo atinge um desempenho de F1=76,3 e ocupa o 4º lugar entre 34 sistemas participantes. Um estudo de ablação posterior mostra que as técnicas utilizadas em nosso sistema são benéficas para o desempenho.', 'fr': "La tâche d'exploration de suggestions vise à extraire des astuces, des conseils et des recommandations d'un texte non structuré. La tâche comprend de nombreux défis, tels que le déséquilibre des classes, les expressions figuratives, la dépendance au contexte et les phrases longues et complexes. Cet article fournit une description détaillée du système de notre soumission dans la sous-tâche 9 de la tâche 9 de SemEval 2019 A. Nous transférons le réseau d'attention personnelle (SAN), un modèle réussi dans le domaine de la compréhension de la lecture automatique, dans cette tâche. Notre modèle se concentre sur la modélisation de la dépendance à long terme, ce qui est indispensable pour analyser des phrases longues et complexes. En outre, nous adoptons également des techniques, telles que l'intégration contextualisée, la rétro-traduction et la perte auxiliaire, pour augmenter le système. Notre modèle atteint une performance de F1 = 76,3 et se classe au 4e rang parmi les 34 systèmes participants. D'autres études d'ablation montrent que les techniques utilisées dans notre système sont bénéfiques pour la performance.", 'ar': 'تهدف مهمة التنقيب عن الاقتراحات إلى استخراج النصائح والمشورة والتوصيات من نص غير منظم. تتضمن المهمة العديد من التحديات ، مثل عدم توازن الفئة ، والتعبيرات التصويرية ، والاعتماد على السياق ، والجمل الطويلة والمعقدة. تقدم هذه الورقة وصفًا تفصيليًا للنظام الذي قدمناه في المهمة الفرعية 9 للمهمة 9 في SemEval 2019. نقوم بنقل شبكة الاهتمام الذاتي (SAN) ، وهي نموذج ناجح في مجال فهم قراءة الآلة ، إلى هذه المهمة. يركز نموذجنا على نمذجة التبعية طويلة المدى التي لا غنى عنها لتحليل الجمل الطويلة والمعقدة. إلى جانب ذلك ، نعتمد أيضًا تقنيات ، مثل التضمين السياقي والترجمة الخلفية والخسارة المساعدة ، لزيادة النظام. نموذجنا يحقق أداء F1 = 76.3 ، ويحتل المرتبة الرابعة بين 34 نظامًا مشاركًا. توضح دراسة الاستئصال الإضافية أن التقنيات المستخدمة في نظامنا مفيدة للأداء.', 'zh': '建议发掘旨在非结构化文本提提、建言、荐举。 务多挑战,类不平喻表达式,上下文赖长杂之句。 本文具言SemEval 2019 Task 9子务A中所言。 自注网络(SAN)(机器读成功)移于此。 吾之所专于久恃者建模,此解析长而杂句必不可少也。 用上下文嵌、反向译、辅失等术以增其统。 我成F1 = 76.3性,34参排名第4位。 消融究明,系统之利性也。', 'ru': 'Задача майнинга предложений направлена на извлечение советов, подсказок и рекомендаций из неструктурированного текста. Задача включает в себя множество задач, таких как дисбаланс классов, образные выражения, контекстная зависимость и длинные и сложные предложения. В этой статье дается подробное системное описание нашего представления в SemEval 2019 Task 9 Subtask A. Мы переносим в эту задачу сеть самовосприятия (SAN), успешную модель в области понимания машинного чтения. Наша модель концентрируется на моделировании долгосрочной зависимости, которая необходима для анализа длинных и сложных предложений. Кроме того, мы также принимаем такие методы, как контекстуализированное встраивание, обратный перевод и вспомогательные потери, чтобы увеличить систему. Наша модель достигает производительности F1=76,3 и занимает 4-е место среди 34 участвующих систем. Дальнейшее исследование абляции показывает, что методы, используемые в нашей системе, полезны для производительности.', 'ja': '候補マイニングタスクは、構造化されていないテキストからヒント、アドバイス、および推奨事項を抽出することを目的としています。このタスクには、クラスの不均衡、比喩表現、文脈依存性、長く複雑な文章など、多くの課題が含まれます。本稿では、SemEval 2019 Task 9 Subtask Aの提出物の詳細なシステム説明を行います。機械読解分野で成功したモデルであるSelf - Attention Network （ SAN ）をこのタスクに転送します。私たちのモデルは、長く複雑な文章を解析するために不可欠な長期依存性のモデリングに集中しています。さらに、システムを拡張するために、コンテキスト化された埋め込み、逆変換、補助損失などのテクニックも採用しています。当社のモデルはF 1 = 76.3のパフォーマンスを発揮し、34の参加システムの中で4位にランクインしています。さらなるアブレーション研究は、システムで使用される技術が性能に有益であることを示しています。', 'hi': 'सुझाव खनन कार्य का उद्देश्य असंरचित पाठ से युक्तियाँ, सलाह और सिफारिशें निकालना है। कार्य में कई चुनौतियां शामिल हैं, जैसे कि वर्ग असंतुलन, आलंकारिक अभिव्यक्ति, संदर्भ निर्भरता, और लंबे और जटिल वाक्य। यह पेपर SemEval 2019 टास्क 9 सबटास्क ए में हमारे सबमिशन का एक विस्तृत सिस्टम विवरण देता है। हम स्व-ध्यान नेटवर्क (सैन), मशीन रीडिंग कॉम्प्रिहेंशन फील्ड में एक सफल मॉडल, इस कार्य में स्थानांतरित करते हैं। हमारा मॉडल लंबे समय तक निर्भरता के मॉडलिंग पर ध्यान केंद्रित करता है जो लंबे और जटिल वाक्यों को पार्स करने के लिए अपरिहार्य है। इसके अलावा, हम सिस्टम को बढ़ाने के लिए प्रासंगिक एम्बेडिंग, बैक-ट्रांसलेशन और सहायक हानि जैसी तकनीकों को भी अपनाते हैं। हमारा मॉडल F1 = 76.3 का प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है, और 34 भाग लेने वाले सिस्टम के बीच 4 वें स्थान पर है। आगे के एब्लेशन अध्ययन से पता चलता है कि हमारे सिस्टम में उपयोग की जाने वाली तकनीकें प्रदर्शन के लिए फायदेमंद हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag tasc mianadóireachta moltaí leideanna, comhairle agus moltaí a bhaint as téacs neamhstruchtúrtha. Cuimsíonn an tasc go leor dúshlán, mar shampla éagothroime ranga, nathanna figiúrtha, spleáchas ar chomhthéacs, agus abairtí fada casta. Tugann an páipéar seo cur síos mionsonraithe ar an gcóras ar ár n-aighneacht i bhFothasc 9 Tasc 9 SemEval 2019 A. Aistrímid Líonra Féin-aird (SAN), samhail rathúil i réimse na tuisceana meaisín-léitheoireachta, isteach sa tasc seo. Díríonn ár múnla ar spleáchas fadtéarmach a shamhaltú, rud atá fíor-riachtanach chun abairtí fada casta a pharsáil. Ina theannta sin, glacaimid freisin teicnící, amhail leabú comhthéacsaithe, aisaistriúchán, agus caillteanas cúnta, chun an córas a mhéadú. Baineann ár samhail feidhmíocht F1=76.3 amach, agus tá sé sa 4ú háit i measc 34 córas rannpháirteach. Léiríonn tuilleadh staidéir ablation go bhfuil na teicníochtaí a úsáidtear inár gcóras tairbheach don fheidhmíocht.', 'ka': 'საზოგადომის მინიღების მიზეზი იქნება საზოგადომები, საზოგადომები და რეკუმენტები არსტრუქტურული ტექსტიდან გამოყენება. დავალება აქვს ბევრი გამოცდილებები, როგორც კლასის განმავლობა, ფიგურატიური გამოსახულები, კონტექსტური განმავლობა, და ძალიან და კომპლექსი გამოსახულები ჩვენ SemEval 2019-ის სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო A. ჩვენ სამუშაო სამუშაო მქონელი (SAN) გადატვირცეთ, სუფლიოდ მოდელი მაქსინური კითხვის სამუშაოში, ამ დავალებში. ჩვენი მოდელი კონტენსტურებულია მარცხლეობის მოდელზე, რომელიც უნდა უნდა იყოს სიგრძელი და კომპლექსი სიტყვების პანუსაციას. დამატებით, ჩვენ კონტექსტუალურად გავაკეთებთ ტექნექციები, როგორც კონტექსტუალურად გადატვირთვა, შემდეგ გადატვირთვა და დახმარებელად დავიწყებთ,  ჩვენი მოდელი F1=76.3-ის პროგრამეტს მიიღება და 34-ს დაწყვეტილი სისტემის შორის მეოთხედი. დამატებული სწავლობა ჩვენი სისტემიში გამოყენებული ტექნექციები გამოიყენებული იქნება გამოიყენება.', 'hu': 'A javaslatbányászati feladat célja, hogy tippeket, tanácsokat és ajánlásokat vegyen ki strukturálatlan szövegből. A feladat számos kihívást tartalmaz, mint például az osztály egyensúlyhiánya, a figurális kifejezések, a kontextusfüggőség, valamint a hosszú és összetett mondatok. Ez a tanulmány részletes rendszerleírást ad a SemEval 2019 Task 9 A alcsoportban benyújtott pályázatunkról. Ebbe a feladatba átadjuk az önfigyelmet hálózatot (SAN), amely a gépi olvasás megértésének sikeres modelljét. Modellünk a hosszú távú függőség modellezésére összpontosít, ami elengedhetetlen a hosszú és összetett mondatok elemzéséhez. Emellett olyan technikákat is alkalmazunk, mint például kontextuális beágyazás, visszafordítás és kiegészítő veszteség, hogy növeljük a rendszert. Modellünk F1=76,3 teljesítményt ér el, és a 34 résztvevő rendszer közül a negyedik helyen áll. További ablációs tanulmányok azt mutatják, hogy a rendszerünkben alkalmazott technikák előnyösek a teljesítmény szempontjából.', 'el': 'Η εργασία εξόρυξης προτάσεων αποσκοπεί στην εξαγωγή συμβουλών, συμβουλών και συστάσεων από μη δομημένο κείμενο. Το έργο περιλαμβάνει πολλές προκλήσεις, όπως ταξική ανισορροπία, εικονιστικές εκφράσεις, εξάρτηση από το πλαίσιο, και μεγάλες και σύνθετες προτάσεις. Αυτή η εργασία δίνει μια λεπτομερή περιγραφή του συστήματος της υποβολής μας στο έργο εργασίας 9 Υποεργασία Α. Μεταφέρουμε το Δίκτυο Αυτοπροσοχής (ένα επιτυχημένο μοντέλο στον τομέα της κατανόησης της μηχανικής ανάγνωσης, σε αυτήν την εργασία. Το μοντέλο μας επικεντρώνεται στη μοντελοποίηση μακροχρόνιας εξάρτησης η οποία είναι απαραίτητη για την ανάλυση μακροχρόνιων και σύνθετων προτάσεων. Εκτός αυτού, υιοθετούμε επίσης τεχνικές, όπως ενσωμάτωση στο πλαίσιο, μεταγραφή και βοηθητική απώλεια, για να αυξήσουμε το σύστημα. Το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει απόδοση F1=76.3 και κατατάσσεται 4η μεταξύ 34 συμμετεχόντων συστημάτων. Περαιτέρω μελέτη αφαίρεσης δείχνει ότι οι τεχνικές που χρησιμοποιούνται στο σύστημά μας είναι ευεργετικές για την απόδοση.', 'lt': 'Suggestion mining task aims to extract tips, advice, and recommendations from unstructured text.  Ši užduotis apima daugelį uždavinių, pavyzdžiui, klasės disbalansą, vaizdines išraiškas, priklausomybę nuo konteksto ir ilgus bei sudėtingus sakinius. Šiame dokumente išsamiai aprašomas mūsų pranešimas SemEval 2019 m. 9 užduoties A papunktyje. Į šią užduotį perkeliame savarankiško dėmesio tinklą (SAN), sėkmingą model į mašin ų skaitymo supratimo srityje. Mūsų model is sutelkiamas į ilgalaikės priklausomybės modeliavimą, kuris yra būtinas ilgiems ir sudėtingiems sakiniams apdoroti. Be to, taip pat diegiame metodus, pavyzdžiui, kontekstinį įterpimą, grįžtamąjį vertimą ir papildomus nuostolius, kad sustiprintume sistemą. Mūsų modelis pasiekia F1 = 76,3 rezultatus, o ketvirtasis iš 34 dalyvaujančių sistemų. Tolesnis abliacijos tyrimas rodo, kad mūsų sistemoje naudojami metodai yra naudingi našumui.', 'it': 'Il compito di mining dei suggerimenti mira a estrarre suggerimenti, consigli e raccomandazioni da testo non strutturato. Il compito include molte sfide, come lo squilibrio di classe, le espressioni figurative, la dipendenza dal contesto e frasi lunghe e complesse. Questo articolo fornisce una descrizione dettagliata del sistema della nostra presentazione in SemEval 2019 Task 9 Subtask A. Trasferiamo Self-Attention Network (SAN), un modello di successo nel campo della comprensione della lettura automatica, in questo compito. Il nostro modello si concentra sulla modellazione della dipendenza a lungo termine, indispensabile per analizzare frasi lunghe e complesse. Inoltre, adottiamo anche tecniche, come incorporamento contestualizzato, back-translation e perdita ausiliaria, per aumentare il sistema. Il nostro modello raggiunge una prestazione di F1=76,3, e si colloca al quarto posto tra i 34 sistemi partecipanti. Ulteriori studi di ablazione mostrano che le tecniche utilizzate nel nostro sistema sono benefiche per le prestazioni.', 'mk': 'Предлозите за минирање имаат за цел извлекување совети, совети и препораки од неструктуриран текст. Оваа задача вклучува многу предизвици, како што се дебалансот на класата, фигуративните изрази, зависноста од контекст и долги и комплексни реченици. Овој документ дава детализиран системски опис на нашето поднесување во SemEval 2019 задача 9 подзадача А. Ја префрлиме Семовнимателната мрежа (SAN), успешниот модел во полето за разбирање на читањето на машините, во оваа задача. Нашиот модел се концентрира на моделирање на долгорочна зависност која е неопходна за анализирање долги и комплексни реченици. Освен тоа, ние, исто така, усвоуваме техники, како што се контекстуално вградување, преведување назад и помошна загуба, за да го зголемиме системот. Нашиот модел постигнува резултат на F1=76,3 и се рангира на четвртиот меѓу 34 учествувачки системи. Понатамошната аплациска студија покажува дека техниките кои се користат во нашиот систем се корисни за перформансата.', 'kk': 'Құрастырылмаған мәтіннен құлақтар, мақсаттарын және рекомендацияларды тарқату үшін таңдау тапсырмалары. Тапсырманың көптеген мәселелері, мысалы, класс дисбаланс, фигурациялық өрнектері, контекстің тәуелдігі, ұзын және комплекс сөйлемелері. Бұл қағаз біздің жүйеңіздің SemEval 2019 тапсырмасының A- тапсырмасында жіберіміздің егжей- тегжейі сипаттамасын береді. Бұл тапсырмаға "Self-Attention Network" (SAN), компьютерді оқу өрісінде сәтті үлгі Біздің үлгіміз ұзын және комплекс сөздерді талдау үшін ұзын уақыт тәуелдігін моделдеу үшін байланысты. Сонымен қатар, жүйені көтеру үшін көмектесетін техникаларды қолданамыз. Біздің үлгіміз F1=76,3 және 34 қатысушылық жүйелердің 4-ші ретінде жеткізеді. Қосымша жүйеңізде қолданылатын техникалар жұмыс істеу үшін пайдалы болады дегенді көрсетеді.', 'ml': 'Suggestion mining task aims to extract tips, advice, and recommendations from unstructured text.  ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d ഒരുപാട് വിലാസങ്ങളുണ്ട്, ക്ലാസിന്റെ തീവ്രതയില്ലാത്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200d, സംവിധാന പ്രഭാഷണങ്ങള്\u200d, സംസ്ഥാനത് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ടാസ്ക് 9 Subtask A-ല്\u200d നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി വിശദീകരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വയം ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന നെറ നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d നീണ്ട നീണ്ട കാലം ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് കണക്കാക്കുന്നു. നീണ്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200d പാര്\u200dസ് ച കൂടാതെ, സിസ്റ്റത്തിനെ കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂട്ടിക്കൊടുക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയിലുള്ള സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയും പിന നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d എഫ്1=76.3 പ്രകടനം നേടുന്നു. 34 പങ്കെടുക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റമില്\u200d നാലാമത്തെ നിലവില്\u200d നിന്നും  കൂടുതല്\u200d തീവ്രമാണ പഠനം കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Il-kompitu ta’ suġġeriment fil-minjieri għandu l-għan li jastrezzjona l-pariri, il-pariri u r-rakkomandazzjonijiet minn test mhux strutturat. Il-kompitu jinkludi ħafna sfidi, bħall-iżbilanċ tal-klassi, l-espressjonijiet figurattivi, id-dipendenza fuq il-kuntest, u sentenzi twal u kumplessi. Dan id-dokument jagħti deskrizzjoni dettaljata tas-sistema tas-sottomissjoni tagħna f’SemEval 2019 Task 9 Subtask A. Intrasferixxu Netwerk ta’ Attenzjoni Awtomatika (SAN), mudell ta’ suċċess fil-qasam tal-fehim tal-qari tal-magni, f’dan il-kompitu. Il-mudell tagħna jikkonċentra fuq l-immudellar tad-dipendenza fit-tul li hija indispensabbli biex jiġu analizzati sentenzi twal u kumplessi. Besides, we also adopt techniques, such as contextualized embedding, back-translation, and auxiliary loss, to augment the system.  Il-mudell tagħna jikseb prestazzjoni ta’ F1=76.3, u jikklassifika r-raba’ fost 34 sistema parteċipanti. Studju ulterjuri dwar l-ablazzjoni juri li t-tekniki użati fis-sistema tagħna huma ta’ benefiċċju għall-prestazzjoni.', 'mn': 'Бүтээгдэхүүнгүй текстээс зөвлөгөө, зөвлөгөө, зөвлөгөө гаргахын тулд санал зориулагддаг. Олон сорилтууд нь хичээлийн тэгш байдал, зураг илэрхийлэл, харьцааны хамааралтай байдал, урт, төвөгтэй өгүүлбэл юм. Энэ цаас SemEval 2019 Task 9 Subtask A-д бидний нийтлэх системийн тодорхойлолт өгч байна. Бид Self-Attention Network (SAN), машин унших ойлголтын талбарын амжилттай загварыг энэ ажил руу шилжүүлнэ. Бидний загвар нь урт хугацааны хамааралтай байдлыг загварчлахад төвлөрүүлдэг. Энэ нь урт хугацааны, комплекс өгүүлбэрүүдийг хуваалцах хэрэгтэй. Үүнээс гадна бид системийг нэмэгдүүлэх технологийг ашигладаг. Бидний загвар нь F1=76.3 болон 34 оролцогчдын 4-р дүрс гарч ирнэ. Дараагийн үйлдвэрлэлийн судалгаагаар бидний системд хэрэглэгдсэн техникууд үйлдвэрлэлд ашигтай гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Førehandsvising av miniatyroppgåve er å pakka ut tips, råd og anbefalingar frå ikkje strukturert tekst. Oppgåva inneheld mange utfordringar, slik som ulike klasse, figurativ uttrykk, kontekstavhengighet og lang og komplekse setningar. Denne papiret gjev ei detaljert systemskildring av vårt oppføring i semiEval 2019 Oppgåve 9 Subtask A. Vi overfører Self-Attention Network (SAN), eit vellukka modell i maskinelesingsforståkingsfeltet, i denne oppgåva. Modellen vårt koncentrerer på modellering av langsiktige avhengighet som er indispensable for å tolka lange og komplekse setningar. I tillegg kan vi også adoptere teknikk, slik som kontekstualisert innbygging, tilbakeomsetjing og hjelpetekst, for å auka systemet. Modellen vårt oppnår eit utvikling av F1=76,3, og rank 4 blant 34 deltakende systemer. Førre aktiveringsstudie viser at teknikkene som vert brukte i systemet vårt er nyttig for utviklinga.', 'pl': 'Zadanie wydobywania sugestii ma na celu wyodrębnienie wskazówek, porad i zaleceń z nieustrukturyzowanego tekstu. Zadanie obejmuje wiele wyzwań, takich jak nierównowaga klasowa, wyrażenia figuratywne, zależność od kontekstu oraz długie i złożone zdania. Niniejszy artykuł zawiera szczegółowy opis systemu naszej zgłoszenia w SemEval 2019 Task 9 Podzadanie A. Do tego zadania przenosimy Self-Attention Network (SAN), udany model w dziedzinie rozumienia odczytu maszynowego. Nasz model koncentruje się na modelowaniu długoterminowej zależności, która jest niezbędna do analizy długich i złożonych zdań. Poza tym, stosujemy również techniki, takie jak kontekstualizowane osadzenie, wsteczne tłumaczenie i straty pomocnicze, aby rozszerzyć system. Nasz model osiąga wydajność F1=76.3 i zajmuje czwartą pozycję wśród 34 systemów uczestniczących. Dalsze badania ablacji pokazują, że techniki stosowane w naszym systemie są korzystne dla wydajności.', 'ro': 'Sarcina minieră de sugestii are ca scop extragerea sfaturilor, sfaturilor și recomandărilor din text nestructurat. Sarcina include multe provocări, cum ar fi dezechilibrul de clasă, expresiile figurative, dependența de context și propoziții lungi și complexe. Această lucrare oferă o descriere detaliată a sistemului depunerii noastre în SemEval 2019 Task 9 Subtask A. Transferăm rețeaua de auto-atenție (SAN), un model de succes în domeniul înțelegerii citirii mașinilor, în această sarcină. Modelul nostru se concentrează pe modelarea dependenței pe termen lung, care este indispensabilă pentru analizarea propozițiilor lungi și complexe. În plus, adoptăm și tehnici, cum ar fi încorporarea contextualizată, traducerea înapoi și pierderea auxiliară, pentru a spori sistemul. Modelul nostru atinge o performanță de F1=76.3 și se situează pe locul 4 în rândul celor 34 de sisteme participante. Studiul suplimentar de ablație arată că tehnicile utilizate în sistemul nostru sunt benefice pentru performanță.', 'sr': 'Predloženi rudarski zadatak je cilj da izvuče savete, savjete i preporuke iz neostrukturnog teksta. Taj zadatak uključuje mnoge izazove, kao što su neslaganje klase, figurativne izraze, zavisnost konteksta i duge i kompleksne rečenice. Ovaj papir daje detaljno opis sistema našeg podnošenja u polju razumijevanja mašin a u ovom zadatku. Naš model se koncentriše na modeliranje dugoročne zavisnosti koje je neophodno za analizu dugih i kompleksnih rečenica. Osim toga, takođe usvojimo tehnike, poput kontekstualiziranog ugrađenja, povratnog prevoda i pomoćnog gubitka, kako bi povećali sistem. Naš model postiže učinkovitost F1=76,3 i četvrtog reda među 34 sudjelujućim sistemima. Daljnje proučavanje ablacije pokazuje da su tehnike koje se koriste u našem sistemu korisne za izvođenje.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තොරතුරු, උපදේශය, සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති පාළුවන් නිර් මේ වැඩේ අභ්\u200dයාගයක් විශේෂයෙන් ගොඩක් අභ්\u200dයාගයක් තියෙනවා, වර්ගයක් නිර්මාණය, වර්ගයක් අභ්\u200dයාගයක්, සං මේ පැත්තේ අපේ සෙම්වෙල් 2019 වැඩක් 9 වැඩක් A වලින් විස්තර පද්ධතිය විස්තරයක් දෙනවා. අපේ මොඩල් සැකසුම් ලොකු වාර්තාවක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න. ඒ වගේම, අපි තාක්ෂණාත්මක විශ්වාස කරනවා වගේම සංවිධානය සම්බන්ධ කරලා තියෙන්නේ, පස්සේ පරිවර්තනය සහ උදව්වක අපේ නිර්මාණය F1=76.3 ගැන ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලැබෙනවා, සහ 4වෙනි ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පද්ධතිය 34 අතර. අපේ පද්ධතියේ භාවිත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාව පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් කියලා.', 'so': 'Talo bixinta shaqada laga sameynayo waxaa loola jeedaa in laga soo bixiyo tijaabooyinka, talooyin iyo talooyin. Shaqada waxaa ku jira dhibaatooyin badan, tusaale ahaan sinnaanta fasalka, muuqashada fikradda, xiriirka ku xiran, iyo hadallada adag. Kanu wuxuu sawir ka dhigaa qoraalka nidaamka ah oo warqaddayada ku qoran SemEval 2019 Task 9 Subtask A. Waxaynu u wareejinaynaa Self-Attention Network (SAN), kaas oo ah model ku liibaan machine-reading comprehension field, shuqulkaas. Tusaalkayagu wuxuu ku qoran yahay sameynta ku xiran waqti dheer, kaas oo aan u baahnayn in lagu baaraandejiyo hadallada dheer oo adag. Sidoo kale waxaynu qaadannaa qalabka, tusaale ahaan xarunta, turjumidda dib-u-dhigista iyo khasaarada xilliga ah si aan u kordhinno nidaamka. Tusaale ahaan wuxuu gaadhaa sameynta F1=76.3, wuxuuna u dhexeeyaa 34 nidaamka qayb-gelinta. Waxbarashada dheeraadka ah waxaa muujiya in teknikada lagu isticmaalo nidaamka ay faa’iido u leeyihiin sameynta.', 'sv': 'Förslag mining uppgift syftar till att extrahera tips, råd och rekommendationer från ostrukturerad text. Uppgiften innehåller många utmaningar, såsom klassobalans, figurativa uttryck, sammanhangsberoende och långa och komplexa meningar. Denna uppsats ger en detaljerad systembeskrivning av vårt bidrag i SemEval 2019 Uppgift 9 Underuppgift A. Vi överför Self-Attention Network (SAN), en framgångsrik modell inom maskinläsförståelse, till denna uppgift. Vår modell fokuserar på att modellera långsiktigt beroende vilket är oumbärligt för att tolka långa och komplexa meningar. Dessutom använder vi också tekniker, såsom kontextualiserad inbäddning, back-translation och extra förlust, för att öka systemet. Vår modell uppnår en prestanda på F1=76,3 och rankas 4:a bland 34 deltagande system. Ytterligare ablationsstudie visar att de tekniker som används i vårt system är fördelaktiga för prestandan.', 'ta': 'கட்டுப்படுத்தப்படாத உரையிலிருந்து குறிப்புகள், ஆலோசனை மற்றும் பரிந்துரைகளை வெளியேற்ற வேண்டும். இந்த பணியில் பல சவால்கள் உள்ளன, வகுப்பு ஒழுங்காட்டு, வடிவமைப்பு வார்த்தைகள், சூழல் சார்ந்த சார்பு, நீண்ட மற்றும்  இந்த காகிதத்தில் SemEval 2019 செயல் 9 துணை பணி A-ல் எங்கள் submissionை பற்றிய ஒரு விவரமான அமைப்பு விவரம் கொடுக்கிறது. நாம் சான்று கவனம் பிணையத்தை மாற்றுகிறோம், இயந் நீண்ட மற்றும் சிக்கலான வாக்குறுதிகளை பார்க்க முடியாது மேலும், நாம் தொழில்நுட்பம் எடுத்துக் கொள்கிறோம் போன்ற நுழைவு, மீண்டும் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு, மற்றும் கூட்டுதல் இழப்பு, அமைப எங்கள் மாதிரி F1=76.3, மற்றும் 34 பங்கீட்டு அமைப்புகளில் 4 நிலை பெறுகிறது. மேலும் உறுதிப்படுத்தல் ஆராய்ச்சி நமது அமைப்பில் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட தொழில்நுட்பத்தை காட்டுகிறது என்பது.', 'ms': 'Tugas tambang cadangan bertujuan untuk mengekstrak tip, nasihat, dan nasihat dari teks tidak terstruktur. Tugas ini termasuk banyak cabaran, seperti ketidakseimbangan kelas, ungkapan figuratif, dependensi konteks, dan kalimat panjang dan kompleks. This paper gives a detailed system description of our submission in SemEval 2019 Task 9 Subtask A. We transfer Self-Attention Network (SAN), a successful model in machine reading comprehension field, into this task.  Model kami berkonsentrasi pada modelkan dependensi jangka panjang yang tidak diperlukan untuk menghurai kalimat panjang dan kompleks. Selain itu, kita juga mengadopsi teknik, seperti penyembedding kontekstual, terjemahan-belakang, dan kehilangan bantuan, untuk meningkatkan sistem. Model kita mencapai prestasi F1=76.3, dan tingkat empat diantara 34 sistem yang berpartisipasi. Ujian ablasi lebih lanjut menunjukkan bahawa teknik yang digunakan dalam sistem kita adalah berguna untuk prestasi.', 'ur': 'مٹینگ کے کام کی پیشنهاد یہ ہے کہ نصیحت، نصیحت اور نصیحت غیر ساختہ متن سے نکالیں۔ اس کام میں بہت سی چالیں شامل ہوتی ہیں، جیسے کلاس نابرالنس، تصویر کی تعریفیں، کنٹکس مستقل، اور طویل اور پیچیدہ جماعت. This paper gives a detailed system description of our submission in SemEval 2019 Task 9 Subtask A. We transfer Self-Attention Network (SAN), a successful model in machine reading comprehension field, into this task. ہمارا مدل مدینہ مدینہ اعتباری کی مدینل پر مضبوط ہے جو طویل اور پیچیدہ جماعتوں کو پارس کرنے کے لئے ضرورت نہیں ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ، ہم بھی تخصیلیں قبول کرتے ہیں، جیسے متوجہ ہونے، پیچھے ترجمہ، اور مددگار خسارہ، سیسٹم کو بڑھنے کے لئے۔ ہماری مدل F1=76.3 کی عملکرد حاصل کرتی ہے اور 34 شرکت سیستموں میں چوتھا رقم حاصل کرتی ہے۔ اور اضافہ فعالیت کی تحقیق دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارے سیسٹم میں استعمال کی تکنیکیاں اضافہ کر رہی ہیں۔', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Vazifaning boshqa muammolari, sinfning balandligi, fikrlash imkoniyatlari, context ishlatuvchisi, uzun va murakkab so'zlar bor. Name Bizning modelimiz uzun uzun va murakkab so'zlarni ajratish mumkin. Ko'p, biz tizimni qoʻshish uchun, qanday taʼminlov qilingan texnologiyani qo'llamiz. Bizning modelimiz F1=76.3 bajarishini amalga oshadi va 34 ta'minlovchi tizimning 4 darajasi. Koʻproq taʼminlovchi tizimimizda ishlatilgan teknologiyalar bajarishga foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Đề nghị khai thác mỏ nhằm lấy lời khuyên, lời khuyên và lời khuyên từ văn bản không xây dựng. Nhiệm vụ bao gồm nhiều thử thách, như mất cân bằng lớp học, biểu hiện tượng, sự phụ thuộc ngữ cảnh, và những câu dài và phức tạp. Tờ giấy này cung cấp một mô tả hệ thống chi tiết về việc chúng ta đăng ký trong Nhiệm vụ Semkhai thác 99. Chúng ta chuyển mạng Mất chú ý (SAN), một mô hình thành công trong lĩnh vực thấu hiểu máy, vào nhiệm vụ này. Kiểu mẫu của chúng ta tập trung vào việc tạo ra sự phụ thuộc lâu dài, cần thiết để phân tích dài và phức tạp. Bên cạnh đó, chúng tôi cũng nhận kỹ thuật, như kiểu tình hình ghép nối, dịch lại, và lỗ trợ giúp, để nâng cấp hệ thống. Hệ thống của chúng tôi đạt được hiệu ứng của F1=6.3, và hạng bốn trong hệ thống 34. Nghiên cứu rửa thêm cho thấy các kỹ thuật được dùng trong hệ thống có lợi cho hiệu quả.', 'bg': 'Задачата за добив на предложения има за цел да извлече съвети, съвети и препоръки от неструктуриран текст. Задачата включва много предизвикателства, като дисбаланс на класа, фигуративни изрази, зависимост от контекста и дълги и сложни изречения. Настоящата статия представя подробно системно описание на нашето представяне в Задача 9 А. Прехвърляме в тази задача успешен модел в областта на машинното четене мрежата за самовнимание (САН). Нашият модел се концентрира върху моделирането на дългосрочна зависимост, което е незаменимо за анализиране на дълги и сложни изречения. Освен това, ние също така приемаме техники, като контекстуализирано вграждане, обратно превод и спомагателна загуба, за да подобрим системата. Нашият модел постига представяне на Формула=76.3 и се нарежда на 4-то място сред 34 участващи системи. По-нататъшно аблационно изследване показва, че използваните в нашата система техники са полезни за изпълнението.', 'nl': 'Suggestion mining is bedoeld om tips, advies en aanbevelingen uit ongestructureerde tekst te extraheren. De taak omvat vele uitdagingen, zoals klassenonbalans, figuratieve uitdrukkingen, contextafhankelijkheid en lange en complexe zinnen. Deze paper geeft een gedetailleerde systeembeschrijving van onze inzending in SemEval 2019 Taak 9 Subtaak A. We zetten Self-Attention Network (SAN), een succesvol model op het gebied van machineleesbegrip, over in deze taak. Ons model concentreert zich op het modelleren van langdurige afhankelijkheid die onmisbaar is om lange en complexe zinnen te parsen. Bovendien passen we ook technieken toe, zoals contextualiseerde inbedding, back-translation en hulpverlies, om het systeem te vergroten. Ons model behaalt een prestatie van F1=76.3 en staat 4e onder de 34 deelnemende systemen. Verdere ablatiestudie toont aan dat de technieken die in ons systeem worden gebruikt gunstig zijn voor de prestaties.', 'da': 'Forslag mining opgave har til formål at udtrække tips, råd og anbefalinger fra ustruktureret tekst. Opgaven indeholder mange udfordringer, såsom klasse ubalance, figurative udtryk, kontekst afhængighed og lange og komplekse sætninger. Denne artikel giver en detaljeret systembeskrivelse af vores indsendelse i SemEval 2019 Opgave 9 Underopgave A. Vi overfører Self-Attention Network (SAN), en vellykket model inden for maskinlæseforståelse, til denne opgave. Vores model fokuserer på modellering af langsigtet afhængighed, som er uundværlig for at fortolke lange og komplekse sætninger. Desuden anvender vi også teknikker, såsom kontekstualiseret indlejring, back-translation og hjælpetab, for at øge systemet. Vores model opnår en præstation på F1=76,3 og rangerer 4. blandt 34 deltagende systemer. Yderligere ablation undersøgelse viser, at de teknikker, der anvendes i vores system, er gavnlige for ydeevnen.', 'hr': 'Predloženi rudarski zadatak je cilj izvlačenja napojnica, savjeta i preporuke iz neostrukturnog teksta. Taj zadatak uključuje mnoge izazove, poput nezavisnosti klase, figurativnih izraza, zavisnosti konteksta i duge i složene rečenice. Ovaj papir daje detaljno opis sustava našeg podnošenja u polju razumijevanja strojeva na ovaj zadatak u podzadatak A. Prebacujemo mrežu samopouzdanja (SAN), uspješan model u polju razumijevanja strojeva. Naš model se koncentrira na modeliranje dugoročne zavisnosti koje je neophodno za analizu dugih i složenih rečenica. Osim toga, također usvojimo tehnike, poput kontekstualiziranog ugrađenja, povratnog prevoda i pomoćnog gubitka, kako bi povećali sustav. Naš model postiže učinkovitost F1=76,3 i četvrtog reda među 34 sudjelujućim sustavima. Daljnje ispitivanje aktivacije pokazuje da su tehnike koje se koriste u našem sustavu korisne za učinkovitost.', 'de': 'Suggestion Mining Task zielt darauf ab, Tipps, Ratschläge und Empfehlungen aus unstrukturiertem Text zu extrahieren. Die Aufgabe beinhaltet viele Herausforderungen, wie Klassenungleichgewicht, bildliche Ausdrücke, Kontextabhängigkeit und lange und komplexe Sätze. Diese Arbeit gibt eine detaillierte Systembeschreibung unserer Einreichung in SemEval 2019 Task 9 Subtask A. Wir übertragen Self-Attention Network (SAN), ein erfolgreiches Modell im Bereich des maschinellen Leseverstehens, in diese Aufgabe. Unser Modell konzentriert sich auf die Modellierung langfristiger Abhängigkeiten, die unerlässlich sind, um lange und komplexe Sätze zu analysieren. Außerdem übernehmen wir auch Techniken wie kontextualisierte Einbettung, Rückübersetzung und Hilfsverlust, um das System zu erweitern. Unser Modell erreicht eine Leistung von F1=76.3 und Rang vier unter 34 teilnehmenden Systemen. Weitere Ablationsstudien zeigen, dass die in unserem System verwendeten Techniken vorteilhaft für die Leistung sind.', 'id': 'Tugas penambangan saran bermaksud untuk mengekstrak tip, saran, dan rekomendasi dari teks yang tidak terstruktur. Tugas ini termasuk banyak tantangan, seperti ketidakseimbangan kelas, ekspresi figuratif, tergantung konteks, dan kalimat panjang dan kompleks. Kertas ini memberikan deskripsi sistem terperinci dari pengiriman kami di SemEval 2019 Task 9 Subtask A. Kami memindahkan Jaringan Perhatian Sendiri (SAN), model yang berhasil dalam bidang pemahaman pembacaan mesin, ke tugas ini. Model kita berkonsentrasi pada model ketergantuan jangka panjang yang tidak penting untuk menghindari kalimat panjang dan kompleks. Selain itu, kita juga mengadopsi teknik, seperti penerbangan kontekstualisasi, terjemahan belakang, dan kerugian bantuan, untuk meningkatkan sistem. Model kita mencapai prestasi F1=76,3, dan tingkat keempat diantara 34 sistem yang berpartisipasi. Studi ablasi lebih lanjut menunjukkan bahwa teknik yang digunakan dalam sistem kita berguna untuk prestasi.', 'ko': '제안 발굴 작업은 비구조화된 텍스트에서 알림, 건의, 건의를 추출하는 데 목적을 두고 있다.이 임무는 학급 불균형, 비유적 표현, 상하문 의존, 길고 복잡한 문장 등 많은 도전을 포함한다.본고는SemEval 2019 퀘스트 9 하위 퀘스트 a에서 제출한 내용에 대해 상세한 시스템 설명을 하였으며, 기계독해 분야의 성공 모델인 자기주의 네트워크(SAN)를 이 퀘스트로 옮겼습니다.우리의 모델은 장기적으로 의존하는 모델링에 전념하는데 이것은 길고 복잡한 문장을 해석하는 데 없어서는 안 될 것이다.그 밖에 우리는 언어 환경 삽입, 반역과 보조 손실 등 기술을 채택하여 시스템을 강화했다.우리 모델은 F1=76.3의 성능을 실현하여 34개 참여 시스템 중 4위에 올랐다.진일보한 소식 연구에 의하면 우리 시스템에서 사용하는 기술은 성능을 향상시키는 데 도움이 된다고 한다.', 'sw': 'Kazi ya uchimbaji madini inalenga kuondoa tiba, ushauri na mapendekezo kutoka kwenye maandishi yasiyoanzishwa. The task includes many challenges, such as class imbalance, figurative expressions, context dependency, and long and complex sentences.  Gazeti hili linatoa maelezo ya kina kuhusu ujumbe wetu katika SemEval 2019 Mipango ya Tamko 9 A. Tunamahamisha Mtandao wa Kujihisia kujitegemea (SAN), mwelekeo wa mafanikio katika mashine ya kusoma eneo la kompyuta, katika kazi hii. Mradi wetu umejikita kwenye kutengeneza kutegemea kwa muda mrefu ambao hauna haja ya kujenga hukumu ndefu na ngumu. Zaidi yake, pia tunachukua mbinu, kama vile kuchapishwa, kutafsiri kwa nyuma na kupoteza kwa kiasi kikubwa, kuongeza mfumo. Mfano wetu unafanikiwa ufanisi wa F1=76.3, na daraja la 4 kati ya mifumo ya ushiriki 34. Utafiti wa nguvu zaidi unaonyesha kuwa mbinu zinazotumiwa katika mfumo wetu zinafaa na utendaji.', 'af': "Die voorstelling van mining-taak is doel om tipes, raad en rekening uit ongestruktureerde teks te uitpak. Die taak inkluit baie uitdagings, soos klas onbalanse, figurasiese uitdrukkings, konteksafhanklikheid en lang en komplekse setinge. Hierdie papier gee 'n gedetaileerde stelsel beskrywing van ons onderwerp in SemEval 2019 Opdrag 9 Subtaak A. Ons oordra Self-Attention Network (SAN), â\x80\x99n suksesvolle model in masjien lees onderwerp veld, in hierdie taak. Ons model konsantreer op die modellering van langtydsafhanklikheid wat is onverwagbare om lange en komplekse setinge te verwerk. Ons aanvaar ook teknike, soos contextualiseerde inbêding, terugvertaling en hulpverlies, om die stelsel te vergroot. Ons model bereik 'n prestasie van F1=76.3, en rank 4de onder 34 deelnaamde stelsels. Verdere ablasie studie wys dat die teknike wat in ons stelsel gebruik word is nuttig vir die prestasie.", 'tr': "Küçük buýruk maslahatlaryň düzgünlerini, maslahatlary we düzülmeýän metinden gaýd etmegini amaçlarýar. Bu zadyň kän kynçylyklary ýaly synpdaky çykyşlygyny, möhüm ifadeler, kontekst baglanyşlygyny we uzak we çykyş sözleri bolan ýaly. Bu kagyz SemEval 2019 Taýry 9 Subtask A'da biziň gönderişimiziň detaylar sistemasy tassyýany verir. Biz Self-Attention Network (SAN), maşynyň okamaky sahypasynda üstünlik bir nusga göçürýäris, bu zada. Biziň modelimiz uzun wagt baglanylygyny modelletmek üçin üns berilýär. Bu uzyn we çylşyrymyz sözlerini analyze etmek üçin mümkin däldir. Munuň ýagdaýynda, sistemi ýetişdirmek üçin tekniklerden üýtgederis. Biziň nusgamyz F1=76,3 we 34-nji tarapyň sistemalarynda 4-nji derejä ýetip barýar. Daha gowy gürrüňli işlenmek sistemamyzda ulanylan teknikleriň etkinlik üçin bir fayda ýok bolandygyny görkezýär.", 'fa': 'وظیفه\u200cی ذخیره\u200cسازی پیشنهاد هدف است که از متن غیرساخته\u200cشده\u200cها، نصیحت و پیشنهاد\u200cها استخراج کند. این وظیفه شامل چالش های زیادی است، مثل نابرابری کلاس، تعریف تصویر، بستگی محیط و جمله های طولانی و پیچیده. این کاغذ یک توضیح سیستم جزئیات از تحویل ما در پایگاه ۲۰۱۹ تابع ۹ زیر تابع A را می دهد. ما شبکه self-attention (SAN) را انتقال می دهیم، یک مدل موفق در میدان خواندن مطالعه درک ماشین به این تابع. مدل ما روی مدل بستگی طولانی تمرکز می\u200cکند که برای تقسیم جمله\u200cهای طولانی و پیچیده لازم نیست. به جز این، ما نیز تکنیک\u200cها را قبول می\u200cکنیم، مثل تغییر فعالیت\u200cهای متوسط، ترجمه\u200cهای پشت و خسارت کمک، تا سیستم را افزایش دهیم. مدل ما به اجرای F1=76.3 رسیده و درجه چهارمین بین سیستم\u200cهای شرکت\u200cکننده\u200cای است. مطالعه فعالیت بیشتری نشان می دهد که تکنیک\u200cهای استفاده در سیستم ما برای اجرای منافع است.', 'sq': 'Detyra e sugjerimit për minierë synon të nxjerrë këshilla, këshilla dhe rekomandime nga teksti i papërstrukturuar. Detyra përfshin shumë sfida, të tilla si paekuilibri i klasës, shprehje figurative, varësia në kontekst dhe fjalë të gjata dhe komplekse. This paper gives a detailed system description of our submission in SemEval 2019 Task 9 Subtask A. We transfer Self-Attention Network (SAN), a successful model in machine reading comprehension field, into this task.  Modeli ynë përqëndrohet në modelimin e varësisë afat-gjatë që është e domosdoshme për të analizuar fjalime të gjata dhe komplekse. Përveç kësaj, ne gjithashtu miratojmë teknika, të tilla si përfshirje kontekstuale, përkthimi prapa, dhe humbje ndihmëse, për të rritur sistemin. Modeli ynë arrin një shfaqje të F1=76.3 dhe renditet i katërti midis 34 sistemeve pjesëmarrëse. Studimi i mëtejshëm i ablacionit tregon se teknikat e përdorura në sistemin tonë janë të dobishme për performancën.', 'am': 'የመግቢያ ጉዳይ ማስታወቂያውን ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡ ስራው ብዙዎችን ጥላቻዎች፣ እንደተጨማሪው ትክክለኛ፣ አስተያየት፣ የሥርዓት ትዕግስት እና ረጅም እና ተጨማሪ ፍርድ ነው፡፡ ይህ ገጽ የሳምEval 2019 ስራ 9 Subtask A የሚደረገውን የሥርዓት ዝርዝርዝር የሚያሳውቀውን የስርዓት ዝርዝር ያሳያል። ወደዚህ ስራ አካሄደው የመሳሳይ አካባቢ አካባቢ መደበኛ ሞዴል እናስቀዳለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን የረጅም ዘመን ታዋቂነት በመምሰል ላይ ያስተካክላል፤ ረጅም እና በተጨማሪም ፍርድ ማሳየት የማይገባው ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ እንደተጨማሪው ግንኙነት፣ የመመለስ ትርጓሜ እና በተጨማሪው ጉዳይ ጉዳይ፣ ስርዓቱን ለመጨመር እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ Our model achieves a performance of F1=76.3, and rank 4th among 34 participating systems.  ከዚህም በላይ ማስታወቂያ የስርዓታችን የተጠቃሚ ስልጣናዎች ለስርዓቱ ይጠቅማል፡፡', 'hy': 'Առաջարկումներ հանելու առաջադրանքը նպատակն է հանել խորհուրդներ, խորհուրդներ և խորհուրդներ անկառուցված տեքստից: Այս խնդիրը ներառում է բազմաթիվ մարտահրավեր, ինչպիսիք են դասարանի անհավասարակշռությունը, ֆիգուրատիվ արտահայտությունները, կոնտեքստի կախվածությունը, երկար և բարդ նախադասությունները: Այս թղթի մեջ ներկայացված է մեր համակարգի մանրամասն նկարագրությունը, որը ներկայացված է 2019-ի "ՍեմԷվալ" 9-ի "Սենթախնդիր Ա"-ի մեջ: Մենք փոխանցում ենք ինքնաուշադրության ցանցը (Սան), մի հաջողակ մոդել մեքենաների կարդալու ընկալումների ոլո Մեր մոդելը կենտրոնանում է երկարաժամկետ կախվածության մոդելների վրա, ինչը անհրաժեշտ է երկար և բարդ նախադասությունների վերլուծման համար: Ավելին, մենք նաև ընդունում ենք այնպիսի մեթոդներ, ինչպիսիք են կոնտեքստալիզացված ներդրումը, վերադարձ թարգմանությունը և օգնական կորստը, որպեսզի բարելավենք համակարգը: Մեր մոդելը հասնում է F1=76.3 և 4-րդ դասակարգը 34 մասնակցում համակարգերի միջև: Հաջորդ աբլացիայի ուսումնասիրությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ մեր համակարգում օգտագործվող մեթոդները օգտակար են արդյունքում:', 'az': "Qurulmadığı məktublardan nəsihətlər, nəsihətlər və tədbirlər çıxartmaq niyyətində. Bu işdə çox çətinliklərdən bənzər, sınıf müqabiliyyəti, figurativ ifadələr, kontekst bağlılığı və uzun və kompleks sözlər vardır. Bu kağıt halımızın SemEval 2019 Task 9 Subtask A'sində təsdiqlənməsinin detaylı sistem təsdiqlənməsini verir. Biz Öz-Attention Network (SAN), maşın oxuması sahəsində başarılı bir modeli, bu işə daşırıq. Modelimiz uzun-uzun müddətli bağımlılığı modelleşdirməyə məcburiyyət edir ki, uzun və kompleks sözləri ayırmaq üçün münasibdir. Biz də sistemi artırmaq üçün müxtəlif inşallaşdırılmış, geri çevirilmiş və köməkçi zəiflik kimi teknikləri qəbul edirik. Bizim modelimiz F1=76,3 və 34 iştirak sistemlərin 4. dərəcəsini başa düşər. Daha çox qüvvətli təhsil sistemimizdə istifadə edilən tekniklərin performans üçün faydası olduğunu göstərir.", 'bs': 'Predloženi rudarski zadatak je cilj da izvuče savete, savjete i preporuke iz neostrukturnog teksta. Taj zadatak uključuje mnoge izazove, poput nezavisnosti klase, figurativnih izraza, zavisnosti konteksta i duge i kompleksne rečenice. Ovaj papir daje detaljno opis sustava našeg podataka u polju razumijevanja mašin a u podzadatak A. Prebacujemo mrežu samopouzdanja (SAN), uspješan model u polje razumijevanja mašina. Naš model se koncentriše na modeliranje dugoročne zavisnosti koje je neophodno za analizu dugih i kompleksnih rečenica. Osim toga, također usvojimo tehnike, poput kontekstualiziranog ugrađenja, povratnog prevoda i pomoćnog gubitka, kako bi povećali sistem. Naš model postiže učinkovitost F1=76,3 i četvrtog reda među 34 sustavima učestvovanja. Daljnje proučavanje ablacije pokazuje da su tehnike koje se koriste u našem sustavu korisne za izvođenje.', 'bn': 'পরামর্শ মিনিং কাজের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে নির্মাণিত টিপস, উপদেশ এবং পরামর্শ বের করার জন্য। এই কাজের মধ্যে অনেক চ্যালেঞ্জ রয়েছে, যেমন ক্লাসের বৈষম্য, পরিসংখ্যাত প্রকাশ, প্রেক্ষাপটের নির্ভরশীল এবং দীর্ঘ এব এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল ২০১৯ সালে আমাদের প্রতিষ্ঠানের বিস্তারিত বিস্তারিত ব্যাখ্যা দিয়েছে। কাজ ৯ সাবকাজ A-এ আমরা স্বেফ-Attention Network (SAN), মেশিনের আমাদের মডেল দীর্ঘমেয়াদের নির্ভরশীল নিয়ে মনোযোগ দেয় যা দীর্ঘ এবং জটিল শাস্তি পার্স করতে পারে না। এছাড়াও, আমরা প্রযুক্তি গ্রহণ করি, যেমন প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতা, পিছনে অনুবাদ, এবং অনুবাদের ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত ক্ষতি গ্রহণ করি, সিস্টেম আমাদের মডেল এফ১=৭৬. আরো আগুনের গবেষণা দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের সিস্টেমে ব্যবহার করা প্রযুক্তিগুলো প্রদর্শনের জন্য উপকারী।', 'ca': "La tasca de suggeriments miners mira a extrair consells, consells i recomanacions de text no estructurat. La tasca inclou molts reptes, com l'desequilibri de classe, les expressions figuratives, la dependència del context i frases llargues i complexes. Aquest article proporciona una descripció detallada del sistema de la nostra presentació a SemEval 2019 Task 9 Subtask A. Transferem la xarxa d'auto-atenció (SAN), un model d'èxit en el camp de comprensió de lectura màquina, a aquesta tasca. El nostre model es centra en modelar la dependència a llarg termini que és indispensable per analitzar frases llargues i complexes. Besides, we also adopt techniques, such as contextualized embedding, back-translation, and auxiliary loss, to augment the system.  El nostre model aconsegueix un rendiment de F1=76,3, i el quart entre 34 sistemes participants. Un altre estudi d'ablació mostra que les tècniques utilitzades al nostre sistema són beneficioses per al rendiment.", 'cs': 'Úkol těžby návrhů má za cíl extrahovat tipy, rady a doporučení z nestrukturovaného textu. Úkol zahrnuje mnoho výzev, jako je třídní nerovnováha, obrazové výrazy, závislost na kontextu a dlouhé a složité věty. Tento článek podává podrobný systémový popis našeho podání v SemEval 2019 Task 9 Subúkol A. Do tohoto úkolu přenášíme úspěšný model v oblasti porozumění strojovému čtení (Self-Attention Network, SAN). Náš model se zaměřuje na modelování dlouhodobé závislosti, která je nezbytná pro analýzu dlouhých a složitých vět. Kromě toho přijímáme také techniky, jako je kontextualizované vložení, zpětný překlad a pomocné ztráty, abychom systém rozšířili. Náš model dosahuje výkonu F1=76.3 a má čtvrté místo mezi 34 zúčastněnými systémy. Další ablační studie ukazuje, že techniky používané v našem systému jsou přínosné pro výkon.', 'et': 'Soovituste kaevandamise ülesande eesmärk on saada struktureerimata tekstist näpunäiteid, nõuandeid ja soovitusi. Ülesanne hõlmab palju väljakutseid, nagu klasside tasakaalustamatus, kujunduslikud väljendid, kontekstisõltuvus ning pikad ja keerukad laused. Käesolev töö annab üksikasjaliku süsteemi kirjelduse meie esitamisest SemEval 2019 ülesande 9 alaülesandes A. Me kanname sellesse ülesandesse eduka mudeli enesetähelepanu võrgustiku (SAN), mis on masinlugemise mõistmise valdkonnas. Meie mudel keskendub pikaajalise sõltuvuse modelleerimisele, mis on pikkade ja keerukate lausete parsimiseks hädavajalik. Lisaks võtame süsteemi täiustamiseks kasutusele ka tehnikaid, nagu kontekstiline manustamine, tagasitõlkimine ja abikaod. Meie mudel saavutab jõudluse F1 = 76,3 ja 34 osaleva süsteemi hulgas 4. koha. Täiendav ablatsiooniuuring näitab, et meie süsteemis kasutatavad tehnikad on tulemuslikkusele kasulikud.', 'fi': 'Ehdotusten louhintatehtävän tavoitteena on poimia vinkkejä, neuvoja ja suosituksia jäsentämättömästä tekstistä. Tehtävään kuuluu monia haasteita, kuten luokkaepätasapaino, figuratiiviset ilmaisut, kontekstin riippuvuus sekä pitkät ja monimutkaiset lauseet. Tämä artikkeli antaa yksityiskohtaisen järjestelmäkuvauksen SemEval 2019 Task 9 -osatehtävässä A. Siirrämme tähän tehtävään onnistuneen mallin Self-Attention Network (SAN), joka on onnistunut konelukemisen ymmärtämisen alalla. Mallimme keskittyy pitkän aikavälin riippuvuuden mallintamiseen, mikä on välttämätöntä pitkien ja monimutkaisten lauseiden jäsentämiseksi. Lisäksi otamme käyttöön tekniikoita, kuten kontekstualisoitua upotusta, takaisinkääntämistä ja apuhävikkiä, järjestelmän parantamiseksi. Mallimme saavuttaa suorituskyvyn F1 = 76,3 ja sijoittuu neljänneksi 34 osallistuvan järjestelmän joukossa. Jatkotutkimus osoittaa, että järjestelmässämme käytetyt tekniikat ovat hyödyllisiä suorituskyvylle.', 'jv': 'Check Spelling Rasane This paper offrs a details System description of us Subtask in semebal 2011 task 9 Subtask A. We transfer Self-Attance Network modellu Yo wis rampung, kita mulai teknik, kaya sistem sing dikanteksi, njuk-terjamahan, lan akeh-terjamahan. model dhéwé iso nggawe barang F1=7.3, dadi 4th karo sistem sing berartikan 34. Awakdhéwé éntuk perusahaan nggambar kanggo teknik sing gampang ning Sistem awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang nggawe gerakan.', 'sk': 'Namen naloge rudarjenja predlogov je izvleči nasvete, nasvete in priporočila iz nestrukturiranega besedila. Naloga vključuje številne izzive, kot so neravnovesje razredov, figurativni izrazi, odvisnost od konteksta ter dolgi in kompleksni stavki. Ta prispevek predstavlja podroben opis sistema naše predložitve v podnalogi A. V to nalogo prenašamo uspešen model na področju strojnega branja samopozornosti Network (SAN). Naš model se osredotoča na modeliranje dolgoročne odvisnosti, ki je nepogrešljiva za razčlenitev dolgih in kompleksnih stavkov. Poleg tega sprejemamo tudi tehnike, kot so kontekstualizirana vdelava, nazaj prevajanje in pomožna izguba, da bi povečali sistem. Naš model dosega zmogljivost F1 = 76,3 in se uvršča na 4. mesto med 34 sodelujočimi sistemi. Nadaljnja študija ablacije kaže, da so tehnike, ki se uporabljajo v našem sistemu, koristne za delovanje.', 'he': 'משימה מכירה של הצעות מתכוונת לחלץ טיפים, עצות ומלצות מטקסט לא מבושל. המשימה כוללת אתגרים רבים, כמו אי-איזון בכיתה, ביטויים דמויים, תלויות בקשר, ושפטים ארוכים ומסובכים. הנייר הזה נותן תיאור מפורט של מערכת ההעברה שלנו ב SemEval 2019 משימה 9 Subtask A. אנחנו מעבירים רשת תשומת לב עצמית (SAN), מודל מוצלח בשדה הקריאה מכונות הבנה, למשימה זו. המודל שלנו מתמקד בדוגמאות תלויות לטווח ארוך, שזה בלתי נחוץ לאבחן משפטים ארוכים ומסובכים. חוץ מזה, אנחנו גם מאמצים טכניקות, כמו קישור קונטוקטואלי, תרגום מאחור, ואובדן נוסף, כדי לגדל את המערכת. המודל שלנו משיג ביצועים של F1=76.3, והרמה הרביעית בין 34 מערכות משתתפות. מחקר נוסף של אובלציה מראה שהטכניקות המשתמשות במערכת שלנו הן מועילות להופעה.', 'ha': "Kayyar da aikin da aka ƙara ƙarƙashin aiki yana aimar ya fita masu shiryarwa, masu shawara, da masu shawarar da kuma masu shawara daga matsayin wanda ba'a samar da shi ba. Kayan aiki na ƙunsa da masu yawa kamar misali da za'a daidaita darajõji, da magana na fasalin, da baka-muhimmanci, da sauran da sauri da masu husũma. Wannan takardan na bãyar da rabo bayyananne na'urar aikin mu cikin SemEl 2019 Modelinmu yana cikin muhalli na zaman ciri, da kuma bã ya da buƙata ga yin parse ga cire tsawo da sauri. Za koma, za'a karɓi kokunyuta, kamar da aka shigar da shirin ayuka, bakin-tarjiwa, da haske na dabar-tarjiwa, don ka ƙara shirin ayuka. Misalinmu ya sami aikin F1=76.3, kuma daraja 4 na cikin tsarin mutane 34. Ana ƙari karatun na ƙaranci ya nuna cewa mafaniki da ake amfani da shi a cikin na'uranmu.", 'bo': 'བསམ་འཆར་བའི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་tips, advice, and recommendations from unstructured text. བྱ་འགུལ་དེ་ལ་གདོང་ལེན་དགོས་པ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་ཀྱང་། རིག་རྩལ་མེད་balance། གཟུགས་རིས་བཀོད་པ། ཁོང་ཡུག འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་SemEval 2019 Task 9 Subtask A རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་ཡོད་པའི་མ་ལག་གི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ཞིག་ལ་བྱིན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་Self- ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་རྣམས་བརྟན་པར་རིང་ཐག་རིང་བའི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མེད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་མཚོན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཚོ་ཡང་ཞུགས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབུགས་འདིས་F1=76.3 ཡི་སྐྱེས་ཚད་དང་། ལས་ཀྱི་རིམ་པ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་འགྲོ་སྤྱོད་མིན་འདུག ལྕོགས་ཅན་ཞིག་བྱས་པ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་སྤྱོད་པའི་རིག་རྩལ་ནུས་པ་ཡིན་པས།'}
{'en': 'YNU_DYX at SemEval-2019 Task 9 : A Stacked BiLSTM for Suggestion Mining Classification', 'ar': 'YNU_DYX في SemEval-2019 المهمة 9: BiLSTM المكدس لتصنيف اقتراح التعدين', 'es': 'YNU_DYX en SemEval-2019 Tarea 9: Un BILSTM apilado para la clasificación de minería de sugerencias', 'pt': 'YNU_DYX na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 9: Um BiLSTM empilhado para classificação de mineração de sugestão', 'fr': 'YNU_DYX à SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 9\xa0: Un BilsTM empilé pour la classification minière par suggestion', 'ja': 'YNU_DYX at SemEval -2019 Task 9: A Stacked BiLSTM for Suggestion Mining Classification', 'zh': 'SemEval-2019тіА9 YNU_DYX:У««тЈЉТјўуД»BiLSTM', 'ru': 'YNU_DYX в SemEval-2019 Задача 9: A Stacked BiLSTM for Suggestion Mining Classification', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 9 पर YNU_DYX: सुझाव खनन वर्गीकरण के लिए एक स्टैक्ड BiLSTM', 'ga': 'YNU_DYX ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 9: BiLSTM Cruachta le haghaidh Aicmiú Mianadóireachta Molta', 'ka': 'YNU', 'hu': 'YNU_DYX a SemEval-2019 9. feladat: Egy halmozott BiLSTM a javaslatok bányászati osztályozásához', 'el': 'Εργασία 9: Μια στοίβα για την ταξινόμηση ορυχείων προτάσεων', 'it': 'YNU_DYX al SemEval-2019 Task 9: Un BiLSTM impilato per la classificazione mineraria dei suggerimenti', 'kk': 'YNU_ DYX жарым- 2019 тапсырмасында 9. тапсырмасы: Балау классификациясы үшін келтірілген BiLSTM', 'lt': 'YNU_DYX pusevalio 2019 m. 9 užduotis: Sukauptas BiLSTM siūlomoms kasybos klasifikacijoms', 'mk': 'YNU_DYX на SemEval-2019 задача 9: Запишан BiLSTM за класификација на минирање на предлози', 'ms': 'YNU_DYX pada SemEval-2019 Tugas 9: BiLSTM Tersimpan untuk Klasifikasi Menyembah cadangan', 'mt': 'YNU_DYX f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 9: BiLSTM Stacked għall-Klassifikazzjoni tal-Minjieri ta’ Suġġerimenti', 'mn': 'YNU_DYX at SemEval-2019 Task 9: A Stacked BiLSTM for Suggestion Mining Classification', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 9-ല്\u200d യുന്യൂ ഡിയ്ക്സ്: മിനിംഗ് ക്ലാസിഷനിനുള്ള ഒരു സ്റ്റാക്ക് ബില്\u200dസ്റ്റ് എം', 'no': 'YNU_DYX ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 9: ein stakkert BiLSTM for foreslåande miniklassifikasjon', 'pl': 'YNU_DYX na SemEval-2019 Zadanie 9: Układane BiLSTM dla klasyfikacji górniczej sugestii', 'ro': 'YNU_DYX la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 9: Un BiLSTM stivuit pentru clasificarea sugestiilor miniere', 'sr': 'YNU_DYX na semiEval-2019 zadatak 9: Stakovana BiLSTM za klasifikaciju rudarstva', 'si': 'YNO_DYX at semeval-2019 Job 9: A Stacked BiLSTM for Suggestion mining Classication', 'so': 'YNU_DYX at SemEval-2019 Task 9: A Stacked BiLSTM for Suggestion Mining Classification', 'sv': 'YNU_DYX på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 9: En staplad BiLSTM för klassificering av förslag på gruvdrift', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 9- ல் YNU_ DYX: குறைந்த வகைப்படுத்தல் பரிந்துரை', 'ur': 'YNU_DYX at SemEval-2019 Task 9: A Stacked BiLSTM for Suggestion Mining Classification', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifa 9: Mining klassification uchun qoʻllanmagan BiLSTM', 'vi': 'Hồ sơ Hồ sơ Hồ sơ Hồ sơ', 'bg': 'Задача 9: Натрупан БиЛСТМ за класификация на добива по предложения', 'da': 'YNU_DYX på SemEval-2019 Opgave 9: En stablet BiLSTM til forslag til minedrift klassificering', 'nl': 'YNU_DYX bij SemEval-2019 Taak 9: Een gestapelde BiLSTM voor Suggestie Mining Classificatie', 'hr': 'YNU_DYX na pola ispitivanja 2019. zadatak 9: Stacked BiLSTM za klasifikaciju rudarstva', 'de': 'YNU_DYX bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 9: Eine gestapelte BiLSTM für Suggestion Mining Klassifizierung', 'id': 'YNU_DYX di SemEval-2019 Task 9: A Stacked BiLSTM for Suggestion Mining Classification', 'fa': 'YNU', 'ko': 'SemEval-2019년의 YNU DYX 퀘스트 9: 채광 분류의 겹치기 BilSTM 권장', 'sw': 'YNU_DYX kwenye SemEval-2019 kazi 9: Msimamo wa BiLSTM kwa ajili ya pendekezo la Kufunguliwa', 'tr': 'YNU_DYX at SemEval-2019 Task 9: A Stacked BiLSTM for Suggestion Mining Classification', 'sq': 'YNU_DYX at SemEval-2019 Task 9: A Stacked BiLSTM for Suggestion Mining Classification', 'af': 'YNU_DYX by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 9: 芒聙聶n Stapel BiLSTM vir voorstellings Mining Klassifikasie', 'hy': 'YNO_DYX-ը, որը գտնվում է Halewal-2019 թվականի 9-րդ հանձնարարությունում. առաջարկների հանքային դասակարգման համար', 'am': 'Eval-2019 ስራ 9: A Stacked BiLSTM for Suggestion Mining Classification', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৯-এ ইয়ানউ_DYX: প্রস্তাব মিনিং ক্লাসিকেশনের জন্য একটি স্ট্যাক্ট বাইলস্টিএম', 'bs': 'YNU_DYX na semiEval-2019 zadatak 9: Stacked BiLSTM za klasifikaciju rudarstva', 'ca': 'YNU_DYX a SemEval-2019 Task 9: A Stacked BiLSTM for Suggestion Mining Classification', 'az': 'YNU', 'cs': 'YNU_DYX na SemEval-2019 Úkol 9: Stohovaný BiLSTM pro klasifikaci těžby návrhů', 'et': 'YNU_DYX SemEval-2019 ülesandel 9: virnastatud BiLSTM soovituste kaevandamise klassifitseerimiseks', 'fi': 'YNU_DYX SemEval-2019 -tapahtumassa Tehtävä 9: Pinottu BiLSTM ehdotusluokitukseen', 'sk': 'YNU_DYX na SemEval-2019 naloga 9: Zložena BiLSTM za klasifikacijo rudarstva predlogov', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'he': 'YNU_DYX ב SemEval-2019 משימה 9: BiLSTM עטוף עבור קליфікаציה מוכרת הצעה', 'jv': 'YNU_DYX at seminval-2011 task 9: A Stack BiLA', 'bo': 'YNU_DYX at SemEval-2019 Task 9: A Stacked BiLSTM for Suggestion Mining Classification'}
{'en': 'In this paper we describe a deep-learning system that competed as SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A : Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forums. We use Word2Vec to learn the distributed representations from sentences. This system is composed of a Stacked Bidirectional Long-Short Memory Network (SBiLSTM) for enriching word representations before and after the sequence relationship with context. We perform an ensemble to improve the effectiveness of our model. Our official submission results achieve an F1-score 0.5659.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نصف نظام التعلم العميق الذي تنافس باسم SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A: اقتراح التنقيب من المراجعات والمنتديات عبر الإنترنت. نستخدم Word2Vec لمعرفة التمثيلات الموزعة من الجمل. يتكون هذا النظام من شبكة ذاكرة طويلة قصيرة مكدسة ثنائية الاتجاه (SBiLSTM) لإثراء تمثيلات الكلمات قبل وبعد علاقة التسلسل مع السياق. نقوم بأداء مجموعة لتحسين فعالية نموذجنا. نتائج التقديم الرسمية لدينا تحقق 0.5659 درجة F1.', 'es': 'En este artículo describimos un sistema de aprendizaje profundo que compitió como Tarea 9 Subtarea A de SemEval 2019: Minería de sugerencias de revisiones y foros en línea. Usamos Word2Vec para aprender las representaciones distribuidas de las oraciones. Este sistema está compuesto por una red de memoria corta larga y bidireccional apilada (SBILSTM) para enriquecer las representaciones de palabras antes y después de la relación de secuencia con el contexto. Realizamos un conjunto para mejorar la eficacia de nuestro modelo. Nuestros resultados oficiales de presentación alcanzan una puntuación de F1 de 0.5659.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous décrivons un système d'apprentissage profond qui a participé au SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A\xa0: Suggestions Mining à partir de revues et de forums en ligne. Nous utilisons Word2Vec pour apprendre les représentations distribuées à partir de phrases. Ce système est composé d'un réseau mémoire longue-courte bidirectionnel empilé (SbilSTM) pour enrichir les représentations de mots avant et après la relation de séquence avec le contexte. Nous réalisons un ensemble afin d'améliorer l'efficacité de notre modèle. Les résultats officiels de notre soumission atteignent un score F1 de 0,5659.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, descrevemos um sistema de aprendizado profundo que concorreu como Tarefa 9-Subtarefa A do SemEval 2019: Mineração de sugestões a partir de avaliações e fóruns online. Usamos Word2Vec para aprender as representações distribuídas de frases. Este sistema é composto por uma Stacked Bidirectional Long-Short Memory Network (SBiLSTM) para o enriquecimento das representações de palavras antes e depois da relação da sequência com o contexto. Realizamos um conjunto para melhorar a eficácia do nosso modelo. Nossos resultados oficiais de submissão alcançam uma pontuação F1 de 0,5659.', 'ja': '本稿では、SemEval 2019 Task 9 - SubTask A: Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forumsとして競合したディープラーニングシステムについて説明する。Word 2 Vecを使用して、文章から分散表現を学習します。このシステムは、コンテキストとのシーケンス関係の前後で単語表現を豊かにするための積み重ね双方向長短メモリネットワーク（ SBiLSTM ）で構成されています。私たちは、モデルの有効性を向上させるためにアンサンブルを行います。当社の公式提出結果は、F 1スコア0.5659です。', 'zh': '本文,我们述了一个深度学习系统,该系统为SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A:在线论和论坛的议论。 用Word2Vec学分布式于句。 积双向短长内存网络(SBiLSTM)成,所以丰序上下文后单词也。 吾行集成以崇模有效性。 我官方提交至于F1得分0.5659。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम एक गहरी सीखने की प्रणाली का वर्णन करते हैं जो SemEval 2019 टास्क 9-SubTask A के रूप में प्रतिस्पर्धा करता है: ऑनलाइन समीक्षा और मंचों से सुझाव खनन। हम Word2Vec का उपयोग वाक्यों से वितरित अभ्यावेदन सीखने के लिए करते हैं। यह प्रणाली संदर्भ के साथ अनुक्रम संबंध से पहले और बाद में शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व को समृद्ध करने के लिए स्टैक्ड द्विदिशीय लंबी-लघु मेमोरी नेटवर्क (SBiLSTM) से बना है। हम अपने मॉडल की प्रभावशीलता में सुधार करने के लिए एक पहनावा प्रदर्शन करते हैं। हमारे आधिकारिक सबमिशन परिणाम एक F1-स्कोर 0.5659 प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы описываем систему глубокого обучения, которая конкурировала как SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A: Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forums. Мы используем Word2Vec для изучения распределенных представлений из предложений. Эта система состоит из стекированной двунаправленной сети длинной короткой памяти (SBiLSTM) для обогащения представлений слов до и после отношения последовательности с контекстом. Мы выполняем ансамбль для повышения эффективности нашей модели. Наши официальные результаты представления достигают показателя F1 0,5659.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo déanaimid cur síos ar chóras domhainfhoghlama a bhí san iomaíocht mar Tasc 9-FoTasc A SemEval 2019: Mianadóireacht Moltaí ó Athbhreithnithe agus Fóraim Ar Líne. Bainimid úsáid as Word2Vec chun na huiríll dáilte a fhoghlaim ó abairtí. Tá an córas seo comhdhéanta de Líonra Cuimhne Fada Gearr Déthreo Cruachta (SBiLSTM) chun léirithe focal a shaibhriú roimh an gcaidreamh seicheamh agus an comhthéacs agus ina diaidh. Déanaimid ensemble chun éifeachtacht ár múnla a fheabhsú. Faigheann ár dtorthaí aighneachta oifigiúla scór F1 0.5659.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy mélytanulási rendszert, amely a SemEval 2019 feladat 9. alfeladat A: javaslatbányászat online értékelésekből és fórumokból versenyzett. Word2Vec segítségével tanuljuk meg az elosztott reprezentációkat a mondatokból. Ez a rendszer egy Stacked, kétirányú hosszú-rövid memória hálózatból (SBiLSTM) áll, amely gazdagítja a szóreprezentációkat a környezettel való szekvenciakapcsolat előtt és után. Modellünk hatékonyságának javítása érdekében együtteset végzünk. Hivatalos benyújtási eredményeink F1 pontszámot érnek el 0,5659-re.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία περιγράφουμε ένα σύστημα βαθιάς μάθησης που ανταγωνίστηκε ως Εργασία 9-ΥποΕργασία Α: Εξόρυξη προτάσεων από διαδικτυακές κριτικές και φόρουμ. Χρησιμοποιούμε το για να μάθουμε τις κατανεμημένες αναπαραστάσεις από προτάσεις. Αυτό το σύστημα αποτελείται από ένα συσσωρευμένο αμφίδρομη μακράς-σύντομης μνήμης Δίκτυο για τον εμπλουτισμό των αναπαραστάσεων λέξεων πριν και μετά τη σχέση αλληλουχίας με το περιβάλλον. Εκτελούμε ένα σύνολο για να βελτιώσουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα του μοντέλου μας. Τα επίσημα αποτελέσματα υποβολής μας επιτυγχάνουν βαθμολογία 0.5659.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ აღწერეთ ძალიან სწავლებელი სისტემა, რომელიც კომპექტირებულია როგორც SemEval 2019 სამუშაო დავალება A: წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენები Online Review და Forums-დან ჩვენ Word2Vec-ს გამოყენებთ სიტყვებისგან გადავსწავლოთ გაყოფილი გამოსახულებები. ეს სისტემა კონტექსტებით და შემდეგ კონტექსექსექსექსექსექსექსექსექსექსექსექსექსექსექსექსექსექსექსექსექსექსექსექს ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელის ეფექტიურობას უფრო მეტადებლად გავაკეთებთ. ნაქთრვ ჲტთუთალნთ პვჱსლრართ ჱა ოპვეაევნთვ ეჲჟრთდნარ F1-ოჲ 0.5659.', 'it': "In questo articolo descriviamo un sistema di deep-learning che ha gareggiato come SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A: Suggestion Mining da recensioni e forum online. Usiamo Word2Vec per imparare le rappresentazioni distribuite dalle frasi. Questo sistema è composto da una Stacked Bidirectional Long-Short Memory Network (SBiLSTM) per arricchire le rappresentazioni di parole prima e dopo la relazione di sequenza con il contesto. Eseguiamo un ensemble per migliorare l'efficacia del nostro modello. I nostri risultati ufficiali di presentazione raggiungono un punteggio F1 0,5659.", 'mk': 'Во овој весник опишуваме систем на длабоко учење кој се натпреваруваше како SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A: Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forums. Го користиме Word2Vec за да ги научиме дистрибуираните претставувања од речениците. Овој систем е составен од Стакирана дводрекционална мрежа на долга кратка меморија (SBiLSTM) за обогатување на претставувањата на зборовите пред и по секвенцата врска со контекст. Ние изведуваме ансембл за подобрување на ефикасноста на нашиот модел. Нашите официјални резултати на поднесувањето достигнуваат оценка F1 0,5659.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз 2019 жылдың жарым бөлігі 9- ішкі тапсырма А деп бөліп жатқан түсінікті оқыту жүйесін таңдаймыз: онлайн редакцияларынан және форумынан бағалау талаптары. Біз Word2Vec дегенді сөздерден таратылған түріндерді үйрену үшін қолданамыз. Бұл жүйе контекстік қатынасының алдында және кейін сөздерді көрсету үшін үлкен екі бағытты ұзын жады желінен құрылады. Өзіміздің үлгісінің эффективнілігін жақсарту үшін көмектесімізді жасаймыз. Біздің официалдық жіберу нәтижелеріміз 0,5659 жылдамдығына жеткізеді.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinama giliavandenio mokymosi sistema, kuri konkuravo kaip 2019 m. SemEval 9 užduotis – A užduotis: siūloma kasyba internetinėse apžvalgose ir forumuose. Naudojame Word2Vec, kad išmoktume paskirstytus atstovus iš sakinių. This system is composed of a Stacked Bidirectional Long-Short Memory Network (SBiLSTM) for enriching word representations before and after the sequence relationship with context.  Mes rengiame kompleksą, kad pagerintume savo modelio veiksmingumą. Mūsų oficialūs pateikimo rezultatai rodo, kad F1 rezultatas yra 0,5659.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം വിവരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ജോലി 9-SubTask A: ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d റിവിസ്കും ഫോ വാര്\u200dഡ്2വെക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു വിതരണ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കാന്\u200d. @ info: whatsthis നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നതിനായി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു മാതൃകയാണ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്ക നമ്മുടെ ഔദ്യോഗിക സമ്മതിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d എഫ്1- സ്കോര്\u200d 0. 5659 പ്രാപിക്കും.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument niddeskrivu sistema ta’ tagħlim profond li kompliet bħala SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A: Suġġestions Mining from Online Reviews and Forums. Aħna nużaw Word2Vec biex nitgħallmu r-rappreżentazzjonijiet distribwiti mis-sentenzi. This system is composed of a Stacked Bidirectional Long-Short Memory Network (SBiLSTM) for enriching word representations before and after the sequence relationship with context.  Aħna nagħmlu ensemble biex itejbu l-effettività tal-mudell tagħna. Ir-riżultati uffiċjali tas-sottomissjoni tagħna jiksbu punteġġ F1 0.5659.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami menggambarkan sistem pembelajaran dalam yang bersaing sebagai SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A: Suġġestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forums. Kami menggunakan Word2Vec untuk belajar perwakilan yang disebarkan dari kalimat. Sistem ini terdiri dari Rangkaian Memori Panjang-pendek Biarah Tertumpuk (SBiLSTM) untuk memperkaya perwakilan perkataan sebelum dan selepas hubungan urutan dengan konteks. Kami melakukan satu kumpulan untuk meningkatkan keefektivitas model kami. Hasil penghantaran rasmi kami mencapai skor F1 0.5659.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид 2019 оны SemEval Task 9-SubTask A гэж өрсөлдөг гүн гүнзгий суралцах системийг тайлбарладаг. Онлайн шалгалтууд болон Форумуудын төлөвлөгөө гаргах санал. Бид Word2Vec-г өгүүлбэрээс хуваагдсан илэрхийллийг сурахад хэрэглэдэг. Энэ систем урт богино Memory Network (SBiLSTM) гэсэн үг илтгэлийг өмнө болон дараа нь холбоотой холбоотой байрлалтай байгуулахын тулд бүрдсэн. Бид загварын үр дүнг сайжруулахын тулд загвар хийдэг. Бидний ерөнхийлөгчийн дамжуулалтын үр дүн нь F1-тоо 0.5659 гарч ирнэ.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule opisujemy system głębokiego uczenia, który konkurował jako SemEval 2019 Zadanie 9-Podzadanie A: Wydobywanie sugestii z recenzji i forów online. Używamy Word2Vec, aby uczyć się rozproszonych reprezentacji ze zdań. System ten składa się z układanej dwukierunkowej sieci pamięci długo-krótkiej (SBiLSTM) do wzbogacania reprezentacji słów przed i po relacji sekwencyjnej z kontekstem. Wykonujemy zespół, aby poprawić efektywność naszego modelu. Nasze oficjalne wyniki zgłoszeń osiągają wynik F1 0.5659.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo sistem dubokog učenja koji se natječe kao polovica 2019. zadatak 9-podzadatak A: predlog rudarstva iz online pregleda i foruma. Koristimo Word2Vec da naučimo raspodijeljene predstave iz rečenica. Ovaj sistem je sastavljen od određene dvosmjerne dugačke Memorijske mreže (SBiLSTM) za bogatstvo predstavljanja riječi prije i nakon sekvenčne veze sa kontekstom. Izvodimo ensemble da poboljšamo efikasnost našeg modela. Naši službeni rezultati podnošenja postižu F1 rezultat 0,5659.', 'no': 'I denne papiret beskriver vi ein dyp læringssystem som kompeterte som halvEval 2019 Oppgåve 9-underoppgåve A: Førsel for mining frå Online Review and Forums. Vi bruker Word2Vec for å lære dei distribuerte representasjonane frå setningar. Denne systemet er oppretta av ein stadig divretning langt kort minnet (SBiLSTM) for å forstørra ordrepresentasjonar før og etter sekvensforholdet med kontekst. Vi utfører ein ensembel for å forbetra effektiviteten av modellen vår. Det finst ein F1-poeng 0,5659.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare descriem un sistem de învățare profundă care a concurat ca SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A: Sugestii Mining din recenzii și forumuri online. Folosim Word2Vec pentru a învăța reprezentările distribuite din propoziții. Acest sistem este compus dintr-o rețea de memorie lungă-scurtă bidirecțională stivuită (SBiLSTM) pentru îmbogățirea reprezentărilor cuvintelor înainte și după relația secvențială cu contextul. Realizăm un ansamblu pentru a îmbunătăți eficiența modelului nostru. Rezultatele noastre oficiale de depunere obțin un scor F1 de 0.5659.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගත්ත පද්ධතියක් විවෘත කරන්නේ, 2019 වැඩේ 9-Sub-Job A: අන්ලයාන් පරීක්ෂණය සහ ෆෝර්ම්ස් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ අපි Word2Vec පාවිච්චි කතාවල් වලින් විතරයි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න. මේ පද්ධතිය ස්ථාපිත වෙලා තියෙන්නේ ලොකු ස්මරණ ජාලය (SBiLSTM) වචන ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් කලින් සම්බන්ධයෙන් සම්බන්ධයෙන් පස් අපි අපේ මෝඩේල් එකේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවක් වැඩි කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්ණයක් කරනවා. අපේ ප්\u200dරධානිය ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් F1-ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් 0.5659 වෙනවා.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaan ku qoraynaa nidaam waxbarasho aad u dheer, kaas oo u khilaafsan sida SemEval 2019 Shaqadda 9-SubTask A: Suggestiisa Mining from Online Reviews and Forums. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa Word2Vec si aan uga barno noocyada qaybsan. Tirkan waxaa ka mid ah shabakadda xasuusta ee Stacked Bidirectional Long-Short Memory Network (SBiLSTM) si uu u hodaneeyo qofka word representations horay iyo dabadeed xiriirka la xiriira context. Waxaynu sameynaa tusaale si aan u kordhino awoodda modeleena. Sujubaanadayada rasmiga ah waxay gaadhaa koox F1-score 0.5659.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats beskriver vi ett djupinlärningssystem som tävlade som SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A: Förslag Mining from Online Reviews and Forums. Vi använder Word2Vec för att lära oss distribuerade representationer från meningar. Detta system består av ett Staked Bidirectional Long-Short Memory Network (SBiLSTM) för att berika ordrepresentationer före och efter sekvensrelationen med sammanhanget. Vi utför en ensemble för att förbättra effektiviteten av vår modell. Våra officiella inlämningsresultat uppnår en F1-poäng 0,5659.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாளில் நாம் ஒரு ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் அமைப்பை விவரிக்கிறோம். அது செம்வால் 2019 என்ற போட்டிருந்தது செயல் 9- உப பணி A: இணைய முறைமைகள வாக்கியங்களிலிருந்து பங்கிடப்பட்ட பங்கீட்டு பிரதிநிதிகளை கற்றுக் கொள்ள வார்த்தை2வெக்  @ info எங்கள் மாதிரியின் விளைவை மேம்படுத்த ஒரு ஒற்றைப்பாட்டை செய்கிறோம். எங்கள் அரசியல் பரிசோதனை முடிவுகள் ஒரு F1- மதிப்பு 0. 5659 பெறுகிறது.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک عمیق سیستم کی تعلیم کررہے ہیں جو سامیEval 2019 ٹاکس 9-SubTask A کے طور پر مسابقات کی گئی تھی: آنلاین رسانیوں اور فورموں سے مینی ڈرانے کا قول ہے. ہم Word2Vec کا استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ کلمات سے تقسیم کیا جاتا ہے۔ یہ سیسٹم ایک سٹک دو دئیرسیٹن لانگ- کوٹی میموری نیٹورک (SBiLSTM) سے پیدا ہوا ہے کہ اس سے پہلے اور اس کے بعد کلمات کی نمایش کو متصل کے ساتھ اور سٹک رابطہ سے بڑھنے کے لئے۔ ہم اپنے مدل کے مطابق عمدہ کرنے کے لئے ایک انگلس کر رہے ہیں۔ ہمارے رسمی مسلمانوں کا نتیجہ F1-score 0.5659 پہنچتا ہے.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda SemEval 2019 yilda rivojlanadigan juda o'rganish tizimni aytib beramiz. 9- Subtask A: Online Reviews va Forumlardan qidirish imkoniyati. We use Word2Vec to learn the distributed representations from sentences.  Name Biz modelmizning effektligini oshirish uchun bir misol qilamiz. Bizning ofisi joʻnatish natijalarimiz F1 scori 0. 5659 bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi mô tả một hệ thống học sâu có thể thành công trong nhiệm vụ 9-SubTask A: Đề nghị khai thác từ trực tuyến. Chúng tôi dùng Word2Vec để học các biểu tượng được phát ra từ các câu. This system is composed of a Stacked hai direction long-Short Memory Network (SBLITM) for encấp các miêu tả từ trước và sau các chuỗi relationship with ngữ cảnh. Chúng tôi làm một kết hợp để nâng tầm hiệu quả của mô hình. Những kết quả đăng ký chính thức đạt được một F1-số 0.5599.', 'da': 'I denne artikel beskriver vi et dybtgående læringssystem, der konkurrerede som SemEval 2019 Opgave 9-SubTask A: Forslag Mining fra online anmeldelser og fora. Vi bruger Word2Vec til at lære de distribuerede repræsentationer fra sætninger. Dette system består af et Stacked Bidirectional Long-Short Memory Network (SBiLSTM) til berigelse af ordrepræsentationer før og efter sekvensforholdet til kontekst. Vi udfører et ensemble for at forbedre effektiviteten af vores model. Vores officielle indsendelsesresultater opnår en F1-score 0,5659.', 'bg': 'В тази статия описваме система за дълбоко обучение, която се състезава като Задача 9-Подзадача А: Подзадача за добиване на предложения от онлайн отзиви и форуми. Използваме за да научим разпределените представи от изреченията. Тази система се състои от натрупана двупосочна мрежа за дълги къси памети (SBiLSTM) за обогатяване на думите преди и след връзката на последователността с контекста. Изпълняваме ансамбъл, за да подобрим ефективността на нашия модел. Нашите официални резултати постигат оценка 0.5659.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel beschrijven we een deep-learning systeem dat concurreerde als SemEval 2019 Taak 9-SubTaak A: Suggestion Mining vanuit Online Reviews en Forums. We gebruiken Word2Vec om de gedistribueerde representaties van zinnen te leren. Dit systeem bestaat uit een Stacked Bidirectioneel Long-Short Memory Network (SBiLSTM) voor het verrijken van woordrepresentaties voor en na de sequentieverelatie met context. We voeren een ensemble uit om de effectiviteit van ons model te verbeteren. Onze officiële inzending resultaten bereiken een F1-score 0.5659.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo sistem dubokog učenja koji se natječe kao polovica 2019. zadatak 9-podzadatak A: prijedloge rudarstva iz Online Review i Foruma. Koristimo Word2Vec da naučimo raspodjeljene predstave iz rečenica. Ovaj sustav se sastoji od određene dvosmjerne dugačke Memorijske mreže (SBiLSTM) za bogatstvo predstavljanja riječi prije i nakon povezanja s kontekstom u sekvenciji. Izvodimo ensemble kako bi poboljšali učinkovitost našeg modela. Naši službeni rezultati podnošenja postignu rezultat F1-a 0,5659.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는SemEval 2019 퀘스트 9 - 하위 퀘스트 a와 경쟁하는 심도 있는 학습 시스템을 묘사했다. 온라인 평론과 포럼에서 조언을 발굴한다.Word2Vec를 사용하여 문장에서 분포식 표현을 배웁니다.이 시스템은 상하문과의 서열 관계 전후의 단어를 풍부하게 나타내는 쌍방향 장단기억망(SBILSM)으로 구성되어 있다.우리는 모델의 유효성을 높이기 위해 통합을 실행한다.우리의 공식 제출 결과는 F1 점수 0.5659에 이르렀다.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kami menggambarkan sistem belajar dalam yang bersaing sebagai SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A: Suggestion Mining dari Online Reviews and Forums. Kami menggunakan Word2Vec untuk mempelajari representation yang disebarkan dari kalimat. Sistem ini terdiri dari Jaringan Memori Panjang-pendek Biarah (SBiLSTM) Stacked Bidirectional Long-Short Memory Network (SBiLSTM) untuk memperkaya representation kata sebelum dan setelah hubungan urutan dengan konteks. Kami melakukan ensemble untuk meningkatkan efektivitas model kami. Our official submission results achieve an F1-score 0.5659.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir ein Deep-Learning-System, das als SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A: Suggestion Mining aus Online Reviews und Foren konkurrierte. Wir verwenden Word2Vec, um die verteilten Darstellungen aus Sätzen zu lernen. Dieses System besteht aus einem Stacked Bidirektional Long-Short Memory Network (SBiLSTM) zur Anreicherung von Wortdarstellungen vor und nach der Sequenzbeziehung mit Kontext. Wir führen ein Ensemble durch, um die Effektivität unseres Modells zu verbessern. Unsere offiziellen Einreichungsergebnisse erzielen eine F1-Punktzahl 0.5659.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما سیستم یادگیری عمیق را توصیف می\u200cکنیم که به عنوان تابع نیم Eval 2019 مسابقه\u200cی تابع 9-SubTask A: پیشنهاد ذخیره\u200cکننده از آزمایش\u200cهای آنلاین و فورم\u200cها مسابقه می\u200cکرد. ما از Word2Vec برای یاد گرفتن نمایش های تقسیم از جمله استفاده می کنیم. این سیستم از شبکه حافظه طولانی کوتاه\u200cای (SBiLSTM) در دو جهت ساخته می\u200cشود که در پیش و بعد از رابطه\u200cهای ترکیب با محیط تغییر دهد. ما یک انجمن انجام می دهیم تا موثرت مدل ما را بهبود دهیم. نتیجه تحویل رسمی ما یک نمونه F1 0.5659 رسیده است.', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili tunaelezea mfumo wa kujifunza kwa kina ambao ulishindana kama SemEval 2019 Kazi ya kazi 9-Subtask A: Mapendekezo ya Kufuatilia Maoni na Jukwaa za Mtandaoni. Tunatumia Word2Vec ili kujifunza uwakilishi wa usambazaji kutoka hukumu. Mfumo huu umetengenezwa na Mtandao wa Kumbukumbu ya Long-Short (SBiLSTM) wa kuwatajirisha uwakilishi wa neno kabla na baada ya mahusiano yanayohusiana na muktadha. Tunafanya mtindo wa kuboresha ufanisi wa mifano yetu. Matokeo yetu rasmi yanafanikiwa vipindi vya F1 0.5659.', 'af': "In hierdie papier beskrywe ons 'n diep-leer stelsel wat gemeenskap het as SemEval 2019 Opdrag 9-Subtaak A: voorstellings Mining van Online Review en Forums. Ons gebruik Word2Vec om die verdeelde voorstellings van teikens te leer. Hierdie stelsel is gestel van 'n Gevoude Bidireksionale Lang- Kort Geheue Netwerk (SBiLSTM) vir verrichting van woord voorstellings voor en na die volgorde verhouding met konteks. Ons doen 'n ensemble om die effektiviteit van ons model te verbeter. Ons offisiele ondersoek resultate het 'n F1- telling 0. 5659 bereik.", 'am': 'በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የሳምEval 2019 ስራውን 9-SubTask A: ከOnline Reviews እና Forums የጥልቅ ትምህርት ሲስተማርን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ቃላት 2Vec ከፍርድ የተከፋፈለ መልዕክቶችን ለመማር እንጠይቃለን፡፡ ይሄ ሲስተም አስቀድሞ ከግንኙነት ጋር ግንኙነት ለመጠቀም ቃላትን እና በኋላ ለመጠቀም በተጨማሪው የረጅም ቆራጭ ማስታወሻ መረብ (SBiLSTM) የተደረገ ነው፡፡ የዓይነታችንን ጥቅም ለማሻሻል ምሳሌ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የሥልጣን አዋጅ ውጤታችንን የF1 ነጥብ 0.5659 አግኝቷል፡፡', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda SemEval 2019 Görevi 9-SubTask A: Suggestion Mining from Online Review and Forums ýarylan derin-öwrenme sistemini tasvir ediyoruz. Sözlerden bölünen suratlary öwrenmek üçin Word2Vec'i ulanýarys Bu sistemi context bilen sözlerni baglaşdyrmak üçin 2 görnöşi, Uzun-Boşy Hata Aýry (SBiLSTM) hasaplanýar. Biziň nusgymyzyň etkinliýetini gowurak etmek üçin bir üýtgeşik edýäris. Resmi ilatymyz netijeli bir F1-score 0.5659 gazanýar.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër ne përshkruajmë një sistem mësimi të thellë që konkuroi si SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A: Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forums. Ne përdorim Word2Vec për të mësuar përfaqësimet e shpërndara nga fjalët. Ky sistem përbëhet nga një Rrjet i Kujtimeve të Larta e Dydrejtuese (SBiLSTM) për të pasuruar përfaqësimet e fjalëve përpara dhe pas lidhjes së sekuencës me kontekstin. We perform an ensemble to improve the effectiveness of our model.  Rezultatet tona zyrtare të paraqitjes arrijnë një rezultat F1 0.5659.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি গভীর শিক্ষা ব্যবস্থা বর্ণনা করি যা সেমভাল ২০১৯-এর কাজ ৯-সাবটাস্ক A-এর প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতা করেছে: অনলাইন রি আমরা ওয়ার্ড২ভেক ব্যবহার করি বিতরণের প্রতিনিধিদের শিখার জন্য। এই সিস্টেম একটি স্ট্যাক্ট করা বাইডেডিয়াল লম্বা-শর্ট মেমোরি নেটওয়ার্ক (SBiLSTM) তৈরি করা হয়েছে পূর্বে এবং প্রেক্ষাপটের সাথে সংযোগে আমরা আমাদের মডেলের কার্যক্রম উন্নত করার জন্য একটা প্রতিবন্ধকতা চালাই। আমাদের আনুষ্ঠানিক প্রদানের ফলাফল এফ১ স্কোর 0. 5659 পায়।', 'ca': "In this paper we describe a deep-learning system that competed as SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A: Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forums.  Utilitzem Word2Vec per aprendre les representacions distribuïdes a partir de frases. Aquest sistema està compost d'una xarxa de memòria bidireccional llarga i curta (SBiLSTM) per enriquecer les representacions de paraules abans i després de la seqüència amb el context. Fem un conjunt per millorar l'eficacia del nostre model. Els resultats oficials de la presentació aconsegueixen una puntuació F1 de 0,5659.", 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նկարագրում ենք խորը սովորելու համակարգը, որը մրցակցել է որպես "ՍեմԷվալ 2019" հանձնարարություն 9-Սենթահանձնարարություն Ա\' Առաջարկություն հանքային հանքային հանդիպումներ առցանց վերլուծություններից և ֆորում Մենք օգտագործում ենք Word2vec-ը, որպեսզի սովորենք բաշխված ներկայացումները նախադասություններից: Այս համակարգը կազմված է երկաուղղակի երկար-կարճ հիշողության ցանցից (SBLStm), որպեսզի հարստացվի բառերի ներկայացումները կոնտեքստի հետ առաջ և հետո: Մենք ստեղծում ենք համակարգ, որպեսզի բարելավենք մեր մոդելի արդյունավետությունը: Մեր պաշտոնական ներկայացման արդյունքները հասնում են F1-ի 0.5659-ի:', 'az': 'Bu kağızda 2019 Yarım Eval Task 9-SubTask A: Online Review and Forums təklif edilən minik sistemini təsdiqləyirik. Biz sözlərdən dağıtılmış ifadələri öyrənmək üçün Word2Vec kullanırıq. Bu sistem, əvvəl və sonrakı seçmə ilişkisi ilə yazılmış sözləri genişləndirmək üçün iki tərəfli Uzun-Qırsa Memory Network (SBiLSTM) ilə yaradılır. Bizim modelimizin etkinliğini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün bir ensembli işlədirik. Bizim resmi təklif sonuçlarımız F1-score 0.5659 olar.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo sistem dubokog učenja koji se konkurirao kao polovični zadatak 9-podzadatak A: prijedloge rudarstva iz Online Review i Foruma. Koristimo Word2Vec da naučimo raspodjeljene predstave iz rečenica. Ovaj sistem se sastoji od zajedničke dvosmjerne dugačke Memorijske mreže (SBiLSTM) za bogatstvo predstavljanja riječi prije i nakon sekvenčne veze sa kontekstom. Izvodimo ensemble da poboljšamo učinkovitost našeg modela. Naši službeni rezultati podnošenja postignu rezultat F1-a 0,5659.', 'et': 'Selles artiklis kirjeldame sügavõppe süsteemi, mis konkureeris kui SemEval 2019 ülesanne 9-SubTask A: Soovituste kaevandamine online ülevaatetest ja foorumitest. Me kasutame Word2Vec, et õppida jaotatud esindusi laused. See süsteem koosneb virnastatud kahesuunalisest pika-lühikese mälu võrgust (SBiLSTM), mis rikastab sõnaesitusi enne ja pärast jada seost kontekstiga. Me teeme ansambli, et parandada oma mudeli efektiivsust. Meie ametlikud esitatud tulemused saavutavad F1-skoori 0,5659.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvailemme syväoppimisen järjestelmää, joka kilpaili nimellä SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A: Suggestion Mining online-arvosteluista ja foorumeista. Käytämme Word2Vec oppia hajautetut esitykset lauseista. Järjestelmä koostuu pinotusta kaksisuuntaisesta pitkän ja lyhyen muistiverkosta (SBiLSTM), joka rikastaa sanaesityksiä ennen ja jälkeen sekvenssisuhteen kontekstiin. Teemme kokonaisuuden parantaaksemme mallimme tehokkuutta. Viralliset tulokset saavuttavat F1-pisteen 0,5659.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku popisujeme systém hlubokého učení, který soutěžil jako SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A: Dolování návrhů z online recenzí a fór. Používáme Word2Vec k učení distribuovaných reprezentací z vět. Tento systém je složen ze Stacked Bidirektional Long-Short Memory Network (SBiLSTM) pro obohacení reprezentace slov před a po sekvenčním vztahu s kontextem. Provádíme soubor pro zlepšení efektivity našeho modelu. Naše oficiální výsledky podání dosahují F1 skóre 0.5659.', 'jv': 'In this paper we describe a deep-Learning System that Competed as semebal 2011 task 9-Subtask A: Suggestion Minng from online Updates and forumes. Awak dhéwé nggunakake Word 2vecc kanggo kelas mrasar Sistem iki kompare durung karo akeh Bidirectiontal langgar-akpo membersêt (sBiLTT M) kanggo nambah kelangan representasi sing dumadhi tur wae sampek kelangan karo context. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing beraksi kanggo luwih nggawe model sing apik. Clear', 'ha': "A cikin wannan takarda, Munã bayyana wani na'urar da aka sanar da shi na ƙaranci kamar SemEL 2019 Taimar 9-SubTasks A: Suyarshen Mining daga Online References da Forums. Munã yi amfani da word2V zuwa a sanar da masu gauraya daga azãba. @ info: whatsthis Munã sami wani misali dõmin ya kyautata aikin misalinmu. MataimakinMu rasmi ya sami F1-score 0.559.", 'sk': 'V tem prispevku opisujemo sistem globokega učenja, ki je tekmoval kot SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A: Suggestion Mining iz spletnih pregledov in forumov. Uporabljamo Word2Vec za učenje porazdeljenih predstavitev iz stavkov. Ta sistem je sestavljen iz zloženega dvosmernega Long-Short Memory Network (SBiLSTM) za obogatitev besednih predstavitev pred in po razmerju zaporedja z kontekstom. Izvajamo ansambel za izboljšanje učinkovitosti našega modela. Naši uradni rezultati oddaje dosežejo rezultat F1 0,5659.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנחנו מתארים מערכת למידה עמוקה שמתחרה בתור SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A: Suggestion Mining from Online Reviews and Forums. אנו משתמשים Word2Vec כדי ללמוד את היציגות המפוצצות משפטים. המערכת הזאת מורכבת מרשת זיכרון ארוכה וקצרה בשני כיוונים (SBiLSTM) לעשיר מייצגות מילים לפני ואחרי מערכת הרצף עם הקשר. אנחנו מבצעים אסמבל לשפר את היעילות של המודל שלנו. תוצאות ההצגה הרשמיות שלנו משיגות נקודת F1 0.5659.', 'bo': 'In this paper we describe a deep-learning system that competed as SemEval 2019 Task 9-SubTask A: Suggestion Mining from Online Review and Forums. ང་ཚོས་བརྗོད་ཐོག་གི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་ལ་སྙད་པའི་ཚིག་རྟོགས་པ་དེ་ཤེས་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། This system is composed of a Stacked Bidirectional Long-Short Memory Network (SBiLSTM) for enriching word representations before and after the sequence relationship with context. ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་མ་དབུགས་ཀྱི་ལྕགས་རིམ་ཡར་རྒྱས་འགྲོ་བ་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོའི་གཞུང་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འགྲོ་བ་ཡིན་པའི་ཨང་གྲངས་༡.5659 རྙེད་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Zoho at SemEval-2019 Task 9 : Semi-supervised Domain Adaptation using Tri-training for Suggestion Mining', 'fr': "Zoho au salon SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 9\xa0: Adaptation semi-supervisée de domaines à l'aide de la formation TRI-Training", 'pt': 'Zoho na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 9: Adaptação de Domínio Semi-supervisionada usando Tri-treinamento para Mineração de Sugestão', 'ar': 'Zoho في SemEval-2019 المهمة 9: تكييف المجال شبه الخاضع للإشراف باستخدام التدريب الثلاثي لتعدين الاقتراحات', 'es': 'Zoho en SemeVal-2019 Tarea 9: Adaptación de dominio semisupervisada mediante TRI-training para la minería de sugerencias', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 9 पर Zoho: सुझाव खनन के लिए त्रि-प्रशिक्षण का उपयोग करके अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित डोमेन अनुकूलन', 'ja': 'Zoho at SemEval -2019タスク9 ：提案マイニングのためのトライトレーニングを使用した半監督ドメインの適応', 'zh': 'Zoho在SemEval-2019务9:以三重教习为言者半监之', 'ru': 'Zoho на SemEval-2019 Задача 9: Полунадзорная адаптация домена с использованием тройного обучения для майнинга предложений', 'ga': 'Zoho ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 9: Oiriúnú Fearainn Leathmhaoirsithe ag úsáid Trí-oiliúint do Mhianadóireacht Moltaí', 'ka': 'Zoho at SemEval-2019 Task 9: semi-supervised Domain Adaptation using Tri-training for Suggestion Mining', 'el': 'Εργασία 9: Ημι-εποπτευόμενη Προσαρμογή Τομέα χρησιμοποιώντας Τρι-εκπαίδευση για Εξόρυξη Προτάσεων', 'it': 'Zoho a SemEval-2019 Task 9: Adattamento del dominio semi-supervisionato utilizzando Tri-training per Suggestion Mining', 'lt': 'Zoho 2010 m. pusės vertinimo 9 užduotis: pusiau prižiūrimas domeno pritaikymas naudojant trijų mokymų siūlomų kasybos srityje', 'hu': 'Zoho a SemEval-2019 9. feladat: Félig felügyelt domain adaptáció a javaslatbányászathoz', 'mk': 'Зохо на SemEval-2019 задача 9: Половина надгледувана адаптација на домен користејќи три обуки за рудање предлози', 'kk': 'Зохо 9 тапсырмасының жарты бақылау үшін үш бақылау үшін қолданатын домен адаптациясы', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ജോലി 9: മിനിങ്ങിനുള്ള മൂന്ന് ട്രെയിനിങ്ങ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനായി സിമി നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഡൊമ', 'ms': 'Zoho di SemEval-2019 Tugas 9: Penyesuaian Domain Semi-dijaga menggunakan Tri-training untuk Menyembah cadangan', 'mt': 'Zoho at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Semi-supervised Domain Adaptation using Tri-training for Suggestion Mining', 'mn': 'Zoho at SemEval-2019 Task 9: SemEval-2019 Task 9: Half-oversed Domain Adaptation using Tri-training for Suggestion Mining', 'pl': 'Zoho w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 9: Adaptacja domeny pół nadzorowana przy użyciu trójszkolenia dla górnictwa sugestii', 'ro': 'Zoho la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 9: Adaptarea domeniului semi-supravegheată folosind Tri-training pentru mineritul sugestiilor', 'sr': 'Zoho na semiEval-2019 zadatku 9: polovično nadzirana adaptacija domena koristeći tri obuku za rudarstvo prijedloga', 'so': 'Zoho at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Semi-supervised Domain Adaptation using Tri-training for Suggestion Mining', 'sv': 'Zoho på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 9: Delvis övervakad domänanpassning med hjälp av Tri-utbildning för Förslag Mining', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 பணி 9: பரிந்துரைக்கு மூன்று பயிற்சியை பயன்படுத்தி பாதிக்கப்பட்ட ட டொமைன் Adaptation', 'si': 'සේම්වල්-2019 වැඩ 9 සෝහෝ වෙනුවෙන්: ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ත්\u200dරි-ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි.', 'no': 'Zoho ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 9: halvoversikt domeneadaptasjon ved hjelp av tritrening for forslag', 'ur': 'سوئوئل-2019 ٹاکس 9 میں Zoho: نصف-supervised Domain Adaptation using Tri-training for Suggestion Mining', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifani 9: Semi- supervised Domen Adaptation using Tri- training for suggesting Mining', 'vi': 'Zoho at SemEvl-tê Task 9: dễ giám sát chỉnh miền bằng cách tập huấn để gợi ý khai thác thác', 'bg': 'Задача 9: Полунадзорна адаптация на домейна с помощта на три обучения за добив на предложения', 'da': 'Zoho ved SemEval-2019 Opgave 9: Delvist overvåget domænetilpasning ved hjælp af Tri-træning til Forslag Mining', 'nl': 'Zoho bij SemEval-2019 Taak 9: Semi-supervised Domain Adaptation met behulp van Tri-training voor Suggestion Mining', 'hr': 'Zoho na semiEval-2019 zadatku 9: polovično nadzirana adaptacija domena koristeći triobuku za prijedloge rudarstva', 'ko': 'Zoho가SemEval-2019퀘스트9:Tri훈련을 사용하여 발굴을 권장하는 반감독역 자체 적응', 'fa': 'Zoho at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Half-supervised Domain Adaptation using Tri-training for Suggestion Mining', 'de': 'Zoho at SemEval-2019 Aufgabenstellung 9: Halbüberwachte Domänenanpassung mit Tri-Training für Suggestion Mining', 'id': 'Zoho di SemEval-2019 Tugas 9: Semi-supervised Adaptation Domain menggunakan Tri-training untuk Suggestion Mining', 'sw': 'Zoho kwenye kazi ya SemEval-2019 9: Tamko la SemEval-2019 kwa kudhibiti Semi-kufuatiliwa kwa kutumia mafunzo ya tatu kwa ajili ya pendekezo la uchunguzi', 'tr': 'Zoho at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Semi-supervised Domain Adaptation using Tri-training for Suggestion Mining', 'sq': 'Zoho në SemEval-2019 Task 9: Ndryshimi i mbikqyrur gjysmë i domenit duke përdorur trejnimin për sugjerimin e minierave', 'af': 'Zoho by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 9: Semi-ondersoekte domein-aanpassing gebruik Tri-oefening vir voorstellings-mining', 'az': 'Zoho at SemEval-2019 Task 9: SemEval-2019 Domain Adaptation using Tri-training for Suggestion Mining', 'hy': 'Սոհո, 2019 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" 9 խնդիր. կիսակառավարվող բնագավառի ադապտացիա, օգտագործելով առաջարկների հանքարդյունահանման երեք ուսումնասիրություն', 'am': 'Eval-2019 ስራ 9:', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজ ৯-এ জোহো: প্রস্তাবের জন্য ত্রিন ট্রেনিং প্রশিক্ষণ ব্যবহার করে সেমি নজরদারী ডোমেনের আড্যাপ্টেশন', 'bs': 'Zoho na semiEval-2019 zadatku 9: polovično nadzirana adaptacija domena koristeći triobuku za rudarstvo prijedloga', 'et': 'Zoho SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 9: Pooljärelevalvega domeeni kohandamine, kasutades kolmekoolitust soovituste kaevandamiseks', 'ca': 'Zoho a SemEval-2019 Tarefa 9: Adaptació semisupervisada del domini fent servir tricapacitació per a suggerir mines', 'cs': 'Zoho na SemEval-2019 Úkol 9: Semi-supervised Domain Adaptation pomocí Tri-školení pro Suggestion Mining', 'fi': 'Zoho SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 9: Osavalvottu verkkotunnuksen mukauttaminen kolminkertaisen koulutuksen avulla Suggestion Mining', 'jv': 'Soho at semebal-2011 task 9: semi-super Vised domain Adjustation use Tri-curation for Suggestion Minng', 'he': 'Zoho ב SemEval-2019 משימה 9: התאמה למשטרה שמבוטחת בחצי', 'sk': 'Zoho na SemEval-2019 Naloga 9: Polnadzorovana prilagoditev domen z uporabo Tri-usposabljanja za rudarjenje predlogov', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Zoho at SemEval-2019 Task 9: Semi-supervised Domain Adaptation using Tri-training for Suggestion Mining'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our submission for the SemEval-2019 Suggestion Mining task. A simple Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) classifier with contextual word representations from a pre-trained language model was used for sentence classification. The model is trained using tri-training, a semi-supervised bootstrapping mechanism for labelling unseen data. Tri-training proved to be an effective technique to accommodate domain shift for cross-domain suggestion mining (Subtask B) where there is no hand labelled training data. For in-domain evaluation (Subtask A), we use the same technique to augment the training set. Our system ranks thirteenth in Subtask A with an F1-score of 68.07 and third in Subtask B with an F1-score of 81.94.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة تقديمنا لمهمة التعدين في اقتراح SemEval-2019. تم استخدام مصنف بسيط للشبكة العصبية التلافيفية (CNN) مع تمثيلات للكلمات السياقية من نموذج لغة مدرب مسبقًا لتصنيف الجملة. يتم تدريب النموذج باستخدام ثلاثي التدريب ، وهي آلية شبه خاضعة للإشراف للتمهيد لوصف البيانات غير المرئية. أثبت التدريب الثلاثي أنه تقنية فعالة لاستيعاب تحول المجال لتعدين الاقتراحات عبر المجال (Subtask B) حيث لا توجد بيانات تدريب معنونة يدويًا. للتقييم في المجال (Subtask A) ، نستخدم نفس الأسلوب لزيادة مجموعة التدريب. يحتل نظامنا المرتبة الثالثة عشرة في المهمة الفرعية A بدرجة F1 تبلغ 68.07 والثالث في Subtask B بدرجة F1 تبلغ 81.94.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nossa submissão para a tarefa de Mineração de Sugestões SemEval-2019. Um classificador simples de Rede Neural Convolucional (CNN) com representações de palavras contextuais de um modelo de linguagem pré-treinado foi usado para classificação de sentenças. O modelo é treinado usando tri-training, um mecanismo de bootstrapping semi-supervisionado para rotular dados não vistos. O tri-treinamento provou ser uma técnica eficaz para acomodar a mudança de domínio para mineração de sugestões entre domínios (Subtarefa B) onde não há dados de treinamento rotulados à mão. Para avaliação no domínio (Subtarefa A), usamos a mesma técnica para aumentar o conjunto de treinamento. Nosso sistema ocupa o décimo terceiro lugar na Subtarefa A com uma pontuação F1 de 68,07 e o terceiro na Subtarefa B com uma pontuação F1 de 81,94.', 'es': 'Este documento describe nuestro envío para la tarea de Minería de Sugerencias Semeval-2019. Se utilizó un clasificador simple de red neuronal convolucional (CNN) con representaciones contextuales de palabras de un modelo de lenguaje previamente entrenado para la clasificación de oraciones. El modelo se entrena mediante tri-training, un mecanismo de arranque semisupervisado para etiquetar datos no vistos. La capacitación triple demostró ser una técnica eficaz para adaptarse al cambio de dominio para la minería de sugerencias entre dominios (Subtarea B) donde no hay datos de capacitación etiquetados a mano. Para la evaluación dentro del dominio (subtarea A), utilizamos la misma técnica para aumentar el conjunto de entrenamiento. Nuestro sistema ocupa el decimotercer lugar en la subtarea A con un puntaje de F1 de 68,07 y el tercero en la subtarea B con un puntaje de F1 de 81,94.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit notre soumission pour la tâche SemEval-2019 Suggestion Mining. Un classificateur CNN (Convolutional Neural Network) simple avec des représentations textuelles de mots provenant d'un modèle de langage pré-entraîné a été utilisé pour la classification des phrases. Le modèle est entraîné à l'aide de tri-training, un mécanisme d'amorçage semi-supervisé pour étiqueter les données non vues. La formation tridimensionnelle s'est avérée être une technique efficace pour s'adapter au changement de domaine pour l'exploration de suggestions interdomaines (sous-tâche B) lorsqu'il n'y a pas de données d'entraînement étiquetées manuellement. Pour l'évaluation dans le domaine (sous-tâche A), nous utilisons la même technique pour augmenter l'ensemble de formation. Notre système se classe treizième dans la sous-tâche A avec un score F1 de 68,07 et troisième dans la sous-tâche B avec un score F1 de 81,94.", 'ja': 'この論文では、SemEval -2019 Suggestion Miningタスクのための提出について説明します。文の分類には、事前に訓練された言語モデルからの文脈的な単語表現を備えた単純な畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ CNN ）分類子が使用された。このモデルは、見えないデータをラベル付けするための半監督ブートストラップメカニズムであるトライトレーニングを使用してトレーニングされます。トライトレーニングは、手書きのトレーニングデータがないクロスドメイン提案マイニング（サブタスクB ）のためのドメインシフトに対応するための効果的なテクニックであることが証明された。ドメイン内評価（サブタスクA ）では、同じ手法を使用してトレーニングセットを拡張します。当社のシステムは、F 1スコア68.07でサブタスクAで13位、F 1スコア81.94でサブタスクBで3位です。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर SemEval-2019 सुझाव खनन कार्य के लिए हमारे सबमिशन का वर्णन करता है। एक सरल Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (सीएनएन) एक पूर्व प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल से प्रासंगिक शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व के साथ क्लासिफायर वाक्य वर्गीकरण के लिए इस्तेमाल किया गया था। मॉडल को त्रिकोणीय प्रशिक्षण का उपयोग करके प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है, जो अनदेखी डेटा को लेबल करने के लिए एक अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित बूटस्ट्रैपिंग तंत्र है। ट्राई-ट्रेनिंग क्रॉस-डोमेन सुझाव खनन (सबटास्क बी) के लिए डोमेन शिफ्ट को समायोजित करने के लिए एक प्रभावी तकनीक साबित हुई, जहां कोई हाथ से लेबल प्रशिक्षण डेटा नहीं है। इन-डोमेन मूल्यांकन (सबटास्क ए) के लिए, हम प्रशिक्षण सेट को बढ़ाने के लिए एक ही तकनीक का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारी प्रणाली 68.07 के F1-स्कोर के साथ Subtask A में तेरहवें स्थान पर है और 81.94 के F1-स्कोर के साथ Subtask B में तीसरे स्थान पर है।', 'zh': '本文言臣等为SemEval-2019建议发掘之文。 简卷积神经网络(CNN)分器,有预训言语形上下文单词,施于句类。 三教者,半监之导也,所以标不见之数也。 三重之教,有效之术也,可以应无手工之数跨域议掘(子B)之域。 域内评(子职 A),吾以同术广训练集。 子职 A 十三,F1 曰 68.07,在子 B 曰三,曰 F1 曰 81.94。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается наше представление для задачи SemEval-2019 Suggestion Mining. Для классификации предложений использовался простой классификатор сверточной нейронной сети (CNN) с контекстными представлениями слов из предварительно обученной языковой модели. Модель обучается с использованием три-обучения, полунадзорного механизма бутстреппинга для маркировки невидимых данных. Тройное обучение зарекомендовало себя как эффективный метод адаптации к смещению доменов для междоменной предлагаемой добычи (подзадача B), где нет данных обучения с ручной маркировкой. Для внутридоменной оценки (подзадача А) мы используем ту же методику для расширения обучающего набора. Наша система занимает тринадцатое место в подзадаче A с показателем F1 68,07 и третье в подзадаче B с показателем F1 81,94.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár n-aighneacht do thasc Mianadóireachta Molta SemEval-2019. Baineadh úsáid as aicmitheoir simplí Líonra Néarach Comhdhlúite (CNN) le léirithe comhthéacsúla focal ó mhúnla teanga réamhoilte chun abairtí a rangú. Cuirtear oiliúint ar an tsamhail trí úsáid a bhaint as trí-oiliúint, meicníocht tosaithe leath-mhaoirsithe chun sonraí nach bhfacthas a lipéadú. Chruthaigh trí-oiliúint a bheith ina teicníocht éifeachtach chun freastal ar aistriú fearainn do mhianadóireacht moltaí trasfhearainn (Fothasc B) nuair nach bhfuil aon sonraí oiliúna lámh-lipéadaithe. Le haghaidh meastóireachta in-fhearainn (Fothasc A), bainimid úsáid as an teicníc chéanna chun cur leis an tacar oiliúna. Tá ár gcóras sa tríú háit déag i bhFothasc A le scór F1 de 68.07 agus sa tríú háit i bhFothasc B le scór F1 de 81.94.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აღწერს ჩვენი წარმოდგენება SemEval-2019 წარმოდგენების მინიღება. კონტუქციური ნეიროლური ქსელი (CNN) კლასიფიკაცია, რომელიც კონტუქციური სიტყვების გამოსახულებებისთვის წინაშემდეგ ენის მოდელიდან გამოყენებული იყო წინაშე მოდელის გამოყენება სამი განსწავლების გამოყენებაში, ნახევარჯიშირებული მონაცემენტის მაქანიზაცია. Tri-training proved to be an effective technique to accommodate domain shift for cross-domain suggestions mining (Subtask B) where there is no hand labelled training data. ჩვენ იგივე ტექნექტიკის გამოყენება, რომელიც გავაკეთებთ განაკეთება. ჩვენი სისტემა სამუშაო A-ში სამუშაო სამუშაო სისტემა 68,07 და სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო B-ში F1-score 81,94.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2019 javaslatbányászati feladatra vonatkozó beadványunkat. A mondatok osztályozásához egy egyszerű Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) osztályozót használtunk, amely kontextuális szóreprezentációkat tartalmaz egy előre képzett nyelvi modellből. A modell képzése a láthatatlan adatok címkézésére szolgáló, félig felügyelt, három tréning segítségével történik. A háromképzés hatékony technikának bizonyult a domain eltolódására a több domain javaslatbányászat esetében (B. alfeladat), ahol nincsenek kézzel jelölt képzési adatok. A területen belüli értékeléshez (A. alfeladat) ugyanezt a technikát használjuk az edzéskészlet bővítésére. Rendszerünk a tizenharmadik helyen áll az A. alfeladatban 68,07 F1 pontszámmal, a B. alfeladatban pedig 81,94 F1 pontszámmal.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει την υποβολή μας για την εργασία εξόρυξης πρότασης. Για την ταξινόμηση των προτάσεων χρησιμοποιήθηκε ένας απλός ταξινομητής Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) με περιγραφικές αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων από ένα προ-εκπαιδευμένο γλωσσικό μοντέλο. Το μοντέλο εκπαιδεύεται χρησιμοποιώντας τρι-εκπαίδευση, έναν ημι-εποπτικό μηχανισμό για την επισήμανση αόρατων δεδομένων. Η τρι-εκπαίδευση αποδείχθηκε μια αποτελεσματική τεχνική για την προσαρμογή της μετατόπισης τομέων για την εξόρυξη προτάσεων μεταξύ τομέων (Υποεργασία Β) όπου δεν υπάρχουν δεδομένα κατάρτισης που φέρουν το χέρι. Για την αξιολόγηση εντός πεδίου (Υποεργασία Α), χρησιμοποιούμε την ίδια τεχνική για να αυξήσουμε το εκπαιδευτικό σύνολο. Το σύστημά μας κατατάσσεται 13η στην Υποεργασία Α με βαθμολογία F1 68.07 και τρίτη στην Υποεργασία Β με βαθμολογία F1 81.94.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive la nostra presentazione per il compito SemEval-2019 Suggestion Mining. Per la classificazione delle frasi è stato utilizzato un semplice classificatore Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) con rappresentazioni contestuali di parole da un modello linguistico pre-addestrato. Il modello è addestrato utilizzando tri-training, un meccanismo di bootstrapping semi-supervisionato per l'etichettatura dei dati invisibili. Il Tri-training si è rivelato una tecnica efficace per adattarsi al trasferimento di dominio per il mining dei suggerimenti cross-domain (Sottotask B) dove non ci sono dati di allenamento etichettati manualmente. Per la valutazione in-domain (Sottotask A), utilizziamo la stessa tecnica per aumentare il set di allenamento. Il nostro sistema si colloca tredicesimo nella Sottomissione A con un punteggio F1 di 68,07 e terzo nella Sottomissione B con un punteggio F1 di 81,94.", 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашето поднесување за задачата за минирање на предлози. За класификација на речениците беше употребен едноставен класификатор на Конволуционална Неурална мрежа (CNN) со контекстни претставувања на зборови од предобучен јазички модел. The model is trained using tri-training, a semi-supervised bootstrapping mechanism for labelling unseen data.  Три-обука се покажа дека е ефикасна техника за прилагодување на смената на домените за минирање на сугестии за крстодомените (подзадача Б) каде што нема податоци за обука со рака. За проценка во домен (подзадача А), ја користиме истата техника за зголемување на наборот на обука. Our system ranks thirteenth in Subtask A with an F1-score of 68.07 and third in Subtask B with an F1-score of 81.94.', 'lt': 'This paper describes our submission for the SemEval-2019 Suggestion Mining task.  A simple Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) classifier with contextual word representations from a pre-trained language model was used for sentence classification.  Modelis mokomas naudojant trimokymą, pusiau prižiūrimą įjungimo mechanizmą, skirtą nematomiems duomenims ženklinti. Tri-training proved to be an effective technique to accommodate domain shift for cross-domain suggestion mining (Subtask B) where there is no hand labelled training data.  Vertinant sritis (A posėdis), mes naudojame tą patį metodą, kad padidintume mokymo rinkinį. Our system ranks thirteenth in Subtask A with an F1-score of 68.07 and third in Subtask B with an F1-score of 81.94.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз 2019 жылы жарым-бағалау тапсырмасына жіберімізді таңдайды. Қарапайым Конверсиялық нейралық желі (CNN) классификациясы, алдын- оқылған тіл үлгісінен тәртіпсіздік сөздерді таңдау үшін қолданылады. Бұл үлгі үш оқыту, жарты бақылау механизмі, көрсетілмеген деректерді белгілеу үшін үшін бақылау механизмі қолданылады. Қосымша доменге ауыстыру үшін доменге ауыстыру (B ішкі тапсырма) көмектесу үшін (B ішкі тапсырма) көмектесу үшін эффективті техника деп көрсетілді. Домендегі бағалау үшін (A субтапсырмасы) біз бір тәжірибені көтеру үшін бір техниканы қолданамыз. Біздің жүйеміз A субтапсырмасындағы 13-ші ретінде, F1- нәтижесі 68,07 және B субтапсырмасындағы үшінші ретінде, F1- нәтижесі 81,94.', 'ms': 'This paper describes our submission for the SemEval-2019 Suggestion Mining task.  Name Model dilatih menggunakan tri-training, mekanisme bootstrapping setengah-mengawasi untuk mengetikkan data yang tidak terlihat. Tri-latihan terbukti sebagai teknik yang berkesan untuk mengakomodasi shift domain untuk cadangan lombong melintasi domain (Subtugas B) di mana tiada data latihan ditabel tangan. Untuk penilaian dalam domain (Subtask A), kami menggunakan teknik yang sama untuk menambah set latihan. Our system ranks thirteenth in Subtask A with an F1-score of 68.07 and third in Subtask B with an F1-score of 81.94.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sottomissjoni tagħna għall-kompitu ta’ SemEval-2019 Suġġeriment Mining. A simple Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) classifier with contextual word representations from a pre-trained language model was used for sentence classification.  The model is trained using tri-training, a semi-supervised bootstrapping mechanism for labelling unseen data.  Tri-training proved to be an effective technique to accommodate domain shift for cross-domain suggestion mining (Subtask B) where there is no hand labelled training data.  Għall-evalwazzjoni fil-qasam (Subkompitu A), aħna nużaw l-istess teknika biex iżidu s-sett tat-taħriġ. Is-sistema tagħna tikklassifika t-tlettax fis-Subkompitu A b’punteġġ F1 ta’ 68.07 u t-tielet fis-Subkompitu B b’punteġġ F1 ta’ 81.94.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-2019 മിനിംഗ് ജോലിക്കുള്ള മിനിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ കീഴ്പെടുത ഒരു മുന്\u200dപഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ മോഡലില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറ്റാള്\u200d ശേഖരിയ്ക്കുന്നതിനാ ട്രീ-ട്രെയിനില്\u200d പരിശീലനം ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു സെമി-സൂക്ഷിച്ച് നിരീക് ക്രിസ്ട്രെഡോമെന്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഡോമെന്\u200d ഷിഫ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d മൂന്ന് ട്രെയിനിങ്ങ് തെളിയിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ സെറ്റിനെ കൂട്ടിക്കൊടുക്കുന്നതിനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരേ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പതിനൊന്നാമത്തേത് സുബ്ബ്ബ്ബസ് A ല്\u200d എഫ്1 സ്കോര്\u200d 68. 07 ലും മൂന്നാമത്തേതും എഫ്1. 94 സ്കോര്\u200d ഉള്ള ഒരു F', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний SemEval-2019 оны зөвлөгөөний салбарын ажлыг тайлбарладаг. Тухайн сургалтын хэл загвараас илэрхийлэгдсэн үгнүүдтэй хамгийн энгийн Конvolutional Neural Network (CNN) хуваалцагч нь өгүүлбэр хуваалцахын тулд хэрэглэгдсэн юм. Загвар нь гурван сургалтыг ашиглан сургалтын хэрэглэгдсэн бөгөөд харагдаагүй өгөгдлийн маркингийн талаар ажиглаж буулгах механизм юм. Гурван дасгал хөдөлгөөн нь дасгал хөдөлгөөн хөдөлгөөн (B) болон гараар нэрлэгдсэн дасгал өгөгдлийн тоо байхгүйн тулд хүрээлэн буй салбарт шилжүүлэх эффективны техник гэдгийг баталсан. Дэлхийн үнэлгээ (А суб-задалгаа) дээр бид дасгал хөдөлгөөнийг нэмэхэд адилхан техникыг ашиглаж байна. Бидний систем Subtask A-д 13 дүрс байна. F1 дүрс 68.07, 3 дүрс Subtask B-д 81.94 дүрс байна.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver vårt oppføring for semiEval-2019-forslag for mining. Ein enkel konvolusjonell neiralnettverk (CNN) klassifiserer med kontekstlege ord- representasjonar frå eit føretrainert språk- modell ble brukt for setningsklassifikasjon. Modellen vert trent med tre- trening, ein semioversikt oppstartsmekanismekanismekanismen for å merke ukjende data. Tri-opplæring viste at det er ein effektiv teknikk for å tilpassa domeneforskyving for mining av krysdomene (Subtask B) der det ikkje finst handmerket opplæringsdata. For inndomeneevaluering (Subtask A) bruker vi den same teknikken for å auka opplæringssettet. Systemet vårt rankerer trettiende i Subtask A med F1-poeng på 68,07 og tredje i Subtask B med F1-poeng på 81,94.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje nasze zgłoszenie do zadania SemEval-2019 Suggestion Mining. Do klasyfikacji zdań zastosowano prosty klasyfikator Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) z kontekstowymi reprezentacjami słów z wstępnie przeszkolonego modelu językowego. Model jest trenowany przy użyciu tri-treningu, pół-nadzorowanego mechanizmu bootstrapping służącego do etykietowania niewidocznych danych. Trójszkolenie okazało się skuteczną techniką dostosowania przesunięcia domeny do eksploracji sugestii między domenami (Podzadanie B), gdzie nie ma ręcznie oznaczonych danych treningowych. Do oceny wewnątrz domeny (Podzadanie A) stosujemy tę samą technikę do rozszerzenia zestawu treningowego. Nasz system jest trzynasty w Podzadaniu A z wynikiem F1 68.07 i trzecim w Podzadaniu B z wynikiem F1 81.94.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie depunerea noastră pentru sarcina SemEval-2019 Suggestion Mining. Pentru clasificarea propozițiilor a fost folosit un simplu clasificator de Rețea Neurală Convoluțională (CNN) cu reprezentări de cuvinte contextuale dintr-un model lingvistic pre-instruit. Modelul este instruit folosind tri-training, un mecanism semi-supravegheat de fixare a bootstrapului pentru etichetarea datelor nevăzute. Tri-training s-a dovedit a fi o tehnică eficientă pentru a adapta schimbarea domeniului pentru extragerea sugestiilor cross-domain (Subsarcina B), unde nu există date de instruire etichetate manual. Pentru evaluarea în domeniu (Subsarcina A), folosim aceeași tehnică pentru a spori setul de antrenament. Sistemul nostru ocupă locul 13 în Subsarcina A cu un scor F1 de 68,07 și al treilea în Subsarcina B cu un scor F1 de 81,94.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše podnošenje za zadatak za rudarstvo predloga u polEvalu-2019. Jednostavni konvolucionalni neuronski mreža (CNN) klasifikator sa kontekstualnim rečima predstavljanja iz predobučenog jezičkog modela je korišćen za klasifikaciju kazne. Model je obučen koristeći tri obuku, mehanizam polu nadziranog šipkanja za označavanje nevidljivih podataka. Tri obuka je dokazala da je efikasna tehnika za usmjerenje domena za rudarstvo preko domena (Subtask B), gde nema podataka o obuci na rukama označene. Za procjenu u domenu (Subtask A), koristimo istu tehniku za povećanje seta obuke. Naš sistem rankira 13 u Subtask A sa F1 rezultatom od 68,07 i trećim u Subtask B sa F1 rezultatom od 81,94.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තේ අපේ පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරනවා සෙම්වෙල්-2019 ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන සාමාන්\u200dය සමාන්\u200dය න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය (CNN) විශේෂකයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වි මොඩල් ත්\u200dරී- ප්\u200dරේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරේෂණය කරලා තියෙනවා, බැහැරි දත්ත ලේබල් කරන්න බූට් ස්ට්\u200dරෑප් මැකසිනයක්. Tri-Training ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා (A ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්ලේෂණය සබ් විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා), අපි එකම ප්\u200dරධාන විශ්ලේෂ අපේ පද්ධතිය සබ්ටැක්ස් A වල තුන්වෙනි පද්ධතියක් තියෙනවා. F1-score 68.07 වල තුන්වෙනි සබ්ටැක්ස් B වල F1-score 81.94 වල තියෙනවා.', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran warqaddayada loo soo dirayo shaqada dhameystirka ee SemEval-2019. Shabakadda Neural ee fudud (CNN) waxaa loo isticmaalay mid ku qoran qoraal joogtada ah oo ka mid ah model afka hore oo lagu baray fasax. Tusaalada waxaa lagu baran karaa isticmaalka waxbarashada saddexda waxbarasho, meymisyo booska lagu ilaaliyey hal semi ah oo lagu qorayo macluumaadka qarsoon. Saddex waxbarasho waxaa looga xaqiijiyey inuu noqdo qaab faa’iido ah oo lagu beddelo bedelka guriga ee lagu talo galay kaynta (Subtask B) meesha aan lagu helin macluumaad waxbarasho oo gacanta lagu qoray. Qiimeynta gudaha (Sub-task A) waxaynu isticmaalnaa iskuul isku mid ah si aan u kordhino koritaanka heerka waxbarashada. Isticmaddeena waxay leedahay saddex iyo tobnaad ee Subtask A, waxayna leedahay F1-score 68.07 iyo saddexaad ee Subtask B, waxayna leedahay F1-score oo 81.94.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் செம்Eval-2019 குறைந்த பணிக்கான பரிந்துரையை குறிப்பிடுகிறது. ஒரு சுலபமான Convolution Neural Network (CNN) வகைப்பாளர் ஒரு முன் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரியிலிருந்து தற்போதைய வார்த்தை குறிப்பிட்ட மாதிரியில இந்த மாதிரி மூன்று பயிற்சியை பயன்படுத்தி பயிற்சி செய்யப்படுகிறது, ஒரு பாதி கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட துவக்க முறைமையை தொ Tri-training proved to be an effective technique to accommodate domain shift for cross-domain suggestion mining (Subtask B) where there is no hand labelled training data.  உள்ளமைப்பு மதிப்புக்கு (உப பணி A) நாம் பயிற்சி அமைப்பை அதிகரிக்க ஒரே தொழில்நுட்பத்தை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். எங்கள் அமைப்பு துணை செயல் A-ல் மூன்றாவது நிறுவனது ஒரு F1- score of 68. 07 மற்றும் மூன்றாவது துணை பணி B-ல் ஒரு F1- score of 81. 94.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt bidrag till SemEval-2019 Förslag Gruvdrift. En enkel Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) klassificerare med kontextuella ordrepresentationer från en färdigutbildad språkmodell användes för meningsklassificering. Modellen tränas med hjälp av tri-training, en halvövervakad bootstrapping mekanism för märkning av osynliga data. Tri-träning visade sig vara en effektiv teknik för att hantera domänskift för cross-domain suggestion mining (Underuppgift B) där det inte finns några handmärkta träningsdata. För intern utvärdering (underuppgift A) använder vi samma teknik för att utöka träningsuppsättningen. Vårt system rankas trettonde i deluppgift A med en F1-poäng på 68,07 och tredje i deluppgift B med en F1-poäng på 81,94.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ہماری سفارش کے لئے SemEval-2019 پیشنهاد مینینگ کام کی توصیف کرتا ہے. ایک سادھا سادھا سادھا نئورل نیٹ ورک (سین ان) کلیسٹ کے ساتھ ایک پیش آموزش کی زبان موڈل سے کلیسٹ کلیسٹ کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا تھا۔ مدل تین ترینس کے مطابق تطابق کی جاتی ہے، ایک نصف-supervised بوٹ سٹراپ مکانیسی ہے جو غیر دیکھی ڈیٹا لیبلینگ کے لئے ہے. Tri-training proved to be an effective technique for accommodating domain shift for cross-domain suggestion mining (Subtask B) where there is no hand labeled training data. ڈومین میں ارزیابی (Subtask A) کے لئے ہم اسی طرح استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ تدریس سٹ کو بڑھنے کے لئے۔ ہمارا سیستم سوٹاکس ا میں تیسرا درجہ ہے جو 68.07 اور تیسرا سرٹاکس B میں ایک F1-score ہے 81.94 کے ساتھ۔', 'uz': "Bu qog\xa0Ľoz SemEval-2019 ta\xa0ľminlovchi vazifa uchun ishlatimizni anglatadi. Name Name Uchta ta\xa0ľminlovchi, juda ko'p ta'lim ma\xa0ľlumot yo\xa0Ľq emas, domen shiftlarini qo\xa0Ľllash uchun qo\xa0Ľllanmagan so\xa0Ľzni qo\xa0Ľllash imkoniyatini (sub- vazifa B) qo\xa0Ľllanmagan foydalanish uchun qo\xa0Ľllanmagan. Domenning qiymatlari (Subtask A) uchun biz bir xil texnologidan foydalanamiz. Bizning tizimimiz Subtask A'da uchinchi bir F1 scori 68.07 va tub vazifa B'da uchinchi bir F1 scori 81.94 bilan birga ega.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả yêu cầu của chúng ta cho nhiệm vụ khai thác SemEvol-209. Một phân loại thần kinh theo thuyết trình đơn giản (CNN) với các từ biểu hiện liên tục từ một mô hình ngôn ngữ đã được đào tạo để phân loại bản án. Mẫu được huấn luyện bằng ba-huấn luyện, một cơ chế khởi động được giám sát gần để đánh dấu dữ liệu không nhìn thấy. Ba-huấn luyện được cho là một kỹ thuật có hiệu quả để điều khiển việc chuyển đổi miền cho khai thác các thao tác vu khống (Subask B) nơi không có dữ liệu đào tạo có tên bằng tay. Để đánh giá nội bộ (Subask A), chúng tôi dùng cùng một kỹ thuật để tăng cường tập luyện. Hệ thống của chúng ta xếp thứ mười ba trong Subask A với một F1-số trong 68.07 và thứ ba trong Subask B với một F1-số số của 81.94.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores indsendelse til SemEval-2019 Forslag Mining opgave. En simpel Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) klassificering med kontekstuelle ord repræsentationer fra en præ-trænet sprogmodel blev brugt til sætningsklassificering. Modellen trænes ved hjælp af tri-training, en semi-overvåget bootstrapping mekanisme til mærkning af usynlige data. Tri-træning viste sig at være en effektiv teknik til at imødekomme domæneskift for forslag på tværs af domæner (underopgave B), hvor der ikke findes håndmærkede træningsdata. Til in-domain evaluering (Underopgave A) bruger vi samme teknik til at øge træningssættet. Vores system rangerer trettende i subopgave A med en F1-score på 68,07 og tredje i subopgave B med en F1-score på 81,94.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва нашето представяне за задачата за добиване на предложения. За класификация на изреченията е използван прост класификатор на конвелуционална неврална мрежа (CNN) с контекстуални думи от предварително обучен езиков модел. Моделът се обучава с помощта на тритренинг, полунадзорен механизъм за етикетиране на невидими данни. Три-обучението се оказа ефективна техника за приспособяване на изместването на домейна за междудомейнно добиване на предложения (подзадача Б), където няма ръчно обозначени данни за обучение. За вътрешно оценяване (подзадача А) използваме същата техника за увеличаване на тренировъчния набор. Системата ни се нарежда на тринадесето място в подзадача А с резултат от 68.07 и трето в подзадача Б с резултат от 81.94.', 'nl': 'Deze paper beschrijft onze inzending voor de SemEval-2019 Suggestion Mining taak. Een eenvoudige Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) classificator met contextuele woordrepresentaties uit een vooraf getraind taalmodel werd gebruikt voor zinsclassificatie. Het model wordt getraind met behulp van tri-training, een semi-supervised bootstrapping mechanisme voor het labelen van onzichtbare gegevens. Tri-training bleek een effectieve techniek te zijn om domeinverschuiving aan te passen voor cross-domein suggestie mining (Subtask B) waar er geen hand gelabelde trainingsgegevens zijn. Voor in-domain evaluatie (Subtaak A) gebruiken we dezelfde techniek om de trainingsset uit te breiden. Ons systeem staat dertiende in Subtaak A met een F1-score van 68.07 en derde in Subtaak B met een F1-score van 81.94.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše podatke za zadatak za rudarstvo prijedloga u poluvolji 2019. Jednostavna konvolucionalna neuronska mreža (CNN) klasifikacija s kontekstualnim riječima predstavljanja iz predobučenog jezičkog modela je korišćena za klasifikaciju kazne. Model je obučen koristeći tri obuku, polu nadzirani mehanizam prebacivanja čizma za označavanje nevidljivih podataka. Tri obuka pokazala se da je učinkovita tehnika za usmjerenje domena za rudarstvo prijedloga preko domena (podzadatak B) gdje nema podataka o obuci označene ruke. Za procjenu u domenu (podzadatak A), koristimo istu tehniku za povećanje seta obuke. Naš sustav je treći u Subtask A s rezultatom F1 od 68,07 i trećim u Subtask B s rezultatom F1 od 81,94.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan pengiriman kami untuk SemEval-2019 Suggestion Mining tugas. A simple Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) classifier with contextual word representations from a pre-trained language model was used for sentence classification.  Modelnya dilatih menggunakan tri-pelatihan, mekanisme bootstrap semi-supervised untuk mengetikkan data yang tidak terlihat. Tri-pelatihan terbukti sebagai teknik efektif untuk mengakomodasi shift domain untuk saran tambang cross-domain (Subtask B) di mana tidak ada data pelatihan yang ditabel tangan. Untuk evaluasi dalam domain (Subtask A), kami menggunakan teknik yang sama untuk meningkatkan set latihan. Sistem kita berturut-tiga di Subtask A dengan skor F1 68,07 dan ketiga di Subtask B dengan skor F1 81,94.', 'ko': '본고는 우리가 제출한SemEval-2019건의 발굴 임무를 묘사하였다.간단한 권적신경망(CNN) 분류기를 사용하여 미리 훈련된 언어 모델에서 상하문어를 추출하여 문장을 분류한다.이 모델은 tri-training을 사용하여 훈련을 하는데 tri-training은 반감독 자진 메커니즘으로 보이지 않는 데이터를 표시하는 데 사용된다.인공적으로 표시된 훈련 데이터가 없는 상황에서 Tri훈련은 도메인 간 권장발굴(하위 임무 B)에서 도메인 이동에 적응하는 효과적인 기술이라는 사실이 입증됐다.역내 평가(하위 임무 A)에 대해 우리는 같은 기술을 사용하여 훈련 집합을 확충한다.우리 시스템은 서브퀘스트 A에서 13위, F1에서 68.07, 서브퀘스트 B에서 3위, F1에서 81.94를 차지했다.', 'de': 'Dieses Papier beschreibt unsere Einreichung für die SemEval-2019 Suggestion Mining Aufgabe. Zur Satzklassifizierung wurde ein einfacher Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) Klassifikator mit kontextuellen Wortdarstellungen aus einem vortrainierten Sprachmodell verwendet. Das Modell wird mit Tri-Training trainiert, einem halbüberwachten Bootstrapping-Mechanismus zur Kennzeichnung unsichtbarer Daten. Tri-Training erwies sich als eine effektive Technik, um Domänenverschiebungen für domänenübergreifendes Suggestion Mining (Subtask B) unterzubringen, wo es keine handbeschrifteten Trainingsdaten gibt. Für die In-Domain Evaluation (Subtask A) verwenden wir die gleiche Technik, um das Trainingsset zu erweitern. Unser System rangiert dreizehnter in Subtask A mit einer F1-Punktzahl von 68.07 und dritter in Subtask B mit einer F1-Punktzahl von 81.94.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ تسلیم شدن ما را برای وظیفه\u200cی کاغذی پیشنهاد نیم\u200cEval-2019 توصیف می\u200cکند. Name این مدل با استفاده از سه تمرین آموزش آموزش یافته می\u200cشود، یک مکانیسم دستگاه\u200cبندی نیمه\u200cنظارت برای برچسب داده\u200cهای غیرنظارت. تری آموزش ثابت شد که یک تکنیک موثر است تا تغییرات دامنی را برای خرید کردن پیشنهاد\u200cهای مختلف دامنه\u200cای (زیر کار B) جایی داده\u200cهای آموزش دستی\u200cنامه\u200cای ندارد. برای ارزیابی دامنی (Subtask A) از یک تکنیک برای افزایش مجموعه آموزش استفاده می\u200cکنیم. سیستم ما 13 درجه در Subtask A با نمونه F1 68.07 و سوم در Subtask B با نمونه F1 81.94 درجه دارد.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea ujumbe wetu wa pendekezo la uchunguzi wa SemEval-2019. Mtandao rahisi wa Neural Neural (CNN) mwenye uwakilishi wa maneno ya sasa kutoka modeli ya lugha iliyoendelea ilitumiwa kwa ajili ya kutafsiri hukumu. Mfano huu umefundishwa kwa kutumia mafunzo ya mitatu, mfumo wa kuangaliwa kwa nusu kwa ajili ya kutangaza taarifa zisizo fichikana. Tri-training proved to be an effective technique to accommodate domain shift for cross-domain suggestion mining (Subtask B) where there is no hand labelled training data.  Kwa uchunguzi wa ndani (Ujumbe wa A), tunatumia teknolojia moja kwa moja ili kuongeza seti ya mafunzo. Mfumo wetu unashikilia nafasi ya tatu katika kazi A yenye score ya F1 ya 68.07 na tatu ya Jumuiya B yenye score ya F1 ya 81.94.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz SemEval-2019-nji ýygnak taýýarlanmasy maslahatymyzy çykýar. Ewir ködlemeler, Ewir ködlemeler (CNN) sözleriň klasifikasy üçin işledildi. Bu model üç-okuw ullanýar, ýarym-gözlemli başlangyç sistemasy görkezilmedik maglumatlary etiketlemek üçin. Üç-eğitim, cross-domain teklifini küçülemek (Subtask B) konusunda elin etiketlenen eğitim verileri taýýarlamak üçin etkinlik bir teknik olarak kanıtlandyryldy. domain değerlendirmesi için (Subtask A) aynı teknikleri eğitim setini arttırmak için kullanırız. Biziň sistemamyz Subtask A'da on üçünji dereje bar we F1-score 68,07 we 3-nji Subtask B'de F1-score 81,94.", 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf ons onderskrywing vir die SemEval-2019-voorstellings Mining taak. Name Die model is opgelei deur die gebruik van drie-oefening, 'n semi-superviseerde opstart-mekanisme vir etiketting ongestelde data. Tri-oefening bevestig is om 'n effektief teknike te wees om domein verskuif te hou vir kruisdomein voorstellings mining (Subtask B) waar daar geen hand etiketeerde onderwerp data is nie. Vir in-domein evaluering (Subtask A), gebruik ons dieselfde tekniks om die opvoeringsstel te groot. Ons stelsel rank dertiende in Subtask A met 'n F1-telling van 68.07 en derde in Subtask B met 'n F1-telling van 81.94.", 'sq': 'Kjo artikull përshkruan paraqitjen tonë për detyrën SemEval-2019 Suggestion Mining. Një klasifikues i thjeshtë i rrjetit nervor konvolutiv (CNN) me përfaqësime kontekstuale fjalësh nga një model gjuhësh të trajnuar para u përdorë për klasifikimin e fjalëve. Modeli është trajnuar duke përdorur tri-trainimin, një mekanizëm gjysmë-mbikqyrur për të etiketuar të dhënat e padukshme. Tri-training proved to be an effective technique to accommodate domain shift for cross-domain suggestion mining (Subtask B) where there is no hand labelled training data.  Për vlerësimin në domeni (Subtask A), ne përdorim të njëjtën teknikë për të rritur grupin e trajnimit. Sistemi ynë renditet i tretë në Subtask A me një rezultat F1 prej 68.07 dhe i treti në Subtask B me një rezultat F1 prej 81.94.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ለሴmEval-2019 የሽልማት ጉዳይ የሚያሳውቀውን ጥያቄያችንን ይናገራል፡፡ ቀላል Convolution Neural Network (CNN) classifier with contextual word representations from a pre-trained language model used for sentence classification. ሞዴላው የሦስት ትምህርት ማድረግ፣ የsemi-የተጠበቀው የቡቶስታር ምርጫዎች የስውር መረጃዎችን ለማሳመር ነው፡፡ የሦስት ትምህርት ማህበረሰብ እጆች ተማሪ ዳታ የሌለበት የዶሜን ለውጥ ማቀናቀል (Subtask B) ለመቀናቀል ጥያቄ ነው፡፡ የውይይት ጉዳይ ማስታወቂያ (Subtask A) እናስቀምጣለን የግንኙነቱን ጉዳይ ለመጨመር ነው፡፡ Our system ranks thirteenth in Subtask A with an F1-score of 68.07 and third in Subtask B with an F1-score of 81.94.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সেমইভাল-২০১৯ সালের প্রস্তাব মিনিং কাজের জন্য আমাদের প্রস্তাব বর্ণনা করেছে। A simple Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) classifier with contextual word representations from a pre-trained language model was used for sentence classification.  এই মডেল ত্রিটি প্রশিক্ষণ ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে, সেমি পর্যবেক্ষণ করা বুটস্ট্র্যাপিং মেশিনগুলো অদৃশ্য তথ্য লেবেল করার জন্ ক্রস-ডোমেইন পরামর্শ করার জন্য ডোমেইন পরামর্শ প্রদান করার জন্য তিন ট্রেনিং প্রমাণিত হয়েছে যেখানে কোন হাতে প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য নেই। ডোমেইন মূল্যের জন্য (সাবকাজ A), প্রশিক্ষণের সেট বৃদ্ধি করার জন্য আমরা একই প্রযুক্তি ব্যবহার করি। আমাদের সিস্টেম সাব কাজ A-এ তৃতীয় সংখ্যা আছে যার সাথে এফ১ স্কোর ৬৮.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր ներկայացումը 2019 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" առաջարկների հանքային գործի համար: Նյարդային ցանցի (CNN) պարզ դասակարգիչ, որը ներկայացնում է նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելի բառերը, օգտագործվում է նախադասությունների դասակարգի համար: Մոդելը սովորեցվում է օգտագործելով երեք ուսուցման մեխանիզմ, որը կիսավերահսկվում է անտեսանելի տվյալների պիտակավորման մեխանիզմ: Երկու ուսումնասիրությունը պարզվեց, որ արդյունավետ տեխնիկան է, որպեսզի համապատասխանի դաշտային տեղափոխման միջոցով հանքային առաջարկների (B ենթախնդիր), որտեղ ձեռքով նշանակված ուսումնասիրության տվյալներ չկան: Աշխարհային գնահատման համար (Ա-ենթախնդիր) մենք օգտագործում ենք նույն մեթոդը փորձելու համար: Մեր համակարգը դասակարգվում է 13-րդ ենթախնդիր Ա-ում, որի F1 գնահատականը 68.07 է, իսկ երրորդ ենթախնդիր Բ-ում, որի F1 գնահատականը 81.94 է:', 'az': "Bu kağıt semiEval-2019 təklif maddiyi işləri üçün bizim təklifimizi təsbiq edir. Əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş dil modeli ilə müxtəlif söz ifadəsi ilə asanlıq Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) klasifikatçısı cümlələr klasifikatı üçün istifadə edildi. Model üç təhsil istifadəsində təhsil edilir, görünməyən məlumatları etiketləmək üçün yarı təhsil edilmiş bootstrapping mehānismi. Üçüncü təhsil təhsil edilmək üçün çox domain dəyişikliklərinin (Subtask B) mining məlumatı üçün faydalı bir teknik olaraq təhsil edildi. Adəmin təcrübəsi üçün, təcrübəsini artırmaq üçün eyni tekniki istifadə edirik. Bizim sistemimiz Subtask A'da on üçüncü dərəcə, F1-score 68.07 və 3-ci dərəcə Subtask B'də F1-score 81.94.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše podatke za zadatak za rudarstvo prijedloga za pola Evala-2019. Jednostavni konvolucionalni neuronski mreža (CNN) klasifikator sa kontekstualnim riječima predstavljanja iz predobučenog jezičkog modela je korišćen za klasifikaciju kazne. Model se obučava koristeći tri obuku, mehanizam polu nadziranog prebacivanja čizma za etiketiranje nevidljivih podataka. Tri obuka je dokazala da je efikasna tehnika za usmjerenje domena za rudarsko rudarstvo preko domena (podzadatak B), gdje nema podataka o obuci na rukama označene. Za procjenu u domenu (Subtask A), koristimo istu tehniku za povećanje seta obuke. Naš sistem rankira 13 u Subtask A sa F1 rezultatom od 68,07 i trećim u Subtask B sa F1 rezultatom od 81,94.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš příspěvek k úkolu SemEval-2019 Suggestion Mining. Pro klasifikaci vět byl použit jednoduchý klasifikátor Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) s kontextovými reprezentacemi slov z předškoleného jazykového modelu. Model je trénován pomocí tri-tréninku, částečně dohlíženého bootstrappingového mechanismu pro označování neviditelných dat. Tri-trénink se ukázal být účinnou technikou pro přizpůsobení posunu domény pro dolování suggestion cross-domain (Subtask B), kde neexistují ručně označená tréninková data. Pro hodnocení v doméně (Subtask A) používáme stejnou techniku k rozšíření tréninkové sady. Náš systém je třináctý v Subúkolu A s F1 skóre 68.07 a třetí v Subúkolu B s F1 skóre 81.94.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu la nostra presentació per a la tasca de Sugeriments Miners SemEval-2019. A simple Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) classifier with contextual word representations from a pre-trained language model was used for sentence classification.  El model està entrenat fent servir tres entrenaments, un mecanisme semisupervisat de bootstrapping per etiquetar dades invisibles. La tripartització va demostrar ser una tècnica eficaç per acomodar el canvi de domini per a la suggerició de mineria de domini transversal (Subtasca B) on no hi ha dades d'entrenament etiquetades a mà. Per a l'evaluació en domini (Subtasca A), utilitzem la mateixa tècnica per augmentar el conjunt d'entrenaments. El nostre sistema es classe a la 13 a la Subtasca A amb una puntuació F1 de 68,07 i la tercera a la Subtasca B amb una puntuació F1 de 81,94.", 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie esitamist SemEval-2019 soovituste kaevandamise ülesandele. Lause klassifitseerimiseks kasutati lihtsat konvolutsioonilist neurovõrgustikku (CNN) klassifitseerijat kontekstuaalsete sõnade esitamisega eelõpetatud keelemudelist. Mudeli koolitamisel kasutatakse kolmekoolitust, mis on pooljärelevalvega bootstrapping mehhanism nähtamatute andmete märgistamiseks. Kolmekordne koolitus osutus tõhusaks tehnikaks domeenivahetuse mahutamiseks domeenidevahelise soovituste kaevandamisel (alaülesanne B), kus puuduvad käsitsi märgistatud koolitusandmed. Domeenisiseseks hindamiseks (alamülesanne A) kasutame sama tehnikat treeningkomplekti täiendamiseks. Meie süsteem on alaülesandes A kolmandal kohal F1 skooriga 68,07 ja alaülesandes B kolmandal kohal F1 skooriga 81,94.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan SemEval-2019 Suggestion Mining -tehtävään osallistumismme. Lausekkeiden luokittelussa käytettiin yksinkertaista konvolutional neural network (CNN) -luokitusta, jossa oli kontekstuaalisia sanaesityksiä ennalta koulutetusta kielimallista. Malli on koulutettu käyttämällä kolmiharjoitusta, puolivalvottua bootstrapping mekanismia näkymättömien tietojen merkitsemiseksi. Kolmikoulutus osoittautui tehokkaaksi tekniikaksi ottaa huomioon toimialueenvaihto toimialueiden välisessä suggestion louhinnassa (alatehtävä B), jossa ei ole käsin merkittyjä harjoitustietoja. Sisäisessä arvioinnissa (alatehtävä A) käytämme samaa tekniikkaa harjoitussarjan lisäämiseen. Järjestelmämme sijoittuu kolmanneksi osatehtävässä A F1-pisteellä 68,07 ja kolmanneksi osatehtävässä B F1-pisteellä 81,94.', 'jv': 'Gambar iki rambarang nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nggawe Sistem-2011 Suggestion Ming task. section model sing kelas telu-curemun, semi-super-sistem sing perusahaan kanggo ngilangno data sing bisa dianggawe. Tri-tutorial document document Dadine-domain assertion (Subtask A), we use the same method to expand the Learning set. Sistem punika telu telu maneh ing Subtask A karo F1-punika sing 6.7 lan telu maneh ing Subtask B karo F1-punika sing 8.1994.', 'he': 'This paper describes our submission for the SemEval-2019 Suggestion Mining task.  רשת נוירולית קונבנולציונית פשוטה (CNN) עם מייצגים מילים קונטקסטיים ממודל שפה מאומן מראש השתמש בהקליזת משפטים. הדוגמא מאומנת באמצעות טרי-אימון, מנגנון חצי-מפקח של התעלות לטיוט נתונים בלתי צפויים. התברר שטרי-אימון הוא טכניקה יעילה כדי לתקן שינוי שטח עבור הצעה מחוץ לתחום כרייה (Subtask B) שבו אין נתוני אימון עם תווית יד. עבור הערכה בתחום (Subtask A), אנחנו משתמשים באותה טכניקה כדי להגדיל את קבוצת האימונים. המערכת שלנו מגיעה לשלוש עשרה במשימה A עם נקודת F1 של 68.07 ושלישית במשימה B עם נקודת F1 של 81.94.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na faɗaɗa'inmu ga aikin da aka ƙarfafa aikin Mining na Semeval-2019. An amfani da wani shirin ayuka na zaman taƙaita na takardar Neural (CNN) mai fassara da wasu abubuwan magana daga wata misalin harshe na zaman-tsari ya yi amfani da wa fassarar ɗabi'a. An sanar da shirin ayuka da aka yi amfani da shirin shida ɗin zaman shawara, an yi amfani da shirin mai lokacin da aka yi taƙaita wa tsarin da ba'a sani ba. Ana jarraba wa-aikin uku ko wani taki mai amfani da ya kamata shift ɗin Domen wa shawarar ƙarami na gudãna-Domen (Sub-aikin B) inda bãbu wani data wanda aka sanar da hannun na tsari. For in-domain evaluation (Subtask A), we use the same technique to augment the training set.  Ubuntu na aikin mu yana da wata F1-score na 68.07 da na uku cikin Subaikin B na F1-score 81.94.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje našo predložitev za nalogo SemEval-2019 Suggestion Mining. Za klasifikacijo stavkov je bil uporabljen preprost klasifikator konvolucionalne nevronske mreže (CNN) z kontekstualnimi predstavitvami besed iz vnaprej usposobljenega jezikovnega modela. Model se usposablja z uporabo tri-treninga, napol nadzorovanega mehanizma za označevanje nevidnih podatkov. Tri-usposabljanje se je izkazalo za učinkovito tehniko pri spreminjanju domene za meddomensko rudarjenje sugestij (podnaloga B), kjer ni ročno označenih podatkov o usposabljanju. Za notranjo evalvacijo (podnaloga A) uporabljamo isto tehniko za povečanje nabora treningov. Naš sistem se uvršča na trinajsto v podnalogi A z rezultatom F1 68,07 in tretjo v podnalogi B z rezultatom F1 81,94.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ང་ཚོའི་ཞུ་གཏུག་པ་དེ་ལ་(SemEval-2019)རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་བསམ་འཆར་བཀོད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་དཔེ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་བྱེད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་སྟོན་པ(CNN) The model is trained using tri-training, a semi-supervised bootstrapping mechanism for labelling unseen data. Tri-training proved to be an effective technique to accommodate domain shift for cross-domain suggestion mining (Subtask B) where there is no hand labelled training data. domain evaluation ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གི་Subtask A ཡི་གྲངས་ཀ་དེ་གཟུགས་གཅིག་པུར་ཡོད། F1-score of 68.07 དང་། Subtask B ཡི་གྲངས་གསུམ་པ་ལ་མཉམ་ལས་ F1-score of 81.94 ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'UniMelb at SemEval-2019 Task 12 : Multi-model combination for toponym resolution', 'ar': 'UniMelb في SemEval-2019 المهمة 12: تركيبة متعددة النماذج لتحليل أسماء المواقع الجغرافية', 'pt': 'UniMelb na SemEval-2019 Tarefa 12: Combinação de vários modelos para resolução de topônimos', 'fr': 'UniMelb au SEMEVAL-2019 Task 12\xa0: Combinaison multi-modèles pour la résolution toponymique', 'es': 'UNIMELB en la Tarea 12 de SemEval-2019: Combinación de varios modelos para la resolución de topónimos', 'ja': 'SemEval -2019のUniMelbタスク12 ：地名解決のためのマルチモデルの組み合わせ', 'zh': 'UniMelb在SemEval-2019务12:地名解析者多合之', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 12 पर UniMelb: toponym रिज़ॉल्यूशन के लिए बहु-मॉडल संयोजन', 'ru': 'UniMelb на SemEval-2019 Задача 12: Комбинация нескольких моделей для разрешения топонима', 'ga': 'UniMelb ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 12: Teaglaim ilmhúnla le haghaidh réiteach ainmfhocail', 'ka': 'UniMelb semiEval-2019 პარამეტრი 12: მრავალური მოდელური კომბიზაცია ტოპონიმის გარეშექმნა', 'el': 'Εργασία 12: Συνδυασμός πολλαπλών μοντέλων για ανάλυση τοπωνύμων', 'hu': 'UniMelb a SemEval-2019 12. feladat: Többmodell kombináció a toponím felbontásához', 'it': 'UniMelb a SemEval-2019 Task 12: Combinazione multi-modello per la risoluzione del toponimo', 'lt': 'UniMelb SemEval-2019 12 užduotis: daugiapakopis toponimo rezoliucijos derinys', 'mk': 'UniMelb на SemEval-2019 задача 12: Мулти-моделна комбинација за резолуција на топоним', 'kk': 'UniMelb жарым- Eval- 2019 тапсырма 12: топонимдің айырмашылығының көп үлгі kombinasyon', 'ms': 'UniMelb at SemEval-2019 Task 12: Multi-model combination for toponym resolution', 'mn': 'UniMelb at SemEval-2019 Task 12: Multi-model combination for toponym resolution', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 12: ടോപ്പോണിമിന്റെ റിസ്റ്റലിനുള്ള ഒരുപാട് മോഡല്\u200d കൂട്ടം', 'mt': 'UniMelb f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 12: Kombinazzjoni ta’ mudelli multipli għar-riżoluzzjoni tat-toponimu', 'no': 'UniMelb ved semiEval-2019 oppgåve 12: fleire modellkombinasjon for toponymsoppløysing', 'sr': 'UniMelb na semiEval-2019 Task 12: kombinacija multimodela za rezoluciju toponima', 'ro': 'UniMelb la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 12: Combinație multi-model pentru rezoluția toponimelor', 'pl': 'UniMelb w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 12: Kombinacja wielu modeli dla rozdzielczości toponimów', 'si': 'UniMelb at HalfEvel-2019 Job 12: Multi-Model combination for toponicm resolution', 'sv': 'UniMelb på SemEval-2019 Uppgift 12: Kombination av flera modeller för toponym upplösning', 'ta': 'SemEval- 2019 பணி 12: toponym தெளிவுத்திறனுக்கான பல- மாதிரி இணைப்பு', 'so': 'UniMelb at SemEval-2019 Task 12: Multi-model combination for toponym resolution', 'ur': 'SemEval-2019 ٹاکس 12 میں یونیمیلب: ٹوپونیم ریزیزول کے لئے multi-model combination', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifani 12: Multi model combination for toponym resolution', 'vi': 'UniMelb at SemEvl-209 Task 12: tổ hợp đa mẫu cho độ phân giải địa hình', 'hr': 'UniMelb na semiEval-2019 zadatak 12: kombinacija višemodela za rezoluciju toponima', 'bg': 'Задача 12: Комбинация от многомодели за резолюция на топонимите', 'da': 'UniMelb på SemEval-2019 Opgave 12: Kombination af flere modeller til toponym opløsning', 'nl': 'UniMelb bij SemEval-2019 Taak 12: Multi-model combinatie voor toponiem resolutie', 'de': 'UniMelb bei SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 12: Multi-Modell-Kombination zur Toponymauflösung', 'ko': 'UniMelb가SemEval-2019 작업12: 지명 해석의 다중 모형 조합', 'id': 'UniMelb di SemEval-2019 Tugas 12: Kombinasi multi-model untuk resolusi toponym', 'fa': 'UniMelb در کار ۱۲: ترکیب چند مدل برای حل توپونیم', 'sw': 'UniMelb katika kazi ya SemEval-2019 12: Muungano wa mifano mingi kwa ajili ya utambulisho wa mada', 'tr': 'UniMelb at SemEval-2019 Task 12: Multi-model combination for toponym resolution', 'af': 'UniMelb by SemEval- 2019 Opdrag 12: Multi model kombinasie vir toponym oplossing', 'sq': 'UniMelb në SemEval-2019 Task 12: Kombinacion me shumë modele për zgjidhjen e toponimit', 'am': 'Eval-2019 ስራ 12: Multi-model combination for toponym resolution', 'hy': 'Unimelb - 2019 թվականի կենտրոնացման ժամանակ', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Task 12: Toponym çözünürlüyü üçün çoxlu model kombinatsiyası', 'bn': 'সেমEval-2019 কাজের ইউনিমেল ১২: টপোনিমের সিসেম্পলেশনের জন্য বহুমাত্র মডেল সংযোগ', 'bs': 'UniMelb na semiEval-2019 Task 12: multimodelna kombinacija za rezoluciju toponima', 'cs': 'UniMelb na SemEval-2019 Úkol 12: Kombinace více modelů pro rozlišení toponymů', 'ca': 'UniMelb a SemEval-2019 Task 12: Multi-model combination for toponym resolution', 'et': 'UniMelb SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 12: Mitme mudeli kombinatsioon toponüümse resolutsiooni jaoks', 'fi': 'UniMelb SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 12: Monimalliyhdistelmä toponyymien resoluutiota varten', 'jv': 'UniMelb at semebal-2011 task 12: Multi-model combining for top unym Resolution', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'he': 'UniMelb ב SemEval-2019 משימה 12: שילוב מודל רב לפתרון טופונים', 'sk': 'UniMelb na SemEval-2019 Naloga 12: Kombinacija več modelov za ločljivost toponimov', 'bo': 'UniMelb at SemEval-2019 Task 12: Multi-model combination for toponym resolution'}
{'en': 'This paper describes our submission to SemEval-2019 Task 12 on toponym resolution over scientific articles. We train separate NER models for toponym detection over text extracted from tables vs. text from the body of the paper, and train another auxiliary model to eliminate misdetected toponyms. For toponym disambiguation, we use an SVM classifier with hand-engineered features. The best setting achieved a strict micro-F1 score of 80.92 % and overlap micro-F1 score of 86.88 % in the toponym detection subtask, ranking 2nd out of 8 teams on F1 score. For toponym disambiguation and end-to-end resolution, we officially ranked 2nd and 3rd, respectively.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة تقديمنا إلى SemEval-2019 Task 12 بشأن حل أسماء المواقع الجغرافية على المقالات العلمية. نقوم بتدريب نماذج NER منفصلة لاكتشاف أسماء المواقع الجغرافية على النص المستخرج من الجداول مقابل النص من متن الورقة ، وندرب نموذجًا إضافيًا للتخلص من الأسماء الجغرافية المكتشفة بشكل خاطئ. لتوضيح الأسماء الجغرافية ، نستخدم مصنف SVM بميزات مصممة يدويًا. حقق أفضل إعداد درجة micro-F1 صارمة تبلغ 80.92٪ وتداخل micro-F1 بنسبة 86.88٪ في المهمة الفرعية للكشف عن الأسماء الجغرافية ، ليحتل المرتبة الثانية من بين 8 فرق في درجة F1. من أجل توضيح الأسماء الجغرافية وحلها من طرف إلى طرف ، حصلنا رسميًا على المرتبة الثانية والثالثة على التوالي.', 'fr': 'Cet article décrit notre soumission à SEMEVAL-2019 Task 12 sur la résolution des toponymes par rapport aux articles scientifiques. Nous entraînons des modèles NER distincts pour la détection des toponymes sur le texte extrait des tableaux par rapport au texte du corps du document, et nous entraînons un autre modèle auxiliaire pour éliminer les toponymes mal détectés. Pour la désambiguïsation des toponymes, nous utilisons un classificateur SVM avec des fonctionnalités conçues à la main. Le meilleur réglage a obtenu un score strict de micro-F1 de 80,92\xa0% et un score de chevauchement micro-F1 de 86,88\xa0% dans la sous-tâche de détection des toponymes, se classant 2e sur 8 équipes sur le score F1. Pour la désambiguïsation des toponymes et la résolution de bout en bout, nous nous sommes classés respectivement 2e et 3e.', 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve nossa submissão à Tarefa 12 do SemEval-2019 sobre resolução de topônimos sobre artigos científicos. Treinamos modelos NER separados para detecção de topônimos sobre texto extraído de tabelas versus texto do corpo do artigo e treinamos outro modelo auxiliar para eliminar topônimos detectados incorretamente. Para desambiguação de topônimos, usamos um classificador SVM com recursos de engenharia manual. A melhor configuração alcançou uma pontuação micro-F1 estrita de 80,92% e uma pontuação micro-F1 sobreposta de 86,88% na subtarefa de detecção de topônimos, ocupando o 2º lugar de 8 equipes na pontuação F1. Para desambiguação de topônimos e resolução de ponta a ponta, ficamos oficialmente em 2º e 3º lugar, respectivamente.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe nuestra presentación a la Tarea 12 de SemEval-2019 sobre resolución de topónimos sobre artículos científicos. Entrenamos modelos NER separados para la detección de topónimos sobre texto extraído de tablas en comparación con texto del cuerpo del papel, y entrenamos otro modelo auxiliar para eliminar topónimos mal detectados. Para la desambiguación de topónimos, utilizamos un clasificador SVM con funciones diseñadas a mano. La mejor configuración logró una puntuación estricta de micro-F1 del 80,92% y una puntuación superpuesta de micro-F1 del 86,88% en la subtarea de detección de topónimos, ocupando el segundo lugar de 8 equipos en la puntuación de F1. Para la desambiguación de topónimos y la resolución de extremo a extremo, oficialmente ocupamos el segundo y tercer lugar, respectivamente.', 'ja': '本稿では、科学記事に対する地名解決に関するSemEval -2019 Task 12への提出について述べる。テーブルから抽出したテキストと論文の本文から抽出したテキストの間で地名検出のための別々のNERモデルをトレーニングし、誤検出された地名を排除するための別の補助モデルをトレーニングします。地名の曖昧さを解消するために、私たちは手作業で設計された機能を備えたSVM分類子を使用します。最高の設定は、地名検出サブタスクで80.92%の厳密なマイクロF 1スコアを達成し、86.88%のマイクロF 1スコアを重ね合わせ、F 1スコアで8チーム中2位となりました。地名の曖昧さ解消とエンドツーエンドの解像度については、それぞれ公式に2位と3位にランクインしました。', 'zh': '本文述我SemEval-2019 Task 12提交科学地名解析提交。 练独NER之形,以取表格之文,与正文之本,以检其名,而练其辅模,以消其非。 除地名,用手工巧SVM分器。 最佳置地名检测子务中得严micro-F1分数80.92%,与micro-F1分数86.88%重叠,在F1分数8团队中第二。 除地名歧义及端至端决议,各正第二、第三。', 'ru': 'Этот документ описывает наше представление к Задаче SemEval-2019 12 на разрешении топонима над научными статьями. Мы обучаем отдельные модели NER для определения топонима по тексту, извлеченному из таблиц, по сравнению с текстом из основной части статьи, и обучаем другую вспомогательную модель для устранения неправильно обнаруженных топонимов. Для расчленения топонима мы используем классификатор виртуальных машин защиты с ручными функциями. Лучшая установка достигла строгой оценки микро-F1 80,92% и перекрытия микро-F1 86,88% в подзадаче обнаружения топонима, заняв 2-е место из 8 команд по оценке F1. Для топонимической размытости и сквозного разрешения мы официально заняли 2-е и 3-е места соответственно.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर वैज्ञानिक लेखों पर toponym संकल्प पर SemEval-2019 कार्य 12 के लिए हमारे सबमिशन का वर्णन करता है। हम कागज के शरीर से टेबल बनाम पाठ से निकाले गए पाठ पर टोपोनीम का पता लगाने के लिए अलग एनईआर मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं, और गलत तरीके से पहचाने गए टोपोनिम्स को खत्म करने के लिए एक और सहायक मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं। Toponym disambiguation के लिए, हम हाथ से इंजीनियर सुविधाओं के साथ एक SVM क्लासिफायर का उपयोग करते हैं। सबसे अच्छी सेटिंग ने 80.92% का एक सख्त माइक्रो-एफ 1 स्कोर हासिल किया और टॉपोनिम डिटेक्शन सबटास्क में 86.88% के माइक्रो-एफ 1 स्कोर को ओवरलैप किया, जो एफ 1 स्कोर पर 8 टीमों में से दूसरे स्थान पर है। Toponym disambiguation और एंड-टू-एंड रिज़ॉल्यूशन के लिए, हमने आधिकारिक तौर पर क्रमशः 2 और 3 वें स्थान पर रखा।', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar ár n-aighneacht do Thasc 12 SemEval-2019 ar réiteach toponym thar ailt eolaíocha. Déanaimid oiliúint ar mhúnlaí NER ar leith chun barrainmneacha a bhrath thar théacs a bhaintear as táblaí vs. téacs ó chorp an pháipéir, agus cuirimid oiliúint ar mhúnla cúnta eile chun deireadh a chur le hainmainmneacha míbhraite. Chun dídhébhriú toponym a úsáid, úsáidimid aicmitheoir SVM le gnéithe innealtóireacht láimhe. Bhain an suíomh is fearr amach scór docht micrea-F1 de 80.92% agus scór micrea-F1 forluí de 86.88% san fhothasc braite toponym, ag rangú 2ú as 8 bhfoireann ar scór F1. Maidir le dídhébhriú toponym agus réiteach ceann go ceann, rinneamar 2ú agus 3ú, faoi seach, a rangú go hoifigiúil.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει την υποβολή μας στο έργο 12 για την επίλυση τοποωνύμων πάνω από επιστημονικά άρθρα. Εκπαιδεύουμε ξεχωριστά μοντέλα για την ανίχνευση τοπωνύμων πάνω από κείμενο που εξάγεται από πίνακες έναντι κειμένου από το σώμα του εγγράφου, και εκπαιδεύουμε ένα άλλο βοηθητικό μοντέλο για την εξάλειψη λανθασμένων τοπωνύμων. Για την αποσαφήνιση τοπωνύμων, χρησιμοποιούμε έναν ταξινομητή με χειροποίητα χαρακτηριστικά. Η καλύτερη ρύθμιση πέτυχε ένα αυστηρό σκορ μικρο-F1 80,92% και επικάλυψη μικρο-F1 σκορ 86,88% στην υπο-εργασία ανίχνευσης τοπωνύμων, κατατάσσοντας 2η από 8 ομάδες στο σκορ F1. Για την αποσαφήνιση τοπωνύμων και την τελική ανάλυση, κατατάξαμε επίσημα 2η και 3η αντίστοιχα.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a SemEval-2019 Task 12 című, tudományos cikkek toponímafelbontásáról szóló beadványunkat. Külön NER modelleket képezünk a toponímek felismerésére a táblázatokból kinyert szöveg és a papír testéből származó szöveg felett, és egy másik kiegészítő modellt képezünk a tévesen felismert toponímek kiküszöbölésére. A név egyértelműsítéséhez SVM osztályozót használunk kézzel tervezett funkciókkal. A legjobb beállítás 80,92%-os szigorú mikro-F1 pontszámot ért el, és 86,88%-os átfedést ért el a toponím felismerési részfeladatban, és 8 csapat közül a második helyezést ért el F1 pontszámon. A toponím egyértelműsítése és a végpontok közötti felbontás tekintetében hivatalosan a második és a harmadik helyen álltunk.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი ჩვენი სამუშაო-2019 სამუშაო დავამუშაობა სამუშაო-2019 სამუშაო 12 სამუშაო ტეპონიმის გარეშექმნა მეცნიერო ჩვენ განყოფილი NER მოდელები ტექსტის განახლებისთვის ტექსტის განახლებისთვის ტექსტის განახლებისთვის, რომელიც ტექსტის განახლებისთვის ტექსტის განახლებისთვის, და მეორე დახმარებელი მოდელი გა Name ყველაზე საუკეთესო პარამეტრები მიკრო-F1 წარმოდგენა 80,92% და მიკრო-F1 წარმოდგენა 86,88% წარმოდგენით, რომელიც F1 წარმოდგენით მეორე წარმოდგენით 8 წარმოდგენით. ტოპონიმური განამბიგუაცია და ბოლოდან დასრულებული განსხვავებაში, ჩვენ უფლებად მეორე და მესამე წინაწერებაში დავწერეთ.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive la nostra presentazione al SemEval-2019 Task 12 sulla risoluzione toponimica rispetto agli articoli scientifici. Alleniamo modelli NER separati per il rilevamento dei toponimi su testo estratto dalle tabelle rispetto al testo dal corpo della carta e addestriamo un altro modello ausiliario per eliminare toponimi mal rilevati. Per la disambiguazione del toponimo, utilizziamo un classificatore SVM con caratteristiche ingegnerizzate a mano. Il miglior setting ha ottenuto un severo punteggio micro-F1 dell'80,92% e una sovrapposizione di punteggio micro-F1 dell'86,88% nel sottotask di rilevamento toponimo, posizionandosi secondo su 8 squadre con il punteggio F1. Per la disambiguazione del toponimo e la risoluzione end-to-end, siamo ufficialmente classificati secondo e terzo, rispettivamente.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз біздің біздің бірінің бірінші жарым- 2019 жылы 12- тапсырманы ғылыми мақалалар туралы топонимді айырымызды таңдайды. Қағаздың денесінен кестелерден және мәтіннен таратылған тапонимді анықтау үшін NER үлгілерін бөліктеп, қайталап табылған топонимдерді алып тастау үшін басқа көмектесу үлгілерін үйренеміз. Топонимді өзгерту үшін, қол инженерлік мүмкіндіктерімен SVM классификаторын қолданамыз. Ең жақсы параметрлері 80, 92% деген микро- F1 деңгейіндегі жетілді және микро- F1 деңгейінде 86, 88% деңгейіндегі топонимді анықтау суретінде, F1 деңгейіндегі 8 топтардың 2- ші деңгейінде. Топонимді өзгерту және соңғы айырмашылығы үшін біз әдетте 2- мен 3- ші ретінде салыстық.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdinamas mūsų pranešimas SemEval-2019 12 uždaviniui dėl toponimo rezoliucijos dėl mokslinių straipsnių. Mes mokome atskirus NER modelius toponimų aptikimui virš teksto, ištraukto iš lentelių, palyginti su tekstu iš popieriaus kūno, ir mokome kitą pagalbinį model į pašalinti klaidingai aptiktus toponimus. Toponimo išskyrimui naudojame SVM klasifikatorių su rankiniu būdu. Geriausiame nustatyme buvo pasiektas griežtas 80,92 % mikro-F1 balas ir 86,88 % mikro-F1 balas toponimų aptikimo pakopoje, antrasis iš 8 komandų pagal F1 balas. Dėl toponimo nedviprasmiškumo ir galutinės rezoliucijos oficialiai priskiriame atitinkamai antrąjį ir trečiąjį rangus.', 'mk': 'Овој весник го опишува нашето поднесување на SemEval-2019 задача 12 за топонимска резолуција во врска со научните статии. Тренираме одделни НЕР модели за детекција на топоним преку текст изваден од таблички против текст од телото на хартијата, и тренираме друг помошник модел за елиминирање на лошо детектирани топоними. За раздвојување на топонимот, користиме СВМ класификатор со рачно инженерирани карактеристики. Најдоброто поставување постигна строга микро-Ф1 оценка од 80,92 отсто и прекривање микро-Ф1 оценка од 86,88 отсто во потпрашањето за детекција на топоними, рангирајќи се на вториот од 8 тимови на оценката Ф1. For toponym disambiguation and end-to-end resolution, we officially ranked 2nd and 3rd, respectively.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan penghantaran kita ke SemEval-2019 Tugas 12 tentang resolusi toponym atas artikel saintifik. Kami melatih model NER terpisah untuk pengesan toponym melalui teks yang dikeluarkan dari jadual vs. teks dari badan kertas, dan melatih model bantuan lain untuk menghapuskan toponym yang salah dikesan. Untuk nyahambiguasi toponym, kita gunakan klasifikasi SVM dengan ciri-ciri rekayasa tangan. Tetapan terbaik mencapai skor mikro-F1 ketat 80.92% dan skor mikro-F1 meliputi 86.88% dalam subtanya pengesan toponym, peringkat kedua daripada 8 pasukan pada skor F1. For toponym disambiguation and end-to-end resolution, we officially ranked 2nd and 3rd, respectively.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi s-sottomissjoni tagħna lil SemEval-2019 Task 12 dwar ir-riżoluzzjoni tat-toponimu fuq l-artikoli xjentifiċi. Aħna nħarrġu mudelli NER separati għall-individwazzjoni tat-toponimu fuq test estratt mit-tabelli vs. test mill-korp tal-karta, u nħarrġu mudell awżiljarju ieħor biex jeliminaw toponimi misjuba. Għad-diżambiguazzjoni tat-toponimu, aħna nużaw klassifikatur SVM b’karatteristiċi inġinerizzati bl-idejn. L-a ħjar setting kiseb punteġġ strett ta’ mikro-F1 ta’ 80.92% u punteġġ mikro-F1 ta’ 86.88% li jikkoinċidi fis-sotto-mistoqsija għall-individwazzjoni tat-toponimu, li kklassifika t-tieni minn tmien timijiet fuq il-punteġġ F1. Għad-diżambiguazzjoni tat-toponimu u r-riżoluzzjoni minn tarf sa tarf, aħna uffiċjalment ikklassifikajna t-tieni u t-tielet, rispettivament.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ശാസ്ത്രജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ കല്ലുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ശാസ്ത്രജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ വിശദീകരണത്തെക്കുറിച്ച്  പേപ്പറിന്റെ ശരീരത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ടേബിളില്\u200d നിന്നും ടെക്സ്റ്റേറ്റില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ടോപ്പോണിമി ടോപ്പോണിമിന്റെ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു SVM ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫയര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. കൈയ്യില്\u200d എഞ്ച ഏറ്റവും നല്ല സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d 80. 92% സ്കോരിന്റെ കഠിനമായ മൈക്രോ- F1 സ്കോര്\u200d എത്തി. എഫ്1 സ്കോരില്\u200d മൈക്രോ- F1 സ്കോര്\u200d 86. 88% സ്കോര്\u200d മാറ്റുകയും ചെയ്തു. ടോപോണിമിന്റെ അസാധാരണയും അവസാനത്തിന്റെ അവസാനത്തിനും വേണ്ടിയാണ് നമ്മള്\u200d ആധികാരികമായി രണ്ടാമത്തേതും മൂന്നാമത്', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver vår tilføring til semiEval-2019 oppgåve 12 om toponymsløysing over vitenskapelige artiklar. We train separate NER models for toponym detection over text extracted from tables vs. text from the body of the paper, and train another help model to eliminate misdetected toponyms. For toponymsk disambiguasjon bruker vi ein SVM- klassifisering med handingeniar funksjonar. Den beste innstillinga har oppnådd ein streng mikro- F1- poeng med 80, 92% og overlapp mikro- F1- poeng med 86, 88% i underspørjinga for toponym- oppdaging, som rangerer 2 av 8 grupper på F1- poeng. For toponymsk disambiguasjon og sluttoppløysing, har vi offisielt sett opp andre og tredje.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje naszą zgłoszenie do SemEval-2019 Zadania 12 dotyczące rozwiązywania toponimów nad artykułami naukowymi. Trenujemy oddzielne modele NER do wykrywania toponimów nad tekstem ekstrahowanym z tabel a tekstem z treści tekstu oraz szkolimy inny model pomocniczy w celu wyeliminowania błędnie wykrytych toponimów. W celu wyjaśnienia toponimów używamy klasyfikatora SVM z ręcznie inżynierowanymi funkcjami. Najlepsze ustawienia osiągnęły ścisły wynik mikro-F1 80,92% i nakładający się na siebie wynik mikro-F1 86,88% w podzadaniu wykrywania toponimów, rankingując drugą z ośmiu drużyn na wyniku F1. Dla rozdzielczości toponimów i rozdzielczości od końca do końca oficjalnie zaliczyliśmy odpowiednio drugą i trzecią rangę.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie prezentarea noastră la SemEval-2019 Task 12 privind rezoluția toponimelor peste articolele științifice. Instruim modele NER separate pentru detectarea toponimelor peste textul extras din tabele vs. text din corpul hârtiei și instruim un alt model auxiliar pentru a elimina toponimele detectate greșit. Pentru dezambiguizarea toponimelor, folosim un clasificator SVM cu caracteristici manuale. Cea mai bună setare a obținut un scor micro-F1 strict de 80,92% și un scor micro-F1 suprapus de 86,88% în subactivitatea detectării toponimului, clasându-se pe locul 2 din 8 echipe pe scorul F1. Pentru dezambiguizarea toponimelor și rezoluția end-to-end, ne-am clasat oficial pe locul 2 și respectiv 3.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje našu predanost zadatku 12 za toponim o naučnim člancima. Treniramo odvojene modele NER za toponim detekciju preko teksta izvedenog od stolova protiv teksta iz tijela papira i treniramo još jedan pomoæni model da eliminiše pogrešno detektivne toponime. Za toponim disambiguaciju, koristimo SVM klasifikatora sa rukom-inženjerskim karakteristikama. Najbolji nastav je postigao striktni mikro-F1 rezultat od 80,92% i preklapao mikro-F1 rezultat od 86,88% u podpitanju otkrivanja toponima, ranking 2 out of 8 teams on F1 score. Za disambiguaciju toponima i rezoluciju kraja do kraja, službeno smo postigli drugo i treće redove.', 'so': "Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran warqaddayada loo soo dhiibay SemEval-2019 shaqo 12 oo ku saabsan go'aanka sayniska qoraalka cilmiga ah. Waxaannu tababarinnaa tusaalaha NER oo kala duduwan si loo garto toponimada looga soo saaray looxyada ka soo saaray qoraalka vs. text ee warqadda ka soo baxay jidhkiisa, waxaana ku tababarinnaa qaab kale oo ku habboon si aan u elino jaamacadaha la xaqiijiyey. Si aan u baahnaanno, waxaynu u isticmaalnaa fasax SVM ah oo gacanta-engineered. Xafiiska ugu wanaagsan wuxuu gaadhay koox adag oo 80.92 boqolkiiba iyo koox madow-F1 oo ku qoran 86.88 boqolkiiba jaamacadda, wuxuuna ka mid ahaa labaad oo ka mid ah 8 kooxda F1. Si aan u kala soocno iyo go'aanka ugu dhamaadka, si rasmi ah ayaannu u kala soocaynaa laba iyo saddexaad.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver vårt bidrag till SemEval-2019 Task 12 om toponym upplösning över vetenskapliga artiklar. Vi tränar separata NER-modeller för toponym detektering över text extraherad från tabeller jämfört med text från papperets kropp, och tränar en annan hjälpmodell för att eliminera felupptäckta toponymer. För toponym disambiguation använder vi en SVM-klassificerare med handgjorda funktioner. Den bästa inställningen uppnådde en strikt mikro-F1-poäng på 80,92% och överlappning mikro-F1-poäng på 86,88% i toponym detektering subaktivitet, rankad 2:a av 8 lag på F1-poäng. För toponym disambiguation och end-to-end upplösning rankade vi officiellt 2:a respektive 3:e.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපේ සම්වේල්-2019 කාර්ය 12 විශ්වාසික පිළිබඳ විශ්වාසික පිළිබඳ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශ අපි පත්තරේ ශරීරයෙන් පැත්තක් වලින් පැත්තක් වලින් පැත්තක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන් NER මොඩේල්ස් වෙනුවෙන් පැහැදිලි කරනවා ටොපෝනිම් නිර්මාණය සඳහා, අපි අත් ඉංජිනියාර්ජියාර් වලින් SVM විශේෂකයක් භාවිත කරන්නේ. හොඳම සැකසුම් වෙනුවෙන් 80.92% මයික්රෝ-F1 ස්කෝර් එකක් ලැබුණා, මායික්\u200dරෝ-F1 ස්කෝර් එකක් 86.88% විතරයි තොපෝනිම් පරීක්ෂණය සබ්පූර්ණයෙන්,  ටොපෝනිම් විශ්වාසය සහ අවසාන විශ්වාසයෙන් අවසාන විශ්වාසයෙන්, අපි සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසයෙන් දෙවෙනි', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் செம்Eval-2019 செயல் 12 விளக்கம் அறிவியல் கட்டுரைகள் மீது தெளிவுத்திறன் பற்றி தெளிவுத்திறன் பற்றி எங்கள்  நாம் தாளின் உடலிலிருந்து வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட உரையில் இருந்து வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட உரைக்கு மேல் வேறு NER மாதிரிகளை பயிற்சி செய்து, மற்றொரு தேவை நாம் ஒரு SVM வகுப்பாளரை கையில் பொறித்த தன்மைகளுடன் பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். சிறந்த அமைப்புகள் 80. 92% க்கு கடினமான சிறிய- F1 புள்ளியை அடைந்தது மற்றும் 86. 88% மேலே கண்டுபிடிப்பு துணை பணியில் மைக்ரோ F1 புள்ளியில் இருந்து இரண்டாவத தொப்புப் பிரிப்பு மற்றும் முடிவு தெளிவுத்திறனுக்கு, நாங்கள் அலுவலகமாக 2வது மற்றும் 3வது வரிசையில் உள்ளோம்.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бидний SemEval-2019-ийн ажил 12-д шинжлэх ухааны баримтуудын тухай топоним шийдвэрлэлийг тайлбарладаг. Бид цаасан биеэс гарсан хүснэгт эсвэл текст дээр топоним нээлтийн загварын тулд NER загварын загварыг суралцаж буруу нээлттэй топонимыг устгах боломжтой. Топоним хэсгүүдийн хувьд бид гар инженерчлэлтэй SVM классификаторыг ашиглаж байна. Хамгийн сайн тохиромжтой нь 80.92% жижиг бичил F1 оноо олж, бичил F1 оноо 86.88% нь топонимын нээлттэй хоёр баг F1 оноо дээр нэмэгдсэн. Топонимын хувьсгал, төгсгөлийн шийдвэрлэлд бид ерөнхийдөө 2, 3-р ангид байлаа.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ہماری سفارش SemEval-2019 ٹاکس 12 کے ذریعہ سفارش کرتا ہے جو علمی مقررہ کے بارے میں ٹوپونیم ریزیزول پر ہے. ہم نے کاغذ کے جسم سے ٹیبل اور ٹیبل سے نکالے ہوئے ٹیبل کے مقابلہ میں ٹیبل کی تلاش کے لئے NER موڈل کو ٹرین کریں اور ایک دوسرے مددگار موڈل کو ٹرین کریں۔ ٹوپونیم نامبیوجیٹ کے لئے، ہم ایک SVM کلاسیر کو ہاتھ انجینر کے متعلق استعمال کرتے ہیں. سب سے بہترین تنظیم نے 80.92% کی ایک مکروفونیم F1 اسکور کو پہنچایا اور 86.88% کی مکروفونیم شناسایی زیب سپورٹ میں دو ٹیموں میں سے 8 ٹیموں میں دوسری رانڈ کی۔ ٹوپونیم نامبوغ اور پایان کے رسولوں کے لئے ہم رسمی طور پر دوسرے اور تیسرے درجے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Bu sahifa esa SemEval-2019 Vazifaning 12 muammolari bilan ilmiy maqola haqida topiy oʻzgarishni anglatadi. Biz sahifadagi jadvaldan tashqarilgan matnni o'rganish uchun alohida NER modellarini o'rganamiz va qogʻozning tanasidan matnni o'rganish uchun boshqa tizim modelini o'rganamiz, xato o o'zgartirilgan toponimni olib tashlash uchun. Tonomni ajratish uchun, biz қўл-engineered xususiyatlar bilan SVM darajasini foydalanamiz. Eng eng yaxshi moslamalar F1 pochta 80.92% darajadagi katta mikro-F1 scori topilmadi va 86.88% toponym aniqlash sub- vazifasida 86.88% yuklangan va F1 scorida 8 guruhdan ikkinchi darajada yuqori. Tonomni ajratish va oxirigi oʻlchami uchun, biz rasm bilan ikkinchi va 3- chi darajada.", 'vi': 'Bài viết này mô tả việc chúng tôi quy phục Nhiệm vụ SemEvl-thẩm 9 12 về độ phân giải địa hình hơn các báo cáo khoa học. Chúng tôi đào tạo các mô- đun số người máy để phát hiện địa hình qua các chữ trích từ các bàn với chữ từ các phần thân tờ giấy, và huấn luyện một kiểu phụ khác để loại bỏ các địa hình bị lỗi. Để phân dạng địa hình, chúng tôi dùng loại phân loại SVM có tính năng được ghép bằng tay. Cách thiết lập tốt nhất đạt được tỉ số vi-F1 nghiêm ngặt của 80.92. và chồng chéo vi-F1 ghi số 86.88=. trong mật mã phát hiện địa hình, thứ hai ra khỏi 8 với điểm F1. Để phân dạng địa hình và kết thúc giải quyết, chúng tôi chính thức xếp hạng thứ hai và thứ ba.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва нашето представяне на задача 12 за резолюция на топонимите върху научни статии. Обучаваме отделни модели за откриване на топоними върху текст, извлечен от таблици, спрямо текст от тялото на хартията, и обучаваме друг помощен модел, за да елиминираме неправилно откритите топоними. За разграничаване на топонимите използваме класификатор с ръчно проектирани функции. Най-добрата настройка постигна строг микро-F1 резултат от 80.92% и припокриващ микро-F1 резултат от 86.88% в подзадачата за откриване на топоними, класирайки се на второ място от 8 отбора по Формула 1. За разграничение на топонимите и резолюция от край до край официално се класирахме съответно на второ и трето място.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft onze inzending aan SemEval-2019 Taak 12 over toponiem resolutie over wetenschappelijke artikelen. We trainen afzonderlijke NER-modellen voor toponiemdetectie over tekst geëxtraheerd uit tabellen versus tekst uit de tekst van het document, en trainen een ander hulpmodel om verkeerd gedetecteerde toponiemen te elimineren. Voor de aanduiding van toponiemen gebruiken we een SVM-classificator met hand-engineered functies. De beste setting behaalde een strikte micro-F1 score van 80,92% en overlappende micro-F1 score van 86,88% in de toponiemdetectie subtaak, waardoor 2e van de 8 teams op F1 score werd geplaatst. Voor toponiem disambiguation en end-to-end resolutie hebben we officieel respectievelijk 2e en 3e rangschikt.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver vores indsendelse til SemEval-2019 Opgave 12 om toponym opløsning over videnskabelige artikler. Vi træner separate NER modeller til toponym detektering over tekst udvundet fra tabeller vs. tekst fra papirets brødtekst, og træner en anden hjælpemodel til at fjerne misregistrerede toponymer. Til toponymforskydning bruger vi en SVM-klassificering med håndlavede funktioner. Den bedste indstilling opnåede en streng mikro-F1 score på 80,92% og overlap mikro-F1 score på 86,88% i toponym detektion underaktivitet, placeret 2. ud af 8 hold på F1 score. For toponymforståelse og end-to-end opløsning rangerede vi officielt henholdsvis 2. og 3. plads.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje naše podnošenje zadatku 12 na toponima o znanstvenim člancima. Vježbamo odvojene modele NER-a za otkrivanje toponima preko teksta izvedenog iz tablica protiv teksta iz tijela papira i treniramo još jedan pomoćni model kako bi eliminirali pogrešno otkrivene toponime. Za disambiguaciju toponima, koristimo SVM klasifikatora s rukom-inženjerskim karakteristikama. Najbolji nastav postigao je striktni mikro-F1 rezultat od 80,92% i preklapao mikro-F1 rezultat od 86,88% u podpitanju otkrivanja toponima, ranking 2 out of 8 teams on F1 score. Za disambiguaciju toponima i rezoluciju kraja do kraja, službeno smo postigli drugo i treće redove.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag beschreibt unsere Einreichung an SemEval-2019 Task 12 zur Toponymauflösung über wissenschaftliche Artikel. Wir trainieren getrennte NER-Modelle für die Toponymerkennung über Text, der aus Tabellen extrahiert wird, und trainieren ein weiteres Hilfsmodell, um falsch erkannte Toponyme zu eliminieren. Zur Begriffsklärung verwenden wir einen SVM-Klassifikator mit handgefertigten Merkmalen. Die beste Einstellung erzielte einen strengen Mikro-F1-Score von 80,92% und einen überlappenden Mikro-F1-Score von 86,88% in der Toponymerkennung Subtask und rangierte Zweiter von 8 Teams auf F1-Score. Für die Begriffsklärung und die Ende-zu-Ende-Auflösung wurden wir offiziell Zweiter bzw. Dritter.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menjelaskan pengiriman kita ke SemEval-2019 Tugas 12 tentang resolusi toponym atas artikel ilmiah. We train separate NER models for toponym detection over text extracted from tables vs. text from the body of the paper, and train another auxiliary model to eliminate misdetected toponyms.  Untuk memadamkan toponym, kami menggunakan klasifikasi SVM dengan ciri-ciri rekayasa tangan. Seting terbaik mencapai skor mikro-F1 yang ketat 80,92% dan skor mikro-F1 yang meliputi 86,88% dalam subtask deteksi toponym, kedua dari 8 tim pada skor F1. Untuk tidak ambiguasi toponym dan resolusi akhir-akhir, kami secara resmi berturut-turut kedua dan ketiga, respektif.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ تسلیم کردن ما به پایین سال ۲۰۱۹ وظیفه ۱۲ در مورد حل توپونیم بر روی مقاله های علمی توصیف می\u200cکند. ما مدل NER را برای شناسایی توپونیم بر روی متن که از میز و متن خارج شده از بدن کاغذ می\u200cکنیم و مدل دیگر کمک\u200cکننده را آموزش می\u200cدهیم تا توپونیم\u200cهای اشتباهی شناسایی کند. برای تغییر آزمایش توپونیم، ما از یک کلیسای SVM با ویژگی\u200cهای دستی استفاده می\u200cکنیم. بهترین تنظیمات یک امتیاز محکم mikro-F1 از 80.92 درصد به دست آورد و امتیاز mikro-F1 از 86.88 درصد در پایتپوست شناسایی توپونیم، درجه ۲ از ۸ تیم در امتیاز F1 به دست آورد. برای تغییر تغییر تغییر توپونیم و تغییر تغییر پایان، ما رسمی به عنوان درجه دوم و سوم درجه رسمی بودیم.', 'ko': '본고는SemEval-2019 미션12에 제출한 과학 논문의 지명 해석에 관한 보고서를 묘사한다.우리는 표에서 추출한 텍스트와 본문에서 추출한 텍스트를 대상으로 지명 검출에 사용되는 NER 모델을 각각 훈련하고 오류 검출의 지명을 없애기 위한 또 다른 보조 모델을 훈련합니다.지명 이의를 없애기 위해 인공적인 특징을 가진 SVM 분류기를 사용했다.최적 설정은 지명 검출 서브미션에서 엄격한 마이크로-F1 점수 80.92%, 중첩 마이크로-F1 점수 86.88%를 받아 8개 구단 F1 점수 중 2위에 올랐다.지명 소멸과 끝에서 끝까지의 해석에 있어서 우리는 각각 정식으로 2위와 3위를 차지했다.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea ujumbe wetu wa SemEval-2019 kazi 12 kuhusu suluhisho la mada juu ya makala za kisayansi. Tunafundisha mifano tofauti ya NER kwa ajili ya kutambua utambuzi wa mada juu ya maandishi yaliyotolewa kutoka kwenye meza na ujumbe wa maandishi kutoka mwili wa gazeti, na kufundisha mtindo mwingine wa ushirikiano ili kuondoa mada isiyogunduliwa. For toponym disambiguation, we use an SVM classifier with hand-engineered features.  Mpango bora zaidi ulifikia score ndogo ya F1 yenye asilimia 80.92 na kupunguza vipimo vya micro-F1 kwa asilimia 86.88 katika jukumu la kutambua mada, lililokuwa na rangi ya pili kati ya timu 8 kwenye score ya F1. Kwa utatuzi wa kutofautisha mada na mwisho wa mwisho, tumekuwa na rangi rasmi ya pili na ya tatu.', 'tr': "Bu kağıt, SemEval-2019'a teslim edildiğimizi bilim makamlar hakkında toponym çözümlerini tarif ediyor. Biz toponym tanyşynyň üstünde täblisden garşylanan metin üçin NER modellerini aýryp süýşirdik we ýalňyş tanyş toponymlary ýitirmek üçin başga bir kömek modi trendiris. Toponymlar aýlamak üçin elimizden inženjeredilen çykyşlar bilen SVM klasifikatçysyny ulanýarys. Iň gowy düzümler mikro-F1 puntuasynda 80,92% we mikro-F1 puntuasynda 86,88% toponym deteksiýasynyň alt soragynda 2-nji we 8 toparda F1 puntuasynda ýeňdi. Toponymlar küçümsemek we soňunda çözümlenmek üçin resmi olarak 2-nji we 3-nji derejä dereje girdik.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument përshkruan paraqitjen tonë në SemEval-2019 Task 12 mbi zgjidhjen e toponimit mbi artikujt shkencore. We train separate NER models for toponym detection over text extracted from tables vs. text from the body of the paper, and train another auxiliary model to eliminate misdetected toponyms.  Për çambiguacionin e toponimit, ne përdorim një klasifikues SVM me karakteristika të inxhinieruara me dorë. Vendimi më i mirë arriti një pikë të rreptë mikro-F1 prej 80.92% dhe pikë të mbishtypur mikro-F1 prej 86.88% në nënpyetjen e zbulimit të toponimit, duke renditur të dytën nga 8 ekipe në pikën F1. Për çambiguacionin e toponimit dhe zgjidhjen e fundit në fund, ne u renditëm zyrtarisht respektivisht të dytin dhe të tretin.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ለሴmEval-2019 ስራ 12 ላይ የሳይንቀሳዊ ጽሑፎችን ማስታወቂያ ላይ አዋጅ ይናገራል፡፡ ከገጽ አካል ጽሑፎችን ለሚወስደው ጽሑፎችን ለቶሎኒም ማግኘት የተለየውን NER ሞዴላዎችን እናስተምራለን እና የተሳሳተውን ተሟጋቾችን ለማጥፋት ሌላን አካል ሞዴል እናስተምራለን፡፡ ለቶሎኒም ግንኙነት፣ የSVM ክፍላፊ እጆችን-engineered ፍላጎች እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ ትልቅ ምርጫዎች የ80.92 በመቶ ጥሩ ሚክሮአ-F1 score አግኝቷል፤ በትቶኖም አዲስ መስኮት ላይ 86.88 በመቶ ክፈት ይጨመር ነበር፤ የስምንት ደረጃዎች F1 score ላይ 2 እጥፍ ነው። ለቶሎኒም ግንኙነት እና የመጨረሻ ፍጻሜ ውሳኔ፣ ባለሥልጣን ሁለተኛ እና ሦስተኛ ተለይተናል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է մեր ներկայացումը "ՍեմԵվալ 2019"-ի 12-ի Թոպոնիմների լուծումների մասին գիտական հոդվածների վերաբերյալ: Մենք պատրաստում ենք առանձին ՆԵՌ մոդելներ թոպոնիմների հայտնաբերման համար աղյուսակներից հանված տեքստի վրա, համեմատած տեքստին թղթի մարմնից, և պատրաստում ենք մեկ այլ օգնական մոդել սխալ հայտնաբերված թոպոնիմների վերացման համար: Թոպոնիմների բացատրելու համար մենք օգտագործում ենք ՁԻԱՀ դասակարգիչ, որը ունի ձեռքի ճարտարագիտական հատկություններ: The best setting achieved a strict micro-F1 score of 80.92% and overlap micro-F1 score of 86.88% in the toponym detection subtask, ranking 2nd out of 8 teams on F1 score.  Թոպոնիմների բացատրության և վերջ-վերջ լուծումների համար, մենք պաշտոնապես դասակարգեցինք 2-րդ և 3-րդ դասակարգերը:', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe ons onderskrywing na SemEval-2019 Opdrag 12 oor toponime oplossing oor wetenskaplike artikels. Ons trein skeidige NER modele vir toponime beskrywing oor teks uitgevoer van tabelle teen teks van die liggaam van die papier, en trein 'n ander hulpbordmodel om misbeskikbaar toponime te elimineer. Vir toponime disambiguasie gebruik ons 'n SVM klassifiseerder met hand- engineered funksies. Die beste instelling het 'n streng mikro- F1 skaal van 80. 92% en oorskryf mikro- F1 skaal van 86. 88% in die toponime opskrywing onderskrywing, ranking 2de uit 8 teams op F1 skaal. Vir toponime-disambiguasie en einde-tot-einde-oplossing, ons het offisieel die tweede en derde rangeer, respektief.", 'az': 'Bu kağıt bizim SemEval-2019 Göndərdiyimizi bilimsel maddələr barəsində toponym çözünürlüyünü təsdiqləyir. Kağıt bedindən çıxarılan mətn üstündə toponym keşif üçün NER modellərini təhsil edirik və yanlış keşif toponymları silmək üçün başqa bir yardımçı modeli təhsil edirik. Toponym müəllifəsinə görə, əl inženjerləndirilmiş özelliklərlə SVM klasifikatorunu kullanırıq. Ən yaxşı qurğular 80,92% mikro-F1 dərəcəsini qəbul etdi və mikro-F1 dərəcəsinin 86,88% dərəcəsini toponym tanıdırması altı dərəcəsini qəbul etdi, F1 dərəcəsinin 2-indən 8 dərəcəsini qəbul etdi. Toponim disambiguasyonu və sona qədər çəkilməsi üçün, resmi olaraq 2-ci və 3-ci dərəcə düzəldik.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি বিজ্ঞানিক প্রবন্ধের বিষয়ে বিষয়বস্তুর বিষয়ে আমাদের সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের কাজ ১২ টাকায় প্ টেবিল থেকে টেক্সট বিভিন্ন টেক্সট থেকে বের করা টেক্সট থেকে প্রকাশিত লেখার জন্য আমরা বিভিন্ন NER মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণ করি এবং ভুল আবিষ্কার কর টপোনিমের বিভ্রান্তির জন্য আমরা একটি SVM ব্যবহার করি হাত-ইঞ্জিনিয়ারের বৈশিষ্ট্য দিয়ে। সবচেয়ে ভালো সেটিং ৮০. ৯২% মাইক্রো-এফ১ স্কোর অর্জন করেছে এবং এফ১ স্কোরে ৮৬. ৮৮% মাইক্রো-এফ১ স্কোরের স্কোর আপ করেছে, যার মধ্যে ৮ টি দলের মধ্যে দ্ব টপোনিয়ামের বিচ্ছিন্ন এবং শেষ সিদ্ধান্তের জন্য আমরা আনুষ্ঠানিকভাবে দ্বিতীয় এবং তৃতীয় বিভিন্ন ভাগ করেছি।', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje našu predanost zadatku 12 za toponim o naučnim članicama. Treniramo odvojene modele NER-a za otkrivanje toponima preko teksta izvedenog iz tablica protiv teksta iz tijela papira i treniramo još jedan pomoćni model da eliminiše pogrešno otkrivene toponime. Za disambiguaciju toponima, koristimo SVM klasifikatora sa rukom-inženjerskim karakteristikama. Najbolji nastav postigao je striktni mikro-F1 rezultat od 80,92% i preklapao mikro-F1 rezultat od 86,88% u podpitanju toponima detekcije, ranking 2 out of 8 teams on F1 score. Za disambiguaciju toponima i rezoluciju kraja do kraja, zvanično smo postigli drugo i treće redove.', 'ca': "Aquest paper descriu la nostra presentació a SemEval-2019 Task 12 sobre resolució de toponyms sobre articles científics. We train separate NER models for toponym detection over text extracted from tables vs. text from the body of the paper, and train another auxiliary model to eliminate misdetected toponyms.  Per desambiguar el toponyme, utilitzem un classificador SVM amb característiques enginyeries manuals. La millor configuració va aconseguir una puntuació estricta de micro-F1 del 80,92% i una superposició de puntuació de micro-F1 del 86,88% en la subterrània de detecció de toponyms, classificant-se en 2 d'8 equips en la puntuació de F1. Per la desambiguació del toponym i la resolució de final a final, oficialment vam classificar-nos en segon i tercer llocs, respectivament.", 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje náš příspěvek k SemEval-2019 Task 12 na řešení toponymů nad vědeckými články. Trénujeme samostatné NER modely pro detekci toponymů nad textem extrahovaným z tabulek versus textem z těla článku a trénujeme další pomocný model pro eliminaci chybně detekovaných toponymů. Pro rozcestnění toponymu používáme klasifikátor SVM s ručně vytvořenými funkcemi. Nejlepší nastavení dosáhlo přísného skóre mikro-F1 80,92% a překrývajícího se skóre mikro-F1 86,88% v podúkolu detekce toponymů, což umístění druhého z osmi týmů na F1 skóre. Pro rozšíření toponymů a rozlišení od konce k konci jsme oficiálně zařadili druhé a třetí.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis kirjeldatakse meie esitamist SemEval-2019 ülesanne 12 toponüümi resolutsiooni üle teaduslike artiklite. Koolitame eraldi NER-mudeleid toponüümide tuvastamiseks tabelitest ekstraheeritud teksti võrreldes paberi põhitekstiga ning koolitame teist abimudelit valetuvastatud toponüümide kõrvaldamiseks. Toponüümide selgitamiseks kasutame käsitsi projekteeritud funktsioonidega SVM klassifikaatorit. Parim seade saavutas range mikro-F1 skoor 80,92% ja kattuv mikro-F1 skoor 86,88% toponüümide tuvastamise alamülesandes, mis oli teisel kohal 8 meeskonnast F1 skoori. Toponüümide eristamise ja otsast otsani resolutsiooni osas olime ametlikult 2. ja 3. kohal.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan julkaisumme SemEval-2019 Task 12 on toponyymien resoluutio yli tieteellisten artikkelien. Harjoittelemme erillisiä NER-malleja toponyymien havaitsemiseen taulukoista poimitun tekstin ja paperin rungosta tulevan tekstin sijaan ja toista apumallia virheellisten toponyymien poistamiseksi. Toponyymien erotteluun käytämme SVM-luokitusta käsin suunnitelluilla ominaisuuksilla. Paras asetus saavutti tiukan mikro-F1 pisteen 80,92% ja päällekkäisen mikro-F1 pisteen 86,88% toponyymien tunnistuksen alatehtävässä, sijoittuen toiseksi kahdeksasta joukkueesta F1-pisteissä. Toponyymien erottelussa ja päästä päähän resoluutiossa olimme virallisesti 2. ja 3. sijalla.', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé iki rambaran nggawe tresnané sampek kang semebal-2011 task 12 banjur Resolusi sing paling nggambar barang saiki urip. Awak dhéwé luwih menyang paling-iwaké ngéwé alat manut sing nyebuté " section Ndoleh sing paling nggawe kelas Strict mikro-F1 Puntuan sing wis rak asat, ambem nggawe mikro-F1 puntuan sing wis rak asat, wis rak cara-cara nggawe jintuan, terus wis rak tanga sekondiki sing wis rak sekondirno F1 puntuan Ngawe Periboni kanggo ngilanggar-periboni kanggo ngilanggar-periboni tambah karo ngon ukuhaan-periboni sing ditambah tanggal 2 lan 3.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מתאר את ההעברה שלנו לסימוול-2019 משימה 12 על פיתרון טופונים על מאמרים מדעיים. We train separate NER models for toponym detection over text extracted from tables vs. text from the body of the paper, and train another auxiliary model to eliminate misdetected toponyms.  כדי לנתק את הטופונים, אנו משתמשים בכיתון SVM עם תכונות מהנדסה יד. התקנה הטובה ביותר השיגה נקודת מיקרו-F1 קשה של 80.92% ותקפלה נקודת מיקרו-F1 של 86.88% בתשומת זיהוי הטופונים, מדרגה שנייה מתוך 8 קבוצות על נקודת F1. עבור הפרעה של טופונים ופתרון של סוף עד סוף, רשמית הגענו לשנייה ושלישית, בהתאם.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na bayyana ma'ishinmu zuwa Semeval-2019 a kan aikin na toponim da takardar da masu sayansi. Tuna kõre misãlai masu tsari na NER wa domin gane toponim da aka nuna matsayin da aka nuna daga abun versa matsayin kowacan takardar, kuma Mu kõre wani misalin mataimaki na daban dõmin ya cire toponim wanda ba'a gane ba. Babu yin gaurawa ga toponim, za'a yi amfani da mai SvM mai fassarar da wasu misãlai da aka samar da hannun-bakin. Tsarin da mafi kyaun ya isa wani nau'i mai tsanani na micro-F1 na 80.92% kuma ya rufe nau'in micro-F1 na 86.88% cikin sub-aikin maɓallin toponim, mai randin 2 na cikin jama'a 8 na F1 score. Ga raba-ɓangan toponim da rabo-ƙari, za'a rasmi rana rasmi na biyu da na uku.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje našo predložitev v nalogo 12 SemEval-2019 o resoluciji toponimov nad znanstvenimi članki. Usposabljamo ločene modele NER za zaznavanje toponimov nad besedilom, pridobljenim iz tabel v primerjavi z besedilom iz telesa papirja, in usposabljamo drug pomožni model za odpravo napačno zaznanih toponimov. Za razjasnitev toponimov uporabljamo SVM klasifikator z ročno izdelanimi funkcijami. Najboljša postavitev je dosegla strogo mikro-F1 rezultat 80,92% in prekrivanje mikro-F1 rezultata 86,88% v podnalogi za detekcijo toponimov, kar je uvrstilo 2. izmed 8 ekip na F1 rezultatih. Za razjasnitev toponimov in ločljivost od konca do konca smo uradno uvrstili 2. oziroma 3. mesto.', 'bo': 'ཤོག We train separate NER models for toponym detection over text extracted from tables vs. text from the body of the paper, and train another auxiliary model to eliminate misdetected toponyms. To toponym disambiguation, we use an SVM classifier with hand-engineered features. The best setting achieved a strict micro-F1 score of 80.92% and overlap micro-F1 score of 86.88% in the toponym detection subtask, ranking 2nd out of 8 teams on F1 score. ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཞིག་གམ་འགྱུར་བ་དང་མཐའ་མཇུག་མཇུག་གི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'University of Arizona at SemEval-2019 Task 12 : Deep-Affix Named Entity Recognition of Geolocation Entities', 'pt': 'Universidade do Arizona em SemEval-2019 Tarefa 12: Reconhecimento de Entidade Nomeada com Afixo Profundo de Entidades de Geolocalização', 'es': 'Tarea 12 de la Universidad de Arizona en SemEval-2019: Reconocimiento de entidades nombradas con afijo profundo de entidades de geolocalización', 'ar': 'جامعة أريزونا في SemEval-2019 المهمة 12: التعرف على الكيان المُسمّى ذي الملصق العميق لكيانات تحديد الموقع الجغرافي', 'fr': "Université de l'Arizona à SEMEVAL-2019 Tâche 12\xa0: Reconnaissance d'entités nommées en affixe profond des entités de géolocalisation", 'ja': 'アリゾナ大学のSemEval -2019 Task 12: Deep - Affix Named Entity Recognition of Geolocation Entities', 'zh': '亚利桑那大学SemEval-2019务12:地理之深词缀名曰实体', 'hi': 'SemEval-2019 कार्य 12 में एरिजोना विश्वविद्यालय: डीप-चिपकाने नामित इकाई Geolocation संस्थाओं की मान्यता', 'ru': 'Университет Аризоны на SemEval-2019 Задача 12: Deep-Affix Именованное распознавание сущностей геолокации', 'ga': "Ollscoil Arizona ag SemEval-2019 Tasc 12: Aitheantas Aonán Ainmnithe Deep-Affix d'Eintitis Geolocation", 'ka': 'არიზონას სუნივერსიტი SemEval-2019 დავალება 12: დიდი-აფფრიქტის სახელ ინტერტის გეოლოკაციის განახლება', 'el': 'Πανεπιστήμιο της Αριζόνα στο Εργασία 12: Αναγνώριση Οντότητας Βαθύ Προσέγγισης Οντότητας Οντότητας Γεωεντοπισμού', 'hu': 'Arizona Egyetem a SemEval-2019 feladat 12: Földrajzi helymeghatározási szervezetek mélypontos megnevezésű entitásainak elismerése', 'it': "Università dell'Arizona a SemEval-2019 Task 12: Deep-Affix Named Entity Recognition of Geolocation Entities", 'kk': 'Аризона университеті 2019 жылдың жарым- бағандағы 12- тапсырма: Географиялық орны нысандарының түсініктемесі', 'ms': 'University of Arizona at SemEval-2019 Task 12: Deep-Affix Named Entity Recognition of Geolocation Entities', 'ml': 'സെമ്എവാല്\u200d- 2019 ടാസ്ക് 12: ഡീപ്- ആഫിക്ക് പേരിട്ട എന്റിറ്റിയുടെ പേരുള്ള എന്റിറ്റി അറിയിപ്പുകള്\u200d', 'lt': 'University of Arizona at SemEval-2019 Task 12: Deep-Affix Named Entity Recognition of Geolocation Entities', 'mk': 'Универзитетот во Аризона на SemEval-2019 задача 12: Длабоко признавање на ентитетите наречени Deep-Affix', 'mt': 'L-Università tal-Arizona f’SemEval-2019 Kompitu 12: Rikonoxximent ta’ Entità Ismija b’Affiċ Profond ta’ Entitajiet ta’ Ġeolokazzjoni', 'mn': 'Аризоны Их Сургууль 2019 оны SemEval-2019 ажил 12: Гүн гүнзгий-Affix Named Entity Recognition of Geolocation Entities', 'no': 'Universiteten av Arizona på semiEval-2019 Oppgåve 12: Deep-Affix Named Entity Recognition of Geolocation Entities', 'ro': 'Universitatea din Arizona la SemEval-2019 Sarcina 12: Recunoașterea entităților cu denumire profundă a entităților de geolocalizare', 'pl': 'Uniwersytet Arizony w SemEval-2019 Zadanie 12: Rozpoznawanie podmiotów o nazwie głębokim powiązaniu podmiotów geolokalizacyjnych', 'si': 'අරිසෝනා විශ්වාසිත්තාවේ සෙම්වල්-2019 වැඩ 12: Deep-Affix Named Unitity පිළිගන්න භූතිත්වය ඇන්තිත්වය', 'so': 'Jaamacadda Arizona ee SemEval-2019 Shaqada 12: Deep-Affix Named Entity Recognition of Geolocation Entities', 'sr': 'Univerzitet Arizona na semiEvalu-2019 zadatak 12: priznanje područja po imenu područja geolokacije', 'ta': 'செம்Eval- 2019 செயல் 12: ஆழம்- ஆஃப்கிக் பெயரிடப்பட்ட முகவரி அறிவிப்பு', 'sv': 'University of Arizona at SemEval-2019 Uppgift 12: Deep-Affix Named Entity Recognition of Geolocation Entities', 'ur': 'آریزونا کی یونیوریسٹ ۱۹۲۹ ٹاکس ۱۲ میں: عمیق آفریق نام کی اینٹیٹی شناسایی جئوٹیٹ ایٹیٹیوں کی', 'uz': 'SemEval- 2019 Vazifa 12: Deep- Affix nomi Entity Recognition of Geolocation Entities', 'vi': 'Đại học Arizona tại SemEvl-209 Task 12: Deep-Affix Tênd Entity recognition of Geolocation Enties', 'bg': 'Университет на Аризона в Задача 12: Дълбоко признаване на наименовани субекти на геолокация', 'nl': 'Universiteit van Arizona bij SemEval-2019 Taak 12: Deep-Affix Named Entity Recognition van Geolocation Entities', 'hr': 'Univerzitet Arizona na semiEval-2019. zadatak 12: priznanje područja po imenu područja Geolokacije', 'de': 'University of Arizona at SemEval-2019 Aufgabe 12: Deep-Affix Named Entity Recognition of Geolocation Entities', 'id': 'University of Arizona at SemEval-2019 Task 12: Deep-Affix Named Entity Recognition of Geolocation Entities', 'ko': '애리조나대학SemEval-19년임무12: 지리적 포지셔닝 실체의 깊은 명칭 실체 식별', 'fa': 'دانشگاه آریزونا در پایین اول-۲۰۱۹ کار ۱۲: شناسایی عنوان عنوان عمیق آفریق شرکت جایگاهی', 'sw': 'University of Arizona at SemEval-2019 Task 12: Deep-Affix Named Entity Recognition of Geolocation Entities', 'tr': 'Arizona Uniwersiteti SemEval-2019 Taýýary 12: Deep-Affix Named Entity Recognition of Geolocation Entities', 'af': 'Universiteit van Arizona by SemEval-2019 Opdrag 12: Deep-Affiks genoemde Eenheidwerkening van Geoligging Eenheidse', 'da': 'University of Arizona at SemEval-2019 Opgave 12: Deep-Affix navngivet enhed anerkendelse af geolocation enheder', 'hy': 'Արիզոնայի համալսարանը, 2019 թվականի "Սեմեվալ-2019" 12-րդ հանձնարարությունը, որը կոչվում է "Deep-Աֆֆիքս" գեոտեղաբանական հաստատությունների ճանաչելը', 'az': 'SemEval-2019 Üniversitesi Arizona 12. Gözəl: Deep-Affix Adlı Entity Recognition of Geolocation Entities', 'bn': 'সেমইভাল-২০১৯ কাজের বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের ১২: গভীর আফ্ফিক্সের নামের গোলোককশন এন্টিটি স্বীকার', 'bs': 'Univerzitet Arizona na semiEval-2019 zadatak 12: priznanje područja po imenu područja geolokacije', 'ca': 'University of Arizona at SemEval-2019 Task 12: Deep-Affix Named Entity Recognition of Geolocation Entities', 'cs': 'Arizonská univerzita na SemEval-2019 Úkol 12: Rozpoznávání geolokačních entit s hlubokou afixí', 'sq': 'University of Arizona at SemEval-2019 Task 12: Deep-Affix Named Entity Recognition of Geolocation Entities', 'am': 'Eval-2019 ስራ 12: Deep-Affix Named Entity Recognition of Geolocation Entities', 'et': 'Arizona Ülikool SemEval-2019 Ülesanne 12: Geolokatsiooni üksuste sügavkindlaksmääramine', 'fi': 'Arizonan yliopisto SemEval-2019 Tehtävä 12: Geolocation-yksiköiden syvä-affix-niminen yksikkötunnustaminen', 'jv': 'Universite di Arezone nang seminval-2011 task 12: deep-Affixed Named Entty RefGNtion of GElocation Entients', 'sk': 'Univerza v Arizoni na SemEval-2019 Naloga 12: globoko priznavanje imenovanih subjektov geolokacijskih subjektov', 'ha': 'University of Arzona at SemEal-2019 Tafiyar 12: Dedep-Affix Named Entity Recognition of Geolocation Entities', 'bo': 'University of Arizona at SemEval-2019 Task 12: Deep-Affix Named Entity Recognition of Geolocation Entities', 'he': 'אוניברסיטת אריזונה ב-SemEval-2019 משימה 12: זיהוי איכות בשם Deep-Affix'}
{'en': 'We present the Named Entity Recognition (NER) and disambiguation model used by the University of Arizona team (UArizona) for the SemEval 2019 task 12. We achieved fourth place on tasks 1 and 3. We implemented a deep-affix based LSTM-CRF NER model for task 1, which utilizes only character, word, pre- fix and suffix information for the identification of geolocation entities. Despite using just the training data provided by task organizers and not using any lexicon features, we achieved 78.85 % strict micro F-score on task 1. We used the unsupervised population heuristics for task 3 and achieved 52.99 % strict micro-F1 score in this task.', 'fr': "Nous présentons le modèle de reconnaissance d'entité nommée (NER) et de désambiguïsation utilisé par l'équipe de l'Université de l'Arizona (UArizona) pour la tâche 12 SemEval 2019. Nous avons obtenu la quatrième place pour les tâches 1 et 3. Nous avons mis en œuvre un modèle NER LSTM-CRF basé sur des affixes profonds pour la tâche 1, qui utilise uniquement des informations de caractère, de mot, de préfixe et de suffixe pour l'identification des entités de géolocalisation. Bien que nous n'utilisions que les données d'entraînement fournies par les organisateurs de tâches et que nous n'utilisions aucune fonction lexicale, nous avons obtenu un micro-score F strict de 78,85\xa0% pour la tâche 1 Nous avons utilisé l'heuristique de population non supervisée pour la tâche 3 et avons obtenu un score micro-F1 strict de 52,99\xa0% pour cette tâche.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos o modelo de Reconhecimento de Entidade Nomeada (NER) e desambiguação usado pela equipe da Universidade do Arizona (UArizona) para a tarefa 12 do SemEval 2019. Obtivemos o quarto lugar nas tarefas 1 e 3. Implementamos um LSTM-CRF NER baseado em afixo profundo modelo para a tarefa 1, que utiliza apenas informações de caracteres, palavras, prefixos e sufixos para a identificação de entidades de geolocalização. Apesar de usar apenas os dados de treinamento fornecidos pelos organizadores de tarefas e não usar nenhum recurso de léxico, obtivemos 78,85% de micro-F-score estrito na tarefa 1. Usamos a heurística de população não supervisionada para a tarefa 3 e alcançamos 52,99% de pontuação micro-F1 estrito neste tarefa.', 'ar': 'نقدم التعرف على الكيان المحدد (NER) ونموذج توضيح الغموض المستخدم من قبل فريق جامعة أريزونا (UArizona) لمهمة SemEval 2019 12. حققنا المركز الرابع في المهمتين 1 و 3. قمنا بتطبيق LSTM-CRF NER على أساس اللصق العميق نموذج للمهمة 1 ، والذي يستخدم فقط معلومات الأحرف والكلمات والإصلاح المسبق واللاحقة لتحديد كيانات تحديد الموقع الجغرافي. على الرغم من استخدام بيانات التدريب المقدمة من منظمي المهام فقط وعدم استخدام أي ميزات معجمية ، فقد حققنا 78.85٪ درجة F دقيقة صارمة في المهمة 1. استخدمنا استدلال المجتمع غير الخاضع للإشراف للمهمة 3 وحققنا 52.99٪ درجة micro-F1 صارمة في هذا مهمة.', 'es': 'Presentamos el Reconocimiento de Entidad Nombrada (NER) y el modelo de desambiguación utilizado por el equipo de la Universidad de Arizona (UArizona) para la tarea 12 de SemEval 2019. Logramos el cuarto lugar en las tareas 1 y 3. Implementamos un modelo LSTM-CRF NER basado en afijos profundos para la tarea 1, que utiliza solo información de caracteres, palabras, prefijos y sufijos para la identificación de entidades de geolocalización. A pesar de usar solo los datos de capacitación proporcionados por los organizadores de tareas y no usar ninguna función de léxico, logramos una puntuación micro F estricta del 78,85% en la tarea 1. Utilizamos la heurística poblacional no supervisada para la tarea 3 y logramos una puntuación micro-F1 estricta del 52,99% en esta tarea.', 'zh': '吾言亚利桑那大学团队(UArizona)以SemEval 2019事12名实体识(NER)与消歧义模形。 我于1、3得第四名。 吾为事 1 施于深缀之 LSTM-CRF NER ,以字符、单词、预定、后缀信以识地理之实体。 虽用组织者之教数,而不用一词典之功,1成78.85%之严F。 吾于任 3 用无监督总体启发式法,而于此 52.99% 严微 F1 分数。', 'ja': '私たちは、SemEval 2019タスク12のためにアリゾナ大学チーム（ UArizona ）が使用する名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）および曖昧さ解消モデルを提示します。タスク1と3で4位を達成しました。私たちは、タスク1のための深アフィックスベースのLSTM - CRF NERモデルを実装しました。これは、地理的位置エンティティの識別のために文字、単語、事前固定、およびサフィックス情報のみを利用します。タスクオーガナイザーが提供するトレーニングデータのみを使用し、辞書機能を使用していないにもかかわらず、タスク1で78.85 ％の厳格なマイクロFスコアを達成しました。私たちは、タスク3に監督されていない集団ヒューリスティックを使用し、このタスクで52.99 ％の厳密なマイクロF 1スコアを達成しました。', 'hi': 'हम नामित इकाई मान्यता (एनईआर) और एरिज़ोना विश्वविद्यालय की टीम (यूआरिज़ोना) द्वारा उपयोग किए जाने वाले बहुविकल्पी मॉडल को SemEval 2019 कार्य 12 के लिए प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हमने कार्य 1 और 3 पर चौथा स्थान हासिल किया। हमने कार्य 1 के लिए एक गहरे-चिपके हुए आधारित LSTM-CRF NER मॉडल को लागू किया, जो जियोलोकेशन संस्थाओं की पहचान के लिए केवल चरित्र, शब्द, पूर्व-फिक्स और प्रत्यय जानकारी का उपयोग करता है। कार्य आयोजकों द्वारा प्रदान किए गए प्रशिक्षण डेटा का उपयोग करने और किसी भी शब्दकोश सुविधाओं का उपयोग नहीं करने के बावजूद, हमने कार्य 1 पर 78.85% सख्त माइक्रो एफ-स्कोर हासिल किया। हमने कार्य 3 के लिए असुरक्षित जनसंख्या ह्यूरिस्टिक्स का उपयोग किया और इस कार्य में 52.99% सख्त माइक्रो-एफ 1 स्कोर हासिल किया।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем модель распознавания именованных сущностей (NER) и дезагрегирования, используемую командой Университета Аризоны (UArizona) для задачи SemEval 2019 12. Мы заняли четвертое место по задачам 1 и 3. Мы реализовали модель LSTM-CRF NER на основе глубокого индекса для задачи 1, которая использует только информацию о символах, словах, префиксах и суффиксах для идентификации объектов геолокации. Несмотря на использование только обучающих данных, предоставленных организаторами заданий, и без использования каких-либо лексических функций, мы достигли 78,85% строгого микро F-балла по заданию 1. Мы использовали неконтролируемую эвристику популяции для задачи 3 и достигли 52,99% строгой оценки микро-F1 в этой задаче.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair an tsamhail Aitheantais Aonán Ainmnithe (NER) agus an tsamhail dí-athbhrí a d’úsáid foireann Ollscoil Arizona (UArizona) do thasc SemEval 2019 12. Bhaineamar an ceathrú háit amach ar thascanna 1 agus 3. Chuireamar LSTM-CRF NER i bhfeidhm atá bunaithe ar dhomhain-affix. samhail do thasc 1, nach n-úsáideann ach faisnéis charachtair, fhocail, réamhshocrú agus iarmhír chun aonáin gheoshuímh a shainaithint. In ainneoin na sonraí oiliúna a sholáthraíonn lucht eagraithe tasc a úsáid agus gan aon ghnéithe foclóireachta a úsáid, bhaineamar amach 78.85% dianscór-F micrea ar thasc 1. Bhaineamar úsáid as heuristics daonra neamh-mhaoirsithe do thasc 3 agus bhaineamar amach 52.99% scór docht micrea-F1 sa mhéid seo. tasc.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენ ახარიზონას სონივერტის განახლება (NER) და განახლების მოდელი, რომელიც გამოყენებულია 2019 წლის SemEval მომუშაობისთვის. ჩვენ მივიღეთ მეოთხედი ადგილი 1 და 3-ზე. ჩვენ განვიყენეთ ყველაფერი, სიტყვის, წინ დაწყენებული LSTM-CRF NER მოდელი, რომელიც მხოლოდ გამოყენებს სიტყვის, სიტყვის, წინ დაწყენებული და სფექტური ინფორმაციის განსაზღვრება დავალების ორგანიზატორიების მონაცემების გამოყენება და არ გამოყენებული ლექსიკონის ფუნქციების გამოყენება, ჩვენ 78,85% სტრიქტური მიკრო F-score დავალება 1. დავალებით. ჩვენ სამუშაო სამუშაო მიკრო-F1 წარმოდგენა 52,99% სტრიქტური მიკრო-F1 წარმოდგენა.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk az Arizonai Egyetem (UArizona) által a SemEval 2019 feladathoz használt Nevezett Entity Recognition (NER) és egyértelműsítő modellt. Negyedik helyet értünk el az 1. és 3. feladaton. Az 1. feladathoz egy mély-affix alapú LSTM-CRF NER modellt vezettünk be, amely csak karakter-, szó-, előfix- és utótaginformációkat használ a geolokációs entitások azonosítására. Annak ellenére, hogy csak a feladatszervezők által biztosított képzési adatokat használtuk, és nem használtunk lexikon funkciókat, az 1. feladaton 78,85%-os szigorú mikro F pontszámot értünk el. A felügyelet nélküli populációs heurisztikát használtuk a 3. feladathoz és 52,99%-os szigorú mikro-F1 pontszámot értünk el ebben a feladatban.', 'kk': 'Біз Аризона университетінің (UArizona) 2019 жылдың 12. тапсырмасы үшін Аризона университетінің аталған нысандарды анықтау (NER) және белсендіру үлгісін таңдаймыз. Біз 1 мен 3 тапсырмалардың төртінші жерін жеткіздік. Біз 1- тапсырма үшін LSTM- CRF NER негіздеген терең ақпараттық үлгісін іске асырдық. Бұл тек қана таңбалар, сөз, алдын- түзеу және жұрнақты географиялық нысандарды идентификациялау ү Тапсырма бағдарламаларының өзгертілген оқыту деректерін пайдалануға қарамастан, біз 1- тапсырма үшін 78,85% жиі микро F- score жеткіздік. Біз 3- тапсырма үшін қолданылмаған адамдардың геуристикасын қолдандық. Бұл тапсырманың 52,99% жиі микро- F1 деңгейін жеткіздік.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome pavadintojo subjekto pripažinimo (NER) ir Arizonos universiteto komandos (UArizona) panaudoto nedviprasmiško modelio 2019 m. SemEval uždaviniui 12. We achieved fourth place on tasks 1 and 3.  Įgyvendinome giliai užfiksuotą LSTM-CRF NER model į 1 užduotyje, kuriame geolokacijos subjektams identifikuoti naudojama tik simbolio, žodžio, išankstinio nustatymo ir sufikso informacija. Nepaisant to, kad naudojome tik užduočių organizatorių pateiktus mokymo duomenis ir nenaudojame jokių lexikonų savybių, mes pasiekėme 78,85 proc. griežtą mikro F rezultatą 1 užduotyje. 3 užduotyje naudojome nepastebimą gyventojų heuristiką ir šioje užduotyje pasiekėme 52,99 proc. griežtą mikro-F1 rezultatą.', 'mk': 'Го претставуваме именуваното препознавање на ентитетите (НЕР) и моделот за раздвојување кој го користи тимот на Универзитетот на Аризона (УАризона) за задачата SemEval 2019 12. Ние постигнавме четврто место на задачите 1 и 3. Имплементиравме модел на LSTM- CRF NER базиран на длабоко прикачување за задача 1, кој користи само карактер, збор, префикс и суфикс информации за идентификација на ентитетите на геолокацијата. И покрај тоа што ги користевме само податоците за обука што ги обезбедуваат организаторите на задачите и не користевме никакви лексиконски карактеристики, постигнавме 78,85 отсто строг микро ф-резултат на задачата 1. Ние ја користевме ненадгледуваната популациска хеористика за задачата 3 и постигнавме 52,99 отсто строг микро-Ф1 резултат во оваа задача.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε το μοντέλο αναγνώρισης Οντότητας και διασάφησης που χρησιμοποιήθηκε από την ομάδα του Πανεπιστημίου της Αριζόνα (UArizona) για την εργασία 12. Καταφέραμε τέταρτη θέση στα καθήκοντα 1 και 3. Εφαρμόσαμε ένα μοντέλο βασισμένο σε βαθιά προσάρτηση για την εργασία 1, το οποίο χρησιμοποιεί μόνο πληροφορίες χαρακτήρων, λέξεων, προκαθορισμένων και επιθηκών για τον προσδιορισμό οντοτήτων γεωεντοπισμού. Παρά τη χρησιμοποίηση μόνο των δεδομένων κατάρτισης που παρέχονται από τους διοργανωτές εργασιών και τη μη χρησιμοποίηση των χαρακτηριστικών λεξικού, επιτύχαμε 78.85% αυστηρό μικρο-σκορ στην εργασία 1. Χρησιμοποιήσαμε την αδρανοποίηση του πληθυσμού χωρίς επίβλεψη για την εργασία 3 και πετύχαμε 52,99% αυστηρή βαθμολογία μικρο-F1 σε αυτή την εργασία.', 'it': "Presentiamo il modello di riconoscimento delle entità nominate (NER) e disambiguazione utilizzato dal team dell'Università dell'Arizona (UArizona) per l'attività SemEval 2019 12. Abbiamo raggiunto il quarto posto sui compiti 1 e 3. Abbiamo implementato un modello LSTM-CRF NER basato sull'affissione profonda per l'attività 1, che utilizza solo informazioni di carattere, parola, pre-fix e suffisso per l'identificazione delle entità di geolocalizzazione. Pur utilizzando solo i dati di allenamento forniti dagli organizzatori delle attività e non utilizzando alcuna funzionalità lessicale, abbiamo ottenuto il 78,85% rigoroso micro F-score sul compito 1. Abbiamo utilizzato l'euristica della popolazione non supervisionata per il compito 3 e abbiamo ottenuto il 52,99% di punteggio rigoroso micro-F1 in questo compito.", 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan Pengenalan Entiti bernama (NER) dan model penyelesaian yang digunakan oleh pasukan Universiti Arizona (UArizona) untuk tugas SemEval 2019 12. Kami mencapai tempat keempat dalam tugas 1 dan 3. Kami melaksanakan model NER LSTM-CRF berdasarkan afiks dalam untuk tugas 1, yang hanya menggunakan aksara, perkataan, pra-betul dan maklumat suffiks untuk pengenalpasti entiti geolokasi. Walaupun menggunakan hanya data latihan yang diberikan oleh pengatur tugas dan tidak menggunakan mana-mana ciri leksikon, kami mencapai 78.85% skor F-mikro ketat pada tugas 1. Kami menggunakan heuristik populasi yang tidak diawasi untuk tugas 3 dan mencapai skor mikro-F1 yang ketat 52.99% dalam tugas ini.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d പേര് എന്റിറ്റിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനെ കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2019 ജോലിക്ക് 12. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നാലാമത്തെ സ്ഥലം എത്തിയിട്ടുണ്ട് 1-3 ജോലികളില്\u200d. ജോയിസ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d വസ്തുക്കളുടെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു ആഴത്തില്\u200d ആഫിക്സ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ LSTM-CRF NER മോഡല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിച്ചിരിക് ജോലി സംഘടനക്കാര്\u200dക്ക് നല്\u200dകിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മാത്രമേ ഉപയോഗിച്ചുള്ളൂ, ലെക്സിക്ഷന്\u200d വിശേഷങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാതിരിക്കുകയുള്ളൂ, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d  We used the unsupervised population heuristics for task 3 and achieved 52.99% strict micro-F1 score in this task.', 'mt': "Aħna nippreżentaw il-mudell tar-Rikonoxximent tal-Entità Ismija (NER) u d-diżambigwazzjoni użat mit-tim tal-Università tal-Arizona (UArizona) għall-kompitu SemEval 2019 12. Kisbu r-raba' post fuq il-kompiti 1 u 3. Aħna implimentajna mudell NER LSTM-CRF ibbażat fuq twaħħil profond għall-kompitu 1, li juża biss informazzjoni dwar il-karattru, il-kelma, il-prefiss u s-suffiss għall-identifikazzjoni tal-entitajiet ġeolokazzjonali. Minkejja li ntużaw biss id-dejta tat-taħriġ ipprovduta mill-organizzaturi tal-kompiti u li ma ntużaw l-ebda karatteristiċi lexicon, laħaqna 78.85% mikro-punteġġ F strett fuq kompitu 1. We used the unsupervised population heuristics for task 3 and achieved 52.99% strict micro-F1 score in this task.", 'mn': 'Бид 2019 оны SemEval-ын 12 ажил дээр Аризоны Их Сургууль (UArizona) Аризоны Их Сургууль (НЕР) нэртэй Нэгдэл Recognition (НЕР) болон халдварлах загварын загварыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид 1, 3 даалгаварын дөрвөн орон хүртлээ. Бид ажлын 1-р LSTM-CRF NER загварын үндсэн гүн гүнзгий загварын загварыг ашигласан. Энэ нь зөвхөн хариу, үг, алдын загвар болон географийн байр суурь загварын тодорхойлолтын мэдээллийг хэрэглэдэг. Зөвхөн ажлын зохион байгуулагчид өгсөн сургалтын өгөгдлийг ашиглаж, ямар ч лексикон байдлыг ашиглахгүй ч бид 1 даалгаварт 78.85% жижиг F-score гаргасан. Бид 3 даалгаварын хувьд хүн амын хюристикийг ашиглаж, энэ даалгаварт жижиг-F1 оноо 52.99% хүртсэн.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer namnet entitetskjenning (NER) og disambiguasjonsmodellen brukt av Universiteten av Arizona-gruppa (UArizona) for semiEval 2019-oppgåva 12. Vi har oppnådd fjerde plass på oppgåver 1 og 3. Vi implementerte ein deep-affix basert LSTM-CRF NER-modell for oppgåve 1, som berre brukar teikn, ord, førefiks og suffiks- informasjon for identifiseringa av geoplasseringseiningar. Til tross å bruka berre opplæringsdata som oppgåver-organiserar gjev og ikkje bruka nokon leksikonsfunksjon, oppnådd vi 78,85% strek mikro F-score på oppgåve 1. Vi brukte den uavhengige populasjonen heuristiske for oppgåve 3 og oppnådd 52,99% streke mikro-F1- poeng i denne oppgåva.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy model rozpoznawania nazwanych podmiotów (NER) i rozpoznawania wykorzystywany przez zespół University of Arizona (UArizona) do zadania SemEval 2019 12. Osiągnęliśmy czwarte miejsce w zadaniach 1 i 3. Do zadania 1 wdrożyliśmy model LSTM-CRF NER oparty na głębokim umieszczeniu, który wykorzystuje tylko informacje o znakach, słowach, wstępnych i przyrostkach do identyfikacji jednostek geolokalizacyjnych. Pomimo wykorzystania tylko danych treningowych dostarczonych przez organizatorów zadań i braku żadnych funkcji leksykonu, osiągnęliśmy 78,85% ścisły mikro F-wynik w zadaniu 1. Zastosowaliśmy heurystykę populacji bez nadzoru do zadania 3 i osiągnęliśmy 52,99% surowy wynik mikro-F1 w tym zadaniu.', 'si': 'අපි අරිසෝනා කණ්ඩායම (UArisona) විශ්වාසයේ සෙම්වල් 2019 වැඩ 12 වෙනුවෙන් භාවිත කරලා තියෙන්නේ නම් ඇන්ටිටි ප්\u200dරතික්ෂණය (NER) ස අපි 1 සහ 3 වැඩේ හතරවෙනි තැන පටන් ගත්තා. අපි දුරස්ථානයේ LSTM-CRF NER නිර්මාණයක් පරිස්සම් කළා වැඩක් 1 වෙනුවෙන්, ඒකෙන් අක්ෂර, වචන, ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය සහ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය ස කාර්ය සංයෝජකයෙන් දෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය දත්ත පාවිච්චි කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැත්නම්, කිසිම ලෙක්සිකෝන් අවස්ථාවක් පාව අපි මේ වැඩේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පාවිච්චි කරලා තියෙන්නේ 3 වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන් හුර', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm modelul de recunoaștere a entității denumite (NER) și dezambiguizare utilizat de echipa Universității din Arizona (UArizona) pentru sarcina SemEval 2019 12. Am obținut locul patru la sarcinile 1 și 3. Am implementat un model LSTM-CRF NER bazat pe afix profund pentru sarcina 1, care utilizează numai caractere, cuvânt, pre-fix și sufixe informații pentru identificarea entităților de geolocalizare. În ciuda faptului că am folosit doar datele de instruire furnizate de organizatorii sarcinilor și nu am folosit caracteristici lexiconice, am obținut 78,85% micro F-scor strict la sarcina 1. Am folosit euristica populației nesupravegheată pentru sarcina 3 și am obținut 52,99% scor micro-F1 strict în această sarcină.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo model priznanja imenovanih entiteta (NER) i disambiguacije koji se koristi tim Univerziteta Arizona (UArizona) za zadatak 12. iz semiEvala 2019. Postigli smo četvrto mesto na zadatku 1 i 3. Implicirali smo model LSTM-CRF NER bazirani na dubokoj afiksi za zadatak 1, koji koristi samo karakter, reč, pre-popravak i sufiks informacija za identifikaciju geolokacijskih entitata. Uprkos korištenju samo podataka o obuci koje su pružili organizatori zadataka i ne koristeći neke leksikonske funkcije, postigli smo 78,85% strog mikro F-rezultata na zadatku 1. Koristili smo neodređenu populacijsku heuristiku za zadatak 3 i postigli 52,99% strog mikro-F1 rezultata u ovom zadatku.', 'so': 'Waxan soo bandhignaynaa magaca aqoonsashada ganacsiga (NER) iyo tusaale baaritaanka ee lagu isticmaalay jaamacadda Arizona (UArizona) ee shaqada SemEval 2019 12. Waxaannu gaadhnay goob afraad ee shaqada 1 iyo 3. Waxaannu sameeynay model LSTM-CRF NER oo ku saleysan waxyaabaha 1 oo kaliya u isticmaalaya xaraf, hadal, hore-fix iyo suffix macluumaad si loo aqoonsado alaabta meesha lagu helo. Inkastoo aan isticmaalin macluumaadka waxbarashada oo ay qabanqaabiyaan shaqaalaha oo aan isticmaalin waxyaabaha lexicon, waxaynu gaadhnay 78.85% oo adag micro F-score oo ku saabsan shaqo 1. Shaqo 3 ayaannu u isticmaalnay hiuristic dadka aan la ilaalinayn, waxaana gaadhnay 52.99% oo si adag u ah micro-F1 shaqo.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar den Named Entity Recognition (NER) och disambiguation modell som används av University of Arizona-teamet (UArizona) för SemEval 2019-uppgiften 12. Vi uppnådde en fjärde plats på uppdrag 1 och 3. Vi implementerade en djup-affix baserad LSTM-CRF NER modell för uppgift 1, som endast använder tecken, ord, prefix och suffix information för identifiering av geolokaliseringsenheter. Trots att vi bara använde träningsdata från uppgiftsarrangörer och inte använde några lexikonfunktioner uppnådde vi 78,85% strikt mikro F-poäng på uppgift 1. Vi använde den oövervakade populationsheuristiken för uppgift 3 och uppnådde 52,99% strikt mikro-F1 poäng i denna uppgift.', 'ta': 'நாம் பெயரிடப்பட்ட பெயர் உள்ளீட்டு அறிவிப்பு (NER) மற்றும் பாதுகாப்பு மாதிரி அமைப்பு ஆர்சோனா கல்லூரிக்கலைக்கு (UArizona) 12 செம்Eval 2019 பண 1 மற்றும் 3 பணிகளில் நான்காவது இடத்தை அடைந்தோம். நாங்கள் செயல் 1க்கு ஒரு ஆழமான பின்னணி அடிப்படையிலான LSTM- CRF NER மாதிரி முறைமையை செயல்படுத்தினோம். அது பூமி பொருளை அடையாளத்திற்கு மட்டும்  செயல் நிறுவுபவர்களால் வழங்கப்பட்ட பயிற்சி தரவு மட்டும் பயன்படுத்தி எந்த லெக்சியன் பணிகளையும் பயன்படுத்தாமல் நாம் 78.85% கடினமான சிறு F நாங்கள் செயல் 3 க்கான பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத மக்கள் வெளிப்பாடு', 'ur': 'ہم نے آریزونا ٹیم (UArizona) کے واسطے SemEval 2019 ٹاکس 12 کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا نام دار انٹیٹی Recognition (NER) اور disambiguation Model کو پیش کیا ہے. ہم نے 1 اور 3 کاموں پر چوتھا جگہ پہنچا۔ ہم نے کام ۱ کے لئے LSTM-CRF NER موڈل بنیاد رکھی ہے، جو صرف شخص، کلمات، پیش-فیکس اور سوفکس معلومات کے لئے استعمال کرتا ہے۔ صرف تابع سازمان کرنے والوں کے ذریعہ دیے گئے ترینس ڈیٹے کے استعمال کرنے کے بعد اور کسی لکسیون کے فائدے کے استعمال نہیں کرتے، ہم نے تابع 1 پر 78.85% سخت میکروٹی F-اسکور پہنچ لیا۔ ہم نے اس کام میں 52.99% سخت میکروفو-F1 اسکور کو استعمال کیا۔', 'uz': "Biz SemEval 2019 tashkilotlari uchun Arizona Universitet (UArizona) tomonidan foydalanuvchi modelni hosil qilamiz. Biz 1 va 3 vazifalarda 4 marta keldik. Biz vazifa 1 uchun eng yuqori AFF asosida LSTM-CRF NER modelini bajardik. Bu loyihani aniqlash uchun faqat belgi, soʻz, pre fix va suffix maʼlumotidan foydalanadi. Vazifalar tashkilotlari tomonidan berilgan taʼminlovchi maʼlumotni ishlatishda va hech qanday leksikan imkoniyatlarni ishlatilmagan bo'lsa, biz vazifa 1 bilan 78.85% katta mikro F- scorini bajardik. Biz vazifa 3 uchun saqlab qolmagan jamoat heuristika ishlatdik va bu vazifani 52.99% katta mikro-F1 scorini topdik.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi xin giới thiệu người được gọi là Entity recognition (NER) và disambigution model được dùng bởi đội University of Arizona (UAeriona) cho nhiệm vụ SemEvl 209. Chúng tôi được phân công thứ tư trong công việc 1 và 3. Chúng tôi đã tạo ra một mô hình LSTM-CRF dựa sâu vào. cho nhiệm vụ 1, dùng chỉ các dữ liệu, từ, trước sửa và đủ để xác định các thực thể địa vị. Mặc dù chỉ sử dụng dữ liệu huấn luyện được cung cấp bởi tổ chức tác vụ và không sử dụng tính năng ngôn ngữ nào, chúng ta đã đạt được 785.85. Chúng tôi sử dụng thần kinh dân không giám sát để thực hiện nhiệm vụ 3 và đã đạt được vị vi-F1 đầy đủ trong nhiệm vụ này.', 'bg': 'Представяме модела за разпознаване на наименовани субекти (НЕР) и разграничение, използван от екипа на Университета в Аризона (Уаризона) за задача 12. Постигнахме четвърто място по задачи 1 и 3. За задача 1 внедрихме модел, базиран на дълбока афикс, който използва само знаци, думи, предварително фиксиране и наставка за идентифициране на геолокационни обекти. Въпреки че използвахме само данните за обучение, предоставени от организаторите на задачите и не използвахме никакви лексиконни функции, постигнахме 78.85% строг микроскор при задача 1. За задача 3 използвахме невзрачната популационна евристика и постигнахме 52,99% строг микро-F1 резултат в тази задача.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer den Navngivne Entity Recognition (NER) og forståelsesmodel, der bruges af University of Arizona-teamet (UArizona) til SemEval 2019-opgaven 12. Vi opnåede fjerdepladsen på opgave 1 og 3. Vi implementerede en deep-affix baseret LSTM-CRF NER model til opgave 1, som kun bruger tegn-, ord-, pre-fix- og suffiksinformation til identifikation af geolocation enheder. På trods af at vi kun brugte træningsdata fra opgavearrangørerne og ikke brugte nogen leksikonfunktioner, opnåede vi 78,85% streng mikro F-score på opgave 1. Vi brugte den uopvågede befolkningsheuristik til opgave 3 og opnåede 52,99% streng mikro-F1 score i denne opgave.', 'nl': 'We presenteren het Named Entity Recognition (NER) en het disambiguation model gebruikt door het team van de Universiteit van Arizona (UArizona) voor de SemEval 2019 taak 12. We behaalden de vierde plaats op taken 1 en 3. We implementeerden een deep-affix gebaseerd LSTM-CRF NER model voor taak 1, dat alleen teken-, woord-, pre- fix- en achtervoegselinformatie gebruikt voor de identificatie van geolocatie entiteiten. Ondanks het gebruik van alleen de trainingsgegevens die door taakomganisaties worden verstrekt en geen lexicon functies, hebben we 78,85% strenge micro F-score behaald op taak 1. We gebruikten de onbeheerde populatieheuristiek voor taak 3 en bereikten 52,99% strenge micro-F1 score in deze taak.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo model priznanja imenovanih subjekta (NER) i disambiguacije koji se koristi tim Univerziteta Arizona (UArizona) za zadatak 12. iz semiEvala 2019. Postigli smo četvrto mjesto na zadatku 1 i 3. Implicirali smo model LSTM-CRF NER bazirani na dubokoj aficiji za zadatak 1, koji koristi samo znakove, riječi, pre-popravak i sufiks informacija za identifikaciju geolokacijskih entitata. Uprkos korištenju samo podataka o obuci koje su pružili organizatori zadataka i ne koristeći neke leksikonske funkcije, postigli smo 78,85% strog mikroF-rezultata na zadatku 1. Koristili smo neodređenu heuristiku populacije za zadatak 3 i postigli je 52,99% strogi mikro-F1 rezultat u ovom zadatku.', 'de': 'Wir stellen das Named Entity Recognition (NER) und das Begriffsklärungsmodell vor, das vom Team der University of Arizona (UArizona) für die SemEval 2019 Aufgabe 12 verwendet wird. Bei den Aufgaben 1 und 3 erreichten wir den vierten Platz. Wir implementierten ein Deep-Affix basiertes LSTM-CRF NER Modell für Aufgabe 1, das nur Zeichen-, Wort-, Präfix- und Suffixinformationen zur Identifizierung von Geolokalisierungseinheiten verwendet. Obwohl wir nur die von Aufgabenorganisationen bereitgestellten Trainingsdaten verwenden und keine Lexikon-Funktionen verwenden, erreichten wir 78,85% strengen Micro F-Score für Aufgabe 1. Wir nutzten die unbeaufsichtigte Populationsheuristik für Aufgabe 3 und erreichten 52,99% strenge Micro-F1 Punktzahl in dieser Aufgabe.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan Entitas Recognition (NER) dan model disambiguation yang digunakan oleh tim Universitas Arizona (UArizona) untuk SemEval 2019 tugas 12. We achieved fourth place on tasks 1 and 3.  Kami menerapkan model NER LSTM-CRF berdasarkan afiks dalam untuk tugas 1, yang menggunakan hanya karakter, kata, pre-fix dan informasi suffix untuk identifikasi entitas geolokasi. Meskipun menggunakan hanya data latihan yang diberikan oleh organisasi tugas dan tidak menggunakan fitur-fitur lexikon apapun, kami mencapai 78,85% skor F mikro ketat pada tugas 1. Kami menggunakan heuristik populasi yang tidak diawasi untuk tugas 3 dan mencapai 52,99% skor mikro-F1 ketat dalam tugas ini.', 'fa': 'ما مدل شناسایی واحد نامیده (NER) و ناآزمایش را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که توسط تیم دانشگاه آریزونا (UArizona) برای وظیفه ۱۲ سال ۲۰۱۹ استفاده می\u200cکند. ما نقطه چهارم در وظیفه\u200cهای ۱ و ۳ رسیدیم. ما یک مدل LSTM-CRF NER بنیاد عمیق برای کار ۱ را اجرای کردیم که تنها شخصیت، کلمه، پیش\u200cدرست و پیش\u200cدرست اطلاعات برای شناسایی واحدهای جایگاهی استفاده می\u200cکند. با وجود استفاده از داده\u200cهای آموزش که توسط سازمان\u200cکننده\u200cهای وظیفه\u200cای داده شده و از هیچ ویژگی\u200cهای لکسیون استفاده نکرده\u200cایم، ما 78.85 درصد نمونه\u200cی میکروفو F سخت در وظیفه ۱ رسیدیم. ما از هوریستیک جمعیت غیرقابل تحقیق برای کار ۳ استفاده کردیم و در این وظیفه ۲۲.۹۹ درصد امتیاز محکم میکروF1 را رسیدیم.', 'ko': '애리조나대학팀(Uarizona)이 SemEval 2019 임무 12에서 사용한 명명된 실체 식별(NER)과 기별 제거 모델을 소개했다.우리는 임무 1과 3에서 4등을 했다.우리는 임무 1을 위해 심층 접미사를 바탕으로 하는 LSTM-CRF NER 모델을 실현했는데 이 모델은 문자, 단어, 접두사와 접미사 정보만 이용하여 지리적 위치의 실체를 식별한다.비록 임무 조직자가 제공한 훈련 데이터만 사용하고 어떤 어휘 특징도 사용하지 않지만 우리는 임무 1에서 78.85%의 엄격한 마이크로 F 점수를 얻었다.우리는 임무 3에서 감독이 없는 단체 계발법을 사용했고 이 임무에서 52.99%의 엄격한 마이크로-F1 점수를 얻었다.', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha jina la kutambua Entity (NER) na model ya ubaguzi uliotumiwa na timu ya Chuo Kikuu cha Arizona (UArizona) kwa kazi ya SemEval 2019 12. Tumefanikiwa sehemu ya nne katika kazi 1 na 3. Tulitumia muundo wa NNER anayeishi LSTM-CRF kwa kazi 1, ambalo hutumia tabia, neno, maneno, uharibifu wa kabla na taarifa za kifo kwa ajili ya kutambua vitu vya eneo hilo. Pamoja na kutumia taarifa za mafunzo tu zilizotolewa na waandaaji wa kazi na sio kutumia vipengele chochote vya lexico, tulipata asilimia 78.85 ngumu za F-score katika kazi 1. Tulitumia takwimu za idadi isiyo na uhakika kwa ajili ya kazi 3 na tukapata vipimo vidogo vya F1 52.99 vigumu katika kazi hii.', 'af': "Ons stel die genoem eenheid herkenning (NER) en disambiguasie-model wat deur die Universiteit van Arizona-span (UArizona) gebruik word vir die SemEval 2019-taak 12. Ons het vierde plek op opdragte 1 en 3 bereik. Ons implementeer 'n diep- affiks gebaseerde LSTM- CRF NER model vir taak 1, wat slegs karakter, woord, vooraf- maak en vervolg inligting vir die identifikasie van geoligging entiteite gebruik. Ons het 78.85% sterk mikro F- score op taak 1 bereik. Ons gebruik die onbevolking heuristiek vir taak 3 en het 52.99% sterk mikro-F1 telling in hierdie taak bereik.", 'tr': "SemEval 2019 hemme zady 12-nji ýylda Arizona Uniwersiteti tarapyndan ullanýan Ady Entity Recognition (NER) we çykyş nusgyny görkezilýäris 1 we 3-de 4-nji ýer tapdyk. Biz 1 täblik üçin derin-affiks tabanly LSTM-CRF NER nusgasyny implementetdik. Diňe karakter, söz, ön-täblik we ýerleşik gabdalyklaryň kimligi üçin ullanýar. Taýýarlaryň düzenleyici tarapyndan berilen eğitim maglumatyny ulanmasa we hiç hili leksikon karakterlerini ulanmasa bile, biz 1-nji buýrukda 78.85% daş mikro F-score tapdyk. Biz 3-nji işe döwürlenmedik ilatyň heuristiklerini ulandyk we bu işde 52.99% kiçi mikro-F1 अ'i tapdyk.", 'sq': 'We present the Named Entity Recognition (NER) and disambiguation model used by the University of Arizona team (UArizona) for the SemEval 2019 task 12.  Ne arritëm vendin e katërt në detyrat 1 dhe 3. Ne zbatuam një model LSTM-CRF NER bazuar në lidhje të thella për detyrën 1, i cili përdor vetëm karakterin, fjalën, prefiksin dhe informacionin e sufiksit për identifikimin e njësive gjeolokalizuese. Megjithë përdorimin e thjeshtë të dhënave të trajnimit të dhëna nga organizatorët e detyrave dhe jo përdorimin e asnjë karakteristike lexikone, arritëm 78.85% të rreptë mikro-F në detyrën 1. Ne përdorëm heuristikën e popullsisë së pazgjidhur për detyrën 3 dhe arritëm 52.99% të rreptë mikro-F1 në këtë detyrë.', 'am': 'We present the Named Entity Recognition (NER) and disambiguation model used by the University of Arizona team (UArizona) for the SemEval 2019 task 12.  1 እና 3 ስራ ላይ አራተኛ ስፍራን አግኝተናል፡፡ አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር ምንም እንኳን የስራ አካባቢዎች እና ምንም ሌክሲን ምርጫዎች ሳይጠቀም የተጠቃሚ ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም እንኳን 78.85 በመቶ ትክክል የF-score በስራ 1 ላይ ደረስን፡፡ ለስራ 3 ያልተጠበቀውን የህዝብ አርጤክስነት ተጠቃቀምን በዚህም ስራ 52.99 በመቶ ብርቱ ሚክሮአዊ-F1 ነጥብ አግኝተናል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք Արիզոնայի համալսարանի (Արիզոնայի) թիմի օգտագործվող "ՆԵՌ"-ի և "Առազոնայի համալսարանի" մոդելը 2019 թվականի "Սեմեվալ" 12-ի համար: Մենք հասանք չորրորդ տեղը առաջին և երրորդ խնդիրների վրա: Մենք իրականացրեցինք ԼՍԹՄ-ԿՌՖ ՆԵՌ մոդել 1-ի համար, որը օգտագործում է միայն բնորոշ, բառ, նախաբեռ և սուֆիքս տեղեկատվություն երկրագծի հաստատությունների հայտնաբերելու համար: Չնայած այն, որ մենք օգտագործում էինք միայն խնդիրների կազմակերպողների տրամադրված ուսումնասիրության տվյալները և ոչ մի լեքսիկոնի առանձնահատկություններ, մենք հասանք 78.85 տոկոսի խիստ F-գնահատականի առաջին խնդիրը: Մենք օգտագործեցինք անվերահսկված բնակչության հորիստիկան 3-րդ հանձնարարության համար և այս հանձնարարության մեջ ստացանք 52.99 տոկոս խիստ միկրո-F1 գնահատականներ:', 'az': 'Biz 2019 √úniversitesi Arizona ekibi (UArizona) tarafńĪndan istifad…ô edil…ôn AdlńĪ Entity Recognition (NER) v…ô disambiguation modelini g√∂st…ôririk. Biz 1 v…ô 3 iŇüin d√∂rd√ľnc√ľ yerin…ô yetirdik. Biz 1. iŇüin i√ßind…ô LSTM-CRF NER modeli t…ôyin etdik ki, sad…ôc…ô karakteri, s√∂zl…ôri, …ôvv…ôlc…ô t…ôyin etdik v…ô geolokasyon m…ôlumatńĪnńĪn tanńĪmasńĪ √ľ√ß√ľn bilgil…ôri istifad…ô edir. ńįŇü organizatorlarńĪn t…ôhsil veril…ôn t…ôhsil m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪ istifad…ô etm…ôdikd…ô v…ô he√ß bir leksikon m√∂vzularńĪnńĪ istifad…ô etm…ôdikd…ô 78.85% s…ôrt mikro F-score taptńĪq. Biz 3. iŇü √ľ√ß√ľn m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edilm…ômiŇü n√ľfusu heuristik istifad…ô etdik v…ô bu iŇüd…ô 52.99% ciddi mikro-F1 n√∂qt…ôsini q…ôbul etdik.', 'bn': 'আমরা সেমইভাল ২০১৯ কাজের জন্য বিশ্ববিদ্যালয় আরিজোনা বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের (উয়ারিজোনা) ব্যবহার কর্তৃক নামের এন্টিটি স্বীকৃতি এবং বি ১ এবং ৩ কাজে আমরা চার্থ জায়গা পেয়েছি। আমরা একটি গভীর আফ্রিক্স ভিত্তিক LSTM-CRF NER মডেল ব্যবহার করেছি কাজের জন্য, যা শুধুমাত্র অক্ষর, শব্দ, পূর্ব- ঠিক করা এবং স্থানীয় বস্তুর পরিচয়ের জন কাজের সংগঠকদের দ্বারা প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য ব্যবহার করে এবং কোন লেক্সিকোন বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে না সত্ত্বেও আমরা কাজের ১ম কাজে ৭৮. আমরা অরক্ষিত জনসংখ্যার হিউরিস্টিক ব্যবহার করেছিলাম ৩ কাজের জন্য এবং এই কাজে ৫২.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo model priznanja imenovanih podataka (NER) i disambiguacije koji se koristi tim Univerziteta Arizona (UArizona) za zadatak 12. iz semiEvala 2019. Postigli smo četvrto mjesto na zadatku 1 i 3. Implicirali smo model LSTM-CRF NER bazirani na dubokoj afiksi za zadatak 1, koji koristi samo karakter, riječ, pre-popravak i sufiks informacija za identifikaciju geolokacijskih entitata. Uprkos korištenju samo podataka o obuci koje su pružili organizatori zadataka, a ne koristeći neke leksikonske funkcije, postigli smo 78,85% strog mikro F-rezultata na zadatku 1. Koristili smo neodređenu heuristiku populacije za zadatak 3 i ostvarili 52,99% strog mikro-F1 rezultata u ovom zadatku.', 'ca': "We present the Named Entity Recognition (NER) and disambiguation model used by the University of Arizona team (UArizona) for the SemEval 2019 task 12.  We achieved fourth place on tasks 1 and 3.  Vam implementar un model NER LSTM-CRF basat en afixes profunds per a la tasca 1, que només utilitza caràcter, paraula, pre-fix i sufixe informació per identificar les entitats geolocalitzades. Malgrat utilitzar només les dades d'entrenament proporcionades pels organitzadors de tasques i sense utilitzar cap característica lexicònica, vam aconseguir un 78,85% estricte puntuació F a la tasca 1. Vam utilitzar la heurística de la població no supervisada per la tasca 3 i vam aconseguir un 52,99% estricte puntuació micro-F1 en aquesta tasca.", 'cs': 'Představujeme model rozpoznávání jmenovaných entit (NER) a rozcestník použitý týmem University of Arizona (UArizona) pro úkol SemEval 2019 12. V úkolech 1 a 3 jsme dosáhli čtvrtého místa. Pro úlohu 1 jsme implementovali model LSTM-CRF NER založený na deep-affixu, který pro identifikaci geolokačních entit využívá pouze informace o znacích, slovech, prefixech a příponách. Navzdory použití pouze tréninkových dat poskytnutých organizátory úkolů a nepoužití žádných lexikonových funkcí jsme dosáhli 78,85% přísného mikro F skóre na úkolu 1. Pro úkol 3 jsme použili heuristiku populace bez dozoru a dosáhli jsme 52,99% přísného skóre mikro-F1.', 'et': 'Tutvustame Arizona Ülikooli meeskonna (UArizona) poolt SemEval 2019 ülesande 12 jaoks kasutatud nimelise üksuse tunnustamise (NER) ja selgitusmudelit. Me saavutasime neljanda koha ülesannetes 1 ja 3. Rakendasime ülesande 1 jaoks sügavkinnitusel põhineva LSTM-CRF NER mudeli, mis kasutab geolokatsioonisubjektide identifitseerimiseks ainult märgi-, sõna-, eelkinnituse- ja liiteandmeid. Vaatamata sellele, et kasutasime ainult ülesannete korraldajate poolt antud koolitusandmeid ja ei kasutanud ühtegi leksikoni funktsiooni, saavutasime 78,85% range mikroskoori ülesandel 1. Me kasutasime järelevalveta populatsiooni heuristikat 3. ülesandel ja saavutasime 52,99% range mikro-F1 skoor.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme Arizonan yliopiston tiimin (UArizona) käyttämän Nimettyjen yhteisöjen tunnistamisen (NER) ja erottelumallin SemEval 2019 -tehtävässä 12. Pääsimme neljänneksi tehtävissä 1 ja 3. Toteutimme tehtävään 1 syväkiinnitykseen perustuvan LSTM-CRF NER -mallin, joka hyödyntää vain merkki-, sana-, ennakko- ja loppuliite-tietoja geolokaatioyksiköiden tunnistamiseen. Huolimatta siitä, että käytimme vain tehtävien järjestäjien antamia koulutustietoja emmekä käyttäneet sanastoominaisuuksia, saavutimme 78,85% tiukan mikro F-pisteen tehtävässä 1. Käytimme valvomatonta populaatioheuristiikkaa tehtävään 3 ja saavutimme 52,99% tiukan mikro-F1 pisteen tässä tehtävässä.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe nambah Entité RefGNtion 1=3 We set Ngawe lagi nggambar data nggawe nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nggawe sistem-sistem lan ora nggambar cara-cara nggawe Leksikan, nggawe wis ditunggawe 75.5% tapi mikro F-puntu kanggo nggawe 1 task. Awak dhéwé nggunakake kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo nggawe barang uristik kanggo nggawe barang-uristik kanggo nggawe barang-uristik kanggo nggawe barang-uristik kanggo nyenggawe lan nggawe barang-uristik iki luwih dumateng miir-F1', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo vam model prepoznavanja imenovanih subjektov (NER) in razjasnitve, ki ga je ekipa Univerze v Arizoni (UArizona) uporabila za nalogo SemEval 2019 12. Pri nalogah 1 in 3 smo dosegli četrto mesto. Za nalogo 1 smo izvedli model LSTM-CRF NER, ki uporablja samo informacije znakov, besed, predfiks in pripone za identifikacijo geolokacijskih entitet. Kljub uporabi zgolj podatkov o usposabljanju, ki jih zagotavljajo organizatorji nalog, in brez uporabe leksikonskih funkcij, smo dosegli 78,85% strog mikro F-rezultat pri nalogi 1. Za nalogo 3 smo uporabili nevrolirano populacijsko heuristiko in dosegli 52,99% strogo oceno mikro-F1.', 'ha': "Tuna halarce the Named Entity Recognition (NER) and dismbanuation Model used by the University of Arzona (UArzona) for the SemEal 2019 job 12. Mun sãmi na huɗu a kan aikin 1 da 3. Mun samar da wani misali na LTRM-CRF mai asansa na-babba wa aikin 1, wanda ke amfani da amfani da takardar, magana, pre-fixi da kuma babu wani maɓalli wa gane abun jigon. Babu amfani da kawai da data na shirin mai aikin aiki da kuma ba mu yi amfani da wasu fassarar leksisini ba, sai muka isa 78.85% mai tsanani micro F-score kan aikin 1. Mun yi amfani da heuristics ga umarnin da ba'a tsare ba ga aikin 3 kuma muka sami 52.99% mai tsanani micro-F1 cikin wannan aikin.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོའི་མིང་བཏགས་པའི་Entity Recognition (NER)དང་རྩ་བ་སྒྲིག་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་གཙོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཨ་རིའི་ནང་ཁག་མཐོང་ཁང་(UArizona)ལ་SemEval 2019 ལས་ཀ་གནད་དོན་ལ་ཟ ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་གཞན་དང་། ༡། ༣་རྣམས་ལ་ཐུག་པ་ཡིན། We implemented a deep-affix based LSTM-CRF NER model for task 1, which utilizes only character, word, pre-fix and suffix information for the identification of geolocation entities. བྱ་འགུལ་དོ་དམ་པ་ཚོགས་ཀྱིས་བྱིན་པའི་སློབ་གྲྭར་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་ང་ཚོས་78.85%ས་གནས་ཚུལ་གཞན་ ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་ནང་གི་གྲངས་འབོར་ཚད་ལྡན་གྲངས་སུ་འབོར་ཐབས་མེད་པའི་ནང་གི་མིར་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལྡན་གྲངས་གསུམ་སྒྲིལ་འགོད་', 'he': 'We present the Named Entity Recognition (NER) and disambiguation model used by the University of Arizona team (UArizona) for the SemEval 2019 task 12.  השגנו מקום רביעי במשימות 1 ו-3. השקענו מודל NER LSTM-CRF מבוסס עמוק למשימה 1, אשר משתמש רק באופי, מילה, מידע מראש לתקן וסופקס לזהות יחידות גיאומייקציה. למרות השימוש בסך הכל במידע האימוני שנספק על ידי מארגני המשימה ולא השתמש בכלל תכונות לקסיקון, השגנו 78.85% נקודת F קשה במשימה 1. השתמשנו בהוריסטיקה של האוכלוסיה ללא השגחה למשימה 3 והשגנו נקודת מיקרו-F1 קשה של 52.99% במשימה הזאת.'}
